No. 9 Minnesota used an 18-2 run over the final seven minutes to beat No. 18 Michigan State , 76-63, on Monday, opening Big Ten play with an emphatic win over a team that has owned the Gophers for years.Michigan State (11-3) had beaten Minnesota (13-1) in 13 of the past 15 meetings.The Spartans led by 5 points with less than 8 minutes 30 seconds to play and they were throwing their weight around at Williams Arena in Minneapolis once again. But Minnesota did something it rarely does against Michigan State: it pushed back. Andre Hollins had 22 points and 6 assists and Rodney Williams added 15 points and 6 rebounds.INDIANA 69, IOWA 65 Cody Zeller had 15 of his 19 points in the second half and No. 5 Indiana (13-1) opened Big Ten play with a win at Iowa (11-3). Victor Oladipo scored 14 points for the Hoosiers, who ended a four-game losing streak in Iowa City.GONZAGA 69, OKLA. ST. 68 Kevin Pangos scored 23 points and made the clinching free throws with 4.3 seconds left, and No. 10 Gonzaga (13-1) edged No. 22 Oklahoma State to spoil one of the Cowboys' most anticipated nonconference games at Gallagher-Iba Arena in decades. Marcus Smart led Oklahoma State (10-2) with 23 points but missed two free throws with 8.7 seconds left and the Cowboys trailing by 2.CINCINNATI 70, PITTSBURGH 61 Cashmere Wright scored 18 points and Sean Kilpatrick added 16 to help No. 14 Cincinnati (13-1) open its Big East schedule with a win. Talib Zanna led No. 24 Pitt (12-2) with 16 points, but the Panthers missed all 10 of their 3-point attempts.SYRACUSE 96, CENT. CONN. ST. 62 No. 7 Syracuse (12-1) won at home to give Orange Coach Jim Boeheim his 902nd career win, tying him with Bob Knight for second among Division I coaches. Duke's Mike Krzyzewski leads with 939.N.C. ST. 89, U.N.C. GREENSBORO 68 U.N.C. Greensboro lost to No. 23 North Carolina State after losing Trevis Simpson to a freak injury. Simpson, the nation's 15th-leading scorer, was walking to the pregame meal at the team hotel when an automatic door opened. Caught by surprise, Simpson flinched and heard a pop in his right ankle.KANSAS ST. 70, NORTH DAKOTA 50 Nino Williams scored 16 points and No. 25 Kansas State (11-2) pulled away late. Trailing by 12 points at halftime, South Dakota cut the lead to 5 with less than eight minutes left.UCONN 95, OREGON 51 Kaleena Mosqueda-Lewis scored 19 points and No. 1 Connecticut (12-0) celebrated its return to the top of the rankings with an easy win at Oregon. Earlier in the day, the Huskies took over the No. 1 spot in the Associated Press poll for the first time since the end of the 2010-11 season.NOTRE DAME 128, ST. FRANCIS (PA.) 55 Markisha Wright scored 20 points for No. 5 Notre Dame (10-1), which forced 33 turnovers and turned them into 49 points. Notre Dame's next game is its Big East opener Saturday at Connecticut.U.C.L.A. 73, ST. JOSEPH'S 65 Thea Lemberger tied her career high with four 3-pointers in scoring 20 points to lead No. 16 U.C.L.A. (9-2) at home.LOUISVILLE 88, TENN. ST. 25 Monique Reid scored 20 points and Sara Hammond and Sheronne Vails each had double-doubles for No. 11 Louisville (12-2), which tied its record for fewest points allowed. The 63-point margin of victory was the sixth largest in Cardinals' history; they notched the second largest with a 74-point win over Wagner in their last game, on Dec. 21.
In his first meaningful act as the Nets' interim head coach, P. J. Carlesimo sat down with Deron Williams and laid out his mission, a broad outline for leading the Nets to success."I told him exactly what I needed him to be," Carlesimo said Tuesday. "I needed him to be Deron Williams."This is more complicated than it sounds.The Nets need the Deron Williams who led the Utah Jazz to the Western Conference finals in 2007, the Deron Williams who became an All-Star at 25, the Deron Williams who was, not long ago, widely regarded as one of the two best point guards on earth (along with Chris Paul).The Nets need the Deron Williams they thought they had acquired from Utah on Feb. 23, 2011, the one whose mere presence could reinvigorate a franchise, change perceptions, inspire greatness, energize a borough, start a new era.The Nets have rarely seen that Deron Williams this season, or for that matter, since he arrived 22 months ago. The Deron Williams they have seems a little lost, a little broken, a little fatigued and not quite sure of himself.If this sounds like some sort of existential crisis, it is. And it threatens to undermine everything the Nets hoped to accomplish with a $330 million roster makeover last summer.All of the team's grand hopes begin with a presumption: that Williams is an elite point guard. At the moment, not even Williams can make that assertion."I don't think I'm playing like one," he said Tuesday morning. "I think I can be. But I've just got to figure this thing out. Try not to panic, hopefully not talk about it too much."With that, Williams smiled ruefully at the reporters who were asking him to talk about it, knowing full well that the questions would not recede until his game returned to form.Williams is averaging a rather ordinary 16.3 points and 7.5 assists a game this season, while shooting a career-low 39.9 percent from the field.At his peak, in 2008-9, he averaged 19.4 points and 10.7 assists while shooting 47.1 percent. He shot 45.6 percent or better in each of his last four full seasons in Utah."I just played with more bounce there," Williams said.No one compares Williams with Paul anymore, and he might not even make a top-10 list of point guards. As of Tuesday, he had the 20th-best player efficiency rating at his position.Williams's struggles are not the sole reason the Nets have lost 11 of their last 16 games. They are having erratic production from Joe Johnson, their other All-Star, and a once-promising bench has faltered badly. Injuries to Brook Lopez and Gerald Wallace have disrupted their fragile chemistry.Nor was Williams the sole culprit in the Nets' humiliating 104-73 loss to the San Antonio Spurs on Monday. He scored all 5 of their points in a record-low third quarter.Yet undeniably it is Williams who, as the point guard and the franchise star, carries the greatest burden and who has the greatest ability to reverse the Nets' fortunes, if only he can find his game."I'm disappointed in how I'm playing," he said. "I've had stretches where one or two games I had off-games, but never like this, never consistently playing this bad."Williams has been the first to call himself out after poor performances, admitting at various times that he has lost confidence while trying to play down various injuries that have surely affected his performance.Earlier this week, General Manager Billy King added another item to the list: the likelihood that Williams is fatigued after playing for the United States Olympic team last summer. Williams agreed, admitting that he barely took a break during the 2012 off-season. For that matter, he has had little time off since September 2011, when he began playing in Turkey during the N.B.A. lockout.In a typical off-season, Williams said he takes a one-month break. But last year, he kept training in advance of the Olympics and resumed personal workouts right after he returned from London."I thought it was the best thing to do," Williams said Monday, "and now looking back, it probably would have been smarter to take some time off and get a little bit of rest, especially just on my legs, my ankles in general, because they took a lot of pounding over the last year."Williams has been dealing with a sprained right ankle and bone spurs in his left ankle, which will probably require off-season surgery.The theories on his struggles do not end there.Williams at one point cited the Nets' isolation-heavy playbook, saying he was more comfortable with Utah's motion offense. Ethan Sherwood Strauss of Bleacher Report last month analyzed Williams's shooting trends and concluded that he simply is not getting in the lane for high-percentage shots as much as he once did.David Locke, the Jazz's radio commentator, has pointed to the right wrist injury that Williams sustained in February 2011, noting that all of Williams's statistics have declined since then. Williams had surgery on the wrist that April. He has fallen on it several times this season and ices it after every game."I felt like I shot a lot better before my wrist surgery," Williams conceded. "I played the last year and a half in Utah with a bad wrist. It's one of those things where I shot a certain way for two and a half years, because of the wrist. I don't know if it's changed my shot or what, but my shot hasn't felt the same since."Having said all of that, having embraced every possible explanation for his struggles, Williams concluded, "It's not injuries; it's just in my head, and I've got to get it out."And the existential crisis goes on.
OKLAHOMA CITY — A smile crossed Deron Williams's face late Wednesday, a new, joyful look to usher in a new calendar year, along with what appeared to be an entirely new Nets team.The Nets hustled, passed with a purpose, defended with pride, skipped happily around the court and hit shots from various places and angles. Their offense flowed, their defense held and everyone looked a little livelier in a 110-93 rout of the Oklahoma City Thunder at Chesapeake Energy Arena.They roared to an early 23-point lead, absorbed the Thunder's furious fourth-quarter rally and — after allowing a momentary tie — closed the game with an authoritative 25-8 run.This was not the Nets team that lost 11 of 16 games in December or the one that was humiliated on both Christmas Day and New Year's Eve. This was a fluid, confident group, powering past the defending Western Conference champions, in a building where the Nets had never won, and just two days after a calamitous defeat in San Antonio.No pure basketball explanations would suffice, so Williams just grinned and pointed to the calendar."It's a new year," he said, beaming. "It's 2013."This was, to be certain, the Nets' biggest victory of the season. They beat the Thunder for the first time in eight tries, won in Oklahoma City for the first time, period, and ended the Thunder's 12-game home winning streak, dealing them just their third loss here this season.Joe Johnson powered the offense with 33 points and an efficient 11-for-19 shooting performance. Brook Lopez added 25 points while fighting through the N.B.A.'s best defensive front line.Williams was masterful as both a passer (13 assists) and scorer (19 points), showing a renewed bounce in his step. He looked neither injured nor uncomfortable nor lacking confidence as he led the Nets (17-15) to their first victory over a winning team since November."Hopefully, we just can realize that this is how we can play, every night, and how we should play," said Williams, who also had a season-high five steals.The victory gave P. J. Carlesimo a 3-1 record as the Nets' interim coach, and a victory over the team that fired him just 13 games into the 2008 season."What I said to them is, We've set the bar a little bit high," Carlesimo said. "We showed ourselves what we're capable of doing."Along the way, the Nets — with the assistance of the officials — flustered Kevin Durant into the first ejection of his six-year career, with 1:57 left to play and the Thunder trailing by 14 points. Durant finished with 27 points, 5 rebounds and 5 assists, but he earned two quick technical fouls for barking at the official Danny Crawford."I said it was a bad call," Durant said. "They got a quick trigger now on techs."The Thunder tied the game only once in the second half, at 85-85 with just over seven minutes to play. Johnson, Williams and Lopez combined for the final push that put the game away.Russell Westbrook had 26 points and 10 assists for the Thunder (24-7).Even in a tight fourth quarter, the Nets seemed looser: witness Williams and Keith Bogans laughing as they walked into a timeout after Bogans shot an air ball from the arc.The Nets had a 16-point lead at halftime. As one would expect, the Thunder came roaring back in the third quarter. Durant and Westbrook fueled a 21-8 run with a combination of 3-pointers and electrifying fast-break dunks, cutting the Nets' lead to 71-68."We kept our composure," Johnson said. "Things didn't look so bright and we still was a confident group out there."Lopez answered with two quick baskets as the Nets momentarily held off the charge. They closed the third with a 76-72 lead and with Carlesimo bellowing angrily at Kris Humphries for a poor pass that prevented another Nets score before the buzzer.Gerald Wallace returned to the lineup after a one-game absence and spent most of his night wrestling with Durant, doing his best to throw him off rhythm, if that is even possible.Durant mostly had his way although, incredibly, he did not attempt a free throw until the 1:06 mark of the third quarter.Thunder Coach Scott Brooks spent half of his pregame session praising the Nets, as if their disastrous December had never happened, and as if he knew they had a second life in them.He called Williams "one of the best point guards in the game," despite his season-long struggles, and called Lopez "one of the best bigs in the league at scoring the basketball."Brooks concluded, presciently, "I'm sure eventually it's going to click, and they're going to turn it around."At halftime, the Nets held a 61-45 lead, setting the stage for either their greatest victory of the season, or the most gut-wrenching collapse one could imagine.Johnson, Williams and Lopez combined for 42 points in the half, while making 17 of 28 shots. Johnson had 20 points — more than he had scored in any of his previous five games. Williams had nine assists by halftime, more than his prior two games combined."I think we've shown that we can be one of the top teams in this league," Johnson said.C. J. Watson was in uniform but did not play because of a bruised right knee. The rookie Tyshawn Taylor took his spot in the rotation, playing nine minutes. It was the first game Watson has missed this season, leaving Joe Johnson and Andray Blatche as the only Nets to play in every game. ... Jerry Stackhouse was held out of the game because of a sore right hamstring.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — As the 2012-13 season has progressed, the Knicks have gradually become less of a defensive-minded team, and it is having an impact on their record.While the Knicks, at 21-10, still have the second-best record in the Eastern Conference, they have gone 5-5 in their last 10 games and are too often allowing their opponents to get comfortable on offense early. That, in turn, has forced the Knicks to spend much of the remainder of the game trying to rally.The Knicks rank a modest 15th in the league in points per game allowed, after starting the season right at the top. More troubling, over those last 10 games, they have allowed an average of 101.3 points per game, which ranks a dismal 25th for that span. In five of those games — against the Portland Trail Blazers, the Sacramento Kings, the Minnesota Timberwolves, the Chicago Bulls and the Houston Rockets — the Knicks also found themselves trailing by 10 or more points at least once. Only against the Timberwolves, who were playing without their best player, Kevin Love, did the Knicks rally to win.But it is the last two games — both losses — that have been particularly troubling for Coach Mike Woodson. The Kings, one of the weakest teams in the N.B.A., built a 27-point second-quarter lead over the Knicks last Friday. On Tuesday, the Trail Blazers, a team slightly over .500, built a 19-point lead at Madison Square Garden.The Knicks rallied and nearly won in each instance, but that counts as a moral victory only, if that.The Knicks have flattened out as a team after their stunning start to the season, and more than anything, they seem to have lost their defensive edge."I don't care what teams you're playing in this league," Woodson said at practice Wednesday. "When you spot yourself 20 points and have to fight back, it can bite you in the butt a lot of times."When the season began, Woodson and his Knicks focused much of their time and attention on defense. It showed. The Knicks led the league in points per game allowed (88.9) in the first three weeks. In that stretch, they went 8-1."Early on, we were committed and we were getting after each other a little bit," Woodson said of his players' defensive approach. "There's been a major drop from the time we started."It is clear that the biggest defensive problems are occurring in the first half.According to Basketball-Reference.com, the Knicks rank 28th in the league this season based on points allowed per 100 possessions. In the second half, though, their defense tightens up significantly.Injuries have clearly had an impact on the Knicks, who are now playing without Raymond Felton and Rasheed Wallace. Wallace, in particular, strengthened the Knicks' interior defense and encouraged his teammates to communicate on the court. Without him, Woodson said, fewer players are talking to one another on defense.But Woodson knows he cannot simply point to absent players as an excuse for the team's less inspired play, and he strongly hinted Wednesday that he might alter the starting lineup."We have to make some changes, because I don't like the way we have started the last few outings," he said. "If you're going to put on the uniform and play, you have to be committed on defense."In Wednesday's practice, Woodson spent much of his time trying to get his team to re-energize defensively. But three key players — Carmelo Anthony, Tyson Chandler and Jason Kidd — were not even on the court, having been given the day off to rest. All three are expected to play Thursday against the San Antonio Spurs, one of the league's top teams.In that game, and the two that follow, the Knicks' perimeter defense, in particular, will be tested. In general, the Knicks have performed poorly against young, quick point guards. With Felton out, Woodson will have to find a way to neutralize the Spurs' Tony Parker, Orlando's Jameer Nelson and Boston's Rajon Rondo. It will not be easy."We have to start taking more pride in guarding the basketball," Woodson said. "That's going to be the key. If you guard the ball, we don't have to rotate as much and everyone can stay home and guard their man. We have to get back to that."
LeBron James scored 32 points and finished an assist shy of a triple-double, Dwyane Wade had 27 points, and the Miami Heat beat the visiting Dallas Mavericks , 119-109, in overtime on Wednesday night.The Heat trailed by 12 in the opening minutes and then dug their way out of a 6-point hole in the final 3 minutes 2 seconds of regulation.James had 12 rebounds and 9 assists for the Heat, who went on a 16-3 run late, including a 7-0 start to overtime."We have ultimate confidence in our team, our talent level, our execution," said Chris Bosh, who scored 17 points for Miami.O. J. Mayo scored 30 points for the Mavericks, who fell to 0-6 in overtime this season.GRIZZLIES 93, CELTICS 83 Mike Conley had 23 points and 9 assists as visiting Memphis sent Boston to its fourth straight loss.SPURS 117, BUCKS 110 Tim Duncan had 28 points and 13 rebounds, and visiting San Antonio won its seventh straight game.ROCKETS 104, HORNETS 92 James Harden had 31 points and 7 assists for host Houston, which outscored New Orleans, 60-28, in the paint.BULLS 96, MAGIC 94 Carlos Boozer had a season-high 31 points and 11 rebounds, and visiting Chicago, playing without center Joakim Noah (flulike symptoms), hung on for a win.Jameer Nelson missed a jumper in the closing seconds that would have tied the score, and Orlando lost its seventh straight.KINGS 97, CAVALIERS 94 Jason Thompson scored 19 points, and DeMarcus Cousins added 18 as Sacramento earned its second road victory of the season.Cleveland's Anderson Varejao missed his seventh straight game with a bruised right knee.RAPTORS 102, TRAIL BLAZERS 79 Terrence Ross scored a career-high 26 points, and host Toronto snapped an eight-game losing streak against Portland. The Raptors had last beaten the Trail Blazers on Jan. 13, 2008.IN OTHER GAMES Luis Scola scored 19 of his 21 points in the second half, and host Phoenix beat Philadelphia, 95-89, to snap a six-game skid. ... Paul George had 29 points and 13 rebounds as Indiana beat Washington, 89-81, at home. ... Gordon Hayward scored 17 points, and Utah beat visiting Minnesota, 106-84, to snap a three-game losing streak.OWNER'S SON FOUND DEAD The son of the Los Angeles Clippers' owner, Donald Sterling, was found dead, apparently of a drug overdose, at his home in Malibu, Calif., the authorities said.The body of the son, Scott Ashley Sterling, 32, was found shortly after 11:30 p.m. Tuesday, Lt. Larry Dietz of the Los Angeles County coroner's office said.Donald Sterling, 77, and his wife released a statement thanking friends for their sympathy, asking for privacy and saying their son was diabetic, but did not indicate what role, if any, that may have played in his death.A friend of Scott Sterling's called the police after not hearing from him for several days, according to a statement from the County Sheriff's Department.Dietz said the death appeared to be accidental, but an autopsy was planned.
LAS VEGAS — It is a Monday afternoon, and one of the most controversial figures in college basketball history sits quietly at the end of a rectangular table at Landry's, a seafood restaurant on West Sahara Avenue that is, both physically and metaphorically, a long, long way from the glitz and glitter of the Strip.The man's silence is jarring. All around him people are talking about the glory days of Nevada-Las Vegas basketball, but the man, Jerry Tarkanian — the Shark, the coach who won more than 700 games, earned a national championship and went to four Final Fours, all while fighting the N.C.A.A. and chomping wet towels on the sideline — stays mum.When Harvey Hyde, a former U.N.L.V. football coach, recalls how Frank Sinatra tried to help with basketball recruiting a few times, Tarkanian barely raises his head. (Sinatra was not all that successful; one of his targets, a New York prospect named Jim Graziano, went to South Carolina to play for Frank McGuire instead.)When Brad Rothermel, the former athletic director, laughs as he recalls the day Tarkanian heard some assistant coaches talking about how Bo Derek "was a 10" and said, with absolute sincerity, "We need to start recruiting him right away," Tarkanian does not chortle with the rest. He does not even look up.The stories keep flowing: the time when Tarkanian nearly got the coaching job at Indiana (the Hoosiers ended up hiring a man named Bob Knight); the back story to his nickname (it came from a Los Angeles Times columnist); even the history of Tarkanian's predilection for sucking on those towels. His son, Danny, explains that Tarkanian began the practice while coaching a high school team that played in a gym so hot it perpetually left Tarkanian with cotton mouth."He couldn't very well keep running to the water fountain!" Danny says. The others giggle; Tarkanian barely moves.As glasses clink and the room fills around them, Tarkanian stays hunched over, his fork going up and down slowly, like a rickety elevator. At one point Danny whispers beneath the din, "You O.K., Dad?" and Tarkanian stirs. "I'm ... good," he croaks, but then he stares, quizzically, as Danny gestures over and over at his own chin. Eventually, Danny sighs; after a quick glance around, he surreptitiously reaches across the table to wipe a speck of salad from his father's mouth."It is different now," Danny says softly to the man sitting next to him. "There are different issues."Jerry Tarkanian is 82. His health, which began deteriorating about four years ago when he fell while walking in San Diego, has declined to the point that basic movements are difficult. When someone comes by for an introduction during the meal at Landry's, Tarkanian shakes hands with his left hand because his right is anchored to the table, as if to keep him from slumping over. His eyes, which drooped like week-old balloons when he was 40, now seem to hang to his neck. After eating, as Tarkanian makes his way to the parking lot, he hesitates as he steps down from the curb, putting his hand on the shoulder of a visitor and grunting hard as he guides his walker a few inches in front of him.His Division I coaching career, which covered 31 seasons, 3 colleges and countless hearings, depositions and court dates as he fought the governing body of the sport he loves, feels far away. In the car on the way back to the family home, a two-story Spanish-style house that Tarkanian and his wife, Lois, bought in 1973, he is asked about his years of plenty. He nods twice when the championship team of 1990 is mentioned. He shakes his head when asked to remember coaching against John Wooden. "Played him three times," he says slowly. "Lost all three." He looks out the window. "Should have won one of them."As the car pulls into the driveway, past the mailbox with the basketball on it and around the corner from the small backyard court where friends and relatives and college students and celebrities have played casual games, Tarkanian is asked if he still watches basketball. For the first time all day, his face brightens. He smiles. "It's on all the time," he says. "We didn't have so much TV when I was coaching."And what does he think when he watches these days? Tarkanian turns in his seat and hacks through a laugh. It is almost as if he is trying to chuckle."I think," he says as he wipes his mouth with the back of his hand, "that it looks familiar."
WASHINGTON — It did not seem to dawn on the Nets until late in the fourth quarter that, two days after stunning the N.B.A.'s best team, they were trailing the worst.It was precisely the situation that Coach P. J. Carlesimo had feared, sensing before the game that a letdown might be looming. The Nets, wrapping up a road swing, were following a monumental win in Oklahoma City on Wednesday, and have a home game on Saturday against Sacramento.But on Friday here at the Verizon Center, the Nets (18-15) needed every second of double overtime to beat the Wizards, 115-113. Joe Johnson hit the go-ahead jumper with 0.7 seconds remaining."I knew I wasn't going to pass," Johnson said.Johnson's final basket ended a staggering, back-and-forth affair. The Nets trailed by as many as 14 in the first half and were down by 8 points with 1 minute 27 seconds left in the first overtime.But they clawed back and even led, 104-101, before the Wizards rookie Bradley Beal hit a 3-pointer at the buzzer to send the game into a second overtime. Carlesimo said he normally would have fouled in that situation, but the team had not practiced it."I think the worst thing you can do is put them in a situation where you haven't worked on something," Carlesimo said.Exactly one month after the Wizards (4-27) upset the Miami Heat here, the Nets nearly fell victim in the same fashion: flagging intensity, porous defense and an early deficit that nearly proved impossible to overcome.It was almost as Carlesimo had described in a warning before the game, knowing the dramatic swings his team has taken from game to game this season. The Nets went 11-4 in November and 5-11 in December, and lately it seems their mission is to prove which record better reflects the truth.They lost by 31 to San Antonio on Monday, in what Carlesimo considered probably their worst game of the year. Then they beat Oklahoma City by 17 on Wednesday, in what might have been their best.Despite that, Carlesimo did not feel the team overlooked the Wizards, though the Nets trailed, 55-52, at halftime."I think it's a good win to hang in the way we did," Carlesimo said. "Yes, we feel we can play better. But that's not fair to these guys. These guys played the hell out of it tonight."Brooklyn's defense on Friday was suspect from the outset. Washington, the worst-scoring team in the league, averaging just 88.7 points on 40.6 percent shooting, scored a season-high 30 points in the first quarter."We didn't come out with the same effort and intensity that we did at O.K.C.," Johnson said. "We may have underestimated this team a little bit."Deron Williams said, "It's not how we wanted to come out."The Nets did not take a lead until 7 minutes 9 seconds remained in the game, and from there the score continued going back and forth. Beal tied it, 86-86, with a thunderous dunk a minute later, and Jordan Crawford gave the Wizards another lead with a 3-pointer.The Nets had a chance to win it with 18.7 seconds left. After the ball swung around, Williams found Gerald Wallace underneath, but he missed the layup. Lopez flushed the rebound home over Nene, but that lead lasted only 2.4 seconds before Nene came back with a floating hook shot to tie the score with 0.8 seconds left in regulation."I botched my defensive assignment, what more can I say?" Lopez said. "I shouldn't have let him go so strong with his right hand."The Wizards scored the first 8 points in overtime, but the Nets cut their lead to 3 with 57.5 seconds left, and a Williams layup brought the margin down to one. Crawford missed two free throws with 14.1 seconds remaining, and Nene fouled Lopez on the rebound.Lopez hit both free throws to give Brooklyn a 102-101 lead. Crawford then missed a fall-away jumper from the top of the arc with 5.9 seconds remaining. But, ahead by 104-101, the Nets opted not to foul Beal, who got an open shot at the wing after a superb screen from Emeka Okafor.Beal drilled the 3-point jumper to send the crowd into a frenzy. In the second overtime, the Wizards hit just 3 of 8 shots, but they still managed to tie the score with 9.1 seconds left on free throws by Beal.But they could not win it. Johnson got the ball and made the most of his chance with it.Kris Humphries was held out of Friday's game after spraining his left ankle in Wednesday's game. Guard C. J. Watson also missed his second consecutive game with a bruised right knee.
After listening to Doc Rivers lecture the Boston Celtics at halftime, Paul Pierce told his teammates to respect their coach and follow orders."We were kind of bickering at each other a little bit too much, figuring out what defense we were going to run," Pierce said. "And I just had to say that the fight ain't with one another. It's against the other team on the court."With Rajon Rondo completing a triple-double — 14 points, 11 rebounds and 10 assists — Boston rallied for an 89-81 victory over the host Atlanta Hawks on Saturday night.Pierce scored 17 of his 26 points in the third quarter as the Celtics erased a 19-point deficit.The Hawks started fast, then fell apart in the third quarter as Boston began double-teaming ball handlers and clamping down on Atlanta inside. Atlanta, which had 13 turnovers and 3 assists in the second half, shot just 2 for 14 in the third quarter.Hawks Coach Larry Drew called it "probably the most disappointing loss of the season," given that the Hawks have given up big leads all season ."We've seen this kind of scenario before where we've played well and then when it starts to get more physical, we don't respond," Drew said. "That was clearly what happened tonight."PACERS 95, BUCKS 80 Roy Hibbert had 20 points, 15 rebounds and 5 blocked shots to lead Indiana over visiting Milwaukee.Hibbert grabbed a career-high 11 offensive rebounds as the Pacers won their seventh straight home game. George Hill added 14 points after missing Indiana's previous three games with a groin injury.ROCKETS 112, CAVALIERS 104 James Harden scored 29 points, including 16 in the fourth quarter, as visiting Houston defeated Cleveland. Jeremy Lin added 20 points for Houston, which has won 11 of its last 14.Harden made 6 of 17 field-goal attempts but was 14 of 15 at the free-throw line and had a career-high seven steals.BLAZERS 102, T'WOLVES 97 Nicolas Batum and Wesley Matthews each made five 3-pointers and scored 26 points to lead visiting Portland over injury riddled Minnesota.Nikola Pekovic led the Timberwolves with 21 points but left in the third quarter because of a left hip strain. Only hours earlier, Minnesota learned it had lost the star forward Kevin Love because of a broken right hand for the second time this season.Ricky Rubio was scratched for the fourth straight game because of back spasms.SPURS 109, 76ERS 86 Tony Parker scored 20 points and Manu Ginobili 19 as San Antonio rolled at home, where it has won 10 straight games.Philadelphia has lost three straight and five of its last six.HORNETS 99, MAVERICKS 96 Eric Gordon completed a 3-point play with 4.7 seconds left in overtime, and visiting New Orleans spoiled Dallas's first game this season with Dirk Nowitzki starting.Nowitzki had a team-high 20 points in 34 minutes. He missed a free throw with 18 seconds left in regulation that would have put the Mavericks ahead by a point.NUGGETS 110, JAZZ 91 Danilo Gallinari scored 26 points, and Denver rebounded from a rare home loss to beat visiting Utah.Andre Iguodala added 18 points for the Nuggets, who improved to 11-2 at home this season after Minnesota snapped their eight-game winning streak at Pepsi Center on Thursday.
ORLANDO — The one-on-one shootout inside Amway Center on Saturday night featured a strange pairing. In the fourth quarter, Carmelo Anthony , the league's second-leading scorer, was being challenged by a career-long role player, a former teammate and a friend, the Orlando Magic 's Arron Afflalo.Anthony accepted Afflalo's challenge, and the two dueled in the game's final seven minutes. Afflalo did his best to keep the Magic in the game. He banked in a 3-pointer, fought his way to the free-throw line and drove to the basket on Anthony without looking for his teammates.After each of Afflalo's baskets, however, Anthony calmly ran down the court and asked his teammates for the ball. Anthony made almost every kind of shot in the fourth quarter: the turnaround jumper, the driving layup, the turnaround fadeaway jumper, the spot-up baseline jumper and the straight-ahead 3-pointer.Anthony did all this while half the crowd, most of them Knicks fans who knew Anthony was having a special performance, showered him with "M-V-P!" chants, and the Knicks went on to secure a 114-106 victory."It feels good to hear it," Anthony said. "I wasn't expecting that on the road here in Orlando. That was a special moment."Anthony, as in so many games this year, was the difference for the Knicks (23-10). He produced a game-high 40 points in 45 minutes — with 16 in the fourth quarter."I was doing whatever it took to win the game," he said.Anthony was almost as dangerous passing the ball as he was shooting it. He finished with a season-high six assists.As Anthony helped the Knicks pull in front, Jason Kidd secured the victory with less than two minutes remaining.When the play began, Anthony noticed the Magic (12-21) were trying to double-team him. Anthony quickly passed the ball to J. R. Smith (18 points), who hesitated before dribbling a few times and finding Kidd in the corner. Kidd, who played the last six minutes with five fouls, swished a 3-pointer to give the Knicks a commanding 109-102 lead.The well-executed play thrilled Coach Mike Woodson, who pumped his right fist multiple times in celebration."I thought Kidd's 3 in the corner was huge," Woodson said. "That's what we've got to do and trust that guys are going to make shots when they've got to make them."Kidd said the play illustrated Anthony's growing ability to recognize defenses."That's the beauty of this team," he said. "No matter if we hadn't touched the ball, we have to be prepared for them to take the ball out of Carmelo's hands."The Magic led by 89-81 to start the fourth quarter behind strong play by Jameer Nelson, who finished with 29 points. But Nelson, who ended the third quarter by beating the Knicks off the dribble in pick-and-roll plays, did not score in the final quarter.The Magic instead went to Afflalo, who played with Anthony in Denver from 2009 to 2011. Afflalo also finished with 29 points, scoring 9 in the fourth quarter. But on defense, Afflalo could not stop Anthony, whom he had to guard for much of the game.After the game, Afflalo and Anthony hugged. They knew they had pushed each other."I know it's special every time he plays against me," Anthony said of Afflalo. "He gets up for these games, and he played extremely well."At the start of training camp, Anthony said he did not want to score 35 or 40 points for the Knicks to win games. But Anthony, who has scored 40 or more points three times this season, knew the Knicks needed him to score in the final minutes."I know there are going to be nights like tonight where I have to get it going in the fourth quarter for us to win the game," he said. "Coming into the game, that's not what I'm thinking, but tonight was an exceptional night."In honor of his brother Hazell, whose birthday was Jan. 4, Amar'e Stoudemire invited 30 children from his hometown, Lake Wales, Fla., to attend the game. Hazell was killed Feb. 6, 2012, when his S.U.V. collided with a tractor-trailer in Lake Wales. "It's still very emotional for me," Stoudemire said. "I've been thinking about him all day and all night." ... Rasheed Wallace, who has a stress fracture in his left foot, traveled with the team but did not play. He was listed as day to day.
It is too soon to declare a return to normalcy, or even to define what normalcy means to a Nets franchise that is still in its Brooklyn-era infancy and inventing new and confounding identities every few weeks.So call this a return to November form — a return to fluid offense, semirespectable defense and just enough grit to hold it all together for a while.The Nets won their third straight game Saturday night, a 113-93 rout of the Sacramento Kings at Barclays Center, for their best stretch since a five-game winning streak in the final week of November. They have won five of six games since P. J. Carlesimo replaced Avery Johnson as the coach, and again seem headed in the right direction."We knew the type of team we could be," Deron Williams said, "and now we're just seeing that come back to life."The schedule has helped, with four of the last five wins coming against losing teams. But the streak gained legitimacy with a 17-point rout of the Oklahoma City Thunder on Wednesday, and the Nets (19-15) gained traction because of Williams's resurgence and the emergence of a suddenly potent bench.The second unit, led by MarShon Brooks, Mirza Teletovic and Andray Blatche, scored 50 points Saturday night and turned the game into a rout in the second quarter. The Nets, playing their sixth game in nine days, badly needed the boost, especially after extending their starters in a double-overtime victory in Washington the night before.Williams (15 points), Joe Johnson (15) and Brook Lopez (18) produced when needed, but they took on a much lighter load."You're going to laugh, but I feel as good as I felt after Oklahoma City," because of the difficult circumstances, Carlesimo said. "This was a heck of an effort by our team."Brooks continued his January revival, scoring 15 points while shooting 7 for 14 from the field in 27 minutes. Teletovic added 14 points, a career high. And Blatche continued his steady production, with 15 points and 11 rebounds.The "Broook-lyn" chants even returned in the final seconds, for once unprompted by the arena's sound system."I think we woke up," Williams said, pointing to Avery Johnson's firing as the turning point. "I think that was an eye-opener when Coach got let go, that we got to play better. We knew we were capable of playing better. For some reason, we couldn't get out of the rut we were in."If the Nets are to join the N.B.A.'s elite — an aspiration they still have this season despite their December derailment — they will eventually have to beat the good teams, too. But their 12-0 record against losing teams (the best such record in the league) is enough for now to keep them in playoff contention, even with a 7-15 record against winning teams.The Kings (13-21) are again wallowing at the bottom of the Western Conference, but they had played better lately, winning six of nine games before Saturday, including quality victories over Golden State, Portland, the Knicks and Boston. They had won two straight to start this trip behind the dominance of DeMarcus Cousins.Cousins had 28 points and 11 rebounds Saturday, but the Nets mostly kept him contained in the first half, when they established the rout. The Nets never let the lead dip below 13 points in the second half and led by as many as 24 in the fourth quarter.The second-quarter burst came primarily from Teletovic and Brooks, two players who had been all but shut out of Johnson's rotation. They have re-emerged in part out of necessity, because of injuries. But they have also gained confidence as Carlesimo has expanded their roles."It's definitely huge," Brooks said, adding, "It's just tough not playing for a while and then just having to react to that."Teletovic scored 9 points in nine minutes in the second quarter, and Brooks added 10 points, including a fast-break dunk and a circus-shot fadeaway. The bench was so effective that Carlesimo left his three stars — Williams, Joe Johnson and Lopez — on the bench until there were 3 minutes 4 seconds left in the half, after the margin had dipped to 12 points."P. J. was very straight up to me," Teletovic, a rookie, said, adding: "He told me: 'I know what you're capable of. I just want you to have confidence once you get into the game.' "Known as a shooter, Teletovic hit twice from behind the arc, but he also attacked the defense and, in one of the highlights of the night, blocked Cousins in the lane."It was a good feeling," Teletovic said. "I really like to show the people I can do really lots more things than shooting 3-pointers."Mirza Teletovic became the last Nets player to attempt a free throw this season when he went to the foul line early in the second quarter Saturday. Teletovic had played 105 minutes and attempted 43 field goals before earning his first foul shot. ... Kris Humphries missed his third straight game because of a sprained ankle.
At first glance, Tyson Chandler's strategy appears odd: an N.B.A. center who chooses at times not to grab an offensive rebound. After all, the 7-foot-1 Chandler is one of the tallest players in the league. He is expected to get rebounds.Yet sometimes when the Knicks are on offense, Chandler will judge that he cannot grab the rebound with two hands because he is not in the best position. When defenders take that option away, Chandler will jump high, try to locate where his teammates are on the floor and use his right hand to tap the ball out to one of them on the perimeter.As rare as it is for a low-post player to execute such a skill, it has become one of the Knicks' most effective plays.In the past 10 games, Chandler has attempted to tap the ball back to a teammate 27 times. Of those attempts, the Knicks have corralled the offensive rebound 17 times (63 percent). The Knicks have gone on to score 12 times on the second-chance opportunities.Chandler performed the tap-out play to perfection in the Knicks' victory against the San Antonio Spurs on Thursday. In the first quarter, Chandler pushed the ball to a wide-open Carmelo Anthony, who made a 3-pointer.The technique is evidence of Chandler's evolution to a more offensive-minded player a year after he was named the league's defensive player of the year.A majority of Chandler's highlights this season have come on alley-oop dunks off pick-and-roll plays. But Chandler said he enjoyed tapping the ball out to an open teammate just as much as dunking because he knows the play is an important weapon for a Knicks team that features a number of strong shooters."It's been something that I've kind of just fell into over the course of my career," Chandler said. "I've done it in the past, but now I think me and my teammates are starting to get a rhythm on it. I'm starting to know where they are on the floor. It's an effective play."Few players in the league have the physical attributes and the court awareness to do it well.Mike Breen, a play-by-play broadcaster for MSG and ESPN, has called N.B.A. games for 21 years. Breen said he had never seen a player consistently tap the ball out for offensive rebounds the way Chandler does. That could be why Chandler ranks third in the league in offensive rebounding (4.3 per game) despite ranking ninth over all (10.3).In recent Knicks games, Breen said, he has watched Chandler closely to anticipate the play.In the N.B.A., there are statistics for just about everything, but there is none for tapping the ball away from the basket so that a teammate might get a rebound. By N.B.A. rules, rebounds are credited to the first player who gains clear possession of a ball immediately after a missed shot (or to the player who tips the ball into the basket). But Chandler sometimes does not get a chance to see where his teammates are before he swats the ball away from defenders in traffic.Chandler is credited with an offensive rebound if he makes a clean, direct tap-out to a teammate. When the Knicks have to chase for the ball after Chandler's tap-out, official scorekeepers will award the offensive rebound to the player who tracks down the ball.In the past 10 games, Chandler has been credited with an offensive rebound on 12 of his 17 successful tap-outs to teammates, based on a review of play-by-play narratives in Associated Press box scores. But no matter who gets the credit for an offensive rebound, it is clear that Chandler's play has helped the Knicks win.Chandler's biggest tap-out of the season came in the Knicks' victory against the Nets on Dec. 11."In the last timeout, I told the guys before we went out there I was getting grabbed and held down," Chandler said. "I said: 'I can't come up with the rebound, so be ready. Don't run away so quick because I'm probably going to get my hands on it and tap it out. So be ready to retrieve it.' "Chandler's teammates paid attention in the final minute, and Anthony was in position for Chandler's tap-out over the Nets' Andray Blatche. The offensive rebound, which was awarded to Anthony, led to Jason Kidd's winning 3-pointer with 24 seconds left.Kidd said Chandler's tap-out technique was a good example of how a player can sacrifice for the team's success.
PHILADELPHIA — The Nets needed something to readjust their focus from the distraction involving center-forward Andray Blatche on Tuesday, and it came quickly, unexpectedly, as Reggie Evans collected rebound after rebound.Evans had nine after the first quarter, enough to generate nods of encouragement from teammates. By intermission, with 16 rebounds, the 6-foot-8 Evans had tied a franchise mark for a half, sweat barely beginning to glisten atop his shaved head.Evans was subtle, and he scored only 2 points, but his presence was dominating in Brooklyn's 109-89 win over the Philadelphia 76ers at the Wells Fargo Center.The win was the Nets' fourth in a row, though it felt as though they needed to shout that distinction. Coach P. J. Carlesimo grew visibly irritated with questions before the game about Blatche, who was questioned as a witness by police after a 21-year-old woman claimed she had been sexually assaulted in a hotel suite where he was present. Television cameras were positioned outside the team hotel in downtown Philadelphia throughout the afternoon."Besides what was going on, we just needed to win," guard Deron Williams said. "We wanted to win bad. And we played well."Evans, who finished with a career-high 23 rebounds despite not playing in the fourth quarter, spearheaded that effort. His rising rebounding tally became an impressive sideshow. He outrebounded Philadelphia, 7-3, in the third quarter. By the start of the fourth, Evans had nearly as many rebounds (23) as the Sixers did (24)."Do I feel like I'm going to get every one?" Evans said. "When you're in the zone, you're just in the zone. If you don't get all of them, you'll get the majority of them."Evans finished just shy of the Nets record of 27 set by Buck Williams in a four-overtime game in 1987. "They play a lot of small ball so you've got to want to take advantage," Evans said of Philadelphia.Brooklyn outscored Philadelphia, 35-14, in the third quarter and assisted on 7 of its 14 field goals. "That was probably the best third quarter we've had all year," guard Joe Johnson said.It gave the Nets a 22-point lead they could coast with through the final 12 minutes, and some reassurance that they are hitting their stride under Carlesimo, who has helped reignite Williams.He scored 22 points on 7-of-11 shooting and has averaged 20 points on 48.1 percent shooting this month, after scoring just 16.9 points per game on 40.8 percent shooting in December. With him, the Nets are averaging 112 points, while holding opponents to 97, during the four-game streak."The ball's moving, guys are hitting open shots," Williams said. "It's more fun that way."Blatche, who scored 20 points, received some scattered boos as he entered the game with 3 minutes and 38 seconds left in the first quarter.Blatche appeared unfazed, shooting 8 of 15 from the field with 7 rebounds. He was not available for comment before or after the game. In a statement Tuesday afternoon, Nets General Manager Billy King said the team would have no further comment until the investigation has concluded.Carlesimo simply praised Blatche for blocking out the distraction."Players are very, very resilient, they really are," Carlesimo said. "One of the traits of N.B.A. players is they come at 7 or 7:30 ready to play and they really don't bring any other interference into the game normally. Guys come and they play."Forward Kris Humphries returned to action Monday after missing the previous two games with a sprained left ankle. He scored 2 points in 10 minutes. ... Guard Jerry Stackhouse was inactive for a third consecutive game for personal reasons.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — Carmelo Anthony said he was wrong. He said he played Monday night's game against the Boston Celtics out of character. About 15 hours after he lost his cool and put himself in line for a possible suspension, Anthony acknowledged on Tuesday that he allowed trash talking from Kevin Garnett to get to him in a nasty-edged contest that the Knicks lost to their Atlantic Division rivals."I lost my composure yesterday," Anthony said to reporters after the Knicks' practice. "I accept that. But there are certain things that push certain people's buttons."But what exactly they were, what Garnett might have said, Anthony did not want to address, although he offered hints."It's certain things that you just don't say to men," Anthony said. "But we're both at an understanding right now. That situation has been handled."It was handled, Anthony said, because he and Garnett finally did talk, although Anthony wouldn't say where or when. But that conversation took place only after a shouting and cursing Anthony first tried to confront Garnett outside the Celtics' locker room after Monday's game and then tried to get to him again as Garnett and his teammates were boarding their team bus outside Madison Square Garden.Anthony said he sought out Garnett because he wanted to talk things through like "grown men." But he created a volatile situation that required the intervention of security guards, police officers and even Knicks Coach Mike Woodson and teammate J. R. Smith to keep Anthony away from Garnett.Although he was the clear aggressor in the postgame uproar, Anthony said he hoped he would not receive a suspension from the N.B.A., which is investigating what occurred."Nothing happened for me to be suspended," he said. "I went and wanted to talk to K. G. I think it was something we both needed to get off our chests and really see what the problem was."Even Boston Coach Doc Rivers, who was upset with Anthony after the game, said on Tuesday that he did not think Anthony deserved a suspension."I think the fans pay and buy tickets to watch the players play, not be suspended," Rivers said after the Celtics practiced in Boston. "No matter how bad things are, I think the fans still pay to watch the guys. Fine him or do something else."Garnett did not speak to reporters after Tuesday's practice.Both Anthony and Woodson said they had not been contacted by the league as of Tuesday afternoon. The N.B.A. was expected to make a ruling before the next Knicks game, on Thursday in Indiana.In a similar situation earlier this season, the league suspended Sacramento's DeMarcus Cousins for two games for confronting Sean Elliott, the broadcast analyst for the San Antonio Spurs, after a game. In 2006, Anthony, then playing for the Denver Nuggets, was suspended for 15 games for punching the Knicks' Mardy Collins during a melee at Madison Square Garden.Monday's confrontation between two of the league's elite players began early in the fourth quarter when Garnett was called for a foul on Anthony. Garnett yelled at the referees while Anthony barked at Garnett. A few possessions later, the two were each given technicals for shouting expletives and pushing each other near midcourt."Kevin is not going to back down or go anywhere," Rivers said of Garnett, who, at 36, is 8 years older than Anthony. "Watch that tape. Kevin did nothing wrong throughout the game. He just played hard. He was defiant, stubborn on defense, didn't give you anything easy — and that's how you're supposed to play defense. Sometimes it bothers people."Garnett clearly upset Anthony, who continued to curse Garnett on the court and bumped him numerous times after the whistle was blown. When the game ended, Anthony headed right into the tunnel that leads to the Celtics' locker room, rushing past his teammate Kurt Thomas, who tried to keep him on the court, and then past two security guards.Anthony's focus on Garnett didn't help his performance. He went just 6 of 26 from the floor, an uncharacteristically poor shooting performance that contributed to the Knicks' loss. Woodson said he and Anthony talked Tuesday morning about how Anthony should have handled the situation better."He's been playing at a high level and he likes winning," Woodson said of Anthony. "He just can't have slippage like that. This is strictly about the team. It's not about individuals. That's what I'm hammering home."Anthony's anger with Garnett on Monday night underlined a troubling pattern for both him and the Knicks this season. In four losses — to Chicago, Memphis, Houston and the Celtics — the Knicks have also lost their poise and have committed 12 technical fouls. Anthony alone has four of those technicals, a weak spot in what has otherwise been a superb season in which he has generated talk that he could end up as the league's most valuable player."I allowed some negativity to come into my circle," Anthony said of Monday's episode. "But it's over with for me."That, of course, he will still have to prove.
Andray Blatche came to Brooklyn last fall with a troubled past, a tantalizing athletic profile and the promise of a clean slate. The Nets offered a one-year contract and the chance for a career rebirth. Blatche pledged to become a more responsible citizen.The early results, both on the court and off, were encouraging.But in the predawn hours on Tuesday, a 21-year-old woman claimed that she had been sexually assaulted in a Philadelphia hotel suite where Blatche was present.Blatche, 26, was questioned by the police as a witness, but he was not being accused of any wrongdoing."From all accounts, he was not personally involved in any kind of assault or anything like that," said the police commissioner, Charles H. Ramsey, who added, "He was there, but he was not involved."Nets officials declined to comment, other than to release a statement confirming that one of their players was involved in a police investigation. Blatche, a reserve forward and center, remained in the Nets' rotation for Tuesday night's game against the Philadelphia 76ers. He checked in late in the first quarter, accompanied by a few boos.According to Ramsey, Blatche was among three men and three women who were together inside a room at the Four Seasons Hotel in Center City, where the Nets stayed Monday night. One of the women, whom Ramsey described as "highly intoxicated," said that she had "nonconsensual sex" with one of the men and "consensual sex" with another man. Blatche was "not an active participant" in either supposed sexual encounter, and he was not in the bedroom area when the alleged assault took place.The woman was taken from the hotel to a hospital around 4 a.m. Ramsey said investigators ordered a rape kit in hopes of acquiring DNA evidence. He said that the investigation was in its early stages and that it was unclear if charges would be filed against anyone."She was so intoxicated," Ramsey said. "She is not going to be a very good witness."Philadelphia television stations reported that Blatche and the others had spent time at a nearby strip club before returning to the hotel. The relationship between Blatche and the other men was unclear, but neither was a member of the Nets' traveling party.Blatche was questioned by investigators with the Special Victims Unit and released shortly thereafter. He was with the team for its morning shootaround at the Wells Fargo Center at 10 a.m. So were news teams from local television stations, who questioned Coach P. J. Carlesimo and players about the incident.Carlesimo declined to comment at the shootaround and again in his pregame session with reporters. Blatche was not in the locker room before the game and left without speaking to reporters after it.At 2:30 p.m., three investigators from the Philadelphia Police Crime Scene Unit emerged from the Four Seasons, carrying multiple cases of evidence, which were loaded into a van, while four TV crews filmed them.Ramsey said that Blatche may have used poor judgment just by being present, but essentially "he was in the wrong place at the wrong time."Blatche acknowledged his involvement on his Twitter page."I'm O.K. and I didn't do anything, just was in the area when it happened," Blatche wrote at 12:21 p.m., later deleting the message.The Nets had high hopes when they signed Blatche in September, despite his rocky seven-year tenure with the Washington Wizards that included multiple arrests, a fight with a teammate and a general lack of professionalism on the court. The Wizards waived Blatche last summer despite being on the hook for the $23 million left on his contract.Blatche spent the summer working with John Lucas, the former N.B.A. star who is known for reviving careers. Blatche reported to training camp in great shape and with renewed dedication. He won enthusiastic praise from Coach Avery Johnson and promptly won a rotation spot as the backup center.It was Johnson who set the rules for Blatche to remain in good standing, and by all accounts Blatche met those expectations from the time training camp opened in October through this past week.
EAST RUTHERFORD, N.J. — Two days after a woman said she was sexually assaulted in Nets forward Andray Blatche's hotel suite in Philadelphia, Blatche said he was not worried about an investigation."It's just a bad situation," Blatche said after practice Thursday. "When the time comes and I can talk about it, everybody will realize it's not what you think."WPVI-TV in Philadelphia reported Wednesday night that it had spoken with the accuser, a 21-year-old woman, and that she said she had seen Blatche peer in from the doorway as the assault occurred.The woman, who spoke to the station on the condition of anonymity, said that Blatche did not engage in any sexual activity but that he was aware of what was happening. She claimed she was drugged after meeting Blatche and two members of his entourage at a Philadelphia strip club, Delilah's, and returned with them to Blatche's hotel suite on the sixth floor of the Four Seasons, where she said a sexual assault took place.Two men held in custody were released Wednesday, and no charges had been filed as of Thursday night. Blatche, 26, was questioned by the police as a witness but was not accused of wrongdoing.Blatche's lawyer, A. Charles Peruto Jr., a Philadelphia-based criminal defense attorney, said he was aware of the television report. But he was adamant that Blatche would not be charged."The girl, once she sobered up, basically said Andray did nothing," Peruto said. "He could not have done anything; he was in a separate room. He didn't participate, he didn't cheer, he didn't do anything. He had no knowledge it was occurring, whatever occurred."An N.B.A. spokesman said the league was monitoring the situation. Nets General Manager Billy King declined to discuss the matter Thursday, after the team issued a statement Tuesday saying it would not comment until the investigation concluded.The interim coach P. J. Carlesimo, whose team has won six of seven games since he took over for Avery Johnson, said the matter had not seemed to disrupt Blatche, who had 20 points and 7 rebounds Tuesday against the 76ers."He's fine," Carlesimo said. "I don't liken the situations, but a lot of people wondered how he was going to play in Washington the first time back, the way it ended there, and he played very well."Blatche, who played with the Washington Wizards for seven seasons, criticized the team in a radio interview and was booed when he returned to Washington last week. He had 13 points and 12 rebounds in that game.Blatche confirmed that King had addressed the issue with him but was not more specific.Blatche's $1.15 million contract became guaranteed on Monday, and the woman told WPVI that Blatche had been celebrating that milestone.He has been a key player off the bench for the Nets, who face the Phoenix Suns on Friday with a chance to win their fifth game in a row, tying a season high. Blatche said his focus remained on basketball."I've got a job to do, I'm going to do my job," Blatche said. "I'm not going to let nothing distract me."
Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo did not say much to his team at halftime, but he thought this might be a game to throw in the towel early. The Nets trailed the Phoenix Suns by 7 points, and they looked lifeless. He implored his players for more energy."We all knew the bottom line," center Brook Lopez said. "They were outplaying us."The Nets were without four key players, including Gerald Wallace, who was injured in the first quarter, and guard Deron Williams was left with a throbbing right thigh after a collision. Still, they responded with their best second-half effort of the season to beat Phoenix, 99-79, at Barclays Center on Friday, the Nets' fifth win in a row.They held the Suns (12-26) to just 9 field goals and a season-low 26 points in the second half, after Phoenix raced to an 11-point lead in the second quarter.The Nets (21-15) had taken some pride in staying unbeaten (14-0) against teams with a losing record this season, and the Suns — losers of 12 of their last 13 — fit snugly in that category. Nonetheless, Phoenix held a halftime lead."We didn't even come close to matching the intensity with which Phoenix was playing in the first half," Carlesimo said. "We were lucky to be as close as we were."The ball was not moving, the shots were not falling, and Lopez was just 1 of 8 from the field. Making matters worse, early in the first quarter, Wallace was fouled by P. J. Tucker as he went for a dunk and landed hard on his backside. He left the game with bruised ribs.Without Wallace, their toughest on-ball defender, the Nets' bench was thin. Kris Humphries missed the game with a sore left ankle, Jerry Stackhouse sat out with a sore hamstring, and Mirza Teletovic was ill. That left a guard-heavy rotation to match up with Phoenix and its stable of forwards.But for the third time in four games, the Nets erased a lackluster first half with a strong third quarter, outscoring the Suns, 28-13. That propelled them into the fourth, where they held the Suns scoreless for nearly the first five minutes."We weren't playing as a team and having fun," Williams said. "In the third quarter, we started having fun."Williams collided with Goran Dragic early in the third quarter and bruised his right thigh, leaving him limping. But after riding a stationary bike and keeping the thigh warm, he stayed in the game and finished with 15 points and 6 assists.The Nets allowed Phoenix to shoot 55 percent and to take a 25-21 lead in the first quarter. Eighteen of the Suns' first 38 points came in the paint. But the Nets picked up the pace in the third quarter and moved the ball. After tying the score at 60-60 with four minutes left in the third, the Nets went on a 24-6 run."In the second half, we got after it," Carlesimo said. "We defended very, very well. We were a lot better offensively, but our defense was great."The Nets' bench was a key, outscoring Phoenix, 45-28. MarShon Brooks and C. J. Watson combined to score 23 points, and Andray Blatche added 17 points and 8 rebounds.With Lopez struggling, Blatche again provided an offensive boost. He was among a group of people questioned in a sexual assault investigation in Philadelphia this week, but he has appeared unfazed. He scored 20 points on Tuesday, hours after news of the investigation became public.Blatche has not been charged with a crime, and on the court he continues to serve as a valuable piece of a team that has found its groove. The Nets have won three consecutive games by 20 or more points for the first time in franchise history and improved to 7-1 under Carlesimo."In this league, to sustain something is very difficult," Carlesimo said. "And right now we're kind of sustaining a nice little run of hard play and successful play."X-rays for Gerald Wallace were negative. Wallace could not return to the game because he was unable to shoot his free throws after the injury.
Georgetown Coach John Thompson III said he was unsure how the Hoyas would respond to a two-game losing streak in which they scored 48 points in each game and were throttled at home in the second.He found out in a hurry Saturday. No. 19 Georgetown took a 23-point lead in the first half and cruised to a 67-51 victory over St. John's at Madison Square Garden.Otto Porter had 19 points and 14 rebounds for the Hoyas (11-3, 1-2 Big East), who were coming off a 73-48 loss to Pittsburgh, their worst home defeat in 40 years.Jamal Branch scored 16 points for the Red Storm (9-7, 1-3), who lost their third straight game. St. John's went 6 for 16 from the free-throw line and was outrebounded, 48-33.CINCINNATI 68, RUTGERS 58 Led by Cashmere Wright's 23 points, No. 21 Cincinnati (14-3, 2-2 Big East) improved to 6-0 on the road by beating Rutgers (11-4, 2-2).MARQUETTE 74, PITT 67 After Pittsburgh's Lamar Patterson hit a tying 3-pointer at the end of regulation, Marquette took control in overtime.Vander Blue scored 22 points for the visiting Golden Eagles (12-3, 3-0 Big East). Tray Woodall, the captain for the Panthers (13-4, 1-3), left in the first half with a head injury after a collision.WAKE FOREST 75, B.C. 72 C. J. Harris scored a career-high 29 points, and host Wake Forest (9-6, 2-1 Atlantic Coast Conference) held off a late rally by Boston College (9-7, 1-2).TEMPLE 64, ST. LOUIS 54 Khalif Wyatt scored 24 points and Anthony Lee had 20 points and 10 rebounds, leading host Temple (11-4, 1-1 Atlantic 10) past St. Louis (12-4, 1-1).BUCKNELL 76, ARMY 55 Mike Muscala had 20 points and 13 rebounds, and Bucknell (14-3, 1-0 Patriot League) beat visiting Army (7-9, 0-1).YALE 104, OBERLIN 39 All 13 Yale players scored as the host Bulldogs (6-11) routed Oberlin (4-10), from Division III, in the largest victory in team history.CORNELL 103, OLD WESTBURY 84 Host Cornell (8-9) had its highest point total in 20 years, blowing out Division III Old Westbury (10-3).IN OTHER GAMES Taran Buie scored 24 points, leading Hofstra (5-11, 2-1 Colonial Athletic Association) to a 70-59 home win over William & Mary (7-8, 1-3). ... Host Lehigh (11-4, 1-0 Patriot League) cruised to a 79-47 victory over Holy Cross (8-8, 0-1). ... T. J. Bray scored 23 points, helping Princeton (7-7, 1-0 Ivy League) win at home, 65-53, against Penn (2-13, 0-1). ... Virginia Commonwealth (14-3, 2-0 Atlantic 10) defeated St. Bonaventure (7-8, 0-2) on the road, 72-65.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — The Knicks used the word urgency several times after practice Saturday. A three-game losing streak has made them concerned about a lot of things, particularly their defense and their poor starts.When the season began, Coach Mike Woodson said he would not push the Knicks, the oldest team in the league, with two practices a day in training camp or with a practice after back-to-back games with just one day of rest before the next game.But he changed his mind despite physical and taxing losses to the Indiana Pacers and the Chicago Bulls, with the New Orleans Hornets, the worst team in the Western Conference, visiting Madison Square Garden on Sunday.Woodson said he wanted his team to have a better understanding of his defensive schemes after opponents scored at least 100 points in seven of the Knicks' last eight losses."We need to get in a gym where we mix it up a little bit," he said. "I just think we need that to get back to where we need to be. It's not about outscoring teams. It's about trying to defend and rebound."Carmelo Anthony and Amar'e Stoudemire said the Knicks had to play harder and smarter on defense."It was just a lack of communication," Anthony said of the Knicks' 108-101 loss to the Bulls on Friday. "We weren't talking, and in games that we lose, we don't talk."J. R. Smith agreed. He had one of his worst games of the season Friday."I wasn't making shots and then I wasn't defending well on the other end," said Smith, who went 4 for 17 from the field and fouled out. "You can't do both. If you're going to miss shots, you have to at least play defense."The Knicks will have to do a lot of things differently against the Hornets. But, Woodson said, they know how to turn things around."I like to practice," he said. "Because I know if I get a good practice, I feel good about going into that game."Iman Shumpert could make his season debut Thursday in London, where the Knicks play the Detroit Pistons. Shumpert, the youngest player on the team, has been recovering from knee surgery. Mike Woodson plans to have him practice at least two more times before Thursday. "If we get the two practices in and there's no setback, he'll probably be cleared to play in the Detroit game," Woodson said Saturday. "He's just going to have to learn on the fly and we'll have to bring him along gradually." ... After Friday's loss at Indiana, Carmelo Anthony said he was disappointed in his one-game suspension for confronting Kevin Garnett after Monday's game. "I didn't think and believe it was going to be a suspension due to what happened," he said. "It's over with. I can't get that game back." Anthony said he watched Thursday's game from the team hotel. "I definitely hurt my team," he said. "We had a chance to win that game."
RALEIGH, N.C. — North Carolina State 's athletic program has a catchy marketing campaign these days: "This is our state." When it comes to men's basketball, that may finally be true.The Wolfpack had a chance to make that point Saturday when No. 1-ranked and undefeated Duke arrived at PNC Arena. And N.C. State did, holding off a late Duke rally for an 84-76 victory to hand the Blue Devils (15-1, 2-1 Atlantic Coast Conference) their first loss of the season.C. J. Leslie led all scorers with 25 points for No. 20 North Carolina State, and Richard Howell added 16 points and 18 rebounds, including a double-double in the second half when the Wolfpack (14-2, 3-0) pulled away."Oh, man, it's a great feeling," said Leslie, who had 14 points in the second half. "This is what I came here for. I came here to beat those type of teams."Guard Lorenzo Brown added 12 points and 13 assists for North Carolina State, which won its 10th game in a row and opened the conference schedule at 3-0 for the first time since 1988-89.Seth Curry had 22 points for the Blue Devils, and Mason Plumlee, a contender for national player of the year, had 15 points and 11 rebounds.This was Duke's first game without the starting forward Ryan Kelly, averaging 13.4 points before he went out with a right foot injury against Clemson on Tuesday.So the game was in part a test of the Blue Devils' depth, although hardly a measure of their postseason potential. Few doubt that Duke will again be in the mix for the conference and national titles.The stakes were far higher for North Carolina State, which has often been no better than the fourth-best team in the state behind Duke, North Carolina and even Wake Forest before the Demon Deacons' recent decline.But before this season, North Carolina State was picked to win the A.C.C. title, raising expectations and the pressure on the team."We drew some energy off our fans, no question about it," Wolfpack Coach Mark Gottfried said. "Our guys played really hard; they knew this was a big deal."Plumlee came in averaging 17.7 points and 11.4 rebounds and had 10 points and 8 rebounds in the first half. But N.C. State held its own, climbing back from an early 8-point deficit to take a 41-39 halftime lead behind 11 from Leslie and 10 from Scott Wood.Howell had 6 points and 4 rebounds in the first half."We didn't change anything," Howell said of the second half. "Just effort. We felt like they couldn't play with us, and we went out and showed it."Including Howell, who had 10 points and 14 rebounds in a dominating second half for the Wolfpack.North Carolina State was leading by 58-51 with 12 minutes 20 seconds to go, but the Blue Devils climbed back with a Curry 3-pointer from the wing that closed the gap to 58-57 with 10:32 remaining.But Duke never was able to take the lead. The Wolfpack, who blew a 20-point lead in a loss to Duke last season, built a 67-57 lead with 7:42 remaining. The Blue Devils closed to 71-67 with 3:53 to go with another 3-pointer from Curry. But Curry was hurt with 3:14 left, grabbing his left leg under the Duke basket, and the Blue Devils did not get closer than 4 the rest of the way.Krzyzewski said Curry slipped on a wet floor and injured his ankle, but did not indicate the injury was serious. As for Kelly, there was no telling when he might be able to return."We don't know Ryan's situation," Plumlee said. "We're moving forward. This is who we have. We're still Duke. We still have players. We'll make do."
Michigan had a chance at its first No. 1 ranking in more than 20 years. But point guard Trey Burke's jumper in the closing seconds Sunday rattled around the rim and bounced out, and the No. 2 Wolverines fell on the road to No. 15 Ohio State , 56-53.After top-ranked Duke lost to North Carolina State on Saturday, the Wolverines were in position to rise to No. 1 for the first time since November 1992. Instead, they went home with their first loss.Michigan (16-1, 3-1 Big Ten) trailed by 52-50 when Burke, a former star at Northland High School in Columbus, Ohio, narrowly missed from 3-point range. Lenzelle Smith Jr. grabbed the rebound, was fouled and made two free throws to help the Buckeyes (13-3, 3-1) deny Michigan its first 17-0 start. The 1985-86 Wolverines also won their first 16 games.Ohio State did most of its damage early, going on a 16-0 run that started and ended with baskets by Deshaun Thomas, who led the team with 20 points. The Buckeyes led, 34-22, at halftime.Burke led Michigan with 15 points, and Tim Hardaway Jr. added 12. The Wolverines battled back in the second half as they switched defenses, causing matchup problems for the Buckeyes. Glenn Robinson III tied the game, 46-46, on a 3-pointer with less than six minutes left. But Ohio State regained momentum."There's always satisfaction in denying Michigan the No. 1 spot in the country," the senior forward Evan Ravenel said with a grin.MICHIGAN ST. 66, NEBRASKA 56 Derrick Nix made two free throws with a minute left and finished with 17 points, helping No. 22 Michigan State (14-3, 3-1 Big Ten) pull away from visiting Nebraska (9-8, 0-4).EVANSVILLE 71, WICHITA ST. 67 Colt Ryan had 24 points and 8 assists, helping host Evansville hold off No. 23 Wichita State.The Aces (11-6, 4-1 Missouri Valley Conference) took advantage of a season-high 22 turnovers by the Shockers (15-2, 4-1).PROVIDENCE 67, SETON HALL 55 Bryce Cotton scored 13 of his 23 points in the first half, leading Providence past Seton Hall in Newark.The Friars (9-7, 1-3 Big East) took command with a 22-5 first-half run, holding the Pirates (12-5, 1-3) scoreless for nearly six minutes.The Minutemen, whose 70-62 loss Thursday at St. Louis ended a seven-game winning streak, led by 14 in the second half. The Rams chipped away, pulling within 2 points with 1 minute 4 seconds left. But Freddie Riley hit a 3-pointer from the corner with 34 seconds to go, and UMass hit 5 of 6 free throws in the final 26 seconds to hold on.IONA 97, CANISIUS 87 Sean Armand matched his career high with 32 points as host Iona (11-6, 5-1 Metro Atlantic Athletic Conference) pulled away from Canisius (10-7, 3-3).CAL 67, STANFORD 55 Gennifer Brandon had 14 points and 12 rebounds, and No. 7 California ended No. 5 Stanford's 81-game winning streak against conference opponents.Brittany Boyd added 19 points to help the visiting Golden Bears (13-2, 3-1 Pacific-12) beat a top-five opponent for the first time since a 2008 win over Rutgers. Cal won for the fourth time in its last 46 games against the Cardinal (14-2, 3-1), who lost consecutive home games for the first time in 12 years.BAYLOR 82, KANSAS 60 Led by Brittney Griner's 33 points, No. 1 Baylor (14-1, 4-0 Big 12) coasted at No. 17 Kansas (11-4, 2-2) for its 12th consecutive victory.NOTRE DAME 71, RUTGERS 46 Skylar Diggins scored 15 points to lead No. 2 Notre Dame (14-1, 3-0 Big East) to a rout of visiting Rutgers (9-7, 0-3).DUKE 73, WAKE FOREST 44 Elizabeth Williams scored 18 points as No. 4 Duke (15-0, 5-0 Atlantic Coast Conference) beat host Wake Forest (9-7, 2-2) for the 38th consecutive time and remained the only undefeated team in N.C.A.A. Division I.TENNESSEE 78, FLORIDA 75 Meighan Simmons scored 27 points, Bashaara Graves added 17 points and 15 rebounds, and No. 9 Tennessee (13-3, 4-0 Southeastern Conference) beat Florida (13-5, 2-2) in overtime, ending the Gators' 15-game home winning streak.GEORGIA 42, SOUTH CAROLINA 40 Jasmine Hassell scored 19 points as No. 13 Georgia (15-2, 3-1 SEC) outlasted No. 18 South Carolina (14-3, 2-2) at home and posted the lowest winning point total in team history.FLORIDA ST. 86, MIAMI 65 Leonor Rodriguez scored 21 points and Natasha Howard added 20 points and 9 rebounds, leading No. 18 Florida State (13-3, 3-2 A.C.C.) to a home win over No. 24 Miami (12-4, 3-2).
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — The Knicks practiced into the night Monday, went through an air travel security checkpoint at their practice facility, then jetted for London, their franchise cornerstone, Carmelo Anthony , all but spirited out of the country under a mysterious veil.The Knicks will play the Detroit Pistons on Thursday in London in what will presumably be the first regular-season game in a couple of weeks in which Anthony will take the court feeling fully nourished. And because the game is being played overseas, there is little or no chance that the Knicks' enigmatic owner, James L. Dolan, will have Madison Square Garden employees aim microphones at the court to pick up every in-game conversation in which Anthony is involved, as Dolan is alleged to have done in last Friday's game at the Garden against the Chicago Bulls.The disclosure that Anthony had engaged in a restricted diet for 15 days — no meat or carbohydrates — came from the player himself after Sunday afternoon's victory at home over the New Orleans Hornets. Anthony said he had undertaken the diet "to get some clarity in my life" but was abandoning it because it had left him feeling "de-energized."The disclosure that Dolan had instructed two audio technicians to stand at opposite ends of the court to record everything said to and by Anthony during Friday's game came in The Star-Ledger of Newark, which did not cite any sources.Anthony had left the locker room on Sunday vowing to find a big steak, his modified fast at an end. But he was not available Monday to add insight into why he followed an eating plan that made him wonder "how I was out there competing at a high level," or to offer his reaction to the notion that Dolan had been eavesdropping on him.The Knicks declined to comment on the Star-Ledger report.That left Coach Mike Woodson to fill the void. He told reporters at Monday's practice that he "got wind of" the restricted diet only when Anthony mentioned it Sunday, but said he was not concerned that his star player had not informed him during the past two weeks that he drastically changed his eating habits and that he was feeling some energy loss as a result."I don't get into players and what they eat and don't eat; I just expect them to be ready to go when it's time to go," Woodson said, adding: "He's going to eat the right foods and do all of the necessary things to be ready to play basketball. I have that much faith in him."When Woodson was further prodded with questions about the issue, he grew annoyed and said: "It's a big thing to you guys, but it's not a big thing to me. I'd take Melo fasting or not fasting; it doesn't matter to me."Knicks fans, of course, may disagree. During the period in which he said he was on a diet, Anthony played sluggishly in first quarters — shooting 30.8 percent then, compared with 53.5 percent previously. That included Sunday's game, in which he went 1 for 8 from the field in the first quarter.In addition, the Knicks went 3-4 in that time, with Anthony missing one of the games because of a suspension stemming from his postgame confrontations with Boston's Kevin Garnett a week ago Monday.But if Woodson did not know what Anthony was up to, some of his teammates did. One was Steve Novak, who said he learned that Anthony was not eating in his normal fashion by dining with him."I guess if he can keep scoring 30, 40 points a night, he can fast all he wants," Novak said.As for the microphones, if they were indeed being aimed at Anthony on Friday night, the question is why? Anthony's postgame confrontations with Garnett came after the veteran Celtics center and forward, a renowned N.B.A. trash-talker, clearly got under Anthony's skin in a game in which he shot poorly and the Celtics won.What Garnett actually said to rile Anthony remains unclear. Some published reports stated that Garnett had made remarks about Anthony's wife. Days later, however, Celtics Coach Doc Rivers adamantly disputed that interpretation.Anthony has declined to provide details. So perhaps Dolan wanted to listen in himself on the things being said to rile Anthony, particularly by a team like the Bulls, who had beaten the Knicks in a tough game late in December in which Anthony, Woodson and Tyson Chandler had been ejected.Asked to comment on the situation, an N.B.A. spokesman noted that there was no prohibition against audio equipment in a league arena.In any case, the Knicks will now spend the next few days in London, where Anthony spent part of last summer as a member of the United States Olympic basketball team. So he presumably knows where to go to find a good meal. Presumably, too, there will not be any microphones recording his dinner conversations.Barring any setbacks in the next two days, Iman Shumpert will make his season debut Thursday for the Knicks. The game will be the only one in a week for the Knicks, which will be a welcome break for a team that is hobbled with injuries and is always mindful of the advanced age of many of its players.
DEERFIELD, Ill. — Joakim Noah has an idea why James L. Dolan and the Knicks would have a keen interest in eavesdropping on the Chicago Bulls ."We've been busting them," Noah, a Bulls center, said Tuesday after hearing that Dolan, the Knicks' owner, had audio technicians with microphones stand at both ends of the court during the Bulls' 108-101 victory at Madison Square Garden on Friday. "We've played them three times this year and we rocked them three times."The disclosure that microphones were employed last Friday, ostensibly to pick up what was said by and to the Knicks star Carmelo Anthony during the game, was made by The Star-Ledger of Newark. On Tuesday, a person in the N.B.A. with knowledge of the Knicks' actions said Dolan had also deployed the microphones during Sunday's visit by the New Orleans Hornets.Dolan apparently felt compelled to use the microphones after what occurred Jan. 7 at the Garden, when the on-court trash-talking of the Boston Celtics' Kevin Garnett so provoked Anthony that he sought to confront Garnett after the game. That, in turn, led to a one-game suspension for Anthony. Dolan might have decided to preserve a record of whatever verbal abuse was being directed at Anthony in case other incidents arose in future games, beginning with last Friday's against the Bulls.But Noah thought it all had more to do with the scoreboard."They can downplay anything they want," he said of the Knicks' explanation that it was trash-talking and not the Bulls' dominance over the Knicks that led to the microphones being used. "If they had been winning, we wouldn't be talking about this."Coach Mike Woodson of the Knicks, who arrived in London with the team Tuesday,  was asked about the microphone disclosure.  "That's not my concern," he said. "It really isn't. All I'm focusing on is the guys running up and down the floor at both ends."Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau said he was not aware that the microphones were being used. "It's not that big a deal because there's mikes everywhere now," he said.
As the captain for three seasons for Spain's Caja Labarol, Mirza Teletovic grew accustomed to talking constantly on the court, calling out screens or bad shots, orchestrating an offense with his vocalizations.He kind of mumbles the calls aloud now, in his jerky first months in the N.B.A., although lately they have been growing more forceful and pronounced, a nice parallel to the progressions in his play. By next week, if he continues playing as he did on Tuesday, his may be the loudest voice in the arena.Teletovic, in his first action since Jan. 8 after missing two games with the flu, scored 10 points and added 4 rebounds, 3 assists, a block, a steal and nonstop energy (legs and lips) off the bench, helping the Nets beat the Toronto Raptors, 113-106, at Barclays Center.It was Brooklyn's seventh win in a row, yet another that required a strong second-half effort to complete. The Nets (23-15) did not make it easy on themselves, but they improved to 15-0 against teams with losing records.It was not to be without Teletovic, who hit all three of his shots in the second quarter, but added key rebounds, assists and a defensive presence late in the game in a career-high 22 minutes."Mirza's floor game was good," Coach P. J. Carlesimo said. "He had, I thought, four or five assists, and they were good assists."Toronto (14-23) was aggressive on the offensive glass and began 11 of 21 from the field. The Raptors know the Nets well, having played them twice earlier this season, and thus calculated precisely where to attack. Forwards Ed Davis, Amir Johnson and Aaron Gray were aggressive early, and the Raptors out-rebounded and outscored the Nets on second-chance opportunities in the first half.The Nets, prone to not finding the necessary intensity until the second half, again fell into an early hole. They began the second quarter 0 for 6 from the field and dropped behind, 40-32, with some stagnant offensive sets.But they woke up just before halftime, scoring 9 points in the final two minutes, including two deep 3-pointers by Teletovic. The Nets closed the half on a 12-4 run in taking a 54-50 lead. By late in the third quarter, the ball started moving again and the Nets' offense began to flow.The Nets committed only six turnovers, after turning the ball over 35 times against Toronto in the prior two meetings. Carlesimo said the defense played just well enough to win."We gave up 106 points and every one of their percentages is high, so you say, man, we didn't defend well," Carlesimo said. "But we found a way to win. We had two really big spurts when we needed them."Teletovic infused the Nets with the offensive spark off the bench that Kris Humphries or Andray Blatche usually provide. Teletovic had been sick the previous two games, which could explain the voracity with which he attacked his precious minutes Tuesday.Or he is simply easing into his role as a reserve in the N.B.A., after years of being a focal point on strong teams throughout Europe. That adjustment, Teletovic said, has taken some time."I wasn't prepared to adjust to everything this team expects from you," Teletovic said. "Different rules on defense, different rules on offense, just a lot of new stuff. You need a month or two just to get used to it a little bit."He had already begun demonstrating signs of progress in practices. Teammates remark about his shooting touch."He'll have practices where he won't miss a shot," guard Keith Bogans said. "What you saw from him today is what we've seen from him in practice."It was a matter of putting it together in a game, in the limited minutes he is normally allotted. On Tuesday, he earned the extra opportunities he got, helping the Nets add another link to their chain of wins."He stayed patient," Deron Williams said. "He was in a tough position where he wasn't getting much playing time, getting thrown out there for a few minutes and having to produce. That's tough for anybody to do."Williams added: "Now he's getting a little steadier minutes. You can see what he can do for this team. He can be a huge part of this team."Gerald Wallace (ribs) missed his second consecutive game. P.J. Carlesimo said Wallace remained questionable to return Wednesday against Atlanta. ... That game will mark the first time Joe Johnson faces his former team, the Hawks, who traded him in the off-season after seven years with the club. Johnson said he harbored no ill will toward his former team. "I'm glad they traded me and put me in a great situation," he said.
DEERFIELD, Ill. — Of all the taunts he has heard, and there have been plenty, Joakim Noah has a favorite. It came when he was in college at the University of Florida, playing in Kentucky's Rupp Arena. During a timeout late in the game, with his Gators handily beating the Wildcats, Noah looked into the crowd, which was a sea of blue, and screamed at the top of his lungs, "It's quiet in here!"An elderly woman looked back at him and yelled: "Noah! Have some class." She tossed in an expletive, too, Noah said."She had to be in her 70s," he said last week, lounging in a folding chair after a Bulls practice. He added, with a big smile: "It's an unbelievable feeling to affect people like that."Six years into his professional career, the 6-foot-11-inch Noah has not lost his ability to irk opponents. One recent example was a late December game at Madison Square Garden, when he and Tyson Chandler were both ejected after the two came close to exchanging head butts during a Bulls win that turned chippy in the fourth quarter. The Knicks' Carmelo Anthony and Coach Mike Woodson were also ejected.Afterward, Chandler said of Noah: "I felt like he had ahold of me and didn't let go. I got frustrated."When the Bulls and the Knicks played again last Friday at the Garden, the Knicks' owner, James L. Dolan, felt compelled to aim microphones at the court, apparently to gauge what trash-talking phrases Noah and his teammates might be tossing at Anthony to try to throw him off his game. Anthony was coming off a one-game suspension for losing his cool after Boston's Kevin Garnett baited him in a game on Jan. 7.What was said on the court on Friday night has not been made public, but the Bulls did get the last word with a 108-101 victory that was not as close as the score suggests.So they have now beaten the Knicks three times in three games this season, a testament to how resilient the Bulls have been in the ongoing absence of Derrick Rose, the league's most valuable player two seasons ago. Rose is still recovering from a torn knee ligament sustained during last season's playoffs.At the heart of the Bulls' toughness is Noah, whose game has grown, slowly but surely, to match his bravado. He may put sidespin on his shot and look like a tornado of elbows and knees running down the court, but this season, he has reached new heights. He has been called the best center in the Eastern Conference, and he could play in his first All-Star Game next month.His statistics back the claims. Noah is averaging career highs in points (12.3), assists (4.1), blocks (2.1) and minutes (38.1). He leads all centers in the N.B.A. in assists and minutes. He has 17 double-doubles in 35 games, and he has helped the Bulls to a 21-15 record, one and a half games behind first-place Indiana in the Central Division."I don't know if my game is any different," Noah said. "But as you get older, you handle the circus of life in the league better."Noah has long been one of the main attractions of this circus, rising from the playgrounds of New York City to be a leader of one of the league's marquee franchises. Early in his N.B.A. career, he was arrested for marijuana possession, and his Bulls teammates once voted to increase a team suspension levied after his altercation with a coach. During a playoff series against the Cleveland Cavaliers in 2010, he proclaimed that the city of Cleveland stank, using language that was more coarse.But Noah, the son of Yannick Noah, the 1983 French Open champion, and Cecilia Rodhe, Miss Sweden 1978, will turn 28 next month, and his mother agreed with his assessment that he is indeed maturing."The 28th year is a turning point in all our lives," said Rodhe, who said she called her son an African Viking because of her Nordic heritage and her ex-husband's Cameroonian roots. "You turn your back to childhood and you define in your own mind and your soul who you want to become. Joakim is doing that, but in his way."Noah spent the off-season doing yoga with Kareem Abdul-Jabbar and training with the professional surfer Laird Hamilton. With Abdul-Jabbar, he worked on flexibility. With Hamilton, he did strength exercises in a swimming pool. Workouts included explosive underwater jumps with 50-pound dumbbells."The more you train, the less you party," Noah said.
ATLANTA — The Nets ' seven-game winning streak came to a thudding end Wednesday night when they were run off the Philips Arena floor, 109-95, by an energetic Hawks team missing its best player.Atlanta led by 16 at halftime and extended the lead to 26 during a third-quarter spurt, taking advantage of a weary team playing back-to-back games and its fourth game in six nights."They ran it down our throats all night," Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo said. "We played like a team that got in late and was tired, but that doesn't give Atlanta their due."The Nets could be excused for being overconfident. Not only had they won 9 of 10 since Carlesimo took over as coach last month, but the Hawks were as frigid as the Nets were scalding.Atlanta had lost six of its last seven, including a 39-point beating in Chicago on Monday. Another mismatch seemed imminent after the Hawks announced the suspension of their leading scorer, forward Josh Smith, before the game, stemming from an undisclosed incident at a practice Tuesday.Instead, Atlanta dominated from the tipoff, taking advantage of the Nets' lethargy. The Hawks hit 8 of their first 11 shots, scoring more points in the opening two minutes than they did in the entire second quarter in Chicago, when they mustered an embarrassing 5 points, a franchise low.On Wednesday, a much different Atlanta team shot a season-high 57.7 percent. Six players scored in double figures.Point guard Deron Williams, who played 43 minutes in the Nets' win over Toronto on Tuesday, was beaten repeatedly on the break and off the dribble by Atlanta guards Devin Harris and Jeff Teague. Teague scored 28 points on 12-for-18 shooting, and Harris chipped in with 18 points.Brook Lopez led the Nets with 22 points, hitting 10 of 14 shots. The other Nets combined to make only 27 of 73 attempts."They had a different gear, a different motor, than we did," Williams said. "We were never really in sync, and a lot of our shots went short."The blowout ruined Joe Johnson's return to Atlanta. Johnson spent seven productive seasons with the Hawks, but subpar performances in the postseason, combined with his enormous salary, meant that his trade was greeted with relief that neared glee in Georgia.Johnson floated through the game, confounded by frequent double teams that took him out of the offensive flow. "We didn't make the proper reads," he said. "We didn't seem to know where to be when they trapped."Johnson made his first field goal with five minutes left in the first half, and he finished with 15 points. He was greeted with a mix of boos and cheers, reflecting his lukewarm relationship with Atlanta fans. A chant of "We don't miss you!" rang out as he shot a free throw in the second period."It didn't surprise me," Johnson said of the reaction. "I blocked that out. I just wanted us to play well as a team, and we didn't do that."The Hawks had a 41-37 edge in rebounds, paced by 13 from Al Horford, who added 17 points for his 20th double-double of the season. More surprising was the effort from Smith's replacement, center Zaza Pachulia, who had 13 points, 11 rebounds and 8 assists.A sequence early in the second half displayed the difference in effort between the teams. Teague broke wide open off a screen seconds into the third quarter. Moments later, Harris converted an easy three-on-one as the Nets watched from the other side of the floor. On the next possession, Teague raced down the floor to take an outlet pass for an uncontested layup. That made the score 62-42, and the rout was on. Carlesimo called timeout, but he was unable to stop the damage or rouse his team to match Atlanta's intensity.The teams meet again Friday night at Barclays Center, and Smith is expected to be back in uniform. Carlesimo noted that the Nets' last loss occurred in a blowout on New Year's Eve in San Antonio. "We bounced back well," he said. "We've got to do it again."Johnson added: "It's not about the Hawks. I expect a different Nets team Friday night."
The Nets have three stars in the conversation for All-Star Game nominations, and they would not have beaten the Atlanta Hawks on Friday without Deron Williams, Joe Johnson and Brook Lopez. But, crucially, the Nets withstood Atlanta's rough, battering style by taking cues from their two less-heralded starters: forwards Reggie Evans and Gerald Wallace, who heave their bodies around with the best of them.The Nets can finesse their way to wins, but that was not an option on Friday, when they ground out a methodical 94-89 victory at Barclays Center. They got to the free-throw line 38 times, committed 18 turnovers and shot only 40.5 percent from the field. The Hawks roughed them up."They're physical guys," said Lopez, who caught more than a few stray elbows and slaps from the Hawks' bruising center Zaza Pachulia, who pestered him relentlessly."But I think our team is definitely comfortable playing physically," Lopez added. "We have a lot of guys out here, like Reggie and Gerald, who really thrive with the contact and physicality. I definitely think it caters to us. It's hard not to see them playing the way they are, playing their hearts out, and not trying to follow suit."It was not as if the Nets were caught by surprise, considering they were blown out in Atlanta on Wednesday in a lackluster effort that the team essentially chalked up to the scheduling, having hosted the Toronto Raptors the night before.With a day off in between, there was an opportunity for redemption. Watching film of Wednesday's game, the Nets said they could hardly recognize their performance."Just lack of effort," Johnson said. "We just didn't have that bounce like we normally do."Johnson was met with consistent double-teams from the Hawks' defense in Wednesday's matchup, but on Friday he found more breathing room. Though he was not much of an offensive factor until the second half, he hit three 3-pointers in the third quarter and finished with 18 points on 7-of-17 shooting.His performance helped keep the Nets hanging around in a back-and-forth game that was highly competitive from the opening tip. In the first half alone, there were nine ties and 14 lead changes. Neither team led by more than 4 points, and they stayed tethered throughout the second half, as well.The Hawks got back Josh Smith, their leading scorer, after he was suspended before Wednesday's game because of conduct detrimental to the team, and the Nets' Wallace returned to the starting lineup after missing two games with bruised ribs and playing a minor role in Wednesday's loss.Atlanta raced out to a hot start, hitting 7 of their first 8 shots from the field, including all four 3-point attempts. The Nets kept pace, hitting 8 of their first 13 shots, and took a 23-19 lead late in the first quarter.The teams had identical scoring quarters until the fourth, when the Nets' defense clamped down. The Hawks hit just 1 of their first 8 field goals in the quarter and committed three turnovers in its first six minutes. The Nets finally got a bit of breathing room.With Atlanta in foul trouble most of the second half, Pachulia fouled out with 3 minutes 20 seconds left and his team trailing, 88-82. But Jeff Teague hit a long 3-pointer with 1:31 left to keep the Hawks within striking distance, and Smith grabbed a rebound and brought the ball back the entire length of the floor to finish with a dramatic one-handed flush, cutting the Nets' lead to 90-89.Then Lopez came through with a key block of Teague's floater attempt with 28.9 seconds remaining to seal the win. "He's playing as well as any center in the league," Coach P. J. Carlesimo said of Lopez. "He's done a heck of a job."The Nets have won 10 of their last 12, and avoided the embarrassment of consecutive losses to the Hawks, currently right behind them in the Eastern Conference standings."That's the beauty of the N.B.A.," said Evans, who grabbed 20 rebounds. "There's always another game."Friday marked the 1,200th consecutive game worked by the Nets' official scorer, Herb Turetzky, beginning in May 1984. Turetzky is in his 46th season with the organization. He started when they were the New Jersey Americans of the original A.B.A. ... Deron Williams has connected on 47 consecutive free throws.
Louisville's reign at No. 1 is probably over after one week.Michael Carter-Williams recovered from a shaky first half and two missed free throws in the final minute to help No. 6 Syracuse beat the Cardinals, 70-68, on the road on Saturday.It was the second straight Saturday that the top-ranked team went down: Duke lost to North Carolina State, 84-76, last weekend.Carter-Williams's contributions included a go-ahead 3-pointer with 5 minutes 28 seconds left and then a steal and a go-ahead dunk with 23 seconds left. He scored 11 of his team's final 13 points, including the last 4.He added a rebound and another steal at the end to cap a 16-point, 7-assist game, making it easy for Carter-Williams to forget a 5-point first half.Brandon Triche finished with 23 points as the Orange (17-1, 5-0) took control of the Big East. Louisville (16-2, 4-1) had won 11 games in a row.KANSAS 64, TEXAS 59 Ben McLemore had 16 points, and No. 4 Kansas (16-1, 4-0 Big 12) rallied from a late double-digit deficit to stun host Texas (8-9, 0-4). Texas has lost four straight, its longest losing streak since Coach Rick Barnes's first season, in 1998-99.FLORIDA 83, MISSOURI 52 Scottie Wilbekin had 13 points and 10 assists, his first career double-double, and No. 10 Florida (14-2, 4-0 Southeastern Conference) beat No. 17 Missouri (13-4, 2-2) at home. The win was Billy Donovan's 400th with the Gators, making him the third coach in SEC history to accomplish that feat with one program.MICHIGAN ST. 59, OHIO ST. 56 Keith Appling, who finished with 15 points, made two free throws with 7.9 seconds left to help No. 18 Michigan State (16-3, 5-1 Big Ten) beat No. 11 Ohio State (13-4, 3-2) at home.WICHITA ST. 67, CREIGHTON 64 Carl Hall had 17 points and 13 rebounds, and host Wichita State (17-2, 6-1) held off No. 12 Creighton (17-2, 6-1) to forge a tie atop the Missouri Valley.BUTLER 64, GONZAGA 63 Roosevelt Jones stole an inbounds pass with 3.5 seconds left and hit a floater from just inside the foul line to help No. 13 Butler (16-2) beat No. 8 Gonzaga (17-2) at home. This is the first season that Butler has beaten three top-10 teams.WYOMING 58, SAN DIEGO ST. 45 Leonard Washington had 14 points and 14 rebounds to help host Wyoming (15-2, 2-2 Mountain West) beat No. 15 San Diego State (14-4, 2-2), which shot 29 percent from the field.NOTRE DAME 69, RUTGERS 66 Jack Cooley had 19 points and 10 rebounds and blocked a shot with two seconds left to help No. 20 Notre Dame (15-3, 3-2 Big East) hang on at home against Rutgers (12-5, 3-3).OREGON 76, U.C.L.A. 67 Tony Woods had 18 points, and No. 21 Oregon beat No. 24 U.C.L.A. (15-4, 5-1 Pacific-12) in Los Angeles. The Ducks, 16-2 over all, improved to 5-0 in Pac-12 play for the first time in 39 years.V.C.U. 90, DUQUESNE 63 Rob Brandenberg scored 22 points, and No. 22 Virginia Commonwealth (16-3, 4-0 Atlantic 10) beat host Duquesne (7-11, 0-4). The Rams were playing their first game as a ranked team since 1984-85.V.C.U. Coach Shaka Smart, 35, became the second-youngest coach to reach 100 career victories.CINCINNATI 71, MARQUETTE 69 Sean Kilpatrick scored 7 of his career-high 36 points in overtime, and Cincinnati (16-3, 4-2 Big East) blew a 16-point halftime lead before rallying at home against No. 25 Marquette (13-4, 4-1).IN OTHER GAMES Rodney McGruder scored 20 points, and No. 16 Kansas State (15-2, 4-0 Big 12) beat visiting Oklahoma (12-4, 3-1), 69-60. ... Mark Lyons scored 24 points, and No. 7 Arizona (16-1, 4-1 Pac-12) beat host Arizona State (14-4, 3-2), 71-54.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — Iman Shumpert needed a project this past summer to help divert his focus from the painful and long road of recovery from knee surgery.One way he thought to help make the long months ahead more enjoyable was to change his hairstyle. Last season in his rookie campaign with the Knicks, Shumpert wore a low buzz cut. He quickly decided he did not want to return to having a long ponytail or braids, as he did when he was a teenager. So Shumpert's older brother, Ahrii, who has been his barber since Iman was in eighth grade, asked what he thought about trying a haircut popular in the late 1980s and early '90s.Shumpert eventually landed on the high-top fade. From the moment he was carried off the court with a torn left anterior cruciate ligament and lateral meniscus during the first round of the playoffs last April to his season debut Thursday in London, Shumpert has grown the hair on the top of his head but has kept the hair on the sides and lower back of his head trimmed."At first, it was just to see how long I could grow my hair before I came back," said Shumpert, who shares the look with Miami's Norris Cole, perhaps the only current N.B.A. players wearing the high-top fade. Shumpert, who was born in 1990, added: "When I was growing up, all my cousins had high-top fades. I thought it would be cool to see how long I could grow a high-top."Everyone in London loved it. For the most part, people like it. My mom said the ladies like it."The hairstyle became popular in the black community in the late 1980s. The hip-hop group Kid 'n Play wore high-top fades in the "House Party" movies. The hairstyle had a presence in the N.B.A., too.The Web site Bleacherreport.com listed the top-10 high-top fades in league history, which featured players like Patrick Ewing, Robert Horry and Charles Smith. Of that list, Shumpert's high-top fade most resembles the one Kenny Walker wore as a Knick."It's cool because you have hair, but you have a fade at the same time," Shumpert said. "I could put designs in it, parts," he said before pausing to add, "all that type of stuff. At the same time, you still have the pick-style Afro."Most of Shumpert's teammates have told him he should leave the high-top fade in the past."It's awful," J. R. Smith said. "It was cool for a while, but he's taking it too far now. He got to cut it."Shumpert, who at 22 is the Knicks' youngest player, said Carmelo Anthony and Kurt Thomas joked daily about his hair. "They just want high tops," he said. "They want it, but they're too old."Shumpert said he planned to keep his high-top fade. When Shumpert's mixtape album, Th3 #Post90s, was released in December, his high-top fade was the focal point of the album cover. He loves the haircut so much he has a tattoo on his left forearm of Johnny Bravo, a cartoon character with pompadour-style hair.Coach Mike Woodson, who is bald but has spent years working on his famous goatee, laughed when asked about Shumpert's hair."Everybody has their choice," Woodson said. "He's a good-looking dude. If that's what he wants to wear, so be it. As long as he plays well is all I care about. I just think he wants to be taller."When the Knicks play the Brooklyn Nets on Monday, it will be Shumpert's first game back at Madison Square Garden. Last season, fans gravitated to Shumpert because of his personality, his tough perimeter defense and his high leaping ability. Now, they can also talk about his hairstyle.Shumpert said he also takes pleasure in knowing his hairstyle helped him in a small way get through his rehabilitation."I had a lot of fun with it," he said. "But I'm having even more fun now that I'm out there playing basketball again."
Kyle Casey woke at dawn most mornings over the summer. He would head straight to the weight room, hoping to add bulk to his 6-foot-7, 225-pound frame, and then to the basketball court, to sharpen the skills that made him a first-team all-Ivy League selection last season as a junior.Casey was driven by a desire to lead Harvard, the team he was elected to captain, to a second consecutive N.C.A.A. tournament appearance and to bolster his N.B.A. prospects with a productive senior season.He never got the chance.Instead, he is working for a nonprofit foundation that conducts after-school programs for children in third, fourth and fifth grade."It's just a good atmosphere," Casey said, "especially with what I've been going through."In August, Casey was implicated in a widespread cheating scandal at Harvard that, the university said, involved as many as 125 students in a government class during the spring 2012 semester. The students "may have committed acts of academic dishonesty, including inappropriate collaboration and plagiarism, on a take-home final exam," the university said. The college's administrative board launched an investigation that is continuing.Facing the possibility of a one-year suspension, Casey voluntarily withdrew from college on Sept. 11 to preserve his final year of eligibility. When he made the decision, he knew only that he needed to fulfill some university requirements — primarily to work a full-time job for six months — in order to return the next year."It's a lot of soul-searching because when you feel like you're on top of the world and then everything is kind of just stripped from you, it's a reality check," Casey said. "It's humbling, and you come back down to earth a little bit and figure out life."Casey became the face of the scandal, a relatively public figure when compared with his anonymous classmates, and he found himself the focus of negative news media attention for the first time."It was a rough period," Casey said. "You see the true colors of a lot of people, whether that's good or bad."A native of Medway, Mass., Casey initially moved to New York to work with Kenny Blakeney, who was an assistant at Harvard from 2007 to 2011, when he left to start a sporting apparel company.Casey soon decided he would be better served returning home. He followed up on a message from Andrew Mirken, the basketball coach at the Rivers School in Weston, Mass., who had worked with Casey at Harvard basketball camps. They discussed the 3PointFoundation, a nonprofit organization that Mirken founded in March with Neil Jacobs, the longtime lawyer for the Boston Celtics.The foundation conducts a free after-school program that is designed to help boys improve their skills in the classroom and on the basketball court in an attempt to point them toward a path to college."We have kids in our program that have been shot at, have brothers that have been shot and killed, their dads are incarcerated," Mirken said. "When you give them an African-American role model, a young male, who is at an Ivy League school, he's obviously going to change what these kids' lives are."Casey grew up in suburban New Orleans before moving to Medway, a small town 35 miles southwest of Boston, when he was in middle school. He did not have an inner-city upbringing but says he can relate to the children in the program.Casey's father is not a part of his life, and his mother, Sharon, a health care provider, raised three sons on her own."There's this belief that if you live in the suburbs, everything is wonderful," Sharon Casey said. "That's not always the case. He could have been any one of those kids."Kyle Casey remains in contact with his teammates and watches Harvard's games when they are televised, but he has remained relatively detached from the team. The Crimson lost to Memphis, 60-50, on Saturday to fall to 9-6."Now that the basketball season is upon us, it's kind of in your face all the time," Sharon Casey said. "I don't know if people want to see him publicly mourning or what the case may be, but I just think some things should be left private."Kyle Casey has not been alone in enduring a year of limbo. Brandyn Curry, who had also been elected a captain, withdrew from college in September because of the cheating scandal. He is now home in Charlotte, N.C., selling life insurance."I'm learning about real life," Curry said. "I'm learning how hard real life can be when you've got to make money and you've got to go work a job. I'm growing up really fast and really maturing."Casey and Curry said they spoke on an almost daily basis, although rarely about the scandal and its fallout. They both plan to return to Harvard and the team next season.Casey said he believed the biggest help during this ordeal had been working with the foundation."I think being in his program has really rejuvenated me," he said. "It's given me that spirit again and the energy to wake up every morning with a passion and a purpose to make a difference in someone's life, if not my life."Some of the students in the program know about Casey's situation, but most do not. Casey plans to explain everything eventually so they can use it as a lesson, he said.His message, he said, will be simple: "Be careful with what you're doing, and stay focused, because it can all be gone quick, like overnight."
Billy King was at courtside Monday afternoon, having a pregame chat with those irascible former Knicks, Larry Johnson and John Starks, when a reporter approached, note pad open."I'm not talking today," said King, the Nets' general manager, pleasant but firm.Told that the intended subject had nothing to do with the state of his red-hot team — it was a question about whether the N.B.A. had in certain operational ways become the realization of Martin Luther King's dream — he dropped his guard and nodded."I think a lot of credit has to go to David Stern," King said. "His message to ownership has always been, 'It's not the color of skin, it's can a guy coach?' That's what set us on the path to where we are today."Where the Nets of Brooklyn and Kings County are for the moment is one game behind the first-place Knicks in the Atlantic Division less than a month after they presumably were left behind to scrounge the rest of the season for low-level playoff position. But on Dec. 28, King replaced his coach, Avery Johnson, with P. J. Carlesimo and the Nets promptly ripped off 11 victories in 13 games, including Monday's 88-85 nipping of the Knicks at Madison Square Garden, keyed by Joe Johnson's right-side jumper over J. R. Smith with 22.3 seconds left.King, an executive who is black, fired Johnson, a coach who is black, and appointed as an interim the veteran Carlesimo, who is white, and didn't have to think twice about consternation or consequences.Progress is when one makes decisions that are solely pragmatic, or at least one's perception of it.When Mike D'Antoni, who is white, faced a virtual mutiny last season from Carmelo Anthony, who is black, and was replaced by Mike Woodson, who is black, there was never a suggestion that race was involved. In a similar development last month, Johnson had apparently lost the support of the star point guard Deron Williams and other Nets players — most of whom, for the record, are black."When we felt we needed to make a change, we chose the guy with the most experience, and color had nothing to do with it," said King, relaxed in such conversation on a holiday when reflection on race is almost expected and on Monday was no doubt enhanced by the second inauguration of President Obama.Referring to the N.F.L.'s Rooney Rule, which demands that teams at least interview minority candidates, King added: "I always thought it was kind of ridiculous that you had to have a rule. Shouldn't be a rule; it should be based on what he's done and who he is."That broader scope comes into sharper focus when there is a history of open-mindedness for a sports league — or any industry, for that matter — to stand taller than its competition. The N.F.L., which had made progress in its once-pitiful hiring practices, has been looking so 20th century of late after 15 head coaching and general manager positions became vacant and not a single minority candidate was hired.Stern has taken his lumps through the years for a variety of issues, and he was mindlessly assailed by the broadcaster Bryant Gumbel for lording over his predominantly African-American player constituency during last season's lockout. But on Stern's watch, the N.B.A. has consistently scored high in minority hiring measures, has ushered in Michael Jordan's purchase of the Charlotte franchise and generally has been a leader in progressive thinking.Not that it couldn't do better. Billy King, for example, is one of five black general managers in a 30-team league. "That's maybe an area we can grow in, but you have guys up there and some of them have been recycled a little bit," said the 18-year veteran Jerry Stackhouse, who signed with the Nets this season with the intention of being an unofficial player-assistant to Avery Johnson. "You know, with Avery, I don't think one person even raised the question of whether it was a white-black thing. Avery's a good enough coach that he'll land on his feet."If he does, maybe he will bring Stackhouse into the fraternity as an assistant. If he doesn't, the well-traveled Stackhouse figures to have options. He will also keep his eye on Scott Skiles, his onetime coach, who recently resigned in Milwaukee but doesn't figure to be unemployed long."It's a brotherhood, always about relationships," Stackhouse said, noting that the N.B.A. has become a coaching haven for former players, white and black. Though the odds still surely favor the smaller pool of white players.Certainly the N.B.A. is a fairer place than the league Woodson broke into with the Knicks as a player in 1980. For years, black players would nag white teammates not to forget them when they ascended into head-coaching jobs or the front office.Currently one of 12 black head coaches, Woodson is an increasingly rare N.B.A. coach who can remember the assassination of Martin Luther King in 1968."I think I was 10 years old," he said. "I didn't understand the dynamics of it, but I think he was fighting for all the people, not just African-American people. He's probably the reason I'm in the position I'm in today and a lot of people."Even Carlesimo, in a sense, despite the very real racial undertones of the 1997 incident in which he was attacked and choked by Latrell Sprewell when they were feuding coach and player at Golden State.Stern's league has navigated many such minefields, emerging stronger for them."Things have changed," Woodson said, though not in conclusion. "Hopefully, they'll get better."
The Sacramento Kings , one of the N.B.A. 's most troubled and well-traveled franchises, may be on the move again.The Maloof family has agreed to sell a controlling stake in the Kings to an investment group led by Christopher Hansen, a hedge fund manager who intends to move the team to Seattle by next season and rename them the SuperSonics.The sale and relocation must be ratified by the N.B.A. board of governors, a process that could take several weeks, while the league's advisory and finance committee evaluates the deal. Although the board will meet next month during the All-Star break in Houston, a vote on the sale will probably not happen until April.The Hansen group will purchase 65 percent of the team, which includes the Maloofs' share. The remaining 35 percent is held by minority shareholders. Assuming a market value of $525 million, which includes the team's debt, the 65 percent stake would cost about $340 million, people informed of the deal said.It is unclear whether this amount includes Sleep Train Arena in Sacramento or the money needed to pay off the Maloofs' loans from the city of Sacramento and the N.B.A. The board of governors would also need to set a relocation fee, which can be any number it chooses.While declining to discuss the terms of the proposed deal, Hansen said in a statement: "Our negotiations with the family were handled with the utmost honor and professionalism, and we hope to continue their legacy and be great stewards of this N.B.A. franchise in the coming years and decades."The Hansen group is expected to file the necessary paperwork by March 1, the deadline to apply for relocation of the team for the 2013-14 season.In a twist, Clay Bennett, who moved the SuperSonics from Seattle to Oklahoma City (where they were renamed the Thunder), is the chairman of the N.B.A.'s relocation committee.Three-quarters of the board of governors must approve a transfer of ownership, but only a simple majority vote is needed to approve a plan to relocate.The Hansen group's bid is unlikely to face serious hurdles. Hansen and his fellow investors — including Steve Ballmer, the chief executive of Microsoft — have deep pockets, and the N.B.A. would like to have a team in Seattle, the nation's 12th largest television market and the largest without an N.B.A. team. The Maloofs own Sleep Train Arena, so Hansen's group would not have to break a lease if it chooses to move the team."There are pieces that make sense," said Marc Ganis, the president of SportsCorp, which brokers team sales but is not working on this deal. "By all of their machinations, the Maloofs have killed the potential for the team in Sacramento."The Kings have long been rumored to be on the market. The team has not qualified for the playoffs since 2006 and is near the bottom of the standings in the Western Conference this season. Sleep Train Arena is one of the oldest in the league and is obsolete by modern standards. Kevin Johnson, the mayor of Sacramento and a former N.B.A. star, brokered a deal with the Maloofs and the N.B.A. for a new arena last year, but the family later withdrew from the arrangement.Even in the face of a signed sale agreement, Johnson says he is confident that Sacramento can keep its team."I keep getting asked do we still have a shot? You better believe it!" Johnson wrote on Twitter on Monday.The Kings are drawing an average of 13,153 fans a game this season, the lowest in the league.Johnson has vowed to line up local investors to buy the Kings and keep them in Sacramento, in a new arena that would include public financing. Commissioner David Stern has said he will give Johnson a chance to speak to the board of governors — most likely in April — to present an alternate plan for local ownership and a new arena plan. With so many wealthy people in California, Johnson could still find an investor willing to match or exceed Hansen's deal.Hansen has promised to bring an N.B.A. team back to Seattle, where he grew up. The Sonics moved to Oklahoma City before the 2008-9 season, after repeated failed attempts to secure a deal for a new arena to replace the aging KeyArena in Seattle. The Thunder have been a success in Oklahoma City.Hansen has said he would like to take an N.H.L. team to Seattle to play at a new arena that would be built downtown, but that team has not been identified. Last year, the Seattle City Council and King County Council approved plans for a new, $490 million arena near Safeco Field, pending the acquisition of a new team.If the Kings moved to Seattle before a new arena is completed, they are expected to play at KeyArena.The Kings are one of the most road-weary franchises in the N.B.A. The Rochester Royals became a charter member of the N.B.A. in 1949; moved to Cincinnati in 1957; and then to Kansas City, Mo., in 1972, where they became the Kings and played some of their games in Omaha. In 1985, the Kings arrived in Sacramento.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — In the two weeks since Carmelo Anthony lost his cool against the Boston Celtics ' Kevin Garnett , he has not played a game in another N.B.A. city. He has not been subjected to taunting from opposing fans only too eager to bring up the trash-talking insults from Garnett that may have gotten under his skin. He has, in other words, not had to run a gleeful gantlet of harassment designed to knock him off his game.All that could change Thursday when Anthony finally goes on the road — to Boston, of all places, where Garnett, his Celtics teammates and perhaps the local fans will be hoping to pounce.Reporters asked Anthony at the close of Tuesday's Knicks' practice if he has put that Jan. 7 confrontation with Garnett behind him. Was he still brooding about the fact that after that game, which the Knicks lost, he had stalked Garnett, first outside the Celtics' locker room and then alongside Boston's team bus? Was he still kicking himself for ending up with a one-game suspension from the N.B.A.?Was he over it?"Oh yeah," Anthony said, whether he meant it or not. "Honestly, that's not even on my mind right now. And it hasn't been on my mind since that day."Lowering his voice to nearly a whisper, he added: "On my end, there's nothing left over. It's just another game that's on the schedule."Of course, even without the Anthony-Garnett issue to consider, a Celtics-Knicks contest is never just another game, especially in a season in which the Knicks are resurgent and threatening to end Boston's primacy in the Atlantic Division.But beyond that, who knows? The Celtics' crowd can be a tough one, but no tougher than some others in the N.B.A. and not any more likely to jump on an opposing player.What is part of the record, though, is that one of Anthony's teammates, Jason Kidd, received very tough treatment in Boston during the 2002 postseason. Then the point guard and leader of a vibrant New Jersey Nets team, Kidd heard chants of "wife beater" from Celtics fans, who were intent on delivering a nasty reminder that Kidd, nearly a year and a half earlier, had been arrested on a charge of spousal abuse involving his wife, Joumana, to whom he is no longer married.Joumana Kidd was in attendance in Boston as the shouts came from the stands. So was their son, T. J., who was then 3.It was a tough scene, an ugly one, and when Kidd and the Nets prevailed in Game 4 in Boston to even the series at two games apiece, he defiantly celebrated on the court, staring into the crowd and holding up two fingers on each hand to remind the fans the series was tied.Afterward, he admitted to having shouted profanities, too.When asked about that incident this week, Kidd said: "No matter what they scream or what is done, you have to go out and play. If you have rabbit ears, it may get to you, but if you don't, it's just another game on the road."Referring to Anthony and what might await him in Boston on Thursday, Kidd added: "He's one of the top players in the world. He's been heckled on the road before, in college and now in the N.B.A. It's nothing new."Chuck McKenney, a co-founder of RedsArmy.com, a Celtics fan Web site, predicted that Boston fans would boo Anthony during introductions on Thursday night, when he went to the free-throw line, when he had the ball and when he did not."We don't have a lot of respect for Melo," McKenney said in a telephone interview. "We kind of feel like he's always been a second-tier superstar, overpaid, not really capable of carrying a team to a championship."But just because we want to dismiss him doesn't mean we're not going to come out with a lot of vitriol and just let him have it."On the other hand, Anthony might be a bigger target than ever for Celtics supporters. He is averaging a career-high 29.2 points a game, excelling as a strong forward too quick for bigger defenders and, perhaps most important, has the Knicks five and a half games ahead of Boston in the standings.Amid the issue of what soundtrack is in store on Thursday night, the fact also remains that the Knicks are in need of a victory. Over the last five weeks, they have cooled off some — impressive some nights, off on others — and have lost 9 of 16 games during that period. It is a letdown that predates the pinkie injury to Raymond Felton, who has been sidelined for the last 11 contests, although Felton's absence has clearly made things worse.At Tuesday's practice, Felton told reporters he hoped to return to action on Saturday, when the Knicks visit the Philadelphia 76ers, although he has not been cleared for full-contact scrimmages.He will just be watching on Thursday, when it will be the Knicks versus the Celtics, Anthony versus Garnett, Anthony versus the crowd."We can't get caught up in that," said Coach Mike Woodson, who nevertheless acknowledged that the Boston fans would be unlikely to let bygones be bygones and let the Jan. 7 confrontation go unmentioned. Anthony agreed, once reporters brought it up."It'll be a hostile environment," he said. "I'm expecting that." He also said it would be "fun," but perhaps he didn't mean that, either.
MINNEAPOLIS — Coaches had to file their ballots for N.B.A. All-Star reserves Wednesday morning, so nothing Brook Lopez did against the Minnesota Timberwolves on Wednesday night could sway opinions. Not that Lopez will be sweating Thursday's televised announcement, which comes on an off day in Memphis."You know I never watch any of that stuff," he said. "I'll probably be sitting in my room with the lights turned off, doing nothing." Told that that sounded depressing, Lopez said with a laugh, "It's my life."On a night when the Nets had a much tougher time than they should have against the undermanned Timberwolves, Lopez again made a case for All-Star inclusion. He scored 22 points in a 91-83 victory, the 12th by the Nets in Coach P. J. Carlesimo's 14 games since replacing Avery Johnson. It is the second-best start by a coach in franchise history, trailing Lawrence Frank's 13-0 debut in 2003-4.As with Monday's 88-85 victory over the Knicks at Madison Square Garden, the Nets had stretches of carelessness that almost let Minnesota, even with three starters and three reserves out with injuries, steal a victory.A big fourth quarter from guard C. J. Watson, who scored the first 9 Nets points while Deron Williams sat with four fouls, helped put the Nets (26-16) 10 games over .500 for the first time since the 2005-6 season, when Lopez was a senior in high school in Fresno, Calif."We rebounded, which was really important," Carlesimo said. "We're grateful for the win, but we need to play a little more consistently than we did tonight."The last time the teams played, Nov. 5 at Barclays Center, the Timberwolves came from 22 points down in the third quarter to win, 107-96. But that was when Johnson coached the Nets, and most of Minnesota's regulars were healthy. Four Wolves who combined for 53 points that night — Nikola Pekovic (21), Chase Budinger (16), Alexey Shved (10) and Brandon Roy (6) — sat out Wednesday night with injuries.Kevin Love (broken bone in his right hand) was not available then or Wednesday. And Timberwolves Coach Rick Adelman, whose wife has been hospitalized with an undisclosed illness, missed his ninth consecutive game. The assistant Terry Porter filled in.Sloppiness cost the Nets the chance to blow out the Timberwolves early after jumping to 9-0 and 14-2 leads. Lopez hit his first four shots in a 10-point quarter, and Joe Johnson sank 4 of 6 for 8 points. Minnesota scored 12 points on seven first-half Nets turnovers, and the Nets led by only 53-42 at the half, which disappointed Carlesimo."The turnovers kept them in the game," he said. "We really could have stretched them out, and we didn't do it."The Timberwolves never led but came as close as 2 points two times early in the fourth quarter. Watson held them off — Minnesota's J. J. Barea committed five fouls in less than five minutes trying to guard him — until Williams returned with 5 minutes 46 seconds to play."I think he frustrated J. J. a little bit," Lopez said.Williams hit two foul shots and a 3-pointer around a layup by Lopez to push the Nets ahead, 89-79, with 1:15 to play. Williams and Johnson each had 18 points for the Nets, while Watson finished with 14."We definitely could have played better, especially defensively," Williams said. "This team, on offense they move a lot, a lot of back cutting, and we got burned a lot. That was the reason they were hanging around. But we're happy we're 2-0 on this road trip."Lopez added seven rebounds a day after rumors linked him again in a trade for Dwight Howard of the Lakers. This has been going on for two years, and Lopez said he was long past letting such talk concern him."I was at that point a long time ago," he said. "I don't pay any attention to what the media says. I just go about my business and focus on what's important here."Memphis, where the Nets play Friday night, is the first stop on a tough stretch that will test whether the Nets are as good as they have played lately. This four-game road trip finishes in Houston on Saturday. Home games with the Orlando, Miami and Chicago follow in a five-day stretch beginning next Wednesday."It will tell us a lot, for sure, but I don't think it's make or break," Carlesimo said.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — Carmelo Anthony 's biggest responsibility is to ignite the Knicks ' offense and be the team's most reliable point producer. He has fulfilled that assignment as the season approaches its midway point, leading the Knicks in scoring in 30 of the 32 games he has played.That is the good news. Less encouraging is that Anthony is taking more shots per game than he did at the beginning of the season, when the Knicks surprised the N.B.A. by winning 11 of their first 15 games.In the past month, Anthony has become more of a volume scorer. He had 29 points on 29 field-goal attempts Monday against the Nets. I In November, by contrast, he aspired to be a pinpoint shooter with fewer than 25 attempts a game.In 15 games in November, Anthony averaged 20.7 shots. In December, that figure increased to 23. This month, it has climbed to 25.5.And too many of those shots are not going in — either because he is being guarded more closely as the season progresses or because more of the shots are being forced. His shooting percentage this month is 41.7 percent, significantly lower than his season mark of 45.6 percent.Too many shots by Anthony, and too many that hit off the rim, do not constitute a formula for success. The trend is also a reminder of past criticism of Anthony, when he has been portrayed as a player focused more on his offense than on integrating himself into a wider team strategy.In this instance, though, Anthony would seem to have an explanation for shooting more. The Knicks have been without Raymond Felton, their starting point guard, for a month. Until Felton's injury, he was averaging 16.4 shots per game, the second most on the team. With Felton out, those shots have gone to other players.So Anthony, whose shots were increasing before Felton was injured on Christmas, has taken even more with him out of the lineup. Anthony conceded he was controlling the offense more now but did not see many alternatives."I guess that's what they pay me to do, right?" Anthony said at practice Tuesday. "I go out there, try to have fun and do what I have to do to help the team win. If it's shoot the ball more, rebounding more, passing the ball more, I'm all for it."For now, it appears Anthony does have to shoot a lot to keep the Knicks in games, although that approach is not necessarily producing victories. Anthony took 26 or more shots in three of the Knicks' last four losses. He was suspended for the other defeat, which came against Indiana.Coach Mike Woodson said he did not have a problem with Anthony's shot totals."He's been hovering around 30 points a game, so he's doing his part," Woodson said. "Some of the shots he's taken have been good shots, and he's taken some bad ones. But I don't find too many shots that Carmelo takes that are bad shots."Woodson had Anthony do a lot against the Nets in Monday's loss at Madison Square Garden. On numerous possessions, the Knicks threw the ball to him and watched him try to score over multiple defenders. He played more like a point guard and even ran pick-and-rolls with Tyson Chandler.Anthony's fourth quarter proved disappointing. He missed all six of his shots and committed three fouls. His last shot, which came with the Knicks trailing, 85-84, was an air ball with 12 seconds left. The Nets won, 88-85.Compare that game with one much earlier in the season, on Nov. 15, when the Knicks rallied against San Antonio on the road. Anthony did not try a single shot in the fourth quarter, and the Knicks stunned the Spurs over the final seven minutes with a 27-11 run to win, 104-100.But that was when the Knicks were undefeated. Now reality has set in, as well as a trend that could lead to problems in the long run.
Nobody knows what Kevin Garnett will say or do when Carmelo Anthony steps onto the floor in Boston on Thursday night, when the Knicks and the Celtics meet for the first time since Garnett's on-court posturing turned Anthony into a backstage vigilante early this month in New York.That is the point. Garnett is as unpredictable as he is emotional. He is as calculating as he is quick-witted. If that sounds contradictory, Garnett has always come across as a little stranger than the average professional basketball player, and at least that much sharper.When he announced at a Chicago pizza restaurant in May 1995 his intention to join the N.B.A. right out of high school, he was asked if he had consulted with Moses Malone or Shawn Kemp, who had successfully made the leap without playing in college.No, Garnett said, he had called Bill Willoughby, who had not lasted long as a pro, to determine what pitfalls to avoid.When he attended the league's rookie transition program the following September, he, alone, spoke out when an acting troupe staged a hypothetical situation in which a player would have to decide whether to give money to his own brother because he was in debt to drug dealers."He's a junkie," Garnett, then 19, said. If he handed over the cash, Garnett added, the brother would "still be a junkie."As a rookie with the Minnesota Timberwolves, he invited a couple of friends from his childhood home in Mauldin, S.C., to share an apartment with him, provided they got jobs or went to school."It was not the typical entourage thing, and Kevin was never your typical N.B.A. star," said Flip Saunders, who became Minnesota's coach during that season and remained there with Garnett for almost a decade. "For him, the team was like a family, and if you're part of it, there's nothing he won't do for you."Over the years, Garnett has bought suits for younger teammates, even a car in one case. When his teammate and close friend Malik Sealy was killed in an early-morning crash by a drunken driver on the way home from Garnett's 24th birthday bash, he paid for the funeral and wrote Sealy's widow a check in the tens of thousands.In or out has always been the determining factor in which Garnett — Jekyll or Hyde, tender spirit or trash-talker — a person might see. Ray Allen was a beloved teammate in Boston until he signed with the Heat. Garnett ignored him when the Celtics opened the season in Miami."Classic Kevin," said Terry Porter, who played three seasons with Garnett in Minnesota in the mid-1990s and is now the acting coach of the Timberwolves. "If you play with him, he's good people, great people, off-the-charts people. Other guys, yeah, he'll rub them the wrong way."Anthony may be another member of the N.B.A. superstar fraternity, a fellow All-Star starter for the Eastern Conference for the annual dunk-and-pony show next month in Houston. But he is a Knick and, more important, the key to defeating the Knicks.With the Celtics struggling to qualify for a low playoff spot in the East, Porter speculated that Garnett might have already have been envisioning a first-round series, trying to attach figurative puppet strings onto Anthony, the Knicks' best player, when he incited him. Or, Porter conceded, Garnett might have merely been conniving in the moment."Always hard to know with Kevin," he said, laughing.While Garnett and Celtics Coach Doc Rivers have denied that Garnett went so far as to comment on Anthony's wife, Porter said Garnett was old school enough — in the manner of notorious trash-talkers like Michael Jordan and Larry Bird — to believe that nothing was off-limits."I just assumed based on Melo's reaction that maybe Kevin went there," Porter said. "Because when you see someone go after a guy after the game — and Melo obviously lost it — you have to wonder if he did cross a line."Saunders, too, acknowledged that Garnett's intensity and team loyalty had always been a combustible mix, even in practice with teammates and coaches. But typically with purpose.
BOSTON — Max Goldstein of Manhattan dutifully paid more than $100 for his upper-bowl seat at TD Garden on Thursday night. To him, it was money well spent.Carmelo Anthony was making his first appearance in Boston since a Jan. 7 incident with Kevin Garnett at Madison Square Garden.Goldstein, a senior at Brandeis University in Waltham, Mass., donned his Amar'e Stoudemire jersey and already had his dream outcome in mind for the Knicks' first game at Boston this season."It's late in the game, the Knicks are up by 15, and Melo is at the line," Goldstein said. "Then we'll start the M.V.P. chants."He did not get the opportunity but he left happy nonetheless as Anthony scored 28 points to lead the Knicks to an 89-86 victory.Goldstein, as well as nearly everyone else in the capacity crowd, was expecting Anthony to be the subject of unending abuse.But on Thursday night, the crowd was restrained, at least by Boston standards. That might have been because both teams came into the game struggling, particularly Boston, which, after winning six straight, had lost four in a row. The Knicks had lost four of six.Anthony was booed during introductions and when he touched the ball early. But building security guards confiscated any potentially disruptive signs at the gate, and fans who bought green anti-Anthony T-shirts outside the Garden were not allowed to wear them or even display them."It's disappointing," the Celtics fan Mike McCarthy, 32, of Marblehead, Mass., said. "I really thought there'd be a lot more stuff than this." He spent $15 (negotiated down from $20, he said) for a shirt depicting Garnett dressed as the bee in the Honey Nut Cheerios ads with "Honey Nut Carmelos" in large letters.The shirt referred to a rumor that Garnett named the cereal while trash-talking with Anthony on Jan. 7, something Celtics Coach Doc Rivers said never happened. But Celtics security guards told McCarthy to put the shirt away for the night.On the court, Garnett and Anthony were rarely in the same space. Early on, Anthony drove by Garnett but missed his shot. Later in the first half, the Garden erupted when Garnett blocked an Anthony layup. By the third quarter, Anthony was helping Garnett off the floor.Other than the boos when Anthony was at the line — he attempted six free throws in the game — it was business as usual. But lately, that has meant a bad night for the Celtics.
BOSTON — He was booed during the introduction of the Knicks ' starting lineup. He was booed when he touched the ball on the Knicks' first possession. While the sellout crowd at TD Garden was generally restrained (by Boston standards) in its treatment of Carmelo Anthony , he would enjoy the last laugh.Anthony scored a game-high 28 points and grabbed a team-high 9 rebounds to lead the Knicks to an 89-86 victory over the Boston Celtics, ending their 11-game losing streak here.There was little interaction between Anthony and Kevin Garnett, no trash-talking exchange, no spit-flying altercation."For me it was just a matter of blocking everything out," Anthony said. "The whole night was kind of satisfying for me to win in this building."Anthony made two distinct adjustments from the game the two teams played three weeks ago, a 102-96 Celtics win: He did not let Garnett rattle him to the point where he lost his composure and he shot less in the fourth quarter.In the fourth quarter, Anthony went right by Garnett on the baseline and scored on a layup that gave the Knicks an 80-70 lead, their biggest of the game. He produced his most impressive plays in the final minutes by passing to teammates.The Celtics (20-22), who entered the game on a four-game losing streak, were determined not to let Anthony score. He was content to pass out of double teams, which led to open shots for teammates.J. R. Smith was a star in the final minutes. He swished a 3-pointer — his only one of the game — with 1 minute 11 seconds left to give the Knicks an 89-84 lead. Before that shot, Smith was 2 for 15."Well, I was seeing the double team all night," Anthony said. "It was easy. When you see the double team, swing, swing, and it's just a matter of guys making shots and J. R. made that big 3 for us."Tyson Chandler said Anthony handled the game and the circumstances well."He responded exactly the way he was supposed to," Chandler said. "The best way to feel like you get some giveback is by getting a victory."Jason Kidd, who was once the main target of the Boston crowd in 2002, said Anthony handled himself well. In fact, Kidd said the Knicks (26-14) had the type of performance Thursday that was similar to their strong start this season. Their offense was based on ball movement, and they played solid defense in the fourth quarter.After Smith's 3, both he and Iman Shumpert forced a turnover. When the Celtics had a chance to tie the score with a 3-pointer with 7.1 seconds remaining, Paul Pierce could not handle a pass from Rajon Rondo and lost the ball out of bounds, securing the win for the Knicks."We got two stops where they didn't even get an attempt at a shot," Kidd said. "We have to play defense like that."The game was not that entertaining through three quarters. Neither team found a rhythm, mostly because the officials Joey Crawford, Dick Bavetta and Marat Kogut called 36 fouls that made the game disjointed and essentially a free-throw shooting contest.Maybe it was an overreaction to what happened at Madison Garden on Jan. 7, when Anthony was suspended for one game for confronting Garnett near the Celtics' locker room and later at the Celtics' bus.Anthony didn't have a problem with the referees. "From my perspective, I thought it was a great officiated game," he said. "When New York and Boston play, that's how the game should be officiated."Coach Mike Woodson was just pleased his team, including Anthony, sacrificed in the final minutes to leave the TD Garden with a victory. Anthony was satisfied, too. When the final buzzer sounded, it was Anthony pumping his right fist in celebration.Before the game, Raymond Felton was cleared by the Knicks' medical staff to participate in his first full-contact practice since he fractured his right pinkie a month ago. Felton said he hoped to play in Saturday's game against the Philadelphia 76ers if he performed well in the practice."It's been feeling good," Felton said of his finger. "The biggest test will be tomorrow. I kind of hope somebody bangs it just to see how it feels."The team did an X-ray examination of his finger earlier this week, but Felton said he wouldn't play if he felt uncomfortable soreness Saturday morning.Tyson Chandler was voted on to the Eastern Conference All-Star team by the coaches Thursday. Chandler joins Carmelo Anthony as the two players who will represent the Knicks.
For years after he tore down a basketball rim with a one-handed dunk on a Monday night in January, Jerome Lane tried to replicate the same achievement just about every time his feet left the floor. He could not do it, of course. The moment — a perfect, inexplicable synthesis of conditions — had come and gone.Twenty-five years later, Lane's name remains tethered to the feat, in which he shattered the Plexiglas backboard at Pittsburgh's Fitzgerald Field House with a fast-break dunk less than five minutes into the first half against Providence on the bitterly cold night of Jan. 25, 1988.The moment is widely considered one of college basketball's most memorable, not just because of the dunk — one of the first (and last) of its kind — but for the call, from ESPN's Bill Raftery, who breathlessly exclaimed, "Send it in, Jerome!"Those four words have been immortalized through highlight reels, T-shirts, March Madness pool titles and regular catcalls for Raftery, who still broadcasts games for ESPN."It just popped out," Raftery said of the line. "There was no preconceived notion for it. I'm sure somewhere along the line I'd heard people say it, maybe."Lane, 46, now the director of a youth recreational center in Akron, Ohio, where he grew up, played five seasons in the N.B.A. He was sturdy and strong — listed at 6 feet 6 inches, he actually stood about two inches shorter but weighed 230 pounds — and had led the nation in rebounding the year before.Lane was never thought of as a particularly ferocious dunker, but he could jump, and he could run, and the Panthers liked to use both skills. The 1987-88 Pitt team began the season ranked fourth in the nation but had lost at Oklahoma, 86-83, on Jan. 23, and came into the matchup with Providence with something to prove.The play came after a steal, on a fast break orchestrated by point guard Sean Miller, now the coach at Arizona. Instead of passing ahead to Demetreus Gore, who was out in front, he dished to his right, where Lane was gathering steam filling the lane.Lane caught the ball and elevated above Providence's 6-foot guard Carlton Screen. The dunk sounded as if a light bulb had popped. When he landed, Lane had no idea that the lower portion of the backboard had shattered, leaving a gaping glass hole squarely in the center of the box. The rim was left dangling by a thread, until the Pitt mascot grabbed it and paraded around the arena with it in hand."I didn't realize anything until I looked at Demetreus," Lane told ESPN in 2010. "Then I saw glass on the floor. It came down like snow." For several seconds, the stands were practically silent. "Everybody just kind of gasped," said Larry Eldridge, then Pitt's associate athletic director. "Nobody could believe what they were watching."A few fans raced onto the court to snatch shards to keep as mementos. Pitt's longtime head of maintenance, Leo Czarnecki, collected some pieces and later posted them onto wooden placards underneath the words "A Piece of the Pitt Action 1-25-88"; he distributed them as gifts to members of the athletic department.The game was officially delayed for 32 minutes as crews scrambled to find a replacement backboard. Eventually they wheeled out an old hoop located underneath the stands. It did not have a shot clock.Both teams returned to their locker rooms during the delay. "I remember players brushing the shards out of their hair," said Kimball Smith, an assistant sports information director for Pitt at the time.Raftery recalled needing to find ways to fill time. He found the former N.B.A. coach Don Nelson there scouting and brought him on the air. "The place went bananas," Raftery said. "The kids were jumping, like they had just won the N.C.A.A. championship. Maybe they sensed it was part of history."For Raftery, the phrase became synonymous with both ESPN's budding college basketball coverage and his own way of punctuating the broadcasts. Reflecting on what that spur-of-the-moment saying meant for his career, Raftery said, "Nothing hurts you if people are still talking about it."Before a Pitt-UConn game Raftery was broadcasting in 2009, Lane appeared and told Raftery, "Thanks for making me famous." Miller likes to tease Raftery that it was his pass that made Raftery famous.After 25 years, and countless replays, they both seem right."I just think it is part of the history of basketball in the Big East," Raftery said. "Fans delight in it. It's just an exhilarating moment that, through TV, has had legs."
In a league in which the Lakers reside in Los Angeles and the Jazz are from Utah, the New Orleans Hornets officially announced Thursday night that they would no longer be on the list of teams with nicknames for regions other than their own. Starting next season, the franchise will be known as the Pelicans.The announcement had been rumored since early December, and the choice of Pelicans as a replacement name was a poorly kept secret. Louisiana is known as the Pelican State, and the brown pelican is the state bird. It appears on Louisiana's flag and seal and on the state's commemorative quarter.The pending change opens the door for one of the stranger possibilities in the history of N.B.A. record-keeping should the Charlotte Bobcats, an expansion team that replaced the Hornets after the team moved to New Orleans in 2002, attempt to reclaim the Hornets moniker.If that happened, the team in Charlotte would still have a history dating only to 2004, when the Bobcats began play. The records and statistics of the Charlotte Hornets from 1988 to 2002 would remain with the Pelicans. Hornets here, Hornets there. Confusing, to say the least.And then there are the Sacramento Kings, potentially headed to Seattle under new ownership. They could then reclaim the SuperSonics name, though the history of that franchise, which played in Seattle from 1967 to 2008, would presumably still be owned by the Oklahoma City Thunder. The Kings' history, which began in Rochester in 1945 and included stops in Cincinnati and Kansas City, Mo., would remain with the team in Seattle.It is enough to make your head spin, but it is standard operating procedure in a league that sees no problem having a Lakers team in Los Angeles that was originally named for the lakes in Minnesota (where the Lakers began their history) and a Jazz team in Utah that was originally named for the music scene in New Orleans, where that team originated.Let's not forget, either, that the Memphis Grizzlies name sounds odd because the team began play in Vancouver.There has been no official decision as to whether the Bobcats would be allowed to take back the Hornets name in the future, and the process to rebrand usually takes two years. So for now the Hornets name stays in New Orleans."We will absolutely take direction from the N.B.A. on this issue," Dennis Lauscha, the Hornets/Pelicans president, said on a conference call, adding that the league had yet to offer any.The N.B.A., at the very least, seems consistent on the matter of how to treat franchise history, with the records and statistics remaining with the team after moving. In the N.F.L., things can get more convoluted. The Cleveland Browns moved to Baltimore in 1996 and were renamed the Ravens, but when an expansion team started in Cleveland in 1999, they were given the Browns' name and history, thus making the Ravens, in effect, the expansion team. Conversely, the Indianapolis Colts retain the records and statistics of their time as the Baltimore Colts.The Hornets/Pelicans, meanwhile, have chosen to not repeat the curious decision to keep an ill-fitting name, not that the decision was made easily."As we moved through the process, we considered well over 100 names and many more logos," Lauscha said. "We found ourselves continually coming back to the Pelicans."The team sees the choice of logo and name as a chance to showcase the bird, which was near extinction in the 1960s but recovered and was removed from the endangered species list in 2009. In that sense, it reflects the resiliency of an area overwhelmed by Hurricane Katrina and the Deepwater Horizon oil spill that threatened the local pelican population."When Tom Benson bought this team, he threw out there very early that he had a goal of rebranding the team to better reflect the city and culture of New Orleans," Lauscha said.The Pelicans name was used by minor league baseball teams in the city from 1887 to 1959 and for one season in 1977. The change will go into effect at the end of this season, and the team's new colors will be blue, red and gold.But for the foreseeable future, there will be still be Grizzlies in Memphis. Be careful when you hike there.
MEMPHIS — Coach P. J. Carlesimo stared down and quietly brought his arms up. The color had drained from his face. He did not say anything as his players walked past him and took a seat at the bench. His look was enough.The Nets trailed the Grizzlies by 16 with six minutes left in the first half. Carlesimo — like the crowd here at FedEx Forum — could sense the game already unraveling, and Memphis was only beginning to hum.Few N.B.A. first halves look like the one the Grizzlies unleashed Friday, in the Nets' eventual 101-77 loss. The Nets stumbled, and the Grizzlies soared, at times controlling the backboard with ravenous efficiency, as if rebounds were loose balls on a football field.They scored a season-high 62 points in the paint.By halftime the Grizzlies (28-14) led by 23, and the Nets were wheezing. The third-quarter entertainment was provided by a dance troupe of septuagenarians. Even they appeared energetic compared with the Nets (26-17)."They were more physical than us, tougher than us," forward Gerald Wallace said. "This was a reality check."Before the game, Carlesimo had deemed the matchup against Memphis "a barometer for where we're at" this season. The Nets, winners of 10 of their previous 11, felt slighted that none of their players were selected for this year's All-Star Game, despite the efforts of their center, Brook Lopez.The Grizzlies had only one player selected, Zach Randolph. Marc Gasol, the 7-foot-1 centerpiece of the team with the fourth-best record in the Western Conference, was snubbed.It was Gasol, not Lopez, who played with the more obvious chip on his broad shoulders, scoring 20 points — all in the first half. Seven Memphis players scored in double figures.The Grizzlies took a 32-22 lead in the first quarter, on 52 percent shooting, and they were just starting. In the second, Memphis shot 68 percent, knocking down 12 of their last 14 shots. The Grizzlies outrebounded the Nets, 20-8, in the opening 15 minutes, with nine offensive boards. They had 21 second-chance points in the first half alone."A lot of it was just pounding on the boards and getting stick-backs and second shots," Carlesimo said. "There was really just no aspect of our game that we executed fairly well in the first half."The Grizzlies left in several of their starters, including Gasol, until the final minutes, even though they were ahead by 20. Nets forward Reggie Evans took exception to that, saying it was a sign of disrespect."There was a point where it was like, wow," Evans said. "It was shock. I guess it is what it is."If Brook Lopez was dismayed about being left off the All-Star team, he was diplomatic about it. "I was a little disappointed that there was no one from our team at all," Lopez said at Friday morning's shootaround. The Nets had the best record of any team not to have an All-Star selection.
HOUSTON — There was a point Saturday when Deron Williams's shooting touch was so scorching that his teammates flatly avoided him, the way they might recede from a bowler edging toward a 300 game. As the first quarter ended, and Williams still had not missed, there was a sense he might be on the verge of something spectacular.Williams and Houston's Jeremy Lin have a history, a seesawing battle of one-upmanship. On Saturday, it may have had a lot to do with Williams's sizzling start. But by the game's end, Lin was being cheered, Williams had been ejected, and the Nets had stalked off with their second lopsided loss in two nights, falling by 119-106 at Toyota Center.The Nets went from facing one of the league's staunchest defensive teams, the Memphis Grizzlies, to trying to keep up with its fastest, the Rockets, who led the league in possessions per game (100.4) and were third in scoring average (104.1) entering Saturday's game. The end results were largely the same.Before the game, Coach P. J. Carlesimo indicated that the Nets' success would hinge on their ability to slow the Rockets to a more deliberate pace. Instead, the Nets fell victim to the early defensive sluggishness that cost them in a blowout loss the night before."We're just getting annihilated in points in the paint," Carlesimo said. "We need to get some better individual defense, and we certainly need team defense."On Saturday, there was hardly enough of either. The Rockets outscored the Nets by 60-24 in the paint and by 27-7 in transition."We got into an up-tempo game; that's not our style," forward Gerald Wallace said. "We run, but this is just a transition team. That's not the style we wanted to play."Paced early by Williams, who hit his first seven shots, the Nets were ahead, 29-28, going into the second quarter. Williams either scored or assisted on the Nets' first 22 points.But he got little support.Then the Rockets took off, starting the second quarter on a 25-6 run. They got assists on 17 of their first 20 field goals."Tonight we were able to go inside, drive inside, get our big men easy buckets," said Lin, who finished with 14 points and 9 assists.The Nets cut the deficit to 9 with a stronger showing in the third quarter, making five 3-pointers and not committing a turnover. But the Rockets pulled away again in the fourth. Omer Asik, their center, had 20 points and 16 rebounds.After Memphis's Marc Gasol and Zach Randolph had their way with the Nets' frontcourt on Friday, Saturday's effort did little to ease concerns about the team."Maybe we're a step slow," Brook Lopez said. "I don't know if I'm communicating enough, or contesting enough, but we definitely got to change some things and get back to what we were doing."Williams scored 38 points against Lin and the Knicks last February, less than three weeks after Lin embarrassed the Nets with 25 points off the bench in the precursor to Linsanity. It was clear Williams had not forgotten about either game.But frustration boiled over late in the fourth, when Williams was ejected for arguing with the official David Jones. Williams finished with 27 points and 11 assists, but he declined to speak with members of the news media after the game.The Rockets are fighting out of a lengthy mid-month funk, following a stretch in which they had won 10 of 12. Their coach, Kevin McHale, acknowledged that the team was still learning a new system."We like the style we play when the ball moves," McHale said before the game. "And we're not very good when it doesn't."The backcourt of James Harden, named an All-Star last week, and Lin has shown signs of flash, but at times has also fizzled. The Rockets lead the league in transition scoring and possessions per game, but also in turnovers."Everybody wants to believe in a microwave society, where everything works in three days," McHale said. "But it takes time."Carlesimo was reluctant to say that his players were slowed by fatigue in their fourth game in six days. He praised the Rockets' ability to run their offense skillfully."It's an extremely good offensive team and it's not an accident the stuff they do," Carlesimo said.
Ramon Galloway scored 31 points, including 12 during an 18-4 second-half run, and La Salle upset No. 19 Virginia Commonwealth , 69-61, on Saturday. The Explorers have won consecutive games against ranked teams for the first time in 60 years.La Salle (14-5, 4-2 Atlantic 10), which edged No. 9 Butler on Wednesday night, is off to its best start since 1990-91. Juvonte Reddic had 22 points and 10 rebounds for host V.C.U. (16-5, 4-2).BUTLER 83, TEMPLE 71 Rotnei Clarke scored 24 points in his return from a severe neck sprain, leading No. 9 Butler (17-3, 4-1 Atlantic 10) to a home victory over Temple (13-6, 2-3).STONY BROOK 79, MAINE 69 Tommy Benton had 15 points, 14 rebounds and 11 assists, leading Stony Brook (15-5, 6-1 America East) past visiting Maine (8-12, 3-4). It was the first triple-double by a Seawolves player in 14 seasons of Division I competition.CORNELL 66, COLUMBIA 63 Galal Cancer had 19 points, helping Cornell (9-10, 1-1 Ivy League) beat Columbia (9-7, 1-1) for its fourth straight road win.ST. JOSEPH'S 59, XAVIER 49 Langston Galloway, Carl Jones and Halil Kanacevic each scored 15 points, and host St. Joseph's (11-7, 2-3 Atlantic 10) rallied to beat Xavier (11-8, 4-2).HARVARD 82, DARTMOUTH 77 Siyani Chambers had 21 points and 7 assists, and host Harvard (10-6, 2-0 Ivy League) came back to defeat Dartmouth (4-12, 0-2) in overtime.YALE 76, BROWN 64 Led by Justin Sears's 18 points and 8 rebounds, host Yale (7-12, 1-1 Ivy League) beat Brown (7-9, 1-1) in overtime.
It was a rough week for the Nets ' Brook Lopez, the high-scoring center with the frizzy curls, the surfer-dude baritone and the thoroughly underappreciated skills. No matter how many points he scored or how many games the Nets won, the unkind story lines kept coming, through no fault of his own.One day, Lopez was being sucked back into the Dwight Howard trade vortex. The next, he was being passed over for the All-Star team. It was not a great week for self-esteem."I was a little disappointed that there's no one from our team over all," Lopez said Friday, a day after the coaches' choices for the All-Star reserves were announced.When the rosters were complete, the Nets were left as the only above-.600 team without an All-Star. Deron Williams and Joe Johnson, All-Stars in past years, were easy to pass over, given their intermittent struggles this season. Lopez, however, was more than worthy, as the N.B.A.'s highest-scoring center (18.6 points a game) and the fulcrum of the Nets' offense.In the Nets' all-for-one, one-for-all lineup, which doesn't have a transcendent star, the 24-year-old Lopez is perhaps the most important element.He scores efficiently (52.1 percent), goes to the foul line frequently and even plays a little defense around the rim (2.1 blocks a game). Those statistics could be even higher if he were playing more than 30 minutes a game.His value was firmly established in December, when the Nets lost five straight games in his absence, starting the downward spiral that eventually led to Coach Avery Johnson's dismissal.Long derided as soft, Lopez has shown some ferocity as a shot blocker and rebounder. He will not soon be confused with Joakim Noah or Tyson Chandler — the top centers named to the All-Star team ahead of him — but then, neither Noah nor Chandler has Lopez's inside-outside scoring ability."I am speechless," Nets General Manager Billy King said on Twitter after the reserves were announced.No one appreciates Lopez more than King, who watched him work his way back diligently from a devastating foot injury last year, and who showed his faith by signing Lopez to a four-year, $61 million contract in July.That is what makes the latest round of trade rumors especially twisted.The Nets dangled Lopez as trade bait for several months last year in their breathless pursuit of Howard. When those talks collapsed for good, King struck an almost apologetic tone, declaring that he was more than happy to have Lopez manning the lane, and to have the trade talks in the rear-view mirror."You know, the guy I feel the happiest for is Brook Lopez," King said on the eve of training camp, "because now he can go to training camp not dodging questions or reading about the questions or hearing about the questions."He knows he's here, he's part of the foundation we're building here."King meant it at the time. Lopez had his new contract. Howard, having been traded to the Lakers, was safely relocated in Los Angeles, where he would undoubtedly, happily, spend the rest of his career.Except nothing has gone as expected in Hollywood, where the Lakers' fairy-tale season has turned into a comic catastrophe.On Friday, ESPN.com was floating potential Howard trades. Naturally, the Nets were a featured destination, with Lopez as the bait. Trading Howard after three months sounds ludicrous, but no more ludicrous than the Lakers' 18-25 record. They are halfway toward completing the most disastrous season in N.B.A. history, an underachievement of epic proportions.Howard hasn't clicked with Steve Nash, the All-Star point guard. His relationship with Kobe Bryant is shaky at best. He has been critical of Coach Mike D'Antoni's offense, although its heavy emphasis on the pick-and-roll should be a perfect fit for Howard, who was not long ago regarded as the N.B.A.'s best pick-and-roll finisher.Howard complained openly to reporters Monday about his lack of field-goal attempts, pointing to the box score after another loss.These acts of petulance have become the rule ever since Howard began souring on the Magic, and they threaten to permanently tarnish him as another self-consumed star who lacks the perspective and maturity to lead an elite team.At 27, and in his ninth N.B.A. season, Howard should be beyond this stage by now. In Orlando, he blamed the front office and got Coach Stan Van Gundy fired before pouting his way out of town.Now it appears that Howard may be writing a sequel, forcing his way out of Los Angeles before the Feb. 21 trade deadline or walking away as a free agent in July.It's one thing to bail out on the Magic. But bailing out on the Lakers, one of the most decorated franchises in sports? Bailing out on Bryant, one of the greatest players ever? Bailing out on one of the league's most dedicated fan bases?In the N.B.A., this would be an unforgivable sin.When healthy, happy and motivated, Howard is a top-five player, with the charisma to match, a star in every sense of the word. If he hits the market, teams will line up to get him, bad back and bad attitude notwithstanding.The Nets will say they have their star center, even if Lopez hasn't been officially certified as such. They will also, most certainly, do everything possible to extract Howard from Los Angeles if the Lakers conclude he is no longer worth the trouble.
Carmelo Anthony  did not let the final seconds on the clock run down. Anthony's decision was smart and it proved to be one of the small differences between the Knicks and the Atlanta Hawks on Sunday night. Anthony received the pass from Raymond Felton. He paused for a second to take a deep breath. Then he showed his biggest burst of energy toward the basket.Anthony surprised the Hawks, and in particular Josh Smith, who was responsible for stopping him. With a quick first step to get by Smith, Anthony drove to his left for a sweeping layup with 12.5 seconds left.Smith also fouled Anthony, and as the capacity crowd at Madison Square Garden chanted "M-V-P," Anthony converted the free throw for the 3-point play to give the Knicks a 106-104 victory."It was just the matter of not letting Josh Smith set his feet," Anthony said of the winning play. "I just wanted to catch the ball and go to catch him off guard."Anthony was in a position to win the game after a couple of mistakes by Smith. It was Smith who turned the ball over twice in the final minute. He committed a backcourt violation when Anthony pressured him and then was called for a moving screen on Felton.But just before time expired, Smith was given a chance for redemption — and it came off a deflection from Anthony."Carmelo should have had that steal," said Iman Shumpert, who was on the court during the final play.Smith hoisted up a wide-open 3-pointer, but the ball bounced high off the back of the rim."I just hate those shots," Shumpert said. "He shot it so high that we had to wait so long. I'm just glad he missed it."Anthony agreed: "That was one of the longest shots I've ever looked at."With Smith's miss, the night belonged to Anthony as he ignited the Knicks (27-15) from the second quarter on. He finished with a game-high 42 points, including a franchise-tying nine 3-pointers, as the Knicks went 16 of 27 (59 percent) from long range. Anthony shares the record with Toney Douglas, Latrell Sprewell and John Starks. Sprewell achieved the feat twice.Anthony, though, did his work in three quarters, not even attempting a 3-pointer in the fourth quarter. He said he did not know he had tied the record until after the game."Someone told me why I didn't try to make my 10th one," he said.Anthony struggled early, going 2 of 9 from the field to start the game, before making two straight 3-pointers. He then called for the ball as soon as the Knicks grabbed the next defensive rebound, even before they crossed midcourt. Anthony, one of the best shooters in the N.B.A., wanted to see just how hot he was.When Felton gave the ball to Anthony — on a backward dribble between his legs — he did not put the ball on the court once. Also one of the quickest shooters in the N.B.A., Anthony rose up, and so did the entire Garden crowd. Anthony's 26-foot shot, from the MSG logo on the court, swished through the net, producing the loudest roar of the first half. Indeed, Anthony was hot."I looked at Raymond and he was telling me to run," Anthony said. "Once he cut his man off and bounced it back, I pulled up and had no idea where I was at."The extra-long 3-pointer was Anthony's third consecutive basket from long range and it gave the Knicks a 52-47 lead. The only question after the shot was whether Anthony could keep up that pace in the second half.He did. Anthony did not miss from behind the arc on five attempts in the third quarter. It was a welcome sight for Knicks fans after Anthony had struggled to shoot the ball from anywhere on the court the past week.He went 31 of 85 in the previous three games, when the Knicks went 1-2."He needed a breakout," Coach Mike Woodson said. "He's been scoring, but he just hasn't been shooting at a high rate. Tonight I couldn't rest him. He came up big with big shots."Against the Hawks, Anthony was left wide open at times, which was something he had not experienced when Felton, the Knicks' starting point guard, missed 12 games with a fractured right pinkie.Felton scored 9 of his 12 points in the first quarter; then he focused on getting the ball to his teammates, finishing with 10 assists. The Knicks also got 18 points each from Amar'e Stoudemire and J. R. Smith.Atlanta (25-19) was able to stay in the game because Jeff Teague exposed what appears to be the Knicks' biggest problem on defense: guarding a quick, young point guard. Teague scored a team-high 27 points and created scoring opportunities for others. He had a chance to give the Hawks the lead late in the fourth quarter, but he missed a driving layup.On the next possession, Anthony made a fadeaway baseline jumper. And when the Knicks needed their most important basket, Anthony provided it.Jason Kidd finished with two assists in five minutes and did not play in the second half Sunday. The Knicks said Kidd, who was having back pain in Thursday's game against Boston, needed rest and that he was not injured. Kidd was also limited against Philadelphia on Saturday, playing just 15 minutes and not recording a point or an assist, just the third time that has happened in his career. In December, he missed four games with back spasms. ... Carmelo Anthony scored 20 or more points for the 29th consecutive game, tying Richie Guerin's franchise mark set in the 1961-62 season.
CHICAGO — On a dark and cold morning last month, 19-year-old Aaron Liberman woke at his apartment and walked a block and a half to a two-story, redbrick synagogue in West Rogers Park, a predominantly Orthodox Jewish neighborhood in northwest Chicago. Inside, he was met by the hum of worship and a smattering of older men — some in black hats, some wrapped in prayer shawls — seated at long tables, surrounded by shelves packed with books, Hebrew letters on their spines.Liberman removed his jacket and unpacked his worn prayer book. He unfurled his tefillin, small boxes holding prayers printed on parchment, and bound them to his left arm and his forehead with black leather straps. Then he prayed.During the service, a man walked over, politely interrupting Liberman's meditation, asked how he was, and then, rather proudly, said: "We're going to get tickets for one of your games. My kids, they are very excited."So met two worlds — Orthodox Judaism and N.C.A.A. Division I basketball — that are making an unlikely connection through Liberman. Liberman, a freshman at Northwestern, is 6 feet 10 inches of lean muscle, topped on and off the court by a skullcap. He did not play basketball seriously until he was a sophomore in high school. Now, he is believed to be the third practicing Orthodox Jew to be part of a Division I team.Tamir Goodman is widely recognized as the first Orthodox Jew to play Division I basketball. He received a scholarship to Maryland, but chose to play at Towson because the university tailored its schedule to his decision not to play on the Sabbath. Naama Shafir, a fifth-year senior at Toledo, is the first Orthodox Jewish woman to play Division I basketball. Shafir, who wears a short-sleeve shirt under her jersey to keep with customs of modesty, scored 40 points in the National Invitation Tournament championship game in 2011.Liberman, though, says he recognizes his situation is a bit unusual."If I had to choose, I wouldn't be known as the Jewish basketball player," Liberman said. "But I see how that might be difficult."After the morning service, Liberman drove his black pickup truck 15 minutes to Northwestern's campus in suburban Evanston, Ill., where he went straight to the training room. Liberman, who has had shin splints and has not appeared in a game, has decided to redshirt this season but continues to practice and travel with the team.As noted by Paul Lukas of the Web site Uni Watch, Liberman will probably be the first Division I player to wear zizit, the knotted tassels at the four corners of a prayer shawl, under a uniform."It wasn't very long ago that I couldn't make a layup, probably freshman year in high school," he said. "It's pretty strange that I'm here."The life of an Orthodox basketball player is one of discipline. Liberman prays three times a day, keeps kosher and travels only by foot on the Sabbath, from sundown Friday to sundown Saturday.However, Liberman has decided, after much reflection and consultation with rabbis, to play on the Sabbath, the Jewish day of rest. On one Saturday afternoon, he walked eight miles to practice."Actually, playing basketball is not breaking any of the 39 laws of the Sabbath," he said. "But I'll only be taking cold showers afterward because you can't use hot water."Liberman grew up in Valley Village, an area of northwestern Los Angeles, where he was discovered almost by happenstance by Josh Moore, a former N.B.A. player and a cousin of Shaquille O'Neal's. During the summer after Liberman's freshman year, Moore saw him play in a scrimmage and approached him, noting that his length and natural athleticism would be attractive to college coaches.Lenard Liberman, Aaron's 6-6 father, played high school basketball and tried unsuccessfully to walk on at Stanford. His son, thoughtful and soft-spoken, preferred games of a slower pace. He fished as a child and played some baseball as he grew older.But after Moore raised the possibility of playing in college, Liberman began training with him.
BOSTON — The official word did not come until the second half, but when it did, the prospects for the Boston Celtics ' season, already shaky at best, took an even darker turn: Rajon Rondo will not play again this season.Rondo, the Celtics' All-Star point guard, was a late scratch from Sunday afternoon's nationally televised game against the Miami Heat with what the team called a hyperextended right knee. He was taken to a hospital, where a magnetic resonance imaging test revealed a torn anterior cruciate ligament. Rondo will have an operation and miss the remainder of the season.After Friday night's double-overtime loss to the Atlanta Hawks, Rondo told the Celtics he had hurt his knee in the fourth quarter but thought it was nothing serious. He played in both overtimes of that game without noticeable discomfort. After the M.R.I., he returned to TD Garden and watched some of the Celtics' 100-98 double-overtime victory over Miami seated at a table near the team's locker room, greeting his teammates as they came off the floor after the game.Sunday's game was the sixth that Rondo has missed this year, three of them because of league-imposed suspensions. Boston is 3-3 in those games.Celtics Coach Doc Rivers said he received the news about Rondo before the game but decided not to tell the players. At that point, Rondo was still expected to be in the starting lineup. He had already participated in the team's pregame walk-through."I just didn't think it was any time to tell any of our guys that," Rivers said. "I told them after the game. Pretty emotional in the locker room."Rivers continued: "I like the team, still. Obviously, this is a blow. It's a huge blow for us. When something like this happens, someone that's already in our locker room is going to play terrific. And I have no idea who it is."The loss of Rondo on Sunday did not immediately affect a resilient Celtics team. Miami Coach Erik Spoelstra said the Celtics, who had lost six in a row heading into the game, "played like a desperate team without their engine." He was not aware that Rondo was going to miss the rest of the season.After the game, Miami's Dwyane Wade said of Rondo: "You never want to see anyone go down with any kind of injury, especially a season-ending injury. So it's very unfortunate. He's a great player, and he really is the leader of their team. Obviously, guys are going to have to step up."Wade and Rondo were to have been the starting backcourt for the Eastern Conference in the All-Star Game on Feb. 17.Rondo's injury overshadowed the other compelling story line of the day, the return of the former Celtics All-Star Ray Allen to Boston. As had been the case with other players from their 2008 team, the Celtics played a video tribute to Allen during a first-quarter timeout. There were some boos at first, but then the capacity crowd gave Allen a standing ovation, which he acknowledged."When you see something like that, all the emotions come out and go back to the great things we did here," Allen said. "I've always said that there is always going to be a part of me that's a Celtic."Allen finished with 21 points, 2 shy of his season high, while playing more than 38 minutes. He hit a 3-pointer near the end of regulation that helped the Heat send the game into overtime. He was also booed during the game when he had the ball, which he called "interesting."But even after their stirring victory over the defending N.B.A. champion Heat, the Celtics (21-23) remain in eighth place in the Eastern Conference and face an uncertain future over their final 38 games. The loss of Rondo will make it much more difficult for them to contemplate a serious run at the Knicks or the Nets for the Atlantic Division title, which they have won for the past five years. There is no designated replacement for Rondo; his backup duties fell to Courtney Lee or Leandro Barbosa.Rivers said: "Well, you can write the obituary. I'm not. We're going to stay in there."Paul Pierce will also take over some of the playmaking duties. He did that Sunday, recording a triple-double (17 points, 13 rebounds and 10 assists). Barbosa, coming off the bench, had an energetic game (9 points, 4 assists, 3 rebounds), as did Jeff Green.But Rondo is almost irreplaceable, given his confidence and comfort at the position, his role as a team leader and his singular style and game.Asked about the loss of Rondo, Allen said: "It forces a team to circle their wagons. It puts the onus on the guys on the bench and everyone has to reprioritize. It shows what kind of team you really are."
Long before he was snubbed by Eastern Conference coaches and ignored by N.B.A. fans, Brook Lopez had his talents dismissed by the executives who steer the Orlando Magic . The insult was indirect and perhaps not intentional, but it was an insult nonetheless.The Nets wanted to send Lopez to the Magic last year as the centerpiece of a trade for the disgruntled Dwight Howard. The Magic rebuffed the proposal again and again, no matter how many other players and unprotected first-round picks the Nets offered.Howard ended up in Los Angeles in a four-team deal. The Magic got a package of solid but unspectacular players. The Nets re-signed Lopez to a maximum contract, content to keep building around him.It was worth wondering Monday night, as the Nets rolled to a 97-77 victory over the Magic at Barclays Center, whether Orlando officials wince now and then over their decision. Lopez has played like an All-Star, powering a Nets offense that ranks among the league's best. The Magic, bereft of a go-to scorer, have been abysmal.The Nets (27-18) used all of their options, riding an early scoring burst from Deron Williams (20 points), a late push from Keith Bogans (12 points) and consistent production from Joe Johnson (13 points) and Lopez (16 points) as they swept Orlando for the first time since the 2003-4 season — just before Howard was drafted.The Nets did not need much from Lopez, but he played efficiently, going 6 for 8 from the field in just 28 minutes, and kept up his push to make the All-Star team, perhaps as an injury replacement for Boston's Rajon Rondo.Rondo was lost to a season-ending knee injury Sunday. It is now up to Commissioner David Stern to choose a replacement, and Lopez is sure to be high on the list of candidates. When the reserves were announced last week, the Nets were left as the best team in the league without a single All-Star.Having already been passed over twice — first by the fans (who chose the starters) and then the coaches (who selected the reserves) — Lopez knows better than to predict anything."I'm not really thinking about it, honestly," he said with a chuckle. "I was busy getting ready for this game. We got Miami coming in in two days, so that's definitely the main thing right now."The campaign for Lopez began in the stands Monday. Fans in both end zones held up placards that spelled out "All-Star" in all capital letters, along with large cutouts of Lopez's face and various signs indicating that Lopez had been robbed. Several fans started an "All-Star" chant when Lopez stepped to the foul line early in the game."I'm just thankful that we have support out here like that," Lopez said.Orlando (14-30) lost its sixth straight game but could take solace in the encouraging play of Nikola Vucevic, the young center acquired in the Howard deal, who finished with 18 points and 9 rebounds in 38 minutes.Eventually, perhaps, Vucevic will justify the trade. But Lopez is clearly the superior player right now. He leads all centers in scoring, with 18.6 points per game, and is shooting 52.3 percent from the field.The commissioner can choose any player he deems worthy and is not obliged to select another guard to replace Rondo in next month's game. Other candidates could include Atlanta's Josh Smith and Al Horford, Boston's Paul Pierce and Indiana's David West.The Nets' star guards, Williams and Johnson, could receive consideration as well, although both have struggled with consistency this season."I just hope it's one of our three guys," Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo said.Monday's game served as a final warm-up for the tougher schedule to come. The Nets will play host to the Miami Heat, the Chicago Bulls and the Los Angeles Lakers over the next eight days.The Nets easily built an 18-point lead in the first half, survived a lackluster third quarter and cruised to the final buzzer after pounding the Magic in the opening minutes of the fourth.Maurice Harkless, one of the key acquisitions in the Howard deal and a native of Queens, scored a career-high 16 points and helped ignite a third-quarter rally, when the Magic cut the deficit to 6 points. But the Nets bounced back quickly, opening the fourth quarter with a 9-0 run, then burying Orlando with a flurry of 3-pointers from Bogans, Johnson, C. J. Watson and Mirza Teletovic.The Nets won their eighth straight home game and are now 11-3 in January, giving them two 11-win months in a season for the first time in franchise history. They went 11-4 in November.The game was filled with oddities, from Reggie Evans throwing a rare over-the-shoulder pass to Johnson for a 3-pointer, to Orlando's Glen Davis catching Gerald Wallace in midair after Wallace converted a layup. Davis bear-hugged Wallace on the way down, held him for a second, and then gently returned him to the court.
Brook Lopez cackled when asked if he could imagine his 7-foot frame rolling on the floor with a celebrating fan who had just hit a halfcourt hook shot. Sure he could."That's the beauty of basketball," he said. "Everything is so close."Lopez was newly minted as an All-Star on Wednesday, but when the world's consensus best player bolts from the sideline and revels in the good fortune of the common man — as LeBron James did last Friday in Miami when Michael Drysch of McHenry, Ill., won $75,000 in conjunction with James's charity foundation — that's a teachable moment to help bridge the yawning gap between the ever-strapped sports consumer and the chosen few.Or in this case, he who bears the tattooed inscription on his back: Chosen 1."You could see that LeBron was really excited for the guy," Lopez said before the James-led (as usual) Heat outclassed the Nets, 105-85, at Barclays Center. "It was cool."It was also quite a week for James and his fully repaired reputation as the N.B.A.'s leading man-child, so to speak, after the 2010 fracture resulting from his grand pronouncement, or Decision, upon departing Cleveland for South Beach. After communing with Drysch, James consorted at the White House with "Prez," as he called Barack Obama when the Heat got their grip-and-grin welcome for winning the championship last June.On Wednesday night, James and company made their first appearance in Brooklyn, the last stop on the James tour of locations he rejected two and a half years ago (though the Nets were still in New Jersey at the time). Doesn't it now seem like 20?Back when the free-agent King finished with fawning suitors, he was convicted in the court of public opinion, more or less of insensitivity that was very likely the residue of immaturity. But recent events watched round the world made you think: thank goodness that James has retained his sense of youthful spontaneity that occasionally borders on silly.Better that than the programmed genius of advisers and television executives in search of the extra buck in the way James looks for the open man."For a while there he was playing to prove people wrong, but what you're seeing now is a guy who understands that you get a lot more accomplished playing for the love of it than for hate," Dru Joyce II, James's high school coach, said in a telephone interview from Akron, Ohio.Given what we know about other transcendent athletes like Lance Armstrong, Alex Rodriguez and, yes, Ray Lewis, did America really expend that much vitriol on a young man who wanted to play on a better team? Did the news media really mercilessly hound James for the none-too-felonious act of promising multiple championships to Miami before coming up small in the 2011 finals against Dallas?Joyce — who still coaches the St. Vincent-St. Mary team from which James vaulted to the N.B.A., as well as James-sponsored teams in Akron — has never been shy in admitting that his disciple was in on a few questionable judgment calls. But was a little context to soften the contemptuousness too much to ask?Joyce's son, Dru III — now playing professionally in Germany — was James's close friend on youth and scholastic teams that were more like family than traveling showcase. But speaking as a coach, the elder Joyce said that what has impressed him most about James's growth was how he took the criticism of the 2011 finals to heart and went to work on his game, more than his brand."When 'Bron was in high school, we always got what we needed from him in the post," Joyce said. "In the pros, he couldn't do what he did in high school. He needed to refine his game, improve his skills. That's what he did."The narrative, of course, is continuing, open to interpretation and apparently re-evaluation. James no doubt will be reminded at some point that he used both hands when forecasting the number of titles the Heat would win. The Nets' Reggie Evans weighed in Wednesday with the opinion that even last season's title was tainted because it came in a lockout season.James's pointed answer was that the Nets shouldn't have quit on the departed coach Avery Johnson, and that zinger was punctuated by 24 points, 9 rebounds and 7 assists. However nonsensical and self-sabotaging Evans's claim was — and James said he was motivated by it — the Heat, even while narrowly leading the Eastern Conference, have at times played unevenly, short a defensive big man and leading them to try out the bizarre if exuberant Chris Andersen.Opponents have to hang their hopes on something. But if not this time around, there is the matter of James's opt-out clause after next season, Year 4 of what so far has to be considered a better first term than Obama's.Whoever James's teammates will be, it is unlikely that his critics will have to question his commitment to them. While Kobe Bryant and Carmelo Anthony are deified when they are moved to share the ball, James has mostly been called out for passing too much — which makes Joyce proud."I have a kid I'm coaching now, a freshman, one of the top 10 in the country for his age," Joyce said. "I tell him: 'Right now you can do everything to make yourself feel good, but you can't do things to make other guys on your team feel good. It's not that you're selfish — you just don't know, and you have to learn.' "What we learn from James, one hopes, is not to exaggerate the self-aggrandizement of runaway fame. Even Drysch, who made one miracle shot and rose from having James land on him with the force of his 240 pounds richer and ready for his 15-plus minutes.Contacted via Twitter Wednesday for an interview, Drysch — a 50-year-old computer technician — messaged back: "Hi, Patrick has been helping me on media requests. Give him a call."
The hardest Nets player to please, Gerald Wallace, had 13 rebounds in 41 minutes in Brooklyn's 93-89 win over the Chicago Bulls on Friday, a scratching, clawing, wrestling match of a basketball game that would seem right up his alley.Wallace has a low, syrupy-thick voice that finds ways to carry around a locker room. Lately, it has been carrying an undercurrent of candor.He criticized the Nets' effort in Wednesday's loss to the Miami Heat, considering it emblematic of how far the team still has to go. Wallace remained forthright in his assessment of Friday's game, despite the win."We could have made this game a lot easier for us tonight," he said. "At the end of the day, a win is a win, and we'll take it. But there's definitely things we've got to get better."The Nets put forth a strong fourth-quarter effort, outrebounded Chicago, 40-29, and shot 52 percent from the field. But squeaking by the Bulls, who were missing three-fifths of their regular starting lineup, was not a performance that would necessarily indicate that the Nets had collected themselves after losing three of four. Chicago guard Kirk Hinrich, forward Carlos Boozer and center Joakim Noah all sat out with injuries. The team's star, Derrick Rose, a former most valuable player, has missed almost all of the past two seasons.But the Nets were not able to take things in a leisurely way. Chicago was motivated and aggressive, and relentless on defense."They make you work for everything," guard MarShon Brook said. "They try to turn you over, especially on nights like tonight when they're missing some of their key guys on the offensive end."Brooks gave the Nets a spark off the bench in the fourth quarter, after the offense began to stagnate. The Nets were forceful inside early, scoring 18 points in the lane in the first quarter, but they strayed from that approach in the middle of the game. The Bulls shot 55 percent from the field in the second and took a 42-41 lead into halftime.Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo said his players were down in the locker room at intermission, because they were expecting to steamroll the depleted Bulls. But they regrouped."By that point, they said, well, this is the kind of game it's going to be," Carlesimo said. "Let's just find a way to win."After trailing throughout the third quarter, the Nets began the fourth with a 7-0 run to take a 70-67 lead. The short-handed Bulls appeared to lose some of their steam, bending at the waist and tugging on their shorts. The Nets spread the floor and worked inside with Andray Blatche, who scored 11 points."We just pounded the ball down low, and I just tried to be aggressive," Blatche said.The Bulls continued snipping back any opportunities the Nets had to run away with a lead. With 31 seconds remaining, Wallace tipped in a miss by Deron Williams for a 91-86 lead. Bulls forward Luol Deng missed a crucial free throw seconds later; the Bulls had been 19 of 20 from the line before that miss.But Deng made up for it after Jimmy Butler swiped the inbounds pass from Wallace by laying it in, cutting the lead to 91-89. Still, Watson and Wallace hit enough free throws in the closing seconds."It was great for the bench guys to come in and give us a lift and really close out the game for us," Joe Johnson said.Wallace steered the defense, which was strong. But he remained disenchanted with the team's play of late."They weren't at 100 percent," Wallace said. "We were able to outmuscle them with the guys we have on the court."There is a chance Brooklyn could be similarly fortunate on Tuesday against the Los Angeles Lakers, who may be without center Dwight Howard. But sneaking by with more ugly wins over diminished teams?That is not the way to please Wallace, who said, "There are still things we could have done better."In the first quarter Friday, the Nets owner Mikhail D. Prokhorov greeted the one-millionth guest to visit Barclays Center since its opening in September. The guest, Allison Barlow of Park Slope, was given a voucher for two tickets to every event at the arena for a year. Since officially opening on Sept. 28, Barclays Center has hosted 86 events, including Friday's game.
Billy Hunter 's long, sometimes-controversial tenure as the head of the N.B.A. players union could be nearing an ignominious end.The union's executive committee, led by its president, Derek Fisher, placed Hunter on indefinite, paid leave Friday, the likely precursor to his dismissal.Hunter, 70, who has served as executive director of the National Basketball Players Association since 1996, is under fire for questionable business practices and nepotism, which were documented exhaustively in a recent audit. He is also the subject of a continuing investigation by the United States attorney's office in Manhattan and the federal Labor Department."Unfortunately, it appears that union management has lost sight of the N.B.P.A.'s only task, to serve the best interests of their membership," Fisher said in a statement. "This is the reason I called for a review almost a year ago. The findings of that review confirm this unfortunate truth, and we must now move forward as players."Ron Klempner, the union's longtime deputy counsel, has been appointed interim executive director in Hunter's place.Hunter's lawyer immediately denounced the suspension and indicated that Hunter would fight it."I am deeply troubled by the lack of fundamental fairness shown my client, by a group whose authority to take such action is highly questionable," said the lawyer, Thomas Ashley. "The act of placing my client on administrative leave is not supported in either the constitution or bylaws of the N.B.P.A."Under the terms of the suspension, Hunter has effectively been stripped of all duties. He is barred from visiting the union's office in Harlem and from using any union resources, including e-mail and credit cards.Ashley protested that Hunter had not yet had the opportunity to respond to the audit. He also asserted that Hunter's contract — which is worth up to $18 million — was valid, although the audit concluded it had not been properly approved and was unenforceable.Hunter's future is likely to be decided Feb. 16, when the union holds its annual meeting at All-Star weekend in Houston. Players will hear from the law firm that conducted the audit, Paul, Weiss, Rifkind, Wharton & Garrison. The 30 player representatives, one from each team, are then expected to vote on whether to retain Hunter.Meanwhile, there were indications the federal investigation was entering its final stages and could reach its conclusion before the players convened in Houston.The movement to oust Hunter is already gaining steam. Several players have publicly called for a change in leadership, and one of the N.B.A.'s most influential agents, Arn Tellem, has urged his clients to fire Hunter.That decision will ultimately fall to the player representatives, who will vote based on the wishes of their respective teams. At least 10 teams, including the Nets, are already committed to firing Hunter, according to people in contact with the player representatives."Everyone I've talked to, it's pretty clear that they're looking for a change," Kris Humphries, the Nets' player representative, said Friday. He added, "Just based off the highly tenured players on this team, and their positions, I don't think he'll have our support."Nets point guard Deron Williams was the first prominent star to call for Hunter's ouster. The Nets' roster also includes three Tellem clients: Humphries, Brook Lopez and Joe Johnson. Lopez, the Nets' alternate player representative, will stand in for Humphries at All-Star weekend.The Chicago Bulls are still debating their position on Hunter. But Joakim Noah, who will represent the team at the Feb. 16 meeting, said: "I don't think the players are too happy, to be honest with you. I think there's a lot of explaining to be done."Reached Friday, Tellem called Hunter's suspension "a necessary first step to enable the players to remedy this unfortunate situation.""The players need a leader of integrity and strong moral character who will put the needs of the membership first and champion their cause," Tellem said.Fisher, a 17-year veteran, has been pushing for a review of Hunter's business practices since last spring — an effort that initially drove a wedge between him and the other eight players on the executive committee, who asked Fisher to resign. Fisher refused, and now four of those committee members have joined him in suspending Hunter. Those four are Chris Paul of the Los Angeles Clippers, Matt Bonner of the San Antonio Spurs, Roger Mason of the New Orleans Hornets and James Jones of the Miami Heat.Amid all of the infighting last year, the executive committee lapsed into near nonexistence because seven members either had their terms expire or were out of the league. Fisher, who played briefly for the Dallas Mavericks this season, and Bonner were the only ones left in good standing, according to the audit.Fisher and Bonner, drawing on union rules, created an interim executive committee and appointed Paul, Jones and Mason. The decision to place Hunter on leave was unanimous."We ask for the cooperation, trust and patience of the players, their representatives and some of our hard-working N.B.P.A. staff as we navigate through this situation," Fisher said.The players are also retaining outside counsel to assist them as they prepare for the All-Star weekend meeting. In the meantime, Fisher — who is not on an N.B.A. roster — plans to work from the union's offices in Harlem.The move to suspend Hunter came just days after he began making moves to comply with the audit's recommendations, including the adoption of new anti-nepotism rules. Hunter announced Wednesday that he had fired his daughter and his daughter-in-law and had cut ties with the financial services firm that employed his son.
Sean Kilpatrick scored 21 points and Cashmere Wright had 17, helping No. 24 Cincinnati beat Seton Hall , 65-59, on Saturday for its fifth win in six games.The Bearcats (18-4, 6-3 Big East) nearly lost a 20-point lead in Newark after going on a 29-5 run that included 15 straight points to open the second half. They led by 48-28 with about 15 minutes left, but the Pirates (13-9, 2-7) pulled to 4 points behind twice.Cincinnati Coach Mick Cronin earned his 200th win. He is 131-92 in seven seasons with the Bearcats.Fuquan Edwin and Brandon Mobley each had 16 points for Seton Hall, which has lost three straight and seven of eight after starting 12-2.The Hoyas held D'Angelo Harrison, the league's second-leading scorer, to 2 points and no field goals.ST. JOSEPH'S 70, TEMPLE 69 Ronald Roberts had 18 points, 12 rebounds and 3 blocks, and host St. Joseph's (13-7, 4-3 Atlantic 10) rallied from a late 9-point deficit to edge Temple (14-7, 3-4).LA SALLE 80, GEORGE WASHINGTON 71 Ramon Galloway and D. J. Peterson each scored 15 points to lead visiting La Salle (15-6, 5-3 Atlantic 10) past George Washington (10-10, 4-3).CHARLOTTE 66, UMASS 65 Victor Nickerson broke a tie with two free throws with 1 minute 16 seconds left, and host Charlotte (17-4, 5-2 Atlantic 10) held on to beat Massachusetts (14-6, 4-3).HARVARD 89, BROWN 82 Siyani Chambers's 17 points and 10 assists lifted Harvard (12-6, 4-0 Ivy League) to a double-overtime win over visiting Brown (8-10, 2-2).STONY BROOK 56, NEW HAMPSHIRE 54 Anthony Jackson's late 3-pointer lifted Stony Brook (17-5, 8-1 America East) at New Hampshire (6-15, 2-7).R. MORRIS 60, L.I.U. BROOKLYN 57 Velton Jones made a jumper with 11 seconds left to help visiting Robert Morris (15-8, 7-3 Northeast Conference) hold off Long Island Brooklyn (11-11, 6-4).
Cody Zeller scored 19 points, leading No. 3 Indiana to an 81-73 victory over top-ranked Michigan on Saturday.It was the third time in program history that the Hoosiers (20-2, 8-1 Big Ten) had beaten the No. 1 team at home, and the first time they had done it in a second straight season. The victory gave Indiana a five-game winning streak, sole possession of the Big Ten lead and, most likely, the top spot in the country.Indiana students did not rush the court in full force as they did in 2001, when the Hoosiers upset Michigan State, or in 2011, when they took down Kentucky, their other home wins against No. 1 teams.The Wolverines (20-2, 7-2) were led by Trey Burke, who had 25 points and 8 assists. Michigan led only once, at 3-2, and spent most of the night playing catch-up after digging itself an early hole.After more than 20 minutes of chasing the Hoosiers, the Wolverines finally caught them when Nik Stauskas made three free throws with 17 minutes 42 seconds left, tying the score at 40-40. That did not last long, though.Michigan played most of the night without the starting forward Jordan Morgan, who played two minutes on a sprained right ankle before returning to the bench.OKLAHOMA ST. 85, KANSAS 80 Markel Brown scored 28 points, Marcus Smart added 25, and visiting Oklahoma State (15-5, 5-3 Big 12) held on to beat No. 2 Kansas (19-2, 7-1), ending the Jayhawks' nation-leading 18-game winning streak.The Cowboys earned their first road win over a top-five team since a 52-50 overtime victory against Kansas on Jan. 2, 1958.FLORIDA 78, MISSISSIPPI 64 Erik Murphy scored 19 points and was instrumental on defense, helping No. 4 Florida (18-2, 8-0 Southeastern Conference) beat No. 16 Mississippi (17-4, 6-2) at home. Murphy took a charge, had a block and altered several shots in the paint.DUKE 79, FLORIDA STATE 60 Seth Curry scored 21 points, and No. 5 Duke cruised at Florida State (12-9, 4-4 Atlantic Coast Conference).Duke (19-2, 6-2) raced to an 18-2 lead and never looked back. Michael Snaer, Florida State's leading scorer, was held without a point until nearly five minutes were gone in the second half.PITTSBURGH 65, SYRACUSE 55 Tray Woodall had 13 points, 4 assists and 3 steals as Pittsburgh continued its mastery of top-10 teams at home, pulling away from No. 6 Syracuse.The Panthers (18-5, 6-4 Big East) are 13-1 against top-10 teams at home since Petersen Events Center opened a decade ago.C. J. Fair led Syracuse (18-3, 6-2) with 20 points. The Orange have lost two straight games for the first time in nearly two years.BUTLER 75, RHODE ISLAND 68 Rotnei Clarke scored 23 points, and No. 9 Butler beat Rhode Island (6-14, 1-6 Atlantic 10) at home. Clarke had 12 points in the first 11 minutes of the second half. The Bulldogs (18-4, 5-2) trailed, 32-30, at halftime but then went on a 15-3 run.CALIFORNIA 58, OREGON 54 Justin Cobbs made an 18-foot jumper with 1:35 remaining and then added a pair of free throws for host California (13-8, 5-4 Pacific-12), which hung on to beat No. 10 Oregon. The Ducks (18-4, 7-2), who were held scoreless over the final four minutes, lost their second straight game to an unranked team this week.The victory was the Golden Bears' first over a top-10 team in more than five years.OHIO STATE 63, NEBRASKA 56 Lenzelle Smith Jr. had 21 points, and No. 11 Ohio State (17-4, 7-2 Big Ten) held off Nebraska (11-12, 2-8) for a road win.MIAMI 79, N.C. STATE 78 Reggie Johnson tipped in a missed shot with 0.8 of a second left to help No. 14 Miami (17-3, 8-0 A.C.C.) edge No. 19 North Carolina State in Raleigh.The Wolfpack (16-6, 5-4) nearly topped the tip-in when Rodney Purvis launched a shot from beyond halfcourt, but it hit the rim and rattled out.The Wolfpack's four league losses have been by a combined 7 points.NORTHERN IOWA 57, WICHITA ST. 52 Anthony James scored 16 points, and host Northern Iowa (12-11, 5-6 Missouri Valley Conference) beat No. 15 Wichita State, sending the Shockers into their first losing streak of the season. The Shockers (19-4, 8-3) lost to Indiana State on Tuesday.KANSAS ST. 52, OKLAHOMA 50 Angel Rodriguez hit two free throws with 5.6 seconds left to give No. 18 Kansas State (17-4, 6-2 Big 12) a road win over Oklahoma. The free throws ended an 8-0 run by the Sooners (14-6, 5-3) that tied the game with 13 seconds to play.NEW MEXICO 75, NEVADA 62 Chad Adams hit two 3-pointers during a 10-2 second-half run to spur No. 20 New Mexico (19-3, 6-1 Mountain West) to a home win over Nevada (11-10, 2-5).CREIGHTON 75, BRADLEY 58 Doug McDermott scored 25 points, including 9 during a 12-0 run, and No. 21 Creighton overcame poor 3-point shooting in the first half to beat Bradley (13-10, 5-6 M.V.C.) at home. The Bluejays (20-3, 9-2) have now won 20 games in 14 of the last 15 seasons.AIR FORCE 70, SAN DIEGO STATE 67 Michael Lyons scored 20 points, and Air Force beat No. 22 San Diego State at home, overcoming a 25-point performance by the Aztecs' Jamaal Franklin.The Falcons (14-6, 5-2 M.W.C.) held on as Franklin, who finished with 10 rebounds, scored 18 of his 25 points in the second half. He was 11 for 12 from the free-throw line, but his only miss was a big one, coming with less than a minute left and the Aztecs (16-5, 4-3) trailing by 2.
CHARLOTTE, N.C. — Michael Jordan has added a hint of his beloved North Carolina Tar Heels blue to the uniforms of the Charlotte Bobcats , perhaps hoping that will endear the N.B.A. franchise to the city it has called home since 2004.He picked the wrong shade of blue.Teal is the color that some long for here, the signature hue of the Charlotte Hornets from 1988 to 2002, before their owner George Shinn moved the team to New Orleans in a huff after being turned down for a new arena. Even now, fans in teal dot the stands at Time Warner Cable Arena in Charlotte during games, clashing with the more prevalent but hardly dominant blue-and-orange Bobcats gear.It was bad enough that Shinn took his team to New Orleans. But he also took the team name with him, and that annoyed a city where the label "hornets" has deep meaning.Now that Tom Benson, the new owner of the New Orleans franchise, has renamed his team the Pelicans, the Hornets nickname is available again."We are currently in contact with the N.B.A. and conducting our own due diligence relative to this matter," Fred Whitfield, the president of the Bobcats, said in a statement.Beyond that, no one from the team would discuss the issue, nor will anyone confirm a report in The Charlotte Observer that Harris Interactive is polling the Bobcats' season-ticket holders. In a poll The Observer conducted last April, Hornets received 85 percent of more than 12,000 votes, followed by Cougars, "I don't care" and Bobcats."The Hornets, the colors, the name, the mascot — it's identified with Charlotte around the world," said Jibril Hough, 46, who attended a recent Bobcats game in a teal Larry Johnson throwback jersey. "This brand says Charlotte like nothing else."During the Revolutionary War, the British commander Charles Cornwallis called Charlotte a "hornet's nest" of rebellion. To honor that legacy, a hornet's nest appears on every city police officer's uniform and every police car. A hornet's nest is even depicted on a statue in the center of the city."They were the first real professional sports team, and they were ours," said Scotty Kent, 24, a teacher who grew up rooting for the Hornets. "And they were given a name that represented our community, and that's really the big thing for me. Charlotte would be the hive and the people would be the Hornets. The teal and purple became iconic."Kent and his younger brother, Evan, are part of a grass-roots movement to restore the Hornets identity. They started a Web site, Bringbackthebuzz.com, two years ago, before the name was available. The Kents also joined hundreds of fans who attended a Jan. 19 Bobcats game in full Hornets gear to make a statement.Another Charlotte teacher, John Morgan, created the "We Beelieve: Charlotte ... Take Back Your Hornets" Facebook page, which has more than 13,000 "likes." He started an online petition at Change.org asking the team to change its name. It has nearly 9,000 signatures.Morgan and others said they never liked the name Bobcats, a nod to the former owner Bob Johnson. Johnson, the founder of the BET television network, was awarded an expansion franchise here after the original Hornets left, but he alienated people through a series of public relations blunders before selling the team to a group led by Jordan.Morgan, 31, said: "I think the most prominent and most well-used reason is the fact that it is by any account named after the man who founded the team and then called the city incestuous and arrogant, and then walked out with his tail between his legs, high-tailed it out and hasn't been heard from since. That's a big part of it. The main thing is that connotes losing."The Bobcats have made the playoffs only once, in 2010. Last season, they posted the lowest winning percentage in N.B.A. history. They are among the league's worst teams this season.The Charlotte Hornets had losing seasons, too. But that did not seem to matter at the time."It was unbelievable," said Dell Curry, an original Hornets player who is now a broadcaster for the Bobcats. "It was a tough ticket to get. Only show in town, new professional franchise. I remember losing by 30 the first game and leaving with a standing ovation."The Hornets led the N.B.A. in attendance for seven consecutive seasons and once posted 358 straight sellouts. The Bobcats have been a much harder sell in Charlotte. Their announced attendance this season has averaged about 15,000 in an arena that seats more than 19,000.Still, the Bobcats have their supporters. Scott Frattaroli, 39, a school principal from Fort Mill, S.C., attended a recent game with his wife and two sons. They wore Bobcats shirts."We love the Bobcats," he said.Frattaroli said that he had spent $500 to $750 on clothing and other team merchandise for his children and that he did not want to have to replace it.The fear is there are too few fans like the Frattarolis to sustain the franchise. Some among the Hornets' proponents worry that the team will move again if support does not improve.Perhaps a name change will help restore enthusiasm until a winning team can be built."If Michael gets the name changed," Hough said, "that would continue the cut from Bob Johnson and it would say, 'This is yours, Charlotte.' "
Russ Smith scored 18 points, and No. 12 Louisville shot 52 percent despite an 0-for-7 start, beating No. 25 Marquette, 70-51, on Sunday at home.The Cardinals (18-4, 6-3 Big East) unveiled white uniforms for the school's "White Out" promotion, and Coach Rick Pitino wore a white suit."I wasn't going to wear it," Pitino said, "but my daughters kept texting me and said it's bad karma if you don't wear it."Louisville trailed, 9-1, going nearly six minutes before Montrezl Harrell scored its first basket with a dunk 12 seconds after he entered the game. Louisville went on a 24-9 run over the next nine minutes, making 10 of its next 15 shots.MINNESOTA 62, IOWA 59 Austin Hollins hit a go-ahead 3-pointer with 11.6 seconds left, lifting No. 23 Minnesota over visiting Iowa.Hollins finished with 17 points to help the Gophers (17-5, 5-4 Big Ten) survive a rough second half against the Hawkeyes (14-8, 3-6).UCONN 69, S. FLORIDA 64 Shabazz Napier had 24 points, including three 3-pointers in overtime, to lift host Connecticut.Ryan Boatright added 17 points for the Huskies (15-5, 5-3 Big East), who overcame a 12-point halftime deficit and won their third consecutive game.DUKE 84, N. CAROLINA 63 No. 5 Duke (20-1, 10-0 Atlantic Coast Conference) blew open the game with a 29-3 run and led by 31 points at halftime, denying North Carolina Coach Sylvia Hatchell her 900th victory."I don't know what it was — we started out like we were intimidated," Hatchell said. STANFORD 65, OREGON STATE 45 Chiney Ogwumike dominated the game with 32 points and 18 rebounds as No. 4 Stanford (20-2, 9-1 Pacific-12) rolled at Oregon State (9-13, 3-7).CAL 72, OREGON 45 No. 6 California (19-2, 9-1 Pac-12) held host Oregon (3-19, 1-9) to 26.7 percent shooting in a rout.GEORGIA 75, KENTUCKY 71 Khaalidah Miller had a career-high 25 points, and No. 13 Georgia (19-3, 7-2 Southeastern Conference) stole the ball with five seconds left to beat No. 8 Kentucky (19-3, 7-2), which had won 33 straight at its Memorial Coliseum.MISSOURI 80, TENNESSEE 63 Morgan Eye scored 26 points, and host Missouri (15-8, 4-5 SEC) upset No. 9 Tennessee (17-5, 8-1) for its first win over a ranked team in almost two years.MARYLAND 85, B.C. 62 Tianna Hawkins scored 26 points and Alyssa Thomas had 24 to lead No. 10 Maryland (18-3, 9-1 A.C.C.) over visiting Boston College (9-12, 3-7).
The Los Angeles Lakers are returning to the New York stage, and it's anyone's guess what that portends: Dominance? Dysfunction? Brilliance? Petulance? All of the above? Some of the above?The Lakers themselves probably couldn't tell you, so it's probably best not to spend much time predicting which version of the team will show up to play the Nets on Tuesday night at Barclays Center. They have already packed at least a half-dozen seasons into this one, which just passed its halfway point.The Mike Brown Lakers (1-4) sputtered and gave way to the Bernie Bickerstaff Lakers (4-1), who looked moderately stable before giving way to the Mike D'Antoni Lakers (17-21), who have looked alternately miserable and capable.The Lakers had Steve Nash (0-2), lost him for seven weeks (12-12), then regained him (10-12).Dwight Howard, the brooding star center, has drifted in and out of the offense. Pau Gasol, the enigmatic star forward, has drifted in and out of focus. Kobe Bryant has snarled, cajoled and fretted, summoning every ounce of talent and wisdom to keep the Lakers from plunging into the abyss.Bryant and Howard have clashed. Gasol has gone from integral starter to depressed backup, while Earl Clark has gone from anonymous bench guy to starter. D'Antoni has struggled to pull it all together, failing to connect with Gasol and Howard.Lately, Bryant and Nash have swapped scoring and playmaking roles, as if in some N.B.A. version of "Freaky Friday." The realignment has paid dividends.The Lakers who landed in New York on Monday had won five of their last six games, including a soul-cleansing 105-96 victory over the Oklahoma City Thunder on Jan. 27. Still, they were a startling four games under .500 (22-26) and three and a half games out of the playoff picture as they prepared to face the Nets (28-19)."The Lakers are still the Lakers," Coach P. J. Carlesimo told reporters Monday. "Whatever their record is right now, it's the Los Angeles Lakers."Easy for him to say.The Lakers' four stars have played only 17 games together, for a not-so-grand total of 229 minutes. In addition to dealing with Nash's broken leg, the Lakers have had to overcome Gasol's sore knees, Howard's slow recovery from off-season back surgery and, more recently, Howard's injured right shoulder, which caused him to miss the last two games. The Lakers are listing Howard as day to day, leaving his status uncertain for Tuesday.In an ESPN interview Monday, Howard said his back was only 75 percent recovered. He also acknowledged having problems with Bryant's shooting volume earlier in the season.No one is complaining about Bryant's decision-making right now. For the last week and a half, he has been on a playmaking binge, dishing out 61 assists over six games while taking a relatively modest 84 shots. He began with back-to-back games of 14 assists and then put up 11, 9 and 8 over his next three outings, for the most assist-heavy five-game stretch of his long and glorious career.Nash, meanwhile, has spent more time off the ball, spotting up for 3-pointers, which is not necessarily a bad thing, since he is a career .428 shooter from beyond the arc."The roles are all kind of upside down," Bryant told reporters last week.Through Sunday, Bryant was still the N.B.A.'s third-leading scorer, at 27.7 points a game, having slipped from the top perch during this stretch. This season, he became the fifth player to cross the 30,000-point plateau. But he also has more assists (5,677) than anyone else in that club (Michael Jordan, Kareem Abdul-Jabbar, Karl Malone, Wilt Chamberlain)."I was probably born a scorer, but I was made a winner, so I figure it out," Bryant told reporters last week. "Whatever works, whatever wins championships, whatever wins games, that's what I do."So maybe the Lakers have found their winning formula, and they may yet return from the edge of oblivion, make the playoffs and reclaim some degree of respectability. They still need a healthy Howard, a confident Gasol and a lot of wins.And Howard's pending free agency and unclear intentions loom as a continual threat to Lakers harmony. If there is any hint that Howard plans to walk away, the Lakers could be forced to trade him by the Feb. 21 deadline, rather than lose him for nothing.Although General Manager Mitch Kupchak told Newsday on Monday that he would not trade Howard, that stance could change quickly if the season unravels again and Howard goes back to brooding.A year ago, the Orlando Magic faced this predicament — a toxic situation that finally ended when they traded Howard to Los Angeles in August. That deal ended the Nets' long pursuit of Howard which, as it turns out, might have been for the best. Brook Lopez has become an All-Star at center, without Howard's dominant defense but also without the drama.The Nets say that they are happy with Lopez and that they are not pondering what might have been."I don't think about that," Deron Williams told reporters Monday. "We're happy with Brook. We're happy with the team we have now. It's not a shoulda, woulda, coulda scenario."
The court was foreign to these feet, but the stage seemed just about right: dark around the edges, brightly lit in the center, with enough wattage to illuminate every ounce of Kobe Bryant 's brilliance.Bryant had never danced across the Barclays Center court before Tuesday night, or tested its rims or measured up the backdrops or become acquainted with these newly arrived Brooklyn Nets fans.In an instant, it seemed everything felt like home. Bryant drove, the lane opened. Bryant dunked, the crowd roared. And as the seconds counted down to a 92-83 victory for the Los Angeles Lakers, Bryant bathed in a familiar chant: "M-V-P!""From my perspective, it's pretty damn cool," Bryant said afterward, with a chuckle and a broad smile. "I enjoy it immensely."In a game with 18 lead changes, 6 in the fourth quarter, Bryant was at his best when it mattered most. He powered for a driving dunk over Gerald Wallace and Kris Humphries for an 82-80 lead down the stretch, sending the Lakers partisans in the stands into delirium. It was the loudest moment of the night.The Nets regained the lead briefly on Brook Lopez's 3-point play. But Antawn Jamison answered immediately with a driving layup, and Bryant delivered one more signature moment: a driving, twisting layup that helped power a 10-0 run to close the game.The Nets (28-20) could only grit their teeth, pay their respects to one of the game's greats and move on to Detroit, where they play the Pistons on Wednesday night. They have lost four of their last six games, their worst stretch since P. J. Carlesimo was installed as the head coach.This was a game the Nets were expected to win, for all sorts of reasons, but mostly because the Lakers (23-26) were missing their two best defenders: Dwight Howard (injury) and Metta World Peace (suspension). They failed to take advantage, settling for jump shots and stagnant offense, shooting 34.8 percent from the field and turning the ball over 17 times."I'm not encouraged by anything I saw tonight," Carlesimo said.Lopez finished with 30 points and 11 rebounds, but even he struggled, going 11 for 25 from the field. The Lakers won the duel of All-Star backcourts, with Bryant and Steve Nash combining for 38 points, to 26 for Deron Williams and Joe Johnson, who were 9 for 28 from the field.The Nets' defense, led by Wallace, held Bryant to 9-for-24 shooting and 5 turnovers — a line that Carlesimo said he would have taken, if asked. But Bryant still finished with 21 points, 7 rebounds, 4 assists and the biggest cheers of the night, all despite a sore right elbow.The victory was the Lakers' sixth in seven games, a surge that has revived their playoff chances and temporarily restored some optimism. Bryant has led the resurgence by putting playmaking ahead of scoring. Except on Tuesday.No play was bigger than his dunk over Humphries and Wallace."I was pretty shocked that the lane was so wide open," Bryant said. "I think that everybody's been drinking the 'Kobe-pass' Kool-Aid, so everybody kind of stays on the perimeter with the shooters. It just parted like the Red Sea. So I felt a little like Moses."The Lakers were the better team down the stretch despite losing Pau Gasol with 4 minutes 21 seconds to play. The Lakers said Gasol strained the plantar fascia in his right foot, but the injury could be more severe; Gasol said he heard a "pop." He will have a magnetic resonance imaging test in Boston, the next stop on the Lakers' trip.The Lakers were already missing Howard, who is recovering from a torn labrum in his right shoulder. World Peace was suspended earlier in the day for grabbing and striking Detroit's Brandon Knight on Sunday.Howard's absence took away a primary story line: his belated debut in Brooklyn, months after the Nets abandoned their bid to acquire him. Lopez, who would have gone to the Orlando Magic in a trade for Howard, seemed to enjoy Howard's absence.Lopez blocked three shots, including a nice block of Bryant's driving layup attempt midway through the fourth. But after another difficult loss, Lopez was one of many Nets blaming himself."I just feel those last two and half minutes were as bad as I've played, on both ends of the floor, all season," Lopez said, pointing to his pick-and-roll defense and Jamison's late layup.Minutes later, Wallace volunteered to take the blame, for missing 7 of 10 field-goal attempts and failing to contain Bryant's drives."For the most part, it's on me," Wallace said. "I didn't make shots." He added, "And Kobe made two big shots down at the end. And that's on me, too."For the first time in many weeks — since the last time the Knicks visited — the Nets did not have a full-throated home-court advantage. Lakers fans were abundant and loud. Gold No. 24 jerseys dotted the stands.Bryant heard as many cheers as boos during introductions, and brief chants of "M-V-P" (which were drowned out by boos) when he went to the foul line. A brief chant of "Let's go, Lakers!" was followed quickly by chants of "Beat L.A.!"If the stage seemed to suit Bryant, it made sense. Only two other arenas feature the stage lighting used at Barclays Center: Staples Center, where the Lakers play, and Madison Square Garden, where Bryant has long thrived."It's kind of a good electricity in the air," Bryant said approvingly. "I like playing here."
Had he stuck to his original plan, been resolute, Dwight Howard — and not Brook Lopez — would have been the tallest lord of Flatbush on Tuesday night. He would have spent the first half of this N.B.A. season rising with the Nets in the less competitive East instead of falling with the Lakers in the merciless West.He would have brought enhanced athleticism to a Nets team that could use a lot more and his trademark joviality — that, granted, too often devolves into juvenility — to the gray-to-grim leadership of his supposed co-star, Deron Williams.But maybe watching Williams's desultory play from the end of the Los Angeles bench as the Lakers defeated the Nets, 92-83, on their first trip to Brooklyn will finally convince Howard that he has made out pretty well in the grand scheme of N.B.A. things.Maybe hearing huge swaths of the Barclays Center crowd roar for Kobe Bryant and the Lakers in the Nets' new building will convince him of the advantages of wearing a uniform that is internationally renowned as opposed to that of a team still trying to build a brand inside a borough.Nursing a sore right shoulder, the result of a partially torn labrum, Howard took another night off and saw Lopez drop 30 points on the Lakers and nearly deal them what would have been a momentum-killing defeat.But Bryant, who lives to compete, electrified the crowd with a game-turning dunk; Steve Nash schooled the ever-dour Williams on both ends; and the undermanned Lakers won for the sixth time in seven games. With depth starting to develop in Howard's absence, they could be mounting a playoff run despite the big man's again being the center of the N.B.A.'s most tedious guessing game.About a year after Howard became a one-person study on runaway indecision in Orlando, it is the Lakers' turn to look into the eyes of their presumed franchise pillar for a post-Bryant future and see a young man who apparently struggles with commitment.Hence, the team that had the defecting Goliaths Wilt Chamberlain, Kareem Abdul-Jabbar and Shaquille O'Neal at hello has no way of knowing if Howard intends to be a Laker for the long term as he approaches unrestricted free agency July 1.Commenting on recent speculation that the Lakers might have to consider moving Howard later this month to avoid the risk of losing him for nothing next summer, Lakers General Manager Mitch Kupchak recently told Newsday: "We will not make a trade. We will not trade Dwight Howard."Assuming Kupchak and Lakers ownership are not as capricious as, say, Howard, a franchise that has forever feasted on small-market carcasses could get at least a taste of what it's been like to have been Orlando and Cleveland, among others, these past few years.The Lakers may have to sweat out the rumors and grovel before Howard and his agent until arriving at the most likely resolution: Howard stays while proclaiming this season an anomalous experience based on injury and unfamiliarity.Los Angeles, remember, is not Orlando or Cleveland, and Howard can make considerably more money with the Lakers than he can by signing with another team next summer or by forcing a trade later this month, according to the rules of the N.B.A.'s salary cap.That is what drives the Lakers' thinking, along with the belief that Howard — who estimated to ESPN on Monday that he has been playing at about 75 percent this season after back surgery, and lately dealing with his injured shoulder — would not leave money on the table, given the possibility of reinjury.For that stated reason, Howard opted out of another chance Tuesday night to dominate Lopez, something he has done in the majority of their career matchups. Tuesday night, Lopez was the best player on the floor until the last two minutes, when the Lakers pulled away. But Howard's new drama — will he play? — surely had something to do with that."I'm in no rush," Howard said of his decision to sit, perhaps forgetting how much time is of the essence for the Lakers as they try to climb out of their sub .500-hole.Howard has every right to protect his health with free agency looming, but the Lakers also have the right to wonder about his competitive fortitude. Bryant chose his words carefully, but listening carefully made it obvious that he has grown wary of Howard's willingness to push through pain."I don't think he's ever had to play through injuries — he's been healthy his entire career," Bryant said, discounting the more serious back injury that required surgery. "It's a new experience for him."Bryant's and Howard's dressing stalls were in opposite corners of the visitors' locker room Tuesday night, and if that wasn't intentional, their lack of interaction was noticeable. It is clear they are skeptical of each other, but Bryant's five titles mean that Howard will never win in the court of public opinion, certainly not in Los Angeles.He will have no shortage of suitors ready to pursue him next summer, but as he stood in the corridor around the corner from the Lakers' postgame locker room, posing for photos, you wondered if Howard had finally figured out that he was better off with Bryant in Los Angeles than with Williams in Brooklyn.At least that much.
NEWARK — The first hint that Billy Hunter 's 16-year tenure running the N.B.A. players union might be over came in an unsigned letter, delivered to his Harlem home last Friday morning.The letter informed Hunter that he had been put on paid, indefinite leave — effectively suspended — by the union's interim executive committee. All access to union resources, including e-mail and credit cards, had been cut off. He was prohibited from any contact with union employees or players.When Hunter, 70, attempted to visit the union's headquarters on Lenox Avenue in Manhattan later that morning, he was turned back by security guards."I haven't spoken to anybody since," Hunter said Wednesday, in his first interview since the Jan. 17 release of an independent audit that faulted his business and hiring practices.That 469-page audit, conducted by the law firm Paul, Weiss, Rifkind, Wharton & Garrison, set in motion the events that led to Hunter's suspension and perhaps his eventual termination as the union's executive director, a position he has held since 1996.In a 65-minute interview conducted at the Newark offices of his lawyer, Thomas Ashley, Hunter passionately defended his record and his reputation, and he indicated that he would not leave without a fight."I intend to exercise all my options, as of this moment," Hunter said.Hunter is owed $10.5 million on a contract that runs through 2016, and he said he expected to be paid the balance if he is fired. Contrary to the audit — which determined that Hunter's contract was not properly approved and thus unenforceable — Ashley contended that the contract is binding under Delaware law, where the union is incorporated, setting the stage for a possible legal battle."They would be required, if they terminated him without cause, to pay him the remainder of his contract and benefits," Ashley said.Hunter acknowledged that his contract had not been approved by a two-thirds vote of the union's executive committee and board of player representatives, as the audit stated. However, he and Ashley said that this requirement, as set forth in the union's bylaws, pertains specifically to the hiring of a new executive director and not to subsequent contract renewals. It is an argument they will surely make in court if the dispute gets that far.Hunter had been silent until now, on the advice of his lawyers, because he is the subject of a joint federal investigation by the United States attorney's office in Manhattan and the Labor Department. Grand jury subpoenas were issued to a number of players and union employees over the last several weeks, according to a person informed about the process. In addition, the New York State attorney general has opened an inquiry, according to the same person."My client maintains his absolute innocence," Ashley said, "so to that extent, we are not concerned." But, he added, "Anytime you're being investigated by the federal government, there is some cause to think about it."The audit found no criminal wrongdoing, although it concluded that Hunter had failed in his fiduciary obligations and had put personal and family gain ahead of union interests — judgments that he vehemently protested."That's not true," he said. "Never. Absolutely not true. Absolutely not true."Hunter noted that the firm had reviewed 100,000 documents, and that the union's finances had been examined by Deloitte Consulting. "They didn't find one dime missing, nothing out of place." To the contrary, Hunter said, the union was $5 million in debt when he took over and now has $80 million in reserves. Its members are among the most highly compensated athletes in the world."Where's the detriment?" he said.Hunter spent much of the interview rebutting specific allegations raised in the audit, in some cases providing broader context and in other cases dismissing their significance altogether. Most of his explanations were already contained in the report. His lawyers are compiling a comprehensive response.
PHILADELPHIA — It was still early, but the crowd noise at Tom Gola Arena had begun to taper, and Gerald Galloway could sense things were not heading La Salle's way.Ramon Galloway, Gerald's son and La Salle's leading scorer, had attempted only four shots. The elder Galloway's large, thick hands began to fidget. He wove his cellphone between his fingers."They need to draw more fouls," Galloway muttered.It was a rainy night in January and the Explorers were playing Massachusetts. Galloway sat quietly in Section E4, Row C, directly behind the home bench, where Ramon could see him and where he could hear Ramon.Gerald Galloway has been blind for 19 years, but that has not stopped him from attending all of Ramon's home games since he transferred from South Carolina in 2011. Before that he was a fixture at his son's high school games in Florida, A.A.U. games in northwest Philadelphia and pickup games at Wister Playground — and in the living room where Ramon shot at a Fisher-Price hoop as a toddler.For the game against UMass, Galloway and Moore took their seats nearly an hour before tipoff, sharing a pretzel. Galloway wore black jeans; a light brown zip-up sweater; and Gucci sunglasses with red frames. He is a burly man in his mid-40s with short black hair, long graying sideburns and a stubbled chin.During games, he does not clap or cheer. He listens intently to the public-address announcer and asks Moore or other family members gathered around him for scoring updates or play descriptions. His head swivels as he follows the action.He knew Ramon had missed several of his early jump shots. "He's had a bunch of assists, though," Galloway said.By the end of the game — a 61-60 La Salle loss — the senior guard had 16 points, 6 rebounds and 6 assists, the type of all-around game that Gerald proudly called "typical Philly," hard-nosed and physical.While waiting for his son in the lower concourse after the game, Gerald repeated over and over the advice he would give Ramon while he was developing his game, about being versatile and multifaceted, suggestions Ramon took to heart."It's incredible," Ramon said. "My father knows the game. He's a student of the game, blind. He knows it, and he knows me."After Galloway decided to transfer from South Carolina, La Salle Coach John Giannini picked him up at the airport for a recruiting visit. He recalled that Galloway "immediately became emotional" as they drove toward campus."He said, 'I can't believe I'm home,' " Giannini said. He took it as a sign that Galloway may have been homesick in South Carolina and wanted to be closer to his family.The emotions were more complex, Galloway said. Philadelphia represented circumstances he had once tried desperately to leave behind. His older brother, Gerald Galloway III, was imprisoned in January 2011 for robbery; another brother, Kadar Gates Davis, was imprisoned last May for selling heroin and selling a stolen gun.His mother, Karen Davis, was out of work but had three children to support. Family members constantly floated in and out of her house in Germantown, one of the roughest sections of Philadelphia.For vacation, Galloway's grandfather, Moore, a retired truck driver, used to stow young Ramon in the cab of his 18-wheel Mack truck on trips up and down the East Coast, rides that he remembers taking when he was as young as 5. He grew to love life beyond Philadelphia, and, eventually, when he got serious about basketball early in high school, he asked to move to Florida, where he could live with an aunt."There was no point in me staying," Galloway said. His father said, "He didn't want to end up a statistic."So he left when he was 16 and attended William T. Dwyer High School in Palm Beach, Fla., which had a nationally ranked program. He was recruited by teams in the Big East and Atlantic Coast conferences, but he eventually committed to South Carolina.
WASHINGTON — When the Wizards ' John Wall stepped in front of C. J. Watson near midcourt early in the second quarter to swipe a loose ball and take it the other way, the play seemed harmless enough. Turnovers happen in basketball games, and Watson watched as Wall raced in for a two-handed dunk.What made this mistake so disastrous for the Nets was that it was merely one of many, all of them in succession, each missed shot and errant pass compounding the damage like the interest on a credit-card balance.The Wizards routed the Nets, 89-74, at the Verizon Center on Friday night as Billy King, the Nets' general manager, watched from a courtside tunnel. It was a lackluster performance that did little to assuage concerns that the Nets, as currently constructed, are flawed in some fundamental ways."I'm very concerned," said Coach P. J. Carlesimo, whose team has lost five of its last eight games.Carlesimo was sharply critical of his reserves, who combined to shoot 4 of 21 from the field and provided little resistance in the pivotal second quarter."Maybe we have to substitute differently, or maybe we can't put guys in the game together, or maybe we can't continue to give people chances of hurting us defensively or by not putting the ball in the basketball," said Carlesimo, who did not cite any players by name. "We just have to look at it. It seems it's been a recurring problem. We can't dig that big of a hole."The Nets (29-21) shot 32.9 percent from the field, committed 15 turnovers and did little to contain Wall, a turbocharged point guard who collected 15 points, 9 assists and 4 steals. It was the third straight win for the Wizards (14-35), a much-improved team since Wall's return from injury last month."I feel like we could be in a playoff spot right now," Wall said. "You don't give up on a season this early."The Nets, meantime, appear to be confronting another identity crisis in a season that has been full of them. Deron Williams scored 20 points to lead the team, but he shot just 7 of 20 over all. Joe Johnson had 14 points, and Brook Lopez finished with 13 points and 8 rebounds."There's no reason why we should be talking about how the effort wasn't there, the energy wasn't there," Williams said. "Especially in some of these big games. Maybe this wasn't a 'big game' for us. But it should have been."The second quarter was a mess for the Nets, who missed their first 12 field-goal attempts. The stretch of ineptitude lasted more than eight minute. At times, it looked as if the Nets were heaving a bowling ball, or shooting into gale-force winds, or simply blindfolded. For the quarter, the Nets shot 4 of 22 over all, including 0 of 7 from 3-point range, and were outscored, 30-11. The Wizards built a 51-31 lead by halftime, and the game was effectively over."During that second quarter, I don't know what happened," Johnson said.Late in the third, the Nets mounted a 14-0 run that was keyed by Williams. They still trailed by 12."When you can't make free throws, when you can't make 3-point shots and when you can't make shots in the paint, it's very hard to win," Carlesimo said.The Nets were in no position take the Wizards lightly, not after losing at home to the Los Angeles Lakers on Tuesday and barely squeezing past the Detroit Pistons on Wednesday.On Jan. 4, the Nets needed two overtimes to take a 115-113 victory over the Wizards — and it should have been marked with an asterisk, since the Wizards were still a week away from getting Wall back.Wall missed the first 33 games of the season with a left knee injury, and the Wizards labored to a 5-28 record without him. Since making his season debut Jan. 12, Wall has been nothing short of a transformative presence. The Wizards entered Friday's game riding the good feelings generated by back-to-back wins over the Los Angeles Clippers and the Knicks, and they kept their momentum going against the Nets."It's not working right now," Carlesimo said of his rotation. "We have to look at everything."
WASHINGTON — When the Wizards ' John Wall was rehabilitating his injured left knee this season, he did what he could to stay involved with the team. He went to road games. He attended practice. He watched game film on a monitor whenever he climbed on the team's antigravity treadmill.He did everything except play basketball. Although Wall's teammates could sometimes sense his impatience, he seemed determined to make his transition as seamless as possible once he returned to the court.It was a wise course. Led by their young point guard, the new-look Wizards are suddenly surging. So jubilant was the mood in the locker room after their most recent game, an 89-74 victory against the visiting Nets on Friday night, that Wall would not rule out reaching the postseason.Forget that Washington, for all its improved play, remains 21 games below .500 at 14-35, far out of the playoff picture, entering Monday's game at Milwaukee. Among the N.B.A.'s longest-tenured doormats, the Wizards abound with optimism."We're finally trusting each other," said Wall, 22, a third-year player and former No. 1 draft pick out of Kentucky.The victory was the Wizards' third straight, all against upper-echelon teams: the Los Angeles Clippers, the Knicks and the Nets. More surprising, Washington has won 9 of 16 games since Wall made his season debut Jan. 12. Without him, they were 5-28.Wall, who is averaging 14.6 points, 7.1 assists and 3.2 rebounds, is the catalyst for everything the Wizards want to do: push the ball in transition, create turnovers in the halfcourt and swing passes around the perimeter."He challenges you as much as any point guard in the league," said Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo, who compared Wall to Boston's Rajon Rondo, Oklahoma City's Russell Westbrook and San Antonio's Tony Parker. "The ball is going to get from foul line to foul line quicker than it does against most other teams. It puts a lot of pressure on your team to get back, and it's not just the guy who's playing him. You need other people back."The Nets had trouble doing that. In Friday's game, the Wizards held a 16-6 advantage on fast-break points and shot 7 of 16 from 3-point range. Wall consistently found the sharpshooting forward Martell Webster, who was 3 of 5 from long range. And Webster got open looks because the veteran center Nene, who finished with 20 points and 11 rebounds, was clogging the paint. The Wizards proved hard to guard because they were multidimensional.Webster, who is shooting a career-best 43.8 percent from 3-point range this season, gave Wall a lot of credit for staying focused while he was injured. It would have been understandable, he said, had Wall begun to feel irrelevant."You start to feel like there's nothing you can do to help contribute to the team," Webster said. "But he stayed strong. That's the most important thing. The kid is very resilient."That style of play — fast-paced, without much regard for his physical welfare — has made a bold return in recent weeks. Wizards center Emeka Okafor said an injury-induced absence can help a player. Wall had no choice but to take a step back and analyze his situation.Jerry Stackhouse, the Nets' 38-year-old swingman, has become something of a mentor to Wall. They grew up in the same region of North Carolina and developed a close relationship in 2010 as teammates in a summer pro-am league that Stackhouse runs in Raleigh. But their relationship did not blossom overnight. Wall, who was a rookie at the time, seemed eager to showcase his talent. Stackhouse was not particularly impressed."He was coming down every time, forcing shots, nobody else touching the ball — and his teammates were wide open," said Stackhouse, one of those teammates. "I was like, 'You have got to move the basketball.' He got a little upset and said something back to me."Stackhouse added, "I was like, 'Who do you think you're talking to?' "He said he was still upset — "smoke coming out of my ears" — when Wall found him in the parking lot after the game. Wall apologized, and Stackhouse said that meant something to him. It was a sign that Wall, who had grown up in a tough Raleigh neighborhood, had the potential to lead.These days, Wall is sharing the ball and making plays. Webster said the Wizards remained a close-knit unit even when Wall was watching from the bench. "We were always having fun," Webster said. "But now we have the wins to show for it."
New York considers itself the mecca of basketball — a conceit infused by street ball legends, a deep roster of native-born N.B.A. stars and the mere existence of Madison Square Garden. The city requires no external validation on this point.The case might be a tad overstated. But on Sunday, because of changing fates and serendipitous scheduling, New York just might be the center of the basketball universe.Starting at 1 p.m. Eastern, four of the N.B.A.'s top teams will play two games, over 10 hours, in two boroughs, about six miles apart. The Knicks and the Los Angeles Clippers will play first, at the Garden. A few hours later, the Nets and the San Antonio Spurs will tip off at Barclays Center in Brooklyn.This virtual doubleheader will feature 12 current or recent All-Stars, a 2-time most valuable player, 3 current Most Valuable Player contenders, several likely Hall of Famers and one lovably irascible coach.The Spurs own the best record in the Western Conference, just four and a half games ahead of the third-place Clippers. The Knicks are second in the Eastern Conference, four games ahead of the Nets. Combined, the four teams have a record of 135-66.The task of describing this hoopla to a national audience will fall, appropriately, to a guy from Queens. Mike Tirico, who grew up in Whitestone, will call the play-by-play on both games, the first on ABC and the second on ESPN.Tirico plans to take the No. 2 train from Midtown Manhattan to Brooklyn. And he is already reveling in this uniquely New York moment."Growing up in Queens, I was of the tap water that makes us believe that this is the mecca of basketball," he said Friday. "And I still believe that."This moment was made possible by the Nets' move to Brooklyn last fall, the first time two N.B.A. teams have occupied the city simultaneously. The Knicks and the Nets have played home games on the same day seven times. But this will be just the second time that the schedule affords enough time for a fan or a broadcaster to attend both.Barring triple overtime at the Garden, Tirico should make it to Brooklyn with enough time to grab a Nathan's hot dog before settling in at the broadcast table."To get back on the subway, to go from one to the other, will be kind of cool," Tirico said. "I'll go load up a MetroCard and give my 2 dollars and 50 cents to my city of birth."The games should be pretty good, too. Consider the talent that will gather.Tim Duncan (Spurs) owns two M.V.P. trophies and four championships. Duncan and Jason Kidd (Knicks) are locks for the Hall of Fame, as is Spurs Coach Gregg Popovich.Chris Paul (Clippers), Carmelo Anthony (Knicks) and Tony Parker (Spurs) are all M.V.P. contenders this season. The roster of recent All-Stars includes those three; the Spurs' Duncan and Manu Ginobili; the Knicks' Tyson Chandler and Amar'e Stoudemire; the Clippers' Blake Griffin; and the Nets' Deron Williams, Joe Johnson and Brook Lopez.The Spurs (39-12), defying all odds and expectations and age, once again look capable of making a run to the finals. The Clippers (35-17), despite a recent swoon caused by injuries, are also in contention to win the West. The Knicks (32-16) appear capable of making the Eastern Conference finals. The Nets (29-21) are a notch below the other three but have the talent to finish in the top tier of the East.That last paragraph itself is stunning in its own way. The Clippers, until recently, were considered among the worst franchises in sports. Now they are threatening to win their first division title, with the pairing of Paul and Griffin, and the best bench in the N.B.A. The Knicks, hapless for most of the last decade, are in position to win their first division title since 1994. The Nets are on track for their first winning season since 2005-6.The Clippers just got Paul, Griffin and Chauncey Billups back in the lineup Friday night, and they are fully healthy for the first time this season. With Paul's passing and Griffin's dunking, they remain one of the most electrifying teams in the league."If you gave most fans the option to see one of the two teams, they'd want to go see the Clippers," Tirico said, comparing the Clippers and the Spurs, while acknowledging that this is probably backward, given San Antonio's wild success over the last 14 years."In this era of oversaturated sports coverage, they're the most underappreciated franchise in the four major sports, period," he said of the Spurs.In an earlier era, N.B.A. doubleheaders were common. But the games were played back to back, under the same roof, on a single ticket. The Lakers and the Clippers will occasionally play on the same day at Staples Center. But no other city can match what will unfold in New York on Sunday."To have it in two distinctly different buildings, with a distinctly different feel, that's one more unique New York turn on this whole deal," Tirico said. He added: "Yeah, all politics are local. But I think our basketball politics in New York have always been in the right place."
The fade was gradual and then instant — a few harmless missteps, followed by a sudden, spectacular free fall. Tony Parker charged. The Nets stumbled and wheezed. And the Barclays Center soundtrack morphed from the warm, familiar "Brook-lyn" chant to something more wrathful: "Booooo."The Nets have had an extended honeymoon in this maiden season in Brooklyn, but the fans finally lost their patience Sunday night, screaming their displeasure as the San Antonio Spurs, playing without Tim Duncan and Manu Ginobili, drilled the home team, 111-86.As the Spurs completed a dominating second half, outscoring the Nets, 60-29, the angry voices began to boom."Deserved," the Nets' Deron Williams said. "These people pay money to come see us play, and play better than that."They were the first sustained boos the Nets had heard since arriving in Brooklyn. But then, this was as listless and demoralizing as any loss the Nets have had. They failed to take advantage of the Spurs' depleted lineup, failed to hold an 8-point lead in the third quarter and utterly failed to contain Parker, who carved up their defense for 29 points and 11 assists.The Spurs pushed their league-best record to 40-12, while the Nets continued to fade, slipping to 29-22. The Nets have lost six of their last nine games, all but one by double digits, and their psyche has never looked more fragile.There have been more Nets trade rumors — including Ben Gordon and Josh Smith — in recent days than Nets victories.From Coach P. J. Carlesimo to every starter, the Nets bemoaned an inability to fight through trouble, to keep their heads, to respond constructively and to play with a singular purpose. In the aftermath, there were hints of a fractured locker room."We got to understand that this is a team game," Gerald Wallace said. He added: "You're allowed to get mad. But instead of going your own individual way, we got to pull together as a team, buckle down. And that's when we got to tighten up our defense a little bit more, instead of going into five different guys out on the court."The Nets have enough fight, "but the fight right now is in the wrong direction," Wallace said. "Everybody is wanting to fight individually, instead of pulling together as a team. And that's fighting as the Brooklyn Nets."The lack of team play was evident in the box score: the Nets had just 12 assists, one more than Parker had by himself. They had four assists in the second half, when the offense deteriorated into a series of one-on-one efforts. Williams, the Nets' presumed offensive leader, had 3 assists and 15 points. The Nets committed 18 turnovers — continuing another bad habit — which led to 30 points for the Spurs.The Spurs wiped out the Nets' lead with a 12-0 run early in the third quarter, and the Nets simply disintegrated from there. By the end of the period, the Spurs had turned an 8-point deficit into a 10-point lead. Minutes into the fourth, it was an 18-point game."We let our emotions affect the way we play," Carlesimo said. He added: "Even against arguably the best team in the league, in our own building, you can't do that. It's not acceptable. We need to be better."Parker thoroughly outplayed Williams and left the Nets off balance all game with his clever drives, timely passing and perfect teardrops in the lane. At one point, Parker so badly faked out Brook Lopez that Lopez staggered as Parker easily skipped past and tossed in a scoop shot.Joe Johnson had 19 points for the Nets, but just 6 in the second half. Lopez had 18 points, but just 4 after halftime.The Spurs rested Duncan and Ginobili, their ailing stars, which at a glance seemed to bode well for the Nets. But then, the Nets have not handled good fortune well. Last week, they lost to a Los Angeles Lakers team that was missing Dwight Howard and Metta World Peace (and lost Pau Gasol in the fourth quarter). The week before that, they barely beat a Chicago Bulls team that was missing three starters.At this point, the Nets can assume nothing and underestimate no one. Every team is a threat."It's almost like we have two different teams," Williams said, "and it's just guessing which one's going to show up on a given night."The Spurs dealt the Nets their worst loss of the season — a 31-point rout on New Year's Eve.That humiliating defeat, oddly enough, spurred the Nets' resurgence, starting with a 17-point rout of Oklahoma City two days later, and they won 10 of their first 11 games in 2013.But the Nets have been sputtering ever since. They have been turnover-prone, offensively inefficient and generally out of sorts, looking more like the team that got Avery Johnson fired in December than the one that came alive under Carlesimo in January."I think when things start to go bad, instead of fighting back, we kind of hang our heads and do the opposite," Williams said. "It's just a mentality that we have, we've developed, which is bad."When the Nets fired Avery Johnson and promoted P. J. Carlesimo in December, it posed an emotional conflict for Gregg Popovich. Carlesimo is a close friend, and Johnson is a protégé. Popovich remains critical of the Nets for making the change so quickly. He said Sunday that he was "thrilled" for Carlesimo, then added: "But I wasn't thrilled — nobody would be — to have a friend lose a job, like Avery. That was something that at the time I thought was a little shortsighted or a little bit impatient. But it's not my business, and I'm not there." ... Toko Shengelia, who sustained a mild concussion two weeks ago, was cleared to play. He was on the inactive list.
In 1990, when C. Vivian Stringer was coaching at Iowa, she received in the mail what she described as a gold letter with a diamond on it from the university congratulating her for her 300th win."I thought, what's this for?" Stringer said. She had been so focused on winning daily that she had overlooked her totals.Today, on the doorstep of another milestone, with 899 wins, Stringer has reached a level of success too rarefied to ignore. With a victory at DePaul on Tuesday, Stringer would join three other women's Division I coaches to reach that mark.Not much else has changed over the years, though. Winning every day remains Stringer's soul-burning objective — particularly this season, with an 11th straight N.C.A.A. tournament berth for her team in jeopardy.Stringer, ever fiery, does not want to entertain the notion of missing the tournament."It scares me half to death," Stringer said before the team's flight to Chicago on Monday. "In my mind, it's hard for me to handle that."At 64, Stringer seems as hungry as when she started, in 1971, coaching basketball, volleyball and soccer at Cheyney State, a historically black college outside Philadelphia. She spoke of the struggle getting her current young team — there are nine underclassmen — to invoke their passion the same way it burns in her."Sometimes they don't even know what they don't know," she said, her soft voice rising. "They mean well. I thoroughly enjoy working with them; they're great. But sometimes I wonder — Do they even know? Do they even know? And what's it going to take for them to know?"I'm looking at this group and thinking, do they really know what's in jeopardy?" Stringer added. "I talk about our sense of urgency. Sometimes I wonder. I think they think we'll just turn it on."With one victory, Stringer would join two retired coaches, Pat Summitt of Tennessee and Jody Conradt of Texas, and the active Sylvia Hatchell of North Carolina with 900 wins or more. Mike Krzyzewski, Jim Boeheim and Bobby Knight are the only men to do it.But at 14-8, tied for sixth place in the Big East at 5-4, Rutgers has an unsettling status this season. The program went to the last 16 every year between 2005 and 2009, including a losing trip to the N.C.A.A. title game in 2007. This season, Rutgers is 13th in the conference in scoring and last among the 15 teams in 3-point shooting and free-throw percentage.Attendance has fallen steadily off its peak of 4,740 a game in the 2007-8 season. There have been grumblings that Rutgers might soon look for a change after Stringer's contract expires in 2014.Stringer said Monday that her team had the talent to succeed but has not yet grasped the right mind-set."With this young group. I've just got to be a little more patient with myself," Stringer said, "and certainly more patient with them."Rutgers has had the No. 3-rated recruiting class in the nation two years in a row, according to ESPN's scouting site, HoopGurlz, including two McDonald's All-Americans."The caliber of player isn't an issue," said Rosalyn Gold-Onwude, an ESPN analyst. But she pointed to the rise of other talented programs that recruit heavily in New York City, like Syracuse, West Virginia, St. John's and even Fordham, which is in the midst of a resurgent season."It's not a one or two or three-coach picking pool for East Coast players anymore," Gold-Onwude said.Carlene Mitchell, a Rutgers assistant under Stringer from 2002 to 2011, said the demands on the program were nearly impossible to consistently satisfy after all the success the team has had over the years."What's enough to make everyone content?" said Mitchell, now the coach at U.C. Santa Barbara. "Is it every year playing in a national championship game? Is it elite eight? The standards she had set are so high, how do you stay there every year?"On the court, Mitchell soaked in Stringer's brilliance as a defensive tactician — her trademark 55 full-court press is stitched to her winning legacy — while marveling at her tirelessness."She has more energy than I have," Mitchell said, "and I'm half her age."Stringer said coaching had not become any easier, but had remained as much fun. She revels in the prepractice planning. Lately, the wins have been harder to come by. But she has not lost the thrill of attaining all 899."It's kind of poetic that this year probably reflects an accumulation of every year over the years, the struggles, the good, the bad," Stringer said. "I'm so frustrated with them at times, but then I'm so happy and elated because I've watched them grow."
LeBron James became the first N.B.A. player to score 30 points and shoot at least 60 percent in six straight games, Chris Bosh scored 32 points and grabbed 11 rebounds, and the host Miami Heat defeated the Portland Trail Blazers , 117-104, on Tuesday night.James was 11 for 15 from the field and scored 30 points. Dwyane Wade added 24 points for Miami, which wasted two 14-point leads before putting the game away with a 14-0 run in the final minutes.It was the 1,000th regular-season win in Heat history. But on this night, James's accomplishment was the most significant event."Like I say over and over, I know the history of the game," James said in a televised postgame interview. "I know how many unbelievable players who came through the ranks, who paved the way for me and my teammates. And for me to be in the record books by myself with such a stat — any stat — it's big time."James has made 70 of his last 96 shots over the past six-plus games. According to the Heat, only Adrian Dantley and Moses Malone had done the 30-point, 60-percent streak in five straight outings before James joined the club.RAPTORS 109, NUGGETS 108 Rudy Gay made a pull-up jump shot with less than five seconds remaining to lift host Toronto over short-handed Denver. Only 4 of Gay's 17 points came after the first quarter, and he spent long stretches of the second half stuck on the bench after landing in foul trouble. "Obviously, it's a not a game I'm proud of," said Gay, who beat Indiana with an overtime jumper last Friday, "but I'm proud to get this win."GRIZZLIES 108, KINGS 101 Marc Gasol had 24 points and 12 rebounds and Mike Conley scored 22 points for host Memphis (33-18), which will enter the All-Star break on a three-game winning streak.PLAYER JOINS ANTIBULLYING GROUP Denver Nuggets forward Kenneth Faried became the first N.B.A. player to join Athlete Ally, an organization aimed at combating homophobia in sports.Faried, 23, was raised by a lesbian couple in Newark."I have two moms and I love them both very much," Faried said in a statement. "I respect, honor and support them in every way."Athlete Ally, founded by a former Maryland wrestler, Hudson Taylor, in January 2011, has enlisted other professional athletes to push the cause against antigay bullying. The former N.H.L. player Sean Avery is on the board of directors, and four N.F.L. players have signed on as supporters: Baltimore's Brendon Ayanbadejo, Minnesota's Chris Kluwe, Cleveland's Scott Fujita and Houston's Connor Barwin.So far, no Major League Baseball players have publicly joined Athlete Ally. JOHN BRANCH
The first big break of Tyshawn Taylor's career, one might say, arrived at a playground in Clearwater, Fla., when Taylor was 8, shooting hoops alone outside his housing complex.He had just moved from New Jersey and did not have a team or a coach or much instruction, but Stephanie Crawford, a local boys' basketball coach, noticed him anyway. She encouraged him to sign him up for her A.A.U. team, Prime Time Hoops, spinning his career into motion. He went on to star at St. Anthony High School in Jersey City, N.J., and at the University of the Kansas. Then he was the 41st pick in last year's N.B.A. draft — the first draft selection made by Brooklyn's rebranded franchise (acquired via trade with Portland).But it had been tough for Taylor, a 6-foot-3 pencil-thin point guard, to see the floor. He had been languishing on the bench and had already spent two stints in the Development League until, one might also say, his latest big break: the ankle injuries to Deron Williams last week.With Williams out of the lineup Monday against the Indiana Pacers, Taylor stepped in and scored 12 points — including 7 in the fourth quarter and overtime — providing a sudden, unexpected glimpse at his N.B.A. potential. He made the most of his opportunity."I understood D-Will was out — he didn't travel with us, so I knew there would be a good chance I was going to play," Taylor said at shootaround Wednesday. "I didn't know how much, and I didn't know I would play this well. But I was ready."Taylor was still beaming about his breakout performance, the newfound attention, the hundreds of text messages on his phone, the razzing from teammates in the locker room. He had played a career-high 34 minutes. Other than in rookie league or D-League games, Taylor had not seen that much time since he played 36 minutes in the N.C.A.A. national title game against Kentucky in April.As the starting point guard all four years at Kansas — including 15 Big 12 and N.C.A.A. tournament games — Taylor had plenty of experience under pressure, and his ability was never an issue. Whether he could make good decisions (3.5 turnovers per game as a senior) and shoot consistently were reasonable to question.Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo said Taylor's confidence helped him through the frustration of his first months in the N.B.A."I don't think it ever entered his mind that he couldn't do it," Carlesimo said. "I think it was good to go out there and do it, against a quality opponent, on the road, and in a close game where he finished the game. Couldn't ask for much more in terms of going out and doing it in a big situation."Taylor was born in Hoboken, N.J., but raised in Florida, where his mother and sisters moved when he was in elementary school. He was small and thin, with no father figure present. He spent most of his time at a local Boys and Girls Club.But after Crawford saw him in the playground, he joined her A.A.U. team, and she helped him develop into a dynamic player. He returned to New Jersey, at St. Anthony, which he helped lead to a 32-0 record and a state title in 2008, his senior season, as the team's starting point guard. He wound up at Kansas after initially committing to Marquette.At Kansas, Taylor needed some time to mature, on and off the court. He made national headlines following an altercation with members of the football team as a sophomore, in 2009. As a four-year star in a basketball-centric state, he was heavily scrutinized, and his play was often overshadowed by the all-American forward Thomas Robinson.The Nets saw things they liked in Taylor, including his change-of-pace athleticism, a nice contrast with the more brutish style of Williams."His quickness, his ability to run the middle pick-and-roll and get into the lane," Carlesimo said. "And he's got that little floater."Taylor came off the bench again in Wednesday's win over the Nuggets, scoring 6 points (2 of 5 from the field) with 4 assists and 1 turnover in 16 minutes. When Williams returns, Taylor will probably settle back into his third-string point guard role.His objective now is proving that Monday's flash of success was not just a fluke."I stayed in college and played in a lot of big games," Taylor said. "I've been well coached. I think I'm prepared to play at this level."
P. J. Carlesimo is a coach of many words, with a knack for weaving expansive answers out of mundane questions, and even longer soliloquies when the subject is complex. Assessing the Nets ' prospects at the All-Star break took a lot of words, even by Carlesimo's standards, perhaps understandably.There is no simple explanation for the Nets' season to date, a 53-game stretch in which they have looked both dominant and listless, resilient and inept, with long winning streaks, long losing streaks, 25-point losses and sudden, random shifts in personality.Who are the Brooklyn Nets? Who knows?"We're a little hard to figure at this point," Carlesimo said Wednesday, during a nearly four-minute response. "I don't think we've settled into what we are."There is time yet to figure it out, and the Nets felt better about their identity Wednesday night, after routing the Denver Nuggets, 119-108, at Barclays Center, in the final game before the All-Star break.C. J. Watson, starting for the injured Deron Williams, had his best game of the season, scoring 25 points, including a career-high five 3-pointers, and adding 6 assists. Joe Johnson scored 26 points — his best game in three weeks — and had 9 assists. Brook Lopez, who is heading to Houston to play in his first All-Star Game, scored 23 points and grabbed 8 rebounds.Denver (33-21) was missing two of its top three scorers, Danilo Gallinari (illness) and Andre Iguodala (neck injury), although the Nuggets have one of the deeper rotations in the league and they play at a breakneck pace that often frustrates plodding teams like the Nets.But on this night, the Nets (31-22) proved up to the challenge, playing fast but under control and setting a season high for points and assists (29), while converting 16 3-pointers. The Nets broke the game open with a 21-6 run to start the second half, building a 20-point lead. Denver cut the deficit to 5 points early in the fourth quarter, but the Nets absorbed the blow and won their second straight game without Williams, their $98 million star point guard.These last few days proved typical of the Nets' season. They were humiliated at home Sunday, in a 25-point loss to San Antonio. Then they beat two of the N.B.A.'s better teams, Indiana and Denver."I'm still trying to figure it out," Gerald Wallace said, smiling. "You never know with this team. You walk into the locker room, you never know what you're going to get. But it just shows when we come to play and everybody's playing — the ball's moving, swinging; we're talking on defense — we're pretty hard to beat."The Nuggets' speed and showmanship were on full display. JaVale McGee converted two electrifying dunks in the first quarter — the first on a 70-foot lob from Andre Miller, the second on a lob by Miller from the 3-point arc. By halftime, Denver had outscored the Nets in the paint (28-14) and on the fast break (11-1). But the Nets took a 62-57 lead, thanks in large part to their 3-point shooting (9 for 14), which also propelled them in the third.Ty Lawson led Denver with 26 points and 9 assists. The Nuggets might have shown the effects of being down two players and playing their fourth road game in five nights.The Nets are, to be sure, tough to peg. They were good enough to go 11-4 in November and earn Avery Johnson a plaque for coach of the month — and lousy enough to get him fired 13 games (and 10 losses) later. They have beaten the Oklahoma City Thunder and the Knicks on the road. They have been blown out at home by the Miami Heat and the Boston Celtics.The Nets' offense has been potent, as expected, except on the nights when it falls apart entirely. Their defense has been better than expected, and sometimes nonexistent."Maybe this is what we are," said Carlesimo, who replaced Avery Johnson on Dec. 27. "I would like us to be more consistent, and the biggest way to see that, to me, would be to have less blowout losses."When they return from the break, the Nets will have just 29 games left — 17 on the road, including a stretch of eight in a row from March 18 through April 3. They have 10 sets of back-to-back games, making the final two months unusually strenuous.But the schedule will ease up in terms of opponent strength. The Nets have 16 games left against teams that had losing records as of Wednesday.The Nets are on pace for 48 victories, which would be their best total in seven years. They go into the break in fourth place in the Eastern Conference."I think we're capable of being one of the top teams, man," Johnson said. "We already understand that. We've proven that. We've shown it. We just got to get some consistency, especially going down the latter stretch of this season."Deron Williams has yet to speak publicly about his injured ankles or the sudden decision to sit out the final two games before the All-Star break. He declined to speak to reporters Wednesday, and he ended an interview at a charity event Tuesday when someone asked about the injuries. Williams had platelet-rich plasma therapy Monday to treat inflammation in both ankles. A team spokesman said Williams would not address the news media until Monday, after the Nets' first practice following the break.
LeBron James 's record-setting streak of high scoring and efficiency came to an end Thursday night, but he still led the way as the visiting Miami Heat beat the Oklahoma City Thunder, 110-100, in a rematch of last season's N.B.A. finals.Heading into the game, James had recorded six consecutive games with 30 or more points while shooting better than 60 percent. Against the Thunder, he scored 39 but shot 58.3 percent, missing a 28-footer with 1 minute 2 seconds left that dropped his shooting percentage below 60.Having been a model of consistency during the streak, scoring 30 to 32 points in each game, James took it up a notch against the Thunder, not only in terms of points but also by adding 12 rebounds and 7 assists.James began slowly, starting 3 for 7 from the field, but he closed the first half making four straight shots, all from more than 20 feet. His eight field goals from 20 feet or farther were a season high.A dunk by Chris Bosh to end the first half made the score 63-46, the largest first-half deficit of the season for Oklahoma City. It proved too difficult to overcome as the Heat won their seventh consecutive game.Even as his streak came to an end, James continued to play a brand of efficient and effective basketball that has rarely been seen.Since Jan. 1, James is shooting 59.5 percent (226 for 380) from the field, despite being a player who often shoots from outside, compared with typical high-percentage shooters like Bosh and Tyson Chandler of the Knicks, who score mostly in the paint.James's dominance was in sharp contrast to the play of Kevin Durant of the Thunder, who scored a game-high 40 points but started the game 0 for 7 from the field and struggled greatly when guarded directly by James. Durant helped lead the Thunder's second-half comeback, but he and Russell Westbrook appeared overmatched, which is sure to be a hot topic as both teams are considered favorites to meet again in this season's N.B.A. finals. James is now 9-2 in regular season meetings against Durant.Adding to his list of accomplishments, James became the third player in N.B.A. history to have seven consecutive games of 30 or more points heading into the All-Star break, according to the Elias Sports Bureau. The only other players to record such streaks are Elgin Baylor and Wilt Chamberlain.For James, having his individual streak end while the Heat's team streak continued was probably a trade he was happy to make.AN ALL-STAR NO MORE The Boston Celtics' Kevin Garnett said that this weekend "is definitely my last All-Star Game," even though he has two years remaining on his contract. Garnett would not elaborate, and General Manager Danny Ainge told The Boston Herald that Garnett had not discussed retirement."Y'all don't know what I know," said Garnett, who is averaging 15 points and 7.7 rebounds per game. "Let's just put it like this: I'm more than grateful for going. I'm not going to act like I've got more All-Star Games in me. So I'm just going to actually enjoy this one with friends and family. That's what I meant."The All-Star Game will be played Sunday in Houston. (AP)BUSS IS SAID TO BE IN HOSPITAL The Los Angeles Lakers' owner, Jerry Buss, has been hospitalized with cancer, The Los Angeles Times reported. Buss, 79, has spent time in the intensive care unit at Cedars-Sinai Medical Center in Los Angeles, according to The Times, which quoted Buss's son, Jim, as saying his father was "doing fine."Several current and former Lakers players, including Kobe Bryant and Magic Johnson, have visited Buss.The team spokesman John Black said the team had no plans to comment on Buss's health, out of respect for the family's wishes. The Buss spokesman Bob Steiner said information would have to come from the Lakers. (AP)
On Wednesday afternoon, the results of the magnetic resonance imaging test on the left knee of Kentucky center Nerlens Noel came back, and the news was not good.The night before, Noel was carried off the court after landing awkwardly following a block attempt. The test confirmed that Noel had severed his anterior cruciate ligament.Noel, a 6-foot-10 freshman, was projected by many N.B.A. draft analysts as this year's No. 1 overall selection. That status is much less clear after the injury.And that has led some to take a critical look at the N.C.A.A.'s policy toward athletes who seek insurance against serious injuries, especially those players who are projected to be high selections in professional drafts.It is an insurance program that Noel, damaging as his A.C.L. tear could be to his elite draft status, would not have benefited from had he entered into it in the summer. The specific policy sponsored by the N.C.A.A. offers protection only against career-ending injury.Furthermore, Noel would have violated N.C.A.A. rules regarding accepting extra benefits if he had sought a loan to pay for so-called loss-of-value insurance. The insurance guards against a drop in draft position, which has the potential to cost athletes millions of dollars.That type of insurance is expensive, said Paul H. Haagen, co-director of the Center for Sports Law and Policy at Duke University. He finds the prohibition against it unreasonable."It's not as if they're being given something," Haagen said. "The attempt not to allow that reasonable accommodation, or not permitting the schools to provide them with a variety of long-term care insurance, that just seems to me inappropriate, shortsighted, wrongheaded."Noel, a shot-blocking phenomenon out of the Tilton School in New Hampshire, was considered the top recruit in the country last year and possibly an N.B.A.-ready talent.But because of the N.B.A.'s prohibition against high school players' going directly into the draft — its so-called one-and-done rule — he enrolled at Kentucky and led the nation with 4.4 blocks per game.Noel could have signed up for the N.C.A.A.'s Exceptional Student-Athlete Disability Insurance Program, known as E.S.D.I., which provides coverage of up to $5 million for a projected first-round pick in the N.F.L. or N.B.A. (the cap is lower for other sports). The organization allows a loan secured through an outside broker to be used to pay for those premiums, which could cost as much as $40,000.Dozens of athletes participate in the E.S.D.I. program each year.It is precisely the coverage that the South Carolina star defensive end Jadeveon Clowney reportedly has recently inquired about to provide some financial security should he suffer a catastrophic injury while playing.But Noel's knee injury would not fall under the umbrella of that policy. It was not career threatening, though it prematurely ended his one-and-done season.His decision now is whether to remain at Kentucky and rehabilitate there, or to enter the draft and hope his value is not decreased significantly.Warren K. Zola, an assistant dean at the business school at Boston College who works extensively as a counselor for athletes pursuing professional careers, said he pushed the N.C.A.A. to clarify its position on loss-of-value insurance in late 2011. The N.C.A.A. provided one stipulation to allow it: if the athlete's family could pay for the premium without taking a loan."How many of those families have access without loans to pay for one of the premiums of these policies that could be six figures?" Zola said.Compounding Zola's frustration is the knowledge that a top athlete like Noel is prohibited from entering the N.B.A. draft out of high school."They go to college, and the N.C.A.A. decides we're not going to allow you the capacity to fully insure your potential earnings, because that's an extra benefit," he said. "And, once again, student-athletes have no union, have no advocates, and everyone just goes along in the commercialism of college athletics saying it's O.K."Haagen said the legislation was hypocritical, given the N.C.A.A.'s stance on protecting the best interests of the student-athlete."Their idea is that you're trading on your future earnings as a professional athlete; well, yeah, if there are any," he said. "It's not as if the N.C.A.A. doesn't know these kids want to go."An N.C.A.A. spokesman said only that athletes were permitted to secure additional independent disability insurance. An N.C.A.A. brochure states simply that third parties are not allowed to be involved in any arrangement for securing a loan.One draft analyst, Chad Ford of ESPN, has already dropped Noel from No. 1 to No. 3 in his projections.Last season's top overall pick, Anthony Davis, signed a guaranteed contract worth $16 million, nearly twice as much as the deal for the No. 3 pick, Bradley Beal.Jonathon Givony, who runs the Web site DraftExpress.com, said that it was too early to determine if Noel would fall out of his No. 1 spot and that it was unreasonable to suggest N.B.A. general managers would automatically cross Noel off their wish lists.But, it would seem, Noel's stock can only fall from here, at a potential cost in the millions of dollars."I think we need to be having these debates in talking about the welfare of student-athletes," Zola said. "Noel is just another shining example of how that gets ignored. Finally, people are talking about this as, Is this fair?"
The news media mob converged and Kobe Bryant settled in, as relaxed and as comfortable as he might be sinking into a plush recliner in his living room. For Bryant, after 17 years and 15 N.B.A. All-Star appearances, these chaotic ballroom scrums sort of feel like home.The questions came in furious waves, for more than 35 minutes, and Bryant — with his daughter Natalia sitting by his side — cheerfully answered them all. He talked about the Olympics and Michael Jordan and Twitter. He gave assessments of Dirk Nowitzki and Derrick Rose and Carmelo Anthony. He responded in Italian, then Spanish, then English again.No subject seemed too trivial.At a glance, this could have been Phoenix in 2009, New Orleans in 2008, Atlanta in 2003 or Washington in 2001. The scene hardly changes."It's a circus; it's a show; it's also an incredible competition," Bryant said, embracing all of it.This is, of course, nothing compared to the scene he left behind in Los Angeles, where the Lakers are 25-29 and in danger of missing the playoffs for just the second time in Bryant's storied career.The Lakers reached this All-Star break seeking mental and emotional sanctuary, after one of the most dysfunctional half-seasons in their recent history: three months, two head coaches, four unhappy superstars and at least a dozen reasons to panic.They closed the pre-break schedule with a 24-point loss to the Clippers, who further secured their standing as the city's new basketball darlings, clinching the season series for the first time in 20 years.That defeat came only hours after the news broke that Jerry Buss, the Lakers' legendary owner, was dying of cancer. Buss, 79, has been hospitalized for more than a year, and his failing health was an open secret among team officials and players, as well as a number of reporters who cover the N.B.A. who kept the matter quiet out of respect for the family. The news finally became public Wednesday, when it was published by radaronline.com.A number of Lakers stars, including Bryant, Magic Johnson, Shaquille O'Neal and Kareem Abdul-Jabbar, have visited Buss in the hospital, according to The Los Angeles Times.In so many ways, the fabled Lakers dynasty appears to be cracking before our very eyes."It's rare that we see it," said Rick Fox, who won three straight championships alongside Bryant from 2000 to 2002 and still counts himself as a Laker at heart. "It hasn't been something where L.A. is comfortable dealing with. It seems to be all happening in one swoop."Buss in recent years has been checking off items on his bucket list. One dream was fulfilled in 2006, when he got his star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame. But what he wants most is for the Lakers to claim a 17th N.B.A. championship, to match the total of the rival Boston Celtics.That goal has eluded the franchise. That 17th banner has never seemed further out of reach.It was supposed to come this season, or that's at least what many people thought after the Lakers acquired Dwight Howard and Steve Nash last summer, pairing them with Bryant and Pau Gasol in one of the most decorated lineups in history.Howard was not only going to help deliver a 17th championship, he was going to take the Lakers into the post-Kobe era, anchoring title contenders for years to come.Injuries, poor relationships and bad karma have seemingly conspired to crush that vision. Howard has clashed with Bryant and Coach Mike D'Antoni. D'Antoni has alienated Gasol. Nash and Bryant have called out Howard. And Howard, a free agent this summer, will not commit to anything beyond this season."I'm not going to talk about it," Howard said again Friday. "The only thing that matters is the present and right now."The now may be all that Bryant has. At 34, he is the old man in the All-Star ballroom; his time in the spotlight nearing its end. His own hopes for a sixth title seem tenuous, tied as they are to Howard's moody self-absorption."I was concerned about reaching the first one," Bryant said, "and the second one, the third. There's always that concern, which keeps you prepared, keeps you on edge."The Lakers have always produced more than their share of drama, on and off the court. Clashes between Bryant and O'Neal were as common as 10-game winning streaks during the early 2000s. But there was a creative tension in those teams: the feuds fueled the winning. Everyone knew the stakes and knew their roles, and eventually, when it mattered, they all fell in line.This is an altogether different dynamic, one that is far more disturbing to longtime Laker fans and Laker alumni, including Fox, who earlier this week ripped Howard for his apparent disengagement."I'd like to see a lot more of the actions that tell me that winning is the most important thing to him, as well as being a Laker, and I don't get that yet," Fox said in a radio interview. "Maybe in another city he can fool some people with that, but unfortunately for him, in Los Angeles, you got a legacy of great players that have shown the city what it looks like — what commitment looks like, what championship play looks like, what championship talk looks like."The Lakers won eight of their last 12 games before the break, showing signs for the first time that they might revive this season, make a run into the playoffs and sustain the dream of a 17th title."I just don't see the dots where it's going to come from, unfortunately," Fox said. "It's hard. Dr. Buss, who would have thought that he would be dealing with the challenges he is, health-wise, and having to watch the one team that probably lifts his spirits and to watch them go through this?"
HOUSTON — Billy Hunter's 16-year stewardship of the N.B.A. players union is likely to end Saturday afternoon in a hotel conference room where more than 30 players are expected to gather, deliberate and ultimately fire their longtime executive director.Hunter, 70, will not be present to defend himself when his fate is decided.He was accused of nepotism and a wide range of questionable business practices in a 469-page independent audit released last month. Hunter is also under investigation by the United States attorney's office, the Labor Department and New York's attorney general.Hunter, who was suspended and placed on paid leave on Feb. 1, has accused union leaders of denying him due process. His lawyers have indicated that they will fight to enforce his contract, which calls for Hunter to be paid about $10.5 million over the next three and a half years.Union officials effectively denied Hunter's request to attend the meeting, infuriating his lawyers, who called the process, including his potential dismissal, "unfair and invalid."Union representatives said Friday that no decision had been made about whether to invite Hunter, a claim Hunter's lawyers decried as false."On every call, I have raised this issue of attending with their lawyers, and they have said consistently: you can continue assuming you are not coming," Michael Carlinsky, one of Hunter's lawyers, said in a statement.The outcome of Saturday's meeting is not considered to be in doubt. A number of people monitoring the situation, including players, agents and other stakeholders, believe that the player representatives will vote overwhelmingly to oust Hunter, who has served as the union chief since July 1996.As many as 50 players are expected to attend Saturday's meeting, during which they will also elect a new executive committee. The vote on Hunter will involve the 30 player representatives (one from each team) and possibly the current members of the interim executive committee. An outside accounting firm will run the election to ensure compliance with union bylaws and legal statutes.The players will also hear a presentation from Paul, Weiss, Rifkind, Wharton & Garrison, the law firm that conducted the audit.Unable to state his case in person, Hunter and his lawyers on Friday released a lengthy rebuttal to the audit, denying that Hunter broke any laws or violated any union policies.The points raised in the rebuttal are similar to those that Hunter and his lawyer made in an interview last week. They note that the law firm's report, which they say cost $5 million to produce, found no evidence of criminal wrongdoing or embezzlement.In a statement, Carlinsky wrote dismissively of the firm's audit, saying it "can best be characterized as one law firm's judgment by hindsight, with which we respectfully disagree."Hunter's legal team is also contesting the audit's assertion that Hunter's contract is unenforceable. Investigators from the union's law firm concluded that Hunter's most recent contract was never properly approved by the player representatives, rendering it invalid. They concluded that the players could therefore fire Hunter without cause and without having to pay him.Hunter has said that none of his previous contract renewals were subject to a full vote. The most recent extension, executed in 2010, was signed by the union president, Derek Fisher. According to Hunter's lawyers, the deal is valid under Delaware law, where the union is incorporated."Under Delaware law, at the moment that Mr. Hunter's contract extension was executed by the parties, a valid and enforceable contract existed," Hunter's lawyers said in their rebuttal.The lawyers protested that Hunter was never allowed to cross-examine the 37 witnesses, many of them anonymous, interviewed by the law firm or to "assess their credibility."In the rebuttal, Hunter's lawyers claimed that the audit "is rife with inaccuracies with respect to hiring, vacation payout, investment strategy and other business practices."The lawyers also hinted at the likely legal battle ahead, saying, "We stand ready to press his claims in the appropriate forum."
HOUSTON — For so long, James White has wanted to put on a show for the basketball world. He waited to hear the roar of the fans over a spectacular dunk in the N.B.A.'s annual dunk contest.White, a 30-year-old journeyman for the Knicks, was given his chance Saturday night inside the Toyota Center. White, who goes by the nickname Flight, was accompanied on the court by a group of women dressed as flight attendants before he took off for his first dunk. He left his feet just below the free-throw line and dunked the ball with two hands.The crowd roared. Drake, the Grammy-award winning rapper, jumped out of his courtside seat, hitting the group of celebrities seated near him.That was White at his best, perhaps at perfection. But the five judges gave him a score of 45 out of 50."That was crazy," White, the oldest of the six dunk competitors, said. "That kind of messed up my whole plan."In his second attempt, White failed to get off a dunk in the allotted time, 1 minute 30 seconds, ending his bid to win the competition. That honor went to the Toronto rookie Terrence Ross, who was voted the winner by fans after two impressive high-flying dunks in the final round. Ross defeated the defending champion, Jeremy Evans."I've never missed that many dunks before," White said of his second attempt. "The basketballs were hard to grip."Although he has just two dunks this regular season, White had plenty of buzz surrounding him leading up to Saturday's competition, part of the N.B.A.'s All-Star weekend.He had the most to gain and the most to lose from this event because many TV viewers were getting their first — and perhaps only — look at him.White became an Internet sensation with the help of a YouTube video that showed him wining a dunk contest in Russia in 2010 over Gerald Green.He was considered by many All-Stars as the favorite in the event. Kobe Bryant said on Twitter that White was his pick to win. Dwight Howard, who won the dunk contest in 2008, said he hoped White and the Indiana Pacers' Green, who also participated in Saturday's event, would have another entertaining battle."I've been wanting to see him in the dunk contest for a long time," Howard said of White.White said he had not practiced his dunks all week."We had a practice yesterday and I didn't do it," he said Friday. "I just came in and shook hands. I have to save my energy."When his night was over Saturday, White smiled. He was not victorious. But that was O.K. He was finally able to live his dream. And on one jump, he knew he made the crowd go "Oooh.""Just the fact that I'm here is cool with me," he said. "I just wanted to have fun. It took a long time for me to get here. I can check something off my bucket list."NOVAK FALLS SHORT ON 3'S The Knicks' Steve Novak was the last player to shoot in the first round of the 3-point contest. Novak, who has made 91 3-pointers and is shooting 44 percent from behind the arc this season, had plenty of time to think about his form.On Friday, he explained what he needed to accomplish if he was to win the competition."You don't want to much excess motion," Novak said. "It's a shot that's hard enough the way it is. It's far away from the hoop as it is. You want to duplicate it over and over."The crowd was behind Novak when he found a good rhythm and swished the majority of his 3-pointers on the first two racks. Then he missed four of the 3-pointers on the middle rack, which kept Novak out of the final round.Novak finished his round with 17 points, which was one fewer than Cleveland's Kyrie Irving, who went on to win the event, scoring 23 points in the final round to defeat San Antonio's Matt Bonner."Those shots felt good," Novak said of the middle rack, adding: "I shot the ball poorly. I was really disappointed."When he practiced for the contest the last two weeks, Novak said he scored more than 17 every time."I hope I get another opportunity," he said. "I really do."Another former Knick, Jeremy Lin received a nice ovation from the fans inside his home arena when he was announced before finishing fourth in the skills completion. Lin, who became a global sensation last season with the Knicks before signing with the Rockets in the off-season, finished the obstacle course in 35.78 seconds. But his time was not enough to get him through to the final round. Portland's Damian Lillard won the contest, which included dribbling, passing and shooting circuits, with a final-round time of 29.8 seconds.
PISCATAWAY, N.J. — C. Vivian Stringer 's 900th victory — and the new contract she seeks to extend her 18-year tenure at Rutgers — must wait.No. 3 Connecticut overcame a slow start Saturday to rout the Scarlet Knights, 65-45, delaying Stringer's bid to become the seventh N.C.A.A. basketball coach to reach the mark."I can't even begin to share with you the strain it is," Stringer said. "I can't wait to get it over with."Stringer, whose team was outscored by 32-18 in the second half, will take her third shot at the milestone when Rutgers (14-10, 5-6 Big East) visits No. 23 Syracuse on Tuesday night."I do respect that it's special," she said. "But it's unfortunate that it's coming at a time when we have so many young people, and we're struggling."Connecticut (24-1, 11-1) has an important matchup of its own looming at home against top-ranked Baylor on Monday night. Coach Geno Auriemma said he was encouraged by his team's resilience after Rutgers sprinted to a 14-4 lead."To start the way we started and finish the way we finished, that bodes well for us," Auriemma said after the Huskies extended their winning streak against the Scarlet Knights to 10.With injury-depleted Rutgers starting three sophomores, the Huskies pressured the Scarlet Knights into 19 turnovers, which led to 24 points. The Huskies' bench outscored that of Rutgers by 31-12, with the freshmen reserves Morgan Tuck (15 points) and Moriah Jefferson (10) leading the way.Stringer, 899-328 in 42 seasons, has acknowledged that her roster has deficiencies. The Scarlet Knights' string of 10 N.C.A.A. tournament berths is in jeopardy. She is aware of those questioning the program's direction. Speaking with reporters last week, she said those critical of her needed to back off. In the same interview, she said Rutgers Athletic Director Tim Pernetti needed to "step up" contract negotiations.On Saturday, Pernetti said he had called Stringer on Friday, but he declined to reveal details of their talk. He also would not assess the state of the program. As for contract talks, he said only that they are "ongoing."And, for at least one more game, that is also the state of Stringer's attempt to reach victory No. 900.BAYLOR 78, T.C.U. 45 Brittney Griner had 22 points and 10 rebounds in just 23 minutes, and No. 1 Baylor held Texas Christian to 26 percent shooting, clinching at least a share of the Big 12 regular-season title.Baylor won its 53rd straight home game and 36th in a row in the conference, both the longest current streaks nationally. Baylor (24-1, 14-0) also has won a nation-high 22 straight games. T.C.U. fell to 7-17, 0-13. (AP)SYRACUSE 80, PITT 39 Kayla Alexander scored 19 points, and No. 23 Syracuse exploited 23 Pittsburgh turnovers on the way to its fifth straight win.The host Orange (21-3, 9-2 Big East) scored 18 points on turnovers by the Panthers (9-15, 0-11). (AP)OKLA. ST. 80, KANSAS ST. 45 Toni Young had 23 points and 18 rebounds as No. 25 Oklahoma State (18-6, 7-6 Big 12) beat visiting Kansas State (13-12, 4-9). (AP)
Five Harvard players scored in double figures, including Kenyatta Smith and Steve Moundou-Missi with 14 each, as the Ivy League-leading Crimson defeated Princeton, 69-57, on Saturday.Laurent Rivard scored 12 points, Siyani Chambers added 11 and Wesley Saunders had 10 for the host Crimson (15-7, 7-1), who won for the sixth time in seven games. Christian Webster, who had 8 points, 5 rebounds and 4 assists, earned his 85th career victory, a Harvard record.Smith, who was 5 for 5 from the field and 4 for 4 from the free-throw line, added 7 rebounds and 6 blocks.Trailing by 26-24, Harvard closed the first half on an 8-2 run, with Rivard hitting two of his four 3-pointers.The Tigers (12-9, 5-2) got no closer than 4 in the second half. Ian Hummer led Princeton with 18 points.PROVIDENCE 71, NOTRE DAME 54 Kadeem Batts scored 20 points, leading host Providence (14-11, 6-7 Big East) past No. 21 Notre Dame (20-6, 8-5) for its fourth straight victory.VILLANOVA 70, UCONN 61 Ryan Arcidiacono scored 25 points, helping Villanova (16-10, 7-6 Big East) beat Connecticut (17-7, 7-5) in Hartford. The Wildcats had 20 offensive rebounds and an overall rebounding edge of 41-25.TEMPLE 83, UMASS 82 Khalif Wyatt scored 24 points, 17 in the second half, as Temple (17-8, 6-5 Atlantic 10) defeated host Massachusetts (16-8, 6-5) in the Owls' fifth straight 1-point game.Rutgers announced late Saturday that the sophomore guard Eli Carter broke his right leg and would miss the rest of the season. Carter played in all of the Scarlet Knights' 24 games and averaged 14.9 points.L.I.U. BROOKLYN 92, F.D.U. 67 Jamal Olasewere had 20 points and 7 rebounds, and host Long Island Brooklyn (15-11, 10-4) routed Fairleigh Dickinson (7-20, 2-12) to move into a tie for first in the Northeast Conference.WAGNER 89, BRYANT 75 Led by four scorers in double figures, including Latif Rivers with 20, host Wagner (15-10, 9-5 Northeast Conference) pulled away from Bryant (16-8, 9-4).TOWSON 57, HOFSTRA 50 Jerrelle Benimon had 17 points, leading Towson (15-13, 10-5 Colonial Athletic Association) to a win at Hofstra (6-20, 3-10).ARMY 56, NAVY 55 Ella Ellis and Kyle Wilson each scored 12 points, and Army (12-13, 5-5) rallied to beat Navy (7-19, 1-9) and win a third straight Patriot League road game for the first time.
HOUSTON — The N.B.A. All-Star game is often more about colorful sneakers and powerful dunks than one-on-one defense. When Sunday's game was to be decided in the final minutes, fans were given the perfect matchup: the Los Angeles Lakers' Kobe Bryant versus the Miami Heat's LeBron James , two stars in the post-Michael Jordan era often compared to him.The day was already significant, as the collection of the N.B.A.'s best talent played on Jordan's 50th birthday.Bryant began the final three minutes of the game with an offensive rebound. He then made a pretty crossover to get by the Heat's Chris Bosh that led to a sweeping layup. On his way to play defense, Bryant sought out James, who was bringing the ball up court.Bryant switched onto James. James tried to dribble past Bryant. They each worked to outplay the other, with Bryant winning this battle when he blocked James's long jumper. Oklahoma City's Kevin Durant turned Bryant's defensive highlight, one of a few, into an offensive highlight with a one-handed dunk.It gave the West a 10-point lead with 2 minutes 33 seconds left and helped seal a 143-138 victory over the East at the Toyota Center."I'm known for my defense," Bryant said of his block. "I can defend. I'm pretty smart with my defense."Chris Paul, who finished with 15 assists and 20 points, including 9 in the fourth quarter, was named the game's most valuable player. Durant had a game-high 30 points, and the Knicks' Carmelo Anthony led the East with 26 points and 12 rebounds.Bryant approached Gregg Popovich, the San Antonio Spurs coach who was guiding the West All-Stars, and asked to guard James in the final minutes. It was hard to find a player who would argue against Bryant's block on James becoming this game's lasting moment."It was a great block," Durant said. "I haven't really seen any M.V.P. get a jumper blocked like that."Anthony was eager to describe what it was like to share the court as Bryant and James battled late."It's fun to be out there with them, it's fun to see," Anthony said. "It brings the best out of everybody, as you could see. It got the game going. It kind of got the West team going. I love that competitive spirit, that competitive nature in Kobe and LeBron."Bryant was not done after the block. He pressured James enough in the final minute to create another turnover. That led to an uncontested fast-break basket in which the Clippers' Blake Griffin dunked the ball after throwing it off the backboard."We both respect each other at the highest level, man," James said of Bryant. "He's one of the best players that we have in this league still at his age. The things that he's able to do out on the floor still today is unbelievable."Bryant is 34 and in his 17th season, while the 28-year-old James has raised his already impressive game to another level in this, his 10th N.B.A. season."My switch never went off," Bryant said when he was asked if he used any of the All-Star break to relax. He added: "It was on all weekend."The East grabbed the spotlight on consecutive possessions early in the first quarter, when Anthony found James for a crosscourt alley-oop dunk in transition and James then made a circuslike pass to Anthony, who quickly rose up to swish a deep 3-pointer.Anthony, who was uncertain if he would play Sunday after sustaining a bruised right bicep in the Knicks last game before the break Wednesday, appeared to be fully healthy.James Harden, the host Houston Rockets lone All-Star, played well in the second quarter when he was paired with his former Oklahoma City teammates Durant and Russell Westbrook.But the memories from Sunday will be of Bryant and James playing aggressively, even late in an exhibition, in a style that mirrored Jordan's on-court play. A few more highlights that will perhaps continue to drive the conversation of which player best resembles Jordan."M.J. loved the game at a high level," James said. "And the guys that he played against — Patrick Ewing and Shaq and Penny Hardaway and Isiah Thomas and all those guys man, Scottie, they all loved the game. And you saw that."He added: "That's what we have as well. We got guys that really love the game and we carry what we do at a high level."
For the greatest basketball player on earth, All-Star weekend is not a game, but a marathon, a dizzying three-day slog through news media scrums, promotional appearances, charity events, business meetings and more news media scrums.The merry-go-round of obligations starts Friday morning in the host city and does not end until long after the final buzzer Sunday night.On Saturday afternoon, LeBron James was due at a local Boys and Girls Club, to help refurbish a gymnasium, which for James is an annual All-Star weekend tradition. The boys and girls expected James at 2:30 p.m. He arrived at 3:15. This was one case where a star athlete's tardiness was a mark of virtue, not casual disregard.James, the N.B.A.'s reigning most valuable player, the engine of the Miami Heat's 2012 championship, had been hunkered down in a hotel conference room, with about 40 of his fellow players, stars and nonstars alike, working diligently to repair their scandalized union.The players took a bold step Saturday, firing the union's executive director, Billy Hunter, whose business practices are being investigated by three government agencies. The sentiment in the room was said to be unanimous, but it was driven by two forceful figures: Jerry Stackhouse, an 18-year veteran, and James, a three-time M.V.P.Amid an orgy of contrived competition, relentless marketing, tired events and semiscripted outcomes, James's sudden civic turn was perhaps the most real moment of the weekend."Well, it's our future," James said Sunday after the West beat the East, 143-138, in the All-Star Game. "Our current state as of yesterday wasn't in the best possible position we can be in. And that's why Billy Hunter's duties was relieved. And now we feel comfortable with where we're at right now. But we got a long way to go."For years, the league's brightest stars have eschewed any sort of responsibility for managing their union. They rarely run for office or attend meetings, except for the occasional show of force during labor negotiations — and even then, they usually leave when the cameras turn off. This emphatic, principled stand by James on Saturday was a rare exception to the rule, and it mattered greatly.Derek Fisher had been virtually isolated in his drive to have Hunter's questionable practices exposed. Last spring, Fisher's fellow executive committee members — bowing to Hunter's authority — asked for his resignation in an 8-0 vote.It took an independent audit, a federal investigation and a flurry of investigative news reports for Fisher to gather enough support to suspend Hunter on Feb. 1, to put in motion the drive to oust him permanently.But Fisher still had to persuade a majority of players, some of whom remained skeptical of him, to take the next step.In the players union, as in the N.B.A., star power matters. Aura matters. Respect matters. So when James started asking pointed questions and making pointed statements, the room took notice.James "practically cross-examined" the lawyers who prepared the audit, according to someone in the room. James and Stackhouse grilled Fisher about signing Hunter's most recent contract — the one that, according to the audit, was never properly approved. They demanded explanations from the committee members who previously sided with Hunter over Fisher."It was spectacular," said the person who was in the room. And it was unusual.Chris Paul, the Los Angeles Clippers guard, is the only superstar on the union's executive committee. The oversight of union operations — including the oversight of its executive director — has fallen mostly to bit players with limited standing.It was surely far easier for Hunter and his chief counsel, Gary Hall, to intimidate and silence Pat Garrity in 2009 — an incident reported in the independent audit — than it would have been to shut down, say, Kobe Bryant. Garrity was the first to ask questions about Hunter's nepotism and questionable investments, but his concerns were muzzled, allowing the problems to fester.One wonders how quickly the union might have acted had James or Bryant or Paul Pierce or Dwyane Wade gotten involved sooner.
EAST RUTHERFORD, N.J. — A week after he had plasma therapy for his balky ankles, Nets point guard Deron Williams returned to practice Monday feeling a shade closer to his former self.He added, somewhat sheepishly, an admission that sounded astonishing coming from someone playing professional basketball."I can't dunk," Williams said. "I can't jump. Even if I tried, off one leg I can't dunk. I can dunk off two, but if I just tried to dunk off my left leg, I can't dunk."Dunking is one thing; Williams, who is listed at 6 feet 3 inches, was never known for his leaping ability. But the Nets hope he can get some of his explosiveness and lift back for the second half.Williams missed the last two games before the All-Star Game break to have the ankle procedure, an orthobiotic treatment that uses an injection of the players' own blood into the injured area to help the body repair. He practiced Monday and said his legs felt fine, although he was not prepared to say the procedure had made a significant difference.Williams said he would be in the lineup Tuesday against the Milwaukee Bucks, but Coach P. J. Carlesimo said he was unsure about Williams's availability for the home-and-home series against the Bucks on Tuesday and Wednesday."I have no expectations, honestly," Carlesimo said. "I wasn't sure if he was going to practice today. Whatever they say is fine. If he can play, great. If he can't, that's O.K."Williams rested in Miami while watching the All-Star Game from afar for the first time since 2009. This season, he has been bothered by ankle, quadriceps, wrist and shoulder discomfort. None of those knocked him out for more than two games, but they have hampered his ability to perform at an All-Star level.His statistical output — averaging 16.7 points and 7.6 assists — is down considerably from previous seasons. He averaged double figures in assists for four consecutive seasons for Utah before signing a $98 million contract to stay a Net.On Saturday, Jerry Colangelo, chairman of the U.S.A. basketball team, told The Daily News that Williams was "not in the best shape" and "a little overweight" last summer in London, when he won his second Olympic gold medal.Though Colangelo later clarified his comments, the critique seemed to sting Williams, who did not respond Monday. He refused to blame his injuries, but acknowledged that his ankles had been a concern."It's definitely affected me," Williams said. "If you're going into the lane, a hard jump-stop hurts. Any hard impact or hard move hurts. I do a good job getting it warmed up; usually in the first quarter it's great. Then I go and sit down, and it stiffens up and it's hard for me to get going."Regardless, Williams said, if fans expect him to produce the statistics he routinely put up in Utah, they may be disappointed."It's a different offense," he said. "I'm not going to be doing the same things and have the same numbers that I did in Utah. But I can still have a great impact on the game."It will probably not be above the rim. In late November against the Los Angeles Clippers, a dunk attempt by Williams — his only one so far this season — was soundly rejected by Blake Griffin. Williams even jammed his wrist on the play, adding injury to insult.It was that kind of first half of the season for him. Now the Nets are hoping for better results."We just want Deron to be Deron Williams," Carlesimo said. "If Deron is Deron Williams, we'll be fine. I do think if the treatment allows him to play with a little or a lot less pain, that will be significant."
The enduring, clichéd myth of the Los Angeles Lakers — perpetuated mostly by envious fans in other cities — is that the franchise owes its aura to its surroundings. That Hollywood made the Lakers cool, and the sunshine made them desirable. That the city made the dynasty.The premise is irresistible. Los Angeles is alluring in a way that few places are, a magnet for supreme talent, fame seekers of all types and anyone who loves palm trees. Glitz and glamour are the city's birthright. Stars come. Championships follow.The premise is false. Los Angeles did not make the Lakers great. Jerry Buss did.Buss, the Lakers' legendary owner, who died Monday at 80, was among the first to recognize that basketball is a production, that sports can be glamorous and that nothing sells like star power.Buss created Showtime, the slogan that became synonymous with the charismatic running, gunning Lakers of the 1980s. He hired an in-house band. He created the Laker Girls, to make the experience at the Fabulous Forum a little more fabulous, to keep the fans entertained through every timeout.Every franchise now has a dance team (or several), and every timeout at every N.B.A. game is now a nonstop whir of kiss-cams, half-court shooting contests and T-shirt cannons. The N.B.A.'s deft fusion of sports and entertainment is part of Buss's fantastic legacy, along with those 10 championship banners — the most by a single owner in any league. Like Commissioner David Stern, who is retiring next February, Buss was a visionary in the art of marketing the game.It is, of course, the banners that ultimately set Buss apart, that qualify him as perhaps the greatest owner in North American sports history. Contrary to the mythology, the banners did not hang themselves.The Lakers have the benefit of a large market and a temperate climate, but so do the Clippers, who have also called Los Angeles home for 29 years, with none of the presumed advantages of the 213 area code.No one ever demanded a trade to the Clippers. In fact, many begged to be sent elsewhere.What made the Lakers great was Buss, who in so many ways was the model owner, the sort that every fan wants: generous with his payroll, methodical in his decisions, competitive and engaged, but never a meddler.Buss paid to acquire the best players, rarely thinking about his profit margin. He hired the best basketball minds — Jerry West, Pat Riley, Phil Jackson — and got out of their way, recognizing that riches do not equate to basketball expertise."His vision was second to none," West said in a statement. "He wanted an N.B.A. franchise brand that represented the very best and went to every extreme to accomplish his goals."In West, Buss had a basketball savant running the show. And he gave him all the autonomy and resources he needed to build and rebuild the dynasty, from Magic and Kareem to Kobe and Shaq. After West stepped away, his protégé Mitch Kupchak refashioned the dynasty once more, acquiring Pau Gasol to help Kobe Bryant win two more titles.It is sometimes forgotten amid the glow of all of those Larry O'Brien trophies, but the Lakers took a huge risk in the summer of 1996, tearing up their roster to make a (then-unprecedented) $120 million offer to Shaquille O'Neal. In the process, they traded their star center, Vlade Divac, to acquire the draft rights to Bryant, an unproven teenager. It was West who maneuvered the Lakers to create one of the greatest tandems, but it was Buss — a devoted and skilled poker player — who trusted and empowered West to make this calculated gamble."He's meant everything to me," Bryant said of Buss last week. "I mean, he took a chance on a 17-year-old kid coming out of Philadelphia when nobody really saw that potential. And he believed in me the entire way."When the time came to break up the Shaq-Kobe partnership, Buss wisely gambled on Bryant, trading away O'Neal.Last summer, the Lakers struck again, acquiring Dwight Howard and Steve Nash, demonstrating once more Buss's commitment to winning at all costs. The Lakers' luxury-tax bill this season is a projected $30 million, and if the roster is kept intact, it could leap to as much as $78 million next season.This has fueled another Lakers myth: that they simply spend their way to success. There is a sliver of truth here — no team can retain the best talent without spending generously — but the Lakers are not the league's biggest spenders over the past decade. (The Lakers trail the Knicks, the Dallas Mavericks and the Portland Trail Blazers in taxes paid, according to the salary-cap expert Larry Coon.) Nor did Buss, a millionaire in a league of billionaires and corporations, have the deepest pockets.The competitor in Buss always valued skills over spending power. When the luxury tax was introduced, Buss vowed never to cross the tax threshold. Not because he wanted to save money, but because he wanted to beat everyone on a level playing field."What they're trying to do is say, 'Let's all have the same number of chips and we'll see who can build a team the best,' " Buss said in 2000.Eventually, other teams sprinted past the threshold, forcing Buss to do the same, but he was always the poker player at heart, angling to beat you with his intellect and his foresight and his bravado."I like the concept of having the same number of weapons and just see who can run the ship the best," Buss said. "That's competition."For the last 34 years, Buss was simply better at it than everyone else.
As energy sources go, Joe Johnson is fantastically deceptive, all sleepy eyes and shrugs and coy smiles, without a single signature exclamation in his emotional arsenal. There is nothing particularly electric about him, until the game is on the line and the seconds are ticking away and the ball is in his hands.In those tense moments of desperation, Johnson is a virtual power station, capable of sending a massive jolt through the atmosphere and thousands of fans into happy delirium with a casual flick of the wrist.Johnson did it twice Tuesday night, sinking a jumper that forced overtime and another at the final buzzer to deliver a thrilling 113-111 victory over the Milwaukee Bucks at Barclays Center, where a crowd announced at 17,334 was left breathless.It was Johnson's fourth game-winning shot of the season, following decisive baskets against Detroit, Washington and the Knicks. The Nets, who acquired Johnson from Atlanta last July, are getting used to the thrills."I wouldn't use the word easy," Coach P. J. Carlesimo said, "but yes, the end of the play is pretty good when it's in Joe's hand."The score was tied at 111-111 with 5.2 seconds left when the Nets inbounded the ball. Johnson sized up Luc Mbah a Moute, one of the N.B.A.'s better defenders, at the top of the key, crossed over to his left and flung a 17-footer while fading to his left. The ball swished just as time expired."It's what he's been doing his entire career," Carlesimo said.The usually reserved Johnson roared as he jogged back up the court and was mobbed by his teammates on the bench while, a few feet away, an appreciative Jay-Z — the music mogul and Nets part-owner — applauded with a look of relief."It's an unbelievable feeling, man," said Johnson, who finished with 24 points, 5 rebounds and 5 assists. "Regardless of the situation, whether it's the regular season or the playoffs, it's always a great feeling, just to see everybody kind of explode and the excitement in the building, is probably the best feeling."The victory was the Nets' third in a row, and it made for a promising start to this post-All-Star-Game section of the schedule. The Nets (32-22) also ended a 13-game losing streak to the Bucks (26-26) that stretched back to 2009, including two losses earlier this season.The teams meet again Wednesday night in Milwaukee to close the season series.The Nets were fortunate to make it to overtime. They never could contain Brandon Jennings, who scorched them for 34 points. They blew a 10-point lead in the second half. They had trouble making plays down the stretch of regulation. And they were hit one costly and controversial call, an offensive foul on Deron Williams with 7.7 seconds left in the fourth quarter, the Nets trailing by 1 point.But Johnson saved the game, hitting a 3-pointer with 1.3 seconds left to tie the game at 105-105. Jennings missed a long heave at the buzzer, forcing overtime."Joe's in trouble," said Brook Lopez, "because every time he gets it now, I think it's going to go in. He's been incredible."No N.B.A. player has been more clutch than Johnson this season. According to the N.B.A.'s statistics tool at NBA.com/stats, Johnson has gone 9 for 10 from the field in the final minute of games when the margin is 3 points or fewer. He is 4 for 4 in the final 10 seconds when the margin is 3 points or fewer."When I get the basketball, it's instincts, it's reactions," Johnson said. "It's nothing that is planned. I totally read the man who's guarding me, how he's playing me, that's basically it."Williams made an encouraging return to the lineup after taking two games off last week to get treatment on his tendinitis-stricken ankles. Though he could not contain Jennings (and no one could), Williams looked spry and aggressive, finishing with 19 points and 9 assists in 44 minutes 36 seconds.Lopez, who made his All-Star debut Sunday, looked as if he had an All-Star hangover, going 6 for 17 from the field and 0 for 4 in overtime, though he did finish with 19 points, 9 rebounds and 3 blocks.Lopez was benched for nearly the entire fourth quarter, as Carlesimo went with Andray Blatche, who at that point was more effective. Blatche finished with 14 points and 6 rebounds, leading a bench group that scored 44 points.Williams spent his weekend in Miami, hanging out at the beach with his family, but it was not an entirely pleasant All-Star break. He was shut out of the All-Star Game for the first time in four years. Then Jerry Colangelo, the president of USA Basketball, told The Daily News that Williams was "overweight" for the Olympics last summer.The wave of scrutiny seemed to irritate Carlesimo, who said he was "befuddled at everything that's being made.""Deron has basically been the single most important factor in transforming the franchise," Carlesimo said. "Honestly, I don't understand it."Billy King told reporters at the Nets' morning shootaround that there was only a 10 percent chance he would make a trade by Thursday's deadline. By the evening, he had cut that number in half. "I would put it at probably 5 percent now," King said. "I don't see anything happening." The Nets have pursued Atlanta's Josh Smith, but they lack the assets the Hawks want: expiring contracts, young prospects and draft picks. The Nets have offered a package built around Kris Humphries, but the Hawks do not want Humphries's contract, which runs through 2014. In general, the Nets have few desirable assets, outside MarShon Brooks, Mirza Teletovic and future draft picks. Teletovic has drawn serious attention from a number of teams, but the Nets have so far refused to part with the young shooter from Bosnia.
MILWAUKEE — For three quarters Wednesday night, the Nets looked overmatched by the Milwaukee Bucks and their electric point guard Brandon Jennings.Jennings, a 6-foot-1-inch dynamo, repeatedly made his counterparts, Deron Williams and C. J. Watson, look old and slow in staking the Bucks to a 76-65 lead late in the third quarter.Then the Nets showed up.What began in the third quarter and continued into the fourth was a 14-0 run that catapulted the Nets to a 97-94 victory at BMO Harris Bradley Center. It was their fourth win in a row and second in two nights over the Bucks. And with the season's playoff push in sight, it was — in the Nets' view — a strong statement."It's really big, because this is a game that could have gone the other way," Coach P. J. Carlesimo said. "We could have lost this one by 14 or 18 and said, You know, hey, it was a back to back."Gerald Wallace simplified his coach's message, saying, "Like P. J. said, we're in playoff mode."The game-changing run began innocently enough with a free throw by Wallace and a basket by Andray Blatche to cut the Bucks' lead to 8 going into the fourth.The final period could not have been scripted better for the Nets. C. J. Watson made a layup, Monta Ellis turned the ball over, MarShon Brooks made a layup, Ellis missed a shot and Brooks hit a 3-pointer. Blatche then knocked down another shot, and Brooks hit two more free throws.In less than four minutes, the Nets (33-22) turned the 76-65 deficit into a 79-76 lead. They then held on for dear life, emerging with the win only after Ellis missed the first two of three free throws (he missed the last on purpose) after he was fouled by Williams attempting a 3-pointer with 2.4 seconds left.Jennings, who scored 34 points against the Nets on Tuesday in Brooklyn, again was the Bucks' catalyst for most of Wednesday's game. He hit his first nine shots of the game and had 26 points entering the fourth quarter, but scored only 5 in the fourth."We just tried to make things hard on him, trapping him a little more on the pick and rolls," Williams said of defending Jennings in crunch time. "He's just one of those players when he's hot, when he gets it going, he's almost impossible to stop."Williams, playing his second game after missing the final two games before the All-Star break to get treatment on his ailing ankles, led the Nets with 23 points. There was some concern over how he would recover for the second game in as many nights."I felt pretty good," Williams said, before adding he will get cortisone shots on his ankles Thursday.Despite any lingering soreness, though, Williams was effective in his 33 minutes, if not flashy or dominating. His 3-pointer with 1 minute 50 seconds left gave the Nets a 94-83 lead and sent many Bucks fans to the exits.Williams was backed up by the Nets' bench, which scored 47 points. Watson accounted for 17 of them, shooting 7 for 11 from the field. His driving layup with 15.5 seconds remaining gave the Nets a 96-92 lead after a layup by Jennings made it a one-possession game. Blatche added 12, and Brooks had 7.Carlesimo called Watson's recent play "enormous," adding, "He hasn't been good, he's been very, very good."The Bucks, thanks in large part to Jennings's 11 first-quarter points, built an 8-point lead by the end of the opening quarter. They stretched it to 12 by halftime.The Nets, after having lost 13 straight to the Bucks entering Tuesday's game, suddenly find themselves with two straight wins against their former nemesis. Before Wednesday's win, the Nets had not won in Milwaukee since March 3, 2009. The victory also moved the Nets to a game behind the Knicks for first place in the Eastern Conference's Atlantic Division.With the game over and the Nets suddenly on a roll again in a topsy-turvy season, attention will now shift to the trade rumors that have swirled around the team for the better part of the past several weeks. While a trade appeared unlikely by Thursday's 3 p.m. deadline, Carlesimo would not rule it out.Asked before the game if he thought his team would look the same Thursday as it did Wednesday, he replied, "I don't know."
As the N.B.A. trading deadline approached Thursday afternoon, the Knicks sent 27-year-old guard Ronnie Brewer to the Thunder for a draft pick. That left the Knicks with a roster spot to fill, and a few hours later they said they were going to sign 35-year-old forward Kenyon Martin, who has yet to play an N.B.A. game this season. By replacing Brewer with Martin, the Knicks, who started the season as the oldest team in N.B.A. history, got even older. Surely a team that in the off-season signed Rasheed Wallace, a 38-year-old who had been out of the N.B.A. for two years, has more vision than that. Here are some suggestions.Seeking Big Man with shorts, Man of a Certain Age preferred, even older O.K., full set of teeth not really required.The Knicks, my team, God help me, had a job opening, having traded Ronnie Brewer, a once ambulatory small forward who transformed himself into a gimpy statue, for a second-round draft pick, which is the N.B.A. equivalent of fish chum. So, how should they have filled that roster spot?Let's start with height and age, as the Knicks needed a big man, and ancient is how the Knicks roll. Our big men include Rasheed Wallace, who has been sitting on the bench, listed as "day to day" since 2009 with a "minor" foot problem that could result in amputation. And there's Marcus Camby, who was injury prone when he was a young stud in the 1990s. Young is no longer his problem.Why not page Walt Bellamy? He last played in 1975, and isn't that the point? He'd be hungry to get back into the game, assuming he remembers the game. He was an All-Star, he rebounded and scored, and he was cantankerous, which makes him a perfect roomie for J. R. Smith.But don't rule out Nate Thurmond, John Gianelli (Knicks backup center mid 1970s; I rode the crosstown bus with him once), Greg Fillmore (Greg was the 136th pick of the 1970 N.B.A. draft and 7 feet tall, and I had such high hopes — until I saw him play). C'mon, gentlemen, whoever adjusted his hearing aid and got James Dolan on the phone first deserved the job. — MICHAEL POWELLIf the Sacramento Kings move to Seattle, the SuperSonics will get their chance at a comeback. The Knicks could have given a similar comeback to one of Seattle's signature stars: Shawn Kemp.The Reign Man was last seen in a 2009 episode of "Pros vs. Joes," but played professionally as recently as 2008, when he joined Premiata Montegranaro of the Italian League. Although that stint failed to have lasting power — Kemp appeared in just three preseason games — he was reportedly in shape, which should come as a surprise to anyone familiar with Kemp.A six-time All-Star, he forced his way out of Seattle over contract demands, ate his way out Cleveland, played his way out of Portland and then saw his N.B.A. life peter out in one last season in Orlando. But Kemp has mouths to feed (at least seven of them) and made some waves last season when he described Blake Griffin's posterizing dunk over Kendrick Perkins as "just a layup," giving him motivation to play hard for the Knicks.Even if he can no longer play at the level of a star, at 43 years young he would at least have served as a cautionary tale for Iman Shumpert, a young player with a similar preference for acrobatic dunks and stylish hair. — BENJAMIN HOFFMANTo consider any other players for an open roster while the greatest point guard of his generation, according to him, is available seems like a waste of everyone's time.Since leaving the Knicks, Stephon Marbury has led the Beijing Ducks to the 2012 Chinese Basketball Association championship, giving him the winning pedigree that the Knicks desire. His moment of international triumph will live on forever, as a statue was commemorated of his celebration.The man with a tattoo on the side of his head depicting the logo for his personal sneaker brand (which may or may not still exist in China) was previously an N.B.A. star as well, averaging 21.7 points and 8.1 assists a game for the 2004-5 Knicks, numbers that even Jeremy Lin fanatics would have to admit were strong. Provided the discussion never turned to character, marketability or dependability, it is hard to see how this signing could go wrong.The real advantage of signing Marbury, however, would be to give the basketball world an opportunity to finally answer the question of who is better: Marbury or Jason Kidd. In a rivalry that seemed to exist only in Marbury's head, the talkative former star often declared himself superior to Kidd. This would give him the chance to prove it.  — BENJAMIN HOFFMANM.J.! He's already come back two times, why not a third? He had some of the best games of his career — which is to say, of anyone's career — at Madison Square Garden. The Double Nickel. The playoff sweeps. That dunk over Ewing. He owned New York without ever living here; think what he could do if he called Manhattan home. Coming back at 50 to play under the glare of New York's brightest lights would have been a bold move. Perhaps a foolish one.But Jordan, "the best there ever will be," as the statue says, is nothing if not bold, and some of his post-basketball moves certainly qualify as foolish. He would have instantly been the biggest celebrity in a city jam-packed with them, making our interest in A-Rod and Tebow look like silly dalliances. We would have watched Jay-Z squirm as he struggles to square his lyrics ("I'm the Mike Jordan of recording") with his Nets allegiance. He's already got his steakhouse in Grand Central, one of the city's finest landmarks. Why not set up shop in a far more exciting temple across town? — SAM DOLNICKThe Knicks are no strangers to signing aged superstars. It's what they do. So why don't they throw it all the way back and give Walt "Clyde" Frazier a look? All that yoga and the off-seasons in St Croix have surely kept him limber and relaxed. His vocabulary is certainly stronger than ever. Maybe his teammates would be the beneficiaries of his altruistic percolations. Maybe together they could have bedeviled overzealous opponents and found themselves rejuvenated and omnipresent in the second half. What about rhyming? Do the Knicks have any capable rhymers on their roster? Maybe he could have initiated some huffing and stuffing. Or even some swishing and dishing. Even at his advanced age he surely could have helped them outhustle and outmuscle a lackadaisical opponent.With the trend in sports toward alternate jerseys, Frazier's sartorial instincts might also have come in handy. How about a cow-print shooting shirt? Maybe a new wildcat patterned away ensemble from Mohan's Custom Tailors for the stretch run? The possibilities are endless. It might have even be worth it just for the postgame spreads at Clyde Frazier's Wine and Dine. It's within walking distance from the Garden and the pan-roasted mahi mahi sounds delicious. — FRED BIERMANSpree! He was the last good thing to happen to the Knicks, the rare player whose attitude managed to embody the city's spirit. He was scrappy, elbows and arms flapping every which way along with his braids. He led a not very good team, an eighth seed in the playoffs, to the N.B.A. finals in 1999. He would have added some swagger, some surprises, and sure, some menace, to a team that can look as if it's sleepwalking some nights. He would probably have gotten along famously with J. R. Smith. And let's be honest, he needs a break. He was arrested on New Year's Eve in Milwaukee for disorderly conduct after neighbors complained that his music was too loud. It's safe to say that if Spree moved back to New York, the neighbors would not complain. That was only the latest setback for the would-be savior — his home was foreclosed a few years ago, he's had serious tax problems, and the U.S. Marshals auctioned off his 70-foot yacht. So we would be saving him, just as much as he would be saving us. New York at its finest. — SAM DOLNICKHe was known to guzzle Diet Cokes on the sideline. He wouldn't crack six feet in heels. And his best-known move on the hardwood involved riding the leg of a rival's star center during a brawl.But the Knicks could use Jeff Van Gundy, their 51-year-old former head coach, who once starred at Nazareth College in Rochester, leading the team to the 1984 N.C.A.A. Division III Eastern Regional championship. Though a news article from 1996 appraised Van Gundy as "slight" and "unheralded" as a player, his 87 percent career free-throw percentage at Nazareth would place him third on the current Knicks — second among those without a full head of hair. (Sorry, Jason Kidd.)Knicks fans will recall that the Van Gundy-led teams of the late-1990s paid more than occasional mind to defense. He must also be commended for having the foresight to resign as coach in 2001, evading the imminent decade of losing, the Isiah Thomas era and the hoops trinity of Eddy Curry, Jerome James and Jared Jeffries. — MATT FLEGENHEIMER
In their last turn as teammates, Jason Kidd and Kenyon Martin achieved the impossible, turning the Nets into an N.B.A. force, bringing life to the dreary Meadowlands and basketball artistry to East Rutherford, N.J. Kidd flung the lobs, Martin slammed them home and for a time the Nets soared over the Eastern Conference.In their last turn as teammates, Carmelo Anthony and Martin achieved the laudable, transforming the Denver Nuggets into a solid playoff team, pushing the Los Angeles Lakers to six games in the Western Conference finals.That was four years ago.No one is certain what the Kenyon Martin of 2013 could mean to a suddenly fragile team with championship aspirations, but the Knicks will soon find out.The Knicks plan to sign Martin to a 10-day contract this weekend, reuniting him with Kidd, his former alley-oop partner, and Anthony, his onetime frontcourt mate, along with his fellow ex-Nuggets J. R. Smith, Marcus Camby and Raymond Felton.It should be quite a reunion party. When the hugs are over, the Knicks will have to assess whether Martin, 35, still has the defensive prowess to help their cause, and whether his talent is worth the headaches he brings.Once a borderline star known for his strength, athleticism and high-flying dunks, Martin now inspires wary glances over his temper and his questionable attitude. The Denver Nuggets happily parted ways with Martin in 2011. The Los Angeles Clippers made no attempt to re-sign him last year.No other team sought his services in the past nine months, causing even Martin to wonder out loud if his reputation was hurting him."There is a notion about me that is not accurate at all — I don't know who started it or where it came from — that people can't control me," Martin told Marc Spears of Yahoo Sports in November. "I don't understand. Have I had my issues like a lot of other people? Yeah. But I'm getting back that people think they can't control me, that if I don't play I'm going to explode, or I can turn a locker room."Martin then asked rhetorically, "Am I that bad of a guy?"Team officials who have worked with Martin characterize him as a disruptive force in the locker room. He is also combustible on the court — he had seven technical fouls last season, in only 42 games — which should be a concern for a testy Knicks team that is already among the league leaders in technicals.Martin also comes with an unfortunate compendium of off-court transgressions.During the 2011 lockout, Martin stirred outrage with a hateful message posted to his verified Twitter account. The message read, "All Haters Should catch full blown Aids and Die!" Martin later denied writing that post and eventually deleted his account.In the 2009 playoffs, Martin engaged in a verbal altercation with the Dallas Mavericks owner Mark Cuban and others at the Mavericks' arena. Cuban accused Martin of cursing at and threatening fans, and of calling the wife of a Mavericks staff member a "fat pig."Three years earlier, Martin was suspended in the middle of a playoff series by Nuggets Coach George Karl after Martin refused to play the second half of a game. The Denver Post reported at the time that two prominent Nuggets had "lost faith" in Martin as a teammate. He did not play again in the series.Martin's most infamous clash with a teammate came in 2003, when he and Alonzo Mourning nearly came to blows at a Nets practice. Mourning chided Martin for not playing through an injury, saying, "You can't be a leader in the trainer's room crying, 'My ankle, my ankle.' " Martin responded by muttering, "My kidney, my kidney" — a reference to the kidney disease that forced Mourning to miss nearly two seasons.For now, the Knicks are more concerned with Martin's physical state, and the 10-day contract gives them a chance to evaluate his skills before deciding whether to sign him through the season.Martin has not played since May, when the San Antonio Spurs swept the Clippers in the playoffs. He played only 42 minutes in the four-game series, and only 9 in the clincher."If he's got anything left in his tank, I think he can still help us," Coach Mike Woodson said Friday.At his peak, Martin was capable of guarding three positions and collecting rebounds in bunches. His offensive skill set has always been limited, but the flagging Knicks, who were 14-14 over their last 28 games before Friday, desperately need an infusion of defense and passion, whatever form it may take."Am I emotional?" Martin said in the Yahoo interview. "Yeah, but that's what made me who I am. Is that too much or did I not do enough? Do I have my flaws? Yes. But have I done things the right way on and off the court? Yeah."
The Syracuse-Georgetown rivalry was born on a cold Tuesday night in Manley Field House in February 1980, or so the story goes. It is a nice opening chapter, but some dig a little bit deeper.Five years earlier, at the War Memorial Auditorium in Rochester, the Hoyas upset the Orangemen, 71-70, in the Kodak Collegiate Classic. Georgetown Coach John Thompson, then in his third year, brought his two young sons, Ronny and John III, along to watch."That game," said Rich Chvotkin, Georgetown's radio voice since 1974, "was technically the start of Georgetown-Syracuse."The venues and the players would change, but for the next four decades the matchup remained just as even and just as taut, between two programs that would sprout like mighty branches from the trunk of the Big East Conference.On Saturday, No. 11 Georgetown visits No. 8 Syracuse for the final time before the Orange depart for the Atlantic Coast Conference. In the Carrier Dome, where the programs have met 30 times since 1981, a record crowd of more than 35,000 is expected. Syracuse carries a 38-game home winning streak, best in the nation.Thus there are parallels to the showdown in 1980, the game that legitimately birthed a rivalry that become one of college basketball's most intense. It was Syracuse's final game at tiny Manley Field House, where the Orangemen, as they were known at the time, held a 57-game winning streak. Until Georgetown came in and won, 52-50.After the game, Thompson loudly declared, "Manley Field House is officially closed" — words that crystallized the rivalry between the teams, inciting Syracuse fans and rallying the Hoyas, who celebrated in the locker room by chanting the phrase over and over and over.For most, Thompson's famous six words are the most memorable moment from that night. But the former Georgetown star guard Eric Floyd, known as Sleepy, who connected on the winning free throws with 5 seconds remaining, remembers another Thompson phrase.In practice that season, Thompson would repeatedly remind Floyd that free-throw shooting could be "easy as ice cream." So before Floyd stepped to the line in Manley, in front of a raucous crowd that filled the arena, Thompson mouthed the words "ice cream.""That just totally relaxed me," Floyd recalled in a telephone interview from his home in Charlotte.Thompson's field-house declaration became a haunting soundtrack for Coach Jim Boeheim and Syracuse, as Georgetown — with Floyd, and then Patrick Ewing, David Wingate and Reggie Williams, among others — built itself into a national contender. (The Hoyas won the N.C.A.A. title in 1984.) Every matchup, from Syracuse's standpoint, was colored by its pursuit of revenge."I think the national interest in the rivalry went to another level," Floyd said. "So a lot more attention from that point moving forward was always placed on that particular game."Syracuse also established itself as a national force under Boeheim, and six of the next eight matchups after that 1980 game were decided by 5 points or fewer. The beneficiaries? Fans of the new Big East, which formed in 1979. Immediately, the twice-yearly Syracuse-Georgetown games in the Capital Centre in Maryland and the Carrier Dome (and often again in Madison Square Garden during the postseason conference tournament) became the conference's marquee events."It was there from the beginning," Mike Tranghese, the former commissioner of the Big East, said in a telephone interview. "There were so many great games between those two teams."Tranghese, who helped found the conference with Dave Gavitt in 1979 and served as its commissioner from 1990 until 2009, said Syracuse and Georgetown typified Big East basketball in their style of play, toughness and effort.Of all the Big East tournament games Tranghese watched, one stood out, and it was not the six-overtime game between Syracuse and Connecticut in 2009. It was the Hoyas' 82-71 win in overtime over Pearl Washington and Syracuse in the championship game in 1984."The caliber of player, the intensity — it was a physical war," Tranghese said. "It epitomized what the Big East was: a street game, in New York City, in Madison Square Garden. No place for the faint of heart."Others have their own favorites. Like maybe the game in 2002, on the day Syracuse dedicated its court to Boeheim, when Georgetown spoiled the party, 75-69. Or in 1985, when Washington hit a winner over the Hoyas, the defending national champions, and Syracuse fans stormed the court. Or in 1997, when Syracuse beat Georgetown, 77-74, thanks to the late-game heroics of a backup guard who went on to become a star in another sport: Donovan McNabb."It's a great game," Boeheim said Wednesday after the Orange's victory over Providence. "Syracuse-Georgetown games always have been."Syracuse will visit Georgetown for the last time on March 9, and both sides have lobbied to continue the rivalry in the future, although there is no indication that will happen. Syracuse will honor its former star Carmelo Anthony by retiring his jersey at halftime Saturday.It would seem a fitting opportunity for Georgetown to pen its final chapter 33 years after the first: upsetting yet another Syracuse celebration, rivals to the end."I run into so many Syracuse people all over the country that remember me because of the rivalry," Floyd said. "It's always Georgetown. And Georgetown is always in the same sentence as Syracuse."
Shabazz Napier scored 28 points, and Ryan Boatright and Omar Calhoun added 17 apiece as visiting Connecticut overcame a halftime deficit to beat DePaul, 81-69, on Saturday night.The Huskies (19-7, 9-5 Big East) trailed by 3 points at the break and were down by 1 early in the second half when they scored 13 straight, sending the Blue Demons (11-16, 2-12) to their 11th loss in 12 games.PROVIDENCE 76, RUTGERS 72 Guard Bryce Cotton scored 22 points, including two foul shots with five seconds left, as visiting Providence (15-12, 7-8 Big East) beat Rutgers (13-13, 4-10).ALBANY 58, FAIRFIELD 50 Sam Rowley and John Puk scored 13 points apiece as Albany (20-9) pulled away from host Fairfield (17-12), reaching 20 wins for the first time since 2006-7.UMASS 76, DAYTON 66 Cady Lalanne scored a career-high 22 points and tied a career best with 14 rebounds as host Massachusetts (17-9, 7-6 Atlantic 10) ended a three-game losing streak. Dayton (14-12, 4-8) remained winless through six conference road games.RICHMOND 72, FORDHAM 55 Visiting Richmond (16-11, 6-6 Atlantic 10) got hot in the second half, shooting 55.6 percent, and easily handled Fordham (6-22, 2-11), which has lost eight straight.PRINCETON 72, CORNELL 53 Ian Hummer scored 23 points and grabbed 7 rebounds to lead Princeton (14-9, 7-2 Ivy League) to a win at Cornell (13-14, 5-5).COLUMBIA 58, PENN 41 Grant Mullins scored 18 points to lead Columbia (11-13, 3-7 Ivy League) over Pennsylvania (7-19, 4-5) in a game featuring atrocious second-half shooting by both teams.The teams combined for six baskets in the second half. Columbia made 2 of 20 shots and Penn 4 of 24.VERMONT 87, CANISIUS 79 Ethan O'Day scored a career-high 22 points, and Vermont (18-9) made 27 of 31 free throws in a home victory over Canisius (17-11).INDIANA ST. 65, IONA 64 Dawon Cummings's layup with four seconds left led Indiana State (17-11) over visiting Iona (15-13).
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — About halfway through Kenyon Martin 's first interview session after he signed a 10-day contract with the Knicks , he was asked if he could once again embody the qualities of a warrior on the court."Put your hand right here," Martin said, pointing to his heart. "Let me see if you feel this. What's that?Coach Mike Woodson said there was a chance Martin would be in uniform Sunday when the Knicks play the Philadelphia 76ers at Madison Square Garden."I've got to still play the guys that know what we're doing right now because we're trying to get out of this skid," Woodson said. "If it presents itself and I can throw him in, I'll probably let him get his feet wet and see where we're at."Adding the combustible Martin on the heels of a four-game losing streak and a prolonged chunk of mediocre play is the latest move indicating that the Knicks' depth hinges on an ever-shifting group of aging players. With Martin, the Knicks have six players older than 35. They also have five of Martin's former teammates: Jason Kidd, Carmelo Anthony, J. R. Smith, Marcus Camby and Raymond Felton."That's huge," Martin said. "I've played with a lot of these guys."In becoming acclimated, Martin ran some simulated offense with a group of new teammates and looked spry throwing down a dunk. Eager and attentive, he heeded instructions, sought clarification and asked questions. His first assist as a Knick was taking attention away from his struggling teammates, most of whom left practice without talking as Martin was being interviewed.After practice, Martin told a story about an older woman bluntly revealing that she once thought he was an unsavory character, only to shift her opinion. Life has taught Martin that his long list of previous spats and confrontations has defined his reputation to some who do not know him."I have conversations with people along the way and they're like, Wow, like, you're all right," he said.He addressed what he thought to be misconceptions, mainly that he was a hothead and that he was not coachable, something he disputed."I think I'm pretty coachable," he said. "I do what coaches ask of me."Martin did not deny his fiery temper. Rather, he asserted it was packaged with a passion that might as well define him."Do it come out wrong sometimes?" he asked. "Yeah, I'm the first to admit my timing and tact sometimes, it's not the best. But are my intentions good? Absolutely. But I kind of have to work on that and learn to keep my mouth shut a little. But I'm never going to stop caring about the game, stop caring about how my teammates are playing, stop caring about how I play and stop caring about how the game is going. That's going to always be there. And if that's too much, then I don't know what to do."After being a part of a Los Angeles Clippers team that reached the second round of the playoffs, Martin was under the impression that a team would pursue him before the season. When the phone did not ring, Martin acknowledged he became frustrated, calling his first real chunk of time without an N.B.A. contract "a daily struggle.""You name it, I went through it," he said after rattling off a list of unpleasant emotions. Eventually, Martin said, he stopped letting the situation consume him and focused on time he would not otherwise be able to spend with his children, watching basketball games and attending dance recitals.Martin estimated he was in decent shape after spending a lot of time on a treadmill, but did not exaggerate his fitness after nine months away from the N.B.A."I was just telling them," he said, referencing his new teammates, "the treadmill's a lot shorter than this court."Looking at the bigger on-court picture, Woodson said: "If he hustles and rebounds and does dirty work, he can play for me. That's something I'm going to hammer home with him while he's here."Asked what he hoped to get out of the short contract, Martin responded quickly: "Another 10 days. And then the rest of the season."
SYRACUSE — There was history on the court, on the sidelines, even in the deepest reaches of the Carrier Dome, where fans stretched out farther to watch basketball than ever before.They came, 35,000-strong, to see No. 8 Syracuse face No. 11 Georgetown in the final Big East matchup here between not-so-friendly rivals that seemed to carry the burden of four decades of emotion behind every basket and block.The dome glowed like the inside of a jack-o'-lantern. It sounded like the inside of a jet engine. And when the game was over, Georgetown celebrated on center court as the spoiler of a Syracuse showcase.The two foes battled the way they did in the old days, and the Hoyas pulled away late in the second half to win, 57-46. The contest was unmistakably reminiscent of their 1980 showdown, the last men's basketball game at Manley Field House, which Georgetown won, 52-50. That result ended a 57-game home winning streak for the Orange, and on Saturday, the Hoyas brought a 38-game home winning streak to an end.Georgetown Coach John Thompson III was 13 in 1980, listening in his family's kitchen in Washington to the radio broadcast. He cheered as his father, John Thompson, then the Hoyas' coach, made the declaration that set the tone for the rivalry: "Manley Field House is officially closed."Those words echoed through the years of memorable games, notable players and timeless moments. Syracuse and Georgetown grew up like siblings waged in perpetual one upmanship, under the umbrella of the Big East conference, a league celebrated as the epitome of toughness in college basketball.Saturday's game, a slug-it-out affair in which neither team shot better than 36 percent, fit the mold beautifully."It's a good win, in a very difficult place to me, against a very, very good team," Thompson III said. "Anytime you can come up here and win, it means a lot. This game, this rivalry means a lot."With Syracuse heading to the Atlantic Coast Conference in July, this was the last time these teams faced each other at the Carrier Dome as conference opponents. They will play one final regular-season conference game March 9 in Washington, and they could always meet in the conference tournament at Madison Square Garden.Perhaps mindful of that, on Saturday Thompson refrained from stamping his own mark on the rivalry. "I'm sure you guys are waiting for a Manley Field House-type of statement — you're not going to get it," he said. "But it feels good to win here."The stands were full — at 35,012, it was the largest on-campus crowd in N.C.A.A. regular-season history — pushing the dome to the brink of its basketball capacity, with every dim corner crammed, partially obstructed views notwithstanding.At halftime, Carmelo Anthony's No. 15 jersey was retired to the rafters, hanging alongside the banner for Syracuse's national championship in 2003 — the year Anthony led the Orange to the title. At that point, Syracuse had a 23-21 lead thanks to an 8-0 run to end the half.Things looked good for the Orange, until suddenly they did not. Georgetown (21-4, 11-3), which has won nine in a row, began the second half on an 18-8 run. Otto Porter, the Hoyas' rangy sophomore forward, put on a second-half show, scoring 8 points in the first eight minutes, giving him 24 of Georgetown's first 39 points. He hit 9 of his team's first 14 field goals."We just stayed poised," Porter said about how his team handled the hostile crowd. "We didn't lose focus and just went out there and played."Porter found all the soft spots in Syracuse's 2-3 zone, and the Orange (22-5, 10-4) had no transcendent offensive performance to match. James Southerland provided occasional bursts but nothing sustained. The point guard, Michael Carter-Williams, who is second in the nation in assists, finished with 7 points, 5 assists and 3 turnovers."Porter was the difference in the game," Syracuse Coach Jim Boeheim said. "The other players were really struggling, he had to make plays and he made them well."With five minutes left, Porter hit a 3-pointer and was fouled by Brandon Triche, extending Georgetown's lead to 45-37. He added another layup and free throw with 1 minute 21 seconds remaining to give Georgetown a 10-point lead. He flexed his arms forward and huffed as the basket went through. He finished with 33 points and 8 rebounds.After the game, Boeheim said the weight of the moment may have adversely affected some of his players."There's a lot of emotions," he said. "Sometimes you try too hard, maybe."
With three minutes left, C. Vivian Stringer stood in front of her bench, arms folded, and slowly shook her head. After having so many answers during her 42-year, 899-victory coaching career, she seemed as baffled as her Rutgers team.The Scarlet Knights trailed from the start and never seriously threatened surging St. John's, losing by 61-48 at Carnesecca Arena on Saturday in Stringer's fourth failed attempt at a milestone 900th win.Rutgers shot 36.2 percent (17 of 47) from the field, hit one 3-pointer, made 13 of 24 free throws (54.2 percent) and committed 19 turnovers. Stringer described the performance by the Scarlet Knights (14-12, 5-8 Big East) as "embarrassingly poor.""I've never seen a team that has far more talent than it's showing, seems to care as they do and — lights, camera, action — plays the way they do," said Stringer, who fell to 899-330 in her career.In many respects, the latest defeat in the four-game losing streak was the most deflating for a roster that includes seven McDonald's all-Americans. Rutgers was beaten by a late 3-pointer in a 60-57 loss at DePaul to begin a slide that could end the team's streak of 10 N.C.A.A. tournament appearances. The Scarlet Knights played a solid first half before being overpowered by third-ranked Connecticut, 65-45, at home. On Tuesday night, they were in the game before Syracuse pulled away midway through the second half in a 58-45 defeat at the Carrier Dome.On Saturday, however, Stringer never had a chance at No. 900. St. John's (15-10, 9-4) sprinted to a 12-3 advantage and extended its lead in the second half to 22 points, 47-25, on a 3-pointer by the senior guard Nadirah McKenith with 14 minutes 19 seconds left. It was the Red Storm's fifth consecutive victory.After her team faltered in the second half against Connecticut, Stringer described her bid to become the seventh N.C.A.A. basketball coach to reach 900 wins as a burden. Now, that burden seems to grow more onerous every day. South Florida, which has won three straight, including victories over the ranked teams Louisville and Syracuse, will visit Rutgers on Tuesday night."I don't even know what to say. I'm tired of talking about it," said Stringer, who was inducted into the Hall of Fame in 2009. "I think our kids are just trying to survive."Rutgers, which relies heavily on underclassmen, fell to 2-10 on the road, including 1-6 in Big East games. Stringer continued her criticism of her team by saying that mental toughness "is one of those things we definitely lack."The St. John's game also appeared to say something about the direction of the two programs. Although Rutgers leads the series, 31-9, the Red Storm have won the last six games between the teams."I have no idea about their program," said McKenith, who led all scorers with 21 points. "I know St. John's is moving up to being one of the top programs in the country."Stringer could only joke about a milestone that has become maddeningly elusive. "I'm going to get it before I die," she said. "That much you can count on."
DURHAM, N.C. — Duke is an elite private university where the buildings are pretend Gothic, where tuition is $42,000 a year, and where hundreds of students eagerly and voluntarily spent five wintry weeks camping in the famed tent city known as Krzyzewskiville for one simple reason: to get a good seat for the basketball game against archrival North Carolina.But even at Duke, where crazy is cool and basketball is king, some administrators, faculty and students are asking if big-time sports — and some of the behavior that goes with it — is a big waste of time and energy."For a big state school, there's some justification for big-time sports; for a private institution like Duke, it's a little harder to figure out," said Charles T. Clotfelter, a professor of public policy, economics and law at Duke who has written a book called "Big-Time Sports in American Universities.""Why are we here?" Clotfelter added. "We're here to educate people. There has been a lot of new chatter about this in the past three years. I think it's better for us to come clean and say, yes, we do commercial sports."That kind of talk is not confined to Duke, or to other elite, private universities. It is taking place at college campuses of all sizes around the country. Duke, however, is a university accustomed to having it all — high academic standards, a vibrant social life and big-time sports — and that was enough to take a trip to see what the debate on campus was like.In 2010, the Knight Commission, an N.C.A.A. watchdog group made up of university presidents and other leaders, reported that spending on high-profile sports was growing at up to triple the pace of spending on academics."We've reached the point where big-time intercollegiate athletics is undermining the integrity of our institutions, diverting presidents and institutions from their main purpose," William E. Kirwan, the chancellor of the University of Maryland system and a co-director of the commission, said last year.Clotfelter pointed out that the current debate about the damaging fallout from big-time college sports echoes an argument that dates to the 1920s. "The only thing that's different now is the money," he said.And at Duke, the money generated by the basketball team is way past crazy. In his book, Clotfelter set out to document the nationwide academic cost of athletic success. Among his findings: at colleges with teams in the N.C.A.A. men's basketball tournament, library patrons view 6 percent fewer articles a day as long as the team is in the tournament; on the day immediately after a team wins in an upset or a close game, library use plunges by 19 percent. Clotfelter also found that from 1985 to 2010, average salaries at public universities rose by 32 percent for full professors, 90 percent for presidents and 650 percent for football coaches.Just how crazy is the basketball money at Duke? To find out, I visited a six-story ziggurat called the Schwartz-Butters Athletics Center. It towers over Cameron Indoor Stadium and a new $18.5 million structure known as the Michael W. Krzyzewski Center for Academic and Athletic Excellence, where the men's and women's basketball players practice and lift weights, and where all of the university's 620 athletes in 26 sports can come to work on their studies.On the top floor, I was ushered into the office of Mike Cragg, the senior associate director of athletics, who is in charge of what is called the Legacy Fund, which has raised $65 million since 2000 to finance the men's basketball program — scholarships, salaries, the operating budget and capital projects. I asked Cragg who came up with the idea."Coach K had a vision," Cragg said. "We realized we had an opportunity to monetize the commitment to the basketball program, and we could expand our donor base outside alumni."The most generous donor has kicked in $7.5 million, and the minimum donation is $1 million. With a thought to some of the ideas Clotfelter has studied, I said, "Have you ever considered getting rid of K-Ville?"Cragg looked at me like I might require medical attention. "It's nothing we would want to get rid of," he said. "It's part of the university fabric. It brings an energy to the program because our staff and players know we're all in this together with the students. That translates onto the court."
Forty-eight minutes of grinding against the Memphis Grizzlies ' impenetrable defense left the Nets grumbling, gimpy, grumpy and in some cases altogether silent. Some practically sprinted out of Barclays Center late Sunday, unwilling to discuss the ugly particulars of a 76-72 loss. Others could barely walk, or contain their fury.The Nets were frustrated by their own ineptitude and incensed over the officiating, specifically the absence of a foul call after Deron Williams was hammered at the basket by Tony Allen and Zach Randolph with 26 seconds to go, and the game tied at 72-72. Williams came up limping — with a contusion to his left calf — and fuming."I definitely thought I got fouled," Williams said. "But they didn't call it, so I guess I didn't."Others chose to avoid the topic altogether, by declining to speak with the news media. Brook Lopez and Andray Blatche walked briskly to the parking garage, accompanied by General Manager Billy King, who told reporters that they would not be talking, lest they draw a fine for criticizing the officials.When Blatche briefly returned to the locker room to retrieve some belongings, he waved off reporters, saying: "You heard what Billy said. I'm following orders."Apparently, the Nets had decided that silence was the best strategy for dealing with a difficult defeat, their second in a row at home (both with the owner Mikhail D. Prokhorov in the building). Reggie Evans was the only other player to speak.Although the noncall involving Williams surely hurt the Nets (33-24), their own mistakes and missteps were far more costly.They missed 8 of 13 free throws, more than enough to make up the 4-point margin of defeat. They committed 18 turnovers. They shot poorly (.377) all night, including several air balls. Williams, despite chronically sore ankles, was the Nets' best and at times only offensive weapon, scoring 24 points on 9-of-15 shooting. The other four starters combined for just 22 points and eight field goals.The Nets surely missed Joe Johnson, their second-leading scorer, who rested a sore left heel for the second straight game. The starting job fell to C. J. Watson, who scored a quiet 11 points. MarShon Brooks got an extended run off the bench, but did little with it, scoring 8 points in 32 minutes.Gerald Wallace missed all six of his shots, finishing with zero points for the second time this season. Lopez went 3 for 10 from the field and was benched for the fourth quarter, for the third time in four games, all since making his All-Star Game debut. He finished with 9 points.Coach P. J. Carlesimo offered the same rationale for the Lopez benching as he has before — that Blatche was playing too well to pull from the game. Indeed, Blatche sparked the Nets early in the fourth, scoring their first 6 points in an 8-0 run. But he did little the rest of the way.Lopez has taken the benchings in stride, but Carlesimo admitted he was concerned about Lopez's confidence.Carlesimo tinkered with the rotation all night, to little positive effect."Some guys were giving us offense, some guys were giving us defense," he said. "Some guys weren't giving us a lot of either, and we were just trying to patch a group together."Did the Nets miss Johnson's offense? That seemed clear. The Nets did not crack the 20-point plateau in any of the first three quarters and did not cross the 50-point mark until the final minute of the third (during which they scored 13 points).Wallace might have explained the loss with the infamous phrase he used last month — "Typical Nets basketball" — but he too left without speaking.The Nets led by 72-67 in the fourth, their largest lead of the game, after 5 straight points from Mirza Teletovic. Memphis quickly erased it, tying the game at 72-72 on Mike Conley's jump shot.Williams took the aggressive route, driving the right side of the lane against Allen and Randolph, but his shot never even grazed the rim as he toppled to the court."I thought I got fouled up top and down low," he said.While Williams was still getting up, Teletovic fouled Allen, who made two free throws to give Memphis (37-18) the lead for good, 74-72. The Nets' last chance to tie the game was snuffed when Williams bounced an errant pass, which Tayshaun Prince intercepted, securing the Grizzlies' seventh straight victory. Conley hit two free throws to finish the scoring."It's frustrating," Williams said. "But I can't really control no-calls or calls or anything like that. I can control that I turned the ball over the next play, which is even more frustrating."The Nets are taking a cautious approach to Joe Johnson's sore heel, which of course will be far more critical to their efforts in two months than it is now. They will need his scoring bursts and his clutch shooting in the playoffs. So no one is rushing him back. P. J. Carlesimo said that Johnson was improving, but his status for Tuesday's game in New Orleans remained uncertain.
SEATTLE — Back in the 1992 N.B.A. playoffs, poor Alton Lister stepped between Shawn Kemp and the basket, back when Kemp sprinted and jumped as if from another planet, back when he and the SuperSonics made the spectacular routine. Kemp approached, elevated and jammed home a signature dunk for Seattle sports.The thunder before the Thunder, as it were.If you grew up around Seattle, if you owned a Dana Barros jersey, if you knew your Silent Assassin (Dale Ellis) from your X-Man (Xavier McDaniel), your Toms (Chambers), Dicks (Drive-In) and Lennys (Wilkens), you remember that dunk. It helped define an era when anything seemed possible, an era of Nirvana and Pearl Jam, of Microsoft and Starbucks, of Kemp and Gary Payton. You probably even remember Lister, a SuperSonic himself from 1986 to 1989.At Kemp's place, the neighborhood joint Oskar's Kitchen, mere blocks from the arena where he once starred, locals ask the proprietor about that dunk all the time, but especially now, with the N.B.A. poised to return — or so we hope.Kemp stood behind the bar earlier this month, where they serve his signature drink, the Reignman, a mixture of rum and melon liqueur and pineapple and orange juice that is green and yellow, like the old Sonics' jerseys. Everywhere Kemp turned, locals asked some variation of the same question: are the Sonics coming back?Kemp ranks among the figures most synonymous with that era of Seattle sports, and he shares the fan base's optimism, its dwindling bitterness, its fear. He feels hopeful and confident and thrilled but also wary, and somewhat guilty with the prospect of taking another city's team. He understands why some of us swore off the N.B.A. when the Sonics left, buoyed by bitterness, counting the days to baseball season."There's something missing in all of our hearts around here," Kemp said. "I feel so distanced from the game of basketball in the last five years. It leaves an empty feeling inside you."The news in recent months seemed too good to be true, as if it came too early, too easily, like some sort of trick, like when Howard Schultz sold the Sonics and all the people involved insisted they wanted the team to remain in Seattle — until it left.Then came Chris Hansen, a local who made hundreds of millions in investments, who bought space south of downtown to build an arena, who put together the group that reached an agreement to buy the Sacramento Kings and filed for relocation.He's halfway to a statue at this point.Hansen wants to put the final touch on a sports oasis, a stretch in the SoDo neighborhood that would include three stadiums or arenas and could include five professional teams, playing football, baseball, soccer, basketball and hockey, on the same street. (The W.N.B.A.'s Seattle Storm play a short drive away at the Sonics' old home, KeyArena.) Maybe then, Seattle sports would feel whole again.Jason Reid grew up in north Seattle in the mid-'90s, back when the Sonics contended for the N.B.A. championship each season. He loved "Big Smooth" Sam Perkins and the sharpshooting Ricky Pierce, and he owned a rare Horace Grant Sonics jersey.Later, Reid would produce a documentary called "Sonicsgate," an exceptional but thoroughly depressing chronicle of how the Sonics left. The seeds of the documentary were sown in fandom and loyalty to the first modern era professional sports franchise here to secure a championship, the Sonics, in 1979."The Sonics were the team that had been here the longest, the team with the richest history," Reid said recently at his office, his hair tucked into a baseball cap. "They were woven into the fabric of the community. They were the hottest ticket in town."For more than 30 years, Steve Kelley covered the N.B.A. and wrote columns for The Seattle Times. Kelley covered all the significant runs for the local teams — the Seahawks' Super Bowl appearance, the Mariners' forays into baseball's playoffs — and he said none resonated with the locals like the Sonics' N.B.A. finals sprint in 1996.Kemp, an important member of that team, had grown up in Indiana. He knew so little of this area that when the Sonics drafted him, at age 19 in 1989, he thought Washington State meant Washington D.C. He wanted to visit the White House.He quickly felt at home anyway. He loved the water, loved the mountains, loved the history, with Wilkens and "Downtown" Freddie Brown and Slick Watts. Kemp and Payton and company elevated the Sonics back into that stratosphere."We added to all that," Kemp said. "We became one of the top merchandise-selling teams. That's like if the Charlotte Bobcats became the Lakers."
Aaron Craft slashed through the lane on Sunday for a career-high 21 points, more than he had scored in his last three games combined, to lead No. 18 Ohio State to a 68-60 victory over No. 4 Michigan State .The Spartans' loss damaged their hopes of catching Indiana atop the Big Ten standings. The top-ranked Hoosiers, who have four games left, lead Michigan State by one and a half games. The Spartans (22-6, 11-4) have three games remaining.Deshaun Thomas scored 12 of his 14 points in the second half for the host Buckeyes (20-7, 10-5), the conference's fifth-place team. Evan Ravenel added 10 points and had a key block in the final minute. The Buckeyes are 2-7 against ranked teams and 18-0 against teams not in the top 25.The freshman Gary Harris scored 14 for the Spartans, who lost their second straight after winning 11 of 12.Craft, a junior guard, had not provided much offense this season for an Ohio State team seeking a scorer to complement Thomas. He had not hit double figures in any of the last three games, totaling 17 points. Against Michigan State, Craft repeatedly sped through the heart of the defense to get to the basket.DUKE 89, B.C. 68 The freshman Rasheed Sulaimon scored a season-high 27 points, leading No. 6 Duke to a rout of Boston College.Mason Plumlee added 19 points and 15 rebounds for the host Blue Devils (24-3, 11-3 Atlantic Coast Conference), who shot 62 percent from the field in the first half to take a 51-27 lead. The victory moved them two games behind Miami, the conference leader. Duke, 14-0 at home, will host the Hurricanes on Saturday.Ryan Anderson scored 23 points to lead the Eagles (12-15, 4-10), who fell to 0-7 at Cameron Indoor Stadium.MICHIGAN 71, ILLINOIS 58 Trey Burke had 26 points and 8 assists to help No. 7 Michigan (23-4, 10-4 Big Ten) defeat visiting Illinois (20-9, 7-8).PITT 63, ST. JOHN'S 47 Tray Woodall scored a season-high 25 points, and No. 20 Pittsburgh (21-7, 9-6 Big East) beat St. John's (16-11, 8-7) at Madison Square Garden.The Red Storm's D'Angelo Harrison, the league's No. 3 scorer with 18.3 points per game, shot 1 for 12 from the field and finished with 6 points.NOTRE DAME 62, CINCINNATI 41 Jerian Grant scored 13 points to lead No. 25 Notre Dame (22-6, 10-5 Big East) past Cincinnati (19-9, 7-8) at home. The Bearcats have lost five of six.DUKE 75, MARYLAND 59 Elizabeth Williams scored 16 points, helping No. 5 Duke (26-1, 16-0) beat No. 8 Maryland (22-5, 13-3) to clinch its fourth straight A.C.C. regular-season title.The visiting Blue Devils, playing without the all-American point guard Chelsea Gray, who sustained a season-ending dislocation of her right kneecap Feb. 17, won their 10th straight game.NOTRE DAME 84, DEPAUL 56 Skylar Diggins had 17 points, 10 rebounds and 10 assists, leading No. 2 Notre Dame (25-1, 13-0 Big East) past host DePaul (18-9, 7-6) for its 20th straight victory.STANFORD 74, OREGON 50 Chiney Ogwumike had 27 points and a team-record 24 rebounds as No. 4 Stanford (26-2, 15-1 Pacific-12) beat visiting Oregon (4-24, 2-14).CAL 58, OREGON STATE 56 Layshia Clarendon scored 26 points, and No. 6 California (25-2, 15-1 Pacific-12) rallied to edge visiting Oregon State (9-19, 3-13).PENN STATE 68, MICHIGAN 57 Led by Maggie Lucas's 21 points, No. 7 Penn State (23-3, 13-1) held off Michigan (19-8, 8-6) at home to clinch at least a share of its second straight Big Ten regular-season title.L.S.U. 77, KENTUCKY 72 Jeanne Kenney had a career-high 22 points and hit all five of her 3-point attempts, leading host Louisiana State (17-10, 8-6 Southeastern Conference) to an upset of No. 8 Kentucky (23-4, 11-3).VANDERBILT 61, TEXAS A&M 51 Tiffany Clarke scored 22 of her career-high 30 points in the second half to help host Vanderbilt (18-9, 8-6 SEC) defeat No. 10 Texas A&M (21-7, 11-3).LOUISVILLE 55, VILLANOVA 49 Bria Smith scored 16 points as No. 12 Louisville (22-6, 10-4 Big East) won at Villanova (18-8, 7-6).
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — Sometimes, Carmelo Anthony is so productive, it takes Coach Mike Woodson until the next day to figure out what was the best part of Anthony's performance.Anthony finished with 29 points and 7 rebounds in 40 minutes in the Knicks' 99-93 win over Philadelphia on Sunday. He also had five turnovers and made one of six 3-point attempts. Anthony's statistical line in the box score was complicated, full of good numbers and bad numbers.The best stat, Woodson realized, was the 18 free-throw attempts, the most Anthony has had in a game this season. Woodson said he was pleased that Anthony was aggressive, but he was more thrilled that his star player forced the 76ers to foul him on his path to the basket. Anthony made 16 free throws; the 76ers shot 20 free throws."He shot more free throws than we've shot in a while in a game, and he had a lot to do with that in terms of his play," Woodson said Monday after practice. "When jump shots aren't falling, you have to find other ways to put points on the board, and one way is to take the ball to the bucket and sacrifice your body to get to the free-throw line. Then you have to have confidence to knock down the shots."In a win they desperately needed to end a four-game losing streak, the Knicks shot 35 free throws and made 27. Raymond Felton was the only player not to attempt one.The Knicks are not known as a team that pounds the ball inside. They average 21.5 free throws a game, which was 21st in the league entering Monday's games. The main reason the Knicks do not shoot many free throws is because they had shot the second-most 3-pointers in the league, behind the Houston Rockets.J. R. Smith said the slump made the team focus more on attacking the basket."I think that's the way we should start off the game, by penetrating the ball and trying to get to the free-throw line and not just settling for jumpers," Smith said. "We have to make our jumpers come from what the defense gives us rather than taking the easy way out."Besides Anthony, Amar'e Stoudemire and Tyson Chandler are the only other Knicks who attempt at least four free throws a game. Stoudemire and Chandler get to the free-throw line off pick-and-roll plays to the basket.Against the 76ers, Stoudemire used low-post moves to score 22 points. He made four of six free throws."Offensively, Stat did an unbelievable job getting to the free-throw line," Smith said. "That's exactly what we wanted him to do."Earlier this season, the Knicks complained about not getting to the free-throw line enough as the referees let games become physical. Woodson said the Knicks could not worry about which calls allowed them to shoot free throws."I want us to play physical and not back away," Woodson said. "That's what the good teams are supposed to do. If team plays us physical, that's O.K. We have to return the favor and let the officials do their job, and hopefully things work out for you."Woodson is not expecting 35 free throws every night. But he wants the Knicks to keep attacking the basket to the point they are awarded more free throws than their opponent. After all, according to the Elias Sports Bureau, the Knicks (33-20) are 18-10 when they shoot more free throws than the other team.Kenyon Martin, who signed a 10-day contract last week, might play on Wednesday against the Golden State Warriors. Mike Woodson said Monday that Martin went through offensive sets with his teammates and was learning the playbook. "We're just trying to get him up to speed, and that's still going to take some time," Woodson said. "Eventually we'll work him in." ... Woodson acknowledged that the team's training staff has advised him to play Amar'e Stoudemire no more than 30 minutes a game. Stoudemire has played 29 minutes in just one game this season. "He was very efficient last night," Woodson said. "I can't go over 30 right now as far as his physical condition. He doesn't need much more than that. Stat has been in this league a number of years, and he can get a lot of things done in 30 minutes."
ANN ARBOR, Mich. — The fun started last summer at the same moment Michigan basketball became cool again. It was the players' first week together. They were spread across the gym, lounging after a scrimmage.Glenn Robinson III had been on the losing side, and he plopped down next to Mitch McGary. They were two of five freshmen making their first impressions. Robinson had been reserved and quiet that week, careful to find his place. Now, McGary turned to him and essentially asked: why don't you show them what you got?Robinson picked up a ball and jogged toward the basket. He jumped, spun, wound his arm and slammed home a 360-degree windmill dunk.The sophomore point guard Trey Burke immediately imagined the possibilities. He and Tim Hardaway Jr., a junior, had dominated the scrimmages, but as the sides were divvied up, Burke noticed those five freshmen — Robinson, McGary, Nik Stauskas, Caris LeVert and Mike Albrecht, better known as Spike — added flair, a little extra cool. By the fall, Robinson and Stauskas were starters on the wings, McGary was the first or second player off the bench, and LeVert and Albrecht were getting time as backup guards. Together, they have helped make No. 4 Michigan (23-4) a national title contender as the N.C.A.A. tournament nears.They have come to be called the Fresh Five, a nod to the famous and infamous Fab Five, the college basketball stars turned cultural phenomenon of the early 1990s. The current freshmen joke about it in private. But when they arrived, they were not as heralded. They were not as brash. There were no black shoes, no black socks. They were not the stars of this team. Burke and Hardaway were. Then Robinson made that dunk, and Burke realized he needed them. Thereafter, whenever they were bored, Burke practiced lobbing alley-oops to Robinson, as if he were trying out a new toy. They would make eye contact, Robinson would point up, and Burke would loft the ball. Higher and farther. The crazier the dunk, the better.In scrimmages, the smooth-shooting Stauskas "just wouldn't miss," Burke said. "He knew it was going in when he was open."McGary, a 6-foot-10 forward, would grab a rebound, dribble the length of the court, finish and scream, "Let's go!" the whole way back."Sometimes, we'd be like, 'Mitch, chill,' " Burke said.LeVert, his arms seeming so long, harassed Burke on defense."Us five freshmen set a tone in those open gyms," said Robinson, whose father is a former Purdue player and N.B.A. All-Star. "From then on, we kind of had everyone's respect."Michigan entered the season ranked No. 5, its highest preseason ranking since 1993, when four members of the Fab Five were juniors. Chris Webber had left, but Juwan Howard and Jalen Rose had stayed for one more season, and their classmates Ray Jackson and Jimmy King were still Wolverines.Now, 19 years later, Rose follows this Michigan team like a fan."I want them to accomplish all of the things that we couldn't accomplish," Rose said in a phone interview. "I want them to win the Big Ten. And I want them to win a national championship."He watched Burke, Hardaway and the Fresh Five start 16-0, get to 20-1 and climb to No. 1 for the first time since the Fab Five were sophomores.Then, the Big Ten caught up with them. Michigan lost at Indiana in a thriller, at Wisconsin in overtime and at Michigan State in a blowout.All four losses have come in front of raucous road crowds. McGary's energy was drowned out. Stauskas was denied the ball. There was no room for errors, no room to think, no room for Robinson and those alley-oops. He, more than anyone, disappeared, scoring an average of 4 points in the losses.On Feb. 17, having lost three of its last four games, the team needed a flash, a flare — something.The Wolverines were playing Penn State, the Big Ten's worst team. Glen Rice and Cazzie Russell, two of the program's greats, were there for a celebration rededicating Crisler Center.The Fab Five were not. They were not mentioned. There were no banners in the rafters honoring their two trips to the national championship game. The university took them down a decade ago when Webber was found to have taken money from a booster. Wins were forfeited and the N.C.A.A. forced Michigan to dissociate from Webber for 10 years. That period will end May 8.The university declined to comment as to what might happen then. Webber, who declined an interview request, may first have to apologize. Rose offered a solution: not to raise the old banners, but to hang a new one. It could be all black, he imagined, with "Fab Five" written in white letters and their jersey numbers stitched in maize and blue."I just hope it doesn't take somebody's funeral to happen," Rose said.He watched the Penn State game from home as Burke, Hardaway, Robinson and a few others came out wearing fresh bald-fade haircuts and baggy shorts, a look reminiscent of the Fab Five.Burke started well, scoring 10 quick points, but everyone else struggled. Penn State led, 25-19, when Robinson cut from the right corner. All five defenders were staring at Burke. He dribbled right, saw Robinson, stopped, and from about six feet behind the 3-point line lofted the ball toward the basket. The defenders turned and watched Robinson catch the ball and slam it with both hands.On the next possession, McGary held the ball in the lane as Robinson cut toward the basket unnoticed. McGary dished him a no-look pass for another dunk.There it was, that cool again.Robinson finished with five highlight-show dunks, and Stauskas found his shot. Burke had 29 points and 5 assists, and Michigan won, 79-71. The crowd left happy, even if there were tougher teams and more road games to come.Afterward, Coach John Beilein said of the Fresh Five, "all five of them have to contribute" if the team wants to make a run at the national championship.At home, Rose had noticed the haircuts. He called Hardaway and Robinson, and they told him it was a tribute.
NEW ORLEANS — The Nets have been trying to rekindle some of the fire in Brook Lopez, their All-Star center, for two weeks now, as his production and dependability have inexplicably slumped.Maybe he needed to find some new motivation or take a closer look at himself in the mirror. On Tuesday, in a sense, he got both, when he lined up for the tip against the New Orleans Hornets and their center, Robin Lopez, his twin brother.What better way to get the blood boiling again?The next 48 minutes proceeded with a lot of elbow jabs, eye rolls and smirks, but Brook Lopez ultimately had the upper hand. He finished with 20 points, 7 rebounds, 5 assists and 4 blocks to help the Nets get past the Hornets, 101-97, at New Orleans Arena.It was not easy, or pretty, or particularly encouraging for the Nets, who watched their 22-point first-half lead get whittled down in the second half.But with 2 minutes 16 seconds left, and the Nets leading by 4, Brook Lopez hit a leaning jump shot that served as perhaps the biggest shot of a night that featured several clutch baskets for the Nets."A lot of people had to play well to get us a win," Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo said. "And still there wasn't a lot of margin at the end."Deron Williams finished with 33 points and 8 assists, including 11 points in the fourth. It was a valiant performance in the absence of Joe Johnson, who is normally the Nets' go-to guy in crunch time. But Johnson missed his third straight game with a heel injury, so Williams filled the void."It felt good to get going, especially down the stretch, and be able to close out a game," Williams said. "That's something I've kind of struggled with this year."Lopez also keyed the Nets down the stretch, which is noteworthy, considering he had been replaced in the fourth quarter of the last three close games by Andray Blatche, the Nets' backup center. On Tuesday, after sitting for the first seven minutes of the quarter, Lopez scored 6 points, including two key free throws and the runner that pushed the Nets' lead to 6.It came after he had just missed a layup. But Keith Bogans got the offensive rebound, swung the ball out to Williams, who got it back to Lopez at the top of the paint. Lopez drove and delivered."It was big," Lopez said. "D-Will just made the right call. He called the play, we executed it right."Bogans said of his rebound: "I just kind of snuck in there, and the ball was right in my face."For most of the game, Lopez seemed focused on one-upping his brother.It was not the first time the two have gone head-to-head, but both have significantly developed their games since they were first-round picks out of Stanford in 2008. Brook Lopez was named to his first All-Star game this season, while Robin Lopez has started every game for the Hornets."He's always very physical and it's enjoyable," Brook Lopez said. "I don't know how many other people get to experience something like this in the world. It's always a good time."The Nets had no difficulty offensively early. They built a 22-point lead in the first half while shooting 62.5 percent from the field and 6 of 8 from 3-point range. But they came out of halftime sluggish, and the Hornets, hustling after loose balls and attacking the rim, trimmed the lead to 73-65 heading into the fourth quarter.New Orleans continued to dial up the defensive intensity, cutting the lead to 4 with five minutes left, but they could not get past the hump. Bogans hit three 3-pointers from the corner in the fourth, helping the Nets preserve their margin, before Williams and Lopez gave the Nets just enough in the final minutes to seal the win.The Hornets committed only eight turnovers, outscored the Nets, 44-30, in the paint, and shot 52.3 percent in the second half, giving the Nets, without their most clutch player, a legitimate scare."They just wouldn't go away," Williams said. "They just kept hitting shot after shot."
CORAL GABLES, Fla. — Jim Larranaga always has a plan. He plans by the day, week, month and year. If anyone wonders how he stays so organized, Larranaga walks behind his desk here at BankUnited Center and opens two large cabinets, which house more than two decades' worth of Franklin Covey daily planners: thick, three-ring monstrosities the size of dictionaries.Larranaga, the men's basketball coach at Miami, keeps track of everything in those binders. His goals. His team's statistics. His thoughts and observations. He also jots down what he expects to happen, and that includes the Hurricanes' remarkable rise this season. Larranaga was so confident in his team that he showed up at a board of trustees meeting last October and delivered a message."I told them this could be the best year in school history," he said this week.It was a low bar. Long known for the success — and various suspected extracurriculars — of its football program, Miami has an unexceptional basketball past, with six trips to the N.C.A.A. tournament and a lone appearance in the Round of 16 back in 2000. Yet in just his second season, Larranaga, 63, has built the team into an improbable contender, much as he did at George Mason, which he coached to the Final Four in 2006.The Hurricanes (22-4, 13-1 Atlantic Coast Conference) are ranked No. 5 entering Wednesday's game against Virginia Tech, and their home games regularly sell out. Fans stormed the court Jan. 23 after a 27-point victory over Duke, then ranked No. 1. The Heat stars LeBron James and Dwyane Wade have made courtside cameos. And students, who line up for tickets on a patch of real estate known as Larranaga's Lawn, wear T-shirts that feature Larranaga's face on the front along with the slogan "40 Minutes of L" — a play on the slightly more profane catchphrase of the high-octane teams at Arkansas in the 1990s."I thought it was hilarious," the assistant Michael Huger said, adding: "People think because of Coach's age, he can't do this, he can't do that. Can't? That's not even in his vocabulary. He's healthy, he moves well, he communicates well, and his mind is sharp as a tack."Miami had won 14 straight games before last Saturday's loss at Wake Forest, a breakdown that was still fresh on Larranaga's mind this week. On Monday, he kept a box score in his pocket and cited what his team did wrong: "Everything." Larranaga wants Miami to limit opponents to 40 percent shooting over all and 30 percent from beyond the 3-point line. Wake Forest shot 54.2 percent over all, 58.3 percent from long range.In coping this week, Larranaga said he was relying on one of his favorite books, "The 7 Habits of Highly Effective People," by Stephen R. Covey. Citing the need for rest — part of Habit No. 7 — Larranaga did not have his players practice on Sunday and barred them from speaking with reporters until after Wednesday's game. "The thing we can't afford to do is allow our priorities to change," Larranaga said.There are times when Larranaga, who grew up in the Bronx, would seem right at home at a TED conference, exchanging innovative management ideas. Part coach and part management guru, he has always been fascinated by numbers and strategy, dating to his college days at Providence, where he started as a math major before switching to economics. (Economics, he said, was more practical.) As a basketball coach, he believes in the data-crunching wizardry of Ken Pomeroy, whose semi-eponymous basketball statistics Web site, KenPom.com, has been an invaluable resource for Larranaga for years.Of particular interest are his team's offensive and defensive efficiency ratings, which are based on points per possession. According to Pomeroy, the Hurricanes rank 6th in defensive efficiency and 39th in offensive efficiency. Defense, Larranaga said, is the foundation. Scoring points? "That keeps your players happy," he said.On defense, he wants to limit his opponents to 12 points per position. In other words, if the starting point guard scores 9 points and his backup hits a 3-pointer, the limit has been reached. That also means opponents should average no more than 60 points a game. This season, opponents are averaging 59.2 points and 38.4 percent shooting. Larranaga's players get a dose of his man-to-man principles every day."Sometimes, it's reiterating things over and over," said the assistant Chris Caputo, who worked for Larranaga at George Mason. "You need to get the message across, and I think we've given a very, very honest defensive effort the whole season — other than the Wake Forest game."
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — When Rasheed Wallace came out of retirement, he was everything the Knicks expected: a 6-foot-11 savvy defender who provided veteran leadership and helped spread the floor with long 3-pointers. As the season progressed, though, Wallace showed why it was risky to sign a 38-year-old player who had been out of the league for two years.A nagging left foot injury never healed, and on Wednesday the Knicks announced that Wallace, one of the oldest Knicks on a team filled with veterans, would have season-ending surgery later in the week.A new X-ray examination found that Wallace had a fractured fifth metatarsal. He is expected to be out for eight weeks, the rest of the regular season. Although Wallace could return in the playoffs, it is unlikely he will play again after such a long layoff.Wallace sustained what was originally called a stress fracture in a win over the Los Angeles Lakers on Dec. 13, and he has not played since.The Knicks won 11 games in November, and Wallace played in 14 of their 15 games that month. After his last game, the Knicks were 17-5 and in first place in the Eastern Conference. Wallace averaged 7.2 points and 4.2 rebounds in 20 games."It's somewhat of a blow because he's gone through so much work to try to get back out on the floor, and now this happens," Coach Mike Woodson said. "The only thing we can do now is think positive in terms of how the surgery is going to turn out."JACKSON'S RETURN TO GARDEN Mark Jackson, the coach of the Golden State Warriors, said he did not think a lot about his first game as an N.B.A. coach at Madison Square Garden.But when Jackson entered the Garden before the Warriors' game against the Knicks, he said he was reminded of how special the arena was and how significant this moment was. Jackson was born in Brooklyn and raised in Queens. He played at Bishop Loughlin Memorial High in Brooklyn and went on to have a stellar career at St. John's. Jackson was the Knicks' point guard for seven seasons — and was the rookie of the year in 1988 — while averaging 11.1 points a game in New York."I really didn't know how it was going to hit me," Jackson said before the game. "That being said, this is something that I've dreamed about, so it's special."Jackson was met by plenty of familiar faces at the Garden. He was able to talk to his former teammates Allan Houston and John Starks. He hugged a number of people on the Knicks' staff and was greeted with smiles from workers who have spent decades at the Garden.Jackson wanted to be the Knicks' coach in 2008, but he was passed over by the Garden's chairman, James L. Dolan. The Knicks instead hired Mike D'Antoni.At the time, Jackson was not disappointed. He remained confident that he would get his opportunity for his first head coaching job in the league."It was never a side of me that was shaking my head because a lot of times God knows what's better for you than what you know," Jackson said. "I truly am thankful an organization and a front office was willing to take a chance on me."Jackson, named the Warriors' coach last season, has led them to a 33-25 record this season.
After every Princeton game, the senior forward Ian Hummer can count on a conversation with his father, Ed."My dad calls me, and we can talk for an hour or two hours on basketball-related stuff," Ian Hummer said. "Even though sometimes I want to rush him off the phone, other times I sit and listen, and we'll chat for an hour or two, and time will fly by without me even noticing."Ed Hummer characterizes his son as "relentlessly self-improving." To that end, Ian embraces his father's postgame critiques."You're not going to go anywhere when everyone is praising you," Ian said. "You need someone to bring you back down to earth and tell you what you did wrong to really improve on your game."There are few holes in Hummer's game right now. He leads the Tigers in scoring (16.1 points per game), rebounding (6.3), assists (4.3) and blocks (0.9)."He dominates in everything that we do, not just what you see in the games," Princeton Coach Mitch Henderson said. "It's such an advantage to point to your best player and you can say, Just play like him."Ed Hummer offers his son a special perspective. He was a sophomore forward on the 1965 Princeton team that Bill Bradley led to the national semifinals. He was a second-team all-Ivy League selection as a junior and finished his career as one of Princeton's leading rebounders.Ian long ago passed his father in the record books and is on the verge of securing a lofty spot in the program's history. If he scores 10 points in Friday's game against Harvard, he will move into second place on Princeton's career scoring list behind Bradley.But Hummer is more consumed with team goals at the moment. Harvard (17-7, 9-1) will arrive at Jadwin Gym leading Princeton (14-9, 7-2) in the race for the Ivy League championship."If I had to draw up my perfect last senior weekend at home," Hummer said, "I would draw it up the way it's going to be played out."There was little doubt where Hummer would spend his college career. In addition to his father, his older brother, Alex, and his uncle John graduated from Princeton. John Hummer played for the Tigers from 1968 to 1970 and was a two-time first-team all-Ivy selection before starting a six-year N.B.A. career.As a child, Ian and his father traveled from their home in Vienna, Va., to Princeton for reunions and games. Ian always loved the campus, although he was not initially a big fan of the basketball team."My brother and I really didn't care about the game," he said. "We were more focused on playing around on the side court."As Ian developed into a star at Gonzaga College High School in Washington, D.C., he was recruited by a number of programs from major conferences, including Northwestern, California, Stanford and Virginia. Ed Hummer did not want his son to feel obligated to attend Princeton and encouraged him to explore his options."I had suggested a couple other trips that he might want to take, but he kept making excuses," Ed Hummer said. "It dawned on me over time that he was really waiting to hear from Princeton."Ian Hummer has managed to continue his family legacy while carving out a niche as a player different from his father. Ed Hummer was 6 feet 7 inches and 182 pounds when he graduated from high school, and he described himself as a finesse player."I was always worried about getting the flu and losing 10 pounds," Ed Hummer said.Ian Hummer is built much more solidly at 6-7 and 225 pounds."He really gets his strength, that musculature, from my late wife's side of the gene pool," Ed Hummer said.Judy Hummer never saw her son at Princeton. She died in May 2006 at 59, after an 11-year battle with breast cancer."It wasn't one of those things that was just out of nowhere," Ian said. "It was sad that we saw it coming, but we kind of prepared ourselves for the worst and the worst happened."Basketball provided an outlet for the family. Hummer's high school career began to take off around that time, and Ed was a fixture at his son's games, offering support and advice."We really bonded over basketball a little more than we had in the past," Ian said. "As the level of basketball increased, I needed his help a lot more than I usually did."Ian has heard countless stories from his father about playing with Bradley and from his uncle about playing for the renowned coach Pete Carril. Ian hopes to play professionally to "hold off real life as long as possible," but when his career is over, he looks forward to sharing his own experiences."I'll have a lot of stories when it's all said and done, and I'll be able to compare personal accolades, team accolades," he said. "It's just so awesome that I can relate so much with my uncle and dad and Princeton basketball."
Photographs of Dennis Rodman laughing while watching a basketball exhibition in Pyongyang, North Korea, with Kim Jong-un , the leader of one of the world's most repressive countries, may be some of the strangest sights in the history of accidental American diplomacy.Not only did Kim attend the game Thursday and watch alongside Rodman, but he also invited Rodman, three Harlem Globetrotters and the Vice Media crew filming the trip for a documentary to his palace for a party, said Shane Smith, the founder of Vice Media, who dreamed up and organized the trip.The group landed in Pyongyang on Tuesday with approval from North Korean authorities to conduct the exhibitions and film the documentary, but it was not promised that Kim would meet with the group."Apparently, he had a blast at the game," Smith said, after speaking by phone with Ryan Duffy, a Vice Media correspondent who was on the trip. "So he invited them back to his home for a party, and they had a grand old time. Speeches were made — Dennis made a very nice one — and they were met with rounds of applause."The scene was particularly bizarre because of the tense relations between the United States and North Korea, which made that relationship more difficult recently by declaring it had conducted a nuclear test. Google's executive chairman, Eric Schmidt, went in January to try to persuade the leadership to allow Internet access for more than a fraction of its people, but he did not report meeting with Kim.Basketball, though, apparently has the power to thaw most anything because Kim, like his father, Kim Jong-il, is said to be a devoted fan. Rodman and Kim Jong-un talked without a translator assisting them courtside. Duffy said that the two spoke in English but that Kim spoke only limited English and that a translator was used at the dinner.Smith said communication with his crew had been difficult, but he spoke with Duffy by phone for a bit and via Skype. He said his crew was allowed to film the party, as well as Kim's appearance at the exhibition game. The video will be used on the HBO series "Vice," which will make its debut on April 5.The exhibition game featured 12 North Korean players on mixed teams with the American contingent, led by the three Globetrotters: Anthony Blakes, Alex Weekes and Will Bullard. Duffy also played.Rodman spent the game watching from a courtside table with Kim. Rodman also gave a speech to the crowd, in which he told Kim, "You have a friend for life."The game was said to end in a 110-110 tie.Kim expressed to Rodman that he hoped this would improve North Korean-American relations, Smith said Duffy told him. Duffy said he invited Kim to the United States."We just couldn't have asked for anything more," Smith said. "It was a long shot, no pun intended. We knew he loves the Chicago Bulls and he was a huge basketball fan, and we hoped he would want to meet a five-time N.B.A. champion" and a Chicago Bull."But we had no guarantees," he said.
David Hixon, the coach of second-ranked Amherst, had mixed emotions when he saw the draw for the Division III men's basketball tournament, which begins Saturday.His team drew one of two first-round byes, meaning the Lord Jeffs will have a gap of nearly two weeks between their final regular-season game and their tournament opener. That is good, Hixon said, because several players are injured and could benefit from the extra time off.But there is another long hiatus that has Hixon — and virtually every other Division III coach — concerned: the 15 days between the semifinal games and the national championship game. It is an unprecedented gap, a one-year-only schedule change the N.C.A.A. pushed through, against the wishes of many Division III coaches, to have the men's championships for all three divisions played in Atlanta over the Final Four weekend in April to commemorate the 75th anniversary of the organization.The new playoff schedule means there will be a 41-day period between when the bracket was announced on Monday and the April 7 title game. The usual Division III tournament runs 19 days, with the semifinals and final played at the Salem Civic Center in Virginia.Many coaches in Division III had wanted to push the start of the tournament back a week and maintain the usual four-team pod format in which three games are played over two or three days. Instead, teams will play once a week until the Round of 8 and Final Four games are held in Salem, concluding March 23. The final two teams will then have more than two weeks to prepare for the title game."The first three weeks, they play one game a week?" he said. "D-3 teams aren't built for that. It's not the world we live in."He added: "It's not the Super Bowl. These are not scholarship athletes. The N.C.A.A. always likes to say 'students first,' but rarely are their decisions for the students. This one isn't."Asked for comment, the N.C.A.A. e-mailed an article posted on its Web site when the format change was announced last July."It was a case of there not being a perfect solution that addressed the extended timeline for this one tournament," Jeff Martinez, the chairman of the Division III management committee and the athletic director of the University of Redlands, said in the article. "But when we balanced all of the factors involved, we believe we settled on the right outcome that protects the tournament experience and keeps to a minimum the issues schools might face because of a new format." Since the format has changed, Hixon said, the N.C.A.A. could have allowed 64 teams into the tournament instead of the usual 62, which would have meant each team would start play this weekend. Instead, unranked Mary Hardin-Baylor of Belton, Tex., received a bye, primarily for reasons of geography, along with Amherst, while top-ranked St. Thomas will play this weekend."We've never had two weeks off during the season before, so it will be interesting to see how we handle that," Mary Hardin-Baylor Coach Ken DeWeese said.Amherst, whose last game was last Sunday, won't play again until March 9."We're banged up and we're not ready, so for us it's break," Hixon said. "Hopefully, we'll learn how to handle this break and hopefully we'll get a chance to handle another one in April."The change also ends Salem's 17-year run as the Final Four host. Since 1996, Salem has been the destination for Division III teams, and a bond developed between the city and the players, coaches and fans who made the trip to the Roanoke Valley each March."As a player, Salem is great, it's a wonderful place," said the former Williams College point guard Michael Crotty, whose team won the title in 2003 and was runner-up in 2004. "The arena is a perfect fit. The locals get juiced up. The fan bases travel. It fits the Division III landscape and type of environment perfectly."This year, instead of hosting four teams and three games, the city will host eight teams and six games. The championship game is scheduled in Atlanta for the Sunday between the semifinals and final of the men's Division I tournament, the same day as the women's Division I semifinals. The Division II championship game will also be held that day. The Division II tournament does not begin until March 8, so there will only be a week between the semifinals and the final.While many Division III coaches are not happy with the new tournament schedule, most have grudgingly accepted that there is nothing to be done. Williams Coach Mike Maker, who likes the change, noted that his university's spring break is scheduled during the 15-day waiting period, but added, "it would be a good problem to have." He also said he was worried that "Division II and III will get lost in the Division I hype."Coach Larry Anderson of Massachusetts Institute of Technology, which received an at-large bid this season and was a Final Four team in 2012, said: "I feel it will still feel like a championship experience, that we will not be playing second or third fiddle to anyone. D-3 doesn't mean third class, at least from where we sit."Amherst has won 19 games in a row and is looking for its second national title; it won in 2007. Hixon is already wondering what he might do if he is presented with a 15-day layoff. Will he emphasize conditioning? Or will he focus on keeping his players motivated during vacation, even as the New England weather improves?He admitted he had no clue. He also said that it was a problem he would love to have.
Deron Williams opened and closed Friday's game against Dallas playing like a motivated superstar, one the Mavericks openly coveted and the Nets paid handsomely to keep this past off-season.But as the final seconds ticked away in the Nets' 98-90 loss at Barclays Center, the Mavericks' owner, Mark Cuban, was at least momentarily vindicated in his assertion that Dallas was better off without Williams.The Nets (34-25) have a better record and appear well positioned for a postseason appearance, a shaky possibility at best for the Mavericks (26-32). But on Friday, Dallas took advantage of a lackluster third-quarter performance to humble the Nets, who have lost three of their last four games."We were playing like we were running in sand," Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo said of the team's start to the second half.The Nets made a furious fourth-quarter rally to get within striking distance in the final minutes. But the deficit, which was 20 with 10 minutes left, was too much to overcome.At halftime the Nets led, 49-48, and had nearly as many assists (12) as missed field goals (16). They were shooting 53.8 percent, and Williams had 17 points.But all that disintegrated in another abysmal third quarter, a recurring theme for the Nets this season. Careless with the basketball — they committed 20 turnovers — the Nets did not get the boost they were looking for from the return of Joe Johnson, who missed the previous three games with a left heel injury.Johnson looked rusty and not quite in playing shape, missing his first three shots before finally hitting a jumper three minutes into the second quarter. He never caught fire, though, and finished with 11 points in 29 minutes."We were making passes just throwing them straight to the defense," Johnson said. "That's unacceptable."The turnovers were costly — Dallas scored 17 points off them — but the Nets' inexplicable defensive lapses in the third quarter, which Carlesimo blamed on effort, hurt worse. The Nets have been outscored by 10 or more points in the third quarter 13 times this season, according to ESPN Stats and Info."We drifted back to what's been a problem throughout," Carlesimo said. "When we don't score, particularly when we turn it over, we don't play with the same kind of energy."The Mavericks outscored the Nets, 29-14, in the third. In particular, the Nets had no defensive solution for Dirk Nowitzki, who made an array of leaners, floaters and fallaways. He scored 20 points while going 8 of 14 from the field.Midway through the fourth, Brooklyn began chipping away. C. J. Watson scored 11 points in the quarter, and Williams got his game going again.He had plenty of motivation facing his hometown team, which he considered signing with in the off-season. In the fall, discussing why he eventually agreed to a $98 million deal to stay with the Nets, Williams indicated he was perturbed that Cuban did not show up for his recruitment meeting because he was shooting an episode of the reality television show "Shark Tank.""A lot of the questions that me and my agent had for them really didn't get answered that day," Williams said in October. "I think if he was there, he would have been able to answer those questions a little better."In a radio interview later, Cuban said the Mavericks — who signed Elton Brand, Darren Collison, O. J. Mayo and Chris Kaman — were "in a better position now than we would have been if we'd gotten" Williams.This week, Williams would not entertain questions regarding the exchange, only to say he was pleased with the way things turned out. "I wouldn't change the decision now, and I didn't really think about it then," he said. "I'm happy being a Brooklyn Net."But Williams could not save Friday's game. With 22 seconds left and the Nets trailing by 5, it was Watson who attempted — and missed — the team's final two shots. The Mavericks hit enough free throws at the end to win without Williams on their side."We've lost three straight at home," Williams said after the game. "That's what I'm most concerned with."The Nets reassigned Tornike Shengelia to the Springfield Armor for his third stint in the N.B.A. development league.
When the Tennessee men's basketball team arrived in Atlanta for the Southeastern Conference tournament in 2011, its season was spiraling out of control. The Volunteers had limped to an 8-8 record in league play, and the N.C.A.A.'s Committee on Infractions had recently released a 26-page notice of allegations regarding the basketball program.It seemed a near certainty that Bruce Pearl's six-year tenure as coach was coming to an end, and one of his assistants, Steve Forbes, was worried about his own future.So before the SEC tournament, Forbes spent an hour in the lobby of a Marriott Marquis listening to a representative from Northwest Florida State extol the positives of the head coaching position at the junior college. It was a familiar place to Forbes, a formidable recruiter, who had scouted players from the program."I thought it was a really good job," Forbes said recently, "and I was interested."He soon had very little choice. Pearl, Forbes and the rest of the coaching staff were fired after Tennessee lost its opening game in the N.C.A.A. tournament to Michigan by 30 points. Normally, a coach like Forbes would find a spot on another staff with very little trouble — "Everybody likes Steve Forbes," said Marquette Coach Buzz Williams, who coached with him at Texas A&M — but the N.C.A.A. said he had failed to fully cooperate with its investigation at Tennessee and, in August 2011, it handed down a one-year show-cause penalty stipulating that he would be barred from recruiting if he were hired by an N.C.A.A. program during that period.Northwest Florida State is governed by the N.J.C.A.A., the organization that oversees junior college athletics, and was not subject to the show-cause penalty. The college hired Forbes over roughly 70 other candidates. In two seasons under Forbes, the team has gone 57-4, reaching its first N.J.C.A.A. title game in 17 seasons last year and attracting the type of talent — like Chris Jones, a guard called the top junior college player of the past decade by the ESPN recruiting analyst Dave Telep — that has brought nearly 100 Division I coaches to the campus on the western border of the Florida Panhandle in Niceville. At 25-2 this season, the Raiders are ranked No. 3 as the national postseason junior college tournament nears."Steve is a really good fit for juco because, he'd be the first to tell you, he's got a little nick on him, which makes him a kindred spirit with juco players," Telep said.Northwest Florida State, which used to be known as Okaloosa-Walton Community College, was impressed by Forbes's track record in recruiting, and by his vast network in the college basketball world. At each of Forbes's professional stops — assistant coaching jobs at Idaho, Louisiana Tech, Illinois State, Texas A&M and Tennessee, as well as junior college head coaching jobs in Iowa and Kansas in his 20s — he continually added to a renowned Rolodex. His trove of contacts, which he used to store in a Franklin planner, is now backed up online and consists of the numbers for coaches at the A.A.U., junior college and Division I levels, as well as those for family members of players he has recruited."He would be a D-I head coach right now if it wasn't for the firing and the fallout," said Louisiana-Monroe Coach Keith Richard, who hired Forbes as an assistant on his staff at Louisiana Tech in 2000.Richard called Forbes when he realized Louisiana Tech would need a recruiting boost to prepare for its move from the Sun Belt to the Western Athletic Conference in 2001. Forbes helped the Bulldogs land consecutive talented classes, one of which included the future N.B.A. player Paul Millsap."Steve is one of the few coaches who has a network of friends and acquaintances that stretches all over country, and that has now provided him with a base to land top-100 talent in Florida," Richard said. Forbes and Pearl met in the late 1980s, when Forbes was at Southwestern Community College in Iowa and Pearl was an assistant at Iowa. Forbes joined Pearl's staff at Tennessee in 2006, and was instrumental in the recruitment of Bobby Maze and Josh Selby, who later reopened his recruitment and went to Kansas.
CHICAGO — There was intensity and passion on the court right from the start of the Nets ' matchup with the Chicago Bulls on Saturday — although it was not exactly coming from the Nets' side.Eighty-five seconds after the opening tip, Chicago's Joakim Noah picked up a technical foul for arguing with the referees after a foul call, and it seemed like something of a fitting appetizer for the remaining 46 minutes.The Bulls pulsed with life in front of 22,414 fans at a packed United Center, while the Nets fizzled out and lost, 96-85.There may have been some tired legs after playing at home — and losing to Dallas — the night before. But the Nets are on the verge of a prolonged trip that will test their mettle for the postseason, and Saturday's performance was conspicuously devoid of the element also mostly missing from Friday's loss: energy.It is a topic Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo and players have continually addressed, knowing the team's inconsistent outputs have cost them winnable games."We shoot ourselves in the foot," guard Joe Johnson said. "We can talk about it until we're blue in the face, but it won't do anything about it."The Nets clearly did not rectify the issue overnight. After a hot start against the Bulls — the Nets hit six of their first eight field-goal attempts to grab an early 15-4 lead — they fell apart in the second quarter. The offense collapsed into dysfunction. Chicago used a 15-0 run to end the half ahead by 53-39.Brook Lopez and Deron Williams combined for 22 points in the first quarter, then faded in the second. As a team, the Nets were outscored, 26-12, and committed seven turnovers in the period."The ball was just sticking," Williams said. "There was no movement, no flow of the game, no rhythm. It's hard to get going. A lot of it is their defense, and a lot of it is us."The Bulls' scoring stretch extended into the third quarter: 19-0, 24-4, then 31-14. The Nets had few answers for the speedy guards Nate Robinson and Kirk Hinrich, or Noah, who scored 21 points with 10 rebounds, 5 assists and 4 blocked shots."Until we can play consistently over more than a three- or four-game stretch, this is what we're going to be," Carlesimo said. "We've definitely got to tighten up, we've got to play better, and we've got to do it soon."After the game, Carlesimo hinted at making changes to the Nets' rotations, including the possibility of stacking Lopez with the backup center Andray Blatche in the same lineup. It has not been used often, but Carlesimo indicated changes might be necessary to serve as a catalyst."We've got to look at a lot of things," Carlesimo said.The possibility of rotation changes was greeted with eagerness from Williams, who said he had felt the Nets' tempo dissipate too often after strong first quarters."Once we sub, it's like we start all over again," Williams said. "It's not the bench fault or one guy's fault — we don't just click right away. We've got to get going again, and that can't happen."On Saturday, the Nets were upstaged as Noah brought his size and athleticism — with a double espresso shot. With his usual blend of scoring and defending, energizing and instigating, he had 21 points, 10 rebounds, 5 assists, 4 blocks and 2 steals."He's so big for them, brings so much energy and does so many different things," Lopez said. "He scores the ball, passes the ball, rebounds the ball, blocks shots. He does everything for them."The Nets committed 21 turnovers, marking the second straight game they have crossed the 20-turnover threshold. The Bulls, with the third-best defense in the N.B.A., scored 24 points off the Nets' miscues.Johnson, in his second game back after missing the previous three with a left heel injury, attempted only four field goals in the first half and finished with 11 points, shooting 5 of 10.Lopez scored 22 points but attempted only six field goals after the first quarter. He disappeared from the Nets' offense. Then the Nets' offense just disappeared."I've said we need to find consistency if we want to be the best we can be," Lopez said. "I don't know if it's a matter of focus or intensity. But we really need to put it together for four quarters."Saturday's game was the first of a stretch in which the Nets play 12 of their next 15 games on the road. That includes a 7-game, 13-day West Coast trip at the end of March.
When Syracuse was overwhelming teams during its nonconference schedule, the Orange thought they could beat anybody. That feeling has not changed despite a sudden slump that has Syracuse reeling with two games left in the regular season.The latest setback came against No. 10 Louisville, which rallied in the final minute for a 58-53 victory at the Carrier Dome.It was the third straight loss for No. 12 Syracuse (22-7, 10-6 Big East), which was humbled by No. 7 Georgetown a week ago, snapping the Orange's 38-game home winning streak, and then was beaten again at No. 22 Marquette."I think Coach believes in us, even though we've lost three in a row," Syracuse guard Michael Carter-Williams said.In four of its past nine games, Syracuse (22-7, 10-6 Big East) has failed to reach 60 points.Louisville (24-5, 12-4) moved into a tie for second in the Big East with Marquette, which beat Notre Dame on Saturday. Both are a game behind Georgetown.GEORGETOWN 64, RUTGERS 51 Taking over the game after Georgetown trailed early in the second half, Otto Porter Jr. finished with 28 points and 8 rebounds, leading the No. 7 Hoyas (23-4, 13-3) to their 11th consecutive victory. Porter made only six field goals but went 15 of 18 at the foul line.CINCINNATI 61, UCONN 56 Sean Kilpatrick scored 20 points and made two late free throws as host Cincinnati (20-9, 8-8 Big East) ended a three-game losing streak by forcing two turnovers in the final 20 seconds. Ryan Boatright led Connecticut (19-9, 9-7) with 22 points, but the Huskies clearly missed guard Shabazz Napier, who did not play after aggravating a nagging foot injury.PRINCETON LEADS IVY LEAGUE Will Barrett scored a career-high 24 points, including five 3-pointers in the second half, as Princeton defeated visiting Dartmouth, 68-63, to take over the Ivy League lead. The Tigers (16-9, 9-2) had tightened the race for the league's N.C.A.A. tournament berth with a victory Friday over Harvard, whose 75-72 loss to Penn on Saturday night dropped the Crimson to 9-3 in the league.The Tigers, however, will go on the road for their final three league game, and Harvard will play its last two at home. If they finish tied, they will meet in a playoff for the second time in three years.IN OTHER GAMES Niagara (18-12, 13-5) beat St. Peter's, 78-61, to clinch the Metro Atlantic Athletic Conference regular-season title. ... Five players scored in double figures as last-place Old Dominion (5-25, 3-15) bade farewell to the Colonial Athletic Association by knocking off the regular-season champion, Northeastern, 81-74.
DURHAM, N.C. — Duke Coach Mike Krzyzewski did not have to worry about fans storming the court when the Blue Devils faced Miami on Saturday night in an Atlantic Coast Conference showdown. The game was at Cameron Indoor Stadium and the Crazies were not likely to do anything crazy to the Blue Devils or Krzyzewski, who was livid after Virginia fans stormed the court following a game in Charlottesville on Thursday.The greater concern was whether Miami would storm the Blue Devils once again, as they did in a blowout victory Jan. 23 when Duke was ranked No. 1.Not this time. Not with Ryan Kelly back in the lineup.Kelly, who missed the previous 13 games with a right foot injury, including that blowout loss at Miami, had a career-high 36 points in his return. He carried No. 3 Duke to a 79-76 win over the No. 5 Hurricanes in a matchup that had the feeling of a March tournament. Kelly scored 20 points in the first half, hit a crucial 3-pointer with 9 minutes 13 seconds left — turning a 56-55 deficit into a 58-56 lead that Duke never gave up — and helped seal the win with free throws in the final minutes.Quinn Cook nailed a 3-pointer with 1:55 to go to give Duke (25-4, 12-4 A.C.C.) what seemed like a comfortable 75-65 lead. But Miami (23-5, 14-2) made one final surge, closed to within 3 in the final seconds and nearly tied it on a Rion Brown 3-point attempt that just missed at the buzzer. Shane Larkin had 25 points for Miami, with Kenny Kadji contributing 17 points and 10 rebounds."Wow, what a game," Krzyzewski said. "Both teams were spectacular and then we were all privileged to see one of the performances of the ages, I think, by Ryan Kelly."One for the ages. Probably as good of a performance as any Duke player has had in Cameron, especially based on the fact that he hasn't played for two months."For those who might have forgotten the start of the season, Duke was undefeated and No. 1 in the country in early January with Kelly, a 6-foot-11 senior forward, in the lineup and averaging 13.4 points and 5.4 rebounds. Included in the Blue Devils' 15-0 start were victories against top-five-ranked teams Kentucky, Louisville and Ohio State.But after Kelly went down with a foot injury Jan. 8 against Clemson, Duke lost not only its undefeated record, but the No. 1 ranking as well. The Blue Devils went 9-4 without Kelly, with fans storming the court four times against them after upset losses at North Carolina State, Miami, Maryland and Virginia."I've been saying for two months, for the last 13 games, we've been missing one of the best players in the country and tonight he showed that," Krzyzewski said.Kelly was told Friday night that he would start. He did not know how much he would play, or how much he would be able to play.All he knew was he had to get back before his senior season was done."When something so special to you is taken away, you want it even more," Kelly said. "I wanted it more."You only get one opportunity to do this and I just wanted to take advantage of it."It showed Saturday night. Kelly scored 7 of Duke's first 9 points and kept the Blue Devils in the game in the first half when the leading scorers Seth Curry and Mason Plumlee were struggling offensively. Kelly was 7 of 10 from the field in the first half as Miami took a 36-34 lead."Especially in the first half, without Ryan Kelly it would've been a different game," the Duke freshman Rasheed Sulaimon said. "We've practiced with him once or twice. He's not even in shape yet. That kid is unbelievable."He did not wear down in the second half, either. Kelly was 10 of 14 from the floor for the game, including 7 of 9 from 3-point range, and added seven rebounds and two steals in 32 minutes."Well, I thought we prepared for Ryan Kelly," Miami Coach Jim Larranaga said, "but obviously not for that Ryan Kelly. Thirty-six points on 14 attempts. That's quite frankly ridiculous."Duke's victory will not change the new hierarchy in the A.C.C. Miami is still atop the conference and will have the No. 1 seed in the conference tournament despite losing two of its last three games.But Kelly's return puts Duke squarely in the national championship conversation again."We were actually bailing water, making sure the ship stayed afloat and we bailed enough to stay with a really good ranking," Krzyzewski said. "This win is a huge win for us and the thing it does for us, it gives us a chance in the next few weeks to transition into the N.C.A.A. tournament."We're just running a little bit different race than anybody else. Right now, it doesn't mean everything's O.K. But it's a lot better. It's a lot better."
Is anyone having more fun these days than LeBron James? As he demolishes his opposition nightly, the N.B.A.'s resident megastar has bearhugged a fan who drained a halfcourt shot, elevated the pregame dunk line into an art form and joined his Miami Heat teammates in putting together their own version of a Harlem Shake video. (James is the shirtless one wearing the crown.)There is a joie de vivre to James's dominance this season, which stands in stark contrast to the scowl he wore the last few years when he was the world's favorite N.B.A. player to hate.Now, he laughs. He smiles. He dances. He wins.All this sunniness can feel a bit disorienting. We're more familiar with tortured souls who would sacrifice limbs or loved ones if they thought it would help them win.Michael Jordan breathed fire on the court. Roger Clemens threw baseballs and the occasional broken bat at hitters. Ty Cobb slid spikes first. John McEnroe, Lance Armstrong, the 1974 Philadelphia Flyers — pick your favorite victorious villain.Indeed, conventional wisdom is that to succeed at the highest level, you have to be boiling over with the rage of Achilles, bursting with a maniacal drive to win. Happy people are too soft to cut it.Bob Knight, the patron saint of surliness, recently finished his manifesto on the issue. Its title: "The Power of Negative Thinking." Bill Parcells, the cloudiest of souls, once said that football was not a game for well-adjusted people.But cussedness is not the only way. Usain Bolt, the sprinting champion from Jamaica, made winning at the London Olympics look like more fun than a holiday parade.Perhaps he and James have offered the world a new archetype: the happy athlete."You can tell that he's just so much lighter this season," Dr. Todd Kays, a sports psychologist, said of James. Kays is based in Ohio, where psychological analysis of James is something of a statewide hobby."I think the past couple years, he had all that mental weight on him — from leaving Cleveland, to working on his own maturity," Kays said. "I think now he's finally free. He's just playing."Not all athletes make that transition, even after they establish themselves as the greatest in their fields. Jordan, for example, barked at opponents and teammates until the day he retired, and he hasn't really stopped, unable to unburden himself of whatever it was that fueled him."He might be one of the most competitive people to ever walk the earth," said Chris Wallace, the general manager of the Memphis Grizzlies.No one suggests that James is less driven than Jordan, or that he loves the game more. Enjoyment manifests itself in different ways.But athletes like James and Bolt have turned their passion into unusually public displays of joy. Maybe it's that they are simply so much better than everyone else that winning feels less like work than play."The only time I've ever seen LeBron unhappy is that first year in Miami," said Keith Dambrot, who coached James in high school. "He's never been a guy who's wanted to be the villain. He's always been the guy who's tried to please people."The New York Times posed the question to reporters who have studied athletes of every temperament: do happy people make history?The Lunatic and the SweetheartWhat to make of the Manning family DNA, which holds the genetic code of two very different kinds of champions?Eli's nickname in the Giants' locker room is Easy E, a homage to a demeanor so quiet and cool that when he once said on a radio show that he considered himself in Tom Brady's class, the swagger surprised even his father.That Eli said it only a few months before beating Brady for his second Super Bowl championship underscores the point that it is possible to enjoy antique shopping with your mom and still prevail in two of the most thrilling Super Bowls in history.His older brother Peyton is, well, not so easy. If he has a nickname, it's the Sheriff. In January, one member of the Baltimore Ravens called him the MacBook. Neither name suggests warm and cuddly.
SPOKANE, Wash. — Trophies cover most of Mark Few's office. They rest behind the desk, on bookshelves, near the black leather couches and the photographs of Few with fishing rod in hand. When available space shrank, he simply lined them on the floor.The hardware collection is a testament to Gonzaga basketball, the program that Few took over in 1999. At this small Catholic university in the Lilac City, Few did something many deemed impossible at the outset: he constructed a major program in a midmajor place, one that should, with its win Saturday against Portland, ascend to the No. 1 overall ranking this week for the first time.The Bulldogs host opponents in their palatial arena and travel by private jet. Their staff budget and recruiting budget and Nike shoe contract are, if not on the same block, at least in the same neighborhood as bigger universities, in major conferences, with longer histories, more tradition.Few, a Northwest guy from small-town Oregon, the son of a pastor, an avid angler who once hooked a 52-pound king salmon, or so the story goes, dislikes the term midmajor and the perpetual notion that he will eventually depart. His story, the story of Gonzaga basketball, a real whopper in its own right, always returns to a simple question.Most wonder: why stay?Last month, he took a lap around the office. Trim and fit, he wore brown loafers and a red pullover sweater, the uniform of a suburban father. He revealed his preference for fly fishing at five nearby lakes with his four children and how he loved to mountain bike. He sidestepped the trophies on the ground.Outside, prospective students toured McCarthey Athletic Center, and fans visited the ticket office at 10 a.m. on a Monday. They had no idea then how February would unfold, in frantic fashion, when so many No. 1 teams lost it seemed as if the ranking carried some sort of curse, until Gonzaga, among the most unlikely contenders ever for that ranking, neared the summit.On Thursday, the Zags did what the best teams in college basketball have failed to accomplish throughout this season. They won a close conference game, a trap game at Brigham Young, to put themselves in position for No. 1.Back in the office, Few had considered all the expectations, for this team, perhaps his most talented, and for the program."When you win 11 straight league titles, people have a tendency to take it for granted, no matter how much you preach," he said. "We didn't win the conference last year. People were taken aback."He laughed. This is what Gonzaga basketball has become.Few first heard the term midmajor his first season, the year after the Zags went all Cinderella and shocked the sport with a run to the regional finals of the N.C.A.A. tournament. Back then, the term applied. That was the beginning of 14 consecutive N.C.A.A. tournament berths, before the 11 consecutive West Coast Conference titles, before the size of the student body swelled, another ripple effect born of basketball.The program evolved so much that 2011-12 was something of a down season — down meaning the Zags did not win their conference title and lost in the second round of the N.C.A.A. tournament, albeit in a close game to a Final Four team, Ohio State. The appearance extended the fourth-longest tournament streak, behind Kansas, Duke and Michigan State, but also bolstered complaints that the Bulldogs had still not advanced past a regional semifinal since that unforeseen run in 1999.In the ensuing years, Gonzaga (29-2, 16-0) helped transform college basketball, which seems as balanced now as ever. Some of that depth resulted from programs that followed the Gonzaga blueprint, that turned jobs once considered steppingstones into destinations. Think Butler with Brad Stevens, Virginia Commonwealth with Shaka Smart or New Mexico with Steve Alford.Butler's athletic director, Barry Collier, said Gonzaga provided the model for these midmajor-to-just-major transformations. The Zags showed universities that could not invest as heavily or at all in big-time football that in basketball, at the right place, under the right circumstances, with the right resources, it could be done, and without the raft of early departures suffered by the more established programs. Butler even advanced to the championship game, twice, bolstering the trend.
SOUTH BEND, Ind. — The beat dropped, a local legend grabbed the microphone, and the crowd went wild. Chris Brown's "Look at Me Now" thumped through the room, and the D.J. shouted, "Do y'all want to hear some serious flow?"Everyone turned to Skylar Diggins. She was excited. She loved the stage, and this was no easy rap she was going to do. It was Busta Rhymes's fast, tongue-twisting verse, including the line "You ain't never going to stop me."Diggins kept up. And when she was done, she dropped the microphone and walked offstage, the crowd still jamming.Never mind that the D.J. was her little brother, or that the crowd was about 200 seventh, eighth and ninth graders at a party last May. Diggins, the star point guard at Notre Dame, was on top of her own world.She is not shy to break into song, around her parents' house, around her team, whenever she likes. She raps. She sings. Sometimes she writes her own lyrics — about life, basketball, success.If she were to write a song now, all three would be in harmony. She could sing about her mother and stepfather, who raised her. About being the hometown kid who led Notre Dame to two national championship games, who has the second-ranked Fighting Irish in position to win it all, and who will face No. 3 Connecticut on Monday in the regular-season finale.She could sing about her budding fame or her bright future in the W.N.B.A. Her nearly 300,000 Twitter followers would listen. Her family might have no choice.When she visits her parents' house seven miles from campus, she bursts through the door singing, or shouting, "Did y'all miss me?""She thinks she's the life of the party," her mother, Renee Scott, said.That swagger started at a young age. In grade school, she sang solos in the choir, and when her stepfather, Maurice Scott, got her a starter D.J. set, she was a natural.She started working as a D.J. at school dances, local sock hops and private parties. In those settings, Maurice said, "with her competitive nature, everybody's going to know about it, and everybody's going to be there."Back then, Diggins was not allowed to party unless she was the D.J. because she was supposed to focus on school and basketball. When she got her first car, her parents had her sign a contract outlining 25 house rules, including a 10 p.m. curfew and a ban on the word "can't." Even now, when Diggins comes home, singing and shouting, the rules apply.Maurice used to follow Diggins and her friends to the movies, and when one of them would spot him in the theater with a big bag of popcorn, he would say, "Hey, I wanted to see this, too!"Diggins would not throw a fit. She was not embarrassed. She would crack a joke and say, "Since you're here, can we all have some popcorn?"Maurice coached her for much of her life. He taught her the basics, taught her so well that the boys on her team refused to pass her the ball so that a girl would not embarrass them. Most afternoons, Diggins hung out at the recreation center where Maurice worked and ran through his drills, sometimes for six hours at a time.Then Renee would take Diggins shopping, or to get their hair and nails done. She could look pretty and play basketball, her mother said.Diggins's high school games were must-see events in South Bend. Her freshman year, she led Washington High School to the state finals. Her sophomore year, the Panthers won it all. The next year, they lost three starters but went back to the finals. The year after that, they lost four starters but went back again.Notre Dame Coach Muffet McGraw had offered Diggins a scholarship in eighth grade. For four years, people would stop McGraw and ask for updates. When Diggins finally committed, it felt like a local holiday.Diggins, a smooth, left-handed, 5-foot-9-inch guard, started immediately. Her sophomore year, she led Notre Dame to the N.C.A.A. title game but the Irish lost to Texas A&M. She cried on the way to the team hotel, at the hotel and all the way home.The next year, Notre Dame returned to the championship game, only to lose by 19 to Brittney Griner and Baylor. Diggins's reaction was the same, as it was after most every loss.
With No. 17 Wisconsin ahead by 13 points in the first half Sunday, many in the crowd at Kohl Center in Madison might have thought the home team was headed to its fourth straight convincing win.But then everything fell apart.D. J. Byrd scored 9 of his game-high 22 points during a decisive 21-3 second-half run as Purdue upset the Badgers, 69-56, all but eliminating Wisconsin from contention in the tightly contested Big Ten race.The Badgers (20-9, 11-5) are still alive in the conference chase, but it seems highly unlikely they will claim the title. They will need to win their final two games, Thursday at No. 9 Michigan State and next Sunday at Penn State, and receive a lot of help to claim a share of the championship.The Boilermakers prevailed the way the Badgers have won many games, playing tough defense, rebounding and hustling for loose balls."The numbers show that they did a better job on some of those hustle plays," said Jared Berggren, who led Wisconsin with 13 points in his final home game.PITTSBURGH 73, VILLANOVA 64 Villanova Coach Jay Wright could not have drawn it up any better. Heading into the final minute at No. 23 Pittsburgh, the Wildcats needed either a defensive stop or a basket in the final minute of regulation to win somewhere they never had in five previous trips.But Villanova got neither in an overtime loss that put a dent in the program's N.C.A.A. tournament résumé. The freshman guard James Robinson of Pitt hit a 3-pointer with 33 seconds left in regulation to tie it up, and the Wildcats threw away two chances to win in the final moments.The Panthers (23-7, 11-6 Big East) controlled overtime behind Talib Zanna, who scored the first 7 points.N. CAROLINA 79, FLORIDA ST. 58 James Michael McAdoo scored 17 of his 21 points in the first half as host North Carolina (21-8, 11-5 Atlantic Coast Conference) beat Florida State (15-14, 7-9).DUKE 66, NORTH CAROLINA 58 The freshman Alexis Jones scored a season-high 22 points and fifth-ranked Duke beat No. 15 North Carolina for its A.C.C.-record 17th regular-season league victory. Elizabeth Williams added 13 points for the visiting Blue Devils (27-2, 17-1).The Tar Heels (26-5, 14-4) were led by Tierra Ruffin-Pratt's 16 points.PENN ST. 82, NEBRASKA 67 The largest crowd of the season showed up on Senior Night to see No. 20 Nebraska play for a share of the Big Ten championship. Maggie Lucas spoiled the party, scoring 34 points to lead No. 7 Penn State to victory. The Lady Lions (24-4, 14-2) clinched their second straight outright Big Ten title and ended Nebraska's 10-game win streak.The Cornhuskers (22-7, 12-4), were playing their last game at Devaney Center, their home for 37 seasons. They move into a new downtown arena next season, and the Devaney will be renovated as the home court for Nebraska's powerful volleyball team.KENTUCKY 78, TENNESSEE 65 A'dia Mathies scored 13 second-half points, including back-to-back 3-pointers in a 19-6 run that helped 10th-ranked Kentucky put away No. 8 Tennessee.Mathies, Kentucky's No. 2 career scorer, finished with 16 points in her home finale as the Wildcats (25-4, 13-3) claimed the No. 2 seed for this week's Southeastern Conference tournament.Tennessee (23-6, 14-2), the regular-season SEC champion, played without the injured center Isabelle Harrison.MARYLAND 88, WAKE FOREST 61 Tianna Hawkins scored 18 points and No. 9 Maryland won at home to snap its first losing streak of the season. Coming off losses against the top 25 foes Duke and Florida State, Maryland (23-6, 14-4 A.C.C.) led by 38-22 at halftime and coasted to their 14th consecutive victory against Wake Forest (12-18, 5-13).
ANN ARBOR, Mich. (AP) — A 10-point lead had slipped away in the final minutes, and it looked as if the best point guard Trey Burke and Michigan could hope for was another chance in overtime.Then Burke decided to gamble, reaching in and knocking the ball away from Michigan State's Keith Appling with the game on the line."I take my eyes off it for a second to see their formation, and there's Trey going down the other end," Wolverines Coach John Beilein said.Burke's steal and dunk put Michigan ahead by 2 points with 22 seconds remaining, and the fourth-ranked Wolverines held on for a pulsating 58-57 win over No. 9 Michigan State on Sunday. Burke had 21 points and 8 assists, and he had enough energy left down the stretch to help Michigan to a much-needed victory.The Wolverines avenged a 75-52 loss at Michigan State last month — and they rebounded from Wednesday night's stunning defeat at Penn State with an inspired performance at home.The Spartans (22-7, 11-5 Big Ten) had the ball with the shot clock off and the score 56-56, but Burke stole the ball from Appling near midcourt and went in alone for the game's last field goal."I really wasn't pressuring him as hard as I felt like I could, the whole game," Burke said. "I tried to turn him as many times as possible. The one time I did turn him, he kept the ball out, so I just went after it. If I was going to miss it, then I was going to be out of the play."Instead, he ended up with a dunk, giving Michigan (24-5, 11-5) the lead. Michigan State's Derrick Nix was fouled with 8.8 seconds left, but he missed the first free throw. After he made the second, the Spartans fouled the freshman Mitch McGary, who missed the front end of a one-and-one.Michigan State called a timeout with 4.9 seconds left but never got a shot off. Burke stole a pass by Gary Harris to end the game.The Michigan State loss clinched at least a share of the Big Ten title for Indiana.It was the type of game Michigan did not seem as if it could win. The Wolverines shot 0 for 12 from 3-point range and were left to slug it out inside with the physical Spartans. Michigan State had 19 offensive rebounds, but the Spartans also turned the ball over 18 times."They've got a good team," Michigan State Coach Tom Izzo said. "We did some real good things, but unfortunately, 'good' isn't good enough in this league."After being beaten by Indiana and Ohio State, the Spartans have now lost three straight.Michigan, maligned for weeks because of shaky defense, was more disruptive Sunday."Today it was all about grit," Beilein said. "We just had to get a win, especially after our Wednesday night disappointment."
Two weeks ago, Kenyon Martin , a former No. 1 pick in the N.B.A. draft , was at home in Dallas waiting for an invisible fence to be installed around his yard for his dog.Just watching basketball games on television made him angry. With a reputation for having an attitude so disruptive that he could sour a locker room, Martin had received no interest from N.B.A. teams. His playing days appeared to be over, whether he liked it or not.But then the Knicks called and made Martin, 35, an offer that not long ago would have seemed unthinkable: sign a 10-day contract and join the team as the most dispensable man on the bench. Although it promised only the smallest toehold on the N.B.A.'s lowest rung, it was an invitation back into the league, where Martin was once a dominant force and an All-Star. He jumped at the opportunity."I just don't want it to be 10 days," Martin said. "I'm trying to make it a long ride."In joining the Knicks, Martin was the first No. 1 overall N.B.A. pick to sign a 10-day contract, according to the league office. By all accounts, he has spent his stint, which expires Tuesday, doing everything he can to fit in and prove his critics wrong. He knows that this is very likely his last chance, and he is all too familiar with what exile feels like.The Knicks have to decide Monday whether to release Martin, sign him for another 10 days or keep him for the rest of the season. Coach Mike Woodson has spoken encouragingly about Martin's contributions, and the team seems unlikely to give up on him yet."He's not going anywhere," Woodson said Sunday. "I like Kenyon and I think he can be a plus for our ball club."His teammates, some of whom played with Martin in New Jersey or Denver, seem to have embraced him as well, even those who remember his volcanic temper. Carmelo Anthony and J. R. Smith were with him in Denver in 2010 when Martin threatened to sit out the playoffs after someone filled his Range Rover with popcorn as an April Fool's prank.Last week, Amar'e Stoudemire posted a photo to his Instagram account of himself smiling with Martin, dressed in a Knicks uniform, with the caption, "Welcome to New York K-Mart."And so a career that has wound through the dreary Meadowlands, the N.B.A finals and the Chinese Basketball Association has made its strangest turn yet. A snarling fast-break finisher, Martin has become a curiosity in warm-up clothes, clapping at the end of the Knicks' bench."It humbles you," Martin said. "I know it humbled me. I'm going to try to make the best of it."Martin did not participate in three of the four games the Knicks played during his 10-day contract, including Sunday's 99-93 loss to the Heat. In his only appearance, he played fewer than five minutes in a 109-105 win over the Golden State Warriors on Wednesday.When Martin took the court in that game, the Garden gave him a hero's welcome, but he returned to the bench without recording a single statistic: zero points, zero rebounds, zero steals, zero blocks."Whatever they are going to give, I'm willing to accept right now," Martin said after that game. "I made a couple of decent traps. The defense is there. It's a start."Martin's best years were with the Nets, when he and Jason Kidd — now a Knicks teammate — reached the N.B.A. finals in 2002 and 2003. After that team broke up, Martin played seven seasons in Denver, where he averaged 11.7 points and 12.5 rebounds despite frequent clashes with Coach George Karl.During the 2011 lockout, Martin signed with the Xinjiang Flying Tigers of the Chinese Basketball Association as the highest-paid player in the league. He played only 12 games, though, before joining the Los Angeles Clippers, for whom he averaged 5.2 points and 4.3 rebounds in 42 games.After a second-round exit in last year's playoffs, the Clippers did not offer to re-sign Martin because the team's coach, Vinny Del Negro, viewed him as more of a problem than an asset."When he went to the Clippers, my feeling is he didn't do enough to dispel all those things in that one year," said Martin's agent, Andy Miller.In the days since Martin arrived in New York, all tiers of the Knicks' organization have closely scrutinized him.James L. Dolan, the Madison Square Garden chairman, watched him from his baseline seat. Woodson drilled him in practice. The team's public-relations staff monitored his every word.Steve Novak, one of Martin's teammates, knows the challenges of a 10-day contract. He remembers his own sleepless nights when he had the same arrangement with the San Antonio Spurs in 2011."You're on a different schedule than the rest of the team," Novak said. "You're coming onto something that's already been in motion. You need to pretty much learn everything instantly, which we know doesn't happen. You just have to show growth, and show that you care.""It's pressure," Novak added. "You just don't let a day go by without being completely ready for the next day."Despite facing more scrutiny than he has in years, Martin has said all the right things. But he has showed signs of frustration.When he spoke with reporters after Friday's victory over the Washington Wizards, another game in which he never left the bench, Martin put his head down and took a deep breath. He appeared uneasy."I don't want to say I'm bitter, man," he said. "I'm on a 10-day. Do I expect to play? No. Do I want to play? Of course. Do I think I can help? Of course. But this is a great win, so that's what it's about. I'm excited to still be around."
LeBron James wobbled, but only for a moment. He winced, flexed his left knee a few times, reset himself and returned to his unshakable agenda: soaring over a league of helpless challengers.The image of James's twisted knee Sunday afternoon had to send shudders through South Beach, and perhaps a perverse hope through Madison Square Garden, but none of it lasted very long. The only image anyone will remember is of James flying downcourt, converting another Knicks turnover into a spectacular breakaway dunk, a final touch on a 99-93 victory.With that, the Miami Heat avenged two blowout losses to the Knicks and put a little more distance, literally and figuratively, between them. The Heat (43-14) have a seven-and-a-half-game lead over the Knicks (35-21) in the Eastern Conference.James provided the clear edge as the Heat erased a 16-point deficit and dominated the second half, 54-34. He had 12 of his 29 points in the fourth quarter, blocked Tyson Chandler's layup attempt down the stretch, then lunged to steal J. R. Smith's careless pass for the final dunk.By that point, James's third-quarter collision with Smith, the one that made James's knee twist unnaturally, had long since been forgotten."That man don't get hurt," Carmelo Anthony, his close friend, said with a wry smile. "So we wasn't buying that. He made some plays, made some shots."James also finished with 11 rebounds, 7 assists and 3 steals as the Heat won their 14th straight game and ended the Knicks' three-game winning streak."You're not going to stop him," Coach Mike Woodson said of James. "He's figured it out."The Knicks answered with Anthony, who had 32 points but went quiet in the second half, going 3 for 11 from the floor as Miami focused its defense on him and let the Knicks' shooters roam free. The result was a barrage of missed 3-pointers, most of them by Smith, who went 3 for 14 from the arc for the game, drawing Woodson's scorn afterward.Anthony did not take a shot in the final four minutes and said afterward that he had hyperextended his right arm in the first half. He played down the injury.James, in turn, said his knee was fine. "I was concerned, but I had a doctor look at it," James said. "I will be all right."It was a heavy reliance on 3-point shooting that carried the Knicks to two victories over Miami last fall, inspiring a belief that the two teams were at last on equal footing. That notion seems antiquated now, and Anthony avoided any attempt to make the case."We don't compare ourselves to Miami," he said. "Miami is Miami. We're New York. We'll see them when we see them again."Even before the loss, Woodson proclaimed the Heat "by far the best team right now in our league." Afterward, James politely praised the Knicks as "one of the best teams in our league."They will meet for a fourth time on April 2, in Miami. And after that, perhaps in the playoffs.By then, the Knicks can only hope to find a better offensive balance. They got double-digit scoring from Smith (13 points), Amar'e Stoudemire (12), Chandler (10) and a resurgent Jason Kidd (14). But the Heat's Big 3 were simply better, with Dwyane Wade providing 20 points and 8 assists and Chris Bosh scoring 16."When you have the Big 3 playing the way they're playing, especially right now, it makes it tough for a lot of people," Anthony said.These teams had traveled divergent paths since they last met in early December, with the Heat dominating the league and the Knicks meandering through the schedule. So the afternoon provided some encouragement for the Knicks, who at least played well enough to have a double-digit lead against the best team in the league. Their defense was mostly sound, if ultimately undermined by 17 turnovers, and the fourth quarter was tight until the end.After months of virtual dormancy, the Knicks of November re-emerged for a time. They hustled, they attacked the defense and they made a whole lot of 3-pointers, building a 14-point lead by halftime.Even Kidd, who turns 40 this month, looked as if he had been sent back in time, by months or years. He converted four 3-pointers in the first half, his most in a game since Jan. 5 and as many as he had hit in the previous eight games combined.The Knicks took their final lead, 87-85, on a Smith 3-pointer. Miami scored the next 6 points, with one basket each from Bosh, Wade and James, who completed the run after blocking Chandler. Replays showed James, who blocked the shot with his left hand, had grabbed Chandler with his right hand. No foul was called."He grabbed my shoulder," Chandler said. "And then he blocked the shot."The Knicks had closed the gap to 2 points when James completed a driving layup over Smith. It was a 4-point game with less than a minute to play when James snatched Smith's pass and ran away for the dunk."We're walking away with a win tonight if we just execute some small things defensively," Chandler said. "So as tough as this loss is to take, we can definitely build on it."Kenyon Martin is expected to get a second 10-day contract after his first 10-day deal expires Monday. The Knicks are still evaluating Martin, who had not played this season before signing with them. Martin is likely to stick for the rest of the season, with the Knicks needing frontcourt help and defense. "He's not going anywhere," Mike Woodson said. "I like Kenyon and I think he can be a plus for our ball club." ... Marcus Camby, who missed 20 games because of an injured left foot, was in uniform for the first time since Jan. 10. He did not enter the game.
EAST RUTHERFORD, N.J. — For a typical team, the N.B.A. season is full of undulations, and moods can swing at any time. The Nets went into the All-Star break three weeks ago riding wins over Indiana and Denver and sitting in fourth place in the Eastern Conference.That was then. And while Deron Williams and Joe Johnson have both returned to health, the Nets have lost four of their last five games by an average of more than 8 points.Most alarming is the manner in which Brooklyn lost its last two games, against Dallas and Chicago, with droopy stretches of lethargic play, particularly in the middle of games. There have been shades of the December swoon that erased the Nets' torrid start and cost Coach Avery Johnson his job.In 16 December games, the Nets were 5-11 and averaged 92.7 points a game, 15.3 turnovers, 43.2 percent shooting and a 16.6 percent turnover ratio (the percentage of possessions that end with a turnover). They allowed 98.2 points and 47.5 percent shooting.Over the last 16 games, the Nets are 8-8 while averaging 92.1 points a game, 16.3 turnovers, 43.9 percent shooting and a 17.7 turnover ratio. Opponents are averaging 95.2 points and 47.1 percent shooting."I want us to not be satisfied and say we did this wrong, we did that wrong and that wrong," Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo said. He pointed to the turnovers and defensive effort as key problems.That 17.7 turnover ratio is the second highest in the N.B.A. over the last 16 games. Off those turnovers, opponents have averaged 18.9 points a game. In December, it was 18.2."It's on everybody," Williams said of the team's need to turn around its careless play. "You can talk about it all you want and we've done that; it's just coming out and doing it."At practice on Monday, Carlesimo said definitively that he would trim the rotation to a steady 10 players, meaning one player's minutes would significantly diminish. He would not name that player, but chances are either Kris Humphries or MarShon Brooks will be the odd man out.The idea of pairing centers Brook Lopez and Andray Blatche on the court is something Carlesimo has favored all season. But he said the team had been selective in playing them together, worried that Blatche might not be able to defend smaller power forwards.As the team has struggled for production from its power forward position, though, that is likely to change."We have to look at what menu of things we would call in that situation and try to anticipate as many of the defensive things as we could," Carlesimo said. "It's something we definitely want to look into."Blatche played primarily at power forward alongside JaVale McGee or Brendan Haywood in his six seasons with the Washington Wizards. He averaged 11.5 points and 7.4 rebounds as the starting power forward for the Wizards last year."It spreads the floor more so people have the opportunity to penetrate," Blatche said. "Even today in practice, it's tough to defend: so many weapons, so many options. And it definitely gives us length."The Nets have become extremely reliant on Williams, Johnson and Lopez to carry the offensive load. Gerald Wallace, who averaged double digits in scoring for eight consecutive seasons, has scored more than 8 points only twice since Jan. 26. He is shooting just 42 percent from the floor while Brooklyn relies on him to hit open 3-pointers when the ball swings around the perimeter.Finding a way to get better production out of Wallace is just one problem the Nets face. The list is growing, and they have much less time than they did in December to turn things around.
When Mike Anderson left Missouri to become the men's basketball coach at Arkansas in March 2011, he said he was going home.Although an Alabama native, Anderson had coached at Arkansas for 17 years as an assistant to Nolan Richardson. During that time, the Razorbacks made three Final Fours and, in 1994, won the program's only national championship.In the last two seasons, Anderson has put into effect his own twist on the scrambling 40 Minutes of Hell-style of play the Razorbacks were famous for under Richardson.Anderson's Fastest 40 Minutes has been a resounding success at home. Attendance is tracking upward at Bud Walton Arena, where the Razorbacks have won 89.1 percent of their games under Anderson, including victories over Florida, Oklahoma, Missouri and Kentucky this season. No Arkansas coach has done that well at home since Richardson's predecessor, Eddie Sutton, in the early 1980s.But Anderson has not had that kind of success elsewhere. Arkansas has a single road victory in each of the last two seasons. This season, the 84.4-percentage-point disparity between its winning percentages at home (94.4 percent) and on the road (10 percent) is the highest in Division I. Second is Missouri (77.8), which on Tuesday night handed visiting Arkansas a 93-63 loss that severely damaged any hopes the Razorbacks have of getting an at-large bid to the N.C.A.A. tournament.Their failure to win more than one game on the road has played a significant role in dropping their Ratings Percentage Index ranking to No. 83 entering Wednesday.While Missouri's extreme disparity appears to be a single-season anomaly, the combination of success at home and little of it on the road has been a pattern for Arkansas since Richardson's final years with the team, in the early 2000s. In the last decade, the Razorbacks have the worst road record among Southeastern Conference teams but the fourth-best home record.The team's hyperaggressive style, its trademark, is a major reason for the trend, said Pat Bradley, who played under Richardson from 1995 to 1999. Richardson's style was designed around half-court traps and full-court presses. Everything was meant to create turnovers and convert fast-break opportunities, the better to keep momentum tilted Arkansas's way.Richardson and Anderson cultivated the style as a way to neutralize more talented opponents who were not accustomed to playing all-out, said Bradley, who works in sports radio in Little Rock, Ark. They understood "that with a less talented team you can create an environment that will win a lot of games at home," he said.In the early to mid-1990s, Arkansas also had plenty of all-Americans, but as the decade wore on, the team's overall talent level dipped. On the road, referees seemed more likely to call fouls on aggressive defenders, and there were fewer fans to keep the team's energy level high."When you talk about pressing, you don't have the luxury of what takes place at home on the road," Anderson told The Associated Press in January.Arkansas had four head coaches (Richardson, Stan Heath, John Pelphrey and Anderson) from 2002 through 2011. That contributed to the early departure or transfer of some of the program's best and most experienced players — including Patrick Beverley, Courtney Fortson and Rotnei Clarke, now a senior at Butler.The result was young teams — Arkansas has no seniors on its roster this season — that were good enough to win at home consistently but were not mature enough to strike the proper balance between tenacity and composure elsewhere."When you are on the road, you need some kind of veteran leadership," Bradley said.Arkansas's trouble executing an efficient half-court offense has further compounded the issue. Anderson's read-and-react offense takes most players a few seasons to fully learn, and his guards have not yet seemed to master it.That has not hurt the team at home, where "they create the tempo to where they may only have to score out of the half-court, I don't know, 7, 8, 10 possessions," Bradley said. "Now they're getting all these other points in transition, whether it's off a steal, a missed shot, some kind of a turnover."With a heralded recruiting class arriving next season and more leadership expected from its returning players, Arkansas has hope for the future. The question is whether that hope will travel.
MONTCLAIR, N.J. (AP) — The N.C.A.A. has lifted a recent ban against New Jersey colleges, allowing them to host tournament games or championships.The N.C.A.A. informed its member colleges of the decision in a memo after United States District Judge Michael Shipp issued a permanent injunction Thursday in Trenton barring New Jersey from offering sports betting in the state.Gov. Chris Christie signed a sports wagering law last year, but the N.C.A.A. and four major sports leagues challenged it.Carol Blazejowski, the associate vice president for university advancement at Montclair State, said she had received the N.C.A.A. memo. The N.C.A.A. did not return calls and an e-mail seeking comment.The memorandum, however, said that the New Jersey ban would be reinstated if the state successfully appealed Shipp's ruling.The decision came too late to help the undefeated women's basketball team at Montclair State University (29-0), which last week had to play its first two games in the Division III tournament at Lebanon Valley in Pennsylvania.The Red Hawks advanced and left for DePauw in Indiana on Wednesday for a third-round game against Christopher Newport (28-2).
The moves. The smoothness. The deadeye release. Even on television, almost everything that Doug McDermott of Creighton used to score 41 points against Wichita State on Saturday appeared so familiar to Ed Schilling that he had to smile.Schilling, a former coach at Wright State, served as an assistant to John Calipari at Massachusetts, with the Nets and at Memphis before returning home to Indiana. Schilling coaches Park Tudor High School in Indianapolis, the two-time defending state Class 2A champion, and runs a summer program for players preparing for N.C.A.A. Division I and the N.B.A.Last summer, McDermott spent three weeks with Schilling at St. Vincent Sports Performance in Indianapolis to better learn how to score off the dribble, a skill that, if mastered, could elevate his status from nice-story college player to N.B.A. draft pick."It's probably the main area I wanted to improve on in the off-season," McDermott said in a conference call this week.Missouri Valley Conference coaches exhausted superlatives and defensive schemes last season on McDermott, the son of Creighton Coach Greg McDermott. He developed from an overlooked high school player into the conference's player of the year, becoming the first sophomore to win the award.This season, McDermott, a 6-foot-8 junior forward, has been even harder to stop.He averages 23.4 points per game, trailing only Erick Green of Virginia Tech (25.0) in Division I. He makes almost half of his 3-point attempts (48.1 percent), ranks third in the conference in rebounding (7.6 a game) and easily repeated as conference player of the year, joining two-time winners like Larry Bird, Hersey Hawkins and Xavier McDaniel.McDermott could be one of the most dynamic players in the N.C.A.A. tournament, if the 24-7 Bluejays get there.Creighton will meet Drake (15-16) in a quarterfinal Friday in the conference tournament in St. Louis.Heading into that game, Creighton ranks 33rd in the Ratings Percentage Index, a measure used by the N.C.A.A. selection committee to fill the 68-team field. But the Missouri Valley Conference is not the Big Ten or the Atlantic Coast Conference, and Creighton did not even dominate its conference foes, finishing 13-5, with the most losses by a regular-season champion since 1999.Greg McDermott said the Bluejays should not count on an at-large N.C.A.A. tournament bid were someone else to win the conference tournament, and he does not have to look far for supporting evidence.Two years ago, the selection committee rejected the regular-season champion, Missouri State, after a 4-point loss to Indiana State in the conference tournament final. That was the first time in 18 years that the regular-season winner missed out. Missouri State's R.P.I. rank was 39th."There is only one guarantee to get in the N.C.A.A. tournament, and that is to win in St. Louis," Greg McDermott said after Creighton beat Wichita State, 91-79, to earn its first conference regular-season title since 2001.That is when Doug McDermott turned senior night in Omaha into a personal highlight show. He dismantled the conference's best defensive team so thoroughly that Shockers Coach Gregg Marshall called it the best performance he had seen by an opposing player.McDermott was 15 for 18 from the field, including 10 for 10 from inside the arc, and was 6 for 6 from the foul line. He also had six rebounds and three assists. Creighton fans at CenturyLink Center, hoping to dissuade McDermott from declaring for the N.B.A. draft, chanted, "One more year!" in the final minutes."He displayed a full array of N.B.A. talent," Marshall said. "He made a shot in front of their bench in the second half where he jabbed, dribbled, pulled back and made a shot over a pretty hard contest that was tremendous. He would put the ball on the floor in the first half, make a move, pivot, make another move — I'm talking about a third move off a pivot — and eventually find an angle to get the ball up into the basket."Those are ways that he's really improved — being able to score off the bounce and being able to shoot the ball off the bounce and even off the catch in kind of a stare-down mode."Schilling's assessment? "He was amazing," he said in a telephone interview. "To see him applying the stuff he learned and using it in a game with defense, pressure and all the things that accompany a high-level game was a lot of fun for me."Of course, McDermott was a big-time talent before he arrived in Indianapolis.
Deron Williams's night began quietly, with a 3-pointer from the left wing that whipped through the net about 90 seconds after the opening tip. Fans were still settling in their seats, and the Nets ' main concern was stopping Washington's John Wall, a pesky guard who could cause them headaches.Another 3-pointer by Williams splashed home, and then another, and another, and by that point there was a buzz in the air. The crowd began to murmur every time he touched the ball, urging Williams just to shoot it, shoot it, keep shooting it.Five 3-pointers in a row, then seven, then nine, an N.B.A. record for a half. He had scored as many points (33) as the Wizards. And he had burned right through the soles of his new white shoes."I could tell off those first two 3's," guard Keith Bogans said, "it was going to be a long night for the Wizards."Williams's first-half performance single-handedly built enough of a cushion for the Nets to cruise past Washington, 95-78, at Barclays Center. Williams finished with 42 points on 11-of-16 shooting from beyond the 3-point arc. He fell one 3-pointer short of tying the N.B.A. record and became one of six players to record 11 in a game."I definitely got hot, especially in that first half," Williams said. "They were shots when they leave your hand they feel like they're really good. And I just kept shooting."Forward Reggie Evans said, "He was hot like fish grease."For the nearly 17 minutes he was on the court in the first half, Williams was as electrifying as any player in the N.B.A. this season.He tied a career high with his eighth 3-pointer, with six minutes left in the first half. The Wizards, guarding him with Wall, or trying to, simply had no answer for his shooting. They switched the bigger Trevor Ariza onto him for a time, but it did not matter. Williams was simply feeling it, and the crowd pulsed with every attempt."I thought they were going to boo me one time because I didn't shoot it," Williams joked. "I passed it up to Joe, and they kind of went 'Ohhhh.' "Williams said earlier this week that his ankles were finally feeling close to 100 percent after he missed two games before the All-Star break to have plasma treatment. He has since received cortisone injections to help the ankles heal.As a result, Williams has rediscovered some of the bounce in his step. Since returning, he had averaged 21.5 points and shot 48 percent from 3-point range going into Friday's game.Against the Wizards, Williams was wearing new and noticeably higher-topped white Nike shoes. He burned through the soles in the first half, changed into a new pair, then burned through those in the second half.Williams and his teammates have put in extra time lately with the assistant coach Doug Overton. At the All-Star break, the Nets' coaching staff carved out additional practice time to improve shooting percentages, and perhaps as a result the Nets are fourth in the N.B.A. in long-range shooting. Since the break, they have made 41.8 percent of their 3-point shots.The Wizards, down by as much as 27 early on, began coming back in the third quarter, as Williams cooled off and the Nets' offense began to stagnate. The Nets shot 5 of 20 and committed seven turnovers in the third quarter.With nine minutes left in the fourth quarter, the Wizards had cut the lead to 76-63. Williams returned to the court and jump-started the offense, collecting assists on passes to Lopez and Mirza Teletovic, then adding a pull-up jumper and another 3-pointer, his 11th.As time ticked down, Williams had the ball, and the fans wanted to see history. He would settle for just a win."The main thing was I knew how bad we needed a win at home," Williams said. "I wanted to come out aggressive. I didn't know I was going to be that aggressive."Reggie Evans grabbed a season-high 24 rebounds, the fifth time this season he has brought down more than 20, tied for the most in the N.B.A. He became just the third Net to have four 20-rebound games in one season, after Jayson Williams and Buck Williams.
LeBron James had 25 points and 10 rebounds, Dwyane Wade added 22 points, and the host Miami Heat beat the Philadelphia 76ers, 102-93, on Friday night for their 17th straight victory.Chris Bosh scored 16 points, Ray Allen 12 and Shane Battier 11 for the Heat, who matched the 12th-longest winning streak in N.B.A. history and became the first team in the league to clinch a playoff spot this season.Trailing by 9 points in the third quarter, the Heat took a 76-75 lead when James beat the buzzer to end the period with a 3-pointer. They then took control with a 17-4 run over a five-minute stretch of the fourth."We got better tonight," James said, "and that's the most important thing."Belinelli missed a potential tying jumper but got a second chance when Joakim Noah grabbed the rebound. Jimmy Butler then swung the ball back out to Belinelli in the corner, and he connected on the fall-away 3 to put Chicago in front.Earlier Friday, Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau said Derrick Rose was "not quite" ready to return from his knee injury.Rose, the 2011 N.B.A. most valuable player, has continued to practice without restrictions, but his return from a torn anterior cruciate ligament in his left knee remained uncertain."He's been cleared to do everything there is," Thibodeau said. "Before he makes the final step, everyone has to get together and sign off. That hasn't happened yet. The most important part of this is that we have to trust Derrick, and I trust him."CELTICS 107, HAWKS 102 Jason Terry hit a tiebreaking 3-pointer with 35 seconds left in overtime as host Boston rallied to defeat Atlanta after blowing a big lead in regulation.The Celtics, who have won five straight, blew a 12-point fourth-quarter lead and trailed by 4 in overtime before outshooting the Hawks from beyond the arc.BLAZERS 136, SPURS 106 Damian Lillard had 35 points and 9 assists, and visiting Portland routed San Antonio, setting a record for most points by an opponent at AT&T Center.San Antonio had difficulty keeping pace with Portland's athleticism while losing for only the fourth time in 29 home games this season.MAVERICKS 102, PISTONS 99 O. J. Mayo scored 22 points, and visiting Dallas held on to beat Detroit when the Pistons' Charlie Villanueva missed a 3-pointer in the final seconds.The Mavericks blew a 15-point lead in the fourth quarter. but Dirk Nowitzki made two straight shots to put Dallas ahead by 3. The Mavericks led, 100-99, after Villanueva caught Jose Calderon's air ball and made a layup with six seconds left.After Darren Collison's two foul shots for Dallas, Villanueva missed from the left corner.THUNDER 116, BOBCATS 94 Kevin Durant had 19 points and 7 assists, and visiting Oklahoma City won its fourth straight by beating Charlotte.The Bobcats have lost nine straight games and 22 of their last 24 at home.PACERS 115, MAGIC 86 Paul George had 25 points and Tyler Hansbrough 18 for visiting Indiana, which used a big first half to roll past Orlando.Indiana scored 30 points off 21 turnovers and also connected on 11 3-pointers.The Magic have not won at home since Feb. 10.GRIZZLIES 103, CAVALIERS 92 Marc Gasol scored 22 points, and Memphis held off a late run to win at Cleveland. The Grizzlies are 12-4 since trading the star forward Rudy Gay to Toronto on Jan. 30.BID FOR KINGS NEEDS A BUMP N.B.A. Commissioner David Stern said a counteroffer to keep the Sacramento Kings from moving to Seattle must be increased before the league's owners can consider it.A group led by the 24 Hour Fitness founder Mark Mastrov and the billionaire Ron Burkle submitted a counteroffer last month in hopes of blocking a bid by a Seattle group headed by the hedge fund manager Chris Hansen and the Microsoft chief executive officer Steve Ballmer. The Seattle group agreed to acquire 65 percent of the team from the Maloof family for about $341 million.
ATLANTA — One night after his 3-point bonanza, Deron Williams gave the nets a break. He did not try to replicate his record night from beyond the arc, but instead controlled the pace offensively and defensively against one of the fastest teams in the Eastern Conference. Williams was the point guard, not the shooting guard, and his floor game helped make for an impressive 93-80 win over the Atlanta Hawks on Saturday night at Philips Arena.It was the third straight win for the Nets, who improved to 37-26. And it was a vital win because it was another sign that the Nets could trust Williams, their $100 million guard, who has played like an All-Star since the All-Star break."That was as good a game as we played all year, considering we played last night," Coach P. J. Carlesimo said. "From the point we were down 10, or whatever we were, we can't play much better."He added: "We took care of the ball so well. I think we had two turnovers the second half. Our defensive energy was good all night."Williams scored 42 points, and had 11 3-pointers, in Friday's win over Washington. While he was a modest 5 of 13 from the field against Atlanta, the rest of his game was stellar. Williams had six assists, made just one turnover in 33 minutes and efficiently directed a halfcourt offense that plowed under the Hawks (34-28)."We need for it to click like that," Williams said. "We did get down early, but we were able to take hold of the game and didn't really look back."Carlesimo said the Nets had an advantage because the Hawks were still playing in overtime at Boston on Friday night when the Nets were leaving their arena after whipping Washington. The Nets seized on that advantage by getting back on defense before the Hawks could rev up their transition game. The Nets are the slower team in the backcourt, but they did not play that way Saturday night.The Nets made just 9 turnovers and had 20 assists on 36 baskets."When we are that focused and play with that much attentiveness as we did tonight and that much energy, we can be a really good basketball team," Carlesimo said. "It's one game, but that's really, really encouraging in a back-to-back against a good team."Williams scored 17 points, and his stewardship of the offense made sure the Nets took advantage of the Hawks' middle, which was without center Zaza Pachulia. The Nets got 18 points from center Brook Lopez and 18 points from the reserve center Andray Blatche, who made 9 of 11 shots. The two big men combined to make 17 of 27 field-goal attempts."The focus for me at halftime was to get those hooks going down," Lopez said. "I missed a few easy ones in the first half. We really wanted to attack the basket and open up the floor for us. Zaza is a huge part of what they do defensively, especially filling up the lane, so we wanted to take advantage of his absence."Williams said there was no temptation to hoist 3-point attempts and continue his binge. For one thing, long 3-pointers that miss can fuel a fast team like the Hawks. There was also the matter of feeding the post, where the Nets dominated the Hawks."Almost every time you have a big game like that, the next one's not as good," said Williams, who noted that he had seven 3-point attempts. (He made two.)The Nets played poorly at the outset and fell behind, 11-1, but they recovered to take a 51-37 lead at the half. Williams had no turnovers in 17 minutes of playing time in a patient display of running the offense. Blatche contributed 8 points as the Nets' bench outscored Atlanta's reserves, 21-8, the first two periods.The third quarter has been a problem for the Nets for most of the season, but it was not on Saturday. The lowest-scoring team in the N.B.A. in the third period (21.7), the Nets outscored the Hawks, 25-20, in the quarter because they took advantage of the inside matchup with Lopez, who made 6 of 9 shots in the quarter and scored 14 of his 18 points.When Lopez was done with the Hawks in the third, Blatche started to work them over. The 6-foot-11 Blatche made his first five shots of the fourth period, including an up-and-under shot from the baseline.With three minutes left, the game effectively ended when Williams drove past Hawks guard John Jenkins for a layup to make the score 92-72."It was a good win for us," Williams said. "I wasn't trying to go out there and get 40 again."
Baylor Coach Kim Mulkey hollered to Brittney Griner , "Score first, pass second." But Griner was in a passing mood Saturday, just missing her second triple-double with 19 points, 13 rebounds and a career-high 9 assists as No. 1 Baylor crushed Kansas State, 80-47, in the Big 12 tournament quarterfinals in Dallas."I'm telling you, I'm a point guard by heart," said Griner, the 6-foot-8 star whose only previous triple-double had come on points, rebounds and blocks, and who scored a Big 12-record 50 points against the Wildcats last week.Baylor (30-1) will play Oklahoma State (21-9) in the semifinals Sunday.U.C.L.A. 70, CALIFORNIA 58 Markel Walker matched her season high with 23 points, and No. 14 U.C.L.A. upset No. 5 California, ending its 16-game winning streak, to advance to the Pacific-12 title game in Seattle.A.C.C. SEMIFINALS Haley Peters had 17 points and 13 rebounds to help No. 6 Duke advance to Sunday's Atlantic Coast Conference final in Greensboro, N.C., with a 72-66 win over No. 23 Florida State (22-9). The Blue Devils will face No. 15 North Carolina (28-5), which reached the final for the first time since 2008 with a 72-65 win over No. 10 Maryland (24-7). Latifah Coleman scored 15 of her career-high 17 points in the final seven minutes for the Tar Heels.SEC SEMIFINALS No. 7 Kentucky (27-4) pulled away from No. 12 Georgia (25-6) with a 15-0 run in the second half and reached the Southeastern Conference title game Sunday in Duluth, Ga., with a 60-38 victory. The Wildcats will face No. 19 Texas A&M (23-9), which defeated No. 9 Tennessee (24-7) by 66-62.BIG TEN SEMIFINALS Jasmine Thomas scored 14 of her 19 points in the second half, and Michigan State (24-7) reached the final Sunday against Purdue by upsetting No. 8 Penn State (25-5), the regular-season champion, by 54-46 in Hoffman Estates, Ill. Purdue (23-8) defeated No. 21 Nebraska (23-8) by 77-64 behind K K Houser, who had 13 points, 8 rebounds and 6 steals.BIG EAST TOURNAMENT Andrea Smith scored 17 points, including a free throw with 1 minute 19 seconds left, to lift South Florida (21-9) to a 42-39 win over over Rutgers (15-14) in the second round in Hartford. ... Shenneika Smith's 16 points led St. John's (18-11) to a 51-45 victory over Seton Hall (11-20).PRINCETON WINS IVY LEAGUE Niveen Rasheed's 14 points led host Princeton (21-6, 12-1) to its fourth straight Ivy League title and an N.C.A.A. berth with an 80-51 win over Brown.TENNESSEE-MARTIN WINS OHIO VALLEY Tennessee-Martin (19-14) needed overtime to beat Tennessee Tech (19-12) by 87-80 in Nashville for its third straight Ohio Valley Conference tournament title and an N.C.A.A. berth.STETSON WINS ATLANTIC SUN In Macon, Ga., Stetson (24-8) made the N.C.A.A. field by overcoming a 15-point deficit and ending the 21-game winning streak of Florida Gulf Coast (27-6) with a 70-64 victory.
Laurent Rivard scored 17 points and Siyani Chambers added 16 on Saturday night as Harvard beat Cornell , 65-56, and won its third straight Ivy League title.The Crimson (19-9, 11-3) clinched a share of the conference championship with their victory, then claimed it outright when Brown beat Princeton, 80-67, about a half-hour later. The loss by the Tigers (16-11, 9-4) eliminated the potential of a one-game playoff for the league's automatic bid to the N.C.A.A. tournament.The Ivy League is the only conference that awards its automatic bid to the regular-season champion.Miles Asafo-Adjei scored 15 points and Errick Peck had 14 with eight rebounds for Cornell (13-18, 5-9).A few dozen fans and parents hung around Harvard's Lavietes Pavilion after the final buzzer to follow the score from Providence, R.I. As Brown made just enough free throws down the stretch to extend its lead to 13 points, a cheer rose from the stands and another was heard in the hallway outside the team's locker room.Rivard and Christian Webster, who were following the game on a student reporter's laptop computer, broke into big smiles and hugged when the score was final.Coach Tommy Amaker, who asked for frequent updates during his postgame news conference but refused to look at the computer screen, came back in to congratulate his players."We always talk about how tough and challenging it is to win on the road in our league," said Amaker, whose team lost at Princeton and Penn last weekend to hand over the Ivy lead, then got it back when the Tigers lost at Yale and Brown. "We went through this last weekend; Princeton went through it this weekend."Harvard is going to the N.C.A.A. tournament for the second straight year and for only the third time over all, including in 1946. Last year, the Crimson lost to Vanderbilt in their opening game, 79-70.Harvard had never won an Ivy title in men's basketball before 2010-11, but has now won the last three. Harvard shared the title with Princeton two years ago but Princeton won a one-game playoff to decide the league's automatic bid to the N.C.A.A. tournament. Last year, the Crimson won the league outright."I just feel like the basketball gods have been on our side," Webster said. "Leaving here, knowing that we're going to the tournament and winning the Ivy League championship outright, there's no better feeling for me."MARQUETTE 69, ST. JOHN'S 67 Vander Blue's driving shot fell through the rim as the overtime buzzer sounded, giving No. 15 Marquette a share of the Big East regular season championship. It is Marquette's first championship since joining the conference in 2005-6.The Golden Eagles (23-7, 14-4) will share the title with fifth-ranked Georgetown, which routed No. 17 Syracuse on Saturday, and No. 8 Louisville, which made it a three-way tie by beating No. 24 Notre Dame.UCONN 63, PROVIDENCE 59 Ryan Boatright scored 23 points, including a key 3-point play in overtime, and Connecticut closed its season by earning its 20th win, a victory over Providence in Storrs. DeAndre Daniels added 19 points and Shabazz Napier, playing on an injured right foot, had 16 points for UConn (20-10, 10-8 Big East), which is ineligible for the postseason. Daniels and Napier each had eight rebounds.L.I.U. BROOKLYN IN NEC FINAL C. J. Garner scored 23 points, Jamal Olasewere had a double-double and four other players scored in double figures to lead Long Island Brooklyn over host Wagner, 94-82, in the Northeast Conference semifinals.Olasewere finished with 12 points and 12 rebounds for his third double-double in four games and became the Blackbirds' career scoring leader with 1,836 points. Booker Hucks added 14 points, E. J. Reed 13 and Troy Joseph 12 for L.I.U. Brooklyn (19-13), which will host Tuesday's final.Rashad Whack scored 26 points as visiting Mount St. Mary's (18-13) won its ninth straight game, upending top-seeded Robert Morris, 69-60, in the other semifinal.PATRIOT LEAGUE SEMIFINALS Tony Johnson and Seth Hinrichs combined for 42 points to lead host Lafayette over Lehigh, 82-69. Johnson finished with 24 points, Hinrichs 18, Dan Trist 13 and Bryce Scott 12 for the Leopards (19-14), who have won nine in a row. Lafayette will visit Bucknell (27-5), a 78-70 winner over Army in the championship game on Wednesday.
Down to its last chance, Miami came through.Kenny Kadji scored a season-high 23 points to help the No. 6 Hurricanes win the Atlantic Coast Conference championship outright by beating visiting Clemson, 62-49, on Saturday in their regular-season finale.Miami (24-6, 15-3) clinched its first outright men's basketball league title after being foiled in consecutive losses to Duke and Georgia Tech. The Hurricanes also tied the program record for victories set in 2001-2.The league championship is the second for the Hurricanes, who shared the Big East Conference title in 2000.Clemson (13-17, 5-13) has lost 6 consecutive games and 9 of its past 10.BAYLOR 81, KANSAS 58 Pierre Jackson had 28 points and 10 assists as Baylor (18-13, 9-9) finished the regular season with a home victory to keep No. 4 Kansas from the outright Big 12 regular-season title. Even after the loss, its worst in seven years, Kansas (26-5, 14-4) will be the No. 1 seed for the conference tournament and has at least a share of the last nine Big 12 regular-season titles.Earlier Saturday, Le'Bryan Nash had 24 points to lead No. 13 Oklahoma State (23-7, 13-5) past No. 9 Kansas State, 76-70, at home. That guaranteed the Jayhawks a piece of the Big 12 title. But because Kansas lost, the Wildcats (25-6, 14-4) held on to a share of their first regular-season conference title since 1977 in the Big Eight.GONZAGA 66, LOYOLA MARYMOUNT 48 Elias Harris had 21 points and 8 rebounds to lead No. 1 Gonzaga over Loyola Marymount (11-23) in the semifinals of the West Coast Conference tournament in Las Vegas. The Bulldogs (30-2) advanced to play for the league championship Monday against the winner of Saturday's late semifinal between St. Mary's and San Diego.DUKE 69, N. CAROLINA 53 Seth Curry hit his first seven shots and finished with 20 points, and No. 3 Duke (27-4, 14-4 A.C.C.) turned a big early lead into a rout at North Carolina (22-9, 12-6).LOUISVILLE 73, NOTRE DAME 57 Gorgui Dieng had 20 points, 11 rebounds and 5 blocked shots to help No. 8 Louisville earn a share of the Big East title with a home win over No. 24 Notre Dame (23-8, 11-7). The Cardinals (26-5, 14-4) finished tied for first place with Georgetown and Marquette.KENTUCKY 61, FLORIDA 57 No. 11 Florida (24-6, 14-4 Southeastern Conference) looked ready to deal the final blow to Kentucky's postseason hopes after going on a 19-5 run that gave it a 57-50 lead with seven and a half minutes remaining. But the Wildcats (21-10, 12-6) scored the final 11 points of the game to win at home.ST. LOUIS 78, LA SALLE 54 No. 16 St. Louis hit 17 of its 20 second-half shots, clinching a share of the Atlantic 10 title with a home victory over La Salle (21-8, 11-5). St. Louis (24-6, 13-3), which won its first conference title since 1970-71 in the Missouri Valley, can take the title outright if Virginia Commonwealth loses at Temple on Sunday.U.C.L.A. 61, WASHINGTON 54 Shabazz Muhammad scored 21 points, and No. 23 U.C.L.A. (23-8, 13-5) clinched the Pacific-12 regular-season title with a win at Washington (17-14, 9-9).IN OTHER GAMES Todd Fletcher hit a 3-pointer with 3.5 seconds remaining to give Air Force (17-12, 8-8 Mountain West) an 89-88 home win over No. 12 New Mexico (26-5, 13-3), the program's first win over a top-12 team. The teams combined for a conference-record 30 3-pointers. ... Nick Johnson had 17 points, and No. 18 Arizona (24-6, 12-6) beat visiting Arizona State (20-11, 9-9), 73-58, to earn a first-round bye in the Pac-12 tournament. ... Joe Jackson had 17 points, 10 assists and 9 rebounds, and No. 25 Memphis (27-4, 16-0) beat visiting Alabama-Birmingham (15-16, 7-9), 86-71, completing an undefeated season in Conference USA.FLA. GULF COAST WINS ATLANTIC SUN Florida Gulf Coast (24-10) claimed its first N.C.A.A. tournament berth, beating top-seeded Mercer (23-11), 88-75, in the Atlantic Sun title game in Macon, Ga. The second-seeded Eagles, in their sixth season as a Division I program and their second year of eligibility for the tournament, denied the Bears their first N.C.A.A. bid since 1985.BELMONT WINS OHIO VALLEY Kerron Johnson hit a pull-up jumper with 1.2 seconds left, and Belmont capped its first season in the Ohio Valley Conference by beating Murray State (21-10), 70-68, in overtime in Nashville for the tournament championship. The Bruins (26-6) earned their sixth N.C.A.A. tournament berth in eight seasons.
The game ended 27 years ago, half a lifetime ago, a few pounds ago, yet Dwayne Washington, known to all as Pearl, cannot forget. He will not forget. It still hurts, still stings, the way his Big East career ended, at the 1986 conference tournament finale, in the final seconds.As this year's valedictory Big East tournament approached and all those memories resurfaced — of Ewing and Mullin, of Boeheim's scowl and Thompson's towel, of Syracuse and Georgetown and St. John's at Madison Square Garden — Washington reclined on a white leather couch at Sweet Jane's in Harlem one recent afternoon. He wore a navy Syracuse pullover, a nod to his alma mater.He mentioned the 1986 final before the interview even started. Like ripping off a bandage."The only regret," Washington said. He cast his eyes downward and continued. "It was in the basket, just about, and he reached over.The final 30 seconds of that game unfolded in a frenzy. Washington missed the front end of a one-and-one. St. John's called timeout. Ron Rowan caught the ball on the right wing, dribbled once toward the baseline and lofted an off-balance floater — "It felt so pure," he later said — that dropped in without touching the rim.Eight seconds remained. Washington took the inbounds pass. He flew up court as if propelled by a turbo button, faster it seemed with the ball than without it. As Rowan watched Washington go coast to coast, at full speed, he saw "an unstoppable force."Walter Berry, an old friend and a fellow New York City basketball prodigy nicknamed the Truth, stalked Washington. He figured Washington was headed toward the rim. As Washington ducked under a defender and released the ball, Berry blocked him from behind. Washington never saw him.For a tournament that defined a conference, that became synonymous with the Garden, that gave basketball aficionados Lou Carnesecca's sweaters and Patrick Ewing's swats, and Gerry McNamara's run to the championship and a six-overtime marathon, the 1986 final provided the Big East with a blueprint. It cemented the conference in the first year of the post-Ewing era. It elevated Washington's legacy in defeat and sent Berry into another stratosphere."The block gets bigger and bigger over time," Berry said over baked catfish and greens at Amy Ruth's, another Harlem restaurant blocks from his old neighborhood. "Like those stories about fish."He continued: "Pearl kept asking me why I blocked his shot. He asked me that 20 times."Always, the same answer."Bro, I knew exactly where you were going."They formed the Big East in 1979 with seven colleges clustered in the Northeast — Providence, Seton Hall, Boston College, Connecticut, Georgetown, Syracuse and St. John's. Dave Gavitt was the first commissioner, the brains behind a somewhat radical concept, a conference created not for almighty football but for basketball."I was kind of reluctant," said Jake Crouthamel, the longtime Syracuse athletic director and Gavitt's fraternity brother at Dartmouth. "A basketball league? Only Dave Gavitt could pull something like that off."Gavitt capitalized on television, his product replete with natural rivalries that existed from the proximity between the universities. By the end of the first year, Syracuse Coach Jim Boeheim said, "It was pretty obvious we had something special."Each basketball season culminated with the conference tournament, which the Big East held in Providence, R.I.; Syracuse; and Hartford the first three years — an inauspicious start. Gavitt wanted to move the tournament to the Garden, but only when he deemed it ready, when the league boasted enough headliners for the marquee. When he told this to the athletic directors, they were incredulous. But Gavitt held firm.Then Ewing committed to Georgetown in February 1981. Gavitt called Mike Tranghese, a top lieutenant who later became conference commissioner."We're going to the Garden," Gavitt told him.The arena called the world's most famous provided this upstart conference with national exposure, with instant credibility, with a tournament home for more than 30 years, starting in 1983. By the time the 1986 final rolled around, The New York Times described the tournament as one that "seems to have settled on a relatively high plateau, like 'A Chorus Line' or some other durable hit.""Going to New York is what made the Big East tournament," Boeheim said. "It helped make the league."Those were the days, the mid-'80s, back when the Big East ruled college basketball with the most physical of imprints. The conference logo might as well have been a fist. Or a bruise.
Cody Zeller made a go-ahead layup with 13 seconds left and altered Trey Burke's potential game-winner at the other end, lifting No. 2 Indiana to a 72-71 victory over No. 7 Michigan on Sunday and giving the Hoosiers their first outright Big Ten regular-season title in two decades.Jordan Morgan had a fairly easy tip-in attempt of Burke's miss that cut have won it for Michigan, but the ball rolled tantalizingly off the rim, to the dismay of No. 14 Ohio State and No. 10 Michigan State. The Buckeyes, who beat Illinois on Sunday, needed an Indiana loss to earn a share of the conference championship. The Spartans were in the same position entering their game against Northwestern later in the day.The visiting Hoosiers (26-5, 14-4) trailed by 5 points in the final minute but rallied when the Wolverines (25-6, 12-6) were unable to protect their lead at the foul line.After Glen Robinson III made the first of two free throws to give the Wolverines a 71-66 lead with 52 seconds left, Zeller made a shot on the ensuing possession and Tim Hardaway missed the front end of a one-and-one. Zeller then connected on two free throws to cut the lead to a point, but Burke failed to extend it again, missing the front end of another one-and-one.Zeller then scored down low, and Burke and Morgan missed from in close. The Hoosiers will be the top seed at this week's Big Ten tournament in Chicago.OHIO STATE 68, ILLINOIS 55 Deshaun Thomas, a junior playing perhaps his final home game for No. 14 Ohio State (23-7, 13-5), scored 19 points as the Buckeyes briefly kept alive their Big Ten title hopes. Thomas, the Big Ten's leading scorer, helped the Buckeyes earn their fifth straight win and wrap up the No. 2 seed for the conference tournament.WISCONSIN 63, PENN STATE 60 Traevon Jackson made a 3-pointer at the buzzer and finished with 15 points as No. 22 Wisconsin (21-10, 12-6 Big Ten) survived an upset scare at Penn State (10-20, 2-16). The Badgers went the length of the court with less than four seconds left before Jackson pulled up at the wing and made the 3 over the outstretched arm of Kevin Montminy. The officials upheld the basket after a video review.TEMPLE 84, V.C.U. 76 Khalif Wyatt scored 30 points and Jake O'Brien had 19 as host Temple denied No. 21 Virginia Commonwealth a piece of the Atlantic 10 title in its first year in the league. V.C.U. (24-7, 12-4), which would have shared the regular-season conference crown with St. Louis if it had won, will settle for the No. 2 seed in the conference tournament.MICH. ST. 71, NORTHWESTERN 61 Keith Appling scored 16 points and Gary Harris added 12, but No. 10 Michigan State (24-7, 13-5) struggled to put away visiting Northwestern (13-18, 4-14), which lost its eighth in a row.LIBERTY WINS BIG SOUTH Liberty became the second 20-loss team to reach the N.C.A.A. men's tournament when it beat Charleston Southern, 87-76, in the conference tournament final in Conway, S.C. Liberty (15-20), which opened the season with eight losses and had never won more than three in a row until this week, joined Coppin State (2008) as the only programs with 20 or more defeats included in the field.The Flames' .429 winning percentage is the lowest for an N.C.A.A. tournament team since Oakland (Mich.) had a 12-18 record (.400) in 2005."That's awesome," Liberty Coach Dale Layer said. "We've got the hats, right?"CREIGHTON WINS M.V.C. Creighton repeated as the Missouri Valley Conference tournament champion, defeating Wichita State, 68-65, in St. Louis despite 5-for-14 shooting from the M.V.C.'s player of the year, Doug McDermott. The Bluejays (27-7) earned the conference's automatic N.C.A.A. bid when Wichita State missed a 3-pointer just before the buzzer.MAAC SEMIFINALS David Laury scored 20 points and grabbed 17 rebounds as Iona eliminated top-seeded Niagara, 79-73, in the Metro Atlantic Athletic Conference tournament semifinals in Springfield, Mass.The fourth-seeded Gaels (19-13) will face Manhattan in Monday's final. The Jaspers (14-17) beat Fairfield, 60-42, in the other semifinal behind 16 points from Emmy Andujar and 12 from Michael Alvarado.Rhamel Brown added 7 points and 7 rebounds for the sixth-seeded Jaspers, who started the season 6-14 but have won 8 of 11.
BLOOMINGTON, Ind. — Victor Oladipo believes there is a song for every occasion, and to the resignation of his Indiana teammates, those occasions include blinking, breathing and walking."All. The. Time," Will Sheehey said.In the shower, Oladipo turns into Usher. Strolling across campus, he belts out Tyrese. After acing an exam, he croons gospel because, after all, he said, he must thank God. Somehow, between serenades, Oladipo carves some time out of his day, every day, to engage in a more strenuous outlet for entertaining the masses.The basketball court doubles as his stage, a hardwood showcase for showmanship. When the ball is in his hands — and really, often even when it is not — the audience better not look away. If it does, it could miss one of those moments of pure rapture — a vicious block, a ridiculous dunk, an even more ridiculous almost-dunk, like his behind-the-head snag of an errant alley-oop Feb. 2 against Michigan that merits at least a few dozen viewings on YouTube. All elicit a reaction commonplace at Assembly Hall — a deafening round of oh-la-DEE-po! chants, preceded by a what-just-happened facial expression: mouth agape, eyes bulging, hands firmly on head."I've looked in the crowd sometimes," point guard Kevin Ferrell said, "and their faces are pretty much in shock."This season has strained the boundaries of credulity for Oladipo, a 6-foot-5 junior who has blossomed from an undervalued recruit into a finalist for the Wooden Award, given to the nation's top player. He has helped Indiana (26-5) win its first outright Big Ten championship since 1993 — the clincher was a 72-71 victory at Michigan on Sunday — and get in position to nab a No. 1 seed in the N.C.A.A. tournament.He fills a stat sheet with the zeal of a locavore at a farmers' market — steals, rebounds, assists, points and blocks, all crammed onto the nightly résumé of perhaps the country's most versatile, improved and exciting player. If Zeller made it cool again for in-state boys to play for the Hoosiers, then it is Oladipo who made Indiana basketball just plain cool."I don't recall ever seeing a player here have the kind of energy, at both ends of the floor, that Victor shows on an every-game basis," said Don Fischer, the radio voice of Indiana basketball for the last 40 years. "I don't know if we'll see anybody quite like him for a long time."Oladipo is at once efficient and electrifying, melding those treasured Hoosier State virtues of defense, hustle and offensive rebounding with a style as magnetic as his personality. He is averaging 13.7 points and 6.2 rebounds and, while often guarding the opposition's best perimeter threat, leading the team in steals and deflections — the most critical indicator, for Coach Tom Crean and his staff, of a player's defensive activity.Oladipo's defense, especially on the weak side, creates turnovers and, in turn, easy baskets that have sent his overall shooting percentage skyrocketing, to 61.4 percent from 47.1 last season. An uncompromising work ethic — he spends at least an extra 90 minutes every day practicing his shooting or ball-handling — has produced a refined jump shooter who, according to Hoop-math.com, has converted 50 percent of his 2-point jumpers, up from 24 percent."The dude's always pressuring, always up in your grill," Sheehey said.The former Indiana player and coach Dan Dakich was chatting with some of his old teammates recently when the subject turned to Oladipo, and all agreed that they would loathe practicing against him."We all think we're gladiators who survived Coach Knight and all that," said Dakich, now an analyst for ESPN. "In our little world, that's a pretty good compliment."Oladipo's little world, until he arrived here in 2010, was his home in a rural pocket of Upper Marlboro, Md., about 20 miles east of Washington, where the family's closest neighbors are horses and cows. His parents, immigrants from Nigeria who moved to the United States more than 25 years ago, relocated there before high school, attracted by a bigger home in a safer area but also because his father, Chris, enjoyed the seclusion. Oladipo characterized him as "isolated."When discussing his mother, Joan, and his three sisters — Kristine, Kendra and his twin, Victoria — Oladipo laughed and cracked jokes. He said that the five of them should star in a television comedy. "What would it be called?" Oladipo said. "The Oladipos, what else?" But when the conversation turned to his relationship with his father, Oladipo shifted in his chair, his voice dropping as he scanned the room.
PHILADELPHIA — The Nets have effectively flexed their muscles against the weaker teams in the Eastern Conference all season long, but on Monday, they were outhustled and outplayed by the flailing Philadelphia 76ers for almost a full 48 minutes.Just as the Nets looked on the verge of making moves up the postseason ladder, they took a step back with a 106-97 loss at Wells Fargo Center."They played better than we did," Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo seethed. "They played harder than we did. They played harder; they played better. This game meant more to them than it did to us."It may be a haunting loss three weeks from now, after the Nets return from an eight-game road stretch that will surely test their capacity to handle adversity. But after three consecutive wins, including an impressive showing Friday in Atlanta, the Nets were quiet and humbled in the losing locker room."It's just a bad loss for us," guard Deron Williams said. "I thought we were playing better. Came up here and didn't come with the same defensive effort."Williams carried the Nets offensively again, scoring 27 points and recording 13 assists. But Brooklyn was unable to stop Philadelphia when it needed to. The Sixers shot 52.6 percent and had 31 assists while committing only 7 turnovers.Sixers center Spencer Hawes scored a career-high 24 points and had 10 rebounds and 7 assists, and Jrue Holiday finished with 15 points and 11 assists."We just didn't defend," Carlesimo said. "For the meat of the game, they had assists and turnovers, and we had no fouls. We just didn't get it done defensively."The Nets were playing well coming into the game, but a subtle undercurrent of alarm has begun to build in Brooklyn surrounding the steady disappearing act of one of the Nets' big three, Joe Johnson, who has been hampered by a left heel injury since the All-Star break.Johnson scored 20 points, shooting 8 of 11 from the field, one of his better performances. But after the game, he said his heel remains a serious issue. At times, Johnson said, he has felt like he has been playing on one foot."I'm just trying to play through it," Johnson said. "Obviously, it's a bit painful. But at this point of the season, man, I think it's very valuable to have me out there."Johnson sat for three games in February after the injury — described as something similar to plantar fasciitis, or inflammation of the tissue at the base of the foot — first flared up. He returned and has not missed a game since.But his scoring average and shot attempts are down, and he has appeared somewhat stiff and restrained. On Monday, he floated in and out of the action, deferring often to Williams. Except for a few possessions in the second half, Johnson seemed hesitant to back down defenders, normally one of his strengths.Carlesimo said Johnson had refused to keep himself off the practice court or out of games."It's about pain tolerance," Carlesimo said before the game, "and Joe keeps pushing."Without Johnson's ability to stretch the floor and generate points in the post, the Nets have relied heavily on Williams. Center Brook Lopez scored 14 points in the first quarter, and appeared to be on his way to a big night. But he faded from the offense after that, scoring just 5 more points.Carlesimo said Lopez needed to be more aggressive."He's got to present himself," Carlesimo said. "He can also get some rebounds. There's other ways to get it."Gerald Wallace added just 4 points on 2-of-8 shooting. He has struggled mightily trying to pick up the slack while Johnson's woes continue.There is another game Tuesday. In between, Johnson said, count on a lot of icing, massaging and wishing.
Kelly Olynyk had 21 points and 12 rebounds, and top-ranked Gonzaga bolstered its case for a No. 1 seed in the N.C.A.A. tournament by routing Saint Mary's, 65-51, on Monday night in the West Coast Conference tournament final in Las Vegas.Already headed to the N.C.A.A. tournament for the 15th straight season, Gonzaga (31-2) had the look of a No. 1 seed, playing a superb game at both ends.The Zags shot 52 percent from the field, dominated inside and teamed up to hound the Gaels' leading scorer, Matthew Dellavedova, everywhere he went.Saint Mary's (27-6) labored against Gonzaga's attacking defense, particularly after point guard Jorden Page injured his right knee midway through the first half.Dellavedova struggled for the second straight game, scoring 2 points on 1-of-8 shooting. The Gaels went 7 for 27 from 3-point range.Stephen Holt (19 points) led Saint Mary's, which should have a solid enough résumé to earn an at-large N.C.A.A. bid.IONA TOPS MANHATTAN IN M.A.A.C. Tre Bowman scored 20 points and Iona claimed its second straight trip to the N.C.A.A. tournament with a 60-57 win over Manhattan in the Metro Atlantic Athletic Conference championship game in Springfield, Mass. The Gaels (20-13) received an at-large bid last year.Michael Alvarado had 14 points for Manhattan (14-18), which led for much of the game but surrendered it when Iona went on a 17-2 run to take charge.JAMES MADISON WINS C.A.A. A. J. Davis scored 26 points, and James Madison (20-14) put together an early 23-1 run before holding off a furious rally to beat Northeastern, 70-57, in the Colonial Athletic Association final in Richmond, Va.DAVIDSON WINS SOUTHERN De'Mon Brooks had 24 points and 8 rebounds, and Davidson (26-7) repeated as conference tournament champion with a wire-to-wire 74-55 victory over the College of Charleston in Asheville, N.C.W. KENTUCKY WINS SUN BELT George Fant had 17 points and 13 rebounds, and Western Kentucky (20-15) earned its second straight N.C.A.A. berth with a 65-63 win over Florida International in the conference final in Hot Springs, Ark.BAYLOR WINS BIG 12 Top-ranked Baylor continued its dominating run through the Big 12 by winning its third straight conference tournament championship with a 75-47 victory over No. 23 Iowa State. The Lady Bears have won 49 consecutive regular-season and tournament games in the league.
HARTFORD — Connecticut, which has reeled off five consecutive Big East tournament titles in women's basketball, will face a Notre Dame team eyeing its first such crown in Tuesday night's championship game at XL Center.The second-seeded Huskies (28-4) dispatched Syracuse, 64-51, on Monday night in a semifinal after top-seeded Notre Dame (30-1) coasted past Louisville (24-8) by a score of 83-59, its 25th consecutive victory.Notre Dame's winning streak, a university record, includes two taut victories over Connecticut, a 73-72 road decision on Jan. 5 and a three-overtime thriller, 96-87, in the regular-season finale March 4."It's tough to beat a good team three times," said Muffet McGraw, in her 26th season as Notre Dame's coach. "It's going to be another battle, another war, and the outcome will get us ready for the N.C.A.A. tournament whether we win or lose."She spoke minutes before Connecticut tipped off against the third-seeded Orange. The Huskies soon built a 39-24 halftime cushion and rattled off 12 of the final 16 points in the half to take control against the Orange (24-7). They led by as many as 19 points, 46-27, when the junior center Stefanie Dolson made a layup with 14 minutes 40 seconds left.Dolson, in looking ahead to a third meeting with Notre Dame, noted that the Huskies had committed 35 turnovers in their last meeting with the Irish."We have to do a good job of staying settled, playing as a group and making good decisions," she said.Although Notre Dame reached the national championship game the past two years, it has not earned a conference crown since 1994, when it ruled the Midwestern Collegiate Conference, now known as the Horizon League.This is the 18th and most likely last season for the Fighting Irish in the Big East, which will take on a new form next season.
ORLANDO, Fla. — Kobe Bryant had a simple message for Dwight Howard before Howard's first game back in Orlando.Howard did, scoring a season-high 39 points, grabbing 16 rebounds and tying his N.B.A. record with 39 free-throw attempts Tuesday night, leading the Lakers to a 106-97 victory over the Magic.His performance served two purposes: It pushed the Lakers to three games over .500 for the first time this season and further punctuated how much the hapless Magic miss their former franchise player.Even the lusty boos that greeted Howard gradually diminished as he kept pouring in points, most of them from the free-throw line. When Orlando beat the Lakers in the teams' only other meeting this season, at Staples Center last December, Howard was 9 of 21 from the line.But Tuesday, he connected on 25, his confidence growing as the game progressed."I think he grew some, coming back and facing this," said Steve Nash, the Lakers' point guard.The game carried enormous emotion for Howard, who spent his first eight seasons in Orlando, before demanding and finally receiving a trade last August."I came here a boy and left a man," Howard said before the game. "I'll always love Orlando and the fans here."Bryant knew this would not be just another game for Howard. Nor would it be for him, but for different reasons. In a sprint to the postseason, every game is critical for Los Angeles, which is 9-2 over its last 11 games."We're very focused," Bryant said. "We know what we have to do and what lies ahead. Everybody's locked in."This is the Howard the Lakers had hoped they were getting, but had not yet seen. His effectiveness and stamina have noticeably improved."He's been 100 percent better," Coach Mike D'Antoni said. "Before, he couldn't make two or three consecutive jumps. Now he's able to make multiple jumps."Howard said: "I think I am getting a little bit better. I'm just going to keep working on my conditioning, get my timing back and just keep going hard."In concert with this timely surge, the Lakers have been an invigorated fourth-quarter team, a trait that had been lacking all season."We're understanding what we need to do to close out games and win games, and that leads to chemistry," D'Antoni said. "Everybody is accepting everybody. And we're getting healthy, too."Make no mistake, though, it is the chemistry that is deemed most important.Howard, who never before had to take a backseat to a teammate, has openly feuded with Bryant. Howard has criticized the number of shots Bryant takes while complaining about his own lack of touches. Bryant has questioned Howard's toughness, especially his willingness to play through pain.It has not helped that Howard has given multiple interviews in which he engages in the sort of self-analysis that drives the no-nonsense Bryant crazy. Howard also continues to make comments that draw distracting attention to the team.Last week, Howard, a free agent after this season, said he had been text messaging with Phil Jackson. Also, Howard said his career in Orlando was spent playing on teams "full of people nobody wanted."The comment drew swift reaction from former teammates.It also ratcheted up the volume of boos for Tuesday's game."All the boos and stuff, I expected that," Howard said. "But nothing is ever going to stop the way I feel about this city."
With the Atlantic Division-leading Knicks slogging through a Western trip, the second-place Nets are in Brooklyn with a chance to cut the Knicks' lead in the standings before they begin their own long Western swing next week. On Tuesday, one day after a dismal defeat to lowly Philadelphia, the short-handed Nets rebounded with a thorough and systematic 108-98 victory over another last-place team, the New Orleans Hornets .In an entertaining game that featured a matchup between twins, Brook Lopez at center for the Nets and Robin Lopez at the same position for the Hornets, the Nets triumphed at what may be a pivotal juncture in their season — just before four consecutive days off and one game before an eight-game, 17-day trip."Bounce-back wins after disappointing losses are huge," said Deron Williams, who had a stellar game playing without his backcourt mate Joe Johnson, who sat out to rest a sore left heel. "It's a nice setup to our little break, and it keeps some of the momentum we've been building going."The Nets have won four of their last five games and will host Atlanta on Sunday before heading West.The game within the game Tuesday was between the Lopez brothers, and the result was a resounding victory for Brook, who not only had a game-high 26 points to his brother's 15 points, but came through with the highlight play of the game.With the Nets clinging to a 5-point lead late in the third quarter, Lopez took a pass just inside the foul line and soared over his brother for a powerful, in-your-face dunk that brought the Barclays Center crowd to its feet and gave the Nets a 72-65 lead.Asked if he would talk to his brother about it after the game, Brook said: "I might try, but I don't think he'll put up with me for too long. We don't talk on the court. I will expect the rest of my family to talk trash to him."Brook Lopez's performance was one obvious story line, but the response by Williams and the Nets' bench to the absence of Johnson was as pivotal.Williams controlled the game nearly from start to finish, scoring 21 points with 13 assists and only 2 turnovers.Where Williams left off, the Nets' bench picked up, outscoring the Hornets' bench, 38-25. The backup center Andray Blatche scored 18 points, and the swingman MarShon Brooks added a critical 14 points. Coach P. J. Carlesimo had Blatche and Lopez on the court together in the second half, and it proved effective, improving the defense and opening lanes for the guards."Having two guys with big bodies and long arms is good defensively, and on offense, they can set a lot of picks and move people around," Williams said. "It's a good combo."The Nets held a comfortable lead through most of the game, although the Hornets tied the score at 78-78 with 20.6 seconds remaining in the third quarter. But Blatche, whose energy off the bench gave the Nets a boost throughout the game, made a layup at the buzzer.Brooks opened the fourth quarter with a 15-foot jumper that also drew a foul. When Brooks made that free throw, the Nets' lead was 5 points; it grew throughout the final quarter.The Nets led by 9 points at intermission, but lost some of their defensive intensity in the third quarter, which allowed New Orleans guard Eric Gordon, who led the Hornets with 24 points, to get free for some open jumpers. But every time the Hornets fought back, the Nets answered.After the game, Carlesimo was relieved."I like where we're at," he said, and then with a nod to the upcoming schedule, he added: "After Sunday we start the merry-go-round of the rest of our trip."
HARTFORD — Notre Dame 's women's basketball team left the Big East in style, winning the conference tournament for the first time when Natalie Achonwa's basket with 1.8 seconds left provided a 61-59 victory over Connecticut on Tuesday night.Notre Dame, playing in the championship game for the seventh time and the third consecutive year, had been foiled by the Huskies on each previous bid for the title. It appeared to be in danger of another disappointment when Connecticut ran off 6 consecutive points to tie the score, 59-59, on Stefanie Dolson's lay-in with 59 seconds left.After the top-seeded Fighting Irish (31-1) called for a timeout with 42.4 seconds to go, the senior point guard Skylar Diggins penetrated the left side of the lane but misfired. She atoned, however, with a steal off a bad pass and a perfect pass downcourt that set up Achonwa's winning lay-up."I think it's special because it's the last one," said Muffet McGraw, in her 26th season as Notre Dame's coach. "It's nice to leave here as champions."Diggins said of the conference title: "It means a lot to our team. I think this is our coming of age."With the Big East realigning and Notre Dame bound for the Atlantic Coast Conference after 18 seasons in the conference, the Fighting Irish used their program-record 26 consecutive victory to secure their first conference crown since 1994, when they ruled the Midwestern Collegiate Conference, now the Horizon League.Second-seeded Connecticut (29-4) had won the tournament each of the previous five years to go with a 17-game winning streak in tournament games. But the Huskies missed all five of their attempts from 3-point range — Notre Dame went 3 for 12 from long range — and suffered their third consecutive narrow defeat to the Fighting Irish this season.Still, Coach Geno Auriemma remained hopeful as he looked to the N.C.A.A. tournament."History has shown that what happens during the regular season, doesn't necessarily mean that's what's going to happen in the postseason," he said.Jack Swarbrick, Notre Dame's athletic director, met with reporters before tip-off to discuss the school's decision to join the A.C.C. next autumn rather than wait one year, as had originally been contemplated."When the Catholic 7 made their announcement and accelerated their departure, it really made it more of an imperative for both parties to expedite it, and it really gave us a template to follow," said Swarbrick, referring to the seven universities that will form their own league but retain the Big East's name.Swarbrick left it unclear whether the rivalry between Notre Dame and Connecticut, which gave women's basketball a needed lift, will endure."Football scheduling tends to be an athletic director's business," he said. "Basketball scheduling tends to be a coach's business. Whatever our coach wants to do and whatever UConn's coach wants to do, I'm sure will have the support of both schools."
Chris Lawless knows about bad beats. He has had plenty of particularly painful gambling losses, but he sure did not see it coming Monday night in the Metro Atlantic Athletic Conference men's basketball tournament championship game between Iona and Manhattan.He was at home in Las Vegas with the fingernails of one hand dug into the armrest of his easy chair and a betting slip from a local casino clutched in the other. Lawless was feeling awfully good about himself.There were six seconds left in the game and Iona was ahead, 60-52, and on its way to a berth in the N.C.A.A. tournament. Lawless was on his way to a big payday. He had bet $40 on a six-team parlay and already had five winners. All the Gaels had to do was run out the clock, and the crumpled ticket in his hand would be worth $1,600.What could go wrong?There is winning, and then there is covering the point spread. It is an important distinction to gamblers, who are forecast to legally wager an estimated $200 million this month with Nevada sports books, and billions more with illegal bookies and offshore betting shops as the N.C.A.A. tournament takes flight.Iona was a 4-point favorite and Lawless did not panic when Manhattan's Shane Richards sank a last-second, 3-pointer to narrow the score to 60-55. The Iona fans stormed the court, players celebrated. The game was over.Or was it? No, there was 0.1 second left when the ball ripped through the net and a technical foul was called on Iona for prematurely starting its celebration. Lawless's heart sank when Donovan Kates stepped to the line and hit the first of two free throws to bring Manhattan to 60-56.Lawless hoped Kates would miss the second attempt to preserve a tie — or push in gamblers' parlance — which would have netted him an $800 payday.No such luck; the ball fell through.The Gaels may have won, 60-57, but Lawless had managed to snatch defeat from the jaws of victory."I couldn't sleep all night," said Lawless on Tuesday by phone. "I tried to count to 10 million. Worst beat ever."On Twitter and talk radio and across betting forums, casual gamblers and hard-core bettors agreed with him."If you can come up w/ a scenario for a worse beat than the end of Iona/ Manhattan then your mind works like Jigsaw in the Saw movies," ESPN's Scott Van Pelt posted."Worst moose of my life," lamented a member of the sports gambling Covers Community, employing the hipper term for being beat in impossible fashion.At the Las Vegas Hotel & Casino, shellshocked gamblers sat in silence trying to comprehend what had occurred."It certainly created havoc," said Jay Kornegay, the vice president of the Las Vegas Hotel & Casino's race and sports book operations. "We had people just staring at sheets, and they didn't move for like a half-hour."The bad beat is a rite of passage for gamblers of all stripes and can be as memorable as a first kiss or as stomach turning as a teenager's first losing bout with alcohol.There have been a raft of them in recent months across the sports spectrum.In the fall, the Green Bay Packers were 3 ½-point favorites and led the Seattle Seahawks, 12-7, on "Monday Night Football" when Seahawks quarterback Russell Wilson heaved a desperation pass toward the back corner of the end zone on the final play. Two replacement officials disagreed on whether it was a touchdown or an interception, before deciding that Seahawks receiver Golden Tate had come down with the ball.On Dec. 31 in the Belk Bowl, Duke was getting 9 points and was on Cincinnati's 5-yard line poised to break a 34-34 tie with less than two minutes left. The Blue Devils fumbled, the Bearcats recovered and, with 44 seconds left, took a 41-34 lead with an 83-yard touchdown reception.On the Las Vegas scoreboard — the one that matters to gamblers — it was 43-41, Duke. No worries. With 14 seconds left, however, Duke threw an interception that was returned for a touchdown, and the final score was 48-34. Ouch!The day after Manhattan hung a moose, Lawless — a new resident of Las Vegas (he moved there five months ago from Houston) — discovered the yin to the bad-beat's yang. After posting his losing ticket on Twitter, he gained a couple hundred more followers and saw his predicament bemoaned on gambling forums.But there was one faction that met him with deafening silence. "I haven't heard a peep from anyone who had Manhattan," he said.The professionals, of course, are not surprised that while misery might love company, those who have been gift-horsed really do not have much to say."You rarely hear anyone talk about the lucky win," said Marty Otto, a handicapper and general manager of the Sports Memo gambling site. "Psychologically, they pass it off as 'I was right all along.' "Now what separates the cool and calculating gambler from the reckless and callow punter is what he or she does in the wake of a bad beat. For Lawless, it was a three-step process. He highlighted the positive: "I was 22-4 over the last few days and had hit a couple six-team parlays, so I was playing with their money.Next, he looked for a lesson."It was bad money management," he conceded. "I actually thought about hedging at halftime, but didn't do it."Finally, he got right back on that horse and told his new Twitter followers what Tuesday's ticket would look like in language that they understood."Today's plays: Orlando +8.5 Orlando over 208.5 Boston -10.5 Atlanta +10 NO + 6 Florida A&M +7.5 Leans: Nevada +3.5 So Fla/ set on U 115.5"
DENVER — Ty Lawson did not take the bait to talk his way into a trap. He is the Denver Nuggets ' quick-thinking point guard — not far removed from the conversation that includes the N.B.A.'s best — who can turn the direction of the delicate Carmelo question as deftly as he crosses over on the dribble."Are we better since the trade?" he said, relaxing at courtside, having finished a recent practice. "I'm not going to say that. I'll just say we're different. Our record is comparable, pretty much the same, still in that fifth-fourth area of the conference."That said, here is the unabashed assertion made by Lawson and the Nuggets even as they straddle the line of fraternal diplomacy: they are still on the rise, a work in progress, perhaps in the process of one day going to a place where no Nugget, including Carmelo Anthony, has gone before.That would be an N.B.A. championship series, which, granted, may not be likely for this season's Nuggets — 43-22 after Monday night's 108-93 victory in Phoenix, their ninth straight — in the powerful Western Conference.That ambition may be no less wishful than the play-in-June dreams of Anthony, who on Wednesday night will make his first visit to his former shooting gallery, Pepsi Center, since forcing a three-team trade to the Knicks in February 2011.Lawson, the only holdover player here from when Anthony was a premier western gunslinger, said: "Most of the players on this team are under the age of 25. We're definitely still learning what we're all about, getting better each day. I don't think we know what our ceiling is yet."This could be in stark contrast to the Knicks, who are having their best season in more than a decade but whose ceiling may be sagging a little too soon as injuries have ravaged their geriatric roster.The consensus on the Anthony trade — considering that the free-agency-bound forward gave the Nuggets no choice but to move him — has generally supported the contention of Masai Ujiri, Denver's general manager, who in a recent interview said: "Win-win, all the way. They wanted to contend, and we wanted to rebuild with young players."The effect that few envisioned was that the Nuggets would immediately do more winning than the Knicks. In a deeper conference with more teams capable of making a title run, they have succeeded in 63 percent of their regular-season games since the trade to the Knicks' 57 percent. While losing twice in the first round, they have won four playoff games to the Knicks' one."I can't deny that I'm a little bit — not in awe — but very surprised that we've done it so quickly and consistently," said the Nuggets' veteran coach, George Karl, who was known to chafe at Anthony's ball-monopolizing tendencies and who, more than anyone, has delighted in his team's swift recovery without a so-called franchise player."I know it's nice to have Kevin Durant, it's nice to have Tim Duncan, a LeBron James," he said, referring to dominant players who can take over a game. "But just because a guy gets paid millions and millions doesn't mean he's a guy that is responsible enough to tell an owner, 'Hey, you give me the money, you're going to win and you're going to win in the playoffs.' How many guys are on that list?"He did not mention Anthony, whose teams have advanced beyond the first round once in nine playoff seasons, so we may assume he was suggesting that the jury is still out or letting the record speak for itself.Karl did add that he hoped Denver fans would treat Anthony's return — assuming his stiff right knee allows him to play after a lackluster game Monday night at Golden State in which the Knicks were drubbed — "as a celebration and figure it out that this is a guy who took a franchise that had won 16 games, or whatever, and in one season got them on the right path."Actually, the Nuggets won 17 games, pre-Anthony, in 2002-03, and 43 the next season on the way to a high of 54 victories in 2008-9, when they lost to the Los Angeles Lakers in the Western Conference finals.Knicks fans would no doubt settle for such a climb this season and would hail Anthony as their conquering hero. Since the three-team trade that more or less gutted the Knicks' lineup around Amar'e Stoudemire, N.B.A. critics, while applauding Denver's stunning reconstruction, have generally given the Knicks a thumbs-up for their side of the trade for a couple of reasons.For one, Stoudemire's inability to remain healthy has justified the acquisition of another brand-name star. For another, many people believe that championships are won with transcendent players, and Anthony, at least on the offensive end, is one of a handful. But as Karl noted, "Great talent doesn't guarantee you winning."
ST. LOUIS — The chant came from the student section as Chaifetz Arena shook, as fans with blue paint streaks in their hair and "All About the Billikens" T-shirts on their backs stood and roared. The final seconds of a season unlike any other ticked away, history in reach.The seniors knew Majerus best. He traveled the world in search of their commitments, taught them the game that he called "ball," molded them into cornerstones of the first St. Louis University men's basketball team to win an outright regular-season conference title since the 1956-57 season, a milestone the Billikens achieved last weekend.Saturday was their senior day, nostalgia day, made all the more sentimental for the absence of Majerus. They learned of his death after the first December practice, carried the coffin at his funeral and honored his legacy by securing the No. 1 seed in this week's Atlantic 10 tournament at Barclays Center in Brooklyn. They think of him when they eat Italian food or execute perfect backdoor cuts. They remember the laughter, the perpetual food stains, the presence.It feels as if he is still around. The spirit of St. Louis.As senior day ended, "Sweet Caroline" played over the arena loudspeakers — "Good times never seemed so good. So good! So good! So good!" — and the seniors addressed the crowd."For you, Coach," guard Kwamain Mitchell said as he pointed skyward.As the stands emptied and St. Louis (24-6) cut down the nets, the parents of the senior forward Cody Ellis, Mike and Robyn, told Majerus stories. Like how he visited them in Australia and talked basketball and bodysurfing at the beach. Or how he nursed Ellis through mononucleosis and a shoulder injury. Or the first impression he made. That took place on an Ellis family trip to the United States to visit four universities. At the other colleges, the coaches told Ellis how great he was and how much money had gone into their facilities. Majerus sat down and grabbed a pencil and diagramed plays. Same as he did with the grandmother of forward Dwayne Evans, a post player in the example Majerus had drawn up.Asked what Majerus would have said as the scene on Saturday unfolded, Robyn Ellis ventured, "It's about bloody time, boys."That was Majerus, a basketball coach in title but a teacher at the core, blunt until the end. Chris May, the St. Louis athletic director, used to watch Majerus conduct practice, in his element, all those X's and O's, and he saw not a coach but "an artist." It was like watching Matisse paint."Just seeing what you've done on film, he could tell you exactly what you're going to be good at, how you're going to be good at it and what plays you could run to be good at what you're going to be good at," said Cody Ellis, his hair painted with a blue stripe down the middle. "He was brilliant."Majerus seemed to enjoy practice, the process, more than games. After he notched his 500th career victory, he scurried into the locker room before the university could conduct the ceremony, upset at the way his team had played and forgetting about the planned celebration. His assistants had to fetch him.He took the St. Louis job in 2007, after a hiatus in the broadcast booth and a few days as the coach at Southern California in 2004, and set about another reclamation project at the second-oldest Jesuit university in the nation, founded in 1818. He moved into a hotel in the city, the Chase Park Plaza. He renovated the space next to the locker room; instead of a team lounge, as intended, he built a classroom, where the keys to victory — defend, rebound — never changed.Majerus fostered a family atmosphere. He called his charges Team Together, two words he repeated dozens of times daily. Players repeated that phrase, hokey as it was, before every practice, during every game, after every meal, every lift."We'd tell recruits, the pool table and all that stuff is in the student union," said Jim Whitesell, the associate head coach. "The classroom is where you prepare to win. This is what we're about. This is our culture."
In its opening game this season, the Liberty men's basketball team had two starters sidelined with injuries and lost by 42 points.Then things got really bleak.The team's best returning player was ruled out for the season with a stress fracture in his foot. Two others in the playing rotation quit the team. And Liberty, the Christian institution founded by Jerry Falwell in Lynchburg, Va., lost its next seven games."It was doom and gloom," said Liberty Coach Dale Layer, describing the team's mood with an 0-8 record. "But I told the players that if we held out hope and kept it together day by day, we still had a chance. I said, 'Trust me, in this sport, if you play well at the end of the year, that's all that matters.' "Keeping the faith is a way of life at Liberty, and while the team continued on an uneven path through the regular season, when the Big South Conference postseason tournament rolled around, it was ready to test Layer's maxim.With four consecutive upsets, each one a little more astounding than the last, Liberty won the Big South tournament and barged into the N.C.A.A. tournament with a 15-20 record. Liberty was in the big dance, a Cinderella before the ball."As adults, you tell your kids that they can defy logic and beat all the odds," Layer said. "But it is life-changing for them when they see it happen. And they'll never forget it."The Flames became the second team with 20 or more losses to qualify for college basketball's marquee event, joining Coppin State's team from 2008.Earning an automatic berth into the national obsession that is March Madness is another step in the institutional mission of athletics at Liberty, where the hope is that the teams will help spread the word of evangelical Christianity throughout the United States. Liberty has a motto for its cause: "Champions for Christ."And while few people filling out N.C.A.A. tournament brackets next week will have Liberty advancing to the championship game, millions will, for a few seconds at least, ponder the Flames' fate — and pause to wonder who they are."Maybe everyone in New York will learn about us now," said guard Davon Marshall, who is from Niagara Falls, N.Y., and who until a year ago attended Monroe College, founded in the Bronx 80 years ago. "I've spent too much time in the last year explaining where Liberty is."The university is in the midst of an athletic spending spree on facilities, scholarships and coaches that has elevated the competitive level of many sports — the women's basketball team, for example, has made the N.C.A.A. tournament in 16 of the last 17 years. Administrators, including Chancellor Jerry Falwell Jr., a son of the founder, are lobbying to join a Bowl Championship Series conference so the football team can one day vault into the big time. The idea is for Liberty to do in the 21st century for evangelical Christians what Notre Dame football did for Roman Catholics in the 20th."There's going to be a lot of TVs tuned to the N.C.A.A. tournament next week," Athletic Director Jeff Barber said. "They're going to see Liberty, and they'll hear a little of our story and hopefully learn what makes us unique."The Liberty roster is already an unusual mix of players from all over the United States, as well as Poland, Venezuela and Nigeria. It features players who turned down scholarship offers from major basketball programs like Oregon, Oklahoma, Providence and Nevada-Las Vegas, at least in part because of the Christian education at Liberty.Marshall, named the Big South tournament's most valuable player after making 17 of 24 3-point shots during Liberty's four postseason games, turned down several other Division I institutions when he left Monroe last year."I grew up in church a lot, and I wanted to be around people with a similar background," said Marshall, who had no scholarship offers out of high school and walked on at Monroe. "I wanted to keep my Christian foundation."His backcourt mate, John Caleb Sanders, was ranked among the top high school recruits from the Houston area but spurned several established programs and committed to Liberty in his sophomore year of high school.Home schooled by his parents — his mother did the tutoring and his father the coaching — Sanders played in the Homeschool Christian Youth Association, as did his older brother, Jesse, who played for Liberty until last year and left as the team's career assists leader.
The Atlantic 10 Conference introduced itself to Brooklyn on Thursday by producing one of the more ridiculous endings to a college basketball game in recent memory. The very first game of the conference's very first tournament at Barclays Center ended with three technical fouls and an ejection in the final 4.7 seconds as Charlotte pulled off an improbable 68-63 victory over Richmond, which had led by 3 points with less than five seconds left."You couldn't make that up if you wanted to make a movie out of that one," Charlotte Coach Alan Major said.Richmond Coach Chris Mooney tossed his jacket. Charlotte guard Pierria Henry attempted 11 straight free throws. And an intimate crowd at this cavernous arena was treated to a finish both bizarre and sublime. It was, in other words, an ideal start for the Atlantic 10.Controversy sells, especially in New York, and as the conference made its Brooklyn debut a mere MetroCard swipe away from the valedictory Big East tournament at Madison Square Garden, any buzz would do in this basketball-sated city."You could certainly call New York the center of the college basketball world this week," said John Giannini, coach of fourth-seeded La Salle.The noon game between eighth-seeded Richmond and ninth-seeded Charlotte was the province of the hard-core fan, or at least a few hundred of them. Yet the conference had never seen anything quite like it: a relatively innocuous affair slipping into something close to anarchy with Richmond leading, 63-60.Mooney opted to have his team foul Henry, the Charlotte guard, to prevent him from getting a look at a potentially game-tying 3-pointer with 4.7 seconds left. After Henry sank his first free-throw attempt, Richmond's Derrick Williams shoved Charlotte's Willie Clayton, with whom he had been battling for rebounding position. Williams was whistled for a technical foul — a momentous call considering the time and score.Reggie Greenwood, the Atlantic 10's coordinator of officials, said that because the violation occurred on a dead-ball situation, Charlotte was awarded an additional two shots plus possession."Basketball's a hard game," Mooney said. "It's very physical. There's a lot of positioning and things that happen during the course of the game, and you kind of have to make sure to recognize the time and score of the game so that you don't have anything like that happen."Henry sank all three free throws to give Charlotte a 64-63 lead, and Richmond was forced to foul. That plan quickly went awry. Richmond's Cedrick Lindsay tried to grab Henry on the inbounds pass, but there was no call. Instead, Henry took two dribbles and drew a foul on Richmond's Greg Robbins as he heaved up a shot from near midcourt with 2.8 seconds left.At that point, Mooney lost it. He ripped off his jacket and stomped to midcourt. Lindsay pushed him back to the Richmond bench, but it was too late. Mooney was called for two technicals and ejected. After the officials added it all up, Henry made his way to the line for seven — yes, seven — free throws. Henry said it felt as if he were at the line for "30 minutes." He made four of them.Mooney said he was upset because he thought Lindsay had fouled Robbins immediately."I was upset, and probably too upset," he said. "It's a pretty devastating way to lose the game, and I feel bad for our players and for our fans because I really thought we had put ourselves in position to win the game."Charlotte's escape made the other games — Butler's 73-67 victory against Dayton, St. Joseph's 58-57 win over Xavier and Massachusetts's 77-72 victory against George Washington — seem tame by comparison. The games were played before modest crowds, though Bernadette V. McGlade, the conference's commissioner, said she anticipated solid attendance this weekend."We've never had a sold-out event, so that doesn't happen overnight," she said, referring to the tournament's 14 previous sites along the Eastern Seaboard, ranging from Curry Hicks Cage in Amherst, Mass., to Boardwalk Hall in Atlantic City, which had hosted the last six tournaments.The A-10 has a five-year deal with Barclays, and the belief among conference officials is that the arena will generate visibility. Dave Wiggins, a 38-year-old news cameraman from East Providence, R.I., was the first spectator through the doors when they opened at 11 a.m."I just love college basketball," said Wiggins, whose favorite team, Rhode Island, did not qualify for the tournament.Wiggins said he paid $60 total for lower-bowl seats to Thursday's afternoon and evening sessions. He planned to stay the night in Brooklyn before heading home the next morning. He packed light: toothbrush, toothpaste, phone charger. Not even a change of clothes."To see four games in one day is exciting," Wiggins said.And yet like many other fans, Wiggins said he was anxious about the conference's future. He wondered how things would shake out once conference realignment's game of musical chairs ended, if it ever does.For the Atlantic 10, any change at this point will not be change for the good. Two high-profile members have already announced their imminent departures, with Charlotte heading to Conference USA and Temple joining the yet-to-be-named conference comprising the non-Catholic universities that will remain from the old Big East.Two other Atlantic 10 universities, Butler and Xavier, are expected to join the Catholic colleges in their new conference, which will be known as the Big East. And that conference could recruit other programs, like St. Louis and Dayton. The Atlantic 10 is not in a position of power right now, not with other conferences dangling more lucrative TV contracts as bait.The conference might have a $1 billion arena at its disposal, but that only carries so much weight."I think every conference commissioner is concerned about realignment, and I'd have my head in the sand if I told you anything different," McGlade said.Referring to the new-look Big East, she added: "When you have a start-up conference with the financial backing that they appear to have, that's a concern. But that's not something that's going to take away from our week here."For one afternoon, at least, the Atlantic 10 did its best to make an impression.
CHICAGO — The question should not have stumped Michigan Coach John Beilein, but it did.Standing inside the Wolverines' locker room at the United Center, Beilein finally relaxed Thursday after his team dispatched Penn State, 83-66, in the first round of the Big Ten Conference tournament. His suit jacket long abandoned, and the sleeves of his French blue shirt still pushed up to the elbows, Beilein tried to recall the last time the sixth-ranked Wolverines won without stressing out their coach or their fans."I think there have been two, maybe, unstressful second halves," he said finally. "I'd have to go all the way to December against a nonconference team. I don't recall one."Until Michigan, which fell behind, 14-3, pulled away in the last 10 minutes, this was another of those preposterously competitive games that characterized the Big Ten season. The Nittany Lions (10-21), the worst team in the 12-team conference, already played Michigan tougher than anyone could expect, losing, 79-71, in Ann Arbor before overcoming a 15-point second-half deficit to shock the Wolverines, 84-78, at home on Feb. 17.That Michigan (26-6), ranked No. 1 as late as Jan. 28, found itself playing on the first day of the tournament provided the strongest evidence of the Big Ten's quality and competitiveness.Four Big Ten teams were ranked in the top 10 this week — No. 3 Indiana, the No. 6 Wolverines, No. 8 Michigan State and No. 10 Ohio State. No other conference has as many. Then throw in No. 22 Wisconsin, which Michigan will play in Friday's quarterfinals.Minnesota and Illinois also spent multiple weeks as ranked teams, with Minnesota rising as high as No. 8 and knocking off Indiana, then No. 1, before dropping off. Illinois opened the tournament Thursday with a thriller, ousting Minnesota, 51-49, on Brandon Paul's buzzer-beating jumper. Illinois pulled its own stunner in December by winning, 85-74, at Gonzaga, the nation's No. 1 team.With so many ranked teams, Beilein noted it was nearly impossible to get through a week of conference play without facing one."Every year is pretty good, but I thought the depth of the conference, of the teams in the league, proved to be what everybody predicted — the best conference in the country, as it's been the last few years," said Minnesota Coach Tubby Smith, who formerly coached at Kentucky. "This year, we've been at a different level compared to other conferences. It's the best I've seen."So when Michigan lost two of its final four games, one to Penn State and the other a 72-71 heartbreaker to Indiana on Sunday, the Wolverines found themselves in an unfathomable place — sixth in the nation yet seeded fifth in the conference, missing a first-round bye by one place."That's what happens when you play in this conference," said the junior forward Jordan Morgan, whose potential game-winning put-back in the final seconds against Indiana rolled off the rim. "We lost some games we probably shouldn't have lost."Beilein said: "We had four games where the ball was in the air, the buzzer went off, and we win or lose. And we were 2-2. We could have gone 4-0, and we could have been 0-4. We're the exact same team. That's the thing that we have to balance through right now, the emotional thing."They still might. Michigan's trail here probably includes more rematches with teams it lost to — Wisconsin on Friday, with the possibility of Indiana in Saturday's semifinals and Michigan State or Ohio State in Sunday's final.An Indiana-Michigan return engagement would be juicy. After the last one, Indiana Coach Tom Crean yelled at the Wolverines assistant Jeff Meyer, accusing him of wrecking the Hoosiers' program. Meyer had been an Indiana assistant to Kelvin Sampson, who resigned in 2008 in the midst of a recruiting scandal that led to three years of N.C.A.A. probation and the loss of one scholarship. Crean apologized the next day.Teams that last until Saturday here will leave beat up and exhausted. Whether this week benefits the five or six teams expected to advance to the N.C.A.A. tournament remains to be seen.Devyn Marble scored 19 points to help Iowa (21-11) hold on for a 73-59 victory over Northwestern in the first round. The Hawkeyes continued their late-season push for a spot in the N.C.A.A. tournament with their eighth victory in 10 games. ... Shavon Shields scored 19 points, Brandon Ubel added 16 points and 8 rebounds, and Nebraska beat Purdue, 57-55. The Cornhuskers (15-17) hung on after Purdue's Terone Johnson missed two shots in the closing seconds. (AP)
A.C.C. FIRST ROUND Olivier Hanlan set an A.C.C. tournament record for freshmen with 41 points, and Boston College beat Georgia Tech , 84-64, in Greensboro, N.C. Hanlan was 14 of 18, made his final 12 shots and was a one-man show in bringing the eighth-seeded Eagles (16-16) back from an early 15-0 deficit.Dez Wells scored 14 of his 21 points in the second half and Maryland (21-11) beat pesky Wake Forest, 75-62.Richard Howell scored 22 points with 12 rebounds while Lorenzo Brown led the defensive effort on the league player of the year Erick Green to help North Carolina State (23-9) beat Virginia Tech, 80-63.SEC SECOND ROUND Kedren Johnson hit all four of his free throws in the final 19.8 seconds, and 10th-seeded Vanderbilt (15-16) upset No. 7 seed Arkansas, 75-72, in Nashville in its first chance at defending its tournament championship.Jordan McRae scored 17 points as fifth-seeded Tennessee defeated Mississippi State, 69-53. Tennessee (20-11) won for the ninth time in 10 games.Shavon Coleman scored 24 points, and L.S.U. held off Georgia, 68-63, to give the first-year coach Johnny Jones a win in his SEC tournament debut. The Tigers (19-11) next face 13th-ranked Florida.BIG 12 QUARTERFINALS Ben McLemore scored 24 points to lead seventh-ranked Kansas to a 91-63 rout of Texas Tech in Kansas City, Mo., setting up a date with Iowa State. The Jayhawks (27-5) shot 66 percent from the field.Rodney McGruder scored 24 points and sparked an 11-0 run in the second half, lifting 11th-ranked Kansas State past Texas, 66-49.Melvin Ejim had 23 points and 12 rebounds and Will Clyburn fueled a 12-0 second-half run, helping Iowa State survive an uncharacteristic 3-point drought to beat Oklahoma, 73-66.
It would be wise to remember the compelling scoreboard evidence in the case against the Knicks as a team on the go, evidence that was flashing even before Tyson Chandler went down and Carmelo Anthony went out in a truly forgettable homecoming on Wednesday night for both him and his fellow former Nuggets.But it wasn't so much that the explosive home team, fresh off a devastating 17-0 run, was leading, 58-38, with 1 minute 28 seconds left in the first half. It was more how thoroughly Denver was destroying the sore-kneed Anthony and his slow-footed company, practically reducing the Knicks' early season promise to a myth."Don't you love watching them play?" said the 74-year-old Doug Moe at halftime, referring to the Nuggets, who were leading by 22 and on their way to a 10th straight victory and 33rd in 43 games.A onetime American Basketball Association gunner for such makeshift outfits as the New Orleans Buccaneers and the Oakland Oaks, Moe coached in Denver across the 1980s and in San Antonio before that, and none of his teams were ever accused of not having a freewheeling brand of fast-break fun."They play together, they hit the boards, they run on everything," a delighted Moe said on his way out to watch the Nuggets complete a 117-94 rout. "They're so much more fun than these teams that come down, hold the ball, one pass and then a shot."If only because he had just watched that startling contrast play out in 24 decisive minutes, he was referring in that latter critique to the isolation-addicted Knicks. With the Nuggets firing on all cylinders (including charter members of the Traded for Anthony Association, Wilson Chandler and Danilo Gallinari), the Knicks, athletically and stylistically, looked like a team of worn-out pistons, and of Fort Wayne vintage."Transition, transition, transition," the Knicks' coaches had written on the locker room board, a warning in triplicate that was much easier to read than repel. The highlight reel of marginally contested layups and dunks should have left little doubt on whether the 44-22 Nuggets have transitioned into the superior team just two years after Anthony — their erstwhile franchise player — forced a trade to New York.The Denver crowd lustily booed Anthony and taunted, "Who needs Melo?" not that Anthony was around to hear it. After Tyson Chandler collided with Denver's Corey Brewer and left with what the Knicks called a contused knee, Anthony walked off early in the third quarter to get treatment on a right knee that has been stiff with fluid buildup."He pulled the plug on it," Coach Mike Woodson said, an admission, in effect, that the Knicks had too many problems to be worrying about how they compared with the young, vibrant and, by reputation, superstarless Nuggets.When the Knicks went on to Portland for Thursday night's game against the Trail Blazers, Anthony made plans to return to New York to have the knee-draining procedure he had stubbornly resisted. He figures to be out for a spell while Chandler, who played down the severity of his injury, could miss time on a five-game trip that began with an ugly blowout at Golden State and might have been the road to perdition if the Knicks weren't a fortunate resident of the Eastern Conference.Still first in the Atlantic Division and in the third overall playoff position, they would have to do some serious losing to slide further, and that would assume flawed teams like the Nets, the Celtics, the Hawks and the Derrick Rose-less Bulls could string together victories.If Anthony's injury does not require extended rest, or worse, geography could be what helps keep the Knicks' season from devolving into wreckage — though Chandler, their 7-foot standup guy, admitted there was more to be concerned about than the recent run of rotten luck."We've been in a little bit of a decline, even in some of our wins," he said. "There are some things we have to address on the team."One thing that must be asked as the regular season winds down: Did Knicks management, in its effort to load the roster with veterans bearing postseason scars to provide leadership for their actual money players, bring on too many in a state of physical decline?This particular matchup with the Nuggets made that question seem more like an indictment. Players like Ty Lawson and Andre Iguodala made the Knicks look decrepit. Wilson Chandler, who scored 24 points, went to the basket at will. We know running teams are dangerous off long missed jumpers, but the Nuggets beat the Knicks down the court even after New York scored.And then there was Kenneth Faried, the second-year forward from Newark, rapidly becoming the N.B.A.'s dominant hustle player, looking as if he were rebounding off a trampoline, reminding us of what the Knicks' roster sorely lacks."I'm not even sure how he's everyplace at once," said Moe, a regular at Pepsi Center, where the Nuggets are 29-3. "I mean, they've got a whole bunch of really good players. I'm telling you, they're a threat."Conversely, the Nuggets are also in the ocean-deep Western Conference, where they could play rugged Memphis in the first round of the playoffs, and lose. But for now, they are rolling as much as the Knicks are reeling.Remember when Jason Kidd was such an integral part of the Knicks' 18-5 start? On Wednesday night, Woodson could keep him on the floor for only 8 minutes 55 seconds against the Nuggets' speedy offense.Remember how much of a brilliant stroke signing Rasheed Wallace seemed to be? Before Anthony emerged from the locker room to discuss his knee, Wallace hobbled away on crutches, another name on the growing list for those wishing to make excuses.At least Woodson did not. "I'm not going to blame it on that," he said, referring to the losses of Chandler and Anthony. "We got down. We were terrible at getting back."Transition, transition, transition. Is there time for the Knicks to get back to where they were, or is this old, used team running on empty?
LAS VEGAS — In college basketball, they are blurred backdrops to the back and forth of the game and the tight close-ups of the leading man. Like movie extras, they get screen time but barely any credit.They are both everywhere and nowhere, ubiquitous and anonymous, this subspecies known as "assistant coaches." And as with fraternity boys or bachelorette partyers, nowhere do they multiply and mingle as they have around Las Vegas this week, part of an impromptu convention, to go along with all the others.The city is playing host this week to three simultaneous conference tournaments, in three arenas along a stretch of Tropicana Avenue. At the start, there were 31 teams among the Pacific-12 Conference, the Mountain West Conference and the Western Athletic Conference, which meant that there were hundreds of coaches — or so it seemed, given all the besuited clipboard clutchers sitting on the bench.Why, in basketball, does it seem as if there are more coaches than players?Officially, in Las Vegas, there were 94 men's basketball assistant coaches at the start of the week — three for each team, as allowed by the N.C.A.A., plus an extra at Air Force, permitted because one coach is an active military member. Women's teams are allowed the same number.What makes it appear that there are more assistants on every bench are the presence of support staff members, whose numbers are relatively boundless, restrained mostly by imagination and finances. They can boost each team's nonplaying courtside entourage toward double digits.There are directors of basketball operations, coordinators of operations and operations managers. There are video coordinators (director of basketball technology at Arizona State) and strength coaches (director of performance enhancement at Arizona) and former players with big titles (director of player personnel and player development at Washington). There are trainers and scouting directors and graduate managers."One of my administrative assistants is in charge of all my video recording," U.C.L.A. Coach Ben Howland said. "We tape every game in the country that's on television, so that when the N.C.A.A. pairings are announced, we have 1,200, 1,500 games — a library of who we're going to play in most cases."Boundless, yes. But those are, officially, the noncoaches. By definition, they are not among the four who are allowed to coach. But during games, they blend in with their dark suits (most are men) to help fill the first five or six chairs on the bench, and then some others toward the baseline.Only occasionally do they take a star turn. Tuesday during the Horizon League championship, Wright State's director of basketball operations, Bill Donlon Sr., the father of the coach, was sitting on the bench when a player ran him over in pursuit of a loose ball. Donlon's backward tumble made "SportsCenter" highlights, after Wright State lost to Valparaiso.But the actual assistant coaches are the ones who have been in the news with strange regularity lately.Last weekend, Indiana Coach Tom Crean celebrated his team's conference-clinching victory by shouting at the Michigan assistant Jeff Meyer."You know what you did!" Crean yelled at Meyer, who was part of Kelvin Sampson's staff at Indiana that ran afoul of recruiting rules in 2008, leading to three years of probation for the program that Crean inherited. "You helped wreck our program!"That came after a game between Stanford and California in which three assistant coaches were ejected for leaving the bench during an on-court scrum, trying to helpfully play peacemakers.While head coaches spend most of the games standing, looking miserable and angry, assistant coaches are "required to be seated on the bench while the ball is live except to react spontaneously to an outstanding play and then to immediately return to sitting on the bench," the N.C.A.A. rule book says under a section called "Coach and Bench Decorum."
LOS ANGELES — Carmelo Anthony rejoined his teammates Saturday, two days after having fluid drained from his right knee in New York. But he did not join them on a practice court at U.C.L.A., instead taking a few jump shots off to the side.He was evaluated by the team's doctor, Lisa Callahan, who had flown to Los Angeles with Anthony to oversee his recovery. Anthony was expected to miss Sunday's game against the Clippers, and Coach Mike Woodson did not indicate when he expected Anthony to return. The Knicks will have one more game on their Western trip, playing the Utah Jazz on Monday.Woodson said he also expected the team to be without Tyson Chandler for Sunday's game. Chandler, out with a bruised left knee, did not practice Saturday. Woodson said Chandler was also dealing with neck stiffness, which has bothered him all season."We have to get these guys in uniform ready to play," Woodson said, explaining that he was setting a game plan for the Clippers that did not include Anthony and Chandler.Chandler made comments suggesting that he and Anthony could miss at least the next two games. "I feel like Carmelo will fully heal and be back in the next couple of games," he said. "I will be back in the next couple of games."Anthony did not speak to reporters after practice, but Woodson said he thought that Anthony was feeling better after having fluid drained from the back of his right knee Thursday."He is in good spirits," Woodson said. "I think he's fine."The Knicks hope that the procedure will allow Anthony to improve the range of motion in the knee and gain strength in his legs.Before falling to the court March 4 during a game in Cleveland, Anthony had felt stiffness and soreness in his right knee for more than three weeks. He left the game against the Cavaliers and did not return.Anthony initially chose to rest, missing the next three games. He returned with uninspiring performances against the Golden State Warriors and the Denver Nuggets last week. The Knicks lost both games by more than 20 points. Including the Cleveland game, a victory, they are 3-4 in their last seven.If the Knicks continue to struggle, there may be questions of why Anthony did not have his knee drained sooner.But Woodson said that decision was Anthony's."Players know their bodies," Woodson said. He added: "You can't sit there and second-guess a guy. He knows his body and he knows how he was feeling. This was the time he decided to do it, so we have to live with it."Chandler said he could understand why Anthony waited."It may have not been a lot of fluid a week or two ago," Chandler said. "I felt like he did the right thing."He added that he could tell Anthony was not at the level the Knicks needed with the playoffs approaching."I talked to him before practice," Chandler said. "I was like: 'Now is a good time. It could be a blessing in disguise. Now is a good time to get your body right for this grind we're going to go through in the last part of the season.' "Mike Woodson said the Knicks had not discussed signing a free agent to give them another healthy body. General Manager Glen Grunwald was in New York, so Woodson said he would talk to him after the Knicks played at Utah on Monday. "We'll evaluate and see where we are when we get back," Woodson said. ... Woodson said he was pleased that the Knicks signed Kenyon Martin on Friday for the rest of the season. "It gives us one more active big," he said. "We're short-handed in that area, so Kenyon signing is really big for us."
Ryan Evans scored 16 points, and No. 22 Wisconsin beat No. 3 Indiana, 68-56, on Saturday in the semifinals of the Big Ten tournament in Chicago.The top-seeded Hoosiers (27-6), who won the regular-season conference title, will have to wait to see if they did enough to earn a No. 1 seed for the N.C.A.A. tournament.The Badgers (23-10) allowed only 7 points after the Hoosiers pulled to 1 behind with 9 minutes 45 seconds left. They earned their 12th consecutive win against Indiana, tying a record for any program against the Hoosiers, and will play No. 10 Ohio State (25-7) in Sunday's final.In the other semifinal, Ohio State beat No. 8 Michigan State (25-8), 61-58, as Aaron Craft came on strong in the second half to finish with 20 points.KANSAS WINS BIG 12 Jeff Withey had 17 points and 9 rebounds, and No. 7 Kansas beat No. 11 Kansas State, 70-54, in Kansas City, Mo., to win its ninth Big 12 tournament championship. The Wildcats (27-7) lost for the 3rd time this season to the top-seeded Jayhawks (29-5) and for the 47th time in their last 50 meetings.A.C.C. SEMIFINALS Durand Scott scored a career-high 32 points to help No. 9 Miami beat North Carolina State (24-10), 81-71, in the Atlantic Coast Conference tournament in Greensboro, N.C. The top-seeded Hurricanes (26-6) earned their first trip to the tournament title game.In the final on Sunday, Miami will face North Carolina, which beat Maryland (22-12), 79-76.P. J. Hairston had 13 points for the third-seeded Tar Heels (24-9) despite his injured left hand, which was heavily wrapped. But his missed free throw with 16 seconds left gave Maryland a chance to force overtime.The Terrapins called timeout with 10.9 seconds left. Logan Aronhalt took the inbounds pass and immediately launched an off-balance, 30-foot air ball.SEC SEMIFINALS Kenny Boynton scored 11 straight points during a 15-0 second-half run, and No. 13 Florida rallied from a 10-point second-half deficit to beat Alabama (21-12), 61-51, in the Southeastern Conference tournament in Nashville.Held scoreless for the game's first 25 minutes, Boynton finished with a game-high 16 points.The top-seeded Gators (26-6) advanced to the championship game Sunday against third-seeded Mississippi (25-8), which beat Vanderbilt (16-17), 64-52, in the other semifinal.A-10 SEMIFINALS Dwayne Evans had 24 points, nearly setting a career high for the second straight game, and No. 16 St. Louis locked down Butler (26-8) in the second half of a 67-56 win at Barclays Center. With the victory, the Billikens (26-6) reached their first Atlantic 10 title game.On Sunday, the top-seeded Billikens will play No. 25 Virginia Commonwealth, which advanced to the tournament title game in its first season in the conference with a 71-62 win over Massachusetts (21-11). Troy Daniels made six 3-pointers and scored 20 points for V.C.U. (26-7).NEW MEXICO WINS M.W.C. Tony Snell scored 13 straight points for New Mexico during a second-half run, and the No. 15 Lobos pulled away late to beat Nevada-Las Vegas (25-9), 63-56, in Las Vegas and add the Mountain West tournament title to their regular-season crown. Snell finished with 21 points for New Mexico (29-5).MEMPHIS WINS CONFERENCE USA Chris Crawford scored 23 points and hit the go-ahead 3-pointer in the second overtime as No. 20 Memphis (30-4) beat Southern Mississippi (25-9), 91-79, in Tulsa, Okla., to win its seventh Conference USA tournament title in the past eight years.AKRON WINS MAC Demetrius Treadwell scored 13 points, and top-seeded Akron (26-6) beat Ohio (24-9), 65-46, in Cleveland to win the Mid-American Conference championship.ALBANY WINS AMERICA EAST Mike Black had 14 points, and Albany (24-10) came back from an early deficit to beat host Vermont (21-11), 53-49, in the America East title game and earn its third trip to the N.C.A.A. tournament.N.C. A&T WINS MEAC Adrian Powell hit two free throws with 23.4 seconds to play and blocked a 3-point attempt in the final seconds as North Carolina A&T (19-16) beat Morgan State (17-15), 57-54, in Norfolk, Va., to win its first Mid-Eastern Athletic Conference tournament title since 1995.N'WEST ST. WINS SOUTHLAND DeQuan Hicks scored 13 points and made the last-second steal that sealed Northwestern State's 68-66 win over Stephen F. Austin in the Southland Conference championship game in Katy, Tex. The Demons (23-8) were the nation's highest scoring team in the regular season (82.4 points a game), and Stephen F. Austin (27-4) boasted the nation's top scoring defense (50.2).SOUTHERN WINS SWAC Derick Beltran scored 13 points, and Southern (23-9) earned its first N.C.A.A. tournament berth since 2006 with a 45-44 victory over Prairie View (15-19) in the Southwestern Athletic Conference tournament in Garland, Tex.
As soon as the final buzzer sounded for Syracuse 58, Georgetown 55, in overtime Friday night, the fan held up a sign that read, "The Rivalry Is Officially Closed." He wore a T-shirt with "I Bleed Orange" across the front and pulled off a mask with the likeness of the Syracuse coach, Jim Boeheim.The fan, behind the basket to the right of the Syracuse student section, gave his name as John Groat, class of 1992. He had come to Manhattan and Madison Square Garden from upstate New York with his friend Dennis Hickey for the last Big East Conference tournament as we have known it (won Saturday night by Louisville, 78-61 over Syracuse).Next year, Groat said, he will make the journey to Greensboro, N.C., for the Atlantic Coast Conference tournament."I will go south," he said. "But it will never be the same as it is here, in Madison Square Garden. Never be the same as the Big East tournament."The fan said he understood why Syracuse had walked away from Georgetown, its bitter rival, and Connecticut, and all it had built as a charter member of a great basketball league formed in 1979. It was about the business of big-time college sports, all the things that have nothing to do with why a grown man would wear a mask and scream himself hoarse."There is no doubt that we will miss this," Groat said. "New York has been a home away from home for all Syracuse fans. We don't know what the future holds. But there will be a different feel next year. It won't be like this."He put his mask back on and resumed celebrating a victory that meant nothing in the grand scheme of the N.C.A.A. tournament but in the moment felt like the grand prize of March.In the Syracuse locker room, the senior walk-on was asked for his most special memory at the self-proclaimed World's Most Famous Arena.He had played a game at the Garden once, with his Amateur Athletic Union team, the Riverside Hawks, but that wasn't it."This one, tonight," said the walk-on, Griffin Hoffmann, a 6-foot-1 guard who had not played a second of the semifinal. "In my four years, I think we've beaten them once and they crushed us twice this season. And to beat them in the last Big East tournament, in the Garden, right where I grew up — I mean, I live 10 blocks from here."Hoffmann gave his address as 20th Street and Avenue of the Americas; he said he could walk home.His family had been in the Garden, which had been electric from the beginning and chock-full of Syracuse fans, especially visible in orange swaths when searchlights scanned the crowd.Hoffmann dressed next to Matt Lyde-Cajuste, a 6-5 forward, another senior walk-on, out of Mount Vernon, N.Y.Boeheim had rewarded them for their service with scholarships this season, and now they would get to hang around the city for another day."I grew up around this place, rooting for the Knicks," Hoffmann said. "To me, the Garden is home. It's Syracuse's home."On the other side of the Syracuse locker room, the star forward with the sweet jump shot talked about savoring the victory over the Hoyas and having tied the former Syracuse backcourt ace and current Boeheim assistant, Gerry McNamara, for the most converted 3-point shots in a single Big East tournament."Make a thousand," McNamara said, mindful of the final, in which Southerland made three more 3s, not enough to stop a furious Louisville rally.Southerland, another child of New York, played high school ball at Benjamin Cardozo in Queens for Coach Ron Naclerio. Syracuse was his choice, he said, because it struck the perfect balance."You know, kids don't want to stay home and go to school," Southerland said. "But if you're from New York and you choose Syracuse, you know you're going to play in the Garden during the season against St. John's and then in the tournament."It's a big factor — the dome up there and the Garden down here."For Southerland, as it had been for others before him, it was the perfect recruiting pitch.In the corridor outside the locker room, the coach said, oh, sure, we could count on Syracuse remaining a player in and around the city."We're going to play St. John's here next season, and in a tournament the year after," Boeheim, 68, said, not sounding like anyone thinking about retirement. "We'll try to play here every season, here and in Brooklyn."Like Hoffmann, Boeheim began at Syracuse as a freshman walk-on, in 1962. Fourteen years later, he was head coach."When we first played St. John's, we had about 400 people," Boeheim said, referring to the number of fans at the Garden. "Now we come down here and we have 6,000, or more."It was something he and countless others had built across five decades, the Syracuse basketball brand, about to be ripped from its mooring as university administrators chased after the money like some gasping defensive tackle in pursuit of Victor Cruz.Will Syracuse really find football prominence playing Wake Forest and Clemson in the A.C.C., or will it wind up compromising what it is has done best?Will the promise of knocking off Coach K in Greensboro mean as much to a college prospect in the Bronx or North Jersey as beating one John Thompson or another at the Garden?"The important thing was to come here and play well and to beat Georgetown," Boeheim said, savoring the semifinal certain to obscure the final.Why, exactly? On Syracuse's last Big East weekend in New York, that was much easier to feel than to explain.
The Wildcats, last season's national champions, will have to settle for trying to win the N.I.T.The Wildcats are not the only Southeastern Conference team passed over by the N.C.A.A. tournament selection committee. Alabama and Tennessee also missed the cut — the first time in 39 years that the Wildcats, the Crimson Tide and the Volunteers were all left out of the N.C.A.A. tournament.Kentucky (21-11) and Alabama (21-12) are No. 1 seeds in the N.I.T., along with Southern Mississippi and Virginia.The Wildcats, who struggled to live up to lofty preseason expectations, went 4-4 in their final eight games without the freshman star Nerlens Noel, whose season ended early because of a knee injury. Kentucky, which played in the last two Final Fours under Coach John Calipari, became the 20th defending national champion to be left out of the N.C.A.A. tournament field and the first since North Carolina in 2010.Tennessee (20-12) is a No. 2 seed. Maryland, Baylor and Massachusetts are the other No. 2 seeds. The field also includes St. John's and Providence.
The Wildcats, last season's national champions, will have to settle for trying to win the N.I.T.The Wildcats are not the only Southeastern Conference team passed over by the N.C.A.A. tournament selection committee. Alabama and Tennessee also missed the cut — the first time in 39 years that the Wildcats, the Crimson Tide and the Volunteers were all left out of the N.C.A.A. tournament.Kentucky (21-11) and Alabama (21-12) are No. 1 seeds in the N.I.T., along with Southern Mississippi and Virginia.The Wildcats, who struggled to live up to lofty preseason expectations, went 4-4 in their final eight games without the freshman star Nerlens Noel, whose season ended early because of a knee injury. Kentucky, which played in the last two Final Fours under Coach John Calipari, became the 20th defending national champion to be left out of the N.C.A.A. tournament field and the first since North Carolina in 2010.Tennessee (20-12) is a No. 2 seed. Maryland, Baylor and Massachusetts are the other No. 2 seeds. The field also includes St. John's and Providence.
It will be April when the Nets next play on the sleek herringbone court of Barclays Center, and by then their game Sunday night against the Atlanta Hawks will linger as either a distant memory or a haunting omen. The Nets are good enough to have secured a solid footing in the Eastern Conference playoff race but too inconsistent to emerge as a credible threat.Every air-balled shot, every misfired pass, every turnover in a 105-93 loss reflected a team that lacked focus, concentration and energy — and, perhaps most important, an explanation. Those words, all of them, were uttered afterward in a disconsolate locker room, by players who have stomached these mood swings — from possession to possession, night to night, week to week — for 66 games now.On Sunday, in spite of themselves, the Nets led by 2 points after three quarters. And then ... "I'm still trying to figure it out," Deron Williams said.A primer, then. P. J. Carlesimo, the Nets' coach, lamented their poor defense and poor shooting, and that would be a fair place to start. In the fourth quarter, Atlanta outscored the Nets by 20-4 in the paint, by 10-0 on the fast break and by 7-0 on second-chance baskets.Jeff Teague, the Hawks' speedy point guard, scored 11 points and dished out a game-high 15 assists, including one on a 3-pointer by Josh Smith that fueled a 19-6 run. Atlanta led, 91-83, with 5 minutes 32 seconds left, and never again would the Nets trail by single digits."In the fourth quarter," Carlesimo said, "it all caught up with us."If possible, Carlesimo was at once confused by the Nets' performance Sunday and accustomed to it. The last time the Nets played the Hawks, on March 9 in Atlanta, they played what Carlesimo then termed "as good a game as we played all year." Two days later, they lost by 9 at Philadelphia, one of the worst teams in the N.B.A.Searching for a cause, forward Gerald Wallace said that, for whatever reason, the Nets seemed to take teams below them in the standings for granted. The Hawks (37-29), though, are not the woeful 76ers. They are a potential playoff opponent for the fourth-seeded Nets, a game back of them in the Eastern Conference standings and in a logjam of six teams separated by three and a half games. Moreover, Atlanta's win denied the Nets a victory in the season series, stopping them from clinching what could be a significant tiebreaker."They came in like they wanted the game; we played like we were already on the road," Wallace said.The loss cost the Nets an opportunity to slide into a virtual tie for first place in the Atlantic Division with the Knicks, who on Sunday sputtered to their fourth consecutive loss, at the Los Angeles Clippers. Before the game Carlesimo tried playing down the potential for shared division supremacy because the Nets (now 38-28) then had one more loss than the Knicks (38-26). But some of his players were well aware of what a victory would have meant, even in mid-March, especially on the eve of a treacherous 8-game, 17-day trip spanning four time zones that begins Monday night in Detroit."We positioned ourselves to move up in the standings, to do something special tonight," Joe Johnson said, "and we blew it tonight, the way we played."The way they played prompted Carlesimo to offer a word that he was not even certain existed: lethargically. Not even the return of Johnson — who was given off Tuesday against New Orleans to maximize the effects of the ensuing four-day break on his sore left heel — could rejuvenate a sagging offense that after halftime shot 37.8 percent from the field and 3 of 11 from 3-point range.Johnson did not play for five days by design. For many of his teammates, though, it was as if the four days off the Nets had between games sapped them of vitality. Brook Lopez (7 of 19) struggled so much that he said, "I wasn't really here tonight." The Hawks took advantage, running pick-and-rolls with the 6-foot-9 Smith and the 6-10 Al Horford. Too often the Nets were oblivious on how to counter, failing to provide adequate defensive help."We really didn't know how to cover it," said Johnson, who had 18 points.In letting Johnson rest Tuesday, the Nets were clearly taking a broad view of their season. They hope that his long-term health will help them come playoff time, when they could benefit from his clutch shooting — four game-winning shots already this season — and bursts of production. The Nets are not passing time until the playoffs start because they cannot afford to.Every game counts the same in the standings, but there is an inherent difference between affairs in March and those in April, when the Nets — so they hope — will be polishing their blemishes in advance of the postseason. There is, they know, much to polish, and perhaps by April 4, when they return to Brooklyn, they will have a better sense of the team that endures: a contender or a team masquerading as one.
Murphy Holloway scored 23 points, and Mississippi gave Coach Andy Kennedy his first N.C.A.A. tournament berth by beating No. 13 Florida, 66-63, in Nashville on Sunday for the Southeastern Conference tournament championship."So much is made about the N.C.A.A. tournament," Kennedy said. "I was just glad to get the albatross that is the N.C.A.A. tournament off the neck of our program so people can now exhale and get a new focal point."Florida led by as many as 14 points and was ahead by 12 at halftime before Mississippi rallied.The Rebels (26-8), who have won seven of eight, grabbed their first tournament title since 1981 and their second ever. Even though they thought reaching the SEC title game had probably earned them an N.C.A.A. bid, the Rebels wanted the championship, too."We worked so hard to get to this point, and it just feels so good to celebrate with the guys in the locker room," the senior guard Nick Williams said. "I don't know, man. I'm at a loss for words."Marshall Henderson had 21 points for Ole Miss, which won two straight without the sophomore point guard Jarvis Summers. Summers sustained a concussion in Friday night's 64-62 win over Missouri."Can you imagine going into a game of this magnitude with a backup quarterback?" Kennedy said. "And that's what this team had to do."Florida (26-7), the regular-season champion, has not won this tournament since 2007. The Gators go into the N.C.A.A. tournament 0-6 in games decided by 6 points or fewer.The Gators had a final chance to force overtime Sunday, but Scottie Wilbekin missed two free throws with 4.2 seconds left, and Kenny Boynton's last-gasp 3-point attempt glanced off the rim after he took a step back to make sure he was behind the line.MIAMI WINS A.C.C. Shane Larkin scored 8 of his career-high 28 points in the final two and a half minutes, helping No. 9 Miami beat North Carolina, 87-77, in the Atlantic Coast Conference tournament final in Greensboro, N.C.Trey McKinney Jones added a career-high 20 points for the top-seeded Hurricanes (27-6) and hit a go-ahead 3-pointer with 6 minutes 27 seconds left, which started Miami's final push toward its first tournament title.The victory came one week after Miami completed its surprising run to its first A.C.C. regular-season title.Larkin was named the tournament's most valuable player after finishing as the runner-up for the league's player of the year."I don't know about the other guys on the team," Larkin said, "but I do a lot of research online, seeing what people are saying about us individual players on our team, and I just kept seeing that everywhere: 'They peaked too early; they're not going to do anything; they're finished.' And that just motivated me to go out there and play as hard as I could."In a back-and-forth game, the Hurricanes slowed P. J. Hairston and the third-seeded Tar Heels (24-10) enough down the stretch to secure what amounted to a road win in front of North Carolina's home-state crowd.OHIO STATE WINS BIG TEN Deshaun Thomas scored 17 points, and No. 10 Ohio State used its stout defense to beat No. 22 Wisconsin, 50-43, in Chicago for its conference-best fifth Big Ten tournament title.Thomas was 6 for 19 from the field, but he made some big free throws down the stretch as Ohio State (26-7) won the championship for the third time in the last four years.Traevon Jackson scored 10 points for the Badgers (23-11), who shot 38.3 percent from the field. None of his teammates reached double figures.ST. LOUIS WINS A-10 Kwamain Mitchell had 19 points, including a clutch 3-pointer with the shot clock winding down, to lead No. 16 St. Louis to its first Atlantic 10 tournament title with a 62-56 win over No. 25 Virginia Commonwealth at Barclays Center.The top-seeded Billikens (27-6), overcoming the Rams' defensive pressure and a boisterous crowd, stayed just poised enough to win the program's second conference tournament crown. (The first was in Conference USA.)St. Louis led, 45-32, with less than 12 minutes left. But the second-seeded Rams (26-8) were only a point behind three minutes later.Cody Ellis hit a 3-pointer on the Billikens' next possession and then made another clutch 3 for a 57-51 lead.DELAWARE WINS C.A.A. No. 15 Delaware blew a 17-point lead and failed to make a basket from the field in the final six minutes, but the Blue Hens held off Drexel (22-10), 59-56, in Upper Marlboro, Md., to win their second straight Colonial Athletic Association title and extend their team-record winning streak to 25 games.Delaware (30-3) is a host in the first and second rounds of the N.C.A.A. tournament and will almost certainly open at home next Sunday.GREEN BAY WINS HORIZON No. 20 Green Bay missed 21 of its first 23 shots in the second half but still maintained a double-digit lead, beating visiting Loyola of Chicago, 54-38, in the Horizon League tournament championship game. Green Bay (29-2) won its 24th straight game.The Green Bay defense held Loyola (17-15) to 7-of-22 shooting in the second half. But Green Bay was just 8 of 34.Green Bay won its third league tournament title in a row and will compete in the N.C.A.A. tournament for a fifth straight year.WICHITA STATE WINS M.V.C. Alex Harden and Michaela Dapprich scored 19 points each to lead Wichita State to a 69-65 win over Illinois State in the Missouri Valley Conference tournament title game in St. Charles, Mo.The top-seeded Shockers (24-9) won the tournament for the first time and will be making their first N.C.A.A. tournament appearance.QUINNIPIAC WINS NEC Brittany McQuain scored 14 points to lead top-seeded Quinnipiac to a 72-33 rout of visiting St. Francis (Pa.) in the Northeast Conference title game, earning the Bobcats their first trip to the N.C.A.A. tournament.Quinnipiac (30-2), which has won 22 straight games, is headed to the Metro Atlantic Athletic Conference next season. The Bobcats will leave in record-setting fashion: it was the most lopsided game in conference history.
There are more charismatic stars in the N.C.A.A. tournament, more compelling characters, louder and flashier. There are players who jump on scorers' tables, and players who preen after dunks. Shane Larkin of Miami does none of that. He treats basketball like a chemistry exam, and he gets consistently high grades.A sophomore point guard, Larkin has been the steadying force for the Hurricanes this season. With Larkin operating as Coach Jim Larranaga's on-court surrogate, Miami claimed its first Atlantic Coast Conference regular-season and tournament titles. Larranaga described him as a player with an innate feel for the game. All those so-called intangibles? Larkin has them."Shane was the missing piece of the puzzle for us," Larranaga said.As the No. 2 seed in the East Region, the Hurricanes suddenly find themselves in unfamiliar territory, as a tournament heavyweight. Only once, in 2000, has Miami advanced past the Round of 32. The Hurricanes' profile has grown. It does not seem to be particularly daunting for them."We're a very hungry team," said Larkin, who scored 28 points in Sunday's A.C.C. championship game, an 87-77 victory over North Carolina. "We want more and more."Larranaga first saw Larkin play when he was a high school sophomore. Larranaga, the coach at George Mason at the time, offered him a scholarship on the spot. Larkin wound up committing to DePaul, but when Larranaga left for Miami before the start of last season, Larkin followed him. Their partnership has been a fruitful one, even if took time for Larkin to find his voice.Last season, as a freshman, Larkin was more passenger than conductor. He hung back and let older teammates run the show. Miami went 20-13, settling for a bid to the National Invitation Tournament. "He had some great moments," the assistant coach Chris Caputo said, "but I'm not sure he ever really opened up completely until the end of the year."Larkin can come off as reserved, almost guarded — a result, Caputo said, of being the son of a famous athlete. His father, Barry Larkin, is the Hall of Fame shortstop. Growing up, Shane Larkin never sought attention, never wanted the spotlight, because it was always around, reflecting off his father."He can be a little introverted," Caputo said. "Once he gets more comfortable around you, his personality comes through."This season, Larkin has looked at ease, having formed a potent starting backcourt with the senior Durand Scott. In Saturday's A.C.C. semifinal win over North Carolina State, the two combined for 55 points and 8 assists."They like that challenge of proving themselves every single night," Larranaga said. "They're both so competitive. When we do drills back home, if we don't keep score, they're bored."​NO. 2 FOR MIAMI IS FIRST FOR A.C.C. No. 2 Miami is the first team to sweep the Atlantic Coast Conference regular-season and tournament titles and not receive a No. 1 seed. Instead, Indiana, which is coming off a loss to Wisconsin in the Big Ten tournament semifinals, is the top seed. The Hoosiers are led by the lightning-quick guard Victor Oladipo, a matchup nightmare. No. 3 Marquette and No. 8 North Carolina State are dangerous teams.A REVIVED ORANGE A couple of weeks ago, Syracuse was considered an also-ran. Coach Jim Boeheim said he was ready to go golfing. Things have changed after a spirited run to the Big East title game. If point guard Michael Carter-Williams can take care of the ball and James Southerland can maintain his 3-point touch, the Orange could be tough.UPSET SPECIAL No. 12 California basically gets a home game against No. 5 Nevada-Las Vegas in San Jose, a huge benefit. The Runnin' Rebels edged Cal, 76-75, in December.
There are more charismatic stars in the N.C.A.A. tournament, more compelling characters, louder and flashier. There are players who jump on scorers' tables, and players who preen after dunks. Shane Larkin of Miami does none of that. He treats basketball like a chemistry exam, and he gets consistently high grades.A sophomore point guard, Larkin has been the steadying force for the Hurricanes this season. With Larkin operating as Coach Jim Larranaga's on-court surrogate, Miami claimed its first Atlantic Coast Conference regular-season and tournament titles. Larranaga described him as a player with an innate feel for the game. All those so-called intangibles? Larkin has them."Shane was the missing piece of the puzzle for us," Larranaga said.As the No. 2 seed in the East Region, the Hurricanes suddenly find themselves in unfamiliar territory, as a tournament heavyweight. Only once, in 2000, has Miami advanced past the Round of 32. The Hurricanes' profile has grown. It does not seem to be particularly daunting for them."We're a very hungry team," said Larkin, who scored 28 points in Sunday's A.C.C. championship game, an 87-77 victory over North Carolina. "We want more and more."Larranaga first saw Larkin play when he was a high school sophomore. Larranaga, the coach at George Mason at the time, offered him a scholarship on the spot. Larkin wound up committing to DePaul, but when Larranaga left for Miami before the start of last season, Larkin followed him. Their partnership has been a fruitful one, even if took time for Larkin to find his voice.Last season, as a freshman, Larkin was more passenger than conductor. He hung back and let older teammates run the show. Miami went 20-13, settling for a bid to the National Invitation Tournament. "He had some great moments," the assistant coach Chris Caputo said, "but I'm not sure he ever really opened up completely until the end of the year."Larkin can come off as reserved, almost guarded — a result, Caputo said, of being the son of a famous athlete. His father, Barry Larkin, is the Hall of Fame shortstop. Growing up, Shane Larkin never sought attention, never wanted the spotlight, because it was always around, reflecting off his father."He can be a little introverted," Caputo said. "Once he gets more comfortable around you, his personality comes through."This season, Larkin has looked at ease, having formed a potent starting backcourt with the senior Durand Scott. In Saturday's A.C.C. semifinal win over North Carolina State, the two combined for 55 points and 8 assists."They like that challenge of proving themselves every single night," Larranaga said. "They're both so competitive. When we do drills back home, if we don't keep score, they're bored."​NO. 2 FOR MIAMI IS FIRST FOR A.C.C. No. 2 Miami is the first team to sweep the Atlantic Coast Conference regular-season and tournament titles and not receive a No. 1 seed. Instead, Indiana, which is coming off a loss to Wisconsin in the Big Ten tournament semifinals, is the top seed. The Hoosiers are led by the lightning-quick guard Victor Oladipo, a matchup nightmare. No. 3 Marquette and No. 8 North Carolina State are dangerous teams.A REVIVED ORANGE A couple of weeks ago, Syracuse was considered an also-ran. Coach Jim Boeheim said he was ready to go golfing. Things have changed after a spirited run to the Big East title game. If point guard Michael Carter-Williams can take care of the ball and James Southerland can maintain his 3-point touch, the Orange could be tough.UPSET SPECIAL No. 12 California basically gets a home game against No. 5 Nevada-Las Vegas in San Jose, a huge benefit. The Runnin' Rebels edged Cal, 76-75, in December.
A season of extraordinary upheaval in college basketball yielded an N.C.A.A. tournament field with few favorites, several more surprises and a landscape wide open for potential upsets.Louisville, winner of the Big East tournament, earned the top overall selection Sunday. But the Cardinals (29-5) appear far from a dominating force, the way Kentucky proved to be last season, and the only distinguishable identity of this season's bracket may be its parity.Of the other three top seeds — Kansas, Indiana and Gonzaga — only the Jayhawks finished in the top 5 in the rating percentage index, with a schedule ranked 19th in the country."I don't think there's any consensus favorite," the CBS analyst Clark Kellogg said. "I just don't think there's a team that has distinguished itself."It was a year when five teams held the No. 1 ranking, none with a particularly firm grip. As a result, the tournament field presents a panorama of teams from big and small conferences, with no apparent favoritism shown toward the regulars that normally populate the brackets.Just ask Kentucky, which was one of the last teams left out of the tournament, after winning it last season. The Wildcats can blame Middle Tennessee State, an at-large out of the Sun Belt Conference, for taking their last opening."Our job is just to identify who we believe are the best 37 teams," said Mike Bobinski, chairman of the selection committee. "I think it's great for college basketball when, in the committee's evaluation, there are good teams spread all around the country in a variety of different settings and leagues. That's a positive, as far as we're concerned."Gonzaga (31-2) finished the season atop the rankings, but the Bulldogs were the third No. 1 seed to be chosen. It is the first time Gonzaga has been a top seed. Entering the weekend, Indiana was the committee's only lock as a top seed, Bobinski said. But after Indiana lost to Wisconsin, 68-56, in the Big Ten tournament semifinals, the seeding became more difficult."We really did give a lot of time and energy on that first line this year," Bobinski said. "As much as I can recall in my five years on the committee."And Indiana was the closest thing to a dominant team, after beginning the season ranked No. 1, staying at the top of the rankings for eight weeks, and finishing ranked No. 3. The Hoosiers earned a No. 1 seed for the first time since 1993, but found themselves in an East Region that includes Marquette, Syracuse and Miami."It has been a long time and a long, hard process to get a program back to considered among the best in the country," Indiana Coach Tom Crean said at a news conference. "The program has been considered for decades as one of the best in the country, but now to have a team and have this program back there with that seeding behind it is fantastic."The Hurricanes, a No. 2 seed, became the first program to win the Atlantic Coast Conference regular-season title and its conference title and fail to earn a No. 1 seed. The A.C.C. earned four bids, one fewer than the Atlantic 10 conference.That was the landscape of college basketball this season, where confusion frequently reigned. Consider Louisville's mercurial rises and falls: ranked No. 2 to begin the season, the Cardinals lost three straight games in January and another, in five overtimes to Notre Dame, in early February. But they have not lost since. They beat Syracuse to win the Big East tournament, and appear to be playing their best basketball of the season.During one monthlong stretch in mid-January, four teams hopped to No. 1 and there were seven losses among top-five teams. Last week alone, four of the teams ranked in the top 6 — Indiana, Duke, Georgetown and Michigan — lost in their conference tournaments, opening the door for Kansas and Louisville, considered outsiders, to move into the top row.Kellogg indicated he might slightly favor Louisville to advance to the Final Four, since the Cardinals went there last season with largely the same lineup."I think togetherness, unselfishness playing for each other, is often overlooked and undervalued," Kellogg said. "Those attributes of unity and chemistry can often be an equalizer as long as the talent gap isn't super great."The Big East put eight teams in the field for a fourth consecutive season, the most of any conference, while the Pac-12 conference seemed to get little respect from the committee.Oregon (26-8), the conference's tournament winner, was given a No. 12 seed and will face Oklahoma State in the Midwest, the bracket's toughest region. Bobinski said Oregon's placement was a matter "an unfortunate circumstance" based on travel and seeding, but Kellogg saw it as indicative of the difficulty the committee had plumbing through all the balance in the country."The lack of clarity, I think, impacted the seed lines for a team like Oregon," Kellogg said.Kentucky (21-11) became only the fifth team since 1985 to miss the tournament after winning it the year before, joining Louisville in 1987, Kansas in 1989, Florida in 2008 and North Carolina in 2010.And hours after winning the Atlantic 10 title, St. Louis was stuck in traffic on the way to the airport and needed to stop in a Best Buy in Secaucus, N.J., to watch its selection. The Billikens were named the No. 4 seed in the Midwest, and they celebrated among appliances and electronic goods, instead of fans.It was a fitting scene in a wild season in college basketball, with the fun seemingly only just beginning."I still think there will be a healthy chance to see some turbulence in the first weekend," Kellogg said. "I think we'll have an exciting tournament."
Of all the numbers in college basketball, No. 1 may be the most ubiquitous. You can find it on jerseys and foam hands and after victories when index fingers are shot skyward. You can hear it — "We're No. 1" — chanted on most nights.This year, though, No. 1 is dangerous. No. 1 is slippery. No. 1 has rarely been more attainable or harder to hold. In a season defined by wild swings and regular upsets, by mind-boggling balance and far-reaching parity and the game of musical chairs that unfolded in the rankings, there is tumult at the top. Below it, too.One was not the loneliest number. Not this season. Instead, it seemed like the most cursed.Indiana opened the season ranked first in the Associated Press top 25. Then Duke was No. 1. Then Louisville. Then Duke. Then Michigan. Then Indiana. Then Gonzaga. That's right, Gonzaga, the small Jesuit university from the West Coast Conference, perhaps the most unlikely No. 1 in the recent history of college basketball — except, perhaps, in this season, when it made perfect sense. That the madness came early this year, well before March, should make for an excellent N.C.A.A. tournament, an event already among the most unpredictable in sports.It's not just the No. 1 ranking that switched teams like a dollar bill changing hands, moving from business to wallet to business, state to state. The top of the rankings proved predictable only in its unpredictability, like a game of Chutes and Ladders for the college hoops set.Of the teams that started the season in the A.P.'s top five — Indiana, Louisville, Kentucky, Ohio State and Michigan, in that order — only Indiana (3) and Louisville (4) finished the regular season there.Fourteen teams made at least one appearance in the top five but none for each week of the season. Georgetown, which fell out of the poll at one point, ascended to fifth. Kentucky, the defending national champion, dropped out entirely and did not hear its name called when the N.C.A.A. tournament field of 68 was announced Sunday night.This trend reverberated across the country, in places like Spokane, Wash. (home of Gonzaga); Albuquerque (home of New Mexico); Memphis (home of the Tigers); St. Louis (home of the Billikens); and elsewhere, too.After St. Louis seized the Atlantic 10 regular-season title, the Billikens turned their attention to the postseason. They could talk all they wanted about one game at a time, but even then, they could not ignore the larger subtext. Namely, that a university from a nonpower conference that is experienced (like the Billikens), deep (like the Billikens) and tested (like the Billikens) could go all Butler-style and make a deep run in the N.C.A.A. tournament.Several teams could in a tournament that lacks an obvious favorite. "We talk about it all the time," St. Louis forward Cody Ellis said. "At the end of the year, when it's all said and done, people are going to be scratching their heads, saying, 'Really, they're the national champion?' That's what it feels like."The way this season unfolded is a natural extension of the way college basketball is trending. At programs like Gonzaga and Butler, with their private planes and million-dollar salaries for head coaches, midmajor is no longer an accurate description. Butler, after all, made consecutive appearances in the N.C.A.A. championship game in 2010 and 2011.Meanwhile, at programs like Kentucky and Duke, the best players often jump early to the N.B.A. Where traditional powers like U.C.L.A. once stockpiled enough stars to fill two teams worthy of the postseason, the talent is now spread, while not evenly, more evenly and has been for a while now.Combine those trends — more resources for smaller universities, limited longevity for elite players at larger ones — and parity, what makes the N.C.A.A. tournament electric in the first place, has become even more prevalent. One could argue that no team held on to the top slot this season because no team truly deserved it, because there is not one best team in the land. Or even five.
LOS ANGELES — The easiest way to get embarrassed in the N.B.A. is to be dunked on, to challenge the opposing player as he rises up and tries to put you on his highlight reel. The Los Angeles Clippers are the best team in the league at making opponents look silly, to the point that their video clips go viral seemingly within minutes.The Knicks, without the injured Carmelo Anthony, Tyson Chandler and Amar'e Stoudemire, were the Clippers' latest victims Sunday during a 93-80 loss on national television.The Clippers dunked on the Knicks eight times inside Staples Center, and with each one, it seemed as if they stole a piece of the Knicks' dignity.The Knicks have lost four straight games on their West Coast trip, matching their longest losing streak of the season. The final game of the trip is against the Utah Jazz on Monday.Before Sunday's game, Coach Mike Woodson gave no indication that Anthony or Chandler, who are recovering from knee injuries, would play against the Jazz."At this point, we have to at least try to get one to go home feeling good about ourselves a little bit," J. R. Smith said. "We have to figure out how to win some games without that $200 million sitting on the bench."The waiting game for Anthony to return to the court — and to being the star player he was before his right knee became stiff — continues. Chandler, who also has a stiff neck, said Saturday that he could miss a few more games to ensure he would be fully healthy when he returned.Jason Kidd said of the Knicks' woes: "The biggest concern is just our health. We have to get healthy first and go from there."About the only thing that went the Knicks' way Sunday was the Nets' loss to the Atlanta Hawks, which kept the Knicks in first place in the Atlantic Division, a half-game ahead of the Nets.For much of the season, the Knicks had been a confident group. They started out 18-5. Since then they have gone 20-21. Also alarming is that the Knicks have not beaten a top team for more than two months. Their last truly impressive victory was over the San Antonio Spurs on Jan. 3."It's starting to take a toll on me mentally losing like this and knowing the type of team that we were in the beginning of the year," Smith said of the losing streak.He added, "We have to keep fighting through it."The Knicks showed some life against the Clippers early. They started the game with a 13-5 lead. But reality soon set in. The Knicks scored only 5 points in the final eight minutes of the first quarter and could not keep up.The Clippers' first dunk came late in the first quarter, when a turnover by Chris Copeland translated into a windmill jam from DeAndre Jordan. The fans clamored for more highlight-reel dunks, and the Clippers gave them what they wanted.The biggest moment came midway through the third quarter. Chris Paul raced down the court in transition — after a turnover by Smith — and looked for Blake Griffin. Copeland jumped in a futile attempt to stop another emphatic alley-oop dunk. Griffin completed it, one-handed, and it was replayed several times on the game's broadcast.Griffin continued to terrorize the Knicks. He dunked over Copeland on another play in transition. Then he dunked on the oldest player in the league, Kurt Thomas."You got to stop that, but it's hard when you turn the ball over and shoot long shots," said Kenyon Martin, who played for the Clippers last season. "That's what they are looking for. They're looking to get out and get the easy ones."Even though the Knicks were within reach of the Clippers at halftime — they trailed by 44-37 — there were plenty of warning signs for another double-digit loss. In the first half, the Clippers shot 50 percent.Once the Clippers did a better job of converting open jumpers and stopped committing unforced errors, they put the game out of reach early in the fourth quarter. Without Chandler, the Clippers outrebounded the Knicks, 51-39."When you don't have Tyson in there," Smith said, "you really don't have that dependable tip-back offensive rebounder who can also set screens for wide-open shots."When the Knicks looked for offense, they often gave the ball to Smith. In the past four games, Smith has been asked to score as much as Anthony usually does. But the burden of keeping the Knicks in games seems to have had an adverse effect on him. Smith led the Knicks on Sunday with 17 points, but he was abysmal from the floor, going 4 for 20."You almost have to play perfect basketball," he said.
Steve Green had seen it all before. The hand gestures. The histrionics. The nonstop conversation Marshall Henderson was having with himself.Henderson was in the process of leading Mississippi to a Southeastern Conference tournament championship over Florida on Sunday, and Green, his former junior college coach, was watching the drama unfold on television. When Henderson made the curious decision to Gator-chomp in the general direction of thousands of opposing fans — with nearly eight minutes remaining in a close game — Green could feel himself turning nostalgic."I've never seen a guy draw the attention of an entire team like he does," said Green, the coach at South Plains College in Levelland, Tex. "Next thing you know, you've fallen into the madness."That madness promises to be one of the more compelling subplots in the N.C.A.A. tournament's opening rounds. A junior guard, Henderson is loud and colorful and borderline obnoxious. He shoots the basketball as if it were coated in molten lava, and he has turned the Rebels' surprising season into his own reality show. His next episode will be shown Friday when Ole Miss (26-8), the No. 12 seed in the West, faces No. 5 Wisconsin in Kansas City, Mo."The whole Marshall Henderson phenomenon — even I've been taken aback by that," Coach Andy Kennedy said. "It's like traveling with the Beatles."Henderson, who averages 20.1 points and 3.1 rebounds per game, had an eventful SEC tournament. He told reporters that he was just trying "to get that money." He gave a shout-out to his "haters." He referred to all the coaches who had voted him second-team all-conference as losers.Will Hopkins, a longtime Ole Miss fan, said, "If he played for anybody else, I'd throw quarters at him."On Monday, an Ole Miss spokesman said he had fielded 80 interview requests for Henderson in the hours since Sunday's 66-63 win, all of them denied. Henderson, the spokesman said, was "shutting himself down" so he could focus on the tournament.That decision followed what appeared to be a festive evening. On Monday morning, Henderson informed his 24,000-plus Twitter followers that he had just won 10 consecutive games of "PONG!!," an apparent reference to a popular drinking game. The time stamp was 4:22 a.m."Any kid that's special does things a little differently," Green said.Henderson was not an instant hit when he arrived at Ole Miss. Fans knew about his prior indiscretions. About how, as a freshman at Utah, he had elbowed a Brigham Young player, drawing a one-game suspension. About how he had transferred to Texas Tech, saying the system at Utah did not suit his "individualism." About how he was arrested in 2009 on a forgery charge and later spent nearly a month in jail for violating his probation. About how Ole Miss was his fourth college in four years.Still, the Rebels had not made an appearance in the N.C.A.A. tournament since 2002, a drought that seemed likely to continue when Kennedy kicked one of his best players off the team. After years of futility — underscored by low attendance in a musty old arena, the nondescript Tad Smith Coliseum — what was the worst that could happen? Perhaps Henderson was worth the gamble.Ole Miss won 17 of its first 19 games, a stretch that featured an improbable comeback at Vanderbilt. Henderson drilled a 35-foot shot at the buzzer to force overtime, and the Rebels went on to win, 89-79. Ole Miss made a splash in the national rankings. The hype was just beginning.For Hopkins, who played baseball at Ole Miss and considers himself a die-hard fan, the tipping point was the Rebels' 63-61 win at Auburn on Jan. 26. Henderson struggled throughout, but his two late free throws were the difference. He punctuated the game by running to the sideline and popping the "Rebels" on his jersey directly in front of hundreds of Auburn fans, who were not amused."That was my favorite moment," Hopkins said, "just because of how he made 10 frat boys from South Alabama want to kill him."Players who feed off the crowd are nothing new, of course. Reggie Miller, the Hall of Fame guard who spent his 18-year N.B.A. career with the Indiana Pacers, was known for interacting with opposing fans, including the filmmaker Spike Lee. Miller said he approached road games as if they were "12 versus everyone.""Marshall definitely has that chip on his shoulder," said Miller, a Turner Sports analyst. "But there's also a difference between having moxie and having a chip on your shoulder. He has a chip. And that kind of lets me know that he may not be all there."Kennedy has had to strike a delicate balance this season. Exactly how much freedom should he give Henderson?"He cares more than you can imagine, and sometimes that crosses the line," Kennedy said. "His passion comes from a good place."So does that mean Kennedy takes a hands-off approach? "Oh, no, no," he said. "We have hands-on, 24/7. We don't have enough hands, sometimes."Last week, after an emotional win over Missouri in the SEC quarterfinals, Henderson was asked if he would be able to get charged up for the semifinals. He turned to Kennedy. "I got to remind him I'm crazy in the head," Henderson said. "I can play another game right now. Let's go."As a high-scoring forward at North Carolina State and Alabama-Birmingham, Kennedy was no wallflower himself."I wouldn't be surprised at all if Andy draws on his own playing days in saying, 'Look, we've got a tremendous player who sometimes loses his mind, but it's all good because the kid wants to win and we can handle the momentary bouts of insanity,' " said Fran Fraschilla, the ESPN analyst.At St. John's, Fraschilla had the unique responsibility of coaching an 18-year-old Ron Artest. Fraschilla would sometimes toss Artest from practice, just to motivate him that much more. Fraschilla knew he was dancing on the edge of a blade."You always had to send two assistants into the locker room after him — two of them — to make sure he didn't rip the TV off the wall," Fraschilla said. "Having said that, he was one of the most fun guys I ever coached."Henderson has had a similar effect at Ole Miss, though he has not destroyed any TVs. He merely dented a door with his fist after a loss at South Carolina.To his teammates, it was just more of Marshall being Marshall, and they will take the good with the bad. After so many ups and downs, Ole Miss is once again dancing and chomping, shouting and shooting. Let the madness begin.
SALT LAKE CITY — Through 64 games this season, Knicks Coach Mike Woodson never had to construct his starting lineup out of pure desperation. Woodson did for Monday's nationally televised game against the Utah Jazz .Woodson went with Raymond Felton, Pablo Prigioni, Iman Shumpert, Chris Copeland and Kenyon Martin — a combination that had never played together this season.Woodson had few other options. The Knicks were without Carmelo Anthony and Tyson Chandler for the third straight game because of injuries. They lost Amar'e Stoudemire to knee surgery last week.The latest setback came Sunday, when Kurt Thomas injured his right foot. X-rays taken Monday revealed a bone spur, but Thomas was expected to try to play Monday night. He will have a magnetic resonance imaging exam Tuesday.The Knicks were prepared to send out a makeshift starting lineup in Utah. One of the five players, Felton, is a regular starter but not a star. Two of them, Prigioni and Copeland, were not in the league last year. Prigioni, a 35-year-old rookie, built his career in Spain, and Copeland, a 28-year-old rookie, spent most of 2012 in Belgium.Shumpert missed more than half of this season while recovering from left knee surgery, and he has not been the same player he was during his rookie season. Martin was thrust into the starting lineup because of injuries. Last month, after being out of the league since May, Martin became the first No. 1 overall pick in the league's history to sign a 10-day contract.After an 0-4 start to the Knicks' Western trip, the Utah game was the final stop before they could try to regroup at home. Woodson's strategy reflected how much had gone wrong recently on the road.Last summer, Woodson wanted a veteran team, and the Knicks became the oldest team in the league. Now, with less than a month remaining in the regular season, the Knicks are stumbling and their injuries are mounting, as some analysts and fans predicted before the season.On Monday, Woodson was dealing with issues besides his starting lineup. Chandler, out with a stiff neck, was at the team's hotel instead of at the morning shootaround. Before bruising his left knee in Denver last week, Chandler had started every game.Woodson said Chandler's neck would be re-evaluated by doctors in New York on Tuesday.Anthony ran up and down the court, took jump shots and showed improvement in his lateral movement, but he announced he would not play against the Jazz. He also spoke with reporters for the first time in nearly a week and said he felt "much better" after having fluid drained from behind his sore right knee Thursday.The team hoped that Anthony, by resting Monday, would gain more strength in his right leg. Anthony said that he felt no discomfort in his knee and that he should be able to play Wednesday against the Orlando Magic at Madison Square Garden.According to the team, the fluid was caused by irritation in Anthony's hamstring. There is no structural damage to his knee."Now it's just a matter of getting that pop back, that power back," he told reporters.Although Thomas, 40, the oldest player in the league, planned to play Monday, the Knicks were still worried that he could miss significant time.The Knicks have already lost Stoudemire (right knee) and Rasheed Wallace (left foot) for at least the rest of the regular season. If Thomas joins Stoudemire and Wallace on the sidelines, the Knicks may have to consider signing at least one more free agent.The Knicks have been an injury-prone group. Anthony has missed 13 games with a variety of injures — ankle, foot, knee and now hamstring. Jason Kidd, who will turn 40 this week, has had back spasms. Marcus Camby has battled a foot injury all season. Felton missed 12 games with a fractured right pinkie, and he has not played as well as he did before the injury. Prigioni has missed four games because of foot and back injuries.Copeland, the last player signed out of training camp, has not had an injury this year, but he is playing only because of injuries to his teammates.The true iron man this season has been J. R. Smith, who has played every game but has yet to be in the starting lineup. Smith has played 2,130 minutes, which leads the Knicks.Woodson needed a scorer off the bench Monday, so Smith stayed in that role against the Jazz.
FORT MYERS, Fla. — The prime-time national television spotlight landed on the Florida Gulf Coast men's basketball team at 6:14 p.m. Sunday and lasted for about eight seconds, as the Eagles whooped and danced and waved towels in delirium.If professional bull riding is the most dangerous eight seconds in sports, then this, a live shot on CBS of a team chosen for the N.C.A.A. tournament, can rank among the most emotional and valuable, especially for the smaller universities, potential upset artists in the making.These images, small windows into locker rooms and meeting rooms and arenas, provide a lasting image of Selection Sunday. And for Florida Gulf Coast, which completed its transition to Division I two years ago, such images are the equivalent of a free commercial, a way to sell an emerging program — in this case, one that upended Miami this season, in the same Alico Arena that is a short walk from an on-campus lake."The first time I saw the show I was in seventh grade," said guard Sherwood Brown, the Atlantic Sun player of the year. "I saw those teams jump up, and I said, 'I want to be a part of that.' "Viewers like Brown catch only those brief windows, unaware of the dizzying logistics involved and the hundreds of moments over dozens of years that culminate in 6 to 10 seconds on TV.For Andy Enfield, 43, eight seconds resulted from a lifetime worthy of a movie script. He set the N.C.A.A. career record for free-throw percentage (92.5) at Johns Hopkins, became an assistant coach with the Milwaukee Bucks and the Boston Celtics, co-founded a document imaging and contract management company (TractManager) in the health care and real estate industries, created and developed a series of basketball instructional videos (All Net Basketball) and assisted for five seasons of Florida State's basketball resurgence.And he also married a model, Amanda Marcum, who has appeared in Elle, Maxim and Vogue, often on the cover, and starred in ads for Victoria's Secret and Armani.After all of that, Florida Gulf Coast called, before last season. It sold Enfield on potential; on a university founded in 1991, on more than 700 acres of restored wetlands; with programs in women's basketball, men's and women's soccer and softball that made the N.C.A.A. postseason in their first eligible seasons."Most people around the country had never heard of Florida Gulf Coast," he said Sunday in his office. "When I first got the job, we'd make recruiting calls, and people thought we were a community college."Right away, the Eagles' leading scorer and rebounder, Anthony Banks, transferred. The conference's assists leader, Marlon Rivera, followed him out the door. Enfield needed to develop the players he inherited. He needed four freshmen to reinvigorate the roster. He needed to build a brand.He needed a program worthy of eight seconds.CBS decides which teams to highlight. The network prefers a mixture: bubble teams and teams that are locks to make the bracket, but also unknown programs and traditional powers. Most years, according to Harold Bryant, the vice president for production at CBS Sports, it selects 15 to 30 teams, although some are ultimately not included in the broadcast.Executives debate which universities to feature for the better part of a month. Sometimes, as they did Sunday, CBS uses a local affiliate, in this case WINK-TV, to provide the national feed. Ideally, the more regular entrants will project a more businesslike reaction, while the newbies, like the Eagles, will spontaneously rejoice as if they uncovered a winning lottery ticket."We're trying to capture that instant emotion," Bryant said. "We see it all, the full range. We see cheerleaders, mascots, jumping in the air, tossing popcorn, hugs, holding up signs, holding up babies, crying."At Florida Gulf Coast, the presentation of those eight seconds fell to Mike Miller, the athletic department's director of facilities and operations. Miller and his staff met with various departments: marketing and sports information and athletics. They hired Tech-Tronics to install a temporary 16-foot screen and an audio system. They diagramed the setup, fiddled with the sound, adjusted the lighting.
Mike McFadden made two free throws with 8.7 seconds remaining and Robert Morris shocked the defending national champion Kentucky, 59-57, on Tuesday night in the opening round of the National Invitation Tournament.The Wildcats decided not to call timeout after the second free throw, but Kyle Wiltjer's 3-pointer before the buzzer bounced off the rim, sending hundreds of Robert Morris students onto the court.Lucky Jones led the Colonials (24-10) with 15 points but was ejected for a flagrant foul on Archie Goodwin with 3 minutes 41 seconds to play. Kentucky, which trailed by 13 points in the second half, managed to tie the score twice but never held the lead. Goodwin finished with 18 points but could not stop Kentucky's disappointing season from coming to a stunning end.The victory was validation for the Colonials, who won the Northeastern Conference regular-season title with ease but lost in the conference tournament. The loss relegated the college to the N.I.T., but it hardly felt like a letdown Tuesday."I know they were disappointed not to get to N.C.A.A. tournament," Robert Morris Coach Andy Toole said. "This is a memory they'll get for rest of their lives."The Wildcats let the Colonials race to an early 10-0 lead, only led briefly at the end of the first half and appeared disinterested to spoil the return of Coach John Calipari, a hometown boy made good. Calipari was born in Pittsburgh and grew up a couple of miles from the Robert Morris campus in Moon, Pa., where he played guard at Moon High.Fans scooped up the 3,500 tickets in a matter of hours on Monday, then lined up outside in the blustery March wind well before tip-off of perhaps the biggest game in the university's history. Robert Morris averaged barely 1,000 fans during its 15 home games, yet scalpers were asking for $75 to get in the door Tuesday."This is humbling," Calipari said. "They think we're supposed to win 30 a year, 35 a year, go to the Final Four, win a national title."N.C.A.A. TOURNAMENT OPENS Jeremy Underwood came off the bench to score 19 points, leading North Carolina A&T past 21-loss Liberty, 73-72, in the opening round of the N.C.A.A. tournament in Dayton, Ohio. The Flames — only the second team ever to make the tournament with 20 losses — had a chance to win when John Caleb Sanders drove the length of the court and flipped up a left-handed layup in heavy congestion, but it just missed. North Carolina A&T (20-16), which had lost its previous nine games in the N.C.A.A. tournament, earned a date with top-seeded Louisville (29-5) on Thursday.In Tuesday's second game, Matthew Dellavedova scored 22 points as St. Mary's got a good start on its second straight tournament appearance by beating Middle Tennessee, 67-54. The Gaels (28-6) will make a trip to Auburn Hills, Mich., to play sixth-seeded Memphis on Thursday.ST. JOHN'S ADVANCES IN N.I.T. Sir'Dominic Pointer raced down the court and made a jumper from the corner at the buzzer to lead St. John's (17-15) to a 63-61 come-from-behind win over St. Joseph's in the first round of the N.I.T. ... Raheem Appleby scored 27 points and Alex Hamilton added 16 to help visiting Louisiana Tech rally from a 9-point second half deficit to beat Florida State, 71-66. ... Nick Faust had 15 points and host Maryland (23-12) used a strong second half to defeat Niagara, 86-70. ... Levi Randolph took over during a 22-0 second-half run in host Alabama's 62-43 win over Northeastern.
WACO, Tex. — Just in case anyone doubted Baylor's confident intent to reach the women's Final Four in New Orleans, Coach Kim Mulkey wore a fleur-de-lis on her T-shirt as she watched the tournament pairings, while some fans wore Mardi Gras beads and sang, "When the Saints Go Marching In."There is every reason to feel assured on a team anchored by the 6-foot-8 center Brittney Griner, a senior who ranks second on the women's career scoring list with 3,203 points and has blocked 736 shots, an N.C.A.A. record for men and women.Along the way, Griner has steadily improved her technique and composure while leading the top-ranked Bears (32-1) to 72 victories in 73 games as they seek to add a second championship season to the 40-0 perfection of a year ago."Brittney Griner, after winning the national championship last year, should have erased any doubt as the greatest to ever play the game," Mulkey, who grew up in southeast Louisiana, said Monday night. "Why is she the greatest? Because she impacts both ends of the floor."Various basketball precincts would undoubtedly cast votes for Diana Taurasi, Cheryl Miller or Chamique Holdsclaw as the greatest college player. But certainly Griner is the most uniquely influential. There have been centers as tall or taller, but none at that size with such lithe elegance."We've never seen a player the size of Brittney that had the athleticism that Brittney does on the offensive and defensive end," said Ann Meyers Drysdale, vice president of the W.N.B.A.'s Phoenix Mercury, which is expected to draft Griner next month with the No. 1 overall pick.The ease with which Griner can dunk makes for engaging highlights, but such novelty should not detract from the fullness of her skills. On offense, she has enhanced her footwork, positioning, free-throw shooting, range, patience and diversity. Defensively, she has maintained deft intimidation, fouling out only twice in four years."Other people may have more championships, but I think, individually, she has a greater impact on the game than anyone who has played," said Notre Dame Coach Muffet McGraw, whose team lost to Griner and Baylor in last season's N.C.A.A. championship game.Weeks after last season ended, Griner fractured a bone in her right, or shooting, wrist while riding an elongated skateboard. But Mulkey did not demand that she stop longboarding, saying, "They've got to live; they're college students, they're not professional athletes."The wrist healed quickly, and only once this season did Baylor stumble. That sole defeat came in a 71-69 loss against Stanford, a No. 1 seed and perennial Final Four team, in November in Hawaii. And the defeat carried an asterisk. Baylor point guard Odyssey Sims, whom many consider more reliable than Notre Dame's Skylar Diggins, especially in the biggest games, played only four minutes before leaving with a hamstring injury.Since its loss to Stanford, Baylor has defeated the other two No. 1 seeds in the N.C.A.A. tournament, Notre Dame and Connecticut, on the road. The Bears have a two-time champion as a coach in Mulkey and a formidable combination punch at forward in Brooklyn Pope and Destiny Williams. And they have resourceful wing players in Kimetria Hayden and Jordan Madden who, along with Sims, can shoot 3-pointers and take pestering risks on defense, knowing that Griner is lurking with her imposing 7-foot-4-inch wingspan."Defensively, the fact that she's in the building causes problems," Iowa State Coach Bill Fennelly said.On the offensive end, a younger Griner sometimes strayed beneath the basket when she wheeled inside or instinctively spun toward the baseline to escape double-teams, opposing coaches said. Now she can turn and shoot over either shoulder. She has added a turnaround jumper and a jump hook and leads the nation in field-goal percentage (60.4). And she has the vision and unflappability to pass her way out of smothering double- and triple-teams.
CHICAGO — Mark Montgomery never noticed this about Tom Izzo. Not that he could. Between playing for Michigan State when Izzo was an assistant, then serving as an Izzo assistant for 10 seasons until 2011, Montgomery had too much else going on to scrutinize Izzo's sideline mannerisms.Last Friday, Montgomery, now the coach at Northern Illinois, stopped by United Center and watched Michigan State come back in the second half to beat Iowa, 59-56, in a Big Ten Conference tournament quarterfinal. His seat behind the Spartans' bench provided a fresh vantage point to watch Izzo, and that is when he saw it.When Michigan State ran its offense correctly, Izzo, in a barely perceptible gesture, rapidly nodded his head up and down. (Imagine the lightest possible tap on the top of a bobblehead doll.) When play flowed the wrong way, the nodding switched to a side-to-side no, then returned to a yes when the players corrected themselves."It's reassuring the guys that they're doing the right thing," Montgomery said in a telephone interview Saturday. "I think he was doing it to the officials, too."Few coaches prepare their teams to win in March as consistently as Izzo, through 16 consecutive N.C.A.A. tournament bids, 6 Final Fours and a national championship (in 2000). No other coach has been to as many Final Fours in the last 14 seasons. And since the 1998-99 season, Izzo's teams are 71-29 in March.But Izzo nodded less last Saturday, when the eventual tournament champion Ohio State eliminated the Spartans, 61-58, in a semifinal. Afterward, Izzo criticized the Spartans for not playing smart.Adreian Payne, undercut by his teammate Derrick Nix while trying to block a shot, grabbed the rim and was called for basket interference, handing the Buckeyes 2 points. With 1 minute 27 seconds left and the Spartans down by 1, Nix pulled down Buckeyes guard Aaron Craft as he drove the lane. The flagrant foul call gave Ohio State two shots — Craft made one — and the ball.Michigan State prides itself on rebounding, but the Spartans could not get one on the ensuing possession, and Deshaun Thomas hit a jumper for a 4-point lead with 22 seconds left.Izzo felt that certain players too often let their egos affect their judgment. Surrounded by reporters outside the locker room, Izzo — still in a gray pinstriped suit and green print tie — made his point plainly."I'd like my players to grow up a little bit," he said. "There's no bad blood, just personal confrontations that take place. It's not disrespect or anything. If that is curbed and used in the right way, it's a motivating factor. I thought it got too personal, like on the playground — you score so I score. You can't do that."I think we need a little more discipline right now. We have enough toughness."In the intensely competitive Big Ten, Michigan State (25-8) did enough to earn the Midwest Region's No. 3 seed and the next-best thing to a home game. The Spartans meet No. 14 Valparaiso on Thursday in Auburn Hills, Mich."I'm looking forward to playing anybody," Izzo said. "I'd play the Lakers tomorrow instead of some of the teams I've played recently."How far the Spartans advance depends on how well Izzo prepares them. Much of the groundwork was done long before the Spartans showed up at United Center.Usually it starts in November and December, when Izzo sprinkles his nonconference schedule with tough opponents. This season the Spartans played Connecticut at an Air Force base in Germany (a loss), the eventual Big 12 champion Kansas in Atlanta (a victory), and the eventual Atlantic Coast Conference champion Miami in Coral Gables, Fla. (a loss). And Texas came to the Breslin Center (a victory). Izzo is not the only Big Ten coach who schedules this way, but it works.Izzo's players usually develop toughness and togetherness during their rugged Big Ten schedule. This season Michigan State faced ranked teams in half its 18 conference games, going 4-5.
BOSTON — LeBron James could not be slowed by the personal demons that once haunted him in the most hostile of N.B.A. arenas, or by the ghosts of famous Celtics past, or by a 43-point scorer suitably named Green.Who, then, will stop the King's run, much less his reign?Kyrie Irving-less Cleveland on Wednesday night? Detroit's motorless Pistons in Miami on Friday? Michael Jordan's broken-down heap of a Charlotte franchise? The Orlando (giggle) Magic?Those are the next four opponents for the Miami Heat, winners of 23 straight after rallying from 17 points down and surviving Jeff Green and the Celtics on Monday night, 105-103, on James's left-side jumper with 10.5 seconds left over Green, fittingly enough.Give the still Derrick Rose-less Bulls a fighting chance in Chicago next Wednesday, which would be Miami's 28th opponent as it chases the N.B.A. winning-streak record of 33. The record has lasted more than four decades after being established by the 1971-72 Los Angeles Lakers of Wilt Chamberlain, Jerry West, Gail Goodrich and, yes, a mustachioed and premoussed reserve guard named Pat Riley.If Riley, the Heat's president and impresario — who impressed the free-agent James in the summer of 2010 by dumping his bag of championship rings on a table — has a sardonic sense of humor to match his undying devotion to that Lakers team, which he once described to me as his forever favorite, maybe he could put an end to what is now the league's second-longest streak.Remember how Coach Gregg Popovich infuriated Commissioner David Stern by resting his best players in Miami in late November? Circle the date, March 31, Miami at San Antonio, Opponent No. 30 on the Heat's late-season hit list. (The Knicks, in Miami, would be No. 31.)Riley, of course, would have as much chance of talking James into a seat with the streak alive as he would of making his players publicly admit that they have his old Lakers in their sights."We've never talked about it one time, at our shootaround, or practice," Chris Bosh said, reciting the Heat's unofficial mantra.Conversely, the raucous sounds coming from the Miami locker room late Monday at the TD Garden befit something greater than the sheer relief of Paul Pierce's last-gasp 3-point attempt bounding off the front rim and deflating a Celtics crowd that had grown increasingly hopeful of seeing history repeat itself.Five years previous to the day — March 18, 2008 — Pierce and the Celtics put an unceremonious end to a string of 22 consecutive victories by the Houston Rockets, who managed that after losing their All-Star center, Yao Ming, to a broken foot in the 12th game.That was different, said Miami's reserve forward, Shane Battier, whose strip of a driving Green preserved the 2-point lead that James's 36th and 37th points (to go along with 12 assists) had provided. Even with Yao, the Rockets were a pretty good team, no defending champion, and certainly not one with the undisputed best player in the world."People were more curious than anything else," said Battier, a regular starter on that Rockets team. Battier added, "And the day the American media outnumbered the Chinese media, that's when we realized, uh oh, we've got some attention now."Battier cackled and looked in the direction of James and Dwyane Wade, surrounded by cameras."We've been dealing with the media circus — well, some of these guys — for three years now. So this is just Monday night."In other words, Battier was suggesting that the burden of a potentially historic achievement in the waning days of the grinding regular season should not carry too great a risk of becoming too emotionally or physically draining.Yes, there's the argument that the 31-year-old Wade and veterans like Ray Allen and Udonis Haslem would benefit from a less taxing finish. But they are all riding James's superhero cape now, and James is no doubt sensing that the stars just may be aligned to achieve what many have thought to be unachievable.The remarkable thing about the Lakers' streak, which occurred during the first half of a championship season, was that it began immediately after Elgin Baylor, one of the game's greats, retired when confronted with losing his starting position to Jim McMillian."That team just killed people, scored so easily," said Bob McAdoo, the Heat's assistant coach, who joined the old Buffalo Braves as a rookie the next season.McAdoo played high school and college ball in the 1960s and early 1970s, was a most valuable player with Buffalo in 1974-75 and supplied instant offense off the bench for Coach Riley's Showtime Lakers of the 1980s. He is therefore as qualified as anyone else to evaluate the relative quality of N.B.A. generations, which surely will become a subtext of this story if it continues much longer.Sitting on the Miami bench before Monday night's game, McAdoo said the Heat players occasionally chided him, wrongly assuming that contemporary players were far superior athletically."I tell them, you guys may be 15 to 20 pounds heavier, but don't think we didn't have athletes," he said.He has teased them about the public overreaction to James and Bosh teaming with Wade, as if basketball had never before had such assemblages of talent. He has bragged to them about a picture he has, taken from above the basket, showing three Lakers boxing out Celtics: him on Kevin McHale, Kareem Abdul-Jabbar on Robert Parish and James Worthy on Larry Bird. The wider view has Magic Johnson on the perimeter next to Dennis Johnson."Eight Hall of Famers in one picture," McAdoo said, needing to say no more.This is the kind of debate James and the Heat are now dribbling toward, shooting for, no matter Battier's insistence that "it's about standard of play, about sharpening who we are as we march toward the playoffs."The road to 33 from 23 sounds like a long and winding one until you consider the comparatively limp Eastern Conference. For the most part, formidable resistance is not exactly lining up to obstruct James, who never played a day of college basketball but who seems hellbent on carrying his own brand of March madness into April.
LAS VEGAS — The basketball court at the Mountain West Conference tournament was like no other, impossible to ignore, which is exactly the point. Stained in at least four hues of brown, it featured deep contrasts of arcs and boxes and jags, including a range of snow-capped peaks stretching the length of the floor .It was part backyard deck, part art installation. More than anything, it was a conversation piece."When people look at that, they're going to think mountains," said Dan Butterly, the Mountain West's senior associate commissioner. "And they're going to think Mountain West."Butterly represents a growing number of college administrators who see the basketball court as a blank canvas atop 90 feet of Northern maple. It needs only a coat of imagination.Universities and college conferences, and even the N.C.A.A., increasingly see the basketball court as one of the last untapped frontiers for image making. The goal is a steady stream of discussion and instant identification, especially by those clicking through television channels."There's a lot of focus on branding," Butterly said. "It's so important, especially with all the recent conference realignment. Programs want to stand out and brand who they are. And the basketball court is one way to do that."It is a natural progression. Teams have always identified themselves with colors and mascots. They tinker with uniforms to create intrigue. But universities like Boise State, with its bright blue football field, and Oregon, with its Nike-designed basketball court intended to look like a forest of fir trees, have shown others that the biggest opportunities may be right under their feet."You say 'the blue turf' across the country, and what do people think of?" Boise State Athletic Director Mark Coyle said. "That's free exposure you just can't get any other way."The recent trend of turning basketball courts into multihued artwork can trace its roots back about 15 years, when colleges seized the floor as a medium for promoting both themselves and their corporate sponsors. Vast expanses of courts — inside the lane, or inside the 3-point line — were painted in bold team colors. Midcourt logos ballooned in size, sometimes to garish proportions.In a strange way, that led to the novelty of today. Bold colors are out, replaced by a more subtle and more intricate use of stains, not paints — sometimes to create images, usually to mark the 3-point area or the key.Until a few years ago, the N.C.A.A. used the courts already in place in arenas for its postseason championship tournament. But it found it increasingly difficult to brand itself amid the visual commotion.So the N.C.A.A. came up with its own design — courts uniformly adorned with little more than a thick black border and a blue N.C.A.A. logo, with a splashier version for the Final Four.In that way, the N.C.A.A. engages in a branding effort of its own, using a minimalist approach to stand out."We wanted the consistency, so that when fans were moving from site to site, watching on television, they knew it was the N.C.A.A. basketball tournament," said L. J. Wright, the director of the men's tournament.The N.C.A.A. now owns nine courts for the opening rounds of the men's tournament, each used for a week in March and then packed away. It orders five more courts for the four regionals and the Final Four — typical courts cost $100,000, the manufacturer said — which it then sells after the tournament. The Final Four court is first offered to the national champion.The N.C.A.A. women's tournament, by contrast, has created Final Four courts with giant, colorful creations, meant to be remembered."When you walk into that arena, you look around and think, 'Wow,' " said Tina Krah, the director of the women's basketball tournament. " 'No one else will play on this court.' "But when Baylor declined to buy the court after it won last year's women's title, the Mountain West Conference stepped in. Butterly, the associate commissioner, saw the floor in Denver and immediately was sold by what he called the "mountainscape" of the design.Like all the N.C.A.A. tournament floors, it was made by Connor Sport Court, based in Salt Lake City. The Mountain West asked for modifications to the design — lose the Final Four logo and stain in a Mountain West Conference logo instead, for example, and darken the perimeter.The Mountain West was simply riding a trend of conferences designing, and sometimes buying, basketball floors for their annual conference tournaments."A lot of conferences have realized that they should brand the floor, not just use the venue," said Gary Gray, the sales manager for Connor Sport Court. "The Mountain West used to just slap their own sticker on the floor, but everyone knew it was the Thomas & Mack Center."Connor Sport Court, which has built the courts for at least six N.B.A. teams (including the Brooklyn Nets) and several dozen college programs, uses three companies to paint and stain the courts. This past week, this year's Final Four court was being painted in Chattanooga, Tenn.But the Mountain West court was stained by United Services of Idaho Falls, Idaho. Run by Richard Matheson and four sons, a family of former dairy farmers, the business also did the work on the court at Oregon's Matthew Knight Arena, which opened in 2011.It was not the first college basketball floor to use an intricate stained pattern — Colorado State, far ahead of its time, had a pair of rams' horns, each the size of half the court, applied in 1998 — but it is the most famous.It can be hard to discern what is being depicted, looking at first glance as if a giant sneezed Minwax all over the court. But it is an improbably detailed, four-sided stand of fir trees, honoring Oregon's Tall Firs national championship team of 1939.
LEXINGTON, Ky. — The wily bracket-crafters on the N.C.A.A. tournament selection committee missed a chance to create a blissful sort of havoc at Rupp Arena on Thursday afternoon. If only they had also slotted the tournament sweethearts Gonzaga and Virginia Commonwealth and Valparaiso and, why not, Northwestern State in a pod already teeming with upstarts.As it is, unaffiliated fans will have a hard enough time deciding whom to root for in the opening two games. All four teams involved in Thursday's day session — Butler and Bucknell tip off at 12:40 p.m. Eastern, Marquette and Davidson about 3:10 — captivated the tournament in Marches past, rising from relative obscurity to become national darlings. So it seems a bit unfair that these so-called Cinderellas have gathered here for the equivalent of musical slippers, with only one advancing to the Round of 16 next week in Washington.At least that is the sentiment of Kevin Bettencourt, who led the Bison in scoring the night Bucknell tipped mighty Kansas in 2005 in one of the most shocking upsets in tournament history. When the pairings were unveiled Sunday, Bettencourt felt a swell of pride — and disappointment."It was great that we got an 11 seed, but I couldn't believe we were playing Butler with Davidson there, too — they're two of my favorite teams to watch," said Bettencourt, who is now an assistant at Division II Bentley (Mass.). "It was always easy to cheer for the underdogs, but now all the perennial underdogs aren't underdogs anymore. I really wish they were in different brackets so I could root for all of them."On Monday, the eighth anniversary of Bucknell's victory, Bettencourt received an e-mail from a former old teammate, Chris Neisz. Attached was a photo of the team celebrating a game that, Bettencourt said, "if we played it 100 times, we'd lose 99." Memories flooded back.How the band from Northern Iowa, which lost earlier that night, welcomed the Bison back to the hotel by playing the Bucknell fight song. How not a single reporter ventured into their locker room the day before the game. How what seemed like every reporter at the arena in Oklahoma City crammed inside the day after.In Halifax, Nova Scotia, a 14-year-old boy absorbed it all, too — but from a hotel room. His name is Bryson Johnson, and he is now the team's career leader in 3-pointers made. Before that night, Johnson had never heard of Bucknell, did not know if it was in Alburgh, Vt. (no), or Big Stone Gap, Va. (no), or Lewisburg, Pa. (yes)."That's the effect that one game can have," Johnson said. "It did on me."Bucknell aspires to become the Butler of north-central Pennsylvania, so much so that its coach, Dave Paulsen, said he tried modeling aspects of his program after the once-underdog Bulldogs. (For instance, the Bucknell assistant Charles Lee, a member of the 2005 team, said the team had adopted Butler's approach of using a big man to help corral the opposing point guard in transition.) To which Brad Stevens, Butler's coach, said with a smile: "I'm trying to steal from them. I don't know if they — they probably shouldn't waste their time looking at us."Stevens, turning serious, said he realized how Butler's soaring profile and remarkable success — consecutive appearances in the national championship game, after being seeded fifth and eighth — had flipped its reputation, how Bucknell on Thursday would be seeking to eliminate a big-time program. He said Bucknell, with its depth and experience, seemed to him "a lot like the Butler teams of the past.""People in basketball circles know there's a reason they don't schedule them in the preseason," Stevens said of Bucknell and Davidson.Two weeks in 2008 propelled Davidson, a tiny liberal arts college north of Charlotte, N.C., into the spotlight. Behind the mesmerizing play of Stephen Curry, the Wildcats, then seeded 10th, edged the midmajor standard-bearer Gonzaga, overcame a 17-point deficit to defeat Georgetown and then whipped Wisconsin before losing, by 2 points, to Kansas in the regional final.
SAN JOSE, Calif. — If the N.C.A.A. held a coed basketball tournament of families — your five against their five, all the way through the bracket — the Tinkles of Missoula, Mont., would be the runaway favorite, seeded first over all."We're pretty solid all around, one through five," Joslyn Tinkle said. "I don't think there's a weak link."Wayne Tinkle, a former professional player, is the men's basketball coach at Montana, which plays fourth-seeded Syracuse on Thursday in the N.C.A.A. tournament. His wife, Lisa, starred for Montana and was inducted into the university's Hall of Fame in 2011.Joslyn, 22, is the second-leading scorer for top-seeded Stanford, a championship contender in the women's N.C.A.A. tournament. Elle, 19, is a highly regarded freshman at Gonzaga, also a tournament team. And Tres, already 6-foot-6 at the age of 16, was an all-state player this season as a sophomore, leading his high school team to a state championship two weekends ago.Together, the 383 combined inches of Tinkles must be the most talented basketball family in the country."Our size alone would be pretty intimidating," said Lisa, a 6-2 47-year-old.Two generations of playing and coaching are colliding this weekend for the Tinkles. Montana (25-6), winner of the Big Sky Conference and seeded 13th, was sent here to open the men's tournament. An upset of Syracuse would advance the Grizzlies to a Saturday game against either California or Nevada-Las Vegas.Less than 20 miles away, Stanford will begin its expected march toward the women's Final Four on Sunday against Tulsa. If the Cardinal and Gonzaga, seeded 12th in its region of the women's tournament, should each win twice, they would meet next week in Spokane, Wash., Wayne Tinkle's hometown."If you're a basketball player, you love March Madness," said Joslyn, a 6-3 forward averaging 11.8 points per game. "To be able to experience that with your family — and not just for them to see it, but to experience themselves — it's just awesome."Wayne Tinkle and Lisa McLeod were simultaneous stars of the Montana basketball teams in the 1980s. The 6-10 Tinkle scored 1,500 career points and grabbed 836 rebounds. McLeod scored 1,470 points and had 830 rebounds.They married and followed Wayne's 12-season professional career through Europe, across Sweden, Italy, Greece and Spain. They returned full-time to Missoula in 2001, where Wayne became a Grizzlies' assistant coach before ascending to the top job in 2006.He has led his alma mater to four-consecutive 20-victory seasons and three N.C.A.A. tournament bids. This season's sharpshooting team (47.4 percent field-goal percentage) has a deep bench, with seven players making at least 20 3-pointers. While it lost its leading scorer, Mathias Ward (14.8 points per game), to a season-ending foot injury in February, the junior swingman Kareem Jamar was the Big Sky's most valuable player, and guard Will Cherry the conference's defensive player of the year.Montana had close losses to Colorado State, South Dakota State (two overtimes) and Davidson (overtime) — all N.C.A.A. tournament teams.Despite past success, the ultimate legacy for Wayne and Lisa Tinkle may be their three children."They kind of grew up on the basketball court," Lisa said. "They knew the borders of the court, and that was their playground. They were never forced to play basketball, but they were surrounded by it."Joslyn is considered the best girls' basketball player in Montana history. She won two state championships, was a four-time all-state selection (and a three-time choice in volleyball), and was named a first-team all-American as a senior. Playing alongside the Stanford all-American Chiney Oswumike, Tinkle is second on the team in scoring and averages 5.7 rebounds per game. She will get her degree this spring (a sociology/communications double major) and hopes to play basketball professionally.
SALT LAKE CITY — Rick Byrd became the basketball coach at Belmont in 1986, the same year the N.C.A.A. universally put in the 3-point line. Byrd considered himself a basketball purist, and still does. Initially, he did not care for the new rule or the strange arc."If they were going to do that, I thought, why don't you just have a big grid?" Byrd said Wednesday, on the eve of another N.C.A.A. tournament. "This is worth 1. This is worth 2. This is worth 17."Yet Byrd also specialized in offense. He loved nothing more than to diagram plays. He sketched them regularly, on notepads and brochures and restaurant napkins. The more he thought about the 3-pointer, the more he considered the math involved.It was simple, really. A team that made one-third of its 3-point shots scored as many points as a team that connected on half of its 2-point shots. At a university like Belmont, where Byrd would perpetually struggle to recruit elite post players, heaving a high number of long-range attempts made perfect sense, within the confines of the offense he constructed.To that end, Belmont has made the third-most 3-pointers of any team in the nation since it entered Division I in 1996. The top two: Troy and a little team called Duke.Such long-range marksmanship has also made Belmont a trendy upset pick in this N.C.A.A. tournament, where the Bruins, a No. 11 seed, will face sixth-seeded Arizona on Thursday in the West region. Belmont is the 18th-most-accurate 3-point shooting team in the country; Arizona is tied for 273rd in opponent 3-point percentage. The math again appears simple — except that it is not.These Bruins have almost come full circle. They still attempt many 3-pointers and still make a high percentage, but they do not rely on the long ball as much as past teams did. They have been mischaracterized as simply a 3-point factory."That's what's scary about them," said Sean Miller, the Arizona coach. "They're a great offensive team, period."So continues the Belmont offensive evolution. For years, Byrd said, his offense fit the school's profile — small, scrappy, creative. The aha moment came early on, back when Belmont played N.A.I.A. hoops. Its rival, Lipscomb, surrounded one adept post player with four perimeter shooters.What Byrd could not defend, he adopted. It helped that he inherited a recruit named Joe Behling, the exact kind of post player for the four-out, one-in offense. Behling became an all-American and the national player of the year.Over the years, Belmont became known for its 3-point prowess, but its offense, Byrd's offense, revolved around that player in the post. The Bruins rarely ran set plays for their shooters. Instead, they threw the ball inside and reacted to the defense, which either guarded the inside player with one defender or helped with another body, opening up driving lanes and 3-point looks."Offense, as much as anything, is about the value of the shot," Byrd said. "We shoot very few shots between the five feet from the basket and the 3-point line. Probably less than almost anybody out there. I want quality shots. I don't care if we win 88-46 or 48-46."That philosophy remained intact this season, even if the implementation shifted. No player taller than the 6-foot-7 forward Trevor Noack played regular minutes. That forced Belmont to change its offense (even Noack took 91 3-pointers) to more resemble other college offenses. That meant the Bruins needed to shoot well, from anywhere, consistently, which is what they did.Belmont made nearly half its shots over the course of the season. Its 49.4 shooting percentage ranked fourth nationally. That started with guard Ian Clark, who came to Belmont for the four-out, one-in offense yet flourished when it shifted to ball screens and heavy motion. This season, Clark recorded a 54.1 shooting percentage and made 46.3 percent of his shots from behind the arc — astounding figures.
SALT LAKE CITY — There was Harvard , in its second-consecutive N.C.A.A. tournament, after a stretch without an appearance from 1947 until last season. Now, all Harvard needed was a win.Despite the loss of two of its better players before the season to a widespread academic scandal, despite an Ivy League season that came down to the final weekend, Harvard even led heavily favored New Mexico late on Thursday. Like, really late. Like, all the way until the scoreboard read zeros straight across.So there was Harvard, winner of an N.C.A.A. tournament game for the first time in team history. The Crimson upset the third-seeded Lobos, 68-62, at EnergySolutions Arena in one of the latest finishes on Thursday night, on the first day of full action in the tournament. It was, if not a seismic upset, then a big one.When it ended, Harvard's players danced on the court like they had just won the national title. The band played. The flags waved. The players skipped into the locker room. History was assured."What a sensational, gutsy effort by our team," Harvard Coach Tommy Amaker said.The rest of the day in the West Region unfolded mostly according to form. Top-seeded Gonzaga won its contest over Southern, although not without a scare. Wichita State topped Pittsburgh in an 8-9 game without a clear favorite. Arizona, seeded sixth, dispatched Belmont, an 11 seed, with ease.Then came the nightcap. Harvard clung to its late advantage. Its band, clad in crimson blazers that matched the ushers' uniforms inside the arena, danced and chanted, hands clasped, all sorts of nervous and excited. The Lobos' fan section, meanwhile, sat in quiet silence, a sea of people clad in red, almost every one of them seated as their season, so promising as of Thursday morning, slowly slipped away.New Mexico (30-5) trailed at halftime, but not by as much as the face of their coach indicated. Steve Alford, who received a 10-year extension Wednesday, stomped all around the sideline, arms folded, eyes rolling, face twisted into grimaces."We can't shoot for them," Alford said when asked about all the missed shots. "We've had games like that. Several games."Alford's team plays in a loud, raucous arena known as The Pit. It seemed as if they brought The Pit with them here — in their stomachs. At one point, the Lobos were shooting 9 percent from the floor, and they concluded the first half with 10 makes in 28 attempts. Their shooting improved only slightly in the second half, not enough to beat the Crimson.At one timeout in the first half, Alford lit into forward Hugh Greenwood, the Australian heartbreaker named by Cosmopolitan magazine as one of the hottest players to watch this March. Greenwood's not-hot first-half point total: zero. Same as at the end.Still, the Lobos only trailed by 31-27 at the break. Laurent Rivard led Harvard (19-10), seeded 14th, with 9 points. He would finish with a team-high 17."I've always been exceptionally impressed with him," Amaker said of Laurent Rivard. "I consider him the best shooter in New England. We used to tease him that he was the second-best shooter in Boston behind Ray Allen when he was with the Celtics. He can shoot the ball with the best of them."History indicated it would be tough for Harvard to close the game out. Since 2000, teams from the Ivy League were 2-13 in the N.C.A.A. tournament. Before Thursday. Still, Rivard made another 3-pointer with 6 minutes 6 seconds remaining, and Harvard led, 55-53. New Mexico called a timeout.Harvard's lead only ballooned from there. Wesley Saunders knocked down a jumper. Kenyatta Smith tossed in a hook shot. The Crimson advantage stood at 59-53."We just took our shots and buried them," Rivard said.All that remained was to hold that margin over the final 4:40, a task more difficult than it sounded.But hold on Harvard did, to advance to the third round, which is sort of the second round, and a date with Arizona on Saturday. Another victory would double their N.C.A.A. tournament total, which only started Thursday night."It feels amazing," Smith said. "In a season when we were expected to do nothing because of the things that haven't gone our way."
DAYTON, Ohio — It would not be much of a stretch to consider Kevin Ferrell Jr. the most anticipated recruit in the history of Indiana basketball, one that Hoosiers fans had envisioned leading their team into the N.C.A.A. tournament since 2002, when he was rated the No. 1 fourth grader in the country.That Ferrell, who goes by the nickname Yogi, would eventually wind up as the starting point guard for the top-seeded Hoosiers as a freshman would seem just part of the divine plan, one that began with a personal trainer at age 9 and was spurred on by a demanding father who oversaw his dribbling drills for hours and made him sleep with ESPN on the television in the background.Of course, his path to Bloomington, Ind., was never that straightforward. In fact, Ferrell credited the two years he spent away from organized basketball in middle school — at the behest of that same demanding father — as what helped him more richly define his character on and off the court.Two years of child's play and natural development, biking around his neighborhood in East Indianapolis, playing video games and table tennis. His days as a youth basketball phenom, touring the country with a highly regarded boys' Amateur Athletic Union team, were momentarily paused."I wasn't happy at the time," Ferrell said Thursday, a day before Indiana was to play No. 16 seed James Madison. "But I notice now, in the long run, it was definitely something we should've done."Ferrell was named the nation's top fourth grader by Hoop Scoop as a 4-foot-11 10-year-old guard on his father's A.A.U. team, 100 Percent Hoops. He was an elite ball handler who began working individually with Shon Bolden, a professional trainer in Indianapolis, in third grade. Crowds would show up to watch his scrimmages.Over time, however, the acclaim began to get overwhelming, and it started affecting his focus and ego. His father, Kevin Ferrell, said he was furious when Ferrell's younger brother, Kaleb, chided Yogi one day about not being that good, and Yogi responded: "I'm not that good? Google me."The words seemed to echo in the family's kitchen."Little situations like that where he was truly not understanding what we were doing here," the senior Ferrell said in a telephone interview. "I said it's time to sit back. It's time to get away from this."His father forbade Yogi, then in seventh grade, from playing organized basketball, something he had participated in almost his entire life. Instead, the Ferrells bought him a table tennis table and went on camping trips to Kentucky."I was pretty much being just a normal kid really," Ferrell said. "I was having a lot of fun."Ferrell did not lose the basketball foundation his father instilled. Though he was not playing in organized leagues, Ferrell continued conditioning with Bolden, who also worked with the future N.B.A. players George Hill and Marquis and Jeff Teague, who are brothers.And on Saturdays, the senior Ferrell would take his son to a gym in a church in northeast Indianapolis, a part of town "where you really wouldn't want to go after dark," he said, where a collection of men aged 25-40 gathered to throw their bodies around, no blood no foul."It was definitely competitive," Yogi said, smiling.The gym was sweaty and cramped; the wall was out of bounds. Playing with men twice his age and his size, Ferrell developed his craftiness and toughness, and his passion for the game followed.Ferrell lifted his son's ban by the time Yogi enrolled at Park Tudor School in Indianapolis as a high school freshman. He grew a few inches — he is currently listed at 6 feet — and filled out his frame. Ed Schilling, Park Tudor's coach, said that Ferrell had standing because of his youth career and that his work ethic and commitment set the standard for the team."What stood out was his ability to focus," Schilling said. "There were few timeouts where his eyes did not stop staying locked with mine."Ferrell shot back up the recruiting rankings and was a five-star prospect and McDonald's all-American by his senior year. He committed to Indiana partly because of his experience playing with forward Cody Zeller on the high school A.A.U. circuit."He's always been a great passer, great vision," Zeller said. "He just does so many different things better now. He runs our team."Early last summer, a couple of weeks after enrolling at Indiana, Ferrell nearly came to blows with a teammate, Will Sheehey, a junior, after Sheehey fouled him hard. Later Sheehey said he roughed Ferrell up for a reason."I knew he could be a very special player," Sheehey said. "If he played to a certain level of toughness, he'd be a fantastic player."Ferrell finished third in the Big Ten with 4.2 assists a game and was named to the conference's all-freshmen team. His 137 assists this season were the second most by a freshman in program history, after Isiah Thomas.In 1980, Thomas was the starting point guard as a freshman, leading the Hoosiers to a berth in the Round of 16.The ball will be in Ferrell's hands on Friday. He has known what to do with it for a while."I might go out there even too jacked up," Ferrell said. "But I'll settle down. I know I always do."
KANSAS CITY, Mo. — Even before the Marshall Henderson Traveling Salvation Show rolled into the Sprint Center on Thursday, Henderson, Mississippi's shooting guard/provocateur, pulled innocent bystanders into his uncomfortable orbit via Twitter.In the last few days, Henderson insulted the National Invitation Tournament ("I know I wouldn't wanna be playin in the NIT," he wrote during Kentucky's first-round N.I.T. loss) and praised the charismatic Wisconsin forward Mike Bruesewitz, the one with the red, Art Garfunkel-style Afro. "That dude got some serious swag!!!" Henderson said on Twitter, meaning swagger, or moxie.With Wisconsin (23-11) and Mississippi (26-8) set to play Friday in the Round of 64 in the West Region, such attention from the tournament's most polarizing player was the last thing the normally loquacious Bruesewitz needed. And Henderson did not stop there. Thursday in the Mississippi locker room, a grouchy Henderson brightened when Bruesewitz's name came up."If I could grow hair like that, I would rock it," Henderson said. "I want to buy his hair and wear it on Halloween. That would be awesome."Henderson added: "I've watched Wisconsin a lot on TV and heard Bruesewitz give some of his interviews. He sounds like a colorful guy. People will trash on him a lot when they go on the road. I obviously feel him on that. He seems like a cool dude, and I can't wait to actually meet him."This, remember, comes from someone who last week tagged Southeastern Conference coaches as losers for not voting him first team all-SEC even though he led the conference in scoring, 3-pointers and free-throw shooting. A 6-foot-2 junior, Henderson relishes his role as the SEC house villain.Last Sunday, after Henderson hit a 3-pointer against Florida late in Mississippi's 66-63 victory in the SEC championship game, he taunted Florida fans by mimicking their trademark Gator chomp. And Thursday he took one more shot at the Gators, who blew a 12-point halftime lead."We knew Florida was about to fold," he said. "They were up by 12. We knew Kenny Boynton was probably going to come out and try to go get M.V.P., but we knew they had their own little seed locked up. We knew we needed it more than they needed it."This, now, is Bruesewitz's biggest fan. "I don't care about what anybody said about my swag," Bruesewitz said. "I've heard about it all year. I might be the ugliest player in the Big Ten, I might be the best-looking player in the Big Ten, I have crazy red hair, you should cut your hair. I've heard it all, and I really don't care, because we've won a lot of games and hopefully will continue to do that."The 6-6 Bruesewitz already took enough ribbing from teammates this week when Cosmopolitan magazine named him one of the 26 Hottest Guys of March Madness. The photo caption: "Aside from his impressive moves on the court, there's just something about Mike's ginger fro that makes us swoon.""I expected that," Bruesewitz said, deadpan. "I don't know what you guys are all thinking about. My teammates didn't expect that, either. I'm not shocked. I'm a good-looking guy. I work really hard at it."His teammate Ryan Evans said: "That's a good thing for him. I thought I should have been in there, but it's good for Mike."Bruesewitz, who averages 6.5 points and 5.3 rebounds, may be the closest thing the Badgers have in spirit to Henderson, though his eccentricities barely compare.Bruesewitz keeps his right arm straight and wrist flexed after shooting 3-pointers, maintaining the pose a little longer if it goes in. He reacts to good plays by slapping a palm or extending one. When Wisconsin eliminated top-seeded Indiana from the Big Ten tournament, 68-56, an excited Bruesewitz cradled the basketball and carried it to the handshake line.The curly hairstyle salutes his older brother Robert, a 6-8 former offensive tackle at Princeton who works for the Department of Defense. One Christmas, Robert came home with a huge Afro because he refused to pay for a haircut. Mike thought it looked cool and grew out his hair his sophomore year."It's not for everybody, man," he said with a smile.How long 12th-seeded Mississippi remains in its first N.C.A.A. tournament since 2002 depends on whether Henderson can exploit a Wisconsin team known for its defense.The fifth-seeded Badgers led the rugged Big Ten in scoring defense (55.9 points a game) and 3-point defense (28.1 percent) and allowed 133 3-pointers, the sixth-fewest in Division 1. Henderson, in his first season at Ole Miss, set university records for 3-point baskets (131) and attempts (367) while averaging 20.1 points a game. Mississippi has not scored fewer than 62 points in a game all season; Wisconsin is 5-6 when allowing 60 or more."Henderson flies off screen," Bruesewitz said. "Any glimmer of daylight, he's pulling. He's going to get shots and he's probably going to get his, but we have to make him as inefficient as possible."
AUSTIN, Tex. — For a window into Northwestern State's soul, look at Coach Mike McConathy as a player. He was a high school star in Bossier Parish, La., and was such a potent scorer at Louisiana Tech that his name remains scattered throughout the university record book.Asked how he would describe his playing style back in the 1970s, McConathy tried to deflect the question, even though the media guide clearly defines him as a sharpshooting point guard who was nicknamed Opie.Finally, McConathy let it go and admitted: "I never saw one I didn't like. I still get a lot of grief about that."So perhaps it is fitting McConathy coaches the highest-scoring team in the nation. The Demons averaged 81 points, throwing a 10-man rotation at opponents and substituting five players at a time.The result is havoc and frenzy, fast breaks and pressure defense — the things McConathy will use to try to level the scales for the No. 14-seeded Demons against the third-seeded Florida Gators on Friday night.If Northwestern State can pull off the upset, N.C.A.A. tournament history will have repeated itself. For inspiration, the Demons only have to look back to 2006. As a No. 14 seed, they shocked Big Ten Conference champion and third-seeded Iowa, rallying from a 17-point deficit in the final eight minutes."The fact that we've been here before, that you're in a position that you know it has happened and can happen again," McConathy said. "You're holding your own destiny in your hand whether or not that takes place. You got to this stage, now you have to go out and do the things you need to do."As a team, the Demons have shot 46 percent while hoisting 63 shots per game. Four starters average in double figures, led by forward DeQuan Hicks at 14 points per game on 58 percent shooting. Guard Shamir Davis and forward James Hublin average 12 points each, and guard Jalen West has 10.Northwestern State averaged three fewer turnovers and three more steals than its opponents, which helped lead to a 10-point average margin of victory. Still, opponents averaged 71.2 points, so do not expect the Demons to shut down a Florida team that can also play at a fast pace.And the Gators can play defense, limiting their opponents to 53.7 points per game, the third-best mark in the nation."All their guys are productive," Florida guard Kenny Boynton said. "But we have reserves also. We just have got to be ready to play, match their intensity."Northwestern State won the Southland Conference with a 15-3 record, but could not fashion a signature victory against more talented teams from major conferences. The Demons were 0-3 against SEC foes, losing to L.S.U. (by 7), Texas A&M (by 13) and Arkansas (by 18), all on the road. They also lost at Oklahoma, by 4."It'll be a struggle," McConathy said. " It concerns me, but the one thing that's very good for us, is we've been into big venues and we've played big teams. We weren't successful, but we were competitive. The game was closer than the eventual score."The deep rotation is critical for Northwestern State, a college of about 9,400 students in Natchitoches, La., (pronounced NACK-a-dish) about 70 miles south of Shreveport along Interstate 49 in the western part of the state."We just call it waves," McConathy said of his mass substitutions, which generally are staggered at the four- and eight-minute broadcast timeouts, but could come at any moment. "It's a feel thing," he said. "We might roll them every two minutes, trying to keep the intensity up as high as we possibly can."McConathy was a four-year starter at Louisiana Tech and once poured in 47 points against Lamar, a total that remains tied for the team's single-game record. He averaged 20.7 points for his career, and is second on Tech's list of leading scorers, behind Mike Green. Third is Karl Malone."But he only played three years," McConathy quickly pointed out.McConathy is the son of a coach. His father, John, also began the family legacy at Northwestern State as a small-college all-American, and was the fifth pick in the 1951 N.B.A. draft, taken by the Syracuse Nationals. Still, given the shared chunks of playing time and depth of the Demons, McConathy said an old coach once told him that he would not have played for himself.His players, though, love the system of havoc and frenzy.
PHILADELPHIA — Shortly after the N.C.A.A tournament brackets were announced Sunday, Sam Rowley learned that his parents and his 19-year-old brother were working the phones to book flights so they could watch Albany's opening game here Friday afternoon."To be honest, I couldn't really believe they were doing it," Rowley said.For his family, a trip to Philadelphia is a bit more rigorous than, say, taking a cab to the train station. The Rowleys live in Australia.It only complicated matters that his brother, Michael, recently had foot surgery but was adamant about coming. That meant he needed an extra plane ticket, at no small cost, so that he could keep his foot elevated on an adjacent seat during the 28-hour journey. Oh, and one more thing: Rowley's parents, Catherine and Gregg, began to make arrangements knowing they would be required back at work Monday morning — in Sydney.Even with the understanding that their stateside sojourn would last less than two days, the Rowleys were willing to pursue this extraordinary feat of logistical gymnastics for the privilege of watching their son and his teammates partake in the tournament and, in all likelihood, get bulldozed by one of college basketball's perennial titans. March Madness, indeed.For the Great Danes, the No. 15 seed in the Midwest, their experience against No. 2 Duke will be one to savor, particularly for the team's three Australians and their families. Like Peter Hooley, a redshirt freshman, and Luke Devlin, a junior forward, Rowley said he grew up watching the Blue Devils on TV, largely because he had no choice. Duke was one of the few college basketball teams that got airtime in Australia."When we saw who we were playing, that was just amazing," said Hooley, who grew up in the small southern Australian town of Hahndorf.Devlin's parents, Angela Donohoe and Tony Devlin, have been caravaning with the team since March 6. They never anticipated staying so long. Their original plan was to return to Sydney earlier this week. Albany, after all, was the No. 4 seed in the America East tournament. But one win became two, and two became three. The next thing any of them knew, the Great Danes (24-10) were celebrating a conference championship and an N.C.A.A. berth."They kept winning," Tony Devlin said, "so we're still here."On Thursday, Devlin's parents watched Albany's practice from the eighth row of the arena. As Angela snapped photos with her phone, her husband recalled conquering the 72-step staircase at the Philadelphia Museum of Art earlier that morning. "The Rocky steps!" he said.The trip had become something of an adventure. They drove through snow in Vermont. They cleaned their son's apartment. Now, they were readying themselves for something even more extraordinary. Tony Devlin surveyed the court. "This is the stuff that all these Australian boys dream of," he said.There is no shortage of Australians playing college basketball, a list highlighted by Matthew Dellavedova, whose St. Mary's team narrowly fell to Memphis on Thursday. Albany's threesome made time Wednesday night to watch their countryman Anthony Drmic score 28 points in Boise State's loss to La Salle in the play-in round."We're all like family over here," said Hooley, who averages 7.8 points off the bench.Coach Will Brown never intended to develop an Australian pipeline. It just sort of happened. One of his assistant coaches, Jeremy Friel, played college basketball with Phil Collins, an Australian who spent the 2009-10 season as an assistant with the women's basketball team at Albany. After returning to Australia to work in player development, he noticed Devlin and recommended him to Friel. Hooley and Rowley matriculated the following season."We can't spend $5,000 to fly over there on our budget," Friel said. "I mean, Luke deserves all the credit. He's the one who took the real leap of faith."For each player, Albany was an adjustment: the food, the driving, the weather. Mostly the weather. "I've never been so cold in my entire life," Hooley said.Whenever their parents visit, they try to deliver the comforts of home. Devlin's mother packs custard powder for the 9,900-mile trip so that she can make trifle, one of his favorite desserts. She also brings Weetabix cereal, Tim Tam biscuits and Vegemite, which is an acquired taste."I know it's a cliché," Luke Devlin said, "but it's something that we miss."Devlin, a reserve who averages 3.2 points and 2.3 rebounds, said he was looking forward to Friday's game. He never expected to be in this position, he said, not as a young boy in Australia. Suddenly, Duke was just hours away. Perhaps he and his teammates were capable of something special."I played rugby in the seventh and eighth grade," he said. "I like to think it made me a little tougher."
LEXINGTON, Ky. — When it was over Thursday night, after 39 bracket-busting minutes and one of pure mayhem, the Davidson Wildcats sat on their chairs, as if unwilling — or, perhaps, unable — to move. It was still all too fresh for them, how defeat was snatched from the jaws of victory, another monumental upset in the N.C.A.A. tournament filched with a second to spare."It was just like, 'How did that happen?' " Davidson guard Tyler Kalinoski said.The final score was Marquette 59, Davidson 58, the decisive points scored with one second left on a driving left-handed layup by Vander Blue, the guard with the name of a jazz musician and the improvisational skills to match. On Saturday the Golden Eagles will face No. 6 Butler, which toppled No. 11 Bucknell, 68-56, for the right to advance to the regional semifinals next week in Washington."It's just devastating," said Jake Cohen, who led Davidson with 20 points.With 28 seconds remaining, Davidson, seeded 14th, led third-seeded Marquette by 5 points, and the Golden Eagles had no timeouts. Davidson is the best free-throw-shooting team in the nation, and Marquette makes 3-pointers with the general frequency of a lunar eclipse — hardly the recipe for a late comeback. In fact, on Wednesday, Marquette's colorful coach, Buzz Williams, said: "Every team we've played knows we can't shoot. We understand that we can't shoot."After Marquette's win, Williams was asked if he wanted to amend his statement. He was asked because the Golden Eagles, who ranked 317th in the country with a 30.1 shooting percentage from 3-point range, made three in the final 63 seconds."We played 38 and a half minutes and made one," Williams said. "So, I don't know how you bet in Vegas, but typically they keep building casinos because they bet on the house."Of all the low seeds, Davidson was the most fashionable pick to win its first game, a product of its recent excellence — it took a 17-game winning streak into Thursday's game — as much as its pedigree. Five years ago, buoyed by the electrifying guard Stephen Curry, the Wildcats blitzed through the tournament, beating three higher seeds before losing in the regional finals, by 2 points, to Kansas.No opening-round site is closer to Davidson than Rupp Arena, and a considerable — and raucous — traveling party erupted as the Wildcats' lead swelled to 9 with 6:26 to play. Marquette never drew closer than three until it decided to start making 3-pointers. It answered 2 points with 3 on three consecutive possessions, drawing to within 58-57 with 11 seconds on a triple from the wing by Jamil Wilson."They had to make great plays to beat us," Davidson Coach Bob McKillop said, "and I think they did."When Williams had called his final timeout, after Wilson drilled a 3-pointer with 63 seconds left, he told his players not to foul — it was too early, he said, and he wanted Davidson to earn its baskets, not take what he figured was an automatic 2 points. But now he needed to, and he ordered a trap. Blue bolted to foul De'Mon Brooks, who, spotting Nik Cochran, the nation's leading free-throw shooter, open upcourt, whipped a pass out of Cochran's reach.Officials huddled to reset the clock, which gave Marquette a de facto timeout — and, with 6.7 seconds left, time to set up the last play.Just 12 days earlier, Blue sliced through the St. John's defense at Madison Square Garden to score the winning basket in overtime of a victory that clinched a share of the Big East regular-season championship. He said that shot was not on his mind Thursday as he received the inbound pass.A smart screen at the top of the arc by Davante Gardner forced the 6-11 Cohen to switch off and guard Blue, who barreled to his left and sped by Cohen."It was just a foot race to the basket," Blue said.When Blue intercepted the inbounds pass, his teammates leapt off the bench and formed a mosh pit near the basket. Davidson, numb, was still trying to process it all.BUTLER 68, BUCKNELL 56 Rotnei Clarke scored 11 of his 17 points in the last 8 minutes 44 seconds, Andrew Smith had 14 points and a career-high 16 rebounds, and Butler withstood a late rally from upset-minded Bucknell. Roosevelt Jones added 14 points for the sixth-seeded Bulldogs, who watched an 11-point lead turn into a 6-point deficit before regaining control of the game for good. (AP)
SALT LAKE CITY — Twenty-four hours with the Southern University Jaguars, a full day in the life of a No. 16 seed at the N.C.A.A. tournament, included meetings, film review, a walk-through with an apple in place of a basketball, speeches, music, chess, backward cuff links, forgotten spandex, "Law & Order" and platters of meat. Nearly $1,200 worth of meat.It also almost included a historic upset. Almost.This was how Southern spent the time before its expected basketball execution, before it tackled top-seeded, top-ranked Gonzaga on Thursday, in a game few, if any, outside the Jaguars' locker room predicted they would win. This window provided insight into the shortest of shelf lives, that of the lowest N.C.A.A. seeds. Even in a tournament defined by upsets, a 16 seed had never won.The Jaguars nearly did it, nearly pulled off an upset among the most monumental, the most epic, of any N.C.A.A. tournament. They tied the score at 54-54 and again at 56-56, as the crowd here at EnergySolutions Arena stood, almost all of them converted Jags fans.Twenty-four hours led into this madness. Twenty-four hours filled with hope and anticipation, with frayed nerves and impossible dreams, with a lot of food and not much sleep. Peter Cipriano lived it for the second time. In 2006, he played for Southern, a 16th seed, against Duke.Against a Blue Devils team favored somewhere between a lot and a ton, Cipriano never felt more focused, and Southern trailed by only 3 points with under 17 minutes left. The Jaguars lost, but Cipriano kept the newspaper from that game, the watch he received for playing in the tournament and a towel from the bench. He never even washed it.This week, Cipriano, now a graduate assistant coach, imitated Kelly Olynyk, Gonzaga's star post player, in practice. He told the Jags: "The field is wide open this year. You have a great chance to beat Gonzaga. You'll remember this game, either way, for the rest of your life."Only they knew if they believed him.None knew how Thursday would unfold.The final 24 hours started Wednesday, when Southern met the news media. The Jaguars settled underneath the bright lights, in front of more microphones than they had faced combined throughout the season. Both interview sessions lasted 15 minutes, with most of the questions about the Zags.No, they did not consider themselves improbable underdogs, a tournament afterthought, even if the rest of the world did. If they played the Los Angeles Lakers, Coach Roman Banks told reporters, they would have taken the same approach."Twenty years ago, Southern was on the map," Banks later told his team. "And nobody knew who Gonzaga was."Added Kevin Pangos, a Zags guard: "They're here for a reason." Which was true, but not in a way that afforded Southern comfort. Historically, No. 16 seeds held a 100 percent nonsuccess rate in these contests.Dinner took place at Texas De Brazil, a Brazilian-style steakhouse where waiters carried large skewers of meat and sharp knives for carving. There was sausage, Parmesan chicken, chicken drumsticks, lamb, lamb chops, top sirloin, garlic sirloin, steak wrapped in bacon, chicken wrapped in bacon, beef ribs and pork ribs. One staff member, poor guy, had given up meat for Lent.If this was a last meal, it was a good one, fit for a king — or a caveman. "Shock the world," one patron told the team.That was why Banks returned to the college he grew up watching, despite a subpar Academic Progress Report score in 2011 that left the Jaguars with nine total scholarships and rendered them ineligible for the postseason. But Banks's father starred at Southern, same as his brother, same as his godfather. Southern basketball was practically the family business. He believed it could rise again.The academic situation — "our issue," Banks called it — was as bad as the scores indicated, worse even. To begin to fix it, coaches walked players to class. They sat in study hall, helped with math problems, brought in more tutors.
SAN JOSE, Calif. — First Oregon, then California. Just like that, men's basketball in the Pacific-12 Conference does not seem so measly after all.Handed No. 12 seeds, but sent to the same site to open the N.C.A.A. tournament, Oregon and Cal provided back-to-back upsets of fifth-seeded opponents Thursday to advance to the Round of 32.Oregon walloped Oklahoma State, 68-55, to set up a game against fourth-seeded St. Louis on Saturday.Cal, fueled by a partisan crowd just a short drive from its Berkeley campus, slid past Nevada-Las Vegas, 64-61. The Golden Bears will play Syracuse on Saturday.The Pac-12 was given nothing higher than a No. 6 seed among its five representatives in the N.C.A.A. tournament. But the Ducks and the Bears looked capable of pushing further into the bracket, and sixth-seeded Arizona beat Belmont, 81-64, giving the Pac-12 a 3-0 record on Thursday."If we play with confidence, like we have been, we're a scary team," the Oregon senior forward E. J. Singler said.Both Oregon and Cal won with strong guard play and substandard games by the opposing team's N.B.A.-quality stars.Oklahoma State's Marcus Smart, a muscular, do-everything guard considered among the best freshmen in the country, had 14 points, 9 rebounds and 4 assists. But he and his teammates struggled to combat the speed and shooting touch of Oregon's own dynamic freshman guards.Damyean Dotson led Oregon with 17 points, while his backcourt partner, Dominic Artis, had 13. Arsalan Kazemi, a 6-7 senior, had 11 points and a game-high 17 rebounds, including a buzzer-beating putback that gave Oregon a 37-26 halftime lead. Oklahoma State never climbed within single digits again.Cal had a tougher time shaking U.N.L.V., who beat the Bears by 1 in Berkeley in December. U.N.L.V.'s Anthony Bennett, a brawny 6-8 freshman who averaged 19 points during the season and had 25 against Cal in December, was held to 3 first-half points and 15 for the game.Cal's Allen Crabbe, a 6-6 junior, led the Bears with 19 points. Missed free throws by Cal allowed U.N.L.V. to narrow the deficit to 2 in the final 10 seconds, but the Bears made just enough to pull the upset.ARIZONA 81, BELMONT 64 In this uneven college basketball season filled with upsets and defined by inconsistency, perennially scrappy Belmont seemed primed for its first N.C.A.A. tournament victory, primed to bust a bracket, as many have long predicted.But not Thursday. Not against Arizona, a sixth seed in the West Region, a team near the end of its own uneven season. The Wildcats (26-7) dominated the Bruins (26-7) wire to wire in their tournament opener in Salt Lake City.It was the sixth N.C.A.A. appearance for Belmont, the No. 11 seed, without a victory. For Arizona, a team that won its first 14 games but lost four conference games in February alone, it was a step in the right direction, into the round of 32.The Wildcats will play Harvard, the 14th seed. The Belmont game seemed like a warm-up. Mark Lyons led Arizona with 23 points.Belmont entered this game ranked fourth in the country in shooting percentage, at 49.4 percent. But the Bruins did not shoot well in the first half, making 7 of 27 shots from the field and only 2 of 13 attempts from 3-point range. Of those field goals, the sharpshooter Ian Clark made five.For a team that made the third-most 3-pointers in Division I since 2006, it was a disaster, the worst-case scenario. The Wildcats, though, had something to do with that.It was a matter of distance. Belmont took jump shots. Arizona pounded the ball inside. It scored more points in the paint (8-6) and more second-chance points (8-0) in the first half. It also outrebounded the Bruins by what looked like a misprint: 27-9. Those totals only increased as the game went on, as did Arizona's lead.Belmont mounted a short-lived comeback in the second half. Lyons drove the middle and threw down a thunderous dunk, and then it was onward for the Wildcats. GREG BISHOPMEMPHIS 54, ST. MARY'S 52 Memphis would not stop going, just going, up and down the court, it seemed, until each possession ended in some spectacular crash. There were big blocks and bad turnovers, missed shots and huge dunks. The chaos did not stop, not until St. Mary's had one last chance to end it.
PHILADELPHIA — Coach Greg McDermott has punctuated nearly every one of his team's practices this season with a free-throw drill. His players must make 10 in row, sometimes more, before they can head home. If it looks as if he might have to turn out the lights on them, he puts a couple of minutes on the clock. Once time runs out, the loners who are left behind line up and run.It was McDermott's way of fabricating pressure situations, though he knew it was impossible to replicate a scene like the one that played out Friday afternoon at Wells Fargo Center. Preparation only goes so far. At a certain point, it would be up to his players to execute with their season on the line.Creighton, the No. 7 seed in the Midwest, came through, fending off No. 10 Cincinnati, 67-63, in the N.C.A.A. tournament to secure a spot against Duke in the Round of 32. The Bluejays (28-7) advanced by sinking 11 of 12 free throws in the final 1 minute 42 seconds.The Bearcats (22-12) threw everything they could at Creighton and its star forward, Doug McDermott, who finished with 27 points, all of them hard-earned. He faced double teams, triple teams, each possession more suffocating than the last. But Cincinnati's defense was not enough, not quite."We knew this wasn't going to be easy," said Creighton's Gregory Echenique, a center who finished with 13 points and 7 rebounds.Exciting things are in the works for Creighton. Next season, the Bluejays will be part of the new-look Big East Conference, joining the so-called Catholic 7, with home games against the likes of Georgetown and Villanova, and a fancy postseason tournament at Madison Square Garden.For now, the Bluejays have more pressing business. They have one of the country's most gifted players in McDermott, a 6-foot-8 junior who entered the tournament averaging 23.1 points and 56.1 percent shooting, including 49.7 percent from 3-point range. Few players, if any, are capable of more wizardry with their pivot foot than McDermott, who has a knack for making defenders slide off him like rain on a windshield."Doug is going to do what he's going to do," Cincinnati Coach Mick Cronin said. "You're not going to stop him from doing it."Short of stopping him, the Bearcats at least hoped to turn McDermott's afternoon into a bruising, frustrating slog. Cronin rotated nearly 700 pounds' worth of defenders on McDermott, though he assigned junior forward Titus Rubles with the primary task of slowing McDermott for much of the game. With Rubles playing him chest-to-chest along the perimeter, McDermott tried to get things going inside. Whenever he received an entry pass, the Bearcats sandwiched him with two players, sometimes three.And while Cincinnati delivered a brand of toughness that McDermott did not see on a nightly basis in the Missouri Valley Conference, the attention was nothing new, nothing unfamiliar. As the game wore on, he showcased his full collection of drop steps and slip screens. Working off a series of picks late in the first half, McDermott found himself with a rare open look from the top of the key. Swish. On the next possession, McDermott ducked under a defender and took a lob from teammate Ethan Wragge for a layup, a foul and a 32-27 lead."You can take him away for five minutes or seven minutes, but eventually he's going to get you," the Creighton assistant coach Darian Devries said. "Length, athleticism, bulk — he adjusts to the situation, and he does it quickly. He's relentless."McDermott also had some help. The Blue Jays got a big lift from Wragge, a 6-foot-7 forward who came off the bench to drill three 3-pointers in the first half. Wragge is a capable shooter — he had 15 points against Wichita State in the M.V.C. tournament final — and his scoring binge forced Cincinnati to pay more attention to him. McDermott was the beneficiary. The Bearcats could no longer be quite so free and easy with those triple teams.Creighton was not overwhelmed by the atmosphere, that much was clear. The Blue Jays play their home games in a huge arena, the CenturyLink Center Omaha, where they averaged 17,155 fans per contest this season.So when Cincinnati's Sean Kilpatrick scored to cut Creighton's lead to 64-63 with 15 seconds left, the Blue Jays headed back to the foul line, as calm as ever. Austin Chatman, a senior guard, sealed the win by making 3 of 4 free throws.McDermott, who was 11 of 11 from the line over all, broke his own single-season scoring record at Creighton. He said he had no time to savor the achievement, the latest in a list of them. His immediate postgame plans involved something much more important: an ice bath.
KANSAS CITY, Mo. — The 7-footer Jeff Withey's shot-blocking and inside scoring in the second half Friday enabled Kansas to hold off Western Kentucky, 64-57, and avoid the upset of upsets as the first No. 1 seed to lose to a No. 16 in the men's N.C.A.A. tournament.The Hilltoppers led by 31-30 at halftime, but Withey led the Jayhawks back with 9 points and 5 blocks in the second half despite foul trouble to finish with 17 points and 7 blocks. Seven of those points came during a 9-3 run that helped Kansas expand its lead from 4 points to 10, 52-42, with 3 minutes 52 seconds to play.Western Kentucky, the Sun Belt Conference champion, closed it to 59-55 with 25 seconds left, but Naadir Tharpe sank two foul shots for Kansas.The Hilltoppers (20-16) struggled to keep up in the second half, shooting 20.5 percent (8 for 39) from the field after making 48.1 percent of their shots in the first.Kansas (30-5) advanced to play North Carolina and the former Jayhawks coach Roy Williams on Sunday in the South Region. The Jayhawks have twice beaten Williams and the Tar Heels in tournament play. This victory made Kansas 21-4 at Sprint Center over all and 7-0 this year.LA SALLE 63, KANSAS STATE 61 On short sleep with tired legs, 13th-seeded La Salle blew an 18-point halftime lead in Kansas City before holding on to oust No. 4 seed Kansas State.Three foul shots by Jerrell Wright in the final 30 seconds saved the Explorers (23-9), who made only three field goals in the second half, none in the last 7:55. With the clock winding down and Kansas State Coach Bruce Weber screaming for a timeout, Angel Rodriguez misfired a baseline jumper over the corner of the backboard that would have sent the West Region game to overtime.The pro-Kansas State crowd at Sprint Center made it difficult to hear. "I know it's tough on the officials because they're focusing on the game," Weber said. "I was sitting right there with them. I looked at the clock at 2.2 seconds, I yelled as loud as I could, but we didn't get the call."Wright, a 6-foot-8-inch sophomore forward, scored La Salle's last 9 points, a dunk and seven free throws. He led all scorers with 21 points on nearly perfect shooting — 6 for 6 from the field and 9 for 10 from the line. Defensively, La Salle limited Kansas State (27-8), a Big 12 regular-season co-champion, to one foul shot in the last 4:53."We kept challenging the guys defensively, just telling them if we get some stops, we'll be all right," La Salle Coach John Giannini said. "That was the message."La Salle arrived here at 4:30 a.m. Thursday after beating Boise State, 80-71, in an opening-round game in Dayton, Ohio, leading Giannini to hold a walk-through instead of a practice Thursday afternoon. The Explorers had not won two games in an N.C.A.A. tournament since 1955, the year after Tom Gola led La Salle to the championship in this city, down the street at Municipal Auditorium.MINNESOTA 83, U.C.L.A. 63 Minnesota was the lower seeded team, but don't count the Golden Gophers' rout of U.C.L.A. as an upset.Guard Andre Hollins scored 28 points, hitting 5 of 8 attempts from 3-point range, and his backcourt mate Austin Hollins had 16 points and 7 assists to lead Minnesota. The 11th-seeded Gophers were slight favorites to beat the sixth-seeded Bruins, who were led by Shabazz Muhammad with 20 points.Minnesota, which was the second Big Ten team in Austin, Tex., on Friday to oust a Pacific-12 opponent, advanced to face third-seeded Florida on Sunday. No. 7 seed Illinois beat No. 10 seed Colorado and will play second-seeded Miami.The Bruins continued a run of weak showings in the N.C.A.A. tournament: they have now failed to survive the first weekend three times since they reached the Final Four in 2008. U.C.L.A. missed the tournament in 2010 and 2012. TOM SPOUSTATEMPLE 76, N.C. STATE 72 Khalif Wyatt's left thumb was throbbing, and the North Carolina State cheering section was screaming, and gathered around him at the free-throw line were four members of the Wolfpack, dressed in white, each seemingly with something to taunt.There were 2.2 seconds left in the game, and Wyatt stood there knowing that Temple's 18-point lead had dwindled to 2."I had to block it all out and come through for my teammates," Wyatt said.
LEXINGTON, Ky. — At the Stank family home in Greeley, Colo., there is a picture of a 6-month-old Justin lodged in the mouth of a bulldog.It was not a real bulldog, just the Fresno State mascot. But the snapshot serves as photographic evidence of a lifelong allegiance to the Colorado State Rams that has transformed Justin, now 16, into the university's most recognizable fan and unofficial mascot.In that picture, Justin is wearing a ram costume, which is — and has been, for the last 15 and a half years — his outfit of choice for Colorado State volleyball, football and basketball games."I sweat like a pig," he said.It can be dangerous; he has been attacked, grabbed by the throat, the head and the horns."He's gone through a lot to do this," Zoe said.One can measure time, like rings on a tree, by how often Justin, a sophomore in high school, needs a new outfit. Some are saved, others passed down to younger fans. By the family's estimation, he has worn eight or nine, and only one — the initial edition, as depicted in the photo with the bulldog — was not handmade. Told at the university bookstore that it would discontinue selling the costumes, Zoe took up the cause.Every two years or so, or when it gets too tight in the shoulders, Zoe, with the help of a neighbor, stitches a new costume with the help of what she called a heavy-duty sewing machine. It is a two-week process. She calls a fabric store in Greeley — where, Justin said, they are known as "the people with the suit" — and orders the caramel-shaded poly fur, always buying extra for emergencies. For the current suit, she needed five yards.Until Justin was about 10, he did not wear a jersey over the outfit. Then he decided he wanted to be more like Cam, the Rams' official mascot, who adapts his clothing to the season. Justin, a broad-shouldered 5 feet 5 inches, has full jerseys for basketball and football, his modest tail tucked beneath the shorts or pants, but only a uniform top for volleyball."Those little shiny shorts?" Justin said. "No, those do not look good on fur."Depending on the sporting calendar, he might wear the costume as often as five times in a week. During an interview at the Rams' hotel here Friday, the university's athletic director, Jack Graham, walked by and asked him, "Have you washed that thing lately?""If we get to the Final Four," Zoe said.Colorado State hammered Missouri, 84-72, on Thursday night, when, for some reason, the television cameras were drawn to a boisterous fan dressed as a ram. As they will be again Saturday night, when the team faces top-seeded Louisville."He's not too shy a little guy, as you can see," said Jesse Carr, a guard on the basketball team who met Justin four years ago. Carr calls him Little Diesel because he bowled him over once when they chest-bumped."Little Diesel's the epitome of the fan that every team wants, a guy who'll travel all the way to Lexington, Ky., just to see us play," Carr said.Zoe and Justin travel to games at Air Force, Colorado and Wyoming, where the fans, Zoe said, are particularly hospitable. Others are less forgiving. At Mile High Stadium once, an inebriated Colorado football fan grabbed Justin by his throat. During a basketball game at the Thomas & Mack Center in Las Vegas a few years ago, Zoe noticed that it had been a while since Justin left for the restroom. A U.N.L.V. fan had ambushed him as Justin exited the stall, and Zoe said he had been shaken up."But it hasn't stopped him," Zoe said. "He was mad he didn't get a swing at the guy. And that guy was lucky I didn't get one, either."Justin can instigate, too. At a Colorado State-Colorado football game, he walked by the Colorado cheerleaders, who asked to take a photograph with him, telling him how cute he was. Cute, at least, until Justin turned to the Colorado mascot, Ralphie the Buffalo, and said, "O.K., let's barbecue.""They all chased him away," Zoe said. "All you saw was this ram and the cheerleaders chasing him up the hill."The suit always travels in its own duffel, a jump bag Zoe used when she volunteered for the fire department. It folds easily, but the head, now that it is detached, is a bit cumbersome. When Zoe and Justin unpacked at their hotel on Wednesday, they noticed that a horn had been ripped off, perhaps during a security search."Some people," Zoe said. "Can you believe that?"Costume maintenance is a serious endeavor. Zoe said she needed to get needle and thread to mend it before the 5:10 p.m. tipoff. But soon, she said, Justin will need new attire. She will sew the horns higher, and she will attach the tail to a pair of shorts "so it doesn't feel like he's sitting on it all the time."No longer do female Colorado State students write their phone numbers on Justin's hand and tell him to call them — "to this day, I am so mad that I have no idea what that meant" — but he continues to wear the costume because he enjoys it, as much a part of his identity as his Eagle Scout project or archery prowess.When he checked Facebook after Thursday's game, he said he had 11 messages from friends who had watched him on television — friends from Greeley West High School who had not otherwise seen him in a few days."I just pulled him out," Zoe said. "Oh, they all know."
PHILADELPHIA — The final two and a half minutes were, in Andy Enfield's estimation, the longest two and a half minutes of his life. The game could not end soon enough, not with the way Georgetown was making 3-pointers and chipping away at Florida Gulf Coast's lead.Yet his players continued to conduct themselves with the same old flair, a borderline recklessness that had carried them to the cusp of an improbable achievement. So Enfield watched and waited, and when his point guard, Brett Comer, decided to throw a low-probability lob to teammate Chase Fieler with the game on the line, Enfield well understood that his players were simply staying true to themselves. They had to do it their way."I've got some crazy dudes on my team," he said.Not long after Fieler finished the play with an emphatic dunk, Friday's game turned into an extended celebration for the Eagles, anonymous no more.Florida Gulf Coast, a plucky upstart from the Atlantic Sun Conference, ousted college basketball royalty in a 78-68 victory over Georgetown at Wells Fargo Center. The Eagles (25-10) secured more than a spot in the Round of 32. They joined a small fraternity, becoming just the seventh No. 15 seed to take down a No. 2.Sherwood Brown, a high-octane guard, scored 24 points after delivering an impassioned pregame speech to his teammates, reminding them that had earned their spot in the tournament."Now we've got to go out there and take it," he recalled saying.Bernard Thompson added 23 points as the Eagles limited Georgetown (25-7) to 37.5 percent shooting over all. It was another harsh disappointment for the Hoyas, who were considered one of the tournament favorites to reach the Final Four. In the past six seasons under Coach John Thompson III, Georgetown has not advanced past the Round of 16."More than anyone on earth, I've tried to analyze it, think about it, look at it and think about what we should do different," he said, "and I don't know."Florida Gulf Coast, a university based in Fort Myers that opened in 1997 and completed its transition to Division I only two years ago, ensured that its first trip to the N.C.A.A. tournament was a memorable one. The Eagles did not simply defeat the Hoyas. They humiliated them, leading by as many as 19 points in the second half and rendering decades of college-basketball tradition an afterthought.Florida Gulf Coast was not the least bit intimidated. The Eagles had already beaten Miami, the Atlantic Coast Conference champion, this season. They went 13-5 in the Atlantic Sun, tackling opponents that were deeply familiar with their personnel. Despite their low seeding, they had credentials."I told our team before the game that Georgetown is ranked eighth in the country," Enfield said, "but after you get out on the court for two or three minutes, you're going to realize that you're just as good if not better than this team, and we did that."The team took its cue from Enfield, 43, whose career trajectory has been just as unconventional as his team's style of play. As a college player, he set the N.C.A.A. career free-throw percentage at Division III Johns Hopkins. He later founded a software start-up that was valued at $100 million when he opted out. He decided to get into coaching, and took the reins at Florida Gulf Coast two years ago. In his spare time, he married a supermodel."We just all have a good time together," forward Eddie Murray said.It showed against Georgetown, which watched Florida Gulf Coast assemble a 21-2 run early in the second half. There were dunks. There were 3-pointers. There were gasps from the crowd.As this was playing out, Ken Kavanagh, Florida Gulf Coast's athletic director, noticed on a courtside monitor that CBS kept referring to his university as "Florida G.C." in its graphics. "That's so disrespectful to us," he said. "We're F.G.C.U. or Florida Gulf Coast. We even put that in our notes."His basketball team introduced itself to the world by taking Georgetown out of its element. The Hoyas were constructed as a grind-it-out team, one that built leads slowly, meticulously, with Otto Porter operating as the fulcrum. They were not particularly good at catching teams from behind this season.So the Eagles pressured the Hoyas on the perimeter and bumped them on the interior. Georgetown had no choice but to employ a full-court press in an effort to create some easy baskets, and they had some success, at least for a stretch. Two late 3-pointers from Markel Starks whittled the lead to 4.But then Enfield called a timeout, and his team gathered around him: no panic, no sweat, not on this night.
SALT LAKE CITY — The N.C.A.A. tournament unfolded here as if in some sort of parallel universe: the conversation dominated by Gonzaga, the spotlight stolen by Harvard .The Zags, long darlings of college basketball's postseason, entered this year ranked among the favorites, stumbled against a No. 16 seed in Southern and withstood a neutral crowd turned obviously — and loudly — in favor of their overmatched opponent. That used to happen for the Zags, not to them.Harvard, meanwhile, captured its first-ever win in the tournament, a victory that slid the Crimson into the darling role once occupied by Gonzaga and others. Harvard, its team, its athletic department and its campus filled with future rulers of the world, had become an underdog — this, specifically, was in basketball, if in little else.For Matt Santangelo, the Gonzaga guard for the beginning of its run, the radio analyst who watched both teams play on Thursday, it was an odd juxtaposition. As he watched the Zags cling for their tournament life against the Jaguars, then watched the Crimson dismantle New Mexico, he identified more with Harvard, less with his alma mater."The Harvards, all the upsets, that's exactly who we were," Santangelo said. "I mean, that was the first time I've ever been at a G.U. game where the neutral fan rooted against G.U. Like the building blew up a couple times, and it was not in our favor."So, he is asked, you felt a lot like Duke? "Basically," Santangelo responded.Santangelo played on the 1998-99 team that shined a national spotlight on Gonzaga basketball, that made an N.C.A.A. regional final and started the run of consecutive tournament appearances, a run with no end in sight. He points to two demarcation lines: everything that happened before and after 1999, and everything that happened before and after forward Adam Morrison arrived in 2003.For those post-1999 teams, "everything was new and fresh," Santangelo said. "After Adam, that expectation was set. Now you're the big dog, the big fish."This season, then, was a natural extension, the next step in Gonzaga's basketball evolution. The first No. 1 ranking in program history. The first No. 1 seed in program history. The first time the Zags were forced to defend whether they deserved a top seed in the first place, the vitriol higher in volume, more intense.Gonzaga, once lovable, once the buster of brackets, now felt, as Santangelo admitted, a little bit the way those Duke teams always felt. That was especially acute on Thursday, when Southern kept the game close, withstood the expected Gonzaga knockout blow and made another run. The crowd, save for the Zags loyalists, screamed for the historic upset, screamed against the Zags."It's not a position we've been in a lot," guard Mike Hart said. "It was weird."In the locker room afterward, Coach Mark Few reminded his players that nothing in this tournament would come easy, that "the longer this thing goes, you're going to see pretty much everybody in the whole arena slide over to the other side." He told his players it did not matter whether they missed an easy shot, or blew an assignment — they needed to move on.Santangelo hoped Gonzaga would embrace this newfound role, to play like a tournament favorite. The Zags struggled in the first half of the first game after they obtained their first No. 1 ranking, same as in their first game as a No. 1 seed."There are two ways to go about it," he said. "Either 'We're going to play at our level, and if you don't come to our level, we're going to blow you out of the gym.' Or 'We're angry. Yes, we got the votes, but there's a lot of scrutiny. We're going to show you guys.' "Life was much easier as an underdog. Just ask Harvard.The Crimson took a victory lap on Friday, even as their next game loomed. The players answered questions about why they went to Harvard in the first place, their hardest classes, whether they considered themselves nerds. One reporter asked guard Christian Webster what he thought of the story line elicited from Harvard's upset: that the cute, smart kids had prevailed, revenge of the brainiest."I don't know about us being that cute," he deadpanned. "But it has been overwhelming."
SAN JOSE, Calif. — Arsalan Kazemi's father owns a candy factory, churning out gaz, a nougat-and-pistachio concoction that visitors to Esfahan, Iran , buy as a souvenir. When Kazemi comes home in the summer, for just a week or so, his father gives him some to bring back to the United States.His Oregon teammates said they had not seen it.And when Kazemi, a 6-foot-7 forward with a magnetic rebounding grip, kept snaring wayward shots on Thursday night — with his mother watching through the night on a computer screen half a world away — his teammates teased him for stealing their statistics. He had a game-high 17 rebounds."I jump to get the ball," Kazemi said after Oregon, seeded 12th in the Midwest Region, routed No. 5 Oklahoma State. "I apologize if I get their rebound, but I just jump to get it. That's how it works."For the Ducks, however, that seems to be the limit of his selfishness."Just the type of young man that he is — quiet, humble, gracious — he's hard not to like," Oregon Coach Dana Altman said. "And the unselfish part of it on the basketball floor, everybody can see. And those are qualities that every team needs."Oregon, set to play fourth-seeded St. Louis on Saturday, is a team rich in talent, led by a pair of flashy freshman guards and trusty senior big men. Kazemi does not dazzle with quickness or dominate with muscle. He just has a habit of filling the television screen with hustle.Kazemi's relatively light build makes him an unlikely master of the double-double — double digits in both points and rebounds. Through four college years, the first three at Rice and this one at Oregon, he has averaged 11.7 points and 9.9 rebounds per game. He is the do-it-all forward, as handy as an iPhone, with a combination of talent and intelligence that makes him an understated key for the Ducks.On the last play of the first half against Oklahoma State — on the way to his 55th career double-double — Kazemi grabbed an errant 3-point attempt by teammate Damyean Dotson and laid the ball in at the buzzer. It gave Kazemi a first-half double-double and the Ducks an 11-point lead. Oklahoma State never cut that deficit to single figures, falling, 68-55.But Kazemi's greater role might be that of ambassador. When he signed with Rice as a freshman, he was touted as the first Iranian to receive a Division I men's basketball scholarship.He now attracts small factions of Iranians to Oregon's road games, and often receives letters from people calling him an inspiration for their country.Kazemi's family in Iran, including a 12-year-old sister, has never visited him in the United States, but he talks to his parents twice a day, and after every game. He has found a second home among dozens of Iranian families and graduate students in Eugene, and has a huge contingent of fans at U.C.L.A., normally a big Oregon rival."I try to be really humble and show myself as a great person," Kazemi said Friday. "Have a lot of respect for the people I play for or play with, and show the world who I am, and that I'm coming from Iran. Obviously, a lot of people see the news on the TV, and they think different. I try to be humble and show them who we really are."He still gets asked frequently about the war — that is in Iraq, he patiently replies — and hears the occasional taunt on the road. "Terrorist" especially stings."I try to focus between the lines, and not listen to what people are saying," Kazemi said.When Kazemi first arrived in the United States, landing in Houston as a 17-year-old, he was held at immigration for six hours of questioning. Tired and scared, he was ready to ask to be sent back home to Iran.But he was just coming to play basketball, starting at the Patterson School in North Carolina. His family had heard that, unlike other countries around the world, the United States had places where you could play basketball and get an education — not just one or the other.Kazemi landed at Rice and started most games for three years, beginning as a freshman, He was one of about five players to transfer after last season, though, and has declined to discuss the reasons publicly. Reports surfaced that Kazemi and teammate Omar Oraby, from Egypt, complained of discrimination.Kazemi saw that the Ducks were a poor rebounding team, and thought he could assist. (He was right, and he did, helping them from 177th last season to 51st this season.) He asked the N.C.A.A. for a waiver from the usual rule requiring transferring athletes to sit out one season. Oraby did the same at Southern California."Unfortunately, U.S.C. and Oregon have included in those waiver applications meritless allegations of discrimination," Rice said in a statement last fall. The athletic director, Rick Greenspan, and the basketball coach, Ben Braun, "strongly deny those allegations," the statement read.The waiver was granted just as the season started, and Kazemi quickly asserted himself in the Ducks' lineup. There are no hard feelings toward Rice; he took a final this week that he hopes will complete a sports-management degree from the school, and Kazemi has tentative plans to take a few more courses to complete a sociology degree from Oregon."My dad always wanted me to study," Kazemi said. "I'm not sure, but he probably wanted a doctor or engineer out of me, and he still wants me to go to grad school and continue my studying. But I think it's a time for me to try to go and make some money from basketball."That will start whenever Oregon's season ends. Kazemi does not believe that his mother has a completed bracket — Kazemi had never heard of March Madness until five years ago — but he is not sure."If she does," he said, "obviously it's Oregon all the way."
KANSAS CITY, Mo. — The 3-point attempt clanged high off the rim, again, and the standout Mississippi shooting guard Marshall Henderson ran downcourt shaking his head. Great, he thought. I'm finally playing in the N.C.A.A. tournament, and now I stink.With Henderson missing 12 of his first 13 shots, and all 6 from 3-point range, Mississippi trailed Wisconsin, 36-30, with less than 12 minutes left in its opening game. One could almost hear the crowing out of Gainesville, Fla., from Gators fans enjoying the struggles of the mouthy Henderson, a Florida nemesis.Then Henderson hit a 3-pointer. Then another. Soon a Rebel run was on, and it carried 12th-seeded Mississippi past a stunned and unresponsive Wisconsin, 57-46. The fifth-seeded Badgers held the Rebels to their lowest point total of the season, but Wisconsin's big scorers wilted while a charged-up Henderson scored 17 of his 19 points in the final 11 minutes 25 seconds."I was sitting by Murphy on the bench," Henderson said, referring to forward Murphy Holloway. "I was like: 'If I don't pick it up, it's going to be my fault. I don't want it to be my fault.' So I had to pick it up a little bit, and I think I did, just a tad."So now I'm glad I'm going to have a chance to redeem myself on Sunday."Mississippi advanced to play No. 13 seed La Salle, a 63-61 winner over fourth-seeded Kansas State in the West Region. Wisconsin managed 7 points in the final 9:20 and was outscored by 27-10 after Henderson started rolling.Henderson also gained at least one prominent fan. LeBron James, referring to his eagerness to shoot, wrote on Twitter after the game: "Man that dude Henderson from Ol Miss got the greenest light in basketball history!! Hahaha."Low-scoring games usually favor Wisconsin, but not this one. The Badgers shot 22.2 percent from the field, including three air balls, in the second half. Ryan Evans, Jared Berggren, Ben Brust and Traevon Jackson, four of Wisconsin's top five scorers this season, combined to shoot 8 for 37 from the field."They just outworked us in the last eight or nine minutes, really took it to us, and we didn't know how to handle it," said the reserve forward Sam Dekker, the only Badger in double figures, with 14 points.Henderson's ability to contain his usual histrionics may have been as big a surprise as the final score. After scattered boos during introductions, the Wisconsin fans left him alone, and Henderson kept things low-key."You can't go a little crazy when you went 1 for your first 17," Henderson said, exaggerating his cold streak only slightly.Henderson gave in once the game had been decided. With 39.6 seconds left, he pumped his right arm toward the Ole Miss fan section as he headed to the foul line. He hopped and waved his arms at those fans after the game, running past the television sideline reporter Craig Sager to the locker room.For much of the game, Henderson did not feel like celebrating. Wisconsin's defensive prowess is well known, but Mississippi matched the Badgers with an aggressive 2-3 zone before switching to man-to-man late. Reggie Buckner, Mississippi's rugged 6-foot-9-inch forward, outmuscled Evans and Berggren inside, finishing with 5 blocks and 12 rebounds. He helped keep the game close until Henderson started making shots."Listen, we've seen this show before," Mississippi Coach Andy Kennedy said. "It doesn't matter. A lot of guys, you go 0 for 5, it's going to be a long night. You go 5 for 5, it's going to be a great night. As long as he's taking shots within our offense, our guys understand that. We were getting him looks, and he made some big ones. Once he makes one or two, feed Henderson."Until his shot started falling, Henderson said, he thought about Tray Woodall of Pittsburgh, the fifth-year senior who shot 1 for 12 on Thursday in his final college game, a loss to Wichita State."I felt so bad for him after everything that he had done," Henderson said. "That was going through my head. Man, I'm a fluke."Not quite. When Henderson hit his first 3-pointer, Kennedy called a timeout. Kennedy later joked that he did it to allow everyone to celebrate. Mississippi likes running Henderson through screens for catch-and-shoot jumpers, and Henderson proved especially deft and elusive the rest of the way.His second 3-pointer tied the score, 36-36. Berggren hit a 3-pointer for Wisconsin, but Holloway converted a tip-in and a layup to put Mississippi ahead, 40-39. Wisconsin never led again, and Henderson helped seal the outcome with another 3-pointer, a layup and two foul shots in the last 2:49. He made 5 of his last 8 shots to finish 6 for 21."Everything he was missing earlier was on point and long," Kennedy said. "He just had to settle down. I knew once he made one, two, three, then we had something."Yes. One more game.
Plenty of college basketball fans across the country were rooting for Harvard on Thursday night when it upset third-seeded New Mexico, 68-62, in the N.C.A.A. tournament's Round of 64. There was no bigger supporter than Brandyn Curry, who was watching the game with his family in Charlotte, N.C."I'm pretty sure a lot of people were on their feet like I was, just standing right in front of the TV watching every possession," Curry said in a phone interview Friday. "After the game was over, I went crazy just like most everybody else did."Curry has an unusual perspective on the first N.C.A.A. tournament win in Harvard history. If not for his implication in a widespread academic scandal before the season, Curry would probably have been playing point guard for the Crimson on Thursday.Curry and his fellow captain Kyle Casey voluntarily withdrew from Harvard in September to avoid the possibility of being ruled ineligible this season as a result of the university's investigation into a cheating scandal. The scandal involved a class held during the 2011-12 academic year.By withdrawing, Casey and Curry, a two-time academic all-Ivy League selection, remained eligible to return to the university and the team next fall.While Curry would not discuss the outcome of the investigation, he said he expected to be back with the team next season.In the meantime, Curry and Casey are in an unfamiliar role as spectators."It's definitely different, but I'm loving it," Curry said of watching Harvard's success. "It wasn't bittersweet at all. Obviously, I would have loved to be a part of it, but we've still got next year. I can't even express how happy I am for those guys."Curry, who has been selling life insurance and working out during his hiatus, has remained in close contact with the senior guard Christian Webster, the only player from their five-man recruiting class four years ago still with the team. Curry has sent congratulatory text messages to his former teammates and coaches after big wins."I know that nobody probably thought that they were going to accomplish this," Curry said. "I know everybody had a lot of doubts after the situation. They had a lot of adversity, but they handled it, and they've done tremendous things."Curry has been especially impressed by his replacement, Siyani Chambers, the first freshman to be named to the all-Ivy League first team."When we recruited him, Coach really wanted him bad, and I could see why," Curry said, referring to Coach Tommy Amaker. "To be a freshman and to step up in this position like this is just unheard-of."When reached by telephone, Casey said he was happy for the team but declined to comment further.Curry and Casey cannot avoid being intertwined with the team's success. The academic investigation, and their departure from the team, was mentioned repeatedly during Thursday's broadcast on TNT."After the first couple of games, I was like, 'Dang, they keep mentioning it,' " Curry said. "Literally every TV game they've mentioned it, so it was nothing new. It's all good. There's nothing I can do about it. It's more motivation for next year."Harvard faces sixth-seeded Arizona on Saturday in Salt Lake City. Curry will be watching, cheering his team on to what he hopes is a long tournament run."I think the sky's the limit," Curry said. "It's just one game at a time; I know that's what Coach Amaker is telling them. There's no telling what can happen. The tournament is crazy like that."
PHILADELPHIA — Before his team faced Mercer in the Atlantic Sun Conference tournament final March 9, Andy Enfield, the coach at Florida Gulf Coast, regaled his players with another story. Enfield has lots of stories. One for every occasion, some for no occasion at all.With an N.C.A.A. tournament berth at stake, Enfield told them about the time Red Auerbach, while coaching the Boston Celtics, accidentally dropped a burning cigar on a pile of papers, sparking a small fire in his office.Enfield's players recalled that it was a terrific story, really entertaining, but the point was lost on them. Why in the world was he talking about cigars?"I think it had something to do with beating Mercer's zone," the senior forward Eddie Murray said.Enfield has a knack for taking sharp detours whenever he talks to his team. It can be impossible to predict where he will go next. In that sense, he has come to typify the wackiness of the N.C.A.A. tournament's opening rounds, in which little has gone according to plan.Amid a flurry of early upsets, Florida Gulf Coast's victory over Georgetown in the Round of 64 on Friday night was perhaps the most extraordinary. The Eagles took their No. 15 seeding to Wells Fargo Center and proceeded to fillet the second-seeded Hoyas in every way imaginable — with defense and dunks, each acrobatic maneuver more astonishing than the last. It also served notice that the landscape of college basketball had changed."We don't care who we play," said Enfield, whose team was largely anonymous before its 78-68 victory. "We'll play anyone, anywhere, at any time."Parity has been a tournament buzzword for years, but there is little doubt that it has become much more difficult for the selection committee to figure out where to slot teams — and for fans to predict how the tournament will unfold.There have been bracket busters galore. No region has been more volatile than the West, where No. 10 Iowa State, No. 12 Mississippi, No. 13 La Salle and No. 14 Harvard advanced out of the Round of 64. Four double-digit seeds in other regions — Florida Gulf Coast, Minnesota, California and Oregon — also secured spots in the Round of 32.Saturday's stunner came courtesy of Wichita State, a ninth seed, which knocked off No. 1 Gonzaga in the second round.The run of upsets by double-digit seeds comes with an important caveat: five of the eight are from power conferences.Mississippi, for example, was seeded only 12th in the West despite winning the Southeastern Conference tournament, then knocked off No. 5 Wisconsin. Amateur bracketologists everywhere considered Oregon's seeding as a No. 12 to be something of an injustice — not necessarily for the Ducks, who won the Pacific-12 tournament, but for their Round of 64 opponent, Oklahoma State.After Oregon beat his team, 68-55, on Thursday, Oklahoma State Coach Travis Ford said of Oregon's seeding: "None of it really made sense to me. I knew right away after watching them that this was not your typical 12 seed."The Ducks proved it again Saturday, beating No. 4 St. Louis to reach the Round of 16.The real intrigue involves smaller programs like Florida Gulf Coast, which became the third No. 15 seed in the last two years to move on to the Round of 32, joining Norfolk State and Lehigh, which pulled off their own improbable upsets in 2012. Or were they really that unlikely?"In the coaching profession, we're not surprised that those things happen, especially today," Duke's Mike Krzyzewski said.He would know, given Duke's loss to Lehigh last season. Krzyzewski cited the N.C.A.A's decision to expand the field to 68 teams from 65 in 2011 as an important factor in building the tournament's top-to-bottom depth. The move, which included the adoption of four first-round games, cleared space for a few additional bubble teams, some from the big-name conferences."The 14, 15 and even 16 seeds now are better," Krzyzewski said. "The 15 seeds are definitely better because they used to be 13s and 14s."At the same time, as more top college players leave early for the professional ranks, midmajor programs with more experienced rosters have been able to take advantage. It seems pertinent to point out that Kentucky, which lost five underclassmen to the N.B.A. draft after last season's national championship run, fell last week to Robert Morris in the first round of the National Invitation Tournament, March's consolation prize.Consider La Salle, whose starting lineup featured a senior and two juniors in its win over Kansas State on Friday. La Salle Coach John Giannini said that the mentality of so-called underdogs had changed. Lower-seeded teams now enter the tournament expecting to win. That was not always the case."People have made great commitments," he said. "You look across the country, whether it's salaries, budgets, facilities — people want to be where we are right now, and people are willing to invest to do that. I'm telling you, everyone is good."While Florida Gulf Coast also has experienced leaders — the senior guard Sherwood Brown was the Atlantic Sun's player of the year — administrators viewed the basketball team as a way to generate visibility for the university, which opened in 1997. In 2002, Florida Gulf Coast opened an on-campus arena that seats 4,500. Last season was the Eagles' first as a tournament-eligible Division I program.On Sunday, they will face San Diego State, the South's No. 7 seed, for a spot in the Round of 16."Part of the reason you have intercollegiate athletics is to bring school spirit and all the rest of that to the forefront," said Ken Kavanagh, Florida Gulf Coast's athletic director. "It's hard to imagine a better way for that to happen than all this."
SAN JOSE, Calif. — There might not be another team in the N.C.A.A. tournament that can go more than 12 minutes without a field goal in the second half of a game and extend its lead.But Syracuse is not like other teams, not with its combination of a perpetually vexing 2-3 zone defense and characteristic above-the-rim flair.Using free throws to score and defense to win, Syracuse corralled Cal on Saturday night, 66-60, sending the fourth-seeded Orange to the East Regional in Washington. Syracuse will play the winner of Sunday's game between top-seeded Indiana and ninth-seeded Temple.Most of the fans inside HP Pavilion were bedecked in the colors of the University of California, as the Berkeley campus sits about 45 miles north up Interstate 880. Traveling from Syracuse — about 2,850 miles, mostly along I-80 — was a taller order, but it did not seem to faze the Orange, officially the "home" team on Saturday."When you get in this tournament, get in a tough environment, you just want to get a win," Syracuse Coach Jim Boeheim said.The Orange held a 34-26 lead in the first minute of the second half, then did not make a field goal again until 7 minutes, 18 seconds remained in the game. Yet the lead had grown to 10 points thanks to 18 free-throw attempts — 11 of them made — in that stretch.By that time, Syracuse had a stranglehold on 12th-seeded Cal's offense, especially its high-scoring guards. Allen Crabbe, the Pac-12 player of the year, scored just 8 points, more than 10 below his average.Cal's second-leading scorer, guard Justin Cobbs, was held scoreless until more than 10 minutes of the second half had expired. Crabbe and Cobbs averaged a combined 34.1 points per game during the season, and had 32 points, 14 rebounds and 10 assists in a victory over fifth-seeded Nevada-Las Vegas on Thursday.Yet they combined for 13 points, 5 rebounds and 6 assists against Syracuse."They keyed in on me," said Crabbe, who attempted only nine shots. "The shots that I thought I'd get weren't there."Both teams shot 39 percent from the field. But Syracuse, making a concerted effort in the second half to drive to the basket and draw fouls, shot 41 free-throw attempts, making 26 of them. Cal had 19, and made 12.Syracuse scored 22 of its 34 second-half points from the foul line."The difference being they were going to the basket and we weren't," said Cal Coach Mike Montgomery, who had no public complaint with the officiating. "They beat us at the point of attack. We did not do a very good job with our defensive rotation. They play above the rim a lot."Blessed with talent and able to win with style or grit, Syracuse was ranked as high as No. 3 in polls during the season, but stumbled in late February and early March, losing three in a row to ranked Big East opponents: Georgetown, Marquette and Louisville. The Orange lost to Georgetown again before winning three games to reach the conference tournament final, where it lost again to Louisville.But while two other fourth-seeded teams lost their opening games in a tournament with few sure results, Syracuse blew out No. 13 Montana on Thursday, 81-34. And in a wide-open N.C.A.A. tournament field, Syracuse seems as reasonable a Final Four candidate as any team, a blend of talent and experience, with three players each averaging in the neighborhood of 14 points per game.Against Cal, C. J. Fair and James Southerland, two 6-foot-8 forwards, combined for 32 points to lead the Orange.For a time in the first half, it looked as though Fair might outscore Cal on his own. He had 14 points at a time that Syracuse led, 27-15.Cal had better luck inside the zone, feeding the ball to the 6-10 Richard Solomon, who had 22 points and 14 rebounds to help keep Cal within reach. His tip-in in the opening moments of the second half brought the Bears within 6 and temporarily lifted the partisan crowd.But Cal made just one of its next 13 field-goal attempts, and Syracuse found a home at the free-throw line.The Bears managed to close within 6 points several times in the final 90 seconds, but the Orange scored 10 of its final 12 points from the free-throw line to slip away with the victory.After the game, Boeheim admitted that traveling 3,000 miles, and back, is a tough way to advance through the N.C.A.A. tournament. But it is a better trip than Cal's short drive to the end of the season.
LEXINGTON, Ky. — Back and forth they went, Butler and Marquette, their game — less a basketball matchup, more a war of attrition — coming down to the final possession, the final moment, because it had to. Every made shot, every rebound, every defensive stop was met in kind.That is how the second half unspooled Saturday night, and for Marquette, which ultimately escaped with a 74-72 victory, that is how its season, its month, its stay at Rupp Arena have unfolded as well. The Golden Eagles won their two games here by a total of 3 points, because of two last-second shots — one made, by Vander Blue on Thursday, another missed, by Butler center Andrew Smith, who stumbled before unleashing an off-balance 3-point attempt that smacked off the backboard."That's just another Marquette game," Coach Buzz Williams said. "We're not good enough to blow anybody out; we're just good enough to get blown out, and if we can turn it into a fight and make it ugly, then it probably trends toward helping us the most."As recruiting pitches go, that assessment by Williams is not a particularly persuasive one. But the team's résumé is. For the third consecutive season, Marquette (25-8) moves on to the Round of 16, where the Golden Eagles, seeded No. 3 in the East Region, will play the winner of Sunday's game between Miami and Illinois on Thursday in Washington."Every game that we play in, it's going to be a grind-out, hard boxing match," guard Junior Cadougan said.Marquette's fortitude trickles down from its high-energy coach, Williams — or perhaps, rather, his wife, Corey, who has spent a few days in a local hospital. "She's tougher than all of us," Williams said.Bullied in their meeting with Butler in November, Marquette pushed around the Bulldogs, and the Golden Eagles' big man, Davante Gardner, grabbed four offensive rebounds.Even as the Golden Eagles played with energy and momentum, they knew that Butler (27-9) can be lethal late in games, especially in the national spotlight. Butler's marvelous March stampedes are so entrenched in N.C.A.A. tournament lore that its teams can seem indistinguishable from one another, as if the same group of Bulldogs emerges from hibernation every March to lay waste to the brackets.Of course, that is not true. For one thing, Butler did not even receive a bid last year. For another, five of its top seven players — including three starters — made their tournament debuts the other day. This team edged two No. 1 seeds, Indiana and Gonzaga, in close games, and Coach Brad Stevens said it inherited the intestinal fortitude of its predecessors."We're going to go back and wish we could have controlled a few things a little bit better, but you do that with any loss," Stevens said. "And you know, we talk about all the close wins over those runs and certainly the close wins this year, and ironically the only commercial I ever see is a close loss, Butler versus Duke."Blue paced Marquette with 29 points. Clarke, who had 18 points in the first half, led Butler with 24.What propelled the Golden Eagles' second-half surge was intense defensive pressure — "playing man to man as hard as you can play for 94 feet," Cadougan said — that forced 10 turnovers, disrupted the Butler offense and, from Blue's perspective, left Rotnei Clarke, the Butler sharpshooter, "a little winded." It was Blue who put Marquette ahead for the first time in the second half, on a dunk with about seven minutes left, and his 3-pointer from the corner evened the score, 69-69, with 1 minute 29 seconds remaining.The Golden Eagles took the lead for good on two free throws by Jamil Wilson with 47.7 seconds left, and they led, 74-70, before Butler nearly upstaged them. After a goaltending call awarded Butler a basket with 3.2 seconds left, Blue threw away the inbounds pass, giving the Bulldogs the ball back with 2.4 seconds left, needing 2 to tie and a 3-pointer to win. At the top of the key, Smith dribbled once and flung a one-hander that was off-line from the start. He wobbled to the other side of the court and crouched over as Marquette celebrated.That Marquette would be advancing was in doubt at halftime, when they trailed by 35-27, unable to contain Clarke, who scored 18 of his team-high 24 points. Clarke assumes an important role in Marquette's season, his 3-pointer as time expired sending Butler to victory back in the Maui Invitational in November. Players divined motivation from that moment, bristling every time it was shown on ESPN commercials.But what stuck with Williams for the reprise were two things: how Butler's frontcourt "abused us," and how much better they would need to defend Clarke. Marquette adjusted, and it will live another week.Next season, these two teams will be in the reconstituted Big East. If this game was a preview of what could be a fierce rivalry, the programs will be better for it. But for now, Marquette owns the bragging rights, and in March that is all that matters.
SALT LAKE CITY — They shuffled down the corridor at EnergySolutions Arena, first the Gonzaga cheerleaders, then Coach Mark Few and three of his players, then the band. No one said a word. It resembled a funeral procession.Minutes earlier, top-ranked Gonzaga's season had expired, and against a team from Wichita State that is nicknamed, of all the possible nicknames in college sports, the Shockers.The scoreboard read 76-70 in favor of those Shockers when the game ended, when Wichita State's spirit squad spilled onto the floor and its odd, pencil-looking mascot danced around in jubilation. To those who lived Gonzaga basketball, who built the streak of 15 N.C.A.A. tournament appearances, it probably looked a bit familiar.That was Gonzaga basketball, those Shockers, at least until Gonzaga basketball grew up. With age has come expectations, and with elevated expectations has come disappointment, especially with a fourth straight season that ended before the tournament's second week.Afterward, in the silent Gonzaga locker room, players slumped against their lockers, held their heads in their hands, tried to explain what they did not yet understand. Guard Kevin Pangos, who sparked a Gonzaga rally and finished with 19 points, sat at his locker, shirtless, his eyes vacant. It took him a second to respond to the first question. He did so with a "What?"A reporter asked Pangos about all the criticism lobbed Gonzaga's way, about the naysayers who said the Zags did not deserve a No. 1 seed, about the skepticism that grew when the Zags nearly fell to 16th-seeded Southern in their first contest. That only reinforced the notion they were vulnerable, even, in an odd twist for an original tournament darling, overrated."We definitely deserved it," Pangos said, and by "it," he meant the seed, not the doubts. "We lost two games all year. People can say whatever they want about strength of schedule, but we won those games."Thus continued the upheaval in the West Region, where the top seed (Gonzaga), third seed (New Mexico), fourth seed (Kansas State), fifth seed (Wisconsin) and seventh seed (Notre Dame) fell in the first week. Only Arizona, seeded sixth, which won earlier Saturday, and Ohio State, scheduled to play Sunday, had survived from the top eight.Into the void stepped the Shockers, who had four scorers register in double figures, who made half of their 28 3-pointers, who built a lead and lost it, regained it and lost it again, only to reclaim it in the final minutes and hold on for a victory as significant as any in their recent history."This has been an incredible year for college basketball, with the parity, the great excitement, the wonderful plays," Wichita State Coach Gregg Marshall. "We did beat the No. 1 team in the country, the No. 1 team in our region, and that's just a wonderful feeling."It was also, simply, Wichita State's best Gonzaga impersonation."I feel like they didn't miss," Pangos said.Early in the second half, Gonzaga's star post player, Kelly Olynyk, lost his right shoe as he made a driving layup. He did not try to reclaim the shoe as he trotted back down court. He played the next defensive possession without the shoe, in fact.This scene, brief as it was, typified how Gonzaga played through its first two contests in this tournament. The Zags, uneven at times, shaky at others, inartistic throughout, took the dirt road here — and on Saturday night, it caught up with them. That guard Gary Bell Jr., the Zags' best perimeter defender, missed most of the second half with a foot injury did not help.The final minutes unfolded in chaotic fashion, the lead swinging back and forth. Behind, 64-63, Gonzaga turned it over on an inbounds pass. Wichita State's Ron Baker made a 3-pointer from the right corner. Teammate Fred VanVleet followed that with another triple on the Shockers' next possession, good for a 70-65 advantage that would hold up.
DAYTON, Ohio — It was well past midnight by the time Iowa State Coach Fred Hoiberg had finished his news media obligations and walked back out to the court, where his team was still celebrating Friday's victory over Notre Dame.The bus had not yet arrived. Family and friends milled about, and Hoiberg folded his 6-foot-5 frame into a seat along the sideline. He smiled."The ticker is doing all right tonight," he said.Hoiberg's heart — which, with an enlarged aortic root, nearly killed him seven years ago and prematurely ended his N.B.A. playing career — is never too far from his thoughts. It cannot be now. It will not be later.He sees the pacemaker implanted in his left shoulder every time he looks in the mirror. And seven years after having emergency open-heart surgery, he has yet to become accustomed to the sensation of feeling his heart beat, beat, beat, continually."I can take my pulse without feeling my wrist or my neck," Hoiberg said. "I can feel it."Hoiberg, in his third season at Iowa State, has taken the Cyclones to the N.C.A.A. tournament in back-to-back years for the first time since 2001. They face second-seeded Ohio State in the Round of 32 on Sunday afternoon.It is not hard for Hoiberg to focus on that task, despite the other, graver matters down the road. He is a month from a doctor's visit that will determine whether he might again need heart surgery, this time to repair the abnormal bicuspid valve he was born with, the one that prompted his first operation, in June 2005.That was during his playing career with the Minnesota Timberwolves, 10 years after he left Iowa State as one of the best scorers in its history. He led the N.B.A. in 3-point shooting percentage in 2004-5, playing in 76 games in the first year of a two-year, $3.36 million contract.It all crumbled after a visit to the doctor for a routine life insurance examination. The doctor discovered an aneurysm and scheduled surgery immediately."I had zero symptoms," Hoiberg said. "My body felt great. As far as I was concerned, I was going to play for another five or six years. To hear that I'm going to have a procedure that you associate with your grandparents, man, that was hard to accept."The procedure involved removing diseased tissue and replacing it with synthetic material in the aorta. Doctors also inserted a pacemaker into his shoulder. He attempted to make an N.B.A. comeback and even came close to signing with the Phoenix Suns. He would have become the first to play with a pacemaker.But the Suns' medical staff urged him to reconsider. With one wrong hit, the pacemaker could dislodge, and his life would be threatened.He moved on to coaching. After a four-year stint in the front office with the Timberwolves, he was hired by Iowa State as its coach. He was immensely popularity on the campus, five blocks from where he grew up.Hoiberg's emotions rarely seem to fluctuate on the sidelines. He seldom loses his composure."It would probably only alarm us if we saw him out of character," the assistant Cornell Mann said. "He's always calm, cool and collected."Players appreciate that he rarely gets in anybody's face, yelling and screaming, guard Chris Babb said."He's had a couple of times where during practice, we'll get under his skin and he'll have to raise his voice a little bit," Babb said. "Other than that, he's not that animated."Hoiberg said his lack of gesticulation on the sideline was not necessarily a result of his heart issues. His pacemaker keeps his heart rate steady at 70 beats a minute; if it drops below that, there is a risk that blood could leak back through the valve."If I would've thought there was any risk involved in this job, I would've never taken it," Hoiberg said. "My family's too important to me."Hoiberg still visits a cardiologist, Dr. Stuart Christenson, every six months. Results are sent to a heart valve specialist at the Mayo Clinic in Rochester, Minn. At some point, he said, he will need valve-replacement surgery, a procedure he considered "difficult to bounce back from."In the meantime, Hoiberg said, he has come to accept his situation and does not shy away from talking about it. He is involved with the American Heart Association and makes yearly visits to Camp Odayin, in Bloomington, Minn., for children with heart disease."I feel one of my responsibilities as a public figure is to raise awareness for heart disease," Hoiberg said. "I know a lot more about the heart than I ever thought I would. I could probably teach a class on the heart."
SALT LAKE CITY — Brawn battered brains on Saturday. Hope was swallowed by Arizona's size. There went Harvard , among the darlings of this N.C.A.A. tournament, a life powerhouse turned basketball underdog whose charmed appearance here ended on the wrong end of a blowout.Arizona dominated, with its swift guards and towering post players, who if they did not run by or around the Crimson, simply threw the ball inside for hardly contested layups. The Wildcats (27-7) ripped open a 17-2 advantage on the way to a 74-51 victory that pushed them into a West Region semifinal next week in Los Angeles."They pounced on us from the beginning," Harvard guard Christian Webster said. "It kind of took us by surprise."Harvard (20-10) made 1 of its first 14 shots and 7 of its 28 attempts in the first half. The Crimson tried to stem their significant size disadvantage, but that only left the Wildcats wide open on the perimeter, with Harvard susceptible for easy backdoor cuts.When Arizona lobbed the ball inside to Kaleb Tarczewski (7-feet), Grant Jerrett (6-10), Angelo Chol (6-9) or Brandon Ashley (6-8), it sometimes looked like high schoolers against middle schoolers. The Wildcats' perimeter players (guard Mark Lyons, forward Solomon Hill) did most of the scoring, but that often resulted from simple math; one team tall, the other one not. Asked if this was Harvard's worst-case scenario, Coach Tommy Amaker said, "Yeah, it was."Guard Siyani Chambers added: "The film didn't give them as much credit as they deserve. They were great on defense tonight."The numbers indicated a mismatch at the outset. Arizona could point to nearly 30 straight winning seasons; Harvard four. Arizona had played 32 games in the tournament since 2000; Harvard had played two, a tally that included its first-ever win on Thursday night. Arizona had more than 30 players drafted by N.B.A. teams since 1988; Harvard none, although Jeremy Lin made his professional mark anyway.In victory, Arizona bucked the curse that had befallen so many of the top seeds in the West Region. Already, the No. 3 seed (New Mexico), the No. 4 seed (Kansas State) and the No. 5 seed (Wisconsin) had fallen in the first round, New Mexico to Harvard. Of the top eight seeds, only Gonzaga (1), Ohio State (2) and Arizona (6) managed to advance, and Gonzaga lost to Wichita State later Saturday..Perhaps that elevated the expectations for Harvard, its players bent on denting the stereotypes of them as nerds or brainiacs, more versed in books than basketball. The junior guard Laurent Rivard knocked down 12 3-pointers in three N.C.A.A. tournament games (counting this year and last). Kenyatta Smith and Steve Moundou-Missi held their own against the Lobos' own sizable frontcourt.Sean Miller, Arizona's coach, said that "Harvard's big guys are somewhat misrepresented." Such talk, combined with all the upsets, made a Crimson win seem possible, or more possible, at least.Then the teams took the court, and there were all those Arizona posts, standing tall, as if they were raised on stilts. In their N.C.A.A. opener, Arizona outrebounded Belmont, whose tallest starter was 6-7, by 44-18. Of Harvard's starters, only Smith at 6-8 stood taller than 6-5.Beyond its height advantage, Arizona also fielded a far more athletic lineup. That was evident in back-to-back lobs to Lyons in the first half that went for automatic layups, plays in which Lyons cut through the defense and leapt toward the rim, his waist above the heads of the defenders.Early into the second half, Chambers crashed into a Wildcat defender. He crashed to the floor and grimaced as he stood up, his hands covering his mouth. From courtside, it looked as if Arizona had chipped one of his front teeth. An arena official looked for it along the sideline. No foul was called.For the Crimson, it was that kind of night.Chambers did return, though, and his 3-pointer from the left corner trimmed the deficit to 44-30. For the most optimistic of optimists, hope remained, at least a sliver of it.Miller worked the sideline, hands up, palms out, face red. His best college teams at Pittsburgh twice lost in the first week of the tournament, bounced by lower seeds. He knew that Harvard had lost two of its best players to a widespread academic scandal, that the Crimson lost back-to-back games against Princeton and Penn down the stretch. But he also knew, from personal experience, how hard it was to beat anyone in this tournament. Harvard included."It doesn't matter the name on the jersey," Hill said. "We're not taking anyone lightly."For Harvard, the blowout materialized instead of another upset bid. Harvard could not match Arizona athlete for athlete. It could not mitigate all those tall trees in the post. And if somehow the Crimson had overcome those deficits, their players made too few shots in the first half to beat Columbia, let alone the Wildcats.As the second half continued, Harvard's fans continued to cheer and hope and implore a Crimson comeback. So did the neutral members of the crowd. It never happened, though, and down went another darling.
LEXINGTON, Ky. — There was red, so much red at Rupp Arena on Saturday night. There was noise, so much noise. And there was pressure, so much pressure. Louisville welcomed it, thrived in it, inflicted it. Until Thursday morning, Larry Eustachy, the Colorado State coach, did not know a single player on Louisville's team, let alone Russ Smith or Peyton Siva, whose names he is as familiar with now as his wedding anniversary.That is a far happier occasion for Eustachy than the 82-56 thrashing No. 1-seeded Louisville administered to his team, dismissing the No. 8 Rams as if flicking away ash from a cigarette. The thousands of Cardinals fans who traveled 75 miles east were treated to a victory as entertaining as it was convincing, with Smith draining 3-pointers and Siva forcing turnovers and a defense swarming and swamping and generally making life miserable for anyone wearing green and gold."We were brilliant in all phases of the game," Louisville Coach Rick Pitino said.Pitino was not bragging. He was just being honest. Against a team that Pitino said scared him more than any opponent he had faced before in the Round of 32, Louisville dominated off turnovers, on the perimeter and in transition. Against a team that led the nation in rebounding margin, Louisville dominated in the lane and on the offensive glass. It was an affirmation — and celebration — of its status as the top team in the N.C.A.A. tournament."We caught as well-coached a team as I've ever played against, and that's — I think that's saying something," Eustachy said. "I don't want to put the pressure on Rick and his guys, but they're special."Pitino said, "We beat a great team, and we probably can't play any better."Only once in its last 16 games has Louisville (30-5) lost, and that was a five-overtime thriller at Notre Dame on Feb. 9, precisely six weeks earlier. The Cardinals do not appear in danger of losing again anytime soon. Their next test comes in Indianapolis, in the Midwest Region semifinals against Oregon, which will probably spend a significant chunk of practice time this week preparing for a press that, Eustachy said, "you just can't simulate.""Total chaos," Colorado State forward Greg Smith said. "Some of those guys are just so fast."The Cardinals' general thinking about their press is this: Even if their opponent handles it at first, it cannot for a full 40 minutes. And that is when they capitalize. "We start to see a lot of fatigue," Louisville forward Wayne Blackshear said, "and we feed off that."The Louisville team that on Thursday set an N.C.A.A. tournament record with 20 steals against North Carolina A&T, that amassed a season-high 67 deflections, came at Colorado State's guards and did not relent, often forcing Colton Iverson, a 6-foot-10 center, to bring the ball up court."Certainly that wasn't the plan," Eustachy said.The Rams had too many empty possessions, too many turnovers (11 in the first half, 19 over all), to counter Louisville's balance. There was Siva, directing the Cardinals' offense, funneling the ball down low to Gorgui Dieng (12 points). There was Smith, the mercurial guard known at Russdiculous, whose performance Saturday — a game-high 27 points, including 18 in the first half — perhaps warranted a temporary name change for this fabled building, to Russ Arena. There was Kevin Ware, delivering five assists — and grabbing two steals — without a turnover.Leading to the game, Pitino had said he was troubled by many of the strengths of Colorado State (26-9): the Rams' five starting seniors, their motion offense, their tenacious rebounding, the likes of which the Cardinals had not experienced this season.At the outset, there were a few restless minutes for Louisville. About nine of them, actually. And then Louisville did what Louisville does. It thwarted inbounds passes. It crowded passing lanes. It turned the backcourt into a blur of red and white, like strawberry shortcake in a blender.It also turned a reasonably competitive game into a rout, capping a 31-15 run to end the first half with an indignity for Colorado State: a jumper by Montrezl Harrell, in the corner in front of the Rams' bench, as the buzzer sounded. Despite making 55.6 percent of its shots, Colorado State was on the brink of being run out of Rupp at halftime, trailing by 45-31, all because it struggled to endure Louisville's press."You really don't know how good they are until they keep coming at you, and coming at you, and coming at you," Eustachy said.Colorado State forward Pierce Hornung maintained Friday that conference games at New Mexico and at Nevada-Las Vegas, at loud arenas bursting with red, had prepared the Rams for the environment that awaited them Saturday. "We love being out here," he said.And they did. Until the game started. The Louisville crowd, louder than a Hawaiian shirt, felt so comfortable in the quarters of its sworn enemy that at halftime, it chanted, "Robert Morris," a reference to Kentucky's first-round loss in the National Invitation Tournament on Tuesday. On this night, there would be no such No. 8 over No. 1 upset. Just lots of red, and noise, and pressure. Lots and lots of pressure.
Angel Goodrich and Carolyn Davis each scored 14 points, and 12th-seeded Kansas upset fifth-seeded Colorado, 67-52, on Saturday night in a first-round Norfolk Region game on the Buffaloes' home floor in Boulder.Kansas (19-13) used a 15-0 spurt spanning halftime to take control and advance. The Buffaloes (25-7) saw their first trip to the N.C.A.A. tournament in nine years come to an unexpected end.The Buffaloes were favored, but they missed Rachel Hargis's presence in the post. Hargis, a junior center, sprained her right knee in practice a week ago and did not play. Arielle Roberson and Chucky Jeffery, their two leading scorers, combined to shoot 5 for 29 from the field.CREIGHTON 61, SYRACUSE 56 McKenzie Fujan scored a career-high 24 points as 10th-seeded Creighton (25-7) held off a late rally by No. 7 Syracuse (24-8) in Knoxville, Tenn., and earned its first N.C.A.A. women's basketball tournament victory since 1994.After trailing by 10 points with less than five minutes remaining, Syracuse had a chance to tie the Oklahoma City Region game with a 3-pointer in the final seconds, but Elashier Hall's shot hit the side of the rim. Creighton's Sarah Nelson added two free throws with three-tenths of a second left.S. FLORIDA 71, TEXAS TECH 70 Inga Orekhova scored 20 points, including five 3-pointers, to lead 10th-seeded South Florida past No. 7 Texas Tech in a Spokane Region game in Lubbock, Tex.ESPN's television feed cut out for the final few minutes with the game tied, leaving the audience unable to see the conclusion.The announcer Cara Capuano called the final 30 seconds over the phone. The feed finally came back after the final buzzer sounded, showing South Florida's cheerleaders celebrating the victory.TENNESSEE 83, ORAL ROBERTS 62 Meighan Simmons scored 18 points, and second-seeded Tennessee (25-7) beat No. 15 Oral Roberts (18-13) in its first N.C.A.A. tournament game of the post-Pat Summitt era. The Lady Vols got points from all 11 players and improved to 51-0 in N.C.A.A. tournament games on their home floor in Knoxville.All of the previous wins came under Summitt, who stepped down last April after leading Tennessee to 8 national titles and 18 Final Four appearances in 38 seasons.Summitt announced in 2011 that she had early-onset dementia. Summitt has remained on the staff as head coach emeritus.UCONN 105, IDAHO 37 Kaleena Mosqueda-Lewis led six Connecticut players in double figures as the top-seeded Huskies routed No. 16 Idaho (17-6) in a Bridgeport Region game in Storrs.Mosqueda-Lewis finished with 22 points, all in the first half. UConn led by as many as 74 in the second half before Idaho made some baskets late.VANDERBILT 60, ST. JOSEPH'S 54 Tiffany Clarke had 16 points and 12 rebounds to lead No. 8 Vanderbilt over No. 9 St. Joseph's in Storrs.Jasmine Lister added 14 points for the Commodores (23-8). Chatilla van Grinsven scored 14 points for St. Joseph's (20-12).U.C.L.A. 66, STETSON 49 Nirra Fields led U.C.L.A.'s balanced attack with 13 points, and the No. 3 Bruins (26-7) rolled to a victory over No. 14 Stetson (24-9) in an Oklahoma City Region game in Columbus, Ohio.The Bruins took an 11-0 lead and were never threatened by the Hatters. Victoria McGowan had 14 points and 14 rebounds for Stetson.OKLAHOMA 78, CENT. MICH. 73 Joanna McFarland had 18 points and a career-high 17 rebounds to lead sixth-seeded Oklahoma over No. 11 Central Michigan in Columbus.Despite 24 turnovers, the Sooners (23-10) held off the Chippewas (21-12).Crystal Bradford led the way for Central Michigan, scoring a career-high 36 points with 14 rebounds and 7 steals.MICHIGAN STATE 55, MARIST 47 Kiana Johnson scored 16 points, Annalise Pickrel added 14 and fifth-seeded Michigan State (25-8) ended No. 12 Marist's string of first-round N.C.A.A. upsets with a victory in the Bridgeport Region in College Park, Md.MARYLAND 72, QUINNIPIAC 52 Alyssa Thomas had 29 points and 13 rebounds, and No. 4 Maryland (25-7), playing on its home floor in College Park, spoiled the first N.C.A.A. tournament appearance by No. 13 Quinnipiac (30-3).NEBRASKA 73, CHATTANOOGA 59 Jordan Hooper scored 18 of her 21 points in the second half, helping No. 6 Nebraska (24-8) rally from 9 points behind to beat No. 11 Chattanooga (29-4) in the Norfolk Region in College Station, Tex.Hooper also grabbed 12 rebounds for Nebraska, which won for the 12th time in 14 games.Taylor Hall scored 13 and Alex Black added 12 to lead the Lady Mocs, who had won 19 in a row.TEXAS A&M 71, WICHITA STATE 45 Kristi Bellock tied a career high with 18 points, and third-seeded Texas A&M blew out No. 14 Wichita State (24-10).Playing in front of a hometown crowd in College Station, the Aggies (25-9) had a big run to erase a 1-point deficit and take a 13-point lead into halftime.S. CAROLINA 74, S. DAKOTA ST. 52 Ashley Bruner had 15 points and 11 rebounds to lead fourth-seeded South Carolina (25-7) to a victory over No. 13 South Dakota State (25-8) in Boulder.IOWA STATE 72, GONZAGA 60 Chelsea Poppens scored 19 points, and fifth-seeded Iowa State (24-8) ended No. 12 seed Gonzaga's dominance at home.Gonzaga (27-6) had been 4-0 the last two seasons in N.C.A.A. tournament games on its home floor in Spokane, Wash.GEORGIA 70, MONTANA 50 Jasmine Hassell scored 16 points, and No. 4 Georgia (26-6) used a 21-6 run midway through the second half to pull away from No. 13 Montana (24-8) in Spokane.CALIFORNIA 90, FRESNO STATE 76 Brittany Boyd scored 21 points and added a career-high 13 rebounds to lead second-seeded California (29-3) over No. 15 Fresno State (24-9) in Lubbock.
PHILADELPHIA — It seemed perfectly appropriate for Duke 's Tyler Thornton to bank in a 3-pointer at the halftime buzzer. It was that kind of game Sunday night at Wells Fargo Center. Lots of inartistic shooting. Lots of fouls. Lots of floor burns and whistles. So many whistles.For Duke and Creighton, which are both known for playing fluid brands of basketball, it was a total anomaly — except for the fact that it was March, and it was the N.C.A.A. tournament, and a berth in the regional semifinals was up for grabs.Duke, the No. 2 seed in the Midwest Region, emerged from the muck with a 66-50 victory, suffocating Creighton with its defense and making just enough shots to secure the program's 21st appearance in the Round of 16 under Coach Mike Krzyzewski.Rasheed Sulaimon, a freshman guard, led Duke with 21 points, and the senior guard Seth Curry added 17.Duke's Mason Plumlee and Ryan Kelly each played with four fouls for much of the second half, but still helped limit seventh-seeded Creighton (28-8) to 30.2 percent shooting from the field. Doug McDermott, the Blue Jays' high-scoring junior forward, finished with 21 points but shot 4 of 16 over all. He went the entire second half without a field goal before fouling out with 37.3 seconds remaining.Duke (29-5) has designs on a fifth national championship, having found its footing after a disappointing showing in the Atlantic Coast Conference tournament. An early exit there most likely played a role in dropping the Blue Devils to a No. 2 seed.On Sunday, the most daunting obstacle in the team's path to the regional semifinals took the form of the 6-foot-8 McDermott. He entered the game averaging 23.2 points on 55.8 percent shooting, including 49.7 percent from 3-point range."That kid McDermott is not bad," Krzyzewski said Saturday. "He can really play, and the guy who coaches him seems to have a really close relationship with him. It's like his father. I mean, they look like father and son. I wish I could have that type of relationship with my guys."The joke being that Doug and Greg McDermott are, in fact, father and son. Their relationship at Creighton has been a fruitful one. Last season, the Blue Jays advanced to the Round of 32 before being dismissed by North Carolina — an experience that they hoped would prepare them for Sunday's game."We've been on this stage before," Greg McDermott said Saturday. "I don't think our guys will be in awe of the situation."At the same time, McDermott recalled facing Duke — and Krzyzewski — back when he was coaching at Iowa State in 2010. The Blue Devils won in a rout, 86-65. McDermott said the most pleasant part of the experience was shaking Krzyzewski's hand during pregame introductions."After that, it wasn't much fun," he said.On Sunday, it was more of the same. Duke led at the half, 29-23, despite shooting 37 percent for the field and dealing with foul trouble. Kelly was whistled for three early fouls, and Plumlee two. The Blue Devils compensated with defense. Doug McDermott had 13 points in the first half, but only went 4 of 11 from the field. Things only got worse for him from there.Duke survived some anxious moments. After Plumlee picked up his third foul, Krzyzewski gambled by leaving him on the floor. He lost. Creighton's Gregory Echenique went right after Plumlee and drew foul No. 4. More than 17 minutes remained in the game. Plumlee went to the bench.His teammates picked up the slack in his absence. Curry had back-to-back baskets — a 3-pointer and a layup — to push Duke's lead to 39-30, and the Blue Jays could sense the game slipping into dangerous territory. Even worse: McDermott was playing with three fouls himself.In Creighton's opening-round win over Cincinnati, McDermott's skill set had been on full display. Working against two defenders (sometimes three), McDermott drop-stepped his way to 27 points and 11 rebounds. Following that effort, he made a beeline to the ice tub.His night was no less bruising against Duke, whose personnel was familiar with him. Kelly was roommates with McDermott last summer at Amar'e Stoudemire's basketball camp in Chicago. McDermott recalled how punctual Kelly was: never late to a meeting, never late to the court.After Sunday's game, McDermott could have added "careful" to the list. Despite playing with four fouls, Kelly remained on the court, avoiding contact and deferring to teammates in the right spots. Sulaimon drilled a 3-pointer for a late 12-point lead, the result never in doubt after that.
CHARLOTTESVILLE, Va. (AP) — The freshman Justin Anderson scored a career-high 18 points, and Virginia extended its home winning streak to 19 games Sunday with a 68-50 victory against St. John's in the second round of the National Invitation Tournament.Taylor Barnette, another freshman, added a career-high 13 points for Virginia (23-11) as first-year Cavaliers scored 46 points, including 15 during a pivotal 20-3 run in the first half.Barnette scored the last 8 in a 90-second stretch, and was 3 of 5 on 3-pointers."We all just mesh together so well," Barnette said of the roster, which also includes the freshmen Mike Tobey (10 points), Teven Jones (5) and Evan Nolte.The Cavaliers, on their longest home winning streak since they won 34 in a row from 1980 to 1983, will host Iowa in the quarterfinals Wednesday night, with the winner earning a chance to move on to Madison Square Garden.Phil Green IV led the Red Storm (17-16) with 18 points, and Jakarr Sampson scored 14 points and had 6 rebounds.
A shot that creates memories. Especially for a small Catholic university from Philadelphia.Tyrone Garland made one Sunday, driving the lane for a bank shot with two and a half seconds to play after Mississippi turned the ball over on a shot-clock violation, giving La Salle a thrilling 76-74 victory and a berth in the West Region's Round of 16 in Los Angeles.The shooting guard Marshall Henderson scored 21 points for Mississippi, but he missed a runner in the final minute that would have given the Rebels the lead. Then Garland snaked down the lane and lofted the winning shot over the 6-foot-9 forward Reginald Buckner for the win. Moments later, he named it."They call it on the playground, when you see a big defender, just lay the ball up, and they call it a Southwest floater," said Garland, who grew up in Philadelphia, where he played at John Bartram High School."He blocked my shot a couple of times in the game, but I'm not scared of nobody. I just went in there and knew if I had a clear shot, I probably had a chance of making it."Kansas City continues to be special for La Salle, which won its only N.C.A.A. title at Municipal Auditorium in 1954, and reached the final again there in 1955 before losing to Bill Russell and San Francisco.On Sunday, it proved magical one more time for the 13th-seeded Explorers (24-9), who made up a 5-point deficit in the final 4 minutes 18 seconds. Ramon Galloway scored 19 of his 24 points in the second half for La Salle, which has won more N.C.A.A. tournament games in the last five days (three) than it did in 37 years from the 1955 final through its last N.C.A.A. appearance in 1992. La Salle is the sixth No. 13 seed to reach the Round of 16."We've talked all week about the great La Salle tradition," Explorers Coach John Giannini said. "When you come in, you want to bring that back. These guys are doing it right before your eyes."It could have been Henderson's moment. Twelfth-seeded Mississippi (27-9) had the ball in a tie game with 44.1 seconds to play, but La Salle hustled to keep Henderson, the Southeastern Conference's leading scorer, from flashing open around a screen. LaDarius White misfired on a jumper from the top of the key, but a scramble ensued and Mississippi kept possession.Henderson drove the lane from the left side and misfired off the glass, without touching the rim. He rebounded but could not get a shot off before the shot-clock buzzer sounded. Then he grabbed his arm, lobbying for a foul call."The timing of it — was he fouled before or after the violation?" Mississippi Coach Andy Kennedy said.With 31 seconds left, Kennedy replaced Henderson with White, opting for stronger defense on the final possession. Kennedy even played a 2-3 zone, figuring La Salle would hold for the last shot. He did not expect what he saw."Their 6-1 guard went at the best shot-blocker in the history of our program," Kennedy said. "The kid made a heck of a play."La Salle won by shooting 56.5 percent in the second half. Though Mississippi outrebounded La Salle by 40-30 over all and had 18 offensive boards, it made only 10 of 21 foul shots, a shortcoming that proved critical at the end. White and Buckner each missed foul shots in the final 2:43.And Mississippi, which usually relies on 3-pointers, made only 4 of 19 on Sunday, all by Henderson on 15 attempts. Henderson finished 8 for 21 from the field."If you dance with the devil so long, eventually it's going to get you," Kennedy said.The arena had cleared out after Kansas beat North Carolina in the first game, 70-58, leaving maybe 7,000 people from the announced crowd of 18,498. But fans of the Explorers and the Rebels made plenty of noise in the second half. Neither team could pull away.La Salle led by 55-52 when Murphy Holloway drew a foul on a basket inside. Holloway missed the foul shot but chased down the rebound, dribbled once and banked home a one-hander for an unusual 4-point play. After a turnover, Henderson made a high-arching 3-pointer from left wing, his only one in the second half, for a 59-55 lead.When La Salle tied the score at 62-62, Henderson hit a pull-up jumper and a foul shot. Mississippi surged ahead, 69-64, but La Salle tied it again on a single stunning possession. Sam Mills hit an open 3-pointer as Nick Williams, racing to cover, fouled him. Mills missed the foul shot, but Jerrell Wright grabbed the rebound and scored the tying basket inside with 3:58 to play."We weren't being aware," Williams said. "You can't have that when your life is on the line like that. They played tough and made some big shots. We didn't."
AUSTIN, Tex. — The Miami Hurricanes start four seniors, and their lone underclassman, the sophomore guard Shane Larkin, happens to be the Atlantic Coast Conference player of the year.They endured the foibles of any team under the heat lamp of the N.C.A.A. tournament, but fortified with such experience, they can turn it on like the neon lights of South Beach.On Sunday night in a South Region game, No. 2 seed Miami needed every ounce of juice to turn back seventh-seeded Illinois, 63-59, and advance to the Round of 16. The Hurricanes will meet Marquette in Washington. It is the second time Miami has reached the Round of 16, but it has never advanced to a Final Four.Rion Brown sank two free throws with 7.7 seconds to go, following Larkin's two free throws with 15.6 seconds left. With a minute left, Larkin put Miami ahead for good, 57-55, with a fall-away 3-point shot from the right corner."I just tried to make a move to the basket, and he cut me off, so I just stepped back and shot the 3," Larkin said. "I just wanted to make a big play. I guess luck was just on my side when I shot it."Luck appeared to be against Illinois on its ensuing possession. After D. J. Richardson missed a 3-point attempt, Miami's Kenny Kadji and Illinois's Nnanna Egwu fought for the rebound, a battle that ended in a controversial out-of-bounds call that gave Miami possession with 43 seconds left."You saw the same video I did," said Illinois Coach John Groce, pausing and carefully phrasing his comments. He added that the officials "did a good job, it's a hard game to officiate.He added, "The 50-50 calls are tough. I respect the call he made."Kadji said: "There were so many hands, I don't know who touched it last. I really don't know."Brown led the Hurricanes with 21 points, Larkin had 17 and Kadji added 10.Brandon Paul had 18 points to lead Illinois, and Tyler Griffey and Egwu each scored 12 points."We had a very hard time scoring against their defense," Miami Coach Jim Larranaga said. "Illinois played the best defense on us that we've seen. Our kids were very resilient."Trailing by 37-36 with 10 minutes to play, Miami found its groove. A basket by Larkin, a driving dunk by Durand Scott and back-to-back 3-pointers by Brown put the Hurricanes ahead by 7 and brought an immediate Illinois timeout.Behind 8 points each from Larkin and Brown, the Hurricanes took a 29-26 lead at halftime. Larkin directed the show, making 3 of 6 attempts (2 of 4 from 3-point range) and distributing 4 assists.Miami shot 42.9 percent in the first half but could not extend its lead beyond 7 points.Indeed, Illinois skipped off the court with considerable energy after Paul's driving layup just beat the halftime buzzer.Griffey had provided sizzle off the bench, drilling all three of his 3-pointers. Paul added 8 points, and the considerably shorter Illini battled the Hurricanes to a 17-17 tie in rebounds. Illinois revels in its reputation for rapid-fire 3-point attempts, but only took 10 in the first half. Still, its long-range shooting percentage (40 percent) was slightly ahead of its overall clip (39.3 percent)."We had our opportunities," Groce said. "It was a battle it was like a heavyweight boxing match out there."Before the second-half tip-off, Miami's starters gathered near the top of the key, an animated bunch smiling and laughing as Larkin relayed something to them. Just as quickly, their faces turned serious.Miami gets that vibe from Larranaga, its second-year coach who has thrived in the pressure-filled N.C.A.A. tournament environment before. In 2006, his George Mason team had one of the most thrilling runs to the Final Four in tournament history."I told the players before the tournament began that I was going to have more fun than any other head coach," Larranaga said, "and I wanted them to have more fun than any other team. Nothing was going to bother me. There would be no complaining; whatever happens, happens. We'll control the things we can control and not worry about the things we can't."Groce has had midmajor success in the tournament, too, taking Ohio to the postseason in 2010 and in 2012, when the Bobcats reached the Round of 16. So when Tracy Abrams, a sophomore guard locked in a defensive duel with Larkin, blew past the Hurricanes for a dunk and a 35-34 lead, Illinois was poised for an upset with 12 minutes 35 seconds left.But this time, this year, it was not meant to be.
PHILADELPHIA — After pregame player introductions, Florida Gulf Coast's Sherwood Brown began to dance as his teammates, their arms interlocked, spun in a circle around him, their speed building and building until they broke apart and scattered.In a sense, that was how the Eagles hoped to play against San Diego State on Sunday night at Wells Fargo Center: fast and exciting and borderline reckless, a bunch of grown children coloring outside the lines. Why not have some fun?Florida Gulf Coast officially turned the N.C.A.A. tournament into its own big celebration, romping to an 81-71 victory over San Diego State in the Round of 32. In the process, the upstart Eagles became the first No. 15 seed in tournament history to advance to the regional semifinals."As everyone's seen, we're doing something special out here," Brown said.On Friday, Florida Gulf Coast will face Florida, the No. 3 seed in the South Region, for a spot in the Round of 8. Yes, you read that correctly.Brown, the Atlantic Sun Conference's player of the year, pushed his way through foul trouble to score 8 points in a late 17-0 run that blew apart a tight game. There were 3-pointers and dunks, fast-break layups and defensive stops. In other words, business as usual for the Eagles.It was such compelling theater that many Duke fans — awaiting their team's late game against Creighton — stood and cheered for the Eagles when they returned to their bench for a second-half timeout. Brown, who finished with 17 points, waved his arms, urging them on.Bernard Thompson scored a game-high 23 points for Florida Gulf Coast (26-10), which shot 55.9 percent from the field. Brett Comer, the team's sure-handed point guard, finished with 10 points and 14 assists. And Christophe Varidel, a sharpshooting guard, had three 3-pointers off the bench."We just want to make history," Thompson said. "We live for moments like this."San Diego State Coach Steve Fisher, who has a condominium in Fort Myers Beach, Fla., not far from Florida Gulf Coast's campus, said he was familiar with Coach Andy Enfield's program, perhaps as familiar as any coach in the country could have been. It did little good."They play with a swagger, and they have a right to do that," Fisher said.Jamaal Franklin scored 20 points for San Diego State (23-11), which committed 17 turnovers after being sucked into Florida Gulf Coast's vortex."I don't like to slow our style down," Enfield said. "I like to let our guys play."In just its second season as a tournament-eligible Division I program, Florida Gulf Coast has suddenly gone from one of the country's most unknown teams to perhaps its most celebrated. On Friday, the Eagles pulled off the Round of 64's most remarkable upset, knocking off second-seeded Georgetown. In the wake of that win, Enfield said he received 450 text messages, e-mails and voice mails.But such was life in the spotlight, not that his team was going to change. After all, these were the same players who, just before taking the court for their Atlantic Sun tournament final earlier this month, opted to keep loose by partaking in a locker-room round of freeze tag. The players refer to Fort Myers as Dunk City — for good reason, based on the evidence they have provided."We don't take ourselves too seriously," Enfield said.At the same time, Brown said he and his teammates were not satisfied with one win, with one upset. They wanted more. It might have sounded brash, considering the team played in Division II as recently as 2006 (and in the N.A.I.A. before that). Did they care? No.The Eagles were amped from the start. When San Diego State's Chase Tapley pump-faked on a 3-pointer on his team's opening possession, Brown barreled into him like a bulldozer. At the other end, San Diego State's aggressive defense continually forced Florida Gulf Coast into using the entire shot clock. This was not the Eagles' preference. They wanted to leak out in transition and score easy baskets.Still, Florida Gulf Coast looked to be easing into its familiar rhythm midway through the half when Comer found Eric McKnight for an alley-oop dunk — a play reminiscent of the team's high-flying acrobatics against Georgetown. It spoke to the team's carefree, go-for-broke style."We're going to be in full attack mode the whole entire game," Comer said.The Eagles dealt with adversity against San Diego State. Brown picked up his third foul early in the second half, but his teammates took up the slack. Comer got into the lane for a runner, and Varidel hit a 3-pointer. By the time Chase Fieler raced in for a fast-break layup, Florida Gulf Coast was ahead, 52-46, and Fisher was desperately calling for a timeout. Brown hit another 3-pointer for a 58-52 advantage, and the lead grew from there."It's hard when we keep going and going and going at you," Comer said.Nobody has been able to slow Florida Gulf Coast. Not Georgetown. Not San Diego State. The team's next stop is Arlington, Tex., though Enfield did not seem entirely sure of the destination. "Where are we going?" he asked.His players knew: Dunk City was headed where no No. 15 had been before. "Everybody be ready," Thompson said.
Throughout this season of exceeded expectations, Wichita State charted its wins and losses, but not just in its games or scrimmages or exhibitions. No, the Shockers separated the victors from the vanquished on a daily basis — in individual drills, in practice.The losers ran sprints. The winners watched. This old-school approach, Coach Gregg Marshall would say late Saturday after his Shockers dismissed top-ranked Gonzaga from the N.C.A.A. tournament, created a culture of competition. He pointed to guard Fred VanVleet as an example. He said VanVleet treated games of H-O-R-S-E in Marshall's pool over the summer with the utmost seriousness. He said VanVleet refused to concede an inch, anywhere, in anything."He got angry with my daughter, Maggie, one time when she was his partner in shuffleboard," Marshall said.He then imitated VanVleet: "Maggie, you got to do better."This drew a laugh from the audience, but Gonzaga knew what Marshall meant. For 40 minutes Saturday, the Shockers imposed their will on the Bulldogs. They inflicted pain. They left bruises. They countered a Gonzaga rally with the magical run that ended Gonzaga's season.Afterward, most of the attention centered on the Zags, who stumbled in their second N.C.A.A. tournament game for the fourth consecutive season. That the latest defeat followed the best regular season in team history — first No. 1 ranking, first No. 1 seed — offered little solace.Lost among all the fingers wagged in the Zags' direction, in all the skepticism over whether a team from the West Coast Conference deserved a top seed in the first place, was how Wichita State played down the stretch. The Shockers deserved far more credit than they were given.Gonzaga, sluggish through much of the first half, took the lead early in the second, behind back-to-back 3-pointers that fueled a 12-0 run, putting the Zags ahead by 49-41. Wichita State, which lost its top five scorers from last season, could have folded, could have called it a nice season — complete with a tournament victory — and moved on.Instead, the Shockers went into shuffleboard mode: "Maggie, you got to do better." With a little less than eight minutes remaining, Gonzaga led, 54-49. There was a timeout at 7 minutes 55 seconds. Wichita State's assistants thought their players walked to the bench too slowly, and the assistants let them know that and emphasized a final push.The Shockers owned the next eight minutes. In one stretch, they made seven shots, including five 3-pointers, and four free throws. They went on a 23-10 run. Eight consecutive possessions went like this: jump shot, 3-pointer, 3-pointer, 3-pointer, jump shot, two free throws, 3-pointer, 3-pointer.It was striking, this run, and it said less about the Zags' propensity to require the Heimlich maneuver come March and more about what can happen in the craziest of N.C.A.A. tournaments when a team gets hot.In all, Wichita State made more 3-pointers (14) than 2-pointers (11). It made half of its 3-point attempts. This despite a 33-percent mark from long range this season and a 2-of-20 performance from behind the arc in the team's first game of the tournament, against Pittsburgh. The Shockers, already stout on defense and among the nation's better rebounding teams, augmented their usual football style with this long-range barrage."The only reason we won is because we made shots at the end, and that's what counted," forward Carl Hall said. "We just got a team full of fighters, man."Hall then implored reporters to come to practice "for once" — presumably to watch the losers run those wind sprints.In this N.C.A.A. tournament, in which upsets could hardly be characterized as such because of the sheer volume of them, the West Region has become a case study in chaos theory. In Salt Lake City alone, the top seed (Gonzaga), the third seed (New Mexico) and the eighth seed (Pittsburgh) went down. They were joined by the fourth seed (Kansas State), the fifth seed (Wisconsin) and the seventh seed (Notre Dame) in the line for early exits.Wichita State seemed emblematic not just of the tournament, but of the region. The Shockers stand one victory, against La Salle, from a regional final and two victories from the Final Four.After Saturday's win, Marshall, the coach, thanked everyone but the chefs who fixed the Shockers lunch. He thanked his team, his players, his assistants, his trainers, his secretaries and his administrators. He thanked them all, appropriately, for their toughness.He kept coming back to Ron Baker in particular. A winner, Marshall called him. A pitcher, a shortstop, a quarterback, a guard. Baker was all those things, in a nonstop quest for competition. At Wichita State, that meant Baker fit right in, despite an injury that sidelined him for much of his redshirt freshman season.On Saturday, Baker took seven shots. He made five of them. He typified the elite marksmanship of the Shockers, of whom Marshall said, "If we shoot the ball well, we're tough to beat."Gonzaga lost its best perimeter defender, Gary Bell Jr., for a long stretch to what Coach Mark Few later called a foot injury. As the Zags slunk into another off-season, again to be absent in the tournament's second week, they credited the Shockers for a victory that was not as shocking as the discrepancy in seedings would lead one to believe."Wichita State is a hot team right now," Few said. "They're shooting the ball at a high level that their numbers don't reflect. That's what's tough."Well, that and VanVleet at shuffleboard.
KANSAS CITY, Mo. — North Carolina Coach Roy Williams walked out of the tunnel last, well after his players and assistants, a police officer beside him until he reached the hardwood floor. Slowly, politely, Kansas fans at Sprint Center stood and cheered for Williams, a former Jayhawks coach.It was not overwhelming love, but it would do, and the impending game in the N.C.A.A. tournament's Round of 32 trumped the drama of will-they-cheer-or-boo anyway.Frenetic and inefficient offense followed until two minutes into the second half, when Travis Releford sank the first Kansas 3-pointer of the tournament after 13 consecutive misses over two games. Suddenly the Jayhawks, who trailed by 9 at halftime, ran the Tar Heels off the floor, scoring 31 points in nine and a half minutes to win easily, 70-58.Releford and center Jeff Withey combined for 20 points in the first 8 minutes 24 seconds of the second half, making 10 of 11 field-goal attempts, as top-seeded Kansas (31-5) advanced to the South Region Round of 16 in Arlington, Tex.Williams has faced Kansas three times in the N.C.A.A. tournament since returning to North Carolina (25-11), his alma mater, and has lost all three, after last year's Midwest Region final and a 2008 national semifinal."No, this is not any more painful," Williams said. "The fact that I coached there for 15 years is extremely important to me, but it doesn't add anything today."Switching to a four-guard alignment may have salvaged North Carolina's season, but Kansas exploited that height advantage, outrebounding the Tar Heels by 21-12 in the second half and by 50-36 in the game. After poor first-half shooting by both teams — 26.3 percent by North Carolina and 25 percent by Kansas — the Jayhawks made 63 percent in the second half to pull away."We folded on defense in the second half, and that cost us the game," North Carolina guard Dexter Strickland said.Releford, playing in his hometown, finished with 22 points and 9-for-13 shooting. Withey, undeterred after being smacked in the right eye in the first half, added 16 points, 16 rebounds and 5 blocks. Williams took his starters out with 1:06 to play, and Kansas Coach Bill Self did the same, just after Releford waved to coax another roar from the heavily pro-Kansas crowd.This might as well have been a home game for the Jayhawks, who won the Big 12 tournament title on this floor and went 8-0 here this season. In the last minute, Kansas fans serenaded North Carolina with an Allen Fieldhouse staple, the celebratory chant "Rock chalk, Jayhawk, K.U.""The first half, we didn't utilize the benefit at all," Self said. "The second half, I thought we really did. We gave the crowd a chance to be a factor."The Jayhawks missed 11 consecutive shots in a 1-for-13 start from the field as North Carolina jumped to a 14-2 lead, but Kansas climbed back with an 11-0 run as the Tar Heels missed 12 consecutive shots. Twelve turnovers, five by Withey, resulted in 11 Tar Heels points that left Kansas behind, 30-21, going to the second half."In the first half, we made some bonehead plays," Withey said. "Especially me."Self said: "I wasn't happy with them. It's O.K. not to play your best, but at least don't play your best when you're being yourself. We weren't ourselves at all in the first half. We were sped up, and played nervous and timid. They beat us to loose balls. And we did some things that weren't very smart to let them get a 9-point lead."Releford's 3-pointer with 18:05 left in the second half prompted a roar from the crowd and some relaxation among the Jayhawks, who still trailed by 30-26 and needed some shooting confidence."At the time, I was wide open," Releford said. "Who passed me the ball? I don't remember. I wasn't thinking, we need the shot, need to make it."Withey followed with back-to-back dunks as Kansas took off on a 17-5 run to lead, 40-35, and the Jayhawks extended it to 14 points with 7:35 to play. Guard Naadir Tharpe sank three 3-pointers while scoring all 12 of his points in the second half."In the first half, we just let those guys get whatever they wanted," Releford said. "In transition, they were getting a lot of easy baskets. I think the key in the second half was we got out and defended them a lot better."P. J. Hairston scored 15 points for North Carolina, but Releford held Reggie Bullock, Carolina's third-best scorer at 14.2 points per game, to 5 points and 1-for-7 shooting. North Carolina trailed by 70-53 when a disappointed Williams subbed out his starters."It was definitely a nightmare in the second half, no question about that," Williams said.Sunday's game was the sixth in the N.C.A.A. tournament between these teams. The first occurred four blocks away at Municipal Auditorium on March 23, 1957, with the Tar Heels beating Kansas and Wilt Chamberlain in triple overtime, 54-53, for the national championship.
The most accomplished senior class in the history of women's basketball at St. John's suffered an agonizing end by falling to Dayton, 96-90 in double overtime, in a first-round N.C.A.A. tournament game at Carnesecca Arena.A group that earned at-large berths in all four years, which lifted the Red Storm to singular heights by reaching the Round of 16 last season, clawed its way back from a 10-point deficit Sunday in the final 4 minutes 19 seconds of regulation only to reach down for more toward the end of the 50-minute marathon and find that nothing was left.When it was over, Joe Tartamella, the first-year coach, tried to remind those who are departing of what they had done over four years and not of the only first-round exit of their careers, one made more painful because it happened in front of family and friends in the Bridgeport Region.They had 25 victories in the 2009-2010 season, their first year together. They snapped Connecticut's 99-game home winning streak at Gampel Pavilion last year. They vaulted St. John's into the top 25 and made a name on a national level for a university previously known largely for men's basketball."They've done so much for us, and they can leave with their heads held high," Tartamella said. "They left everything on the floor for us."Shenneika Smith, a 6-foot-1 senior guard, could not have given any more. She played all 50 minutes, scoring 18 points to finish as the fourth leading scorer in team history with 1,727 points. But there were no words to console her after she hopped barefoot into the postgame news conference, apparently unable to bear any weight on her right foot, and left the same way."It's not a great feeling, obviously," she said. "We wanted to get a win. It's terrible right now to play our last game."She shook her head, as if that might make 50 minutes of ultimate exasperation disappear and not leave her 10th-seeded team's record at a dissatisfying 18-13.Her fellow senior Nadirah McKenith, whose desperation drive with a second left in regulation tied the score, 75-75, seemed more eager to embrace all of the past and look ahead."We've got to let it go," she said. "We've got bright futures ahead of us. We've got to let the past be the past."McKenith, a guard with a knack for finding open teammates, provided 10 of St. John's 17 assists to go with a team-leading 22 points and 9 rebounds in 44 minutes. She fouled out with 28 seconds remaining in the first overtime, which ended tied at 84-84 after Dayton's Amber Deane hit a jump shot from the left side with 16 seconds to go.As McKenith walked off the court to rousing applause, having stretched her St. John's record for assists to 605, Tartamella felt the game slipping away."I thought it was critical we win in that segment because of how we use our players," he said of his squad.Dayton (28-2), the Atlantic 10 regular-season champion, had a commanding advantage from 3-point range, sinking 10 of 22 compared with 5 of 10 for the Red Storm. The Flyers rattled off 10 of the first 12 points in the second overtime as St. John's, with significantly less depth, appeared to be running on empty. The St. John's bench was outscored, 39-19.
DAYTON, Ohio — Indiana's Christian Watford, Remy Abell and Yogi Ferrell watched Gonzaga lose to Wichita State from their hotel room Saturday night, enjoying the way the Shockers hit shots and felled a top seed in the N.C.A.A. tournament's opening weekend.Less than 18 hours later, they were beginning to understand the feeling of getting caught from behind, of succumbing to the wave of upsets, of having a dream season dashed by a less-heralded team.They were trailing against Temple. Time was ticking. Hope was sinking. There were chills from here to Bloomington, Ind., and even beyond — perhaps to Washington, where the East Region semifinals looked as if they would proceed without their headliner.But, unlike Gonzaga the night before, Indiana summoned enough to advance. The Hoosiers made key defensive stops and leaned on Victor Oladipo to sneak by with a 58-52 victory."They were as tough a team as we've seen all year," Indiana Coach Tom Crean said of the Owls.Oladipo's 3-pointer with 14 seconds left gave Indiana a 4-point lead, and his raised-arm pose as the shot went through was reminiscent of a player he has drawn subtle, albeit premature, comparisons to: Michael Jordan.The shot will certainly reverberate in Indiana for the remainder of the team's tournament run. So will a blocked shot by Watford on Temple's Anthony Lee with 2 minutes 18 seconds remaining, an attempt that would have put the Owls ahead by 4.Instead, Cody Zeller made two game-tying free throws, and Temple never led again."That's what winners do," Zeller said. "You've got to survive and advance this time of year."Shortly after second-seeded Ohio State needed a last-second 3-pointer by Aaron Craft to beat Iowa State, Indiana was being challenged by Temple, led by Khalif Wyatt, who finished with 31 points.Indiana committed eight turnovers in the first half and gave up a 9-point lead to trail at halftime, 29-26. It was the Hoosiers' second-lowest point total in any half this season."I couldn't have been more proud of how this team competed today," Temple Coach Fran Dunphy said. "I would have all good things to say and feel and remember about this group."Wyatt was an offensive force from everywhere on the floor, even against Indiana, one of the toughest defensive teams in the nation. It hardly mattered if Abell, Will Sheehey or Oladipo, the Big Ten's defensive player of the year, guarded him. Wyatt was undeterred.He scored 20 points in the first half, but Oladipo said he allowed Wyatt too much space to get comfortable. In the second half, that changed."Just made it hard for him to catch the ball," Oladipo said. "We tried to limit his touches and make it hard for him to even move."Wyatt failed to make a field goal in the final 6:35, when Indiana was face-guarding him and mimicking his movements all the way up the court."They were denying me the ball when they could," Wyatt said. "They pretty much took me out of the game."Indiana, which shot 47.4 percent in the second half, never trailed by more than 6. Still there was noticeable consternation among the red-clad fans in the stands. Jordan Hulls hit two key second-half jumpers, and the 7-foot Zeller went to work on Temple's frontcourt players, putting the Owls in foul trouble.The block by Watford, a senior, swung the momentum to the Hoosiers, and for the first time in the second half, they were able to sustain it. Watford called it the biggest play of his career.Then there was Oladipo, Indiana's most electrifying player in years, who was quiet in the first half but got going in the second. His late 3-pointer came after a pass from Zeller (15 points), who gathered himself in the post and drew a second defender before passing the ball to Oladipo, who was open at the top of the key."I was just open, and I shot it," said Oladipo, who finished with 16 points. "It really didn't have anything to do with the moment or the confidence to shoot it. I just caught it and shot it. I didn't think about it."The assistant Tim Buckley said, "That's a shot Victor has been working on every day at 7 a.m."The Hoosiers were nearly toppled Sunday, similar to how Gonzaga went down on Saturday.Not to the Hoosiers. Not on Sunday."There were a lot of different games going on in the game tonight," Crean said. "There was our start. There was the middle of the second half. There was how we ended." He added: "I'm proud of their maturity. I don't think an immature team has a chance to win this game."
DAYTON, Ohio — The West Region is in shambles. The one, three, four, five, seven and eight seeds will not be going to Los Angeles for the regional semifinals this week.But somehow — barely, luckily, unbelievably — the No. 2 seed, Ohio State, can pack its bags.Aaron Craft, the senior point guard from Findlay, Ohio, grew up dreaming about hitting a game-winning shot for the Buckeyes in the N.C.A.A. tournament. He lived out that fantasy Sunday when his go-ahead 3-pointer with five-tenths of a second remaining sent Ohio State past Iowa State, 78-75, and gave an already wild N.C.A.A. tournament another memorable moment.Craft did not have thoughts of home or family or realized dreams when the ball splashed through the net. He raised his arms and yelled to his teammates to return to their full-court press."The first thing I thought was how much time is left and how to get a stop," Craft said.The arena, speckled with scarlet and gray, being only about 80 miles west of Columbus, Ohio, burst into pandemonium. Iowa State's Georges Niang, who defended the shot, crumbled to his knees.After a last-ditch shot by Korie Lucious fell well short, the Buckeyes surrounded Craft at midcourt. Iowa State Coach Fred Hoiberg trudged into the locker room and told his players he loved them.On the podium for the postgame news conference, Hoiberg stared down at the box score for 12 seconds before declining to make an opening remark. He was too overwhelmed."What they've done, what they've accomplished, words can't describe," Hoiberg said of his team. "They left their heart on the floor."Hoiberg fashioned his team as giant slayers, loading the roster with transfers like Lucious, Chris Babb and Will Clyburn. They led the nation in 3-pointers made per game, making them a tough team to stamp out of any game. Ohio State Coach Thad Matta knew it, saying he wanted his team to build at least a 12-point lead to absorb Iowa State's runs.The Buckeyes did that. They had a 13-point lead, 69-56, with six minutes remaining. It did not last.The Cyclones chipped away, chipped away, chipped away, finally tying the score at 69-69 with a layup by Lucious with four minutes remaining. Moments later, a 3-pointer by Tyrus McGee gave Iowa State its first lead since early in the second half. The mighty Buckeyes seemed to be on the ropes.It would have been only fitting, in this combustible West region, for Ohio State to go down, too. Its path to the Final Four, following the losses of top-seeded Gonzaga, third-seeded New Mexico, fourth-seeded Kansas State and so on, seemed clear of the predictable obstruction.And there was 10th-seeded Iowa State, nearly muddying up the bracket yet again, if not for a key steal by Deshaun Thomas with less than a minute remaining. He was so excited by the defensive play that his leg began cramping. He hobbled back on offense and struggled to set a screen.Craft fired up a shot at the top of the key that missed, but the rebound was tapped out of bounds by Iowa State. The Buckeyes had the ball again with 29 seconds left.For the Cyclones, who out-rebounded Ohio State, 36-22, the last mishandled rebound was a backbreaker."We couldn't corral that last rebound," Hoiberg said. "That gave them the opportunity to hit the game-winning shot."More important, Craft said his first shot — while it missed — felt good out of his hands. He was not planning to take another shot, but as time wound down, Iowa State switched on the screen set by LaQuinton Ross, and Craft found himself matched up against the 6-foot-7 Niang.He weaved in and out, drew separation and fired up a shot: his only 3-point attempt of the game."I didn't have to rush it too much," Craft said. "I was fortunate to get the shot off clean."He added, "Every kid dreams of situations like that."Matta said it was not exactly how the play was expected to unfold, but it worked out having the ball in his best player's hands."We told him, let's play for the win here," Matta said. "It was pretty good timing on his part."Ohio State has won 10 games in a row. It beat Iona, the second-highest scoring team in the nation, by adapting to the Gaels' style, showing it is not another plodding Big Ten fundamentals-centric team, but one that can run, and leap, and score.On Sunday, the Buckeyes got back to their more familiar style of play: gritty, poised and tough-minded defensively. They turned the ball over only 9 times, while forcing 16. They shot 51 percent and scored 18 points off turnovers.And, for all that effort, they are barely alive, moving on to their fourth consecutive Round of 16, which, in this region, after this game, could not feel sweeter.
Tyson Chandler drew a crowd, and Carmelo Anthony ducked past it, virtually unnoticed, perfectly executing the oldest misdirection play in the Knicks' playbook, their own special brand of screen and roll.Chandler provided the screen Monday afternoon, by speaking to members of the news media for the first time in two weeks to offer an update on his injured neck. With reporters dutifully distracted, Anthony made a quiet exit, slipping through the training room door, out of sight and out of reach.If he had any thoughts on Tuesday night's showdown in Boston, any ruminations on the meaning of this latest rematch with the rival Celtics, Anthony did not vocalize them at this time.Anthony surely has some strong feelings on the subject, which might include (although not be limited to): frustration, irritation, anger, heartbreak and grudging respect. This would make him no different from Jamal Crawford, David Lee, Zach Randolph, Eddy Curry, Stephon Marbury, Nate Robinson and the dozens of other Knicks who have spent the past six years being tormented and trampled by the Celtics during the era of Doc and Paul and Kevin and Ray and Rajon.Since forming its new Big Three in 2007, the Celtics have beaten the Knicks 21 times in 26 games, including a four-game sweep in the 2011 playoffs. In his two years as a Knick, Anthony has beaten the Celtics three times in 12 tries (counting that first-round sweep).In that time, the Celtics have mercilessly lorded over the Atlantic Division, winning five straight titles, by an average of 14.6 games (and by an average of 22.2 games over the Knicks).Anthony's arrival in February 2011 was a move to shift the balance of power, his pairing with Amar'e Stoudemire an attempt to approximate Boston's firepower. That shift was slow to materialize but — with the assistance of time, age and happenstance — the Knicks appear poised to vanquish a few shamrock green ghosts.The Knicks (42-26), despite their own bouts of misfortune and mediocrity, have held sole possession of the division lead for 16 weeks. Their lead Monday was two games over the Nets (41-29) and six and a half games over the slumping Celtics (36-33), who have lost four in a row.Boston lost Ray Allen to free agency last summer, lost Rajon Rondo to season-ending knee surgery in February and on Monday announced that Kevin Garnett could miss up to three weeks because of an ankle injury. Paul Pierce must be having flashbacks to 2006."They're going to always be a threat," Coach Mike Woodson said respectfully, pointing to the continued presence of Pierce, Garnett and Coach Doc Rivers, as well as the emerging Avery Bradley and the relative newcomers Jordan Crawford and Jason Terry."I still like the makeup of their team, and they'll be a threat for any team in the playoffs," Woodson said, adding later: "They play hard. Offensively, they share it. And they know who their go-to guys are."That "any team" could well be one Woodson coaches. With the Knicks bouncing between the second and third slots in the East and the Celtics hovering in the six-seven range, the teams could meet in the first round.Tuesday's nationally televised game will be loaded with significance, both symbolic and practical. The Knicks are still jockeying with the Indiana Pacers for the No. 2 spot in the East and still fighting off the Nets for the Atlantic title — a race that could be decided by division record. So the Celtics, who visit Madison Square Garden next Sunday, have two chances to torpedo the Knicks' drive to claim their first division title since 1994.Woodson spoke admiringly of the Celtics' firm identity. With four weeks left in the regular season, the Knicks are seemingly still in search of theirs. They are 24-21 since mid-December, and their last impressive win came more than two months ago, in a Jan. 3 victory over San Antonio. The Knicks could replace the Celtics atop the division, but they have yet to match Boston's former dominance.There will be meaningful tests in these final 14 games, with dates in Miami and in Oklahoma City and tough games against Memphis, Chicago, Indiana and, yes, the still-ambulatory and unfailingly ornery Celtics.Boston flustered and embarrassed Anthony on Jan. 7, with Garnett trash-talking him into distraction in a 102-96 Celtics victory. Anthony got a measure of revenge two weeks later with an 89-86 victory at TD Garden — the Knicks' first win in Boston since November 2006.When the teams meet again, there will be no Rondo passing flourishes, no Allen 3-point daggers and no Garnett head-butts into the basket stanchion. The Celtics as we knew them are fading. The Knicks, unknowable and maddeningly inconsistent, are nevertheless rising. One game will decide nothing and yet the Knicks need it anyway — for the past, present and future.
FORT MYERS, Fla. — It was high noon on the sun-splashed campus, and Sherwood Brown looked perky despite having arrived from Philadelphia at 3 in the morning. He posed for picture after picture after picture with a small army of fans of America's newest basketball darlings, the Florida Gulf Coast University Eagles.Most fans joined Brown, the Atlantic Sun Conference player of the year, in sticking their tongues out at the cameras. It was his way of showing some love to his fans and fellow students during games. (In a nod to tradition, he also blows kisses.) Such gestures — along with the chicken dance and some bone-rattling dunks — have come to embody the fun-loving, freewheeling spirit of this implausible team, the first No. 15 seed to advance to the Round of 16."It's not as insane here as it was in Philly," Brown said in the thronged student union building, which had Dunk City written in tall green letters on its front doors. "But this is my best day ever here," he added. "This has done wondrous things for our university — admissions, recruiting."Conventional wisdom is open to debate, but there is no denying that the university has vaulted, over the course of a single weekend, from obscurity to floodlighted national visibility. Opened in 1997, the 760-acre campus is carved out of a platter of scrub pines on the southeast fringe of Fort Myers. The Eagles are in their second year of eligibility for the N.C.A.A. tournament.Danny Zabaleta, for one, says Brown is right about the transformative power of the team's unexpected, borderline miraculous success."This has given the school a name and it has put Fort Myers on the map," said Zabaleta, a junior from nearby Naples. "It'll give the school more diverse students, not just from Naples and Fort Myers, but from out of state."Half of the university's 13,615 students are from southwest Florida, and more than 90 percent are from in-state. Many commute.Success, Zabaleta said, is contagious. Pointing toward the long line in the bookstore, he said, "People who don't even go to school are here buying shirts and stuff."Inside the bookstore, Ashley Crosby was completing her hourlong wait in the checkout line. A graduate of Vanderbilt University who teaches elementary school in Fort Myers, Crosby had selected $217.23 worth of Eagles hats, shorts, T-shirts and sweat pants for herself and her fiancé, John Geisler, an F.G.C.U. senior."I think this is going to be huge for this school," Crosby said. "If the school plays it right, it'll become more challenging to get in, which in turn makes more people want to apply. I saw it happen at Vanderbilt. That's where this school, which started out as an online school, wants to go."Just then, her fiancé walked up, fresh from class. "The basketball team is getting the name of F.G.C.U. out," Geisler said. "Part of the reason is that they're a lively team — playful, energetic, fun. At a lot of the big schools, it's all about results, results, results."He motioned toward the mob surrounding Brown, who scored the first eight points in a 17-0 second-half run that overwhelmed San Diego State on Sunday."Look, he's smiling," Geisler said. "A lot of teams let the pressure and the stress get to them. These guys realize it's a game. It's not a life-or-death situation. You gotta have fun."As he spoke, a television news crew from Miami was moving in to interview Brown. He smiled into the camera and somehow managed not to stick his tongue out or blow a single kiss. All that can wait until Friday night in Arlington Tex., when the little university from southwest Florida tries to slay its third Goliath in a row, the University of Florida.
Kaleena Mosqueda-Lewis scored 22 points, and top-seeded Connecticut (31-4) advanced to the Round of 16 in the women's N.C.A.A. tournament for the 20th consecutive season with a 77-44 victory over No. 8 Vanderbilt on Monday night in Storrs, Conn.The Huskies (31-4) are seeking their sixth straight trip to the Final Four.Annalise Pickrel and Becca Mills each scored 12 for No. 5 Michigan State (25-9). The fourth-seeded Terrapins (26-7) will face UConn in a Bridgeport Regional semifinal Saturday. Maryland reached the Round of 8 a year ago.KANSAS 75, SOUTH CAROLINA 69 Monica Engelman scored a career-high 27 points, and Kansas (20-13) became just the second No. 12 seed to advance to the Round of 16 in the women's N.C.A.A. tournament.San Francisco was the other in 1996.The Jayhawks will face the winner of Tuesday's game between Notre Dame and Iowa in a Norfolk Regional semifinal Sunday.Ashley Bruner and Aleighsa Welch each scored 16 points for the fourth-seeded Gamecocks (25-8).NEBRASKA 74, TEXAS A&M 63 Jordan Hooper scored 21 points to lead Nebraska in a Norfolk Region game in College Station, Tex.The sixth-seeded Cornhuskers (25-8) will face the winner of a matchup Tuesday between Duke and Oklahoma State.CALIFORNIA 82, S. FLORIDA 78 Layshia Clarendon scored 27 points to lead second-seeded California (30-3) to an overtime victory in a Spokane Region game in Lubbock, Tex.California will play the winner of the game between Louisiana State and Penn State.GEORGIA 65, IOWA STATE 60 No. 4 Georgia held off a furious second-half rally in Spokane, Wash. The Lady Bulldogs (27-6) will face Stanford or Michigan in a Spokane Region semifinal on Saturday.TENNESSEE 68, CREIGHTON 52 Kamiko Williams scored 15 points, and Tennessee (26-7) pulled away in the second half on its home floor in Knoxville, Tenn.Second-seeded Tennessee is 52-0 in N.C.A.A. tournament games on its home floor.Alexis Akin-Otiko scored 12 points for the No. 10 seed Creighton (25-8).OKLAHOMA 85, U.C.L.A 62 Aaryn Ellenberg scored 27 points from the perimeter, and Joanna McFarland handled things inside with 20 points and 16 rebounds to lead Oklahoma in Columbus, Ohio.Atonye Nyingifa had 18 points, and Markel Walker added 14 for third-seeded U.C.L.A. (26-8),.Sixth-seeded Oklahoma (24-10) will face Tennessee in a semifinal in the Oklahoma City Region on Sunday.
At the time, it did not strike Lipscomb Coach Scott Sanderson as particularly noteworthy. About an hour before his team faced Florida Gulf Coast on Jan. 17, Sanderson glanced across the gym and saw that the Eagles had formed a layup line, or at least some futuristic version of one."The thing is, they were all dunking," he said. "Every single one of them, even the players who couldn't really dunk. They were having a great time."Yet Sanderson's players were not intimidated, not in the least. Not by Brett Comer's lobs to teammates. Not by Chase Fieler's airborne acrobatics. Florida Gulf Coast was just another Atlantic Sun Conference opponent, and Lipscomb went out and scrapped its way to an 87-78 overtime victory — on the road, no less. It was a nice little confidence builder for the team amid a disappointing season.Neither Sanderson nor his players had any way of knowing how ridiculously impressive the win would look two months later.As Florida Gulf Coast (26-10) spent the past weekend fashioning the opening rounds of the N.C.A.A. tournament into its own personal highlight show, securing a spot in the Round of 16 with victories over Georgetown and San Diego State, a small group of teams from around the country, their seasons long since over, watched the drama play out with a mix of curiosity and pride."I think it's hard not to root for them," Maine's Ted Woodward said in a telephone interview.Like Sanderson, Woodward coached his team to a win over Florida Gulf Coast this season. It turned out to be a banner moment for Maine (11-19), which was otherwise not particularly adept at winning basketball games. The same could be said for East Tennessee State (10-22), Stetson (15-16) and Lipscomb, which labored through a 12-18 season but swept its two-game series with Florida Gulf Coast.That probably bears repeating: Florida Gulf Coast lost twice to Lipscomb this season."I can tell you that it will come up in conversations with recruits," Sanderson said. "We probably benefit more than anyone from all this."A few N.C.A.A. tournament teams — Duke, Virginia Commonwealth and Iowa State — also defeated Florida Gulf Coast during the regular season, but the significance for programs like Lipscomb is more profound: if Florida Gulf Coast was capable of doing something like this, why not us?Sanderson said he was in church during the first half of Florida Gulf Coast's game against San Diego State on Sunday night but kept checking the score on his phone. ("I feel guilty saying that," he said.) He found a television in time to watch the Eagles become the first No. 15 seed in tournament history to advance to the regional semifinals. On Friday, the Eagles will vie for a berth in the Round of 8 against Florida, the No. 3 seed in the South.With the reality setting in that Florida Gulf Coast was making history, having fully cemented its status as the country's most lovable collection of dunkaholics, Sanderson decided to check the box scores of his team's two wins over the Eagles this season. He hoped to refresh his memory of how that had happened.He observed that Florida Gulf Coast went a combined 13 of 51 from 3-point range in the two games. Lipscomb, a small, faith-based university in Nashville, turned Dunk City into Clunk City by sprinting back on defense and protecting the basket."You can't just let them go crazy up and down that floor," Sanderson said. "If they get out in transition and start pushing the ball, you're in trouble. Anyone can see that on television. Ain't take no brain surgeon to figure that one out."Stetson Coach Casey Alexander, whose team is responsible for Florida Gulf Coast's most recent loss, said his players were prepared for the Eagles' up-tempo style. If Georgetown and San Diego State were taken aback by Florida Gulf Coast's penchant for no-look passes and alley-oop lobs, teams in the Atlantic Sun knew what was coming this season."I mean, they keep a dunk meter in their game notes," Alexander said.Stetson shot 54.2 percent and drained 11 3-pointers in its 80-71 win over Florida Gulf Coast on Feb. 22. Sadly for the Hatters, they could not replicate that effort in the Atlantic Sun tournament semifinals, as the Eagles dealt them a 14-point loss. Florida Gulf Coast advanced to defeat Mercer, the conference's regular-season champion, for the tournament title on Mercer's home court. That result stood out to Alexander."I'm honestly more surprised that they won that game at Mercer than that they beat Georgetown and San Diego State," he said.Like Lipscomb and Stetson, East Tennessee State had a rough go of it this season — except, of course, for its 85-75 win over Florida Gulf Coast on Jan. 12. The Buccaneers trailed by 19 points early in the second half before mounting a 39-13 run."We started pressing, and the game really became an up-and-down contest," Coach Murry Bartow said. "We had to make a lot of plays."For Florida Gulf Coast, the losses played an important role in the team's late-season success. Coach Andy Enfield, in his second season at the university, said his players learned to cope with adversity. In that respect, the Eagles probably owe a lot of credit to some pretty mediocre teams."We had a couple of really bad losses," Enfield said, adding, "We're playing better than we have before because we're doing it on both ends."
BOSTON — A fifth straight defeat, even at home to the hated Knicks , somehow seemed almost preordained for what remains of the Boston Celtics these days. Coach Doc Rivers drew up his 17th starting lineup Tuesday night — and then watched his injury-ravaged team drop a 100-85 decision to the Knicks, the Celtics' 11th — and worst — home defeat of the season.The Celtics were massacred on the offensive glass, turned the ball over twice as often as the Knicks, and, as Rivers saw it, showed no sense of urgency or even competitive fire in what once loomed as a big game."It certainly meant a lot to them," Rivers said of the Knicks who, after having not won in Boston for five years, took both TD Garden games this season. "You could see it. You could feel their emotion.""I think our energy was down," Jeff Green said.The Celtics long ago came to the realization that their five-year run as the Atlantic Division champions was coming to an end. They also have come to the conclusion that they will make the playoffs; they are in seventh place and well ahead (nine games in the loss column) of the ninth-place Philadelphia 76ers.So the mission statement for the last month has been to get everyone as healthy as possible for the playoffs. They know they will open on the road. They know they will be playing a division champion. They may even end up playing these same Knicks.They know that they can field a starting lineup that will not in any way resemble the one that took the floor Tuesday night.The Celtics were without two of their regular starters in the newly reconfigured lineup since the season-ending injury to Rajon Rondo on Jan. 27. Kevin Garnett is out with a bum left ankle and most likely will miss several more games. Courtney Lee (left ankle) was also out. He and Garnett are two of the three best defenders on the team.The newcomer Jordan Crawford had his first start and was all over the final box score, with as many turnovers (6) as assists and 14 points in a team-high 41 minutes. The ever-puzzling Green started for Garnett. Against Miami eight days earlier, he had started for Garnett and lit the Heat up for 43 points. Against the Knicks he had 19 points, 10 rebounds and 6 assists. Avery Bradley continues to struggle offensively; he was 3 of 11 and is 25 of 81 over the last eight games.The new starting lineup turned the ball over on the team's first two possessions, setting the stage for a night of miscues (20 turnovers, 6 each by Paul Pierce and Crawford), missed assignments (a 29-6 advantage in second-chance points for the Knicks, who took 21 more shots) and, well, general, overall blah-ness."We didn't have it," Rivers said. "I wish I knew why."He refused to even consider the possibility that the absence of Garnett may have contributed to the uneven performance."We were just bad," he said. "Kevin had nothing to do with that."Pierce offered the bromide that injuries provide opportunity and thought that seldom-used players might benefit. He didn't name names. Crawford seems to have found a spot in the rotation — he has J. R. Smith-like shooting tendencies — but no one else has made a case for more playing time.The Celtics trailed by as many as 17 points and never led over the final 31 minutes, 35 seconds. They allowed Smith (32 points) and Carmelo Anthony (29 points) to get open looks and second chances. With 5 minutes 19 seconds left and the Knicks leading by 15 points, the Garden emptied.If these teams do meet in the postseason, the Celtics will have a different look. That much is certain. Whether the games will have a different outcome remains to be seen.
BOSTON — It will be at least another month, perhaps in a first-round playoff series, before declarations can be made, or conclusions drawn, or torches passed — or wrested away. After five years of pre-eminence, the Boston Celtics have at least earned a withholding of judgment until the games really matter.But the ground continued to shift beneath them Tuesday night, the balance of power tilting ever more sharply, unmistakably, southward.The Knicks cruised to a 100-85 victory at TD Garden and inched ever closer to taking the Atlantic Division crown that the Celtics have owned for the last five years. It was the Knicks' fifth straight victory, the Celtics' fifth straight loss, and it left a seven-and-a-half game gap between them, with 13 games to play."We want to beat them, let's just be quite frank about it," Carmelo Anthony said, after scoring 29 points in the win. "We always want to beat Boston. New York in anything wants to beat Boston. And when we do, it's a great feeling."The Knicks (43-26) have a 2-1 edge in the season series, having won twice in Boston for the first time since 2003-4. They meet once more on Sunday at Madison Square Garden, with the Knicks poised to win the series for the first time in nine years.So although neither team was at full strength, the symbolism Tuesday was striking. The Knicks thrived on the one-two punch of Anthony and J. R. Smith (32 points), who took turns carving up the Celtics' suddenly lax defense. They pounced early and held a double-digit lead for most of the second half.Jeff Green led the Celtics with 19 points. Paul Pierce, the Celtics' only healthy star, hardly made an impact, scoring just 16 points, and the Celtics sabotaged themselves with 20 turnovers.The Celtics (36-34) could conceivably revive themselves in the postseason and make another storied run. At the moment, they are slotted seventh and on course to face the Knicks in the first round. But Boston is just a game-and-a-half ahead of Milwaukee and could easily slip to eighth, setting up an almost impossible first-round matchup with the Miami Heat.With Kevin Garnett and Courtney Lee both resting injured ankles, the Celtics looked disoriented and discouraged. Garnett is out for at least two weeks, which means he will miss Sunday's rematch as well."It's been like that for us all season long," Pierce said. "It just seems like it gets worse and worse. But like I said, we can't feel sorry for ourselves."The Knicks were also missing their defensive anchor, Tyson Chandler, who missed his seventh straight game because of a bulging disk in his neck. But Kenyon Martin continued to make a strong impression in Chandler's place, anchoring the defense, slamming put-back dunks and generally punishing the Celtics, one of the teams that passed on signing him this season. There were discussions between the Celtics and Martin's representatives, but no contract was ever offered, and Martin joined the Knicks in February.With Garnett ailing, the Celtics surely looked like they could use Martin's ferocity in the paint."That's their fault," Martin said. "They lost. There was talks, there was negotiations, they chose not to do it. It was out of my control. So I'm a Knick now. So they lost."With no Garnett to meet them under the basket, the Knicks drove freely and often, scoring 50 points in the paint. Smith was blistering from the field in the first half and finished 13 for 24 from the field, again showing off a nice mix of drives and jumpers. He was timely, too: after Jason Terry's 3-pointer cut the lead to 12 points in the final seconds of the third, Smith raced downcourt, pulled up from 29 feet and drilled the shot as the buzzer sounded.Barring an untimely slump — or another knee injury — the Knicks seem primed to claim their first division title in 19 years, fulfilling one of Coach Mike Woodson's stated goals."When it's all said and done, hopefully we'll be hanging a division banner up there, because that's what it's all about," Woodson said, though he quickly noted that the championship was the primary goal."We have a long way to go before we reach that goal," he said. "But you got to set many goals along the way, and winning your division puts you in a position to host first round at home."Boston's five-year dominance is almost certainly over. But then, no one here has ever been particularly focused on minor achievements: there are no Atlantic Division pennants hanging among the 18 championship banners in the TD Garden rafters."They're nice to have, I guess," Coach Doc Rivers said. "But it's not what you should be playing for."Tyson Chandler thought he had a chance to return to the lineup Tuesday — "I felt like I was close" — but he reconsidered after his neck stiffened up Monday, hours after a light workout. "I knew that I probably wasn't ready, late afternoon, because I started to have some of the same symptoms," which continued into Tuesday morning, Chandler said. "I knew right away that I wasn't quite there." Although the pain is manageable, Chandler is having difficulty turning his neck and looking up, which would make it difficult to play defense and rebound. Chandler said he might take "a couple days" to rest the neck and said it was "most likely" that he would sit out his eighth straight game Wednesday night.
Elena Delle Donne scored 33 points in her final home game, and Delaware rallied past foul-plagued North Carolina, 78-69, on Tuesday in Newark, Del., to advance to the Round of 16 in the N.C.A.A. women's tournament for the first time in program history."It was a little sad, it was emotional, saying goodbye," Delle Donne said. "But to leave this way is absolutely incredible."The Blue Hens (32-3), seeded sixth in the Bridgeport Region, trailed, 50-42, with 15 minutes 31 seconds left before coming back to extend their team-record winning streak to 27 games and eliminate No. 3 seed North Carolina (29-7).KENTUCKY 84, DAYTON 70 A'dia Mathies matched a career high with 34 points to lead second-seeded Kentucky to a victory over seventh-seeded Dayton in Queens.The Wildcats (29-5) will face Delaware in the Bridgeport semifinals on Saturday. Andrea Hoover scored 22 points to lead the Flyers (28-3).BAYLOR 84, FLORIDA STATE 46 Brittney Griner had 33 points and 22 rebounds to go along with three impressive slam dunks in her final home game for Baylor, and the defending national champion Lady Bears beat Florida State.The Lady Bears (34-1), the top seed in the Oklahoma City Region, are in the Round of 16 for the fourth year in a row. Baylor has won 57 in a row at home.Leonor Rodriguez had 11 points to lead No. 8 Florida State (23-10).LOUISVILLE 76, PURDUE 63 Sara Hammond had 21 points and 10 rebounds to help fifth-seeded Louisville beat Purdue in Louisville, Ky., and advance to the Round of 16 in the Oklahoma City Region. The Cardinals (26-8) will play Baylor on Sunday in Oklahoma City.The fourth-seeded Boilermakers (25-9), who had won five in a row, have lost in the second round three straight years.LOUISIANA ST. 71, PENN STATE 66 Adrienne Webb scored a career-high 29 points, including two crucial free throws with 22 seconds left, and No. 6 Louisiana State (22-11) beat third-seeded Penn State in Baton Rouge, La.Nikki Greene scored 16 points and Alex Bentley 14 for Penn State (26-6), whose loss means all four No. 3 seeds are out.Louisiana State next meets California on Saturday in a Spokane Region semifinal.STANFORD 73, MICHIGAN 40 Joslyn Tinkle made a career-high five 3-pointers on the way to 21 points in her final home game, and top-seeded Stanford (33-2) routed No. 8 Michigan (22-11) to reach the Spokane semifinals.Stanford set up a matchup with Georgia on Saturday.DUKE 68, OKLAHOMA STATE 59 Elizabeth Williams had 16 points and 12 rebounds, and Duke rallied to beat Oklahoma State in Durham, N.C.Haley Peters added 15 points and 13 rebounds for the second-seeded Blue Devils (32-2). They advance to face sixth-seeded Nebraska in a Norfolk Region semifinal on Sunday.Duke trailed by 15 points in the first minute of the second half.NOTRE DAME 74, IOWA 57 Kayla McBride scored a career-high 28 points, and top-seeded Notre Dame beat No. 9 Iowa (21-13) in Iowa City. Notre Dame (33-1) will next face 12th-seeded Kansas in the Norfolk Region semifinals on Sunday.
LOS ANGELES — For college basketball coaches, N.C.A.A. tournament preparation extends beyond white boards and practices and game strategy. This advance work is less about their preferred style of play and more about their preferred style of dress.The custom suits. The lucky ties. The hair product. This is where fast breaks meet fashion forward. Or backward. Or sideways.It happens several times each game, when the camera pans toward the sideline, and there, amid fans clad in their team colors and players dressed in their uniforms, stands the one guy who is dressed up. While N.F.L. coaches can make famous a hooded sweatshirt, and baseball managers wear uniforms to sit in dugouts, college basketball is all about the suits. And the mousse.This can create a first impression or reinforce an existing one — and not always in a good way.Jeff Halmos of the men's design firm Shipley & Halmos is a college basketball fan. His firm was nominated for the GQ/CFDA Best New Designer Award in 2009."Coaches wear suits because that's what they do, because no one has ever bucked the trend," he said in a telephone interview. "They follow suit. I'm all for it. I'm not a big fan of the Bill Belichick fashion style, looking like you just rolled out of bed. I don't think that's cool. You don't have to go all Craig Sager with it, but it helps to look good."Sager, of course, is the sideline reporter known for his colorful ensembles and one tie that resembles an N.C.A.A. tournament bracket. Most coaches, Halmos said, tend to follow a style patterned after Pat Riley when he coached. He wore suits that looked as if they came straight out of fashion magazines. They suited his personality, added to his aura.If Halmos were to rank coaches according to their style preferences, he said Duke's Mike Krzyzewski, Harvard's Tommy Amaker, Florida's Billy Donovan and Villanova's Jay Wright would receive top-seed consideration. At least on game day, there is not a sweater vest or track suit among them.Now, when it comes to the N.C.A.A. tournament, the sideline can sometimes resemble a red carpet. Most coaches like to say they put little thought into what they will wear, or how they will wear it. Yet almost all look perfectly coiffed once the cameras turn on."I'm an old-school Louisiana country boy," said Southern's Roman Banks, whose team lost to Gonzaga in the Round of 64. "Two-button, three-button coats. Basic shirts and ties. Nothing that would draw attention to myself."He added: "I've heard about some of those other guys. The expensive haircuts. The tanning."It is always the other guys. Always.Often, the fashion statements made by coaches reveal as much about their superstitions as their preference for Armani. Before Bruce Pearl became an ESPN analyst, he always wore suspenders underneath his suit jacket. A booster had told him a long time ago he needed to wear something to distinguish himself. The suspenders worked, but "the only time anyone saw them was when I took my jacket off," Pearl said. "I only took my jacket off when I was mad at the officials, which was about half the time."Pearl also wore a certain tie only until he lost in it. The same went for Bucknell's Dave Paulsen and North Carolina A&T's Cy Alexander, who shelved each suit he lost in throughout the season."I didn't pay a ton of attention to my wardrobe," Pearl said. "But my kids did: 'Dad, that suit is so old!' "Some coaches are required to wear a suit and tie, like Donovan at Florida. That is one of the Gators' policies. The hair product is his own undertaking, not part of the contract. Not that Donovan follows that policy throughout the game."I take my jacket off before the game ever starts," he said. "It doesn't make any difference to me. If it was up to me, I wouldn't wear a suit and tie. But once the game starts, you don't even realize what you have on."
CHICAGO — Before Wednesday's tip-off at United Center, LeBron James lay on a towel in the Miami locker room as a team assistant helped him stretch. James rapped along to a song on his iPod as his thighs were kneaded and his long limbs were pushed and pulled. Nearly 20 reporters and cameramen watched his every movement.After the Chicago Bulls stunned the Heat, 101-97, to end their 27-game winning streak — the second-longest streak in N.B.A. history and six games short of the record set by the 1971-72 Los Angeles Lakers — James had another moment in the locker room, this one much more private."I had everyone come in and put a hand on each other," Heat Coach Erik Spoelstra said. "It was the first time I talked about the streak."James said: "We haven't had a moment to really know what we just did. We had a moment, just very fortunate and very humble and blessed to be a part of this team and be a part of a streak like this."The Bulls sprinted to an early lead, as many teams had done recently against the Heat. They led by double digits for much of the first half and held a 9-point edge at halftime. But a 13-3 third-quarter spurt gave the Heat their first lead of the game, 59-58, with 4 minutes 30 seconds left in the quarter.Rather than fold, the Bulls stiffened, something no other team had done during Miami's run. Boston led the Heat by 17 in the second quarter on March 18, and Cleveland held a 27-point second-half advantage two nights later. Neither cushion was enough.With the game tied at 69-69 early in the fourth quarter, Miami appeared poised to go on another run, and remind the league that they were good enough to spot opponents large leads and come back at will.Instead, it was Chicago that found an extra gear. As the minutes ticked away, the wait for the Heat to turn into that familiar squad of steel nerves and ruthless efficiency became cheer after cheer as the Bulls hit big shot after big shot.Luol Deng sank a 3-pointer to make the score 78-73 and another to make it 83-75. Jimmy Butler drilled a third long-range basket to put the Bulls ahead, 86-78.Suddenly, the crowd was chanting, "Beat the Heat." And with belief.The Heat never threatened again. Deng led the Bulls with 28 points, Carlos Boozer had 21 and Butler added 17.The last time the Heat had lost was Feb. 1 to Indiana. The streak spanned 53 days, beginning in Toronto on Super Bowl Sunday, and captivated the N.B.A., as James raised his already electric game to another level. He was terrific again Wednesday, scoring 32 points on 11-for-17 shooting from the field. Dwyane Wade returned after missing two games with a knee bruise and scored 18.It was not enough.Despite an 86-67 Miami victory over Chicago in late February, the gritty, defensive-minded Bulls posed a test for the Heat. Before Wednesday's game, Spoelstra spoke of the challenge rather starkly."We're preparing for an absolute cage-fight mentality game," he said.Chicago obliged. Indicative of Spoelstra's assessment was a first-quarter play in which James went one-on-one against Kirk Hinrich on a fast break. James lowered his shoulder and Hinrich took it in the chest, while also giving James a bear hug. Both players tumbled to the floor, Hinrich was whistled for a foul and the home crowd erupted.Chicago was short-handed, playing without Derrick Rose, who has yet to return after tearing an anterior cruciate ligament during last year's playoffs, and the All-Star center Joakim Noah, out with plantar fasciitis. It did not matter.A thunderous round of boos greeted James when he was announced, but it was nothing compared with the raucous scene as the fourth-quarter clock ticked down. Fans stood, and the arena seemed to shake.Despite the heightened media attention, and presence, as the Heat inched closer to history, James said the weight of the streak was not an issue."We weren't pressing every game saying we have to win so we can get the streak," he said.Soon, the Heat will turn their attention to a larger prize, in the playoffs."It has never been about the streak," Spoelstra said. "We have had a bigger goal in mind."
FAIRFAX, Va. — The basketball commemorating George Mason's run to the Final Four in 2006 is perched inside a modest trophy case near an obscure back entrance of the university's basketball arena. Embossed with the score of the East Region final — George Mason 86, Connecticut 84 — the basketball is not all that easy to find in this sprawling suburban campus 20 miles from Washington, and hundreds of students pass it without notice each day.But little at George Mason has been the same since that game, and it is likely that some, if not many, of the students striding past the arena had never heard of George Mason before 2006.The 2006 team's run through the N.C.A.A. tournament was led by an enchanting, spiritual coach, Jim Larranaga, who motivated his players to defeat a succession of college basketball Goliaths with corny slogans and pithy catchphrases.Larranaga left George Mason two years ago, and with similar locker room pep talks — embellished this time with dance steps — he has his new team, Miami, once again within sight of the Final Four. Miami will play Marquette on Thursday in the East Region semifinals at Verizon Center in Washington, the same arena where Larranaga's team upset Connecticut seven years ago.Back at George Mason, off Interstate 66 in Northern Virginia, Larranaga may no longer be on campus to write inspirational mottos on the locker room walls, but his imprint is far from forgotten."The 2006 team was America's darlings, and we told the George Mason story to the world," Athletic Director Tom O'Connor said. "One of my other coaches tells the story that when his team used to check into a hotel on the road, he would say, 'George Mason,' and the desk clerk would answer, 'I'm sorry; we don't have a reservation for anyone by that name.'"Now, he says the desk clerks know who George Mason is."Larranaga's humble, homespun tactics amplified the Cinderella theme of that George Mason team's run."We were the underdog that people said shouldn't even be in the tournament," Lamar Butler, one of the stars of the 2006 team, said in a telephone interview. "You can't get any more disparaged than that. But we had some basic strengths, and Coach had us ready. People thought we were small time, but they were wrong."With an enrollment of more than 30,000 students, the university was hardly small time, and its sudden basketball success became big business. The unexpected national exposure also became a boon for George Mason in several unforeseen ways.In the first admissions cycle after the Final Four appearance, the number of out-of-state applications to George Mason rose by 54 percent, according to a report compiled by Robert E. Baker, the director of George Mason's center for sports management. Visits to the admissions department's Web site increased by 150 percent, and inquiries fielded by the office of admissions jumped 350 percent. The SAT scores and grade-point averages of incoming students also increased.There was a 25 percent surge in the number of alumni who were considered active with the university's alumni association. A $100 million fund-raising campaign attracted $132 million in donations.The George Mason bookstore took in more money in March 2006 ($800,000) than it did the entire rest of the year ($625,000). Enrollment in the annual summer basketball camp more than doubled. N.C.A.A. licensing revenue went up by $100,000.Recruiting became national in scope for all sports.George Mason team rosters were once populated almost entirely by students from Virginia and Maryland. "Now we can get into the living rooms of recruits from all over the country," O'Connor, the athletic director, said.In 2006, there was even less campus unrest, with significant declines in the number of internal judicial proceedings involving student misbehavior."The gains are evident far beyond athletics, and that's partly because Jim Larranaga was so engaged in the George Mason academic community," Baker said. "He lectured in classes, and he was a designated faculty member. So when we suddenly got the spotlight, Jim was the perfect spokesman. He talked about our Nobel laureates because he knew them, and he talked about graduation rates because he valued them."Officials at George Mason are quick to point out that they thought the university was poised to make strides in its national standing and was preparing for a period of enhanced student achievement before the 2006 basketball team's run."There's no question there were glowing embers," Baker said. "But Jim's legacy here is the 2006 team that turned those embers into an intense fire that is burning still."In the last several years, the university has been going through a building boom, and that has included athletics, where more than $40 million has been spent on upgrades of facilities.At a news conference Wednesday at Verizon Center, Larranaga was asked if he had talked to his Miami players about the 2006 team and its stretch of upsets in the tournament. Larranaga was typically revealing and self-deprecating."To them, I'm kind of wacky, you know?" he said. "I say a lot of things to them, and initially they don't understand. I use quotes and our thought of the day. I ask them to explain it, and they have no idea. I have to then educate them of what we're trying to get across."Larranaga acknowledged that Verizon Center was, for him, a place of "incredible memories."But speaking about his Miami team, he added: "To them, it's just another venue. They want to create those memories for themselves."Miami is not exactly the home team, but Larranaga will have his share of local support."I hope they win the whole thing," O'Connor said. "Then when they tell Jim Larranaga's story, they will always bring up George Mason. It's always going to be there. It's a great part of N.C.A.A. tournament history. In fact, it's one of the great parts of college athletics."
LOS ANGELES — It seemed inevitable that Sean Miller would end up here, with a permanent home underneath Hollywood's bright lights, where his prodigious childhood talent for dribbling and handling a basketball drew the attention of film and movie types.Alas, Miller's big-screen career lasted a handful of seconds, just one scene in which he dribbled three basketballs at once as the actor Nicholas Pryor walked by and asked, "How tall is your mother?" It is true, though. Before Miller became a basketball coach, before he took over at Arizona, before he guided the Wildcats into the Round of 16, there was "The Fish That Saved Pittsburgh."Released in 1979, the film became something of a cult classic. Strangers ask Gary Stromberg, one of its producers, about it all the time. He heard Shaquille O'Neal once ranked it among his favorite movies. Same with Donovan McNabb."I remember that kid from the movie," Stromberg said this week in a telephone interview. "I didn't know that was Sean Miller until just now. I had no idea he became a coach."That Miller landed beneath these bright lights anyway, with his Wildcats pitted against Ohio State in a West Region semifinal Thursday, is a direct result of his childhood experiences and his father's influence in particular.John Miller coached for nearly 30 years in Beaver Falls, Pa., where he won nearly 600 games at Blackhawk High School and 4 state titles. By the time his children could walk, Miller had set up a basket in the basement, complete with a wooden backboard, an 18-inch rim and some 40 pages of drills, everything from dribbling to jump rope."You knew basketball was important in our house," said Archie Miller, Sean's younger brother and the head coach at Dayton. "It was basically the same as breathing. Very, very few people have outworked my brother in the game of basketball. And I mean from age 5 to 44."From this basketball incubator, Sean Miller dribbled. Everywhere he went, he dribbled. He dribbled to his friends' houses, around the neighborhood, into restaurants. He learned to dribble while he spun a ball on an index finger, or pulled it around his back. He jumped rope as he spun balls with one finger on each hand. He was a puppet master. The ball was his puppet.This led to more than 15 minutes of attention. Miller performed all over the country, at halftime shows, for the Pittsburgh Steelers, even on "The Tonight Show Starring Johnny Carson." He once signed an autograph for John Wooden.Somehow, Miller's dribbling came to the attention of Bo Ryan at Wisconsin, then an assistant coach. Ryan, an economics and marketing major, wanted to spice up the university's basketball camp. So he flew in three basketball magicians, Miller, the youngest of the three, included. As part of his routine, Miller wore a Superman costume."Those were the three best at the time," Ryan said in a telephone interview. "Probably in the world. In the '80s, there were all these kids whose dad took them to the gym for 10 hours a day, all these instructional videos. But Sean is the one that people from my generation remember."Around that time, Stromberg was a producer of the movie "Car Wash," which earned him some Hollywood credibility. He and his partner wrote "The Fish" in one night, which Stromberg, who has been a recovering drug addict for about 30 years, said was fueled by cocaine. "We used a lot of drugs that night," he said. "Got very high. And laughed a lot."They managed to land Julius Erving for the lead role. (Stromberg said he once saw Dr. J doing his own laundry on set in Pittsburgh.) The movie, a mixture of sports and fantasy, told of a struggling basketball franchise that tried to right its season by building a team around players with the same astrological sign (Pisces).Neither the movie nor Miller's stint as a ball-handling prodigy is listed in his bio on the Arizona athletics' Web site. The topic, in fact, is among his least favorite. (He would not consent to an interview that included it.)
WASHINGTON — It is one of college basketball's great riddles. Every season, Syracuse Coach Jim Boeheim unveils another iteration of his 2-3 zone defense and dares opponents to concoct solutions.It should not be so difficult or so maddening. There are, after all, decades of game tapes for coaches to dissect, the zone's antidote hidden somewhere within those autopsies of offenses gone awry. So many have tried, and so many have failed.The Hoosiers will get the next crack at it when they face the Orange on Thursday night in the N.C.A.A. tournament's Round of 16 here.Indiana, the top seed in the East Region, was circumspect Wednesday in comments about its game plan. The freshman point guard Yogi Ferrell talked about "finding the gaps" and working the offense "inside out." The junior forward Will Sheehey said the team had been sticking to its usual routine at practice. "But regarding the 2-3 zone, I'm not going to give out details," he said.Crean, who spent nine seasons coaching at Marquette, including three in the Big East Conference, is more familiar with Syracuse than most. He described how Boeheim recruited long, athletic players who were tailored to his zone. This season, that means having the 6-foot-6 Michael Carter-Williams — and his impossibly long, Inspector Gadget-like arms — up top alongside the 6-foot-4 Brandon Triche. They constantly edge their way into passing lanes."We don't play the 2-3 zone like most teams do," Syracuse's Trevor Cooney, a reserve guard, said.Boeheim considers this one of his better defensive teams, for good reason. Syracuse, the region's No. 4 seed, ranks third in the country in field-goal defense, limiting opponents to 37.3 percent shooting, and ranks sixth in defending the 3-point arc, from which teams are shooting 28.9 percent. In its 66-60 loss to Syracuse in the Round of 32, California went 4 of 21 from the 3-point line and, during one particularly ineffectual stretch, committed turnovers on seven straight possessions.One major challenge for opponents is that Syracuse's 2-3 zone is not some sort of monolithic beast. It is always changing, from week to week and from game to game. The basic framework stays intact, but Boeheim makes endless adjustments based on the opposing personnel. Some coaches learn that the hard way.Before his team visited Syracuse on Nov. 25, Colgate Coach Matt Langel studied film of Princeton's loss to the Orange on Nov. 21. He thought he identified one area where his players — even if they were clearly overmatched — could attack Syracuse's zone.Langel noticed that whenever Princeton flashed one of its forwards to the foul line for an entry pass, Syracuse's post defenders remained near the baseline. Langel assumed Syracuse would do the same against his team, so he drew up several sets that involved passes to the high post.But Syracuse altered its approach against Colgate's smaller lineup. Boeheim had a post player, often the 6-foot-9 Rakeem Christmas, trail Colgate's post player to his position at the elbow. Colgate had other issues in its 87-51 loss, but subtle adjustments like moving Christmas off the low block had a cumulative effect. Syracuse dismantled Colgate's offense."Their length is the No. 1 problem," Langel said in a telephone interview. "You try to prepare for it, and you talk about it, and you watch it, but until you get out there — they're even longer than they look, if that makes any sense. You think you're making the easy play, and passes get deflected or stolen."Ray McCallum, the coach at Detroit, said he and his staff began to plan for Syracuse's zone in the summer, months before the teams met at the Carrier Dome on Dec. 17. McCallum had 13 plays to run against the zone. He hoped to screen the zone, slip some of those screens and punch the ball inside."It didn't help us win the game," McCallum said, "but I think it put us in a good position."He also made sure his team was aware of Syracuse's full-court press, which Boeheim likes to use after converted free throws. The Titans kept it a one-possession game for much of the night before losing, 72-68.McCallum identified three keys for any opponent: ball movement, body movement and offensive rebounding. Being active against the zone is essential, he said, because Syracuse has the savvy to complement its athleticism. Opponents must match that level of activity."They don't just stand there like zombies," McCallum said. "They read and react and move."At the same time, McCallum found it almost impossible at practice to simulate Syracuse's length. He estimated that 60 percent of the teams that Detroit faced this season showed some form of zone, at least for a few of possessions. But Syracuse's defense was like no other, he said.For Indiana, an important factor could be the play of the sophomore forward Cody Zeller, a skilled passer. If the Hoosiers — as Ferrell suggested — hope to initiate their offense by getting the ball inside to Zeller, he could stretch Syracuse's defenders by kicking the ball back outside. Indiana is one of the country's top teams in 3-point shooting, at 40.8 percent."I don't think you can look at that zone and think you're going to beat it any one way," Crean said. "But I don't think you can look at it and think you can stand around and pass the ball around the perimeter, either. That's a recipe for defeat."
WASHINGTON — Indiana could not have looked more lost. The Hoosiers missed layups, dribbled into defenders and threw passes that sailed into the Syracuse bench, as if a gust of wind had suddenly swept through Verizon Center. And that was just the first few possessions.Indiana had spent four days preparing for Syracuse's celebrated 2-3 zone defense heading into Thursday's East Region semifinal. The Hoosiers watched video, studied sets and moved the ball at practice with authority.Up close and personal, they found the Orange to be longer, more athletic and more exasperating than they could have imagined. The result was clear, as Syracuse leaned on its usual brand of swarming defense to topple Indiana, 61-50."When teams practice against the zone, it's a false sense of security," Syracuse Coach Jim Boeheim said, "because you're not playing against our defense."Indiana, the region's top seed, shot 33.3 percent from the field and committed 19 turnovers. It was not the first time Syracuse's defense baffled an opponent, but the N.C.A.A. tournament has a way of magnifying each hurried shot and every errant pass."I'm sure the strength and the size of the Syracuse guards had something to do with it," Indiana Coach Tom Crean said.Syracuse (29-9), the No. 4 seed, will face third-seeded Marquette on Saturday for a spot in the Final Four. Michael Carter-Williams, a sophomore guard, led the Orange with 24 points and 5 rebounds in what Boeheim deemed his finest all-around game of the season. The senior guard Brandon Triche added 14 points.Syracuse led by 18 points in the first half. By the time Indiana (29-7) unearthed some semblance of rhythm on offense, it was too late."Not too many teams are used to our zone," Triche said.Not so long ago, Boeheim was so disgusted with his players that he talked about wanting to drop everything so he could go golfing. The team was mired in a late-season slump, and Verizon Center was the site of one Orange debacle, a 61-39 loss to Georgetown on March 9 during which Syracuse scored its fewest points since 1962. When Boeheim was asked Wednesday about that game, he pretended not to remember it.Syracuse has a different air about it now, after reaching the Big East Conference tournament final, after cruising past Montana and California in the N.C.A.A. tournament's early rounds, and after dismantling Indiana, the Big Ten Conference's regular-season champion.Thursday's game was not about playing the most artistic basketball — far from it. Syracuse's Baye Moussa Keita wore a wrap on his left hand after falling on his face in the first half. During one particularly comedic stretch of the second half, Syracuse and Indiana, two programs with proud basketball traditions, combined to commit five straight turnovers without attempting a shot."We didn't take care of the ball like we should have," said Indiana's Victor Oladipo, who scored a team-high 16 points.Carter-Williams delivered an exquisite performance amid the muck of a tournament brawl. Even with Oladipo, the Big Ten's defensive player of the year, shadowing him for much of the second half, Carter-Williams found his spots. With Indiana threatening, he scored back-to-back baskets — the first on a layup, the second on a deep 3-pointer — to give Syracuse a 14-point cushion that stifled any remaining drama. He finished 9 of 19 from the field, with three 3-pointers.In the first half, Boeheim had to encourage Carter-Williams to shoot his first 3-pointer. Indiana's guards kept going underneath ball screens, and Boeheim wanted Carter-Williams to stretch them out."I didn't think he would make it," Boeheim said. "I just wanted them to think he might shoot it."The game was only the fifth meeting between the teams, and their first in the tournament since their best-known clash, in 1987 for the national championship. The Hoosiers won that game on Keith Smart's last-second jumper over the outstretched left arm of Syracuse's Howard Triche.On Thursday, Triche's nephew had an opportunity to help Syracuse (and his family) add a bit of a postscript to that loss, 26 years later. Brandon Triche made an immediate impact against Indiana, scoring his team's first 4 points as Syracuse opened an 11-3 lead. By the time Syracuse's James Southerland drilled a deep 3-pointer, Crean was motioning for a 30-second timeout. The Hoosiers were flummoxed. There were possessions when Cody Zeller, the team's star forward, found himself trapped by a pair of defenders 18 feet from the basket.In the game's first nine minutes, Indiana went 1 of 6 from the field and committed eight turnovers.It was a sign that Syracuse had come a long way since its woes in late February and early March. Even then, as it turns out, the team had no real reason to panic, no cause for great concern. Syracuse could always reach back and rely on its zone, for so long one of Boeheim's philosophical staples.On Thursday, it worked once more, and it looked as terrifying as ever.
LOS ANGELES — For Ohio State , the end felt so four days ago. Here came the Buckeyes, in another tied game in the N.C.A.A. tournament, with the ball in the final seconds.Just as before, Aaron Craft dribbled. Seconds ticked away. He drove right, and two Arizona defenders went with him, which left his teammate, LaQuinton Ross, open on the left wing. More time gone. Craft did not loft the game-winner, not like on Sunday against Iowa State. He kicked the ball to Ross and shouted "knockdown." Ross launched his own 3-point attempt, which went in as the Buckeyes' bench erupted in celebration.It marked the second straight contest Ohio State had won on its final shot, this time with two seconds on the clock. Arizona had enough time for one last heave downcourt, which guard Lenzelle Smith Jr. deflected.The final score read, 73-70, in favor of Team Buzzer Beater.In the handshake line, Arizona guard Mark Lyons found Ross, his old friend."I can't stand you," Lyons told him, and they laughed, although Ross a bit more heartily.As this N.C.A.A. tournament unfolded in the wild West Region, top seeds fell as if they were underdogs, one after another, until upsets could hardly be classified as such. The teams seeded first, third, fourth, fifth, seventh and eighth all failed to survive the first weekend.Then there was Ohio State (29-7). The Buckeyes, the No. 2 seed, did not fall victim to the upset epidemic. Instead, they seemed immune. They battered Iona and clipped Iowa State on Craft's buzzer beater, and they arrived at Staples Center on Thursday for a regional semifinal against Arizona again favored and again doubted and again listed among the potential upsets.By late Thursday, there it was: another rare victory by a favorite, in the final seconds no less."I know it makes some people nervous," Craft said of the Buckeyes' late theatrics.Ohio State needed Craft to overcome his first-half foul trouble. It needed Deshaun Thomas to carry its first-half scoring. It needed to slow Lyons, who finished with 23 points but never regained the dominant form that staked Arizona to an 11-point first-half lead.Mostly, though, Ohio State needed Ross, its superb substitute and resident knucklehead in recovery. Afterward, Ross, a sophomore forward, alluded to immaturity issues in his abbreviated freshman season. Coach Thad Matta said Ross played so erratically last year — he was not eligible until December while he fulfilled academic qualification requirements — that Matta told him, "I can't hold tryouts in the Big Ten season."Yet here was Ross in the final minute, with one bad play and one good one, so typical of a player once ranked among the country's top eighth graders whose vast supply of potential often remained untapped. Sean Miller, Arizona's coach, said he worried about Ross's contribution off the bench as much as anything.With 29 seconds left, Ohio State clung to a 70-67 lead. Lyons received a pass from Nick Johnson and barreled into the lane, where his layup dropped as officials whistled a foul — on Ross. Lyons made the free throw and tied the score, which set up the final sequence.Ross finished with 17 points and scored again with his postgame hilarity. He revealed that he challenged the broadcaster Reggie Miller to a 3-point contest Wednesday and that he had used Kobe Bryant's locker at the home of the Lakers throughout the week. He talked up the weather in Los Angeles. He laughed. He laughed some more.Matta would later say Ross always floored him with the sheer amount of useless, or not-that useful, information he stored away. Much of it centers on sports like hockey and football."I always ask him, not how do you know this, but why do you know this?" Matta said.Ohio State improved its winning streak to 11. That came at the expense of Miller, Matta's protégé. The more they talked Wednesday, the more they revealed about each other, including, Matta insisted, Miller's propensity to leave his wallet behind on trips.For Miller, the ending Thursday also felt familiar, but not in the way it felt familiar to Ohio State. Miller coached Xavier in 2007, and Xavier met Matta and the Buckeyes in the second round. Xavier even led late, but a 3-pointer — always a 3-pointer — from Ron Lewis forced into overtime a game the Buckeyes eventually won.This time, Arizona (27-8) built a lead in the first half. It followed Miller's instructions, switching defenders whenever Ohio State screened or handed the ball off. It did so on hundreds of occasions, almost every time, until that play in the final seconds.From their respective vantage points, all the coaches could do was watch. Miller could only watch as another Ohio State 3-pointer sank his season. Matta could only watch as another 3-pointer pushed his Buckeyes into another regional final.And with that, Team Buzzer Beater continued forward, with another ending that could have been scripted by someone in Hollywood, with another narrow escape.
INDIANAPOLIS — The video of Dana Altman's most embarrassing professional moment is on YouTube, shot by a hand-held camera directed at a computer screen, viewed nearly 18,000 times. It was 55 seconds that forever changed Altman's career.He stood in the center of Bud Walton Arena in Fayetteville, Ark., wearing a dark red tie, and made an awkward, halting, clearly uncomfortable effort pumping his fists as Arkansas's athletic director, Frank Broyles, led the audience in a "Pig Sooie" chant."I'm not sure my friends in Omaha would like to see me do that," Altman told the crowd — an attempt at a joke, but one that carried an ample bit of truth.Altman had won 260 games in 13 seasons at Creighton, 80 miles from where he grew up, but when Arkansas and the Southeastern Conference came calling in late March 2007, Altman accepted the offer. He was introduced by Broyles and John A. White, the chancellor at the time, on a Monday.And on Tuesday, he resigned.Altman's one-day stint with the Razorbacks — after what he deemed a late change of heart — ultimately altered the direction of three programs. Arkansas began its coaching search anew, and Creighton took Altman back. But his curiosity was soon piqued again. That is where Oregon comes in.Oregon provided Altman the resources of a major-conference program, a familial atmosphere in Eugene, Ore., which Altman sought, and a fresh slate. He has responded by taking the Ducks, picked to finish seventh in the Pacific-12 Conference before the season, into the N.C.A.A. tournament's Round of 16 for the first time since 2007.It is purely coincidental that the genesis of Altman's hiring at Oregon stemmed from a four-hour meeting with the then-athletic director Pat Kilkenny at the Conrad Hotel in Indianapolis, blocks from Lucas Oil Stadium, where the 12th-seeded Ducks face top seed Louisville on Friday.Kilkenny was 37 days into a search for a new coach after firing Ernie Kent in mid-March 2010. His private jet was crisscrossing the country as he sought out interest. He had some of the most powerful executives for Nike — whose founder, Phil Knight, is an Oregon alumnus — lobbying for candidates.One of them was Altman, the aw-shucks Nebraska native, the one who seemed impossible to divorce from Creighton, the tiny Jesuit university in Omaha with the $291 million arena known as the House That Dana Built.That seemed especially true after the false start at Arkansas. Altman cited family as the reason for his quick turnabout. His daughter, Audra, was then just entering high school in Omaha, and two sons, his parents, his brother and his sister lived nearby."We would go to his house for holidays, and there'd be 50 family members over there," said Brian Fish, Altman's longtime assistant. "It was home. I didn't know if he'd ever leave."Altman indicated Thursday that the three years in between job changes made a difference to the family."My family was grown," Altman said. He added: "I just felt like if I was going to make a change — I was in my 50s — it was time to make a change. I felt like this was the right time to make a move, and the people at Oregon have been really good to us."Altman's decommitment from Arkansas did not deter Kilkenny, who said he had zero reservations considering Altman as a candidate."I had a level of awareness of it, and I asked him about it, and his answer was totally satisfactory," Kilkenny said. "I wasn't really concerned about it. I just wanted to understand what had occurred."Kilkenny knew his private jet was being tracked by the news media, so he said he chose Indianapolis as a discreet meeting spot. At one point during their session, Kilkenny said he needed assurance that Altman truly wanted to join Oregon.The next morning, Altman sent him a text message saying, "Pat, I want to be a Duck."It was not quite a "Pig Sooie" moment, but it sold Kilkenny. Altman was offered the position that day."Early in our conversation, I could just see he was the right guy," Kilkenny said. "I sort of got goose bumps early on. He just really did feel right."Altman began with six players on his roster from a team that had gone 24-39 the previous two seasons. He brought in the program-changing players Tony Woods and Arsalan Kazemi as transfers within the first two seasons. The addition of the freshmen Damyean Dotson and Dominic Artis this season boosted the team to another level."When we came here, we didn't know how long it would take," Altman said. "It was maybe hard to envision that we were going to turn it very quickly. But I've got a great staff that works awfully hard."Altman added: "The decision to move was a tough one, but it's worked out great for Creighton, and it's worked out O.K. for us. And hopefully it will get better."
DENVER — The Nets ' bid to ensure a winning road record for the first time since entering the N.B.A. in 1976 came up well short against the Denver Nuggets ' home dominance on Friday night.The Nuggets scored the game's first 21 fast-break points en route to a 109-87 victory, their 18th in a row at the Pepsi Center. Denver is 33-3 here, the best home record in the league.The Nets, who were seeking their team-record 21st road win, are 4-2 during a stretch of eight consecutive road games.With the Nets' second unit overmatched, the Nuggets pushed a 3-point lead at the end of the first quarter to 17 midway through the second as the rookie Evan Fournier led a 16-2 run. Fournier had a career-high 19 points, including 10 in the fourth.Even with Denver point guard Ty Lawson sidelined with a foot injury, the Nets could not keep up with the Nuggets' rapid ball movement. That resulted in easy shots inside for Denver, including a surplus of layups and dunks.Deron Williams led the Nets with 19 points, and Andray Blatche added 16 on 8-of-11 shooting. Reggie Evans continued his aggressive play with 15 points and 16 rebounds, but Joe Johnson (quad) missed his third straight game.
INDIANAPOLIS — Steven Izzo called it right. Two weeks ago, Steven, the 13-year-old son of Michigan State Coach Tom Izzo, sidestepped family loyalty and picked Duke to defeat the Spartans in his N.C.A.A. tournament bracket. The Blue Devils validated his nerve Friday night by sending the Izzos home.In a Midwest Region semifinal matching two of college basketball's most successful coaches — Izzo and Duke's Mike Krzyzewski — the second-seeded Blue Devils scored 9 consecutive points early in the second half to pull ahead and beat third-seeded Michigan State, 71-61, at Lucas Oil Stadium.Guard Seth Curry's 29 points and six 3-pointers lifted Duke (30-5), which will play top-seeded Louisville (32-5) on Sunday for a place in the Final Four. That game offers an equally enticing coaching showdown, between Krzyzewski, who has the most N.C.A.A. tournament victories among active coaches (82), and Rick Pitino, who ranks fourth with 45. The Cardinals ousted Oregon, 77-69, earlier Friday."Possessions were very difficult tonight for both teams," Krzyzewski said. "Seth was at a different level than anyone else on the court offensively. To get 29 points in a game like this against an outstanding team is just incredible."Whether coming open around screens or beating the celebrated Michigan State freshman Gary Harris one on one, Curry dominated. "There is no doubt he single-handedly beat us, when you look at the other guys," Izzo said of Curry.Michigan State (27-9) trailed by only a point at halftime, but Curry opened the second half with three 3-pointers in the first three minutes, the last starting the game-deciding run that put Duke ahead by 47-38."We didn't do too many things too different, honestly," Curry said. "I was just trying to set up my cuts a little better. Guys were screening a little better. Things of that nature. I made some tough shots as well."Forward Mason Plumlee (14 points) followed Curry's 3 with a two-handed reverse layup that he could not quite dunk. He then rolled across the lane for a left-handed hook shot, the mirror image of a right-handed hook he made in the first half. Curry finished off the run with a jump shot from the left wing."We didn't do a very good job guarding them," Izzo said. "I thought they exploited our freshmen a little bit."On the defensive end, the Blue Devils limited Harris, the Big Ten's freshman of the year, who grew up in the Indianapolis suburb Fishers, to 6 points."I think he just got frustrated," Izzo said of Harris, who was 2 of 11 from the field.And Harris was not the only Spartan who struggled from the field. Michigan State made only seven baskets in the second half while shooting 30.4 percent.Forwards Adreian Payne and Derrick Nix, two of Michigan State's top scorers, each shot 3 of 10, although Payne finished with 14 points and 10 rebounds."They challenged shots," Nix said. "We missed shots down low and outside."Michigan State never drew closer than 5 points after Duke pulled ahead.The Blue Devils stayed in front by sinking 13 of 14 foul shots in the final 5 minutes 19 seconds. Izzo grumbled about the 24-17 discrepancy in foul calls, saying, "The foul thing bothered me a little bit, to be honest about it."Krzyzewski has more consecutive tournament appearances than any coach whose team qualified this season, making 18 straight with Duke. Michigan State has made 16 straight under Izzo. (Rick Barnes made 17 consecutive appearances with Clemson and Texas starting in 1996, a streak that ended this month when the Longhorns failed to qualify.)Both Duke and Michigan State have played well historically in Indianapolis. Duke's 7-1 record here includes its 2010 national championship victory, with the current seniors Ryan Kelly and Plumlee playing reserve roles then and Curry sitting out as a transfer from Liberty. Friday's loss was only Michigan State's second in nine games here, the other being a 52-50 loss to Butler in the 2010 Final Four.When Izzo approached Krzyzewski on the sidelines before tipoff, Krzyzewski reached for both his hands, and they hugged. A brief conversation and a handshake later, their visit was over, and they headed toward their respective benches.Expect a similar scene on Sunday between Krzyzewski and Pitino, who have not coached against each other in the tournament since March 28, 1992. In that game, Christian Laettner's overtime buzzer-beater sent Duke past Kentucky, 104-103, in the Round of 8.In November, Krzyzewski faced Pitino for the first time since that game, with Duke beating Louisville, 76-71, at the Battle 4 Atlantis tournament."They're playing the best basketball in the country," Krzyzewski said. "They're a deep team. We can't turn the ball over against them."
INDIANAPOLIS — Oregon was the newcomer to the Midwest Region semifinals, joining three of college basketball's blue-blood programs — Louisville, Duke and Michigan State — and, in somewhat self-deprecating fashion, the Ducks brought their lone N.C.A.A. championship trophy on the team plane here.It is from 1939, a wobbly and partly broken relic of a bygone era when Ducks basketball was at the top of the national food chain. The trophy was positioned courtside near the Oregon bench as a good-luck charm. It might have inadvertently reminded them of the distance they still need to go.The Ducks' impressive tournament run ended Friday against top-seeded Louisville, 77-69, at Lucas Oil Stadium in the Round of 16.Russ Smith scored 31 points, tying a career high, despite battling the cold symptoms that have made the rounds through the Louisville locker room this week. He said he was "daydreaming" during the national anthem, when he was facing the Oregon bench instead of the flag. He sniffled at the podium during his postgame news conference."I wouldn't say I'm terribly sick," Smith said. "I was pretty sick."But on the court, he was a revelation, providing Louisville enough offensive firepower to withstand early foul trouble for its other primary scoring threat, Peyton Siva, and a surprisingly tame defensive performance that Coach Rick Pitino blamed partly on his team's illnesses.The Cardinals' locker room after the game was in a subdued celebratory mood — filled with sedentary players, muffled coughs and runny noses. Forward Chane Behanan talked about his intake of Mucinex. Kevin Ware, who scored 11 points off the bench, thanked his trainers for telling him to drink orange juice."I cleaned out the whole fridge," Ware said.Oregon, in the Round of 16 for the first time since 2007, had its opportunities, but after falling into a deep hole in the first half, the Ducks could not tighten up the score enough in the second.The Cardinals built a 24-8 lead in the opening minutes as Oregon missed 7 of its first 10 shots. The Ducks looked overmatched, but they eventually calmed down and trimmed the lead to 34-26, before Louisville pushed it back to 14 by halftime.Louisville's lead grew to 18 points midway through the second half, but Oregon kept pushing, revving up the pace and scoring a bulk of its points in transition. The freshman guard Damyean Dotson and forward Arsalan Kazemi found second-half rhythms, and soon the Louisville lead was back down to 70-64, the closest it had been since early in the first half.For a moment, and for one of the few times in the last two months, Louisville appeared to be staggering. In the huddle, Pitino sensed his team's energy lagging."I told these guys we don't have it tonight," Pitino said. "We've got to dig in and get stops, and we did at the end."Back-to-back baskets by Ware and Behanan fortified Louisville's lead and curtailed Oregon's attempt at a late comeback. Oregon scored only 5 points over the remaining five minutes."We dug ourselves a pretty big hole and weren't able to come back," Oregon Coach Dana Altman said. "Louisville is a very good basketball team and very talented."If anything has been undervalued about the Cardinals so far in their 13-game winning streak, it is their balance and depth, which was on display again Friday. Eight players played more than 14 minutes; seven players scored more than 4 points.Four minutes into the first half, Siva picked up a second foul, and Pitino sent him to the bench. He sat, and sat, and sat, not playing again until the second half, and the reason was the backup Ware's ability to pick up promptly where Siva was missing. Ware scored 9 points on 4-of-4 shooting in the first half, and Louisville hardly missed a beat."Kevin gave us a big lift," Pitino said. "Every time we needed a basket, he got it for us."Smith was somewhat similar to Ware a season ago, as a player off the bench who could inject offensive life for the Cardinals on their rise to the Final Four. This season, Smith has transcended that, becoming a player who Pitino said reminded him a bit of the former N.B.A. star Allen Iverson."Iverson was so good at the pro level because it's tough because you really have a 16-second shot clock, and now Allen always had the ball with five seconds to go and he had to create," Pitino said. "That's what Russ does."Smith was a dervish with the basketball Friday, hitting open shots, contorting his body for acrobatic layups. He tied a Louisville record with 12 free throws in an N.C.A.A. tournament game. "He can be guarded," Behanan said, "but it's hard."Behanan smiled, and added a line that Oregon's coaches might have been saying to themselves at the same moment. "Well, he looked the same to me," Behanan said. Illness? Fatigue? Nothing was going to slow down the player known as Russdiculous.
LOS ANGELES — Wichita State was watching highlights of Ohio State on Friday morning, when the whole team shared a big, hearty laugh.At first, the Buckeyes' Deshaun Thomas flashed across the screen, making shot after shot. They were tough, contested shots, and maybe ill advised. They were bad shots, Coach Gregg Marshall told his team. But they went in. The Shockers' job would be to contest harder, make those bad shots look worse. Maybe then, they would not go in.Marshall said he would not want any of his players taking shots like that. They all laughed.No. 9-seeded Wichita State was loose Friday, looser than one might expect, with No. 2 Ohio State looming in the West Region final to be played Saturday, with a Final Four berth on the line.The Shockers talked about being disrespected and underrated, having lost their top five scorers from last season. They talked about being the underdog, and rebounding, and defense and identity. They talked about this run to the Round of 8.At a news conference, Marshall was asked about the U.C.L.A. job. Feeling the good vibes, he said, "I'm very pleased to be the coach at Wichita State — content, happy, and you can't buy happy."When prodded, Marshall added, "It's probably one of the top six elite jobs in the country."Down the hall, in the recesses of Staples Center, Wichita State assistants huddled around a laptop in the locker room and scouted Ohio State. On the whiteboard, two messages were still there from the previous night, when the Shockers pounded La Salle, 72-58."Play Angry," the first one read, and it was underlined."Are U Satisfied?!?!" the second one read, and it was underlined twice."We're not going to forget where we came from, how we got here," the associate head coach Chris Jans said during a break in the scouting footage. "This program is built on rebounding, toughness, defense, and trying to get into a rhythm offensively, maybe ride a hot hand or two, depending how the game unfolds."Using that method, the Shockers disposed of No. 8 Pittsburgh. Panthers guard Tray Woodall shot 1 of 12 and broke down afterward, saying it was one of the worst games he had ever played. The Shockers were outrebounded by Gonzaga and Kelly Olynyk but defended well enough to eliminate the Bulldogs, the West's No. 1 seed. On Thursday, against La Salle, the Shockers did it all: they made shots, rebounded, defended and dominated.One statistic would be crucial against Ohio State, Jans said: offensive rebounding. At halftime of each game, members of the Shockers' staff track offensive rebounds. At Wichita State, Jans said, they consider it a sign of effort.Of course, Ohio State is no La Salle. So much of Friday's game planning was dedicated to stopping Thomas, rotating multiple defenders onto him, probably Cleanthony Early or Carl Hall, Wichita State's 6-foot-8 forwards. Neither seemed overly worried about the matchup.Early joked with reporters about how he might name his first child "Clea," and his second child, "Anthony." Hall talked about his new haircut, how he cut off his trademark dreadlocks just before the tournament started. He explained how he had had the dreads for five years but just wanted to change. He said his mother did not believe he would go through with it, so he sent her the hair clippings in the mail.Hall felt a few pounds lighter now, he joked.Against the Buckeyes, the Shockers' offense will probably start through Hall and Early, point guard Malcolm Armstead said, so they can get off to a "beastin' " start. Then, Armstead said, they can kick the ball out to him, for rhythm shots. Armstead has averaged 16 points, 4.6 rebounds and 4 assists in the tournament.On Saturday, he will have to solve the indomitable Aaron Craft."I just got to go out and do what I do, man," Armstead said. "Us sitting here, talking about it, is not going to give me 50 points, 60 points, or give us the win. He's a great defender; I respect him for what he does. He plays a great basketball game. He's leading a great team. It's just the matter of us going out here and performing."In another interview room, Early was asked about the Armstead-Craft matchup. He smiled and said, "I'm just as excited as you are to see it."Early also talked about staying composed, playing defense, playing hard, playing angry — as the whiteboard said. He was asked if Wichita State was confident."Of course — always," Early said, leaning back in his chair. "Always."
LOS ANGELES — The club, among the most exclusive in N.C.A.A. tournament history, includes stars and unknowns, guards and post players, from universities with tradition and without. From Christian Laettner to Bryce Drew, James Forrest to Scottie Reynolds, they are linked by clocks dwindled and buzzers beaten and heartbeats elevated.All made history with the shot that children dream about, the kind of shot that has come to define college basketball in March. All held the ball in the final seconds of a close tournament game and made the shot that won it.To that club, Ohio State added two new members over the past week. One was Aaron Craft; the other, LaQuinton Ross. In consecutive games, both connected on 3-pointers that pushed the Buckeyes into the next round; in each instance, only seconds, or fractions of a second, before the buzzer sounded.Among those who admired Ohio State's late heroics was the sportscaster Gus Johnson. He called what seemed like a million tournament games for CBS, many of them close, with his signature expressions, "Bam!" and "Pure!" and "Cold-Blooded!""I don't remember a team winning on back-to-back buzzer-beaters like that," Johnson said. "That was awesome. But that's the tournament. It's about moments. And those were two moments that will live forever in tournament lore."Like Florida's Mike Miller against Butler in 2000, or Connecticut's Richard Hamilton against Washington in 1998. Like U.C.L.A.'s Tyus Edney against Missouri in 1995 and Indiana's Keith Smart against Syracuse in 1987. All reinforced the art of the buzzer-beater, a shot notable both for all that went into it (backyard visualization in childhood, years of practice, hundreds of games) and the spontaneity involved (circumstances dictated by the time on clock, the defense, the opponent).The art of a buzzer-beater, then, must start with the definition of a buzzer-beater. Some would quibble that only shots taken just before or when the game clock reads 0:00 should count. Others, like Johnson, argue that any shot that would require a miraculous response — a half-court heave, for example — should also count. Ohio State's game-winners would fall into that latter category. Some count only shots that won, others shots that tied a game or forced overtime.Then there is the shot itself. Craft said Friday that Ohio State rarely reviewed such late-game situations in practice. In these games, the Buckeyes knew they wanted to force both defenses to make a decision whether they would double Craft or leave a single defender on him. Iowa State chose to guard Craft solo, so he shot. Two Arizona defenders followed him Thursday night (against their coach's instructions), so he passed.Where Craft described the process as instinctual — read the defender, decide — Gerry McNamara, an assistant coach at Syracuse who beat a few buzzers for the Orange in his day, said he worried most about his position for the shot. He wanted to create enough space to launch. He wanted, if he could, to find a spot that felt familiar."It's somewhat of a comfortable feeling knowing you're going to shoot," he said. "It's just getting yourself in position to get a decent look. You dream about stuff like that, and when you pull it off, it's such a rewarding feeling, because you're played it over in your mind in so many different ways, thousands of times."Forrest, who played at Georgia Tech, knows that feeling well. His moment came in the 1992 N.C.A.A. tournament, in the second round, against favored Southern California. In that season, had attempted only a few 3-pointers — and missed them all. He rarely practiced shooting from long-range, either.Georgia Tech struggled to inbound the ball before it finally came to Forrest, who launched perhaps the smoothest 3-pointer he had ever taken. It went in. Broadcasters immediately dubbed that shot "The Miracle in Milwaukee," and Forrest had joined the club.People ask Forrest every March about his shot, but especially after contests that featured other late game-winners. Like Ohio State's recent victories. Or when Marquette toppled Davidson earlier in this tournament."Twenty years later, and we're still talking about the miracle," Forrest said Friday in a telephone interview. "I've been approached at gas stations. One time a homeless man said to me, 'You're Forrest, the U.S.C. buzzer-beater guy.' "That same year, Laettner connected on his last-second attempt against Kentucky in the tournament. The one that followed a pass that sailed nearly the length of the court."You can't prepare for that," Forrest said. "They already have the perfect name for it. March Madness. But I'll tell you what: 1992 was the year for buzzer-beaters."For  broadcasters, such moments can also prove definitive. Ask Johnson. He built a cult following out of so many late-game calls. One in particular stuck with him: a game-winner from Washington's Isaiah Thomas against Arizona in the 2011 conference tournament.Such moments, Johnson said, "are so dramatic and syrupy and dripping with passion and drama." The keys, he added, were patience and an inner calm, same as for the players."You want to call what you see and not get ahead of yourself and try to make it about you," Johnson said. "That's the biggest moment for a sportscaster, a moment like that, but you can't think about it that way. You call what you see. I try to associate myself with the moment and energy the stadium has in it for that particular situation."All week, Ross occupied Kobe Bryant's locker at Staples Center. The day before his moment, Ross had challenged Reggie Miller to a 3-point contest.Against Arizona, he set up on the left wing, watched Craft dribble down the clock, saw Craft drive, then kick the ball wide in his direction. He had the kind of space McNamara always wanted, the kind of nerves that Forrest always showed. The ball went in. There it was, the art of the buzzer-beater, so much preparation and yet so spontaneous, once again."This is what every player grows up looking at on TV," Ross said.Welcome to the club, kid.
WASHINGTON — Gerry McNamara still participates in an occasional practice at Syracuse. Not far removed from his playing career, McNamara is the youngest assistant on Coach Jim Boeheim's staff, so the onus often falls on him to get out there and compete.McNamara enjoys himself for the most part. There are exceptions. For example, he does not particularly relish being guarded by Michael Carter-Williams, a 6-foot-6 guard with the wingspan of a pterodactyl. So after Carter-Williams dismantled Indiana's backcourt on Thursday in the Round of 16, McNamara could empathize."I know what it feels like trying to beat him off the dribble," he said. "I know what it feels like trying to get a shot off against him."In igniting Syracuse's run to the region final, Carter-Williams has showcased more than defense. He might own one of the more comprehensive toolboxes in college basketball: defending, scoring, rebounding, passing."Not a lot of players can impact the game in every aspect," McNamara said. "And he can."Ahead of Saturday's East Region final against Marquette, Carter-Williams ranked third in the country in assists (7.5 a game) and fifth in steals (2.74). He scored a game-high 24 points as fourth-seeded Syracuse (29-9) eliminated No. 1 seeded Indiana with startling proficiency.Carter-Williams has managed to deliver his finest work of the season in the wake of personal adversity. Last week, his family's home in Hamilton, Mass., was destroyed in a fire. Carter-Williams said he lost nearly everything, but he was able to recover a handful of items, including the ring he received as a McDonald's all-American in 2011. It has not been easy, he said. He tries to compartmentalize his emotions."When it comes time for basketball," he said, "everything else is kind of irrelevant."His two seasons at Syracuse have been anything but bland. As a freshman, he played sparingly behind Brandon Triche, Scoop Jardine and Dion Waiters, who was the fourth pick in last year's N.B.A. draft. In hindsight, Carter-Williams said, the experience probably helped him. He added 12 pounds. He watched and learned. He stifled his frustration. "As a competitor, I wanted to be out there playing," he said.He has gotten that opportunity this season, though he has not been immune to growing pains. His perimeter shooting has been an adventure; he has shot 29.3 percent from 3-point range. Errant passes, too, have been an issue. He had eight turnovers against Louisville in January. But if some of his plays are high risk (no-look lobs to teammates), then they also are high reward."He understands the game, he sees the game, and he's got a great feel for the game," Boeheim said.As a high school player at St. Andrew's School in Barrington, R.I., Carter-Williams was a potent scorer, finishing with 2,260 points. He split time at both guard positions, but his coach, Michael Hart, said he projected Carter-Williams as a point guard in college, figuring that Carter-Williams's unusual combination of savvy, skill and size had the potential to make him unguardable: too big for small guards, too quick for big forwards."A lot of people see this skinny kid with the baby face," Hart said in a telephone interview. "It's deceptive."Carter-Williams has a knack for the game's subtleties — passing angles, defensive positioning — that he credits to growing up in a basketball family. His mother, Mandy Zegarowski, coaches high school basketball in Massachusetts. His stepfather, Zach Zegarowski, was an assistant coach at Charlestown High School, a powerhouse program just north of downtown Boston. His father, Earl Williams, played college basketball. Carter-Williams said he got regular assessments of his play from all three. "Pretty much after every game," he said.His recent play has further piqued the interest of N.B.A. scouts. While leaving college early for the draft seems like an increasingly viable option, Carter-Williams said he had not decided his future. He cited more pressing business.In anticipation of Saturday's game, Carter-Williams used the word "toughness" three, four, five times. On Feb. 25, Marquette defeated Syracuse, 74-71, in their only meeting of the season."Things couldn't have gone much worse for us," he said, adding, "We've learned from those mistakes."
LOS ANGELES — When Aaron Craft caught the ball on the right wing, with Ohio State behind by 6 and less than a minute remaining, the crowd was tense, the game's outcome was uncertain, and the first half seemed so far away.The Buckeyes had shot so poorly then: they had trailed by 13 points at halftime and by 20 with just over 11 minutes remaining. But now, as Craft caught the ball, they had new legs, new life.Immediately, he rose, flicked his wrist and fired. Clank. It was not loud enough to be heard over the crowd, but that discomfort — of seeing a clean shot hit the rim — set in again.Second-seeded Ohio State missed all kinds of shots against No. 9 seed Wichita State in Saturday's West Region final. Easy shots. Open shots. Tough shots. Bad shots. But they started to make enough of them, too, to make it interesting, until Craft missed that shot with 54 seconds left. Soon, time ran out on Ohio State's comeback. Wichita State won, 70-66, and advanced to the Final Four.Afterward, Ohio State Coach Thad Matta, sitting in the locker room surrounded by reporters, did not seem angry or upset. His team had trailed — big — and then made a run. He blamed the first half, when his team shot 24.2 percent and fell behind, 35-22. But he said he could live with the shots."Those are shots that you have to make, that we've been making in this tournament, that we've been making in the Big Ten," Matta said. "Guys had good looks. Unfortunately, they didn't go down."Answering questions in the center of the room was Ohio State's go-to scorer, Deshaun Thomas, who may have never taken a shot he did not like. Before Saturday's game, Wichita State Coach Gregg Marshall had said, as a compliment, that Thomas was "a bad shot-taker and a bad shot-maker."Thomas had embraced the idea, even joked about it. He said he first noticed when he was in the third grade that he had a knack for scoring. By high school, he said, he had a perpetual green light, meaning he "took every shot — took every bad shot."At Ohio State, he said, Matta always told him: "Take good shots. We need good ones."On Saturday, Thomas missed the first five shots he took. He missed nine shots in the first half.But in the second half, as Ohio State whittled a 20-point deficit to 3, Thomas was rejuvenated, shooting 4 of 7 and scoring 14 points. He finished with 23 points, and an average of 22.3 points for the tournament. He said he thought that he had played well. So he was pleased.Asked about Wichita State's defense, Thomas said: "They were bumping and grinding. They just played sound defense, got in the gaps and rotated real well."In a corner of the room, Shannon Scott, who was 2 of 7 from the field, sat with a towel over his head. Next to him, Lenzelle Smith Jr., who was 2 of 6, told reporters, "Our first half was probably the worst I've seen us play in a very long time."Evan Ravenel stared at his phone and texted his family. Amir Williams hung his head and ate pizza.Ravenel had taken one shot and missed it. Williams had not shot at all. He lauded Thomas, rationalized the shots Thomas took. Some went in and out. A couple were blocked. Maybe that affected Thomas's shot selection, Williams said.Craft, who shot 2 of 12, told a reporter that he would probably be back in the gym the next day."They were laying off me, daring me to shoot," Craft said. "I couldn't make them pay today."At his locker, LaQuinton Ross shook his head. He could not forget the defensive rebound he had failed to corral with the Buckeyes trailing by by 4 points with 1:36 remaining. After that, Wichita State ran down the clock and scored to go ahead by 6. Then Craft misfired."I went up for the ball, thought I had it in my hands; guy came over the top, hit it out, ended up getting a rebound," said Ross, who missed eight shots. He sighed. "Tough play, man."That is what Ross would remember, he said — that rebound, the ending. Not all the missed shots.
SALT LAKE CITY — Randy Foye made five 3-pointers in the third quarter Saturday as the Utah Jazz went on a 22-11 run to take control of a close game and defeat the Nets , 116-107, at Energy Solutions Arena."You don't like to make excuses," said Deron Williams, playing his second game in Utah as a visitor. "They play really well in this building. That's the main thing and Foye went nuts."The loss dropped the Nets four games behind the Atlantic Division-leading Knicks, with nine games left on the Nets' schedule."We're concerned with us," Williams said. "We've been losing; we've lost the last two, so we can't worry about them winning."Foye, who finished with 26 points on 9-for-11 shooting, added a knockout blow with another 3-pointer to put the Jazz ahead, 88-76, early in the fourth quarter. His eight 3-pointers tied a Jazz record."A couple of them, we let him loose in transition and once he started feeling it, he was pulling from three-four feet behind the line," Williams said.The Jazz, fighting for the Western Conference's final playoff spot, shot 55.6 percent from the field. They moved the ball so well that Paul Millsap, a power forward, set a career high for assists with more than 19 minutes left in the game.Williams, who played with the Jazz from 2005 to 2011, received a mixed reaction from the crowd, which included his former coach Jerry Sloan. Fans clapped when he was introduced and booed loudly whenever he touched the ball early on. They roared when Gordon Hayward blocked him at the rim late in the second quarter.But Williams also received warm embraces from team employees and hugs from an usher and the Jazz mascot shortly before tipoff. A fan held a sign that read, "D-Will U Stud.""It wasn't as bad as last year, so that was good," Williams said of the crowd.He added: "It's good; no animosity. I had a great time in Utah."C. J. Watson (22 points on 8-of-13 shooting) did all he could to revive the Nets at times, but it was not enough.Brook Lopez led the Nets with 27 points and Reggie Evans grabbed 16 rebounds, but neither player was well suited to guard Al Jefferson (20 points and 7 rebounds), who was able to score inside and out.Derrick Favors, the centerpiece of the Williams trade, scored 13 points and grabbed 9 rebounds in 23 minutes off the bench.Joe Johnson (right quad contusion) missed his fourth game in a row, and for the second night in a row at a high altitude, the Nets missed his ability to slow the game down and score in key moments.Speaking about Johnson's injury, P. J. Carlesimo said: "The longer we go without Joe, the more you appreciate it. We're putting guys in unfair situations."Carlesimo also noted that Gerald Wallace and Lopez were hurting and that health was a priority as the Nets prepared to head home for a few days.Little defense was played early in the first quarter as the teams combined to hit 20 of the first 25 field-goal attempts.Williams came out focused and played well, with the exception of two first-half turnovers that did not end up directly hurting the Nets.The Jazz took a 33-28 lead into the second quarter, but the bench, led by Watson and Andray Blatche, hit its first seven field goals to help the Nets claw back and tie the game at 45-45 by the time Williams, Evans and Lopez checked back in. Watson's baskets were timely, and Blatche was a force on both ends of the court, blocking shots and finding open teammates.The Nets will now head home for a few days before leaving for Cleveland to face the Cavaliers on Wednesday, concluding a stretch of eight straight road games, tying a franchise record. At 4-3 heading home, the overall success of the journey may be judged on its final leg."Even though we go back, we still got a game left on this trip," Carlesimo said. "It's eight in a row."Enes Kanter, whom the Jazz selected with the draft pick sent by the Nets in the Deron Williams trade, did not play. Mehmet Okur, who played with the Nets last season, was honored at midcourt during a third-quarter timeout.
LOS ANGELES — Gregg Marshall sat atop a stage, squinted at the bright lights that reflected off his glasses and tried to make sense of all that had occurred the past two weeks. He needed a few more hours, both to process and to explain.Let's see. The N.F.L. quarterback Tim Tebow addressed Marshall's Wichita State Shockers on their team plane. His forward, Carl Hall, cut off his dreadlocks and mailed them home to his mother. His glasses, the ones with the bright yellow frames, were analyzed on social media.At the end of all that, his team, the one that lost its top five scorers from last season, the one with a mascot called WuShock, dispatched Ohio State in a 70-66 thriller on Saturday at Staples Center to advance to the Final Four. There stood the Shockers (30-8) atop a ladder late Saturday, scissors in hand, snipping at the nets.Back on stage, Marshall took one final question, "West Regional Champion" spelled out on the banner behind him. He was asked, as he is often asked, whether he considered this a lucky N.C.A.A. tournament run, a confluence of favorable factors, whether he considered Wichita State a Cinderella."If you get to this point, you can win the whole thing," Marshall said. "I think Cinderella just found one glass slipper. I don't think she found four."In two weeks, Wichita State managed to introduce its basketball team to the casual sports fan, advance to the N.C.A.A. tournament national semifinals for the first time since 1965 and somehow redefine its nickname. From upset to upset to upset, the Shockers became less about wheat and more about, well, shock.Perhaps it should have been less shocking.On Saturday, the Shockers faced another team favored to end their season. There was Ohio State, the second seed in the West Region, the Big Ten bully, its roster stocked with prized recruits, its athletics' budget among the country's largest.In comparison, Wichita State was smaller. It did play in a less prominent conference. But the term midmajor also provided an inaccurate description. The Shockers flew to away games on private planes, same as the major schools. Marshall's salary reportedly went over $1 million.Marshall knew his team could rebound, knew it could play defense. Beyond that, he told the Shockers to play angry, which became their mantra, which meant tough and physical, football without pads. Then his team began to shoot well, or better, which made the Shockers dangerous, served three ways.They did not, it should be noted, luck into a national semifinal into Atlanta. They battered four opponents, beat each soundly, beat two by double digits. Along the way, three higher seeds fell: first Pittsburgh (No. 8), then Gonzaga (No. 1), then the Buckeyes."I understand they're shooting off fireworks back in Wichita," Marshall said.After upsets became the new normal, of course the West Region of the N.C.A.A. tournament ended this way, with the No. 9 seed left standing. A team with a nickname sure to inspire puns from coast to coast until the Final Four tips off.Ohio State had taken the improbable route to this point, behind back-to-back buzzer-beaters, a pair of shots hoisted in the final seconds to snatch consecutive victories over Iowa State and Arizona. Aaron Craft made the first and assisted on the second, and the Internet nearly exploded. Someone even said Chuck Norris planned to shave his head to look more like Craft, after Craft battered him in a fistfight.So there was that.Wichita State entered this game with its usual underdog status and a more impressive tournament résumé. The Shockers won their first three tournament games by a combined 38 points.Fans filed into the Staples Center early, the majority clad in red. Supporters of the Shockers filled the section behind the team bench, a spot of yellow in a sea of red, and the assembled refused to sit until the halftime buzzer sounded.Wichita State made its run over the final 11 minutes of the first half. The score was 19-15, advantage Shockers, when guard Tekele Cotton made a 3-pointer. Guard Demetric Williams followed with another 3 from almost the same spot. As Ohio State called a timeout, Williams danced back to the sideline, full of swagger, as WuShock implored the crowd to stand.They were already standing.Ohio State (29-8) trailed by 20 points with 12 minutes 39 seconds left. As the second half continued, that 20-point lead dwindled.Deshaun Thomas, so cold in the first half he nearly froze solid, called for the ball, fought into double teams, scored and rebounded as if possessed. At the end of a 28-11 run, Ohio State trailed, 62-59.Here was the same Wichita State team that lost at home against Evansville in late February, that lost twice to Creighton in early March. Another Buckeyes comeback seemed inevitable.In the stands, a fan waved a sign that read "100 percent Cotton." Indeed. Indicative of a team that lacks a true superstar but makes up for it with balance, Cotton, quiet for much of Saturday, made a series of key plays down the stretch. This included the 3-pointer that made it 65-59 and an offensive rebound that extended the next possession."We just did what we've been doing all year," guard Fred VanVleet said.Afterward, Ohio State could only lament its missed shots, 42 of them, to be exact. The Shockers had wanted to stop Craft from driving, to force the Buckeyes outside. That game plan worked well. Ohio State took 25 3-point attempts. It made five.Asked for his assessment of why the Buckeyes lost, Coach Thad Matta clenched his teeth and started back at his questioner."Were you in there?" Matta said, then added, referring to the team's field goal percentage: "Thirty-one percent."When the final horn sounded, the Shockers' fans were standing, clad in yellow, as they waved their signs. Coaches fist-bumped other coaches. WuShock signed autographs and posed for photographs. Forward Cleanthony Early made a beeline for Marshall, nearly knocked him over, nearly knocked off those yellow glasses.Early screamed, "Here we go, baby!" Next stop: Atlanta for the national semifinals.
It can happen in Durham, N.C., where members of the 1992 national championship team, like Christian Laettner and Grant Hill, come around campus in the summer. Mason Plumlee loves hitting them up for stories about March 28, 1992, the East Region final, when Laettner hit perhaps the most memorable winning shot in college basketball history, guaranteeing that the Kentucky fans who already hated him would never forgive him.But that, Plumlee said, was not what most of them wanted to talk about. "They talk more about the celebration," said Plumlee, a senior, blushing at details he declined to reveal. "We can't celebrate like that now. Everybody's got a camera on their phone."Or a lesson can happen a third of the way across the country. On Saturday, five Duke players sat attentively on a dais at Lucas Oil Stadium as Blue Devils Coach Mike Krzyzewski answered questions about that game.Krzyzewski professed his friendship and admiration for Rick Pitino, then Kentucky's coach, who always speaks about the loss with dignity and grace. Pitino now coaches Louisville (32-5), which faces Duke (30-5) on Sunday in the Midwest Region final. It will be first meeting between Krzyzewski and Pitino in the N.C.A.A. tournament since the day in Philadelphia that links them forever, like baseball's Bobby Thomson and Ralph Branca, who also became friends after their fates intertwined."I think when the basketball gods deem you worthy enough to put you in a great moment, sometimes you're placed in that moment as a winner, and sometimes you're placed in that moment as a loser," Krzyzewski said. "But sometimes, the loser shines more than the winner. I thought how he reacted, and has reacted since, made him shine."None of the current players for Duke and Louisville know any of this firsthand. Five Blue Devils and nine Cardinals were alive when Laettner caught Grant Hill's lengthy pass around the foul circle, dribbled once, turned and hit the fallaway jumper to win it in overtime, 104-103. But they were babies and toddlers, too young to remember."I wasn't even thought of when that game was going on," Louisville's Chane Behanan said. (That's not exactly true; Behanan was born six months later.) "But I have seen the same highlight over and over on ESPN since this morning," he said.They all know, and they all want to know more. When Duke and Louisville played earlier this year at the Battle 4 Atlantis in the Bahamas, a 76-71 Duke victory, Plumlee and his teammates watched Krzyzewski and Pitino catch up during a dinner among all the teams."Coach K and Coach Pitino spent a lot of time talking together, and everybody was like, I wish we could be in that conversation," Plumlee said.On Saturday, Pitino spoke at length about the game and Krzyzewski, calling him a modern-day John Wooden as a teacher and a competitor. The comparison will gain some historical merit if Duke wins. Krzyzewski, who has the most victories by a Division I men's college basketball coach, can tie Wooden's mark of 12 Final Fours should Duke advance.Pitino said he watched tape of the 1992 game five times. The first came 24 hours afterward, when Pitino realized how well his players had performed and how spectacular a performance it had taken to beat them. Pitino compared it to watching a masterly singer command the stage at Carnegie Hall.Each team shot better than 50 percent from the field. Laettner made every attempt he took, 10 from the field and 10 from the foul line, for 31 points."Both of us look at that game a lot different than the Kentucky fans, or the Duke fans, for that matter," Pitino said of himself and Krzyzewski. "Both of us sat back and coached and watched an incredible offensive display."I've always had Kentucky fans say it's one of the worst losses. To me, it's one of the best losses I've ever had. A bad loss is something where your guys play terrible, or you don't play. It was a great loss because my guys played almost a perfect game. It just had the wrong ending for us."Pitino second-guesses only one thing: telling John Pelphrey and Deron Feldhaus, who were covering Laettner at the end, not to foul him. "I should have said, 'Whatever you do, bat the ball down; I don't care what the contact is, but go for the basketball,' " he said. "And you saw my guys freeze a little bit."The coaching matchup alone makes Sunday's game one of the most intriguing of the tournament. Krzyzewski discounts Duke's win in November because Gorgui Dieng, Louisville's 6-foot-11 center and the second-leading rebounder in the Big East, sat out with a broken left wrist. "The fact that we won I don't think is significant," Krzyzewski said. "The fact that we have some familiarity with them helps."Whatever happens this time, Krzyzewski and Pitino will always share that memorable game at the Spectrum."It's one of those moments in time that helped define our sport," Krzyzewski said. "When I've talked to Rick about it, we realize we were the lucky guys. We had different roles at the time, but we were lucky to be there."
ARLINGTON, Tex. — The tattoos are the essence of Florida guard Mike Rosario, his testimonials. They cover his body, and he is not even sure how many there are — more than 60, he guesses. Rosario is the canvas for his story.There is an ink drawing on his left biceps of a boy cradling a basketball with a building in the background. The boy is Rosario in the shadow of the Duncan housing projects, where he grew up in Jersey City. There is a tattoo just below his right thumb of a gun to show Rosario as a sharpshooter — not on a street corner, but on a basketball court."Every tattoo is a story about me," Rosario said of his upbringing, adding that the art is about "my past, my present." Of the building tattoo, he said it reminded him "of all the ups and downs I have been through growing up." He said: "I seen a lot of things, a lot of violence. I won't forget where I've come from."If the tattoos are a reminder of where he has come from, then the next drawing should depict Rosario nose to nose with Florida Coach Billy Donovan. He has been an irritant to Donovan, a player who said he wanted discipline when he arrived at Florida as a transfer from Rutgers, but one who rebelled against Donovan's stern approach to defense and sharing the ball. Rosario, a high school all-American, averaged 6.6 points as a junior at Florida and looked like a flop.Donovan never thought Rosario, now a senior, would be as significant to the program as he has been in helping the third-seeded Gators (29-7) reach Sunday's South Region final against No. 4 seed Michigan. Rosario is tied for the team lead in points (12.6 game) and can erupt in a big game, which he did against Minnesota earlier in the tournament when he scored 25 points."There are certain things here at Florida, a way we're going to do things and an expectation here, and I think he really struggled with that in particular last year," Donovan said. "He was going to go in there and just rely on his talent, so to speak, and just go play. And it was a real growing and maturing process."And I would tell you this: last year I didn't even think him playing as many minutes in our program at this stage of the season would have even been possible."Rosario, the senior guard Kenny Boynton and the junior guard Scottie Wilbekin will be matched up against the Wolverines' terrific perimeter group of Trey Burke, Tim Hardaway Jr., Glenn Robinson III and Nik Stauskas. Michigan (29-7) can score and score.Florida's style is to use fierce defense so that no spot on the floor is safe. It is a different environment from what Rosario was accustomed to when he began his college career in 2008. He was the first McDonald's all-American to sign with Rutgers, and his goal was to lift the program to national prominence. He averaged 16.2 points as a freshman and 16.7 as a sophomore, but Rutgers stayed in a rut."He was drained by it," his mother, Joanne Rosario, said. "He wanted to win more than get them points. As a mother you see these things, and Michael was frustrated."So Rosario hunted for a new university and picked the Gators. He said he wanted the demanding Donovan to make him conform as a player. Did he really mean it? It did not look like it last season, when Rosario played halfhearted defense or tried to use his playing time as a personal showcase. Donovan took none of the nonsense, and Rosario, once an offensive star, was a reserve all season.Rosario, whose high school coach, Bob Hurley at St. Anthony, demanded obedience as much as Donovan, always thought it was a two-way street between coach and player. It was not."In some situations, I would try and stress my opinion, and he would say, 'No, Mike, this is how it is,' " Rosario said. "That's when we bumped heads."He added: "If I felt like something was wrong on this play, I don't want to hold in what I have to say, so I might be right, or I might be wrong. Me being the experienced player, I try and squeeze a word in here or there. I never forget he is the head coach."Rosario has a modest scoring average on a team that, while it features four scorers averaging double figures, is known more for its defense. He is a 44 percent field-goal shooter and an 84 percent free-throw shooter, but there is nothing Rosario would rather do more than win.Rosario always likes to say that he has a different role here.He can still manage to call his own shots once in a while. The Gators led upstart Florida Gulf Coast, 54-45, with two minutes to play Friday night when Florida Gulf Coast's Christophe Varidel turned his back on Rosario, who was inbounding the ball. Rosario bounced the ball off Varidel's back, grabbed the ball and raced in for a dunk."I felt like I was going to get in trouble for it, but I did it," Rosario said.
ARLINGTON, Tex. — His teammates have talked about framing a picture of the shot as a keepsake. For Michigan fans, it has already ascended into Wolverines lore, a thunderbolt fired from between the 3-point line and midcourt, one Trey Burke had always visualized growing up in Columbus, Ohio."Yeah, but it wasn't ever from that deep, though," Burke said Saturday as the drama settled from Michigan's 87-85 overtime victory Friday over Kansas.The No. 4 seed Wolverines face third-seeded Florida in the South Regional final Sunday, and should Michigan advance to the Final Four, Burke understands his 30-footer with four seconds left in regulation will be further immortalized.Yet even as he spoke, it was clear Burke viewed his game-saving shot through the prism of a first half mired in adversity. A sophomore, he is considered a strong candidate for national player of the year honors, but he was incapable of making a basket against the Jayhawks.Burke had missed all four of his field-goal attempts. Three of those were 3-point tries that did not come close. With his shooting stroke awry, Burke concentrated on playmaking, distributing five assists. But he also committed three turnovers.A year ago, such a zero-sum game would have caused Burke to sulk. But his growth and maturity were the embodiment of how he and these underclassmen-laden Wolverines rallied in the second half, erasing a 14-point deficit in the final seven minutes of regulation."I never got down on myself," Burke said. "I tried to stay confident. They kept encouraging me. I knew if I came out the second half moping and down on myself, then it was going to go south fast. I know that the more I stay positive, try to do what it takes for the team to win, the more successful we'll be."Burke's audacious 3-pointer tied the game at 76-76, forcing overtime, when he added 5 more points. He hit 9 of 17 shots after halftime and finished with 23 points and 10 assists — and the unflinching faith of his teammates."Trey wasn't struggling at all to me," Tim Hardaway Jr. said. "He was doing what a point guard is supposed to do, and that's get his teammates involved. In the second half, he just took over."Burke modestly pointed to Glenn Robinson III's reverse layup off a rebound with 28 seconds remaining as "the biggest play of the game that people aren't talking about.""It wasn't just a shot that went in for me," Burke said. "We all did things out there together."Burke leads a band of starters that includes three freshmen — Robinson, Mitch McGary and Nik Stauskas — and the junior Hardaway. They play beyond their years and have responded to Burke's emerging as more of a vocal leader at the prodding of coaches."I had no idea that his development would go this fast until we started working with him a few times and saw the passion of his workouts, the leadership he showed," Michigan Coach John Beilein said.Florida Coach Billy Donovan compared Burke's skills to those of Kyrie Irving of the Cleveland Cavaliers."You can do a great job on him for 10 minutes, a great job on him for 25 minutes," Donovan said. "He has got the ability just to explode at any point in time. It's got to be a concerted effort against him for 40 minutes."Burke was not highly recruited at Northland High School in Columbus, where he was a teammate of Jared Sullinger, a rookie forward with the Boston Celtics taken as the 21st pick in last year's draft.Burke was not recruited by Ohio State because the Buckeyes had already signed a highly regarded guard, Aaron Craft, who is responsible for a few memorable moments of his own in this tournament.Burke first committed to play at Penn State but changed his mind, and the Wolverines swooped in. Burke then seized his opportunity and control of Michigan's backcourt as a freshman when Darius Morris decided to leave early for the N.B.A."I just saw a leader from Day 1, a guy that was a real winner," Beilein said.One who could add to Michigan's highlight show and lead the Wolverines to the Final Four."A lot of people doubted it, a lot of people thought we were too young, not tough enough," Burke said."But I think we've proved we have what it takes to be a young team and go far in this tournament. You saw what Kentucky did last year. We felt that being young isn't an excuse for not going far in the tournament."
WASHINGTON — On the same court where he and his teammates had been obliterated in a regular-season loss three weeks ago, Syracuse's Brandon Triche found himself staring at the scoreboard high above Verizon Center on Saturday afternoon. About 11 minutes remained in Syracuse's East Region final against Marquette, but Triche kept looking at the clock, wishing hard that the minutes would tick away.Triche said he felt no sense of relief until only seconds were left, and he heard Marquette Coach Buzz Williams yelling for his players not to foul. Triche said he knew then that Syracuse's 55-39 victory was in hand, its trip to the Final Four secure, so thoroughly had the Orange smothered the Golden Eagles with a zone defense that has become one of the most compelling story lines of the N.C.A.A. tournament."Our defense has been tremendous," Syracuse Coach Jim Boeheim said, "and our offense has just been enough."Nobody has been able to score against fourth-seeded Syracuse (30-9), at least not much. On a white cinder-block wall in Syracuse's locker room here, a staff member had affixed a poster that featured the logos of the team's four tournament opponents: Montana, California, Indiana and Marquette. All four had thick black X's through them, the ink covering Marquette's logo still wet in the minutes immediately after Saturday's victory. Spots for two more opponents remained."We're still hungry," said Michael Carter-Williams, a sophomore point guard who was named the region's outstanding player after finishing with 12 points, 8 rebounds and 6 assists. "We're sticking together. We're not breaking down."Third-seeded Marquette (26-9), which defeated Syracuse in the teams' only regular-season meeting, had more turnovers (14) than field goals (12). The Golden Eagles shot 22.6 percent from the field. Their 39 points were a record low for a regional final since the shot clock was introduced in 1986. They were 3 of 24 from 3-point range. For much of the game, it looked as if they were shooting the basketball while wearing oven mitts."They beat us from start to finish," Buzz Williams said. "We tried everything we knew how to try."James Southerland had 16 points to lead the Orange, who earned a berth in their fifth Final Four, the program's first since Carmelo Anthony's 2003 title team. Syracuse will face the winner of Sunday's South Region final between Florida and Michigan on Saturday in Atlanta.Marquette's struggles were more than vaguely reminiscent of those experienced by Indiana in Thursday's Round of 16. Like Marquette, Indiana looked utterly baffled by Syracuse's zone, going 3 of 15 from 3-point range. Through four games in the tournament, Syracuse has limited its opponents to 28.9 percent shooting over all."Our zone is good when you have the right players for it," Triche said. "Once you buy into it, we know we can stop anybody."It felt like a home game for Syracuse, with the crowd heavily flecked with orange, all those fans turning Verizon Center into Carrier Dome South. President Obama was in attendance, too. "I hope he had a good time watching," Carter-Williams said.Syracuse, which will be part of the new-look Atlantic Coast Conference next season, had its share of Big East Conference battles in this building against Georgetown, the most recent of which was a 61-39 loss on March 9. The assistant coach Mike Hopkins recalled how miserable the Orange felt after that debacle — everyone from the first-year assistant Gerry McNamara to the players. It was Syracuse's fourth loss in five games."I wanted to hide under a rock," Hopkins said. "I'm sure Gerry wanted to go to Scranton for the night, just to have his mom rub his back. What can you do?"Yet Boeheim said he always believed in the team's potential, and he reinforced that message with the players. He said he was encouraged by the way they reacted, showing up for their first practice after that Georgetown loss before the coaches arrived. When Boeheim got to the court, he discovered that practice had started without him. The team was already playing a game of 4-on-4."And playing hard," Boeheim said. "I watched them for a few minutes, and it was a really good thing."On Saturday, in the face of Syracuse's relentless pressure, Marquette appeared at a total loss, which was not often the case this season. In his fifth season at Marquette, Williams has emerged as one of college basketball's most exuberant personalities, running preseason boot camps and making relentless pleas for energy, for loose balls, for floor burns. Williams is also a stickler for preparation. By Friday afternoon — less than 24 hours after his team had dispatched Miami in the regional semifinals — he had watched video of Syracuse's last six games.It did little good. The lone bright spot for Marquette was the play of Davante Gardner, a 6-foot-8, 290-pound junior whose body evokes the general dimensions of an industrial-size meat locker. He scored 6 points in a 10-2 run in the first half, and finished with 14, but that was pretty much all the offensive pyrotechnics the Golden Eagles could muster.Early in the second half, Triche got loose for a fast-break layup, giving the Orange a 28-21 lead. By the time Syracuse's C. J. Fair tipped in a missed layup, Syracuse was up by 15 and Triche was staring at the clock."We showed that defense wins," he said.
Eleven days ago, New Mexico announced a 10-year contract extension for Coach Steve Alford , who agreed to coach the Lobos until 2023. But on Saturday, U.C.L.A. announced that Alford would be its next coach, the latest man charged with returning the Bruins to glory.After his seven-year, $18.2 million deal with U.C.L.A. was announced, Alford said in a teleconference that he loved New Mexico, the university and his team. He said he loved Albuquerque, and that his family did, too."I thought this was long term," he said, but that he was leaving because his new job was a chance to coach "the premier basketball program in the country.""It goes back to the four letters: it's U.C.L.A," he said.Even if, it seems, that what he is inheriting is no longer the U.C.L.A. of John Wooden and his 10 national titles.Coach Ben Howland was fired last week after 10 seasons. He took the Bruins to three straight N.C.A.A. Final Fours through 2008 but failed to make the tournament's Round of 16 in five seasons since. This season, U.C.L.A. (25-10) lost its opening game by 20 points.Coaches were not fighting one another for Howland's job. Virginia Commonwealth's Shaka Smart and Butler's Brad Stevens were said to prefer their current positions. They have found success, especially in the tournament. Alford has not.In six seasons, Alford coached New Mexico to three N.C.A.A. tournament appearances — as a No. 3 seed in 2010, a No. 5 in 2012, and a No. 3 this season — but never reached the Round of 16. And yet U.C.L.A.'s athletic director, Dan Guerrero, said he believed Alford could deliver "sustained success."Guerrero was vague in defining success. He did not demand championships or Round of 16 berths or conference titles. He praised Alford, 48, as a competitor, a teacher and a builder of programs.He said Alford, most important, was "an individual who wanted to accept the challenge of being the head coach at U.C.L.A."Asked if he could handle the pressure, Alford pointed to his decorated high school career, his participation in the 1984 Summer Olympics for the United States, his four seasons at Indiana under Bob Knight and his 22 years as a college coach."So nobody understands pressure any more than I do," he said.Guerrero said: "He's not the kind of guy that will shy away from what U.C.L.A. basketball is all about. He'll handle the expectations with dignity, with understanding and with class."Alford started his coaching career in 1991 at Manchester College, a Division III program in Indiana. He made stops at Southwest Missouri State (now Missouri State), Iowa and then New Mexico, where he went 155-52 but lost to Harvard in the opening round this season.At U.C.L.A., Alford's "first order of business," Guerrero said, would be to re-establish the program's recruiting presence in Southern California. That connection, which was "critically important," had been lost, Guerrero said.
Jasmine Hassell scored 6 of her 13 points in the final three minutes, and fourth-seeded Georgia reached the N.C.A.A. women's regional finals for the first time since 2004 with a 61-59 victory over top-seeded Stanford on Saturday in the Spokane, Wash., region.Georgia overcame three major scoring droughts, including falling behind, 9-0, to start the game, to end Stanford's hopes of reaching the Final Four for the sixth straight year.Jasmine James led Georgia (28-6) with 16 points, including a pair of free throws with 23 seconds left that gave the Lady Bulldogs a 60-56 lead. It's the 11th trip to the regional finals for Coach Andy Landers in his time at Georgia.The Lady Bulldogs will face second-seeded California or No. 6 Louisiana State on Monday for a berth in the Final Four.Chiney Ogwumike led Stanford (33-3) with 26 points but was held to 8 in the second half.KENTUCKY 69, DELAWARE 62 Kentucky Coach Matthew Mitchell has his team one victory from the program's first women's Final Four.The Wildcats had to overcome an incredible effort by Elena Delle Donne to get there.Jennifer O'Neill scored 19 points and A'dia Mathies added 16 to help Kentucky hold off the Blue Hens in the Bridgeport, Conn., regional semifinals, bringing to an end the college career of Delle Donne.It is the second straight season that Kentucky (30-5) will play Connecticut in a regional final. UConn beat Kentucky by 15 points last year."When we were here last year and go back and watch those games, I think we're more talented than the team last year," Mitchell said.No. 2 Kentucky withstood a rally led by Delle Donne, who had 33 points for No. 6 Delaware (32-4). The Wildcats led by 14 in the second half before the Blue Hens cut it to 62-60. But Kastine Evans responded with a 3-pointer from the top of the key.Delle Donne finished as the fifth-leading scorer in N.C.A.A. history with 3,039 points. She passed the former stars Cheryl Miller, Chamique Holdsclaw and Maya Moore on Saturday. Delle Donne finished short of Jackie Stiles's record of 3,393 set at Southwest Missouri State from 1998 to 2001.With the game out of reach, Delaware Coach Tina Martin took Delle Donne out with 10 seconds left to a long ovation from the crowd.UCONN 76, MARYLAND 50 Connecticut's youngest players have the Huskies in a familiar spot.The freshmen Breanna Stewart, Moriah Jefferson and Morgan Tuck combined for 35 points as No. 1 UConn (32-4) advanced to its eighth straight regional final with a blowout against fourth-seeded Maryland in Bridgeport."I think we were 16 for 28 from the floor, our freshmen," Huskies Coach Geno Auriemma said. "One turnover between the three of them. I thought they were the key to the game today, for sure."Stewart and the sophomore Kaleena Mosqueda-Lewis each had 17 points to lead the Huskies. Stewart also had eight rebounds and four blocked shots.Jefferson made several key defensive stops, and her two fast-break layups capped a 9-0 run to start the second half, giving UConn a 44-26 lead."We got in a nice offensive flow," she said. "Once the transition game came, then the offensive flow was right there."Alyssa Thomas, a two-time Atlantic Coast Conference player of the year, was held to 13 for Maryland (26-8). Thomas averaged 28.5 points in the team's first two tournament games.The Huskies will play Kentucky on Monday night in a rematch of last year's regional final, which UConn won, 80-65.Connecticut will be playing in a regional final for the 19th time. The Huskies have made five consecutive trips to the Final Four.
NEW ORLEANS — If LeBron James seemed bothered by the lapse of Miami's 27-game winning streak or the hard fouls — physical and verbal — he had absorbed in recent days, it was not apparent Friday morning. His hunger for victory or reprisal seemed outweighed at the moment by his hunger for lunch.Wearing sunglasses inside New Orleans Arena, earplugs connected to his smartphone, James waited as Dwyane Wade finished his interviews after a shootaround, then said, "I'm starving, man, come on."He must have left room for dessert, as James delivered 36 points (including seven 3-pointers), 6 assists, 4 rebounds and 2 steals in Miami's restorative soufflé of a victory, 108-89, over the Hornets.Sean Payton, coach of the New Orleans Saints, saw James in person for the first time and professed amazement that an athlete of that size — 6 feet 8 inches, 260 or 270 pounds — could play guard. And by that he did not mean pulling guard.Sure, James could play a handful of positions in the N.F.L., Payton said, then joked, "But we can't afford him with our cap right now."Friday's performance was an exuberant and defiant rebuttal of Miami's loss in Chicago on Wednesday, when James was pulled down by Kirk Hinrich, who grabbed him as if trying to move a chest of drawers. Later, Taj Gibson swatted James in a game of basketball Whac-a-Mole.The takedowns frustrated James, who apparently concluded that markings on a basketball court should not include the chalk outline of a body. So he dug a shoulder and an elbow into Carlos Boozer and was hit with a flagrant foul.After that 101-97 loss, James told reporters, "I believe, and I know, that a lot of my fouls are not basketball plays." Such mugging had occurred all season, he said. Until Wednesday, he had been able to "keep my cool" and tell Coach Erik Spoelstra, "Let's not worry about it too much.""But it is getting to me a little bit," James said.Naturally, his coach and teammates remained supportive. But some others around the league did not. Perhaps they consider any complaints to be whining, given that Pat Riley, the Heat president, perfected the dark art of the hard foul as coach of the Knicks, when basketball sometimes became indistinguishable from Greco-Roman wrestling.No one tried to hurt James, Gibson told a Chicago radio station, saying he was surprised to hear James grumbling. "He's too good of a player to do that," Gibson said.Then came the two cents of Danny Ainge, the Celtics' president for basketball operations. "I think that it's almost embarrassing that LeBron would complain about officiating," Ainge told a Boston radio station.This from someone who was so annoying in his playing days that many still believe Ainge bit Tree Rollins on the finger, instead of the other way around, during a 1983 playoff game between Boston and Atlanta.Riley did not let this go unchallenged, saying through a Heat spokesman Friday night that Ainge should shut up and manage his team."He was the biggest whiner going when he was playing, and I know that because I coached against him," Riley said.Told about Riley's retort as he stretched on the floor in the Heat locker room, James laughed and said: "There it is. There it is."Earlier, he said: "I don't care what people's response is. I stated what I felt and left it at that. I haven't went on about it at all. I know everything that I say is going to be either blown out of proportion or taken the wrong way. But I said what I had to say, and I moved on."All this moving on did not include Spoelstra, at least not before Friday's game.Strong-arming will only increase during the playoffs. It always does. So Spoelstra prepared a message that seemed to have been thoroughly considered, vetted and perhaps even approved by a focus group.He stayed on point like a politician in midcampaign: James and the Heat would continue to play an aggressive, attacking style. And Miami did not need police protection from the referees, only consistency."We're well aware of what everybody's game plan is against us, and that's to prevent layups and dunks and highlight plays at all costs," Spoelstra said. "A lot of times those result in hard fouls. We'll have our guys' backs, but we don't need anybody's help, and we're not afraid of anybody's game plan against us."Monty Williams, the Hornets' coach, noting Chicago's success against the Heat, said: "Everyone is going to take the blueprint to go out there and knock them out. That's easier said than done. Let's face it. Sometimes they have to have an off night for you to beat them."During the streak, which fell six short of the 33 consecutive games won by the 1971-72 Los Angeles Lakers, Miami developed an exasperating habit of falling behind early and winning with a late rescue. That pattern brought failure against the Bulls. Too many inattentive early minutes, Spoelstra said. Sometimes a defeat was necessary, he said, to "change the process."There was no slow start Friday as Miami seemed to be playing at home instead of on the road. When James scored his first basket on an alley-oop dunk, the crowd erupted. By the end of the first quarter, James had 15 points, and the Heat had a 32-22 lead.He planned to rest some before the playoffs, James said, but he did not like sitting out games. "If I'm in uniform, I'm here to play at the highest level," he said.Three minutes 15 seconds into the second quarter, James had 28 points and 6 three-pointers. At one point, he waved his hand, urging the crowd to show him some love. It was again good to be the King."I think he's just playing with a calm he's never had before, and his talent is shining through that calmness," his teammate Shane Battier said. "He was never harried or hurried, but he's playing at a pace I don't think people have seen, and it's pretty amazing."Surely this will become James's fourth season as the N.B.A.'s most valuable player. Some of his equanimity came with the liberation of winning a championship last season, Battier said. This dispelled any notion, fair or unfair, that James could not convert his individual brilliance into collective success.And, Battier said, "as you get older in this league, you tend to say, 'I want to be who I am, and that's going to be good enough.' "With Friday's victory, Miami headed for Sunday's matchup in San Antonio. There was no chance, Battier said with a laugh, that the Heat would send their regulars home instead to rest. Spurs Coach Gregg Popovich did that earlier this season for a game in Miami and cost his team a $250,000 fine."After the hubbub of that last game," Battier said, "I don't think anyone is willing financially to make that decision."
The chant was loud and emphatic, the product of years of pent-up frustration and surely a dose of envy. It lasted only a few seconds. It consisted of only two words, with a subject of "Boston" and a predicate that cannot be printed in this newspaper.Rest assured, the thousands who filled Madison Square Garden on Sunday night enjoyed every salty repetition of the phrase, as the Knicks dismantled the Celtics, their onetime tormentors, 108-89, edging ever closer to supplanting them as Atlantic Division champions.The Knicks are resurgent. The Celtics, as the Garden crowd accurately noted, are not very good right now, and their five-year reign of dominance is nearing its end. For the Knicks faithful, this was a moment worth savoring all the way around."The fans definitely understand what's going on right now," Carmelo Anthony said. "Any time we have a chance to beat Boston, it's always a good feeling."Anthony shook off foul trouble to score 24 points, leading the Knicks (46-26) to their eighth straight victory, and their second over Boston (38-35) in six nights. With that, the Knicks won the season series (3-1) for the first time since 2003-4. Their magic number for clinching the division title is six, with 10 games to play.The Knicks now face their stiffest test in weeks: a Tuesday night date in Miami, against the no-longer-streaking but still-imposing Heat. Miami rested LeBron James and Dwyane Wade on Sunday, perhaps saving them for the showdown.The Knicks, who are ultimately aiming to dethrone the Heat as Eastern Conference champions, feigned indifference: to whether the Heat's stars play or not, and to any suggestion that this final regular-season between the teams holds any meaning."We're going to get every game we play," Kenyon Martin said. "The importance of every game, you go out to win. It's not just against Miami, or Boston or any team that's in the top of the conference. You go out to win every game."But doesn't the road to the finals go through Miami?"That's what you assume?" Martin said. "You know what assuming do, right?"The Knicks were more eager to discuss other goals, like the large, block-faced "50" scrawled on a locker-room greaseboard by Rasheed Wallace. The Knicks need just four wins in their final 10 games to reach that plateau for the first time since 1999-2000.The eight-game winning streak served as its own milestone — the Knicks' longest since Anthony joined them two years ago. (They also won eight straight two months before he arrived.) And the Knicks closed March — their busiest month of the season, with 18 games in 31 days — with a rather impressive 12-6 mark, despite losing Tyson Chandler for the last 10 games.Chandler is now shooting to return Tuesday night, barring any setbacks in his recovery from a bulging disk in his neck."We'll welcome him back if he tells me he's ready to go," Coach Mike Woodson said.Martin, who has held the defense together in Chandler's absence, will most likely return to the bench. Martin sustained a strained abdominal muscle Sunday and sat out the fourth quarter, but he said afterward that he could have played. He is considered probable for Tuesday.J. R. Smith had 15 points and 12 rebounds, ending a three-game streak of 30-point games. Jeff Green led Boston with 27 points and Paul Pierce had 24, but the stumbling Celtics — still playing without their defensive anchor, Kevin Garnett — lost for the sixth time in eight games.The Knicks' streak has been built mostly on the backs of the lottery-bound (Orlando, Toronto, Charlotte) and the barely breathing (Utah, Boston). They have beaten just one top-tier team (Memphis) along the way, and even Woodson admitted he is curious how this revival will hold up against the elite teams. The Knicks travel to Miami, Oklahoma City and Chicago over the next 11 days."Yeah, we beat Miami the one time without Melo," Woodson said, referring to the Knicks' last victory over the Heat, on Dec. 6, "but Miami's playing at such a high level now than when we were playing them back then, it's not even funny. And Oklahoma has been very consistent all season. So yeah, it'll be interesting to see where we stand."A week ago, Miami was riding a 27-game winning streak. Now the Heat are on cruise control, content with a two-game streak and well-rested stars, while the Knicks are enjoying the league's longest active streak. The game surely will lose a little luster if the Heat are not at full strength."I really don't care," Woodson said. "We've seen it enough. They're pretty good."Tyson Chandler went through solo drills before the game, sprinting, making lateral moves and driving for layups with apparent ease. It was his first extensive on-court workout since he injured his neck and left knee in Denver on March 13. Chandler said he "felt pretty good" but had a little residual stiffness in the neck, which has a bulging disk. Still, Chandler is able to raise his arms and rotate his neck freely, movements he could not make a week ago. Although the Knicks are not practicing Monday, Chandler plans to go through an informal workout and, if all goes well, will return Tuesday night. The team considered giving Chandler an epidural injection last week, but it was deemed unnecessary after new treatment.
INDIANAPOLIS — It happens in every game, thousands of times in the course of a season. A player breaks free for an open jumper. An off-the-ball defender jumps at him. Whether the shot falls or not, both players run back downcourt and play on.For Louisville's Kevin Ware, a 6-foot-2 sophomore reserve guard originally from the Bronx, that innocuous play in the N.C.A.A. Midwest Region final ended with a gruesome injury. Ware broke his lower right leg in two places as he landed near the Louisville bench with 6 minutes 33 seconds left in the first half of the Cardinals' 85-63 victory.Louisville Coach Rick Pitino said that Ware was expected to have surgery Sunday, and that it would take a year to recover. "It was very difficult to look at and watch," Pitino said. "But he's a brave young man, because all he kept saying was, 'Win the game.' "In a first half loaded with physical play, Louisville rattled Duke with a full-court press, making the Blue Devils work for every shot. Ware, who averages 4.6 points, converted a 3-point play in a brief appearance. He returned with 8:09 to play in the half.The Cardinals led by 21-17 when Duke's Tyler Thornton broke free for a 3-point jump shot from the right wing. Ware dashed from the edge of the foul circle and jumped at Thornton to try to block the shot. Spinning in the air, Ware landed with all his weight on his right leg. The lower part of his leg buckled unnaturally, and he slid into the Louisville bench. He lay on his back with the lower leg dangling grotesquely, broken at the middle of the shin."When he landed, I heard it," Smith said. "Then I saw what happened come out. And I just fell."Pitino said a broken bone punctured the skin. "I went over and was going to help him up, and then all of a sudden I saw what it was," he said. "And I literally almost threw up. And then I just wanted to get a towel to get it over that."Thornton yelled and grimaced. "I was freaked out," he said. "He lifted his leg in the air and I saw where his leg was broken. It was bent in a weird way it shouldn't have been."As Cardinals trainers surrounded Ware and covered his leg with towels, Louisville's Smith, Wayne Blackshear and Chane Behanan fell to the court, crying. Behanan, Ware's close friend, dropped to all fours. Pitino wiped away tears. Blackshear helped Behanan to his feet, and Gorgui Dieng, himself visibly shaken, put an arm around Behanan to console him."When he went down, oh my God, it scared me," Behanan said. "I never cried for nobody like that. Kevin is like a brother to me. We're always together outside of basketball, just doing things."After about nine minutes, medical personnel slid a board underneath Ware. Louisville players were huddling near midcourt when Pitino called them over — Ware wanted to tell them something before he left."He was laying down, crying and saying: 'Win it for me, y'all. I'm good. I'm going to get surgery and be back at it like I never left,' " Behanan said.Moments later, while the crowd chanted his first name, Ware was lifted onto a stretcher and wheeled away. He was taken to Methodist Hospital. When play resumed, Smith pulled the top of his jersey across his face to wipe his eyes one more time."It was really hard for me to pull myself together, because I didn't ever think in a million years I would see something like that, and it happened especially to a guy like Kevin Ware," Smith said. "I was completely devastated."The former Washington Redskins quarterback Joe Theismann, who sustained a grisly leg fracture in a 1985 "Monday Night Football" game against the Giants, wrote on Twitter: "Watching Duke/Louisville my heart goes out to Kevin Ware."The halftime locker room was solemn, Behanan said. The second half was no contest. Louisville shot 59.3 percent and scored 50 points to win easily."I think 9/11 and the loss of a child were probably the two most difficult things in my life," said Pitino, who lost an infant son to congenital heart failure in 1987 and his brother-in-law, Billy Minardi, in the 2001 World Trade Center attacks. "This was very traumatic for us to overcome, because we all witnessed it right up close."
Louisville guard Kevin Ware is already up and walking in an Indianapolis hospital, and he has a souvenir to keep him company until he is cleared to return to campus.Coach Rick Pitino brought the Midwest Region championship trophy when he visited Ware, who remains hospitalized after surgery to repair a gruesome fracture in his right leg.Pitino said Ware was "excited" about the trophy, which Louisville won by beating Duke on Sunday to earn a Final Four berth."I said to him, 'You want me to bring it back or stay with you?' " Pitino said. "He said, 'It's staying with me.' I said, 'All right, just make sure you don't lose it.' "During a two-hour operation Sunday night, doctors reset Ware's broken tibia and inserted a rod into the bone. Because the bone broke through the skin, Pitino said, doctors were monitoring Ware to make sure he did not develop an infection. If there are no complications, he should be released Tuesday.The Cardinals plan to leave on Wednesday night for the Final Four in Atlanta, and Pitino said they expected to have Ware, who grew up in Atlanta, with them."He gets to go home, be with his family and be with us on the bench," Pitino said.Ware's right leg snapped during the first half of Sunday's regional final when he landed awkwardly after contesting a shot.
Breanna Stewart scored 21 points and Kaleena Mosqueda-Lewis added 17 to help top-seeded Connecticut rout Kentucky, 83-53, on Monday night in the Bridgeport, Conn., regional final of the women's N.C.A.A. tournament.The Huskies (33-4) advanced to a record sixth straight Final Four."It definitely doesn't get old," the UConn senior Kelly Faris said. "Each year is different, special in its own way. This is our last go-round; we want to go out with a bang. I'm fortunate to be part of this program where we make it every year. We never are satisfied until we get to that final game."They will face Notre Dame or Duke in a national semifinal on Sunday in New Orleans.Kentucky (30-6) kept pace for the first 10 minutes with a staunch defense. The Huskies trailed, 23-22, with nine minutes left in the first half.That was when Stewart and UConn's defense took over, allowing only 3 points the rest of the half."We're either right on point, we do everything right, or we get a little bit off kilter and lose our composure a little bit," UConn Coach Geno Auriemma said. "Once we got into our rhythm and our tempo, we just played good basketball."CALIFORNIA 65 GEORGIA 62 Layshia Clarendon scored 17 of her 25 points in the second half and overtime, and second-seeded California (32-3) rallied from a 10-point deficit with less than seven minutes left in regulation to beat No. 4 Georgia (28-7) in the Spokane, Wash., regional final and advance to the Final Four for the first timeThe Golden Bears will face Tennessee or Louisville in a national semifinal Sunday in New Orleans.
Anthony scored 50 points, his career high with the Knicks, going 18 of 26 from the field, including 7 of 10 on 3-pointers, in a 102-90 win at American Airlines Arena."It's a feeling that you just have when you're out there on the court," Anthony said. "Sometimes, you get off to a good start and then you get cold throughout the game, but tonight wasn't one of those cases."The Knicks, who extended their winning streak to nine games, took three of four meetings from the Heat to win the season series for the first time since the 2007-8 season. This is also their longest win streak since 1994 (15 games).Miami played its second consecutive game without LeBron James, Dwyane Wade and Mario Chalmers. Wade and Chalmers are nursing ankle injuries and James has a sore hamstring."We beat a great team tonight," Knicks Coach Mike Woodson said. "Their supporting cast, I have a great deal of respect. Most of these guys were a part of that championship team, and you can't take them lightly. To me, we beat a great team tonight, minus three of their top players, but hey, they're a team. That's why they won the title last year, and we're trying to chase that."Anthony, who scored 50 points twice with the Denver Nuggets, including once against the Knicks, scored 8 of the team's first 11 points and was in double figures less than four minutes into the game. He finished the first half with 27 points."That is a game that drives the analytics guys crazy," Heat forward Shane Battier said. "He didn't attempt a shot within 15 feet of the basket. Most nights, we would take that every single time. He made a ton of shots. There were some we had poor rotations on and he had really clean looks and that was just breakdowns in our defense. A lot of shots you would take 11 times out of 10, and he just had it rolling."The Knicks, who are tied with the Indiana Pacers for second place in the Eastern Conference behind Miami, received a boost with the return of Tyson Chandler, who missed the last 10 games with neck and knee injuries. He played 24 minutes and was matched against Chris Bosh, who led the Heat with 23 points."I was a little stiff out there, obviously fatigued," said Chandler, who does not know whether he will play Wednesday night against the Hawks in Atlanta. "This was my first time stepping on the court in three weeks and running up and down the floor. I really just wanted to get the win. No serious pain but obviously some stiffness and soreness, which hinders me a little bit, but some things I'm confident will get better each game."Anthony went cold early in the fourth quarter before scoring 5 straight points to stretch the lead to 7 and reached 50 points with a jumper with 16.9 seconds remaining. His teammates were hounding him down the stretch to take more shots."I knew I was close and they were telling me to come get the ball," Anthony said. "I was trying to get the ball over with, but Ray yelled at me, Tyson yelled at me, so I came up there and got it."Woodson did not change his approach to the game, especially after seeing Miami beat the Spurs in San Antonio on Sunday without James, Wade and Chalmers."Every game is important for us no matter who plays," Woodson said before the game. "They are a big piece of Miami's puzzle, but they are still pretty good without them. They go into San Antonio and win without those three guys, so I say they're pretty good."As for Miami Coach Erik Spoelstra's decision to hold James, Wade and Chalmers out, Woodson said: "Obviously, they are hurt. I believe that. If he is holding them out for those reasons, then so be it. I can't worry about guys who are not playing; I have to worry about the guys that are in uniform playing."The Knicks were able to play better defense in the second half after letting Mike Miller get loose for 18 points on 4-of-8 shooting from beyond the arc. He was held scoreless the second half. Ray Allen finished with 16 points, while Norris Cole, starting in place of Chalmers, added 14 points.On Sunday, Miami still managed to pull out an 88-86 victory over the Spurs on a last-second 3-pointer by Bosh. What Spoelstra did with James, Wade and Chalmers was thought to be an anomaly and more of a statement in response to what Spurs Coach Gregg Popovich did Nov. 29. San Antonio was fined $250,000 by Commissioner David Stern after Popovich sent the starters Tim Duncan, Tony Parker, Danny Green and Manu Ginobili home before the Heat-San Antonio game in Miami.Tuesday morning's shoot-around showed that Spoelstra had more of a method to his madness with the playoffs around the corner. There was quite a bit of energy spent by every Heat player during the 27-game winning streak and the tightness in James's hamstring only proved that, according to Spoelstra, "he's human."Miami plans to be careful between now and the start of the postseason."We're not panicked about it," Spoelstra said. "We're being very proactive and aggressive with the treatment and rehab, just to make sure we can contain their injuries where they are. You get into 70-plus games, where we are right now, we feel very fortunate." He called them minor things "that happen over the course of a long season."He added: "These are minor things right now. Minor things can turn into much bigger things if they're not addressed."
In a video shown Tuesday on ESPN, the Rutgers men's basketball coach, Mike Rice, is seen yelling homophobic slurs at his players, kicking them, grabbing them and shoving them. He also throws basketballs at their legs, their heads and their bodies from point-blank range — as if he were playing dodge ball.The footage, taken at practices from 2010 to 2012, went viral Tuesday, putting Rice under scrutiny.In December, after seeing the video, Rutgers Athletic Director Tim Pernetti fined Rice $50,000 and suspended him for three games. He offered little elaboration.Messages left for Rice on Tuesday were not returned, and efforts to contact Pernetti were unsuccessful. An N.C.A.A. spokeswoman declined to comment.In an interview Tuesday on WFAN radio, Pernetti said of fining and suspending Rice, rather than firing him: "I made that decision. I am accountable for it. I have to live with it."He said: "In the end, I am not going to look back and say shoulda, woulda. All I can do is figure out going forward the decisions I can make to fix the problem for Rutgers."In a statement on behalf of Gov. Chris Christie of New Jersey, his press secretary, Michael Drewniak, said: "Governor Christie saw the video today for the first time, and he is obviously deeply disturbed by the conduct displayed and strongly condemns this behavior. It's not the type of leadership we should be showing our young people, and clearly there are questions about this behavior that need to be answered by the leaders at Rutgers University."The video was compiled by Eric Murdock, a former Rutgers director of player personnel. Murdock's lawyer, Raj Gadhok, said Murdock reported Rice's actions last summer, and later was told his contract would not be renewed. In November, Gadhok said, Murdock presented the video, which is said to be about 30 minutes in length, to Pernetti and other Rutgers officials.By Dec. 13, Pernetti concluded his investigation and issued Rice's punishment. After the season, in which Rutgers finished 15-16, Pernetti publicly backed Rice, and he reiterated Tuesday to reporters that Rice would not be fired, barring any further incident.Murdock said he planned to sue Rutgers for wrongful termination. Gadhok said that before Murdock reported Rice's actions, he had been told his contract would be renewed.The footage, apparently, was not supposed to be shown on ESPN until Sunday, but when word leaked, Rutgers showed it first to a group of reporters Tuesday. After the viewing, Pernetti told the reporters that the gay slur was "at the core" of Rice's suspension in December. The physical contact, though, shocked many.Jalen Rose, an ESPN basketball analyst, sent out a Twitter message saying: "The video of Rutgers H.C. Rice abusing players is appalling! He should be fired ASAP."In 1997, Indiana Coach Bob Knight was caught on tape choking a player named Neil Reed in practice. In 2000, when Reed spoke out about the incident and a video surfaced, Knight was placed on a zero-tolerance policy. Six months later, he was fired.Rice is not the first Rutgers basketball coach to draw the public's ire for an incident during practice. In 1997, Kevin Bannon ordered two players and two student managers to run sprints naked, as part of a free-throw-shooting contest. The two players later transferred. Bannon was not fired until 2001, when the incident was revisited publicly by the players.
Just after noon on Wednesday, a large purple and white camper van pulled up in front of the St. Regis Hotel on 55th Street in Manhattan. Several dozen Sacramento Kings fans in purple and white jerseys and hats mobbed the truck like druids welcoming the summer solstice."I feel like the entire city of Sacramento is here," said Dave Weiglein, a radio commentator known as Carmichael Dave, who drove cross-country in the van to show that the Kings had many fans who wanted the team to stay put. To those in Seattle who hope that a group buys the Kings and moves them to Washington State, he declared, "You're going to get a team, but just not now."The scrum in front of the hotel was a prelude to the showdown inside, where two heavyweight investment groups who want to buy the Kings from the Maloof family made their pitches to the N.B.A.'s advisory finance and relocation committees.The first group to make its case was led by Christopher Hansen, a hedge fund manager; Steve Ballmer, the chief executive of Microsoft; and Erik and Peter Nordstrom, the department store executives. They were joined by Mayor Mike McGinn of Seattle; Dow Constantine, the King County executive; and Wally Walker, who played for the SuperSonics when they won their only title, in 1979, before the team left five years ago for Oklahoma City, where they were renamed the Thunder.George Maloof told the owners on the committees that his family was eager to sell the club to the Hansen group, which in January struck a deal to buy, for about $340 million, the 65 percent of the Kings owned by the Maloofs."I think we were very well prepared, we are optimistic, the ownership group is very enthusiastic, and we appreciate the N.B.A. has a very tough decision to make, and we're hopeful for an outcome in our favor," Hansen said after his group's 90-minute presentation.When Hansen's group struck a deal with the Maloofs, it appeared to face few hurdles. The investors have deep pockets, and there was political momentum for a new arena in Seattle, the nation's largest city without an N.B.A. team. Hansen's group compiled a list of about 48,000 people willing to buy season tickets. In Sacramento, the Kings, who have not qualified for the playoffs since 2006, are last in the league in attendance.But the announcement of the deal prompted Mayor Kevin Johnson of Sacramento to make a last-ditch effort to stop the team from leaving. The Sacramento City Council voted last month to contribute more than $250 million toward the cost of a new arena. After the N.B.A. let it be known that a counteroffer by Ron Burkle, a grocery store mogul, and Mark Mastrov, the founder of 24 Hour Fitness, was not strong enough, Vivek Ranadivé, a software tycoon, helped enhance their bid.Ranadivé is the vice chairman of the Warriors, and he would have to sell his stake in Golden State if his group bought the Kings. But he has quickly become the face of the group seeking to keep the Kings in Sacramento."We're here to put our best foot forward," Ranadivé said Wednesday. "It's Seattle who's asking for a mulligan, not Sacramento."In a news conference that was decidedly more upbeat than Hansen's, Johnson said his group "left it all out on the floor" in its presentation to the owners, which included Clay Bennett of the Thunder, James Dolan of the Knicks and Peter Holt of the San Antonio Spurs.Commissioner David Stern said the owners asked him to provide a lot more data on the finances and arena construction schedules of the two groups. The owners, he said, may take more than two weeks to announce which group they prefer.The N.B.A. board of governors must set a relocation fee, which can be any amount it chooses, if it picks Seattle over Sacramento.Three-quarters of the board of governors must approve a transfer of ownership, but only a simple majority vote is needed to approve a plan to relocate.
History is beckoning the Knicks these days, but which will be the more powerful calling, the individual measure of lasting greatness or the consummate joy of collective achievement?Carmelo Anthony's 50-point demonstration of near-flawless shooting against the depleted Heat in Miami on Tuesday night stirred memories of Bernard King's back-to-back 50-point eruptions in 1984 — his famed Lone Star swing through San Antonio and Dallas. More significantly, the Knicks' running their winning streak to 10 with a 95-82 victory in Atlanta on Wednesday night — as a presumably relieved King watched Anthony ring up 40 more points — continued to raise hopes for an extended playoff season that might even include surmounting Miami, the defending champion.To further crystallize fond recollections of the Brooklyn-born King, along with the last time the Knicks rose to the level of N.B.A. royalty, both he and the 1973 championship team will be in the news in the coming days. King again is a finalist for the Basketball Hall of Fame — his exclusion to date has riled his many supporters, though mostly from New York — and the Knicks will celebrate the 40th anniversary year of the 1973 championship team on Friday, when they play the Milwaukee Bucks at Madison Square Garden.Having covered the Knicks teams King played on for The New York Post and The Daily News, I can attest to the spectacular nature not only of his electric performances but also in the fastidious way he remade himself from a talented enigma struggling with substance abuse before joining the Knicks in 1982 after stops in New Jersey, Utah and Golden State.Fiercely determined to rewrite his early career narrative, King dressed impeccably, refused to so much as loosen his tie when the Knicks traveled on commercial flights and took the floor every night with a scowling game face that seldom dissolved. In terms of sheer scoring ability, he was a smaller version of Anthony, with less range on his lightning-release jumper, but with a more sustained ferocity bordering on rage.While King drove the Knicks to a seven-game Eastern Conference semifinal series against Larry Bird and the Celtics (who ultimately won the championship) in 1984, a severe knee injury in a meaningless game down the stretch of a lost 1984-85 season denied him the chance to team with Patrick Ewing, who was drafted months later.Though he defied the medical odds then for a player with torn ligaments and made the All-Star team with the Washington Bullets in 1991, King's reign in the N.B.A. elite was relatively short, which no doubt has factored into the Hall of Fame election process.While King belongs, I have typically said, "When they do the right thing and put Dick Barnett in, that's when I'll campaign for Bernard."Barnett's absence is an injustice decades old that reflects a time when black players were not only ignored but excluded. Besides starring on three straight N.A.I.A. championship teams in the late 1950s at what was then Tennessee A&I — and before desegregation drained talent from the smaller or historically black schools — Barnett was a key scorer and strong on-ball defender for four of the five N.B.A. championship series teams he played on.He sacrificed numbers to meld with the likes of Jerry West and Elgin Baylor in Los Angeles and with Willis Reed, Walt Frazier and the others in New York. (He also won a title for George Steinbrenner's Cleveland Pipers of the short-lived American Basketball League.)Barnett was a spare part by the Knicks' second title, having surrendered his backcourt post to Earl Monroe, with Dean Meminger as the third guard. Barnett never got the credit Monroe deservedly received for assimilating his transcendent one-on-one skills into the Knicks' democratic approach and, most germane to the 1973 title, sitting on the bench for the last three quarters of the signature playoff victory that season, Game 7 of the conference final in Boston.Meminger subbed in for Monroe at the start of the second quarter, primarily to slow the Celtics' Jo Jo White, and proceeded to have the game of his life. To this day, Reed calls it "Dean's game," and not only did Monroe never question the benching, he and Meminger wound up toasting the Game 5 finals clinching in Los Angeles together, rather quietly, in the team hotel. They were roommates and best friends.It is no secret that collective achievement outweighs individual exploits on the most important scorecards, but that does not mean the heights King reached in the 1980s, or what Anthony did Tuesday night in Miami and on many other a night this season is not worthy of a starred archiving in the Knicks' history book.But when the defensive intensity increases in the playoffs, the challenge for the Knicks will be to avoid deferring too much to Anthony, in the interest of finding and sustaining a delicate chemistry that would allow Anthony's future Hall of Fame candidacy to evoke 1973-like memories of sharing, sacrifice and ultimate celebration.As LeBron James routinely proved last spring — and Kobe Bryant and Michael Jordan before him — it can and has been done. Just not for four decades in New York, Monroe, Meminger & Co. will remind everyone Friday night.
The lights went out. Players bounced together in unison on the herringbone floor for the first time in 18 days. Fireworks shot into the air. The Nets were back in Brooklyn, and a sellout crowd at Barclays Center was treated to a close game and a frenetic finish.When Brook Lopez's baseline jumper spun in and out, the Chicago Bulls had earned a come-from-behind 92-90 victory Thursday."We'll take that shot 10 out of 10 times," point guard Deron Williams said. "That's his spot on the floor."Lopez said the play was designed for Williams to attack the basket and look for the open man, which was Lopez when his defender, Nazr Mohammed, slid over to stop Williams."I guess I can be thankful it happened in the regular season," Lopez said of the miss. "It wasn't the postseason."Nate Robinson gave the Bulls a 91-90 lead with a floater in the lane after stealing an errant Lopez pass on a disorganized possession. Mohammed then blocked Lopez at the rim, and Daequan Cook made one of two foul shots, setting up Lopez's final attempt.The ending overshadowed a brilliant start from Lopez (28 points) and a brilliant finish from Williams (30 points, 10 assists). They combined for nearly two-thirds of the Nets' scoring output.The loss dropped the Nets five and a half games behind the Knicks in the Atlantic Division. The game also had playoff implications. The Nets are only a game and a half in front of the Bulls in the race for the fourth seed in the Eastern Conference. The Bulls own the tiebreaker after winning the season series, 3-1.The absence of four Bulls rotation players — including two big men — eased the Nets' transition back into familiar surroundings as they jumped to an 18-4 lead. The fast start, the kind fans have grown accustomed to, faded with a poor third quarter, another season hallmark. Despite committing eight third-quarter fouls to the Nets' zero, the Bulls erased an 11-point halftime deficit before the end of the quarter, and the Nets were undone late by eight fourth-quarter turnovers.The Nets had a difficult time containing Carlos Boozer (29 points, 18 rebounds), with most of his damage coming in the second half. At times in the second half, Williams and Boozer, former Jazz teammates who vacationed together in Miami over All-Star Weekend, traded baskets. Late in the fourth quarter, Williams exploded into the lane and attempted to dunk on Boozer, the latest chapter in Williams's dunk-happy resurgence."It's the third time we've played them this year on a back-to-back," Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo said. "That's just the way it goes. It's the third time we've played them that they've been undermanned."Lopez hit his first six shots and scored 18 of the Nets' first 22 points, displaying a silky touch from various spots. Williams looked to be back at home as well, handing out six first-quarter assists, four to Lopez.Joe Johnson played for the first time in six games and struggled to find a groove in the first half. Johnson hit his first shot, a tough fallaway, midway through the third quarter before the Bulls went on a game-changing 22-11 run."I think the biggest thing is to get Joe back," Carlesimo said before the game. "Get him minutes, and kind of get him going. I would probably say it's the No. 1 priority."Johnson responded with three 3-pointers in the fourth quarter and finished with 12 points.
ATLANTA — The usual collection of college basketball coaches arrived this week for the Final Four. They came from the smallest universities and the major programs; they came to network, to trade inbounds plays and to debate the finer points of the 1-3-1 press.Often, their conversations lingered on John Beilein, the Michigan coach with the itinerant career path, a man who put in some 35 years at eight schools at various levels before he reached the sport's grandest stage. Beilein is a coach's coach. His story is their story, particularly for those at the places he stopped along the way.In a Final Four defined by the men in suits, by Syracuse's Jim Boeheim and Louisville's Rick Pitino and the new guy, Wichita State's Gregg Marshall, those who want one day to reach that pinnacle can identify most with Beilein. They can recite his résumé — Newfane Central High, Erie Community College, Nazareth, Le Moyne, Canisius, Richmond, West Virginia. They will root for him Saturday, against Boeheim and the Orange.Beilein was one of them, is one of them. He recorded 20-win seasons at the N.A.I.A. level and in Division II and Division III. He drove vans, washed jerseys, went to clinics, shared rooms and recruiting tips. Just like them."I didn't think it was possible," Beilein said Thursday, inside a ballroom, surrounded by cameras and microphones. "I didn't think about it. I'm always thinking about what we can do right now to be a better team, what I can do to be a better father, a better teacher."Alex Nwora is one of those. He took over at Erie Community College in 1999. He knows Beilein only in passing, as an inductee to the college's Hall of Fame, as a former community college coach who stands two wins from a national championship. The gulf between the former and the latter once seemed insurmountable. Beilein closed it."We're the little guys," Nwora said. "We look up to him. He keeps the flag flying for us. I hope he goes all the way."In recent news conferences, Beilein spoke of the small-school coach's life, of the fast food eaten and miles driven and the ratty gyms with partisan referees. A bus trip constituted a luxury, the equivalent of a chartered flight. Beilein attended his first Final Four in the mid-1980s, and he loved it, watching all the practices, sending postcards home.He would not, Beilein said, "suggest the route I took to anyone."Still, there is something nostalgic, something poetic, about the long road or the scenic route. Like Beilein before him, Steve Evans is in charge at Le Moyne. His team made "SportsCenter" when it upset Syracuse in a 2009 exhibition. He grew up near there, the son of a coach. He attended Beilein's clinics, played in college against Beilein's teams, coached against Beilein through the years. When Evans became an assistant at Northwestern, he helped install Beilein's offense, which Beilein graciously explained."At Michigan, the kids get their beds made for them," Evans said. "He knows what it's like to ride in a van, to 'keep it under $10, fellas' for a pregame meal. He knows eating with plastic forks, trying to get home from Vermont in a snowstorm."Beilein also still knows the Le Moyne athletics office phone number. "You can look at his career like each job was a steppingstone," Evans said. "I don't see if that way. John Beilein showed me you can make it where you're at."As Beilein climbed, he adapted. That kept him invigorated, never stale, because he took over so many programs at or near their low points. He installed his system as the clock ticked, as each turnaround started. "It's probably the reason why we're still here, still coaching," Beilein said. "When you're in survival mode, you find ways to improvise."Such is the coach's life, especially away from Division I. Beilein carried his basic offensive concept — the two-guard system, based on spacing and passing and backdoor cuts — with him everywhere. But at Michigan in particular, he changed his offense to suit the talent at his disposal. He allowed these Wolverines more freedom, more opportunity to freelance.This is what Jim Baron, the coach at Canisius, another Beilein stop, noticed about Beilein's Final Four team. It looks like his past teams and yet is different.
Gov. Chris Christie had pushed through a plan to reorganize higher education in the state, and he wanted it done in less than a year. No one knew how much it would cost, but it was clear that Rutgers would have to find a way to pay for it.As Barchi has pushed toward that goal in his first six months on the job, he has alienated faculty, state legislators and the student body. He has been accused of marginalizing needy students, shortchanging major departments and acting detached and even dismissive.All this has left Barchi little good will as he finds himself at the center of a Rutgers basketball scandal, with faculty and students asking why he waited for news media outrage to fire Coach Mike Rice, instead of dismissing him when he learned of his abusive behavior last fall.Some faculty members have seized on the crisis to call for Barchi's resignation. Others suggest that he was so focused on the merger of Rutgers and the state medical schools that he did not have enough time last fall to consider that Rice's berating of students and throwing basketballs at their heads violated basic university values — and that the fact it was on video was a disaster waiting to explode."What we're struggling with is a president who has a mission that doesn't apparently involve active involvement in university life," said Thomas Prusa, a professor of economics. "Maybe if the president was more tuned in, he would think that we have 58,000 students, 18 to 22 years old, and what exactly is happening? He is throwing balls at students' heads? And he's calling them what? He was not interested in that. He was interested in how do I make this merger work."On Thursday, the university continued to draw fire for its handling of Rice. The president of the State Senate, Stephen M. Sweeney, called for the athletic director, Tim Pernetti, to resign. One of Rice's assistants, Jimmy Martelli, resigned Thursday after ESPN reported that he too was on videos berating players and hurling basketballs at them.As more faculty members signed a letter calling for his resignation, Barchi did not respond to requests for comment, and he canceled a long-scheduled town-hall-style meeting at the Newark campus.The reorganization of the state's higher education system, passed by the Legislature in June, reflected the sheer force of will of Christie, whose predecessors had tried and failed to pass similar plans.The chief requirement was the merger of Rutgers and the two of the three schools of the long-troubled University of Medicine and Dentistry of New Jersey, attaching them to the Rutgers campus in New Brunswick, by July 1, 2013. Officials argued that having a medical school would raise the prestige of Rutgers, allowing it to attract more grant money, which would make up for chronic funding problems in a state that spends less than most on public higher education.But the plan was hard fought, with students and faculty protesting it had been done too hastily and legislators warning that no one knew how much it would cost. Trustees signed off on it only reluctantly in November.Barchi, a physician who had been president of Thomas Jefferson University, a Philadelphia medical school, was considered an ideal person to oversee the merger.He has put the cost of the merger at $75 million and has said that the university cannot expect help from the state in paying. In meetings with senior administrators, he has argued that the university can make up some of those costs by attracting more out-of-state students, who pay premium tuition.To lure more enrollees, he wants to raise the average SAT scores of incoming students, which would also raise Rutgers's rankings in the prestigious Association of American Universities. The university's entry into the Big Ten athletic conference, engineered by Pernetti, was another part of that bid for prestige. That bid could have been complicated by the videos of Rice's behavior, which Pernetti first saw last November, just as the university was completing terms with the Big Ten. At the time, Rice was suspended for three games and fined $50,000, a punishment that critics now view as far too soft.On Thursday, as rumors of high-level resignations swirled on campus, some Rutgers donors stood behind the university's leaders, reaching out to board members to voice their support.Steven Plofker, a real estate developer and donor, said that while Rice "clearly stepped over a bunch of boundaries that are unacceptable," Barchi and Pernetti deserved another chance.In New Brunswick, faculty members complain that in trying to pay for the merger, Barchi froze hiring in the school of arts and sciences, the largest faculty on campus.
Phil Jackson is finally returning to Madison Square Garden as a Knick — not in the role that fans might have wanted, but returning as a Knick all the same.Jackson and the rest of the Knicks' 1973 championship team will be honored Friday night as the franchise celebrates the 40th anniversary of its last title. It will be Jackson's first appearance at the Garden in two years, since his retirement as the Los Angeles Lakers' coach in 2011.The possibility of Jackson's return to the Knicks as a coach or an executive has been floated many times over the years, but it has never come close to happening. The Knicks declined to contact him last spring before promoting Mike Woodson.Jackson, 67, has all but ruled out coaching again and is instead eyeing possible front-office roles with a handful of teams. The Nets have inquired, but Jackson is not interested. He seems unlikely to leave the West Coast after becoming engaged to Jeanie Buss, the Lakers' executive vice president. The two live in Playa del Rey, Calif.The 1973 team will be honored at halftime of the Knicks-Bucks game. All of the living members are expected, including Willis Reed, Walt Frazier, Earl Monroe, Bill Bradley, Dick Barnett, Henry Bibby, John Gianelli, Jerry Lucas, Dean Meminger and Harthorne Wingo.
ATLANTA — Somehow, they all work, the varied elements of Bacari Alexander's story. Somehow, it all ties together, from the streets of Detroit to the Harlem Globetrotters to the Michigan Wolverines, from nutcrackers to construction hard hats to sledgehammers, from custom suits to Magic Circles to basketballs that spin forever on his index fingers.Alexander is a basketball coach, a Michigan assistant on the eve of the Final Four. But he is also not a basketball coach, at least not in any traditional sense.Alexander is a showman often ranked among college basketball's most fashionable assistants. He is a recruiter who can regale elite young players with tales from his two seasons with the Globetrotters. He is a frequent Twitter poster with his own favorite acronym — HALOL, or Having A Lot Of Laughs.Alexander has always been this way, outgoing and creative, outsized and dramatic. His personality, though, went viral in this N.C.A.A. tournament. He became the subject of television segments and blog posts and newspaper stories because of a most unexpected prop he used in the latest of his memorable pregame speeches.He went viral because of, well, because of a potato chip. Several potato chips, in fact."I saw a student manager eating some Pringles," Alexander said. "And I had an a-ha moment."The student manager was Jamie Peretzman, a junior who studies history and political science. Last Sunday, Alexander tasked him with picking up a can of Pringles. Never mind that it was Easter Sunday, and that few, if any, stores were open. Peretzman eventually found a "shady-looking corner store," where he purchased a can of original Pringles for under $2 as part of his per diem.Michigan was set to play Florida that day, in the South Regional final. Peretzman handed the can to Alexander, who wore a rubber glove and placed one chip on several players' shoulders. He told them they needed to play with a chip on their shoulder — literally! — then turned to John Beilein and said, "Coach, let's eat." Apparently, it worked. Buoyed by salt, preservatives and a sports cliché translated into snack time, the Wolverines trounced the Gators."Only him," Peretzman said, as he shook his head inside Michigan's locker room on Friday.Some college basketball teams now employ statisticians, or sports psychologists. The Wolverines, who play Syracuse late Saturday, have Alexander, who is college basketball's equivalent of Ray Lewis — at his best in those moments before the game starts, the team huddled around him.Alexander draws inspiration from myriad influences, from statements made by other coaches and reporters' questions and inspirational quotations and slogans from billboards he spies on the recruiting trail. He once witnessed a trainer taping players' ankles and decided to tape together an entire team to drive home that they should "stick together." That worked so well he did it three or four times.Different teams, Alexander said, require different approaches, different types of speeches, less fire, or more brimstone, depending on their makeup. Regardless, Alexander almost always goes last when the Michigan coaches speak. He listens to Beilein, to his fellow assistants, and he tries to "insert what I feel is needed at that time."Sometimes he brings along a prop, like a construction hard hat or a maize-and-blue sledgehammer, or a picture of Jayhawk, which he placed in a cage before Michigan played Kansas in this tournament. Kansas, after all, needed to be caged.In a recent season, Alexander lay down on the floor of the locker room, told the players that Ohio State had walked all over them, asked if they planned to lie down or get up. They yelled, "Get up!" in response.
ATLANTA — The laboratory back then was Case Gymnasium, a cozy cedar closet of an arena that must have felt like a casino floor to the men's basketball team at Boston University . The windows were taped over for practice, and the clocks were, too. Rick Pitino was a first-time head coach who possessed the energy of an uncoiled spring, and to change what he considered a culture of losing at B.U., he needed his players to run and run and run — two, three, sometimes even four times a day."Because we weren't any good," said Brett Brown, who played four years there for Pitino, "and he told us so."Pitino's squads at B.U. pressed for 40 minutes. They pressured and they trapped. They demoralized opponents, and they won much more than they lost.This progression has happened at every stop throughout Pitino's Hall of Fame college coaching career (an official announcement will come Monday), at Providence, Kentucky and Louisville, where he has built one of the most successful programs in the country — and a defensive dynamo — by adhering to the same approach he forged as a 25-year-old in Boston.Around the country, from New York to Texas to California, former players and assistants watch his team's games and are transported back more than 30 years, with the only obvious difference, they say with a knowing laugh, being the quality of his players.They can predict a particular pressure unfolding before it does, or they yell familiar defensive sets at the television — 3 Red, 22 White. When in the Big East championship last month Syracuse led the Cardinals by 16 points with about 15 minutes left, Ralph Groce, a former point guard at B.U., told a friend of Pitino, "He's got them right where he wants them," because, he sensed, the Orange would soon feel the effect of Louisville's press. The Cardinals went on a 49-16 run and won by 17 points."I bet you wouldn't find many coaches, if you said, 'Are you still doing at 60 what you were doing at 26?' who would say yes," said Brown, who is now an assistant with the San Antonio Spurs. "He built something to last."Pitino had confidence in his system from the outset. At B.U., where he coached from 1978 to 1983, attendance at games was meager, news media attention scant, and so, he said, he felt that he could make mistakes "and nobody would notice what I was doing wrong." Whether they did notice, Pitino does not know. But he had to develop his philosophy partly out of circumstance, because he realized that his teams, a collection of athletic but often undersized players, would likely struggle playing a more conventional half-court style."We weren't physically talented enough," said Glenn Consor, Pitino's first starting point guard at B.U., "so he had to hide some deficiencies." By deploying a relentless pressure defense, Pitino turned games into survival of the fittest competitions, and his players were as conditioned as Olympic swimmers."I don't care how much we pressed or ran during a game, it was only 40 minutes," Groce said. "Please, that was nothing compared to what we did in practice."On the track there were timed workouts of varying distances, and the former center Gary Plummer remembered the shock of showing up for preseason workouts as a freshman and having to run a mile in faster than 5 minutes 15 seconds. Pitino did not establish curfews for his B.U. teams because practices were so demanding he would know who had been out late the night before."And he was right," Consor said. "He could tell in two seconds."At those practices, Pitino installed the press, describing to players when to trap on the first pass and when not to. He conveyed a cardinal rule — never trap a big man because he will pick up his dribble eventually, anyway — and told them how, if they were persistent, there would be a time in the second half when they looked in their opponent's eyes and saw fatigue, something confirmed by statistical data.Pitino expected to see a dip in opponents' field-goal percentage after halftime, and in the tournament, Louisville has allowed 39.6 in the second half compared to 45.2 in the first half; for the season, the Cardinals have yielded 40.3 in the first half and 38.2 after halftime.Jamie Ciampaglio served two years on Pitino's staff. He remembers the 4 a.m. meetings at IHOP, the 6 a.m. practices, the 7 a.m. individual workouts. This was before the N.C.A.A. instituted limits on practice time, so Pitino would hold double sessions on weekdays, triple sessions on weekends — in addition to the one-on-one instruction and, Groce said, "God help you if you need to work on defense."In his mind's eye, Consor sees himself walking down Commonwealth Avenue after a rigorous shooting workout. He is sopping wet, dripping with sweat, on his way to class where, "no one wanted to sit by me because of how disgusting I was."For making a bad pass or not taking a charge or similar transgressions, Consor and his teammates would endure "a minute on the bricks" — sliding through the lane in a defensive stance, a brick in each hand.The Louisville forward Stephan Van Treese said, "I don't think you can be prepared" to withstand the physical rigors of playing in Pitino's system, and then he went on to describe a drill that was a variation of what at B.U. Pitino called 170 and 4: a sprinting left-handed layup circuit that is as fun as a jellyfish sting, always coming at the end of practice. If players failed to complete it, they would try again. And again.Pitino used to tell his players, "if you can match my energy, we'll be O.K.," and even now, at age 60, he is in constant motion along the sideline. Recently the Louisville guard Russ Smith said, "If Coach isn't tired, then we can't be tired."The Cardinals hope to rest on Monday night, after winning their first national championship since 1986. But in the meantime, they will do as their forebears in Boston did. They will run and run and run, just as their coach asks them to do.
ATLANTA — The last 10 minutes of a college basketball game will never be described as crisp. Between television stoppages and a never-ending procession of coaches' timeouts, the average fan watching an N.C.A.A. tournament game often sees an abundance of commercials, countless team huddles and the odd spurt of game action, which typically has all the rhythm of rush-hour traffic.Lately, though, there seems to be yet another factor grinding down basketball's endgame. In addition to TV timeouts, 30-second timeouts, full timeouts and injury timeouts, the breakout star of this year's tournament could be what Davidson Coach Bob McKillop has labeled the monitor timeout.The monitor timeout — sometimes referred to by announcers as "taking another look" or "going to the table" — is that unexpected stoppage when the officials converge near midcourt to look at a video replay of a disputed or potentially disputed sequence. Unlike the N.F.L. procedure, the college basketball review does not involve anyone ducking under a hood, but the motivation is the same: trying to get a call right.Not surprisingly, the apparent proliferation of these stoppages has prompted much discussion at this weekend's Final Four. While exact data on monitor timeouts is difficult to compile, several coaches and players said that it felt as if officials were using replay more often this season.By rule, referees can use replay to double-check clock questions and whether a shot was a 2- or 3-pointer, as well as conduct related to flagrant fouls.On the surface, those conditions seem reasonable enough. But when officials stop play to check, say, whether there should 37.9 or 37.7 seconds on the clock after a basket, one of the unintended consequences is that it grants both teams an extra timeout, which can be a critical gift.McKillop knows. In the Round of 64, McKillop watched his team build a 5-point lead over Marquette with about 40 seconds remaining. After Marquette cut the lead to 1 with about 11 seconds left, Davidson turned the ball over on a pass out of bounds. With none of its allotted timeouts remaining, Marquette should have had to try to win the game without drawing up a play.The officials, though, took a monitor timeout to check the clock. That allowed Marquette Coach Buzz Williams a chance to tell his players exactly what he wanted, and Vander Blue, a wily guard, came out of the timeout and hit a game-winning shot. McKillop was left feeling that Davidson had been eliminated, at least in part, because of what he said was an unfair advantage."So much of what was done by us in the last few moments of that game was dictated by the fact that they had no timeouts," McKillop said in an interview. "By the letter, everything was done right. The officials did the right thing and made the right call. But Marquette got an advantage, and it's something that I'm sure will be looked at."One potential remedy would be requiring players to stay on the court during any review (instead of allowing teams to congregate in the bench area), but the strategic ramifications of the monitor review go hand in hand with two larger issues connected to the proliferation of pauses in college basketball: the rules surrounding replay use and the coaches' desire to manage as much of the endgame as possible.Several game officials have complained privately this year about the replay restrictions and directives. In an effort to reduce dangerous contact near players' faces, officials are instructed to use replay to judge potential flagrant fouls. That instruction has led to frequent stoppages, as referees will generally call a regular foul and then go to the monitor to see if a flagrant is warranted."We are not allowed to downgrade from a flagrant if we see there wasn't contact," said one game official, who spoke on the condition of anonymity because he was not authorized to discuss policies publicly. "So there's almost no choice: call the regular foul and then stop the game and go take a look."With Wichita State's tight defensive style — "there are always more elbows because we're up so close," the junior forward Cleanthony Early said — it seems almost inevitable there will be a monitor review of some kind on Saturday during the Shockers' national semifinal against Louisville. And that is in addition to any instances in which the referees stop to adjust the clock.Those stoppages, as well as those in which officials confirm whether a shot was made from behind the 3-point line, have become an area for coaches to employ gamesmanship. McKillop said many coaches would already do whatever they could to extend timeouts a few extra seconds; he mentioned that some teams even had a coach spill water on the court intentionally, causing a delay. The game official said coaches often shouted that officials should check the monitor.Even if the referee is nearly certain a shot was a 2-pointer, the official said, it is difficult not to stop the action and take a look.All of that, combined with the standard every-four-minute television timeouts and all the allotted team timeouts, can make for a herky-jerky pace to the game that is either intense or infuriating, depending on one's inclinations. "It's hard to tire a team out," Louisville's Wayne Blackshear joked.The Michigan freshman Glenn Robinson III said: "It is really different than in high school. It takes a little bit to get used to it because there's just so many more huddles."A few extra seconds might seem like a short amount of time, but for coaches, as Williams and Marquette reminded everyone against Davidson, that is sometimes all it takes."You can't plan for those stoppages," said Wyking Jones, an assistant coach for Louisville. "But that doesn't mean you can't take advantage of them."
The two videotapes that contain Game 5 of the 1973 N.B.A. finals had broken down chemically, turning them soft and sticky. They would not budge in a tape deck.They were so decrepit that Maurice Schechter, who has restored tapes damaged by seawater, viewed salvaging evidence of the game as the biggest challenge of his career."They were on the brink of death," said Schechter, the chief engineer at DuArt Film and Video, a postproduction house in Manhattan.The tapes are precious commodities to MSG Network, which hired Schechter to rescue them and prepare them to be televised as part of its 40th anniversary commemoration of the Knicks' second — and last — title.The game was broadcast by ABC on May 10, 1973, from the Los Angeles Forum. The Knicks were leading the Lakers, three games to one, in the third finals between the teams in four seasons. The 7:30 p.m. start time was perfect out West, but the potential number of Knicks fans who stayed in front of their television sets until the final buzzer was almost certainly reduced by the 10:30 start on WABC-TV/Channel 7.When the game ended — a 102-93 Knicks victory — the video seemed to vanish.No one — no fan nor anyone at ABC Sports — came forward with a tape, as Bing Crosby's family did three years ago to say that he had stored a kinescope of Game 7 of the 1960 World Series in his dry, cool wine cellar."No one could explain where it was," said Ken Mattucci, the director for content, licensing and acquisitions at MSG Network. "It was the holy grail."Last year, as Mattucci started planning for the anniversary, he contacted a collector he knew and asked if the collector had Game 5. He did. Mattucci, who would not identify the collector but said he was prominent in the field of sports video, does not know how the collector acquired the tapes or if he got them from a person who recorded the game when it was first broadcast.But there was a glitch: the game had been recorded, somewhere in the New York area, in the little-known Cartrivision format — which preceded VHS and Betamax — and only a Cartrivision system could play its 6 ½-by-7 ¼-inch tapes.Cartrivision's home video recorders came along around 1972. They were installed in TV consoles made by manufacturers like Emerson and Admiral. "Leave it to A&S to be first to show you the most innovative entertainment system since talking movies," the department store Abraham & Strauss boasted in a newspaper ad.But in July 1973, Cartridge Television, the producer of the video system, filed for bankruptcy, having used up nearly all its money to introduce its product. A liquidator in Ohio subsequently sold off the surplus recorders, one of them to a 16-year-old in Heath, Ohio, named Tim Thompson, who recalled seeing a flier that tantalized him: "Videophile's Dream: Color Cartrivision.""Oh my God, I had to get one of them," Thompson, who does 3-D computer modeling, said from Newark, Ohio. He paid $300 and found a repairman to connect it to his family's 23-inch TV. A year later, his friend bought a Sony Betamax machine, which produced a better picture, and the Cartrivision's allure faded.In recent years, however, Thompson has bought and sold other Cartrivisions on eBay, which is where Schechter found him.Schechter paid Thompson $99 for one of his 60-pound Cartrivision units. But when he slipped the Game 5 cassettes into its deck, they did not move.The restoration began when he tucked the tapes into a Ziploc bag with a desiccant to dry them out. Nothing changed. They did not play.He baked one of the tapes in an incubator. No change.He used the lubricant WD-40. No luck.Freezing one of the tapes reanimated only a few minutes of the footage.Running out of ideas, he asked some of his peers in the restoration business for help; one told him that isopropyl alcohol had brought the sound back on an audiotape.Schechter went to a small section at the end of the second cassette, which held the latter half of the game. If the labeling on the tape was right, he could experiment by dabbing the alcohol on footage of ABC's broadcast of the 1973 Preakness Stakes. Schechter mounted the tape onto a reel-to-reel cleaning machine and rigged a system that let the tape pass through a fabric that he had saturated with alcohol.That, to his glee, worked.Schechter then cleaned both game tapes with alcohol, which worked on everything but the second half of the first cassette.
ATLANTA — Late in the second half Saturday, Coach John Beilein worked the Michigan sideline, his jacket off, his sleeves rolled up, his tie loosened. He crouched. He leaned. He clapped and shouted. It was part coaching, part pleading, part aerobics.There Beilein stood, a handful of heart-thumping minutes from the national championship game, most every seat in the Georgia Dome filled. All it took was some 35 years in coaching, with stints at almost every level from high school to Division I. All those vans driven and uniforms washed and floors swept. All those games in small gyms surrounded by empty seats.He did not stand still.On Saturday, his Wolverines delivered Beilein to the doorstep of his first national championship, to the title game against Louisville on Monday night. This Michigan team brought to mind those from the Fab Five era, with a 61-56 victory launching the Wolverines into the final game of the college basketball season for the first time since 1993. Back when most of them were infants.When the game ended, guard Trey Burke sauntered toward the Michigan supporters, as he thumped his chest and fans threw seat cushions on the court. As Burke made his way back to the locker room, the same locker room where the assistant coach Bacari Alexander squeezed an orange into juice before the game, Burke yelled to no one in particular, "We're not done yet!"Beilein walked in soon after. The room erupted.Syracuse (30-10) had whittled a double-digit deficit to a point, 57-56, after forward James Southerland knocked down a 3-pointer, a rare basket on one of his worst shooting nights. Burke missed one of two free throws.The Orange inbounded the ball with a chance to tie the game. They ran a play for Southerland, who was covered. Guard Brandon Triche took what Coach Jim Boeheim said later was his best and only option. He drove the right side of the lane.Michigan forward Jordan Morgan slid in Triche's path. Morgan would later say he felt he had position. Triche would say he felt that Morgan did not. The officials agreed with Morgan and called a charge."I probably should have made a better decision," Triche said. "I probably should have pulled up."The Orange had one final opportunity to tie. Again, they called a play for Southerland. Again, Michigan smothered him. Again, a Syracuse player drove (guard Trevor Cooney in this instance), and again, a Syracuse player missed. Morgan slammed home an exclamation point at the other end.That was the pretty play, the one destined for the highlights. But the charge taken was a sequence that best embodied the Wolverines on Saturday — average on offense; resourceful at the end; if not a defensive juggernaut, then a pesky defensive team."At the end of the day, it wasn't offense," Burke said. "It was defense that allowed us to advance."Early in the second half, Syracuse missed three consecutive shots from in close. Guard Michael Carter-Williams tried to throw the ball off an opponent and stepped out of bounds. Southerland clanged another jumper off the rim.The sequence was indicative of the way the game unfolded, of Michigan's defensive prowess and Syracuse's offensive ineptitude. The Wolverines controlled the pace, sped the tempo, forced the Orange out of their comfort zone, in this case the 2-3 defense Syracuse made famous. Michigan was too athletic. Too fast. Too tough.Mitch McGary always seemed to force his way into the thick of it. He presented Syracuse with a conundrum: how to defend a player with the bulk of a center, the size of a forward, the skills of a guard and the nimble feet of a ballerina. The answer for the Orange was not well, as it turned out.In one second-half sequence, McGary tossed a no-look pass to forward Glenn Robinson III, who dunked the ball. On Michigan's next possession, McGary received a feed from Burke and jammed home his own slam. The Michigan student section erupted in celebration. The band played. The cheerleaders danced with yellow Michigan cones over their heads.McGary finished with 10 points, 12 rebounds, 6 assists and 2 blocks. C. J. Fair kept Syracuse in the game. He basically was the Orange offense, recording 22 points.
The Nets had eight games left in the regular season when the last-place Charlotte Bobcats came to town Saturday, in what was assumed would be a figurative stroll in the park as Brooklyn built toward the postseason.The Nets finally had a complete and healthy lineup, and, with seven of their final eight games against teams with losing records, Coach P. J. Carlesimo has remarked about the opportunity this afforded the Nets down the stretch.That is, if they do not fizzle as they did Saturday, squeaking by Charlotte, 105-96, in a lackluster performance at Barclays Center that probably left Nets fans scratching their heads.After the Nets had a hard-fought loss Thursday to the Chicago Bulls, their likely first-round playoff opponent, the setting Saturday seemed ripe for an April tuneup, an easy win against an overmatched team in which the Nets could resolve some deficiencies, rediscover their balance and maybe give their starters some rest.Instead, each of the five starters played at least 30 minutes, and the Nets had to claw their way to a win, closing the game on a 10-2 run. Deron Williams had 8 points in the fourth to finish with 32."We did a good job closing," Carlesimo said. "We certainly didn't play as well during a chunk of the 48 minutes as we would've liked, but down the stretch, they did a very good job with some stops."The Bobcats were the league's worst shooting team entering the game, but they managed to light up the Nets' perimeter defense. Ben Gordon hit six 3-pointers off Charlotte's bench to score 27 points; Gerald Henderson added 22 points and shot 8 of 12.With 1 minute 19 seconds left and the Nets leading by 95-94, Williams hit a turnaround jumper that spun on the rim for several seconds before falling through, giving the Nets some breathing room. Williams scored 20 points in the second half for the second consecutive game."One of the few intelligent things I've said is the only thing I'm not worried about is Deron Williams," Carlesimo said. "He's worked, he's come back and he's playing extremely well right now."The Nets remained a game and a half ahead of the Bulls for fourth place in the Eastern Conference. Both teams have seven games remaining, and the Bulls' closing stretch appears significantly more challenging.But as the Nets showed Saturday, matters are not always so simple on the court. They should have had a breezy game against the Bobcats (18-59) in front of a large home crowd, and they might have had an edge in motivation, coming off a loss.Instead, they came out sluggish and slow, allowing Charlotte to hang around. The Nets built a 29-23 lead after the first quarter and looked as if they were preparing to pull away in the second.Instead, the Bobcats shot 52.6 percent in the second quarter, including going 4 of 6 from 3-point range, to outscore the Nets, 31-24. Charlotte was trailing, 53-52, when Kemba Walker missed a free throw with three seconds left. But the Nets' Reggie Evans threw the ball away after grabbing the rebound, and Gerald Henderson was there to make a steal and soar in for a layup at the buzzer, putting the Bobcats ahead, 54-53.Charlotte has led just 14 games at halftime this season. Evans clenched his fists and shook his head. Carlesimo simply turned the other way and hurried into the locker room."I would've liked to play better and crisper, yes," Carlesimo said.In the second half, Joe Johnson started to find his rhythm, reeling off 8 consecutive points, after attempting only six shots in the first half. He finished with 15 points in his second game back after missing the previous five with heel and quadriceps injuries.The Bobcats, who had lost to Miami on Friday, showed no signs of fatigue. The Bobcats outrebounded the Nets, 43-40, and hit seven 3-pointers, just the 11th time this year they made more 3's than their opponent."They came out and hit some tough shots," Williams said. "But we definitely feel like we could've played a lot better, especially on defense. We've got to look at the film and see what we did wrong and hopefully get better."The film will show a team still out of sync on offensive and uninspiring on defensive."We can't have the highs and lows, like a great quarter, then a low quarter, then a high quarter, then a low quarter," Johnson said. "We can't beat a great team like that."On Saturday, they barely beat a poor one.
ATLANTA — Passengers on the express bus from Throgs Neck in the Bronx to East 23rd Street in Manhattan last Monday morning might have wondered why their driver was wearing sunglasses on a cloudy day. Kevin Ware Sr., the father of Louisville's famously injured guard, said he had no choice."Man to man? I was boohooing," he said. "No lie. I didn't want everyone to see me crying. I had tears for days."On Saturday night, though, after Louisville's dramatic victory over Wichita State in the Final Four, the elder Ware had wet eyes for a different reason. He happened to be looking away from the television screen a week ago when his son Kevin sustained a compound fracture of his right leg in a regional final against Duke. He still has not watched the graphic video of the incident, in which his son was hurt so badly that a bone broke through the skin.Instead, he said, he hopes someone will offer to show him a video of what happened at the final buzzer Saturday, when Ware turned around and found his father, who had walked into the arena moments earlier, for a long embrace while his teammates celebrated on the Georgia Dome court."I just wanted to tell him how proud I was," the elder Ware said. "This has been so difficult for him, and he's handled it so well."Recalling his son's immediate reaction after the injury, when he called over his teammates and told them to go on and win without him, Ware added: "To see your leg hanging out and you say, 'Go win the game'? That kid is my hero."Ware has become an emotional catalyst for the Cardinals since his leg buckled grotesquely in the first half last weekend. There were No. 5s — Ware's uniform number — everywhere one looked at the Georgia Dome: on signs in the stands, on the cards in the cheerleaders' hands, on T-shirts worn by fans.Ware did not imagine it this way. He couldn't have. He was supposed to help lead his team, not inspire it. Supposed to play in the Final Four, not watch it.But there he was Saturday, his locker in the dressing room replaced by a parking spot for a wheelchair and his seat on the bench turned sideways to accommodate his damaged right leg, which rested for most of the game on several towels placed atop another chair.Ware was supposed to stay put. But early in the second half, he ignored the team trainer who kept telling him to keep his leg elevated and hobbled onto the court during a timeout. He joined the Louisville huddle in a sequence that prompted several Cardinals players to look at Ware with wide eyes."I just couldn't sit anymore," Ware said afterward. "They were kind of like, How did you get out here?"Forward Wayne Blackshear said Ware was "kind of upset at us.""He told us we had to pick it up and, obviously, we listened," Blackshear said.Guard Peyton Siva said, "I thought he was about to sub in for me, I'm so used to it."Once the timeout ended, Ware had to return to his seat. Watching instead of playing was difficult, he acknowledged, and in the game's final moments, he dropped his head in prayer, not wanting to watch as his teammate Luke Hancock took two critical free throws.It was right around that time that his father entered the arena, having been stuck in Chicago by a delayed connecting flight from New York. The elder Ware, who said he taught his son to play basketball in the Bronx River projects and used to take him to the famed street ball mecca at Rucker Park, asked a security guard to tell his son that he had arrived. He was allowed near Ware's seat for the game's final moments.Ware said he and his wife split up when Kevin was a teenager but remain in close touch, talking and texting often. With Kevin Ware living in Atlanta (and going to college in Louisville), though, they do not see each other much, and Saturday was the first time father and son had been together in about a year, Ware said.That was why, when the final buzzer sounded, Ware turned and wrapped his father in a bear hug."It meant so much to me to be here," the elder Ware said. "I had those tears again."This time, he did not mind.
They first saw the video Nov. 26, the Monday after Thanksgiving, inside an office in Piscataway, N.J., but it was hardly the first time that senior Rutgers officials had heard of the troubling behavior of Mike Rice, the men's basketball coach.There was the upperclassman who earlier in the year had come forward to say that he felt bullied. There was an outburst during a game that led to Mr. Rice's ejection. And there were the months of allegations from a former assistant, who repeatedly claimed that Mr. Rice was abusive.Tim Pernetti, the athletic director, knew all of that and had repeatedly tried to rein in Mr. Rice, according to a 50-page report that Rutgers commissioned outside lawyers to prepare. He personally reprimanded him, attended Mr. Rice's practices and even assigned the university's sports psychologist to work with the team, the report said.But the video was stark, a highlight reel of abuse — the coach kicking his players, hurling basketballs at them and taunting them with homophobic slurs. Those epithets were especially galling at Rutgers, where a gay freshman had killed himself.The video, parts of which were made public last week, was 30 minutes long. It had been professionally edited from a collection of 219 DVDs covering hundreds of hours of practices, material that Rutgers had voluntarily provided to Eric Murdock, the former assistant, after his departure.Mr. Pernetti's decision not to fire Mr. Rice after seeing the video — despite internal university documents that suggest he legally could have — cost him his job, and has embroiled Rutgers in a deepening scandal during a time of tumultuous change for the university.But Mr. Pernetti is hardly the only person who watched the edited video and still approved of keeping Mr. Rice on staff until last week. The athletic department's human resources and chief financial officer saw the video, as did the university's outside legal counsel. At least one member of the board of governors saw it. Robert L. Barchi, the university president, has said he did not see it before last week, although at least one of his senior directors asked him to watch it.Interviews with university officials, former players and members of the board, as well as reviews of internal documents and legal records, show that when the most senior Rutgers officials were confronted with explicit details about Mr. Rice's behavior toward his players and his staff, they ignored them or issued relatively light penalties.The interviews and documents reveal a culture in which the university was far more concerned with protecting itself from legal action than with protecting its students from an abusive coach.University officials focused on the technical issue of whether Mr. Rice had created a hostile work environment, a potential legal justification for his firing, while paying less attention to the larger question of whether Rutgers should employ an authority figure who hurled slurs at and physically provoked its students.Mr. Murdock first laid out his allegations about Mr. Rice in a letter that his lawyer sent to university officials in July. He said officials repeatedly canceled meetings with him to discuss those claims, until Nov. 26, when he showed them the video.About two weeks later, Rutgers suspended Mr. Rice for three games and fined him $50,000. Mr. Pernetti did not offer much explanation at the time other than to say that the punishment was related to incidents at practice involving players."We commenced a thorough, lengthy and fair investigation, and this was the result," he said in December.Meanwhile, the university had hired outside counsel to investigate the men's basketball program and determine Rutgers's legal options. Lawyers with the firm Connell Foley of Roseland, N.J., interviewed coaches, players and administrators. They reviewed text messages, secret recordings and dozens of hours of video, noting the vulgar terms Mr. Rice used to address players.
The F.B.I. is investigating whether the assistant at Rutgers who first voiced concerns about the abusive behavior of his boss, Mike Rice, tried to extort the university.As part of its investigation, an F.B.I. agent recently visited the office of Tim Pernetti, the athletic director, according to two people familiar with the investigation, one of whom is a university official who insisted on anonymity because he was not authorized to speak publicly. Pernetti resigned as the Rutgers athletic director on Friday.In December, a lawyer representing the former assistant, Eric Murdock, a retired N.B.A. player, sent a letter to the university demanding $950,000, according to a copy of the letter. The letter — which was first reported by ESPN on Friday — was sent two weeks after Rice was suspended for three games for the abusive behavior that eventually led to his firing Wednesday.The university declined to pay the money demanded in the letter, and Murdock eventually publicized video footage that showed Rice kicking his players, throwing basketballs at them and taunting them with homophobic slurs. The footage has touched off a scandal that has led to the resignations or dismissals of at least four Rutgers officials.Murdock filed a wrongful-termination lawsuit against Rutgers and several university officials Friday, claiming that he was let go for being a whistle-blower. The university said it did not renew his contract after the 2012 season because he left Rice's basketball camp early and without permission, among other factors.James Tareco, a special agent with the F.B.I., visited Pernetti's office and other locations at Rutgers, the university official said.The investigation, which is being led by the F.B.I. office in Newark, is in its early stages. A spokeswoman for the F.B.I. said that following policy, she could neither confirm nor deny the existence of an investigation.A Rutgers spokesman referred all questions to the F.B.I. Raj Gadhok, a lawyer for Murdock, did not immediately respond to a message seeking comment.
Imagine the bipartisan bind Danielle Donehew was in, her knot of warring emotions, as she watched Louisville play Tennessee in the regional final of the N.C.A.A. women's basketball tournament last Tuesday night in Oklahoma City.In the final go-round for the Big East Conference as we have known it, Louisville was 40 game minutes from becoming the dying league's third Final Four qualifier. But in the first season of the post-Pat Summitt era, Tennessee was suddenly favored to reach the national semifinals for the first time since 2008 and — there is no easy way to say it — something Summitt, its beloved former coach, was certain to enjoy."Those two hours were really challenging for me," Donehew said.In one space, she is the associate commissioner for Big East women's basketball, roiled like anyone in the industry with a heart or a conscience by the shape-shifting world of big-time college sports.In another, she is a disciple of Summitt's, as well as a co-founder and advisory board member of Summitt's foundation, formed to fight the disease — early-onset Alzheimer's — that forced Summitt's retirement.Donehew, who was a graduate assistant and director of operations for Summitt's team from 2001 to 2008, was close enough to be inside the circle after the painful diagnosis came in the summer of 2011. She was part of a small group that included Summitt's son, Tyler, meeting one day to plot a strategy with Summitt on how to proceed publicly."We talked about what she wanted to do moving forward: her career, her plans, her legacy," Donehew said.But what of the heritage of the Big East, where Donehew has worked for the past four years, joining the conference at a time when its women's basketball fortunes had become very much the competitive equal of its acclaimed and soon-to-be-mourned big brother?In the 1990s, Big East women's basketball was more or less the Connecticut Invitational, a testament to the rising power of Geno Auriemma's team. But when Louisville pulled away from Tennessee in the final minutes in Oklahoma City, it joined Connecticut and Notre Dame here (along with California from the Pacific-12), matching the men's three-team assault on the Final Four in 1985 and the Atlantic Coast Conference's Maryland-Duke-North Carolina triumvirate at the women's Final Four in 2006.Add Louisville and Syracuse reaching the men's semifinals Saturday in Atlanta, and the five-of-eight affirmation of depth pre-eminence made it impossible for Auriemma to refrain from cracking, as only he can, "I guess the shoutout should go out to all the presidents for having the foresight to tear apart the greatest basketball conference that ever existed."Watching the Rutgers president, Robert L. Barchi, stammer like Ralph Kramden — homina, homina — over the Mike Rice video question while driving the proverbial bus on Friday over his former athletic director, Tim Pernetti, was a convincing demonstration of the see-no-evil fecklessness all too common at the highest administrative university levels with regard to their revenue-producing athletic programs.Along the way to more Big Ten dollars, Rutgers's national reputation has taken the kind of pummeling its football team will soon be absorbing when it lines up against Ohio State. Rutgers is far from alone in being in such compromising positions. Along with tearing apart long-established traditions and geographic common sense, university presidents everywhere have sold out many student-athletes, with the accent on the student, by putting them in travel-challenged situations against opponents that offer little competitive attraction.Women's sports are typically the last to merit much consideration or credit. In the wake of the most recent defections, setting off eulogies everywhere for the demise of Big East men's basketball, there was hardly a howl over the women's league, which has done the conference proud, and without the wretched graduation rates, among other embarrassments, endemic to the guys' hire-wire act.Including this year's Final Four, 10 of the last 20 women's teams have come out of the Big East. Three universities — Louisville (2009) and Notre Dame (2010 and 2011), in addition to Connecticut — have played in the final. Programs that were once laughable when mentioned with Connecticut or even Rutgers — St. John's, Georgetown, Syracuse — grew in recent years into tournament-caliber teams.After losing 12 straight to Connecticut, Notre Dame has beaten the Huskies seven of the last eight times and three times this season heading into Sunday night's semifinal. On its way out the conference door, leaving Connecticut behind to play in what will be called the American Athletic Conference, Notre Dame reflects the growth not only of the conference but of the sport since the one-dimensional days of Pat and Geno, Geno and Pat.Summitt pulled the plug on the rivalry with Connecticut for reasons she never disclosed and which no longer seem terribly important to either side.Donehew, in fact, was in the arena with Summitt at last year's Final Four, when they bumped into Auriemma at a Connecticut practice. It was Summitt's first contact with her longtime antagonist since she made her diagnosis public.A friend to both, a go-between of sorts, Donehew said the emotion was genuine and strong."They've moved past the rivalry that was," she said. "We're all in a different space. Now it's about life."Here at the Final Four, last stand for Donehew and the old Big East, it is also about change, coping with the unknown ahead, while relishing the here and now.
OKLAHOMA CITY — Louisville had just advanced to the women's Final Four, and the sisters Shoni and Jude Schimmel had helped cut the nets in celebration, a rare achievement for American Indian athletes. But it was not the biggest family news of the day.As the sisters left the court Tuesday night, their father beamed and their mother waved and flashed her wedding ring. After 25 years of companionship and 8 children, Ceci Moses and Rick Schimmel had been officially married, inspired in part by Louisville's epic run through the N.C.A.A. tournament, a mother's deferred dream realized and an accomplishment by her daughters that was as much a cultural triumph as an athletic success.Although basketball has long been the most popular sport on Indian reservations, seldom has that esteem translated into great performance in the highest college and professional ranks. An N.C.A.A. study indicated that during the 2011-12 academic year, only 21 women and 4 men identified as American Indian/Alaska Native participated among the 10,151 basketball players at the Division I level.The Schimmel sisters, who belong to the Confederated Tribes of the Umatilla in eastern Oregon, are not only participating, but also have become indispensable members of Louisville's team. Shoni Schimmel, a 5-foot-10 junior guard, leads the Cardinals in scoring at 14.4 points a game and has seemingly unlimited range on her arcing 3-point shot. Jude Schimmel, a 5-5 sophomore, is the team's steady sixth man.While Jude is quietly reliable, Shoni is a florid passer with a brash on-court personality. She twice scored more than 20 points and was named most outstanding player of the Oklahoma City regional as Louisville upset Baylor, the defending national champion, and Tennessee, which has won eight N.C.A.A. titles.On Sunday, Louisville (28-8) will face California at the Final Four in New Orleans. Through Shoni's influence, in particular, the Cardinals have adopted a more structured version of what many call Rez Ball, an up-tempo style that is joyful, feverish and fearless."It's a very rare position they're in to excel at this level," said Ryneldi Becenti, a star at Arizona State in the 1990s who is the only female basketball player inducted into the American Indian Athletic Hall of Fame. "I don't think I've heard of any Native American women getting to the Final Four, especially being the biggest part of the team."For Tuesday's victory over Tennessee here in the regional final, Indians from numerous tribes came in support, holding up signs that said "Rez Girls Rock" and "Native Pride" and "Never Give Up." Many said they viewed the Schimmels as an inspirational counterpoint to the despair of poverty, alcoholism, teenage pregnancy, drug addiction and educational indifference often found on reservations.Depending on the region of the country, 30 percent to more than 50 percent of Indians do not graduate from high school, according to various studies. And many who do leave for college often feel pressure to return in a culture that finds comfort at home, and fear and suspicion in the outside world."This shows you can go to college and you don't have to drink and have babies," said Glory Thompson, 48, a Cherokee from Holdenville, Okla. "Every step you want to take to get somewhere, it's out there. Just because you're Indian doesn't mean you can't go."Basketball serves a passionate communal purpose and provides an objective measure of success against the bleak statistics of failure on reservations, said Don Wetzel Jr., who operates the Montana Indian Athletic Hall of Fame, founded by his father. Stories abound of cars ringing makeshift courts at night, lights on, boundaries marked with flour, players honing their ball-handling skills by wearing gloves or dribbling over rocks."A lot of things are holding the tribes down in a lot of ways," Wetzel said, "but you cross those lines on the court, and it's an equal playing field. What these Schimmel sisters are doing is really impacting Indian country. It's all over Facebook, TV. Everybody is cheering for them."For as long as she can remember, Shoni Schimmel said, she was obsessed with basketball. By age 2, she was allowed to dribble freely around the house. At 4, she played in her first tournament. By 10 or 12, she said, she sometimes shot outside until 3 in the morning. Her parents knew she was safe "because they could hear me dribbling.""Rez Ball," Shoni said. "It's run and gun, shoot whenever you're open, trust in your heart."
ATLANTA — A little more than an hour before tipoff last Monday, the Atlanta Hawks' Kyle Korver bounded up a fight of stairs at Philips Arena, two steps at a time, to a fitness room for a quick lifting session. Then, as his teammates relaxed in the locker room after having completed their warm-ups, he went to the court, where Team Korver awaited for one of the most precise, structured pregame routines in the sport.For 11 minutes, Korver darted at nearly game speed to assorted locations on the floor, carefully mapped out based on where an opponent would most likely yield shots. With white socks pulled up almost to his knees and his right foot bent inward on release so that it was nearly perpendicular to the left, Korver took brisk passes from one assistant coach while another occasionally defended, then he let fly, almost always from beyond the 3-point arc. Two other members of his group retrieved each ball, usually after it slid through the net, ungrazed by the rim.After the final swish, Korver slapped hands with his practice entourage and, sweat glistening, signed autographs before sprinting to the team meeting for which he is sometimes late, igniting good-natured yelling from Coach Larry Drew.Later, with three and a half minutes elapsed against the Cleveland Cavaliers, Korver clutched a pass from Jeff Teague above the top of the key and made the first of his three 3-pointers on the night, extending his streak of games with a 3-pointer to 68, tying Reggie Miller for the fourth-longest streak in league history. He moved past Miller on Wednesday when he made six 3-pointers in a 95-82 loss to the Knicks.Korver's run of 3s — now at 70 games — could not be more low key, largely by his own insistence."I don't really care," he said while sitting with bags of ice on his knees after the Hawks' 102-94 victory against the Cavaliers. "The only thing I like about it is that it shows a level of consistency."By 3-point practitioners' standards, Korver, 32, is hardly a high-volume shooter. This season, he has taken 402 attempts, the 14th most, and made 183, fourth most. His 45.5 percent accuracy is second in the N.B.A."When Kyle is in the building, he is within range," said Teague, who added that the players maintained an unspoken awareness of Korver's achievement.The Hawks' season opener gave no indication of what was to follow. In foul trouble, Korver logged 15 minutes, missing both attempts from past the arc.In the next game, assisted by Teague, Korver struck early, the lone successful try amid four misses. Since then, there have been no zeros in the 3-point column of box scores, though he did miss six games because of back spasms, a sore big toe and the birth of his first child.There have been close calls. He made a single 3-pointer in 18 games during the streak. Drew broke his pledge not to call a play specifically for Korver when the Hawks set him up for a 3 halfway through the fourth quarter against Orlando seven weeks ago. Last month, against Boston, Korver connected with 1 minute 31 seconds left.As a reflection of the streak's insignificance to Korver, the Hawks' television announcer Bob Rathbun could recall only one time Korver had forced a shot this season."If my mind-set is on it, I'd go out and take bad ones," said Korver, who grew up in California as a fan of the Showtime-era Los Angeles Lakers and their adherence to selective shot-taking."I hate to miss shots," he said. "If you are guarded, you pass it."The Hawks are well suited to exploiting Korver's skill. On offense, they favor a rapid tempo and spread the floor, allowing him to roam along the semicircle in search of uncluttered space. The post players Al Horford and Josh Smith have mastered the kick-out pass, even when double-teamed. And Drew has put no restraints on Korver."He's really given me a green light here," Korver said. "As a shooter, that's a big thing."Korver's mental checklist of shooting mechanics has evolved with experience. In practice, he might slow down slightly to take inventory on, say, whether his right elbow is perfectly straight. A misfire can prove beneficial, revealing a facet of his game that needs correcting."I'm a better shooter now," Korver said, who is on pace for the second-best success rate on 3s in his 10-year career. (His 53.6 percent in 2009-10 would be the league record, but he took too few attempts to meet the minimum.) "I know it inside-out."Korver said any pressure he might have felt dissipated when he broke the Hawks' record of consecutive games with a 3-pointer, 42. Broaching the topic then was unsettling, given athletes' belief in jinxes. Even now, the less is said, the better.Korver said that he did not even keep track of his streak, nor the number of games in the streaks of the players ahead of him in the record book: 78 (Dennis Scott), 79 (Michael Adams) and 89 (Dana Barros)."If it ends the next game, I won't worry about it," said Korver, who acknowledged he felt uncomfortable on the single instance when Drew called a play for his benefit.Korver was presented a hypothetical situation: late in a game whose outcome is certain, he is on the bench, absent any 3s, when Drew offers to reinsert him."I wouldn't go back in," he said. "I am not going to sacrifice team play."
ATLANTA — The legend of Mitch McGary ballooned throughout this N.C.A.A. tournament, until he seemed less like a Michigan basketball player and more like some combination of Paul Bunyan and Chuck Norris.As McGary collected double-doubles and the Wolverines advanced to Monday night's championship game against Louisville, the exaltations spread. Of his basketball prowess. His football potential. His weight loss. His buzz cut. His unicycles.Mostly, though, the legend centered on his tournament emergence, the latest step in McGary's evolution from a top recruit to a role player to someone described by Coach John Beilein on Sunday as the difference between a good team and a great one. Those closest to McGary, though, do not see a revelation. They see the same goofy, lovable, fearless Mitch. Their Mitch."People still don't know who Mitch McGary is, I guess," said Wayne Brumm, his Amateur Athletic Union coach. "I'm somewhat relieved and satisfied to share him with the rest of the world. I don't know how exactly to describe it. He relates to everybody. I mean, grandmas love him. Grandpas. Little kids. Blue-collar people."He's going to take America by storm."Brumm does not have a favorite McGary story. He has three, all from the same week at the Bob Gibbons Tournament of Champions in North Carolina, when McGary was 15.Story 1: Brumm drove the team from Indiana. They left at 3 p.m. and arrived the next day at about noon. For four hours, maybe five, McGary and another post player sang classic rock, pop and oldies in the middle of the night. Just two 6-foot-10 guys who really liked to harmonize.Story 2: McGary visited Brumm's hotel room, where he found Brumm's wife watching a movie near the beginning. "A bona fide chick flick," Brumm called it.McGary flopped down on the other bed. "Oh, I love this one," he said.Brumm left the room and returned about an hour later. "Here they were, lying in bed, just two girlfriends on movie night," Brumm said. "That's Mitch. He goes: 'You came back at just the right time, Coach. It's a really good ending.' "Story 3: On the ride home, McGary sat in the back of the van. Attention deficit hyperactivity disorder had been diagnosed when he was a high school sophomore, and the long slog home made him restless. Brumm nearly drove off the road, though, when he glanced in the rearview mirror and saw his future-star big man, an elite recruit who would choose among Michigan, Florida, Duke and many others, with his feet on the ceiling and his head on the floor as the van cruised down the highway."Mitch is for sure the most unique individual I've ever coached," Brumm said. "I mean, he is a crazy dude. I mean, oh, my goodness."Tim McGary, chuckling, added, "Well, Mitch is definitely not shy."McGary himself added, "I'm going to have fun no matter what."In the last three weeks, McGary introduced himself — and his buzz cut and his three unicycles — to the larger sports world, to the casual sports fan. Other than Kevin Ware's broken leg and the way he inspired Louisville, McGary became the story of the tournament. He dominated Jeff Withey, the Kansas center ranked among the nation's best. He accumulated three double-doubles, one more than his total in the regular season and the Big Ten tournament.Late Saturday, against Syracuse, McGary threaded no-look passes and powered inside for baskets and rendered the Orange's zone less effective from the high post. He arrived at the team's hotel well past midnight, and when he embraced his mother, she cried. He had also received about 120 text messages."I'm shocked where we are right now," Tim McGary said. "My wife turned to me after one game and she said, 'He's playing like he did when he played for Wayne.' "
What was Brittney Griner supposed to say to the hackneyed notion of her or any woman trying out for the N.B.A., raised recently by the Dallas Mavericks' owner, Mark Cuban?That it would be an invitation to embarrassment? That she — at 6 feet 8 inches — would rather dominate in the W.N.B.A. against undersized (or mere) women?Graciously accommodating, Griner took the high, happy road even if Cuban's self-promoting spiel was a proposition that could lead only to nowhere good for the cause of gender equity in sports, conceptually speaking."When are tryouts?" Griner told reporters Saturday at New Orleans Arena, where the women's Final Four proceeded Sunday night without her and the tournament favorite, Baylor. "The W.N.B.A. is where I'm at. That is where I'm going. After that, if I get a shot, why turn down something like that? That's big, even if you don't make it."Actually, it was just the standard big tease, typically propagated by men, and one that — perhaps unintentionally — would make a sideshow out of a player who has been considered revolutionary by women's basketball standards.Yes, girls do compete against boys in various sports at the youth and high school levels. Danica Patrick has become a fixture in men's auto racing. Women like Ann Meyers (now Meyers Drysdale) and Nancy Lieberman took dips in the coed pro basketball pool back when the women's game was just getting off the developmental launching pad and needed the boost.But women have worked hard to develop incrementally their own college and professional arenas, their own measures of expectation and excellence. What, exactly, would be the point of setting up the most imposing female player to emerge from the college game to be physically overwhelmed by men?Why impose male standards on Griner and give those inclined to dwell on such comparisons more ammunition in making the case that the women's game is inferior?Geno Auriemma, Connecticut's outspoken coach, treated Cuban's pitch with the scorn it deserved."His genius would take a huge hit if he drafted Brittney Griner," Auriemma said. "I think it would be a sham. The fact that a woman could actually play right now in the N.B.A. and compete successfully against the level of play that they have is absolutely ludicrous."At least when Auriemma states something so obvious, it is with the credibility of one who has devoted a professional life to fighting pejoratives, stereotypes and pointless apples-versus-oranges comparisons.When Connecticut approached (and surpassed) U.C.L.A.'s 88-game winning streak, the longest basketball run in N.C.A.A. history, late in 2010, Auriemma fumed or laughed when some critics surmised that the achievement was less worthy.More recently, he brazenly proposed lowering the rim from 10 feet in the women's game to adjust for the average player being smaller — in effect saying that women should be confident and independent enough to play by their own rules that work best for them.Only 22, here to collect more awards for another dominant season on the way to being the likely first pick of the W.N.B.A. draft, by Phoenix, Griner understandably sounded more flattered by the attention than flustered."I was like, wow, Mark Cuban, he tweeted me?" Griner said. "It definitely made me feel good, feel special. I tweeted him back, 'When is tryouts? I can hold my own.' I'll try, too. I'm not going to back down from a challenge."Serena and Venus Williams dealt with similar pseudo challenges back when they were perceived to be too physically imposing for the women's tennis tour. Fortunately, that line of thinking died a merciful death. Still dominating the women of her era, Serena can now wage comparative war against the all-timers of her sport.Why should competing against men — "pushing the envelope," as Griner called it — be a yardstick for her when the question people should be asking is: how will she fare next summer in the W.N.B.A. against the likes of Tina Charles and Sylvia Fowles? In the women's game, they have earned that respect and undoubtedly will demand it from Griner when she suits up against them."I would hope that she would just stay with the W.N.B.A., because she's got the opportunity to make a huge impact and continue to prove what we already have," said Jeff Walz, the Louisville coach, whose physical team defense on Griner was credited in the Round of 16 defeat of Baylor.And last anyone looked, he didn't have Dwight Howard or Tyson Chandler defending the paint.Summing up the story of Griner and Cuban, Walz said: "I'm not sure it would really be for her, or would it be for publicity to try to say, 'Look what we did in Dallas, look what we've done'? "Nothing good, in all likelihood, for women's sports.
NEW ORLEANS — California, the West Coast intruder at the Final Four, did its best to break a Big East stranglehold on the national championship game. But in a battle of scrappy teams that felt like the junior varsity preliminary, Louisville rallied from a 10-point halftime deficit to win its semifinal, 64-57, on Sunday night at New Orleans Arena.As if scripted by a Big East historian, Louisville will play Connecticut, which beat Notre Dame in the second semifinal, in a final that will mark the end of the conference as we have known it.Unlike Coach Jeff Walz's 2009 team, which lost the final to Connecticut but was led by one of the country's best players, Angel McCoughtry, this Cardinals team has advanced without nationally known players — at least until it scored one of the biggest upsets in the women's tournament, over Brittney Griner and Baylor in the Round of 16."It doesn't even feel realistic yet, but we're ready to take on anything," said Shoni Schimmel, the spirited Cardinals guard who shot only 4 for 13 but added 6 assists to her 10 points.The Golden Bears led for most of the first half and until 3 minutes 40 seconds remained in the second.But two free throws by the 6-foot-2 forward Sara Hammond, playing with four fouls, put Louisville ahead, 53-52, and a 3-point play by Hammond gave the Cardinals the lead for good, 60-57, with 1:28 to go.Strangely, Lindsay Gottlieb, California's second-year coach, kept the 6-3 senior Talia Caldwell, her best interior defender and rebounder, on the bench, also with four fouls, until Hammond scored inside and added a free throw for that 60-57 lead. It was a costly decision.Caldwell had dominated the lane in the first half but picked up her third foul early in the second half, just as Louisville began to rally. She was not a factor after that. And without Caldwell taking up space inside, Louisville changed the tenor of the game."I thought what happened is that we started to rebound the ball better because they were just abusing us," Walz said, referring to California's offensive board-crashing by Caldwell, Gennifer Brandon and Layshia Clarendon, who led the Golden Bears with 17 points."We started to get a little more patient at the offensive end," Walz added, and that led to open shots on the perimeter for Antonita Slaughter, who scored all 18 of her points on six 3-point shots."A stat sheet doesn't always tell the story of the game, but I think this one does," Gottlieb said, noting that Cal was outscored in the second half, 37-20.Cal's first opponent was the notion that it was here as a decoration on the wall of a Big East-catered affair, with three teams making one loud — and last — statement for a conference that will all but disintegrate upon season's end.Louisville has another go-round remaining in the league that will continue as the American Athletic Conference, along with Connecticut. But the rest of the country will no doubt be grateful not to have to deal with the Big East behemoth, along with a perceived right-coast bias.Not that the Golden Bears — losers of three games coming into the tournament, the No. 2 seed in the Spokane Region — had come by way of recreational league play, having joined Stanford as a Pacific-12 team to be reckoned with.But in Louisville, they were facing a basketball brand name, men's and women's. Irreverently funny, Walz sprinkled his news conferences with references to Rick Pitino, his campus golfing colleague with the much more sophisticated wardrobe, a men's finalist Monday night against Michigan.Nothing formal for Walz, a shirt and slacks kind of guy, who received permission to dress down from Louisville's athletic director, Tom Jurich. The look matched Walz's philosophy, he said, of always remembering that basketball is a game and a game should be fun.No one on the Louisville side enjoyed much of the first half after the Cardinals built an early 8-2 behind Bria Smith, the 5-10 guard who scored 17 points but tested Walz's patience with eight turnovers.On the California bench, the reserves and coaches screamed for their starters to "relax, relax." The pleas seemed to have the opposite effect, putting a charge into the Golden Bears, and they controlled the next 15 minutes.Mostly, they demystified the Big East bully reputation, hitting the boards with a fury, while also playing excellent perimeter defense against the Louisville shooters who had rained 3-pointers on Baylor.Clarendon, in particular, smothered Schimmel, holding her without a point until the 3:59 mark, when she made her only field goal, from long distance, of a 1-for-7 half. When Brandon made a 12-foot jumper before the halftime buzzer, Cal had a 37-27 lead and was 20 minutes from making an even stronger case for their coast.Louisville, like its conference, was not done just yet.
ATLANTA — The nets did not move. That is how pure their jumpers were. In they went, again and again, from 21 feet and beyond, shot by a Michigan freshman named Spike and a Louisville junior named Luke. No one dared miss, and neither did. It was the highest-stakes game of Horse they had ever played — on the raised court of the Georgia Dome, a national championship the prize — and, perhaps, the unlikeliest one, too.Before Monday night, Spike Albrecht was known, in the words of his coach, for being the most eligible bachelor on the Michigan campus. He does not start. Before this weekend, Luke Hancock was known for rushing to teammate Kevin Ware's aid and kneeling beside him. He does not start, either.But he can shoot, and every 3-pointer that spun off his hands before halftime dropped through the hoop. There were four of them, and then his fifth, with about three minutes remaining, secured victory for Louisville, title for Louisville. It extended the Cardinals' lead to 10, and they eventually won, 82-76, to capture their first championship since 1986.With three minutes left in the first half, Albrecht had four 3-pointers and Hancock none. Fans around the nation scurried to their favorite Internet search engine to learn more about a player who began Monday averaging 1.8 points and ended it trending on Twitter. It was all Albrecht, all the time, but then, with Louisville trailing 35-23, Hancock got open, over and over. When his staccato bursts subsided, Louisville trailed, 36-35.The shooting display par excellence mesmerized their teammates and the boisterous crowd. Albrecht pumped his fist and gestured to the crowd. Hancock put his fingers to his head as he backpedaled upcourt. In 20 minutes' time, the tournament of Russdiculous and Trey — the Louisville guard Russ Smith and Michigan guard Trey Burke, the national player of the year — had morphed into a stage for Albrecht and Hancock.A few years apart, they followed similar career paths. Overlooked out of high school, each spent a year at a prep school to gain visibility, Albrecht in Massachusetts and Hancock in Virginia, where he landed at George Mason. After transferring when the coach, Jim Larranaga, left for Miami, Hancock sat out last season for the Cardinals, had shoulder surgery and emerged as a critical sixth man."As soon as we started playing Luke Hancock more," Coach Rick Pitino said, "our halfcourt offense evolved into something special."This has been a particularly emotional three weeks for Hancock, whose father, Bill, is ill with an undisclosed ailment, as reported by Yahoo Sports. He did not attend the Cardinals' first four games, but he and his wife, Van, reportedly drove here from their home in Roanoke, Va.After pouring in 20 points off the bench Saturday night against Wichita State, Hancock thanked Pitino for the opportunity. After leading the Cardinals with 22 points on Monday night, Hancock reflected."It's hard to put into words," he said. "I'm so excited that he was here. It just means a lot."Bill Hancock was present to watch his son become the first nonstarter to be named the most outstanding player at the Final Four since at least 1939. When the moderator at the postgame news conference made that announcement, Hancock, walking off the dais, just nodded. The emotion, he showed that earlier.As Smith strode to the foul line with two seconds left, with Louisville up by 6 points, Hancock hopped around midcourt and flexed, looking toward the crowd, before giving a flying shoulder-bump to Peyton Siva. Hancock bettered his performance from the other day, finishing with 22 points, scoring 6 after halftime, helping the Cardinals build their lead. That is where he differed from Albrecht, who scored all 17 of his points in an absurdly efficient 12-minute spurt."Fortunately, I was hitting shots," said Albrecht, who appeared dazed afterward, his eyes red. He logged 28 minutes, by far a career best. "Teammates were finding me."Plagued by foul problems, Burke spent the final 11:09 of the first half on the bench. In his absence, Albrecht made 3-pointers from the corner and the wing and the top of the arc, and a ridiculous floater and a driving layup. In Massachusetts, his former coach at Northfield Mount Hermon, John Carroll, took it all in. "This is crazy," he said in a text message.
ATLANTA — Behind the Louisville bench, those in cardinal red remained on their feet in the final minutes, unable to sit down, or feel comfortable, or breathe. Peyton Siva drove and Gorgui Dieng swatted and Luke Hancock launched 3-pointers. Here was Louisville, the top seed in this N.C.A.A. tournament, playing like it until the end.As the national championship unspooled Monday night, Louisville and Michigan put on a show, a production worthy of a stage, with acrobatics and dramatic flair, with stars in their usual roles and understudies in starring ones, with bodies that thudded when they hit the floor after so many collisions at the Georgia Dome.It was Cirque du Soleil for the hoops set.Louisville pulled from many elements, from its press and its pressure, from its outside marksmanship and its balanced scoring. The Cardinals (35-5) came from behind and seized control as the second half wore on. They ultimately triumphed, 82-76, as those fans danced and waved red towels and finally exhaled.With that, a college basketball season as chaotic as any in recent memory ended, at once oddly and predictably, in favor of the favorite."These are the 13 toughest guys I've ever coached," said Rick Pitino, officially a Hall of Famer now, before he revealed that he promised them he would get a tattoo if they triumphed on Monday night.Bring on the ink — perhaps "Louisville 4-eva" across the chest.The players left the bench in the final seconds and stood on the elevated court. At the end of the scrum stood guard Kevin Ware, who broke his leg earlier in this tournament, propped up on crutches, as confetti rained down on the court. Out came the championship hats and T-shirts, the black Louisville banner, the stage for "One Shining Moment." Siva grabbed the flag and carried it around the court."These are my brothers," Ware said on stage. "I'm so proud of them."So many elements. Hancock scored 22 points and earned most outstanding player honors while his father, who Yahoo Sports reported had a serious illness, watched from the stands. Pitino, who became the first men's basketball coach to capture championships with two Division I colleges, worked the sideline. Siva, who once talked his father out of a suicide attempt, swayed back and forth and sang along to every song, karaoke but on a national stage.The chosen few soon clustered on the court, as officials lowered the basket and the Cardinals snipped at one net with scissors. Dieng took his turn. So did another teammate. The basket was then lowered even more, as the assembled whistled and clapped and shed more than a few tears. Ware took the scissors and cut himself some nylon and held the net high in his right hand.There it was. Louisville's first men's basketball title since 1986.Afterward, Siva wore a clip of the net attached to a hat he had turned backward. Hancock carried the championship hardware with him to the interview room. He talked about the path he took there — lightly recruited out of high school, from prep school to George Mason to Louisville, all the way to Monday night, when he became the first nonstarter to win most outstanding player honors, according to research the N.C.A.A. said went back to 1939."There's really no way to describe how I feel that my dad was here," Hancock said. "It's hard to put into words."Michigan players climbed first atop the stage for interviews, their eyes red, their faces glum. Their coach, John Beilein, had reached the final after some 35 seasons, many of them spent at the lower college levels. He called Monday night's locker room "the most emotional I've ever seen."Of Louisville, he added, "I have not seen that quickness anywhere, and we've played some pretty good teams."The first half unfolded with a series of surprises, the pace frenetic, the play physical, each new twist as unlikely as the one that had proceeded it. Guard Trey Burke, the national player of the year in most quarters, scored Michigan's first 7 points.Then the game got weird.Then the freshman Michael Albrecht, just as the freshman Gerry McNamara did for Syracuse against Kansas in 2003, turned the first half into his own personal 3-point contest.
In the three-month span from Dec. 16 to March 16, the Knicks played 41 games, lost 21 of them and never stopped referring to themselves as championship contenders — a world-class case of cognitive dissonance.Only the Knicks, and the most zealous of their fans, could envision games in June while the team lost twice to the Toronto Raptors in February. In those months of midseason mediocrity, the Knicks muddled through two four-game losing streaks and lost nearly every game they played against the N.B.A.'s top teams.Yet the title talk persisted, as if the Knicks were either a) stupendously, irrationally overconfident or b) aware of something the skeptics were not.As they ride the giddy wave of a 12-game winning streak — punctuated and legitimized by a 125-120 takedown of the Thunder in Oklahoma City — the Knicks have earned the right to gloat."Our confidence would always have us believing that we're one of the better teams in the N.B.A.," Carmelo Anthony said Sunday after that victory. "Right now what we're doing hopefully is proving it to everybody."All things seem possible in a weak and injury-ravaged Eastern Conference, the land of torn A.C.L.'s and broken dreams. The Chicago Bulls cannot seriously contend without Derrick Rose, nor can the Boston Celtics revive themselves without Rajon Rondo. That leaves only the Knicks and the Indiana Pacers as legitimate threats to a LeBron James dynasty in South Beach, assuming anyone can derail the Miami Heat at all.Until recently, the Knicks (despite their place in the standings) hardly seemed fit for the task. Then J. R. Smith turned into Kobe Bryant and Anthony became Bernard King, and everyone went scrambling for the record books.The 12-game streak is the third longest in franchise history, behind only a 15-game run in 1993-94 and an 18-game stretch in 1969-70.A happy omen for fans: The Knicks made the N.B.A. finals in each of those years.A better sign: These Knicks could tie the team record by winning their final six games — a distinct possibility, given the schedule. The only serious threats would appear to be the Bulls (whom the Knicks visit Thursday) and the Pacers (who visit New York on Sunday).Yet assessing the Knicks as title contenders remains a fraught exercise. The streak itself — impressive as it is — is lined with caveats and concerns.Two victories stand out: No. 12 (over the Thunder) and No. 6 (the Memphis Grizzlies). Otherwise, the streak has been largely built on the backs of the downtrodden, with four victories over lottery-bound teams — Toronto (twice), Orlando and Charlotte — and others coming against weak or depleted playoff hopefuls: Boston (twice), Utah and Milwaukee.Only three teams beaten during the run have a winning record since the All-Star break: Miami, Memphis and Oklahoma City. And the Heat were resting James, Dwyane Wade and Mario Chalmers when the Knicks visited.But 12 straight is 12 straight, and most of the games have not been close, with the Knicks winning by an average of more than 12 points. They have trailed by double digits only once — by 10 points against the Bucks.The Knicks have looked this dominant before. They opened the season with 18 wins in 23 games, inspiring the first giddy visions of an orange-and-blue parade down the Canyon of Heroes. The current streak and the hot start have much in common.During the 18-5 run, the offense was blistering, producing 111.1 points per 100 possessions. Their offensive rating for the last 12 games is an even gaudier 118 — a huge jump from the 104.6 rating the Knicks generated over the previous 41 games.Indeed, the streak is due almost entirely to the scoring burst. The defense is the same as it has been all season: sturdy, but average.The Knicks' defensive rating over the last 12 games is 103.7, which would rank 17th for the season. That mark is virtually identical to their rating during the 20-21 stretch and just slightly worse than their rating during the 18-5 start.So this is about scoring, and specifically Smith and Anthony, who have fueled the run with career-best streaks of their own.Smith has averaged 23.8 points — 10 above his career average — while shooting .492 from the field. For the first time in a maddening nine-year career, Smith is showing some discipline in his game, driving to the basket more often and taking fewer 30-foot jumpers and crazy fadeaways (but also, hitting the ones he is taking). His true shooting percentage (which accounts for 2-pointers, 3-pointers and free throws) is 60.2 during the streak, which would rank him in the league's top 25.Smith's hot hand carried the Knicks in the early part of the streak, and saved them on Anthony's bad nights. While still recovering from his knee troubles, Anthony shot 61 for 147 (.415) over a six-game stretch. But the struggles were glossed over by the wins and forgotten after Anthony rattled off three straight games of 40-plus points (while shooting .642).The Knicks' hot start was also characterized by brilliant shooting, career-best performances and reasonable doubts about whether it was all sustainable. When they faltered for three months, the answer appeared to be no.This streak brings its own questions: Is the new, efficient Smith here to stay, or will he revert to bad habits under postseason duress? Can Anthony keep scoring at this rate when defenses target him during the playoffs? Can the Knicks make the finals with a merely average defense? Does their defense have another gear? What happens to the chemistry if Amar'e Stoudemire, Rasheed Wallace and Kurt Thomas return?And most curious of all: After months of mediocrity, where did this Knicks team come from?
NEW ORLEANS — Notwithstanding the imminent dissolution of the existing Big East Conference, or the possibility of what would be a most surprising defeat in the women's national championship game, Louisville Coach Jeff Walz failed to foresee the end of dominance anytime soon for Geno Auriemma and his stalwart Connecticut program."I mean, Breanna Stewart is a freshman, so we're dealing with her for three more years," Walz said of Connecticut's 6-foot-4 forward, this season's prize recruit, who has already been the Huskies' best tournament player after a tepid regular season. "He's not one to stockpile kids. He's going to get three or four each year, and then he builds players that go around his system."Walz added, "And I don't see how that's going to change unless he decides to retire, which I think he should."All kidding between two wisecracking coaches aside — or postponed for about two hours while their teams tie a ribbon around the traditional Big East and the 2102-13 season — Connecticut will be shooting for its eighth national title Tuesday night against Walz's giant-slayers from Louisville at New Orleans Arena.In a rematch of the 2009 title game, won handily by UConn, a Huskies victory would pull Auriemma even with the retired Pat Summitt and Tennessee for the most titles in N.C.A.A. women's history. Auriemma has never been one to count his titles before an opponent has been toe-tagged, but he did say: "What would be most rewarding to me? That it wasn't easy, that they were able to conquer some things that are hard to conquer, which is mostly in your mind."Not to get carried away with a characterization of a 34-4 team as reinvented or as a late-season riser, but this Connecticut edition, if successful, would be Auriemma's first to win it all without having been the best of the Big East. The Huskies had lost three straight games to conference rival Notre Dame before Stewart's career-high 29 points powered them to an 83-65 national semifinal victory, after Louisville had clawed back from a 10-point halftime deficit to eliminate California.Unlike other coaches who have been uncomfortable with Auriemma's needle lodged in their side, Walz has enjoyed the exchanges in the one-sided rivalry — he has not beaten UConn in his six years at Louisville — and said, in general, that Auriemma has shown him a much-appreciated fraternal respect.Now, understandably, more than ever, after Walz's swarming defense took out Brittney Griner and Baylor, the pretournament favorite, in the Round of 16. Baylor was the other team that Connecticut lost to during the regular season.In his street-smart Philadelphia way, Auriemma congratulated Walz for making the final by observing that the shirt he wore during Sunday night's semifinal — Walz does not wear a sports jacket or tie — looked like a tablecloth from one of the restaurants Auriemma owns.Walz took the bait and mockingly announced at his Monday news conference that he would be coaching his last game Tuesday night and would begin a new career in Auriemma's employ as a waiter.Not so fast, said Auriemma. "He doesn't dress well enough to work in the front room of my restaurant," he said. "He'll be bussing dishes and taking out the trash until he fixes his attitude."Then Auriemma said that he had run into the parents of Louisville's Schimmel sisters, Shoni and Jude, and, given Walz's pending departure from coaching, had arranged for them to transfer to Connecticut.Here is the cold, hard truth for Louisville: in this season's Connecticut lineup, which features one starting senior, guard Kelly Faris and standout underclassmen — most notably Stewart and the sophomore forward Kaleena Mosqueda-Lewis — even the more productive of the sisters, Shoni, would probably have difficulty earning more than token minutes.Many believe Stewart actually has the potential to be the best Connecticut player of all (including Diana Taurasi and Maya Moore). Walz recalled sitting with Jim Boeheim, watching the women's Olympic gold medal game in London, when Boeheim began praising last season's top high school senior, Stewart, who happened to be out of his backyard in Syracuse."He was, like, 'Wow, there's this kid that plays open gym with our women all the time at Syracuse; she's going to UConn, she's one of the best players I've ever seen.' I'm like, 'Yeah, I know,' " Walz said.Here is what Walz also knows, heading into Tuesday night. His team does not have to win four games to win the title, as will any N.B.A. challenger to, say, the Miami Heat. All it takes is one game, albeit, as Walz conceded, "pretty much" the perfect game."It's just like Baylor," he said. "If it's a best-of-seven series, I told my kids — I'm honest with them — I don't think we win that series."But that Round of 16 night in Oklahoma City, with Kevin Durant courtside, Walz watched his best shooters — Shoni Schimmel and especially Antonita Slaughter — attack Baylor, and his front-line players knock Griner off her pedestal.He knows he can count on effort from a scrappy team that, while losing eight games this season, including one to Connecticut, never surrendered when it might have used injuries and the loss of several rotation players as an excuse."No one thought we could beat Baylor," Walz said. "No one thought we'd come back a day after that and beat a Tennessee team. I got a pretty good feeling they aren't picking us for tomorrow night."But this was Monday, with Rick Pitino's Louisville team hours away from playing for the men's title in Atlanta and Walz's team hoping they might have a shot at joining Connecticut's 2004 teams as the only Division I double champions.Using impeccable logic, he concluded, "I'd rather be playing tomorrow night than not."
NEW ORLEANS — Almost three decades later, people remember the back-to-back 50-point games with the Knicks in Texas, the quick-release turnaround jumper on the way up, the preternatural ability to slither through the tiniest cracks in transition defense along the left side on the fast break.They typically forget the near-mythic context in which Bernard King shaped and reshaped himself as an irresistible offensive N.B.A. force and a Hall of Fame player, as of Monday's class of 2013 announcement.Players of King's era (late 1970s to 1980s) who battled substance abuse and the legal entanglements they could spawn often had their careers aborted in midair. And no N.B.A. player had ever recovered from what then was a virtual kiss of career death — surgery to repair a torn knee ligament — to regain elite status, if not the same body propulsion.One early Sunday morning in the summer of 1980, the telephone rang in my Brooklyn apartment. It was King calling from out west to talk about sobriety, his new best friend, a fragile relationship he had cultivated during the previous weeks at a rehabilitation center in Santa Monica, Calif.King, out of Fort Hamilton High School in Brooklyn, wanted to speak his piece with his hometown New York Post after a run of years in which he compiled a lengthy social and criminal rap sheet. The last straw came Jan. 1, 1980, in Salt Lake City, when King was charged with sexually abusing a woman after being found by the police passed out drunk.On the telephone, he admitted to being an alcoholic and said that drinking had become a problem during his college years at Tennessee, where he, a northeast African-American teenager, needed a release from the social pressures for a young star athlete in the South.He spoke of having had premonitions of death, the challenge of dropping the mask of denial and his determination to rescue his life and career before it was too late. He did just that in Oakland, playing for the Golden State Warriors, in what then was one of the N.B.A.'s more tempting drug and alcohol environments.The comeback was spectacular and executed with a near hypnotic focus he said he learned from watching his father leave every morning for his blue-collar job. King would need that same work ethic when he tore up his knee in what was a meaningless game of a lost season at Kansas City against the (now Sacramento) Kings.Few people understood why King separated himself from the Knicks, became downright reclusive, as he overcame a fear of water and learned to swim to begin a rehab that lasted two years.One day in June 1986, after the Knicks had drafted Kenny Walker out of Kentucky as King's presumed (and ultimately pedestrian) replacement, General Manager Scotty Stirling was asked about King's progress in rehab. He didn't know; he suggested to reporters that they go ask King, who was working out at Upsala College in East Orange, N.J.I was by then reporting for The Daily News; a colleague, Filip Bondy, and I decided to take a shot. We planned to sneak into the college's gymnasium early, hide and peek at King working out. We did not factor in his ritualistic dedication. He was already inside, working out with his trainer, when we arrived.Perched in the bushes, we watched through a window, though King was at the far end of the court and the view was not good. Several times, he turned to look, while we ducked for cover.Finally, King appeared from behind us, having slipped out the exit on the other side of the building, a flawless back-door play. He asked us what we thought we were doing. Stirling suggested we come, we said. He had choice words for Stirling but stopped short of the door."You want to see me work out?"In that instant, King had decided to take advantage of the opportunity to send the Knicks a message: don't count him out. Against a college player, he played one-on-one, ran the floor without any noticeable limp and polished his dormant jumper."How do I look?" he said afterward. Pretty darn good, we would go home to write.Our exclusive was dimmed that day by the shocking, cocaine-related death of the Maryland all-American Len Bias, drafted that very week by the Boston Celtics. King had to know on some level that it could have been him.He would play only six more games with the Knicks, though none with Patrick Ewing, at the end of the 1986-87 season. The young coach Rick Pitino, who will be inducted into the Hall of Fame with King in September, did not think King fit his defense. General Manager Al Bianchi would bear the brunt of the decision not to re-sign King one night in January 1991 when he returned as a Washington Bullet with his frightful game face to haunt the Knicks with 49 points while fans serenaded Bianchi with "Al must go."This is not to suggest that King has lived an incident-free life since that telephone call in 1980, because he hasn't, far from it. But in the context of what had already happened, that 1991 night at Madison Square Garden all but completed his career circle, just one digit short of a well-rounded 50.
Rutgers officials announced Monday that the university would begin an investigation into its men's basketball program and how it handled claims of abusive behavior by Coach Mike Rice, who was fired last week .This would be the second investigation commissioned by Rutgers into the basketball team — the first was done last year before Rice's misconduct was made public in a video last week that showed him kicking players and throwing basketballs at them.The footage went viral, prompting outrage that university officials chose to suspend Rice for three games and fine him last year rather than fire him. Rice was dismissed last week, and three other university officials have resigned since ESPN first broadcast the video.Rutgers officials also acknowledged Monday that Mark Hershhorn, the head of the board of governors' athletics committee, was the university's highest-ranking official to see the video before it was made public. He saw it in early December, before Rice's suspension, Rutgers said.Hershhorn, who runs a Pennsylvania-based management consultancy, said through his lawyer, Jennifer Joseph, that he called for Rice's firing after watching the video and that he was displeased when his recommendation was not followed."That was a surprise to Mr. Hershhorn and he was disappointed," Joseph said, adding that she did not know why his recommendation was not followed.During a town-hall meeting Monday on the Rutgers-Newark campus, Robert L. Barchi, the university's president, said he had ordered a fresh review of video recordings of all of its teams and that any offenses would be reported directly to him.The university also said that it would form a search committee for an athletic director to replace Tim Pernetti, who resigned last week, and that it had appointed Carl Kirschner, the special counsel for academic programs, to serve in the role temporarily.Barchi has been criticized for not watching the video last fall, but he said Monday that he had trusted his senior staff to handle Rice's misconduct."There was general agreement that this was the action that should be taken," he said of the original suspension. "It seemed to me that the right people had put their eyes on it, and this was the right course of action."Barchi added that his advisers never recommended Rice be fired. "I didn't overrule anyone regarding dismissal," he said.The packed town hall meeting was filled with Barchi's critics, many of whom waved signs calling for him to step down, but their fire was reserved more for grievances with the administration that predate the scandal.New Jersey Gov. Chris Christie on Monday called Rice an "animal," but repeated his support for Barchi.
Closing in on the fourth seed in the Eastern Conference playoffs, the Nets wasted little time dispatching the Philadelphia 76ers on Tuesday, 104-83, at Barclays Center.It was a blowout from the outset, the type of all-around performance the Nets have been pining for at home, thanks to a milestone performance from Reggie Evans, who has suddenly emerged as a fourth offensive threat.With the win and a loss by the Chicago Bulls, the Nets held a three-game margin for the fourth seed. If they hold on to the spot, the Nets will have the home-court advantage in their opening-round series, no trifling matter.The Nets had no problems with the Sixers, outrebounding Philadelphia, 67-34, and scoring 25 second-chance points.Evans got things going early, scoring 10 points and grabbing 10 rebounds in the first quarter, the first time a Nets player has recorded a double-double in the first quarter. It had not been done in the N.B.A. since Dwight Howard accomplished the feat in February 2012."I've got to do my best just to get the team something," Evans said. "I want to go out there and do my best just to make something happen."By the fourth quarter, Evans had more rebounds than the entire Sixers team. He finished with 17 points and 24 rebounds, his fourth double-double in the last seven games, after having only four in his previous 69 games."We just fed off his energy," point guard Deron Williams said. "When he's playing like that, especially offensively, we're tough to beat."Brook Lopez had 29 points, and the rout allowed the Nets to rest their starters, with their next game at Boston on Wednesday.Joe Johnson, who was a game-time decision as he continues to nurse left heel and right quad injuries, scored 11 points and was 5 of 10 from the field in 23 minutes.The man who helped establish the team in Brooklyn, Jay-Z, was not in his customary seat next to the Nets' bench.Yahoo! Sports reported Tuesday that Jay-Z was beginning to divest himself from his ownership share of the team. The Nets and the N.B.A. declined to comment on the report, as did Ron Berkowitz, a spokesman for Roc Nation Sports, Jay Z's full-service entertainment company.Roc Nation Sports recently teamed with Creative Artists Agency, a powerful Hollywood agency with several prominent N.B.A. clients, including the Knicks' Carmelo Anthony and J. R. Smith.By league rule, no person affiliated with a player representation company can maintain any ownership share of a team.Though Jay-Z's stake in the Nets is minimal — one-fifteenth of 1 percent — he brought new life to the franchise that it could never claim in New Jersey. He helped design the new uniforms and logo, opened Barclays Center with a series of concerts, and clips from his assorted hits are played throughout each game, including the lineup introductions."It would be hard to overstate how important he was to the rebranding of the team," Coach P. J. Carlesimo said before the game.Before Tuesday's game, the Nets displayed the 1955 Brooklyn Dodgers championship banner on the court to commemorate the 100th anniversary of the opening of Ebbets Field. ...Deron Williams tied Kerry Kittles for the most 3-pointers in a season for the Nets with 158.
One of the more pleasing occurrences at the women's Final Four did not involve a basket, or a rebound, or a net-cutting ceremony. Simply, Caroline Doty trotted onto the court Tuesday night, the first of the five Connecticut starters before its national championship game against Louisville.Doty, a fifth-year senior guard, made it to the career finish line, pretty much on one leg and, perhaps, as a future coach on the court."I don't think there's anybody that appreciates being here more than she does," UConn Coach Geno Auriemma said before his Huskies unleashed a 19-0 first-half run of suffocating defense and transition offense to run away from Louisville, 93-60, for Auriemma and Connecticut's eighth and record-tying (with Tennessee) national title.As often is the case in the separate but parallel worlds of the men's and women's Final Fours, the female experience is demonstrably understated. A lasting memory of the men's tournament will surely be Kevin Ware cutting down the final threads Monday night for the Louisville players he inspired after sustaining a gruesome leg injury against Duke.After three operations on her left knee, Doty knows what Ware has experienced and then some, just not as graphically or publicly."I saw it on the replay because when it was live, you see one of the Duke players cover his eyes, and you see everyone on the floor and you're asking why, you're not really sure," she said. "And when they showed the replay, I kind of got sick to my stomach. But the fact that he was able to go down to Atlanta, where he's from, and could be there for his team shows what being in college should be all about: experiencing, learning, moving forward with your life."That often is what's overlooked by those in charge who are consumed with ambition, or blinded by pressure. For the players, these games should be considered steppingstones to young adulthood, not life-defining achievements.Doty came to Connecticut in the fall of 2008 out of Germantown Academy in Fort Washington, Pa., a 5-foot-9-inch ball-handler and shooter, no budding star but certainly a surefire starter.She is planning to depart next spring with a master's degree in educational psychology. In between, she has learned a few things about life in general and how to deal with its cruel setbacks in particular.Doty's problems date all the way back to her senior year of high school, when she tore her left anterior cruciate ligament while playing soccer. She recovered to begin her freshman season at UConn but was reinjured while driving for a layup against Syracuse in January 2009.On Monday, Auriemma spoke wistfully of the 2009-10 season, when Doty stayed healthy, shared the backcourt with Tiffany Hayes and the Huskies went 39-0, beating Stanford in the final. "I wish I could have had that Caroline for the whole four years," he said."That Caroline" disappeared forever when she blew out the knee for a third time while practicing in August 2010. She missed the next season, sat on the bench, refused to surrender."That year, she really learned a lot, what things are supposed to look like, a lot about how to instruct," said Heather Buck, another fifth-year senior. "Now, even when she doesn't play a lot, maybe five minutes, she's always giving advice, able to see things and communicate that to the younger kids. Any one of us on the team could see her in coaching, and I think that's where she'll end up eventually."For the sake of a Connecticut comparison, Auriemma spoke of Shea Ralph, who finished playing for him in 2001 after five knee operations that prevented her from playing in the W.N.B.A. She wound up on his coaching staff."I don't think anybody's suffered from a physical standpoint more than Shea Ralph has at the University of Connecticut, or sacrificed her body more," he said. "With Caroline, it's been maybe even harder."Once Doty's quickness was compromised, she had to adjust psychologically, integral player to, in effect, nominal starter."Honestly, it took me a while to realize that this was something more than about me," she said.Doty has been a liaison between the coaches and the emotional guard Bria Hartley, and the most recent prize recruits, Kaleena Mosqueda-Lewis and Breanna Stewart, the new It Girl with the elastic reach and the high-arching jumper. Stewart was named the most outstanding player of the Final Four as a freshman — an academic year that to Doty seemed a lifetime ago.She strapped on her thick black brace Tuesday night and, three-plus minutes in, needed an elbow to shake off a defender, drawing a flagrant foul. Auriemma howled, returned her to the bench, not to reappear until UConn had a comfortable lead and again for mop-up duty. She finished with that one foul next to zeros in her line score.Gruff as Auriemma can be, he can also be a softy, and Doty said he had "touched my heart" with his appreciation of her perseverance, by letting her continue to start and especially Tuesday. Her introductory jog was a subtle reminder that the very best Final Four stories are more heartwarming than wrenching and need not be part of the televised action, when the big picture is in focus.
Carmelo Anthony has the N.B.A.'s top-selling jersey since the start of the 2012-13 season, and the Knicks top the list in team sales for the same period, according to rankings released by the league Tuesday.The rankings are based on sales at the N.B.A. Store in Manhattan and through NBAStore.com since November. The league does not include sales at sporting goods stores, big-box outlets or other sources outside New York.The rebranded Nets — boosted by their new black-and-white color scheme and the move from New Jersey to Brooklyn, made the list at No. 4, their highest ranking ever. Deron Williams, the Nets' star guard, has the sixth-best-selling jersey. The Nets' previous high was No. 5 in April 2003, when they were on their way to their second consecutive N.B.A. finals.Anthony, who overtook Miami's LeBron James for the top spot, is the first Knick to rank No. 1 since the league began compiling the list in 2001-2. James slipped to No. 2 and is followed by, in order, Oklahoma City's Kevin Durant, the Los Angeles Lakes' Kobe Bryant and the Chicago Bulls' Derrick Rose. The Knicks' Amar'e Stoudemire, despite missing most of the season because of injuries, is 14th.In team jersey sales, the defending champion Heat rank second, followed by the Lakers, the Nets and the Bulls.
BOSTON — The teams had not met since Christmas Day, when Avery Johnson still coached the Nets , and Rajon Rondo still led the Celtics . Boston embarrassed the Nets on national television then, and Johnson was fired a few days later.Perhaps the Nets now regard that game as one of many turning points in their up-and-down season. P. J. Carlesimo replaced Johnson, and with a 101-93 victory over the Celtics on Wednesday night, he has 32 wins in 50 games. That ties him for the best start by a coach in the franchise's history.More to the point, the Nets (46-32) solidified their hold on the No. 4 playoff spot in the Eastern Conference with the victory, their third straight. The Nets, who will play at Indiana on Friday, have four games remaining and lead Chicago and Atlanta, who are in a virtual tie for fifth place, by three and a half games."Along with our game Friday, this is clearly the best preparation we could have going forward into the playoffs," Carlesimo said.The Nets have a mathematical chance to overtake the Pacers (49-29) for the No. 3 spot, but it is a remote one.Had the Celtics (40-38) won, they could have put themselves in the discussion for perhaps the No. 5 or No. 6 spots. Instead, they continue to puzzle, seeming content to play out the string while hoping for the kind of postseason turnaround they have enjoyed the past few seasons.With what looks to be their playoff lineup intact, they lost at home for the 13th time this season — the second time to the Nets — but managed to remain three games ahead of eighth-place Milwaukee, which lost at Orlando.The Celtics appear destined to finish in the No. 7 spot, which all but guarantees them a first-round series against the Knicks, who lead No. 3 Indiana by two and a half games. The Knicks have five games to play; Indiana has four. Like the Nets, the Knicks took three of four from the Celtics, winning both games at TD Garden.On Wednesday, the Nets' starting backcourt of Deron Williams (29 points) and Joe Johnson (20) abused the Celtics from the outside while Brook Lopez (21 points) dominated inside. The Nets took control of the game late in the second quarter with a 15-2 run and never looked back. Over the final 26 minutes the Celtics never got closer than 8 points.The Nets have not fared well against the league's best teams this season, something that does not appear encouraging for their prospects of advancing in the playoffs. The victory over the Celtics was just their 17th this season in 45 games against teams with winning records.Three of those 17 wins have come against the Celtics, with the Nets taking a season series against Boston for the first time since the 2005-6 season. In the previous five seasons, the Celtics had won 17 of the 19 games between the teams."My season is not about beating the Boston Celtics," Williams said. "But they're a good team, been a playoff team for the last five or six years, so it's a big win for us."The Nets spotted the Celtics an early 8-point lead before going ahead, 22-21, at the end of the first quarter.It was still a tight game with 4 minutes 12 seconds left in the half, when, with Boston leading by 39-38, the Nets erupted to take the first double-digit lead of the game, outscoring the Celtics, 15-2.Lopez had his fingerprints all over the run, scoring 7 points on a short flip, a shot across the lane with an added free throw, and a baseline set shot. Johnson added 5 points, including the Nets' sixth 3-pointer of the half."That has been an elusive thing for us, finishing quarters strong," Carlesimo said. "That's what elite teams do — they finish quarters."Despite P. J. Carlesimo's success, he said he had not heard a word about removing "interim" from his job title. General Manager Billy King said the Nets would take up the issue in the off-season. ... Gerald Wallace played 15 minutes early but missed the rest of the game with what the Nets said was a left heel injury.
For 24 days and 13 games, across seven cities, two countries and three time zones, the Knicks have crushed every challenger, obliterated every obstacle, eradicated all doubts and left little to prove in the fleeting days of this revitalizing season.They have their Atlantic Division title, their 50 wins and the assurance of a lofty playoff seeding. They have defeated the Miami Heat and the Oklahoma City Thunder, the N.B.A.'s reigning royalty, convincingly. Through their late-season charge — 13 straight wins and counting — they have built a worthy case as title contenders.There is only one thing the Knicks have failed to accomplish this season: beat the Chicago Bulls. Indeed, they have hardly been able to keep their composure when standing within 10 feet of them.The teams played three times between Dec. 8 and Jan. 11, and the Bulls took them all, decisively — the only team to beat the Knicks three times this season. Chicago led wire to wire in two games, by as many as 25 points in each, flummoxing the Knicks with relentless defense and snarling aggression.There were ejections: Carmelo Anthony, Tyson Chandler and Coach Mike Woodson all getting tossed on Dec. 21. And there were boos: the Garden faithful vocalizing its disappointment on Jan. 11.No other foe this season has so consistently made the Knicks appear so emotionally fragile."It just seems like some teams have certain teams' numbers," Anthony said Tuesday. "And it seems like the Bulls this regular season have it."The Knicks get one last chance to prove otherwise, Thursday night at United Center, although under less-than-ideal circumstances. Chandler and Kenyon Martin were left in New York to rest their injuries — Chandler a bulging disk and Martin a sprained ankle. They will also miss Friday's game in Cleveland.The Bulls are in no better shape. Joakim Noah, their defensive backbone, is out because of plantar fasciitis. Luol Deng (hip) and Taj Gibson (knee) are listed as day to day but seem unlikely to play Thursday. And of course, Derrick Rose, their All-Star point guard, has been out all season.Neither team has much at stake, or a reason to risk the health of its stars, although both are jockeying for playoff position. The Knicks (51-26) are trying to hold off the Indiana Pacers (49-29) for the second seed in the Eastern Conference. Chicago (42-35) is wrestling the Atlanta Hawks for the fifth seed, although the Bulls do not seem overly motivated to win it. The sixth seed would get to avoid the Heat until the conference finals.Yet there should be no lack of tension or motivation on the court Thursday — for Anthony, in particular. He missed the first loss to the Bulls because of a lacerated finger and was stymied in the two games he played, going 24 for 57 from the field (.421)."They caught me at some bad times," Anthony said with a rueful grin.Anthony was ejected in the fourth quarter of the second game, for swinging his arm near Noah's head, after a long night of irritating defense from Noah, Deng and Jimmy Butler."They've got multiple guys that can cover Carmelo," the TNT analyst Steve Kerr said. "Deng does a fantastic job on him, and the way that Jimmy Butler has developed, you really have someone you can throw on Carmelo for 48 minutes. One of those two guys can stay with him and make everything difficult."In Noah, the Bulls also have a mobile center who can (when healthy) help contain Anthony and still recover to guard Chandler in the lane.With Noah and possibly Gibson out, the Bulls will lose some versatility and strength. With Chandler and Martin out, the complexion of the game could change. But the hallmark of Coach Tom Thibodeau's Bulls is that they play the same way every night, no matter who is on the court, which is why they never dropped out of playoff contention despite Rose's season-long absence.So this game, or rather this style of game, might still provide some insight into the Knicks' late-season evolution, and their readiness for the playoffs, where they may tangle with the similarly stingy defenses of the Boston Celtics, the Pacers and the Heat.The Knicks' resurgence, after three months of dreary mediocrity, has been fueled by a scorching offense, by Anthony's brilliant efficiency and J. R. Smith's newfound shooting conscience. If they revert to bad habits — forced shots, self-indulgent play, mindless domination of the ball — the Knicks will not last long in the postseason. A great defense can do that to a player."I do think when Carmelo gets in trouble it's with too much isolation and not enough ball movement by the team in general," Kerr said. "And Chicago has the ability to do that to anybody. They frustrate a lot of teams. They load up on you. They get you stagnant, and you lose the rhythm and the flow of your offense. I think that's definitely the case when they play the Knicks."The Bulls do something else well: end winning streaks. They doused the Heat's 27-game streak two weeks ago. On a smaller scale, they snuffed the Knicks' five-game streak on Dec. 8, the fifth loss in the Knicks' 18-5 start. Soon after, the Knicks began drifting into a three-month funk.So here they are once more: the Knicks streaking, and the Bulls scheming to spoil their happy vibe. This game may have little bearing on the postseason, but the Knicks still have tests to pass — and one more Eastern Conference foe to defeat."We've got one more shot at it," Anthony said, "one more shot out there to win the basketball game and keep the streak alive and do what we've got to do."
CHICAGO — If you laid the Knicks ' top six big men from end to end, you would get 41 feet and 4 inches of pain, and enough sore necks, feet, knees and ankles to fill a modest orthopedic ward.The Knicks stepped onto the United Center court Thursday night without any of them, having arrived without the services of Amar'e Stoudemire's right knee, Kenyon Martin's left ankle, Tyson Chandler's neck, Kurt Thomas's right foot and the two left feet belonging to Marcus Camby and Rasheed Wallace.They put nine players in uniform, started the 6-foot-8 Chris Copeland at center and put their 13-game winning streak on the line against the feisty, physical Chicago Bulls.After all the fretting over injured giants, the game was decided by the smallest player on the court.Nate Robinson, the Chicago Bulls' sprightly 5-9 guard, exploded for 35 points, including 8 in overtime, sending the Knicks to a 118-111 defeat, their first loss since March 17.The third longest winning streak in Knicks history is over. The Bulls — who two weeks ago snuffed out the Miami Heat's 27-game streak — reign as the N.B.A.'s premier streak stoppers. They also swept the season series with the Knicks."They can have it," Carmelo Anthony said, a bit of contempt in his voice. "They can have it. They can have these regular-season wins. They did a great job at beating us four times. We're not worrying about them at this point. We're concerned about ourselves."For the first time in 26 days, the Knicks have something to be concerned about. They blew a 15-point lead in the second half and never found a way to contain Robinson, who went 10 for 18 from the field and 10 for 10 from the foul line, eluding Raymond Felton, Iman Shumpert and everyone else in a Knicks jersey.Anthony led the Knicks with 36 points, his sixth straight game with at least 35, breaking Bernard King's franchise record. He also grabbed 19 rebounds, helping offset the absences of, well, everybody.But Anthony missed the biggest shot of the night, an open 19-footer at the regulation buzzer. When overtime arrived, the Knicks had nothing left. They made just 3 of 11 shots and were outscored by Robinson alone.J. R. Smith scored 28 points but went 1 for 6 in overtime.There was one more injury scare along the way. Raymond Felton sprained his right knee while chasing after the jump ball in overtime and crumpled to the court, wincing."I mean, the first thing you're thinking is, Is he going to get up and continue?" said Woodson, who rushed onto the court to check on Felton.Felton did get up and finished the game. Despite an obvious limp, he said he would play Friday night in Cleveland.The Knicks (51-27) still lead the Indiana Pacers (49-29) by two games in the race for the second seed in the East, with four games to play. The Pacers visit Madison Square Garden on Sunday. Chicago (43-35) moved a half-game ahead of the Atlanta Hawks for the fifth seed.The Bulls are the only team in the East to go undefeated against the Knicks this season — a fact the Knicks dismissed as trivial."We played them four times; we came up short four times," Jason Kidd said. "There's a bigger picture right now."Not as easily dismissed was that the Bulls again flustered the Knicks into technical fouls and tough shots. The Knicks converted just 40.4 percent of their field-goal attempts, with Anthony going 13 for 35 and Smith going 11 for 27.The Bulls surged ahead by 7 points in the fourth quarter, with Robinson providing a nifty reverse layup and two 3-pointers, celebrating the second one by co-opting Steve Novak's "discount double-check" belt gesture.The Knicks rallied in the final three minutes of regulation, and Anthony tied the game at 105-105 with 14.5 seconds left.The Knicks' revival has been built on brilliant shooting, so it is only appropriate that this season will be immortalized with the N.B.A. record for 3-pointers. The Knicks hit 10 more Thursday night, pushing their season total to 847, breaking the mark set by the 2009-10 Orlando Magic, who had 841.This season has also been defined by the Knicks' move to small-ball, a tact they took to new extremes Thursday, out of sheer necessity. With all of their big men sidelined, the Knicks installed Copeland as their center, making him the shortest player to start at the position since Buck Williams, also 6-8, on April 18, 1998.The Knicks could have listed the 6-8 Anthony at center, but Woodson dismissed the suggestion with a gentle laugh."Cope's the center," he said. "I can't call Carmelo the center. If I do, he'll jump on me for that."Copeland scored 14 points, and the Knicks battled the Bulls to a virtual draw in rebounds, never looking any worse off for their lack of big bodies.
INDIANAPOLIS — The Nets have had a playoff spot secured for several weeks now, and their seeding — third, fourth or fifth — has been the only thing at stake since. They might have begun resting players, or relaxed a bit, or even conceded a game or two, and few would have questioned it.But their foot has stayed firmly on the pedal to the postseason, ignoring the yield signs — like the ice bags piling up in the locker room — that might give another team some pause. They have stated a tangible goal: home-court advantage for the first round.They have stayed quieter about another: proving to themselves that they are ready to make a playoff run.At Bankers Life FieldHouse on Friday, a sold-out crowd provided a postseason-type atmosphere — and the bumps and bruises validated it. The Nets seemed to go through the ebbs and flows of an entire series in one hard-fought night and ended it optimistically with an impressive 117-109 win over Indiana."This was what a playoff game looks like," guard Jerry Stackhouse said.After building a 24-point lead, the Nets lost it in the third quarter and lost their composure over the referees and the Pacers' physical play. But they managed to steady themselves in the fourth, closing the game on an 18-8 run.With the win, and Chicago's loss to Toronto, the Nets clinched the fourth seed in the Eastern Conference, guaranteeing the home-court advantage they were seeking, and giving them a new feeling of self-assurance after a tough victory in a hostile environment."Hopefully, practices Thursday and Friday will be productive," Coach P. J. Carlesimo said. "But they're not going to be as productive as this was."Deron Williams scored 33 points, including 18 in the second quarter, but sustained injuries to his knee and neck that left him hobbling as the game ended."It was everything," Williams said jokingly. "I blacked out, I think."The Nets were already without Gerald Wallace, who missed his second game with a left heel bruise, and they lost forward Reggie Evans in the third quarter after he picked up a second technical foul and was ejected from the game.Without Evans, the momentum abruptly reversed toward Indiana. The Nets led, 81-64, when Evans was tossed, but three minutes later, with 2 minutes 10 seconds left in the period, their lead was down to 4.This came after the Nets put together one of their most impressive halves of the season, scoring 69 points — a season-high for a half — on 65 percent shooting to go into the locker room ahead by 19.But the Pacers picked up their defensive pressure, and the Nets began to lose their cool.Things began to slip away when Keith Bogans and Lance Stephenson needed to be separated after Bogans fouled him hard while Stephenson was going for a layup. Then Evans was ejected after tossing his headband in disgust over a foul call.Indiana seized on the Nets' loss of composure. George Hill scored 11 points in the third quarter, and the Pacers held the Nets to just 36.8 percent shooting.With five minutes left in the game, a 3-pointer by Stephenson gave Indiana its first lead.The crowd was in a frenzy, and the Nets appeared lost. A 24-point lead had been blown. The playoffs felt a long way away."We lost our composure there for a minute," Joe Johnson said.It was Johnson, who finished with 24 points — his most since Feb. 19 — who hit a 3-pointer to tie the score again. The Pacers would never regain the lead.Stackhouse added another 3-pointer, and baskets by Brook Lopez and Andray Blatche provided the Nets enough cushion to close out the win. Afterward, groaning as he sat down in the locker room, bags of ice at his feet, Williams said what the Nets needed to hear."I feel like I just played a playoff game," Williams said.
Before he stepped onto the podium for a pregame news conference, Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo was handed a white sheet with a list of six names: the night's injury report. He took a look and made a slight cringe.Among those named: Deron Williams, Brook Lopez, Joe Johnson, Reggie Evans, Keith Bogans — the five starters from Sunday night's loss at Toronto. With two games left in the regular season, and the fourth seed in the Eastern Conference playoff picture locked, the Nets had little incentive to risk their irreplaceables.So Monday's 106-101 win over the Washington Wizards at Barclays Center played out like a basketball game on tiptoe, or like a final N.F.L. preseason game. Neither team pushed harder than it might in a weekend scrimmage. It was a showcase for the rookies and the dusty end of the Nets' bench.The romp also seemed like a victory lap before the playoffs begin and games get serious. The Nets are no strangers to meaningless basketball, having spent much of the past six seasons in the Eastern Conference's basement, with little at stake beyond professional pride and draft positioning.They have 48 wins this season for the fifth best total in franchise history, and that has bought them the luxury of time. Time to rest their key players, with five days and two games to go before the playoffs. Time to take a breather, after a year that included a new franchise brand, a new home arena and a midseason coaching change.That time is a luxury that the Nets' first-round opponents, the Atlanta Hawks or the Chicago Bulls, teams still jockeying for the fifth seed, will not have when they arrive in Brooklyn this weekend. The only thing Carlesimo was complaining about before the game was being unsure which team would await.The players sitting on the bench — a majority of whom were dressed in street clothes — smirked and giggled as the reserves took their starring turns. Andray Blatche finished with 20 points and 12 rebounds, Kris Humphries added 20 points and 9 rebounds, and Tyshawn Taylor scored 14."It's all about opportunity," Blatche said. "I felt a lot of the young guys showed they belong in this league."The Nets have another reason to smile: although the injury list was lengthy, none of the ailments were serious or particularly alarming. Some bordered on the absurd. Brook Lopez sat with a mid-back bruise; Jerry Stackhouse was withheld for a stiff neck.Though Williams is banged up and Johnson continues to work his way back to full health, the Nets made it 81 games through the season with their rotation intact."Let's be honest, there are other teams in worse shape than us," Carlesimo said before the game. "We shouldn't be complaining about where we're at."The key player the Nets had been concerned about, Gerald Wallace, returned to the lineup after missing the previous three games with a left heel bruise and played 22 minutes, making 1 of 3 shots."The whole point was to get him out and get him a little cardio work," Carlesimo said. "Hopefully, he comes out of it well tomorrow."The Nets would love to get Wallace going again to the level he was playing the first half of the season, when he averaged 8.9 points on 43.2 percent shooting. In Wallace's previous seven games, he averaged 3.7 points on 4.4 shot-attempts per game.While Carlesimo continued to praise his defensive energy and hustle, the Nets hope for more from him as an offensive contributor, and need it. Wallace has one more game to revive himself in that mold: a game that counts in the score books but not in the grand scheme of the season, which will extend further into April and regain meaning soon enough.
The fourth quarter was about to begin Monday night at Barclays Center when a single voice boomed above the din, shouting at the assembled masses, imploring them through every subwoofer:"We're in a tight one!" David Diamante, the exuberant public-address man, exclaimed. "We got to support our Nets and show these guys some love! We need you on your feet! Brooklyn, stand up!"Diamante himself stood up, as if to set the example, as he does every night — a ritualistic clarion call that awkwardly encapsulates what it means to be a Brooklyn Net in Year 1.Most N.B.A. announcers do not stand and lead cheers. But then, most fans don't need the cajoling. Diamante is only doing what's necessary, injecting enthusiasm into a crowd that is sometimes too hip, too casual, too detached for its own good.Eighty-one games into this inaugural season, newly branded Nets fans are — like the team they follow — still learning, still carving an identity, still developing emotional bonds.As the comedian Jimmy Fallon, a season ticket-holder, was quoted acerbically observing in a recent GQ article: "No one's standing up. See? They need to work on this. This will not be here in a year. It's a new team. They haven't figured out what they want to be yet."The good news, seven months into the Brooklyn era, is that the Nets have turned out to be a pretty good team, with a growing (if sometimes aloof) fan base, wildly popular merchandise and promising results on and off the court.The Nets take a 48-33 record into their regular-season finale Wednesday and have clinched the fourth seed in the Eastern Conference, securing home-court advantage for the first round of the playoffs."I think a lot has been accomplished by the team," said P. J. Carlesimo, who replaced Avery Johnson as the coach after the Nets stumbled to a 14-14 start. "And I think there's a lot for the players to feel good about, proud about, to this point."The arena has been filled to 97 percent of capacity, with an average attendance of 17,196 and 22 sellouts — better than any of the Nets' last 14 seasons in New Jersey. Their games have drawn an average of 93,000 viewers on YES, a 238 percent increase over last season. The network has set the single-game viewership record twice this season.The Nets' sleek black-and-white jersey is fourth on the N.B.A.'s best-seller list. In the neighborhoods surrounding Barclays Center, fans wearing Nets gear outnumber those wearing Knicks gear by a wide margin.And though the Knicks still own the city and the Atlantic Division, the Nets were in contention up until March 18, when the Knicks embarked on a 13-game winning streak.It has been a stranger, bumpier journey than anyone could have imagined, starting with Hurricane Sandy wiping out the Nets' home opener and flooding their New Jersey training center, which was rendered unusable for eight weeks.Deron Williams, the $99 million point guard, meandered through the early months, looking more like a broken-down veteran than a star in his prime. Joe Johnson struggled in his new role as a second option.At times, the Nets have appeared listless or simply outclassed, as they were in three blowout losses to the Miami Heat. Other nights, they have been surprisingly dominant, routing the Oklahoma City Thunder on Jan. 2 and blowing out the Indiana Pacers last week. And they have been sturdy, winning five times in an eight-game stretch on the road that some observers thought would wreck them.The Nets are 14-7 since March 6, their late-season surge fueled by Williams's sudden return to All-Star form, with averages of 24 points and 8.5 assists and a .497 shooting percentage in that stretch.While the resurgence has mostly been attributed to better health, the underlying reason is a significant weight loss — 15 to 18 pounds — in late February, according to two people with ties to Williams. He is now playing at 198 pounds and looking every bit like a franchise star.The biggest loss of the season? Easily, Jay-Z. The rapper and music mogul recently began the process of divesting his stake in the franchise (a 0.67 percent share), according to an ESPN report, since confirmed by two people involved with the team. The sale became necessary when Jay-Z moved into the player-agent business, with plans to eventually represent N.B.A. players.Jay-Z gave the Nets their popular color scheme and their logo and, through his ownership and mere presence, a veneer of cool. No other team has had its uniforms unveiled by a global hip-hop star at a sold-out concert. He gave the franchise a legitimacy it sorely needed after decades of irrelevance in New Jersey.But that presence was more critical last fall, and in the years preceding the move, than it is today. The Nets are established now, their place in the Brooklyn consciousness secure. The perceived value of Jay-Z as player recruiter never materialized, despite his popularity. LeBron James never came.Jay-Z's portrait remains affixed to the press room wall, and he is said to be keeping his courtside seats. His music will surely remain in heavy rotation on game nights, when the music and the sound effects never seem to stop, even during Nets possessions.The manufactured noise is, for now, necessary. Nets fans cheer, sometimes quite loudly, but they take a few quarters to warm up. They rarely boo, even when the Nets are behind by 20 points. The passion is not quite at a New York level."We're building a base of fans," General Manager Billy King said. "I know the noise levels they make here when they get going, it's just a matter of time that it's like that throughout every home game."On their best nights, fans start the "Brooklyn" chants without prompting, stand without being told and scream from start to finish. Occasionally, they need a nudge. But it is just Year 1, after all.
Hours before the season's final game, 198 days after they opened camp, the Knicks gathered for another round of introductions, farewells and welcome-backs.They said goodbye to Rasheed Wallace, who announced his retirement Wednesday, after an aborted comeback from foot surgery.They said hello to Earl Barron, a 31-year-old journeyman, who took Wallace's roster spot and will serve as an emergency center in the playoffs.And they welcomed back Quentin Richardson — a Knick for four seasons in a less glorious era — who returned to fill the vacancy left by Kurt Thomas last week.Then the Knicks sent a cast of backups onto the court for a 98-92 victory over the Atlanta Hawks, who also rested all of their starters.It was not your average Game 82 at Madison Square Garden.The Knicks' priority was to rest their stars and get healthy for their first-round series against the Boston Celtics, which opens Saturday at 3 p.m. at the Garden. Even that goal proved elusive.Pablo Prigioni, their starting off guard, sprained his right ankle in the final minute of the first quarter and did not return. Iman Shumpert left the game with leg cramps in the fourth quarter. Chris Copeland hurt his left shoulder. Copeland said he felt the shoulder pop out and back in but assured, "I'll be all right."Although Shumpert is apparently fine, Prigioni's status is unclear. He left without speaking to reporters.After all the Knicks have gone through this season — losing Wallace and Thomas, playing long stretches without Carmelo Anthony, Raymond Felton and Tyson Chandler — every twinge was heightened."It's great that we all came out of there walking," Shumpert said with a smile.It was a meaningless game for the Knicks (54-28), who had already locked up the second seed in the Eastern Conference. The Hawks (44-38) slipped to sixth, behind Chicago, and will open the playoffs against the Indiana Pacers.The Knicks' attention now turns to the Celtics, whom they beat three out of four times this season. Both Chandler and Kenyon Martin are expected back for Game 1, after recovering from injuries. Chandler missed the final six games, and 16 of the last 20, because of a bulging disk in his neck. Martin missed the final five games after spraining his left ankle.Anthony, Felton and Jason Kidd were given the night off Wednesday. Prigioni and Shumpert were the only regulars in the starting lineup, with Barron, Copeland and James White.The night was more interesting for who was missing than who was in uniform. Anthony, Chandler, Kidd, Martin, Amar'e Stoudemire and Marcus Camby were nowhere to be seen — all of them presumably watching from the training room.Of the resting rotation players, only J. R. Smith (wearing a suit) and Felton (in uniform) sat courtside. Otherwise, the bench was nearly empty.Wallace, however, sat behind the bench and could be a fixture there during the postseason, despite his retirement. He is a trusted confidant of Coach Mike Woodson, who lured him out of a two-year retirement last fall. Woodson still wants Wallace around, for his wisdom and his locker-room influence."I like him around me," Woodson said. "I like Rasheed, man."The decision to retire was not entirely surprising. Wallace missed nearly the entire season because of a broken foot, and he lasted only 3 minutes 50 seconds in his attempted return Monday.Yet, in typical Knicks fashion, Wallace's retirement was shrouded in mystery and misdirection. At the morning shootaround, Woodson told reporters Wallace was "day-to-day." An hour later, the team issued a statement saying he had retired.Barron was already at the team's headquarters in Westchester County, signing his new contract, a clear indication that team officials had planned for both transactions. Woodson declined to explain the discrepancy."I'm not going to go into all of that," he said before the game. "I mean, the bottom line is: He's retiring. It doesn't matter when it happened."Neither Richardson nor Barron is likely to make the postseason rotation, although Richardson — a skilled 3-point shooter and defender — could be valuable as a spot player. The Knicks have been thin at shooting guard and small forward all season.Richardson, 33, had been out of the league since being cut by the Orlando Magic during camp. He was both surprised and thrilled to get the call from the Knicks, who signed him Tuesday."It's very exciting," said Richardson, who played here from 2005 through 2009, when the Knicks averaged 28 wins. "I always knew this was the mecca of basketball. They have the greatest fans, even when I was here. We didn't play that well, but when we played all right it got crazy. I've always been watching. They're at the level they need to be in competing for a title."While sitting out, Carmelo Anthony clinched his first N.B.A. scoring title, with a final average of 28.7 points per game, ending Kevin Durant's three-year streak as the league leader. Durant sat out Oklahoma City's season finale, finishing with an average of 28.1 points per game. Anthony is just the second Knick to win a scoring title, joining Bernard King in 1984-85. ... The Knicks finished with their best overall record since the 1996-97 season, when they won 57 games.
The Nets have been in playoff mode for almost a week now, making the last two games of the regular season largely irrelevant and, to put it bluntly, a bit of a drag. They spent Monday tending to the tired needs of their starters; they spent Wednesday praying those same starters would stay upright.They did not do much scoreboard watching either, letting fate — or a second-half surge by the Chicago Bulls — dictate their first-round matchup. It was only in the closing minutes of the Nets' 103-99 win over Detroit on Wednesday that the outcome was decided. With the Bulls' win over Washington, and the Atlanta Hawks' loss to the Knicks, Chicago earned the fifth seed and a series with the fourth-seeded Nets; Game 1 will be in Brooklyn on Saturday evening.The Nets are doing all they can to build up the franchise's first playoff appearance since 2007 — and the first playoff appearance by a Brooklyn team since 1956 — as a must-see event. The playoff décor: black on black.The blackout is the brainchild of the Nets' chief executive officer, Brett Yormark. The hope is to create a unified (and intimidating) atmosphere: fans wearing black while sitting in black seats and watching the action on a court with black trim. And yes, even the players might be wearing black, even though the Nets traditionally wear white at home."The goal is to wear black at home," said Fred Mangione, the team's chief marketing officer.The Nets would need permission from the Bulls to alter their designated uniforms, permission that is normally given without much issue. Mangione said black towels would be distributed to fans for Game 2.On Wednesday, the anticipation was evident in Barclays Center and on the court; the Nets have clearly been eager to get the playoffs under way already. It hardly mattered that, heading into the game, the Nets still did not know who they would play in the first round or when.All week, the players never stated a preference. They claimed to be preoccupied with getting themselves in shape and healthy, which they said they accomplished."It's the first time in a long time we've had everybody at full strength," point guard Deron Williams said. "We're definitely excited about that and feel confident that when we're playing at a high level, we're tough to beat."Some teams give their stars the night off on the cusp of the postseason — as the Hawks and the Knicks did Wednesday — but Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo opted to risk playing his.All five starters had been given Monday's game against Washington off, but on Wednesday, Carlesimo rolled the dice, held his breath and gave his key players 20-something minutes to build a healthy sweat and a little momentum. By the start of the fourth quarter, they had towels slung over their shoulders.There were a few signs of life, like a steal by Williams that led to an alley-oop in transition by Gerald Wallace. On the next play, Wallace stole another pass and finished with a one-handed dunk.Brook Lopez had 20 points and 9 rebounds, and Andray Blatche scored 15 points. With that, the Nets won their 49th game, matching the second-highest total in the franchise's N.B.A. history, and sounded ready to face the Bulls."The ball's been moving offensively; people are on the same page," Joe Johnson said. "We're clicking. The cohesiveness is there. It's pretty good timing for us."There were video tributes from the players sprinkled throughout the evening, thanking the fans for their support and encouraging them to wear black this weekend. A soft "Brooklyn" chant picked up at the end of the game. But the fans may have been saving their voices.As the game wore on, Lopez took a moment to reflect, he said. He thought back to when General Manager Billy King and his staff would bring artist renderings of Barclays Center, with "little factoids" about the size of Brooklyn and its capacity for enthusiasm.That enthusiasm is expected to be in full force Saturday — a black curtain of love."It's really been an amazing journey," Lopez said. "To finally be here now — on the verge of the playoffs. It's pretty incredible."
LOS ANGELES — When Mike D'Antoni took over as the Lakers ' coach in November, he felt that he had a big problem. Two of them, actually. He did not think there was any way he could keep Dwight Howard and Pau Gasol on the court at the same time."I was skeptical at first, mainly because Dwight wasn't 100 percent and neither was Pau," D'Antoni said. "But now, with both of them being close to 100 percent, yeah, they can play together. I probably had a preconceived notion, and it probably wasn't right."That admission came on the eve of Wednesday night's regular-season finale against the Houston Rockets at Staples Center, where the Lakers arrived not knowing if they would need to win to secure a playoff berth. As it turned out, minutes before the Lakers took the floor, the Memphis Grizzlies did them a favor by closing out an 86-70 victory over the Utah Jazz, who had been vying with the Lakers for the final berth.The result took the pressure off the Lakers, who are playoff-bound after a tumultuous season. The latest obstacle presented itself last week, when Kobe Bryant was lost for the season with a torn Achilles' tendon. In addition, Steve Nash, still hampered by hip and hamstring soreness, did not play against the Rockets, and his status for the playoffs remained unknown.The Lakers, though, appear to be a confident bunch. They had won seven of their last eight games heading into the finale. Such was the state of play that Howard showed up for the game wearing a white tuxedo jacket. "Guys are very focused," he said.In the playoffs, D'Antoni will certainly rely on Howard and Gasol, a potent frontcourt in recent weeks. The two have accounted for 38.2 percent of the Lakers' scoring over the last eight games. It merely required the length of the season for them to find the right chemistry."It all takes time to settle in and adjust and understand certain things, understand certain people and how to maximize their qualities," Gasol said, adding, "When we share the love and share the ball a little bit, we can be really effective."Gasol has done most of his damage from the high post, having averaged 16.4 points, 9.7 rebounds and 5.8 assists over his last 10 games while shooting 54.1 percent from the field. His success has cleared space for Howard to operate in the paint. In Sunday's 91-86 victory over the San Antonio Spurs, Howard finished with 26 points and 17 rebounds — a huge effort as the Lakers coped with life without Bryant for the first time."We can coexist," Howard said of his relationship with Gasol. "We know how to play basketball."Each has had his share of struggles. After spending the off-season recovering from back surgery, Howard was hindered by a torn labrum in his right shoulder, an injury that forced him to miss six games. His production also waned in the presence of Bryant, who dominated the ball for long stretches. D'Antoni said Howard seemed to play with a different mind-set in recent weeks."I think that goes with feeling good," D'Antoni said. "When you feel bad in the morning, sometimes you get cranky. And we had a lot of things to be cranky about."D'Antoni was critical of Gasol's conditioning earlier this season, going so far as to bench him for the fourth quarter of a win over the New Orleans Hornets in January. Gasol later missed 20 games after tearing the plantar fascia in his right foot. He returned to play his best basketball of the season."When he came in, he had his way of doing things," Gasol said of D'Antoni. "That's why they brought him here, with his philosophy and the way he's coached. He did his best. There's nothing really to say about it. It's taken a little while. Unfortunately, my injuries also probably slowed that process down."Howard was adamant that nothing had changed in the on-court dynamic between him and Gasol. In his mind, he said, it has always been solid. But he also credited D'Antoni with helping them "grow as players" by freeing them up to move away from the basket."He believes that we can do that," Howard said.Both players' time with the Lakers could run its course in the postseason. Howard will be an unrestricted free agent, and Gasol, who is due to make $19.3 million next season, could be traded or waived, the latter option under an amnesty provision.After such a long season, one packed with injuries and challenges, the two seem eager for the playoffs to begin."It's just a matter of proving that we can both deliver and be dominant," Gasol said.
As N.B.A. owners debate the merits of the two groups vying to buy the Sacramento Kings , including at their two-day meeting in New York on Thursday and Friday, they will scrutinize the size of each group's bid and each's ability to build a new arena.The group led by Christopher R. Hansen, a hedge fund manager, and Steven A. Ballmer, the chief executive of Microsoft, had been thought to have the upper hand. It has a tentative agreement to buy 65 percent of the team from the Maloof family and approval to build a new arena from Seattle, where the group hopes to move the team if it wins.The rival group, which includes the founder of 24-Hour Fitness, Mark S. Mastrov, and Paul E. Jacobs, the chief executive of Qualcomm, has an offer worth about as much and approval to build a new arena in Sacramento. The group has another attraction: Vivek Ranadive.Ranadive, a software businessman from Silicon Valley who is vice chairman of the Golden State Warriors, will become the face of the Kings if his group is chosen. With deep pockets and extensive contacts, he plans to promote the N.B.A. heavily in his native India and to Indians living in the United States.Cricket is the most popular sport in India, but several sports, including basketball, vie for the second spot."I believe basketball will be the global sport of the 21st century because it can be played by young and old, boys and girls, indoors or outdoors, rich or poor," Ranadive said this week in a phone interview. "Independent of whether the Kings bid succeeds or not, I'm very committed to making it the No. 2 sport in India."The two sets of bidders could learn their fate in the coming days or weeks. On Wednesday, the N.B.A.'s advisory finance and relocation committees met to discuss the offers. They may recommend a bid to the league's owners this week, although Commissioner David Stern told reporters Wednesday that it would probably take several more weeks before the owners vote on the sale of the team. Either way, the recommendations of the committees are expected to hold sway.If the group trying to keep the team in Sacramento wins, Ranadive will have to sell his minority stake in the Warriors so he can become the general partner of the Kings. He would then be the first majority owner of Indian descent in the N.B.A. and become an instant celebrity among the Indian diaspora and in India.His star power in India should help supplement the N.B.A.'s fledgling efforts there. The league opened an office in Mumbai in 2011 and now has six employees looking for ways to market the league. Three N.B.A. games are shown each week on the channel that broadcasts the country's largest cricket league, and the N.B.A. has started a Web site in India. Several N.B.A. players have traveled to India to hold clinics and promote the sport.Parallels with the N.B.A.'s efforts in China are often made. Stern, who this month traveled to India for the first time, said the comparisons were unfair because the Chinese have been playing the game far longer, have their own leagues and have produced N.B.A. stars. But the potential for growth in India is enormous, Stern said. India has more than 1.2 billion people and an emerging middle class, many of whom speak English."The demographics favor us," he said. "This is not about finding the next great Indian player, though over time we know it's inevitable. It's about working with schools, creating programs. But we're not unmindful of television, merchandising or events. This is a long-term proposition."Ranadive's drive to raise the profile of the sport in India, while welcomed, will not be a deciding factor in which group gets the Kings. Money may be secondary to which group offers more reassurance about its ability to build an arena, which generates revenue and stabilizes a team's position in its home city."Although the purchase price is important, it's only one factor," said Irwin Raij of Foley & Lardner, who advises teams on stadium deals and is a former member of the Sacramento First Task Force, which helped the city evaluate options for a new sports complex several years ago. "If you're the league, you want to make sure the arena deal is real."If Ranadive's group wins, expect him to take some of his marketing and promotional ideas to Sacramento. With the Warriors, he has held Bollywood nights and sold a record number of season-ticket plans partly because so many Indians now follow the team. Ranadive, who attends nearly every home game, created a smartphone application that lets fans follow the team. He has recruited other Indian executives to help promote the sport.Becoming the face of the Kings, Ranadive said, "could be that catalyst" that catapults the sport in India. "We would have a full-court press on this."
One of the most dominant basketball players in recent memory came out as gay Wednesday, casually mentioning the fact in an interview as if it were an afterthought. The news media and the sports world seemed to treat it as such, too, with little mention of the star's sexuality showing up on social media or on message boards, and virtually no analysis of what the revelation meant for tolerance in society as a whole.At first glance, it seemed implausible. After all, players, fans, coaches and league executives had been waiting with bated breath for weeks, if not months and years, to see if an active team-sport athlete would come out. So how could this sort of revelation be treated with such nonchalance?"Because it was a woman," said Jim Buzinski, a founder of Outsports.com, a Web site about homosexuality and sports. "Can you imagine if it was a man who did the exact same thing? Everyone's head would have exploded."The aftermath of the former Baylor star Brittney Griner's revelation in several interviews this week was muted, to say the least. Griner, who was chosen with the No. 1 pick in the W.N.B.A. draft Monday, did not treat the issue with any outward hesitation — in fact, she appeared to refer to her coming out in the past tense, as though it had happened before — giving a casual feeling to the entire episode.It was an odd juxtaposition: as there is increased speculation about whether a male athlete — any male athlete — will come out while still playing a major professional team sport, one of the best female athletes in the history of team sports comes out, and the reaction is roughly equivalent to what one might see when a baseball manager reveals his starting rotation for a three-game series in July."A few weeks ago, we had a story on Outsports about the rumors that an N.F.L. player was going to come out — no one knew who, or anything more than that," Buzinski said. "All it had was, 'I think some player might possibly come out but I don't know who,' essentially."Buzinski gave a wry laugh. "That story got 10 times the traffic of Brittney Griner, on video, saying that she is a lesbian," he said.There is, obviously, a more substantial history to female athletes' coming out and continuing to play. Individual-sport stars like the tennis legend Martina Navratilova and team-sport players like basketball's Sheryl Swoopes and soccer's Megan Rapinoe are among the women to continue playing after publicly discussing their sexuality.But those players generally received a similarly subdued response, with nothing close to the expected surge in attention that figures to follow a male athlete's coming out. The reaction to Griner's disclosure, then, was simply the latest example of a disturbing trend, according to some leaders of L.G.B.T. causes."We talk a lot in the L.G.B.T. community about how sexism is a big part of what contributes to homophobia," said Anna Aagenes, the executive director of GO! Athletes, a national network of L.G.B.T. athletes. "It's disheartening when there are so many great role model female athletes out that we're so focused on waiting for a male pro athlete to come out in one of the four major sports."Context may not be the only factor in the ho-hum public response to Griner's disclosure. Stereotypes that top female athletes are gay continue to persist, and that probably played a role in how the sports world responded to Griner, said Sherri Murrell, the women's basketball coach at Portland State and the only openly gay basketball coach in Division I.Murrell praised Griner for her low-key approach — "she was being who she is," Murrell said — but added that stereotypes about women involved in sports clearly still existed."There's certainly going to be people who say, 'Oh, it's just another lesbian,' " Murrell said. "I still get people that say to me, 'You're beautiful — I can't believe you're gay.' "She continued: "I think we're always going to be living in that bias. I think it's getting better, but there is still that tag."That persistent stereotype about female athletes does damage on multiple levels, said Patrick Burke, a founder of You Can Play, a prominent advocacy group for L.G.B.T. athletes. While a number of heterosexual male athletes, including the N.F.L. players Chris Kluwe and Brendon Ayanbadejo, have publicly supported the efforts of L.G.B.T. athlete groups, it has been much harder to find straight female athletes to speak out in support, Burke said."In sports right now, there are two different stereotypes — that there are no gay male athletes, and every female athlete is a lesbian," Burke said. "We've had tremendous success in getting straight male players to speak to the issue; we're having a tougher time finding straight female athletes speaking on this issue because they've spent their entire careers fighting the perception that they're a lesbian."Kluwe, a punter for the Minnesota Vikings, said, "I think it's clear that there's reverse stereotyping, if you want to call it that, going on, as well as the general sexism."Not surprisingly, Kluwe added that he did not think it was likely that the reaction to Griner's decision to come out would have much of an impact on any male athlete considering a similar revelation, if only because the experience figures to be so different. And that, of course, is the problem, Burke said."We're all waiting for the first gay, male, active athlete in a major professional team sport in North America to come out," Burke said. "That's something like eight adjectives or descriptors. We're all ignoring people who don't fit into those exact adjectives, and it's frustrating that we don't recognize the enormously important contributions that are already being made."
One of the most dominant basketball players in recent memory came out as gay Wednesday, casually mentioning the fact in an interview as if it were an afterthought. The news media and the sports world seemed to treat it as such, too, with little mention of the star's sexuality showing up on social media or on message boards, and virtually no analysis of what the revelation meant for tolerance in society as a whole.At first glance, it seemed implausible. After all, players, fans, coaches and league executives had been waiting with bated breath for weeks, if not months and years, to see if an active team-sport athlete would come out. So how could this sort of revelation be treated with such nonchalance?"Because it was a woman," said Jim Buzinski, a founder of Outsports.com, a Web site about homosexuality and sports. "Can you imagine if it was a man who did the exact same thing? Everyone's head would have exploded."The aftermath of the former Baylor star Brittney Griner's revelation in several interviews this week was muted, to say the least. Griner, who was chosen with the No. 1 pick in the W.N.B.A. draft Monday, did not treat the issue with any outward hesitation — in fact, she appeared to refer to her coming out in the past tense, as though it had happened before — giving a casual feeling to the entire episode.It was an odd juxtaposition: as there is increased speculation about whether a male athlete — any male athlete — will come out while still playing a major professional team sport, one of the best female athletes in the history of team sports comes out, and the reaction is roughly equivalent to what one might see when a baseball manager reveals his starting rotation for a three-game series in July."A few weeks ago, we had a story on Outsports about the rumors that an N.F.L. player was going to come out — no one knew who, or anything more than that," Buzinski said. "All it had was, 'I think some player might possibly come out but I don't know who,' essentially."Buzinski gave a wry laugh. "That story got 10 times the traffic of Brittney Griner, on video, saying that she is a lesbian," he said.There is, obviously, a more substantial history to female athletes' coming out and continuing to play. Individual-sport stars like the tennis legend Martina Navratilova and team-sport players like basketball's Sheryl Swoopes and soccer's Megan Rapinoe are among the women to continue playing after publicly discussing their sexuality.But those players generally received a similarly subdued response, with nothing close to the expected surge in attention that figures to follow a male athlete's coming out. The reaction to Griner's disclosure, then, was simply the latest example of a disturbing trend, according to some leaders of L.G.B.T. causes."We talk a lot in the L.G.B.T. community about how sexism is a big part of what contributes to homophobia," said Anna Aagenes, the executive director of GO! Athletes, a national network of L.G.B.T. athletes. "It's disheartening when there are so many great role model female athletes out that we're so focused on waiting for a male pro athlete to come out in one of the four major sports."Context may not be the only factor in the ho-hum public response to Griner's disclosure. Stereotypes that top female athletes are gay continue to persist, and that probably played a role in how the sports world responded to Griner, said Sherri Murrell, the women's basketball coach at Portland State and the only openly gay basketball coach in Division I.Murrell praised Griner for her low-key approach — "she was being who she is," Murrell said — but added that stereotypes about women involved in sports clearly still existed."There's certainly going to be people who say, 'Oh, it's just another lesbian,' " Murrell said. "I still get people that say to me, 'You're beautiful — I can't believe you're gay.' "She continued: "I think we're always going to be living in that bias. I think it's getting better, but there is still that tag."That persistent stereotype about female athletes does damage on multiple levels, said Patrick Burke, a founder of You Can Play, a prominent advocacy group for L.G.B.T. athletes. While a number of heterosexual male athletes, including the N.F.L. players Chris Kluwe and Brendon Ayanbadejo, have publicly supported the efforts of L.G.B.T. athlete groups, it has been much harder to find straight female athletes to speak out in support, Burke said."In sports right now, there are two different stereotypes — that there are no gay male athletes, and every female athlete is a lesbian," Burke said. "We've had tremendous success in getting straight male players to speak to the issue; we're having a tougher time finding straight female athletes speaking on this issue because they've spent their entire careers fighting the perception that they're a lesbian."Kluwe, a punter for the Minnesota Vikings, said, "I think it's clear that there's reverse stereotyping, if you want to call it that, going on, as well as the general sexism."Not surprisingly, Kluwe added that he did not think it was likely that the reaction to Griner's decision to come out would have much of an impact on any male athlete considering a similar revelation, if only because the experience figures to be so different. And that, of course, is the problem, Burke said."We're all waiting for the first gay, male, active athlete in a major professional team sport in North America to come out," Burke said. "That's something like eight adjectives or descriptors. We're all ignoring people who don't fit into those exact adjectives, and it's frustrating that we don't recognize the enormously important contributions that are already being made."
The Nets ' last postseason series began with a different roster and a different coach, with different uniforms in a different country, and all of that was just fine for a franchise that had regularly and happily dwelled beneath the radar.But when the lights go out in Barclays Center before Saturday's postseason opener, obscuring a black-clad curtain of fans fueled by six years of dysfunction, the stakes will have been raised.The Nets have confidence heading into their first-round matchup with the Chicago Bulls after finishing the regular season on a strong note, with a healthier roster than most other postseason teams have. They lost to Chicago three times during the regular season, but as guard Deron Williams put it, "That season's over."The Nets are passing into uncharted waters. In contrast with their last postseason appearance, which began in Toronto in 2007, they will command attention, they will be favored, and their toughest opponent might be the pressure they put on themselves."That's the trick of the playoffs," Coach P. J. Carlesimo said. "You can't pretend it's not more important than what's preceded it, and you can't pretend that each game isn't important. You've got to walk that line."Carlesimo said he believed the team's first season in Brooklyn, which had its ups and downs on the court, was a rousing success off it. The Nets sold 94.9 percent of their available seats this season, finishing 16th in the N.B.A. in attendance, and the franchise rebranding has taken off in merchandise sales, television ratings and national perception."The whole Brooklyn phenomenon has just made this year very special," Carlesimo said. "This year, to me, has been 10 times more exciting, more well received, more everything than I could have ever thought."Although Carlesimo said there had been no sign that the weight of that expectation had burdened the team so far, the Nets have had deep postseason ambitions since the summer, when they re-signed Williams and Brook Lopez and traded for guard Joe Johnson.Around those three stars, the Nets rounded out the roster with veterans whom they could rely on for experience and perspective come the spring. The task of those role players now is keeping the team as loose as possible."We've got a lot of the veteran guys that's played in the playoffs, already know what it's going to be like," said guard Keith Bogans, a nine-year veteran. "We're all just ready to go."The brunt of the pre-series speculation has centered on Lopez, an All-Star center, the only member of the starting five who has never appeared in a postseason game, and the 7-foot pivot upon which the team's playoff success is likely to hinge. There has been plenty of whispering in his ear. Reggie Evans, who has appeared in 38 postseason games, said he had been priming Lopez with as much detail as possible, right down to the N.B.A. playoffs logo on the floor."It's just, man," Evans said, pausing. "Everything is different and intense. We all can feel the intensity — Brooklyn, first year, excitement. Everybody's going to be focused on him. Like, all right, what's Brook going to do?"Lopez led all centers in scoring (19.4 points per game) this season. In four games against the Bulls, he averaged 22 points and 2 blocks while shooting 52.9 percent from the field.The uncertainly surrounding Bulls center Joakim Noah, who is battling a right foot injury and said Friday that there was a possibility he might not play in Game 1, also eases some of the burden on Lopez."I'm not worried about Brook," Carlesimo said. "I'm more concerned with turnovers than Brook. Brook will play well."Williams said Lopez arrived at practice this week with a new mental focus, which was demonstrated by his clipped answers in interviews with members of the news media Thursday."I'm proud of how our team did, our team's success," Lopez said when asked about his season. Evans referred to Lopez as being "on a mission."Like Lopez, the Nets' marketing staff has been gearing up for the playoffs for nearly a month, generating a new social media campaign — "Hello Playoffs" — selling the presentation rights to American Express and introducing a sleek new all-black playoffs apparel line, with the hope to black out Barclays Center. Mikhail D. Prokhorov, the Nets' owner, will be in attendance Saturday to witness the atmosphere firsthand.The buildup is approaching a level above anything in the franchise's 36-year history, maybe even trumping the season opener in November, when Lopez won the opening tip and the newly relocated team was off and running. Eighty-two games later, one goal already achieved, the Nets are starting over again.
The Nets transformed Barclays Center into a grand postseason stage, with dark T-shirts and luminous bracelets, banners and baked goods, fireworks and a drum line, one glorious self-tribute after another.It was like a concert, Chicago Bulls forward Taj Gibson said. The arena glistened like a gemstone. All that was left, after the team's owner, Mikhail D. Prokhorov, addressed the crowd and the lights flooded back onto the court, was a basketball game, and a fairly important one for the franchise.Just reaching this point was not the team's ultimate ambition, as much as the pregame festivities suggested it was. A team stocked with playoff veterans — with no N.B.A. championship rings on any of their fingers — understood that a stumble in this series-opening showcase against the Chicago Bulls would be dire.But they did not stumble. They surged.The Nets dominated Chicago in a 106-89 win in Game 1 on Saturday that may resound in the Eastern Conference. The Bulls trudged off the court in stunned silence. The Nets' pregame party became a nightlong event."It's been a long time coming for this franchise," guard Deron Williams said. "We expected to be here. We came out playing like we wanted to be here."Earlier in the week, Williams said he appreciated that many observers were picking the fifth-seeded Bulls, making their eighth playoff appearance in nine years, to win the series. Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo said the team still carried its underdog spirit from its days in New Jersey."As good a year as we've had, I think we're still fighting for more respect," Carlesimo said before the game. "It will come from us advancing."The fans showered their rebranded franchise with adoration, and the arena pulsed with "Brooklyn" chants that echoed throughout the first quarter. Black T-shirts were left on the seats, and the Nets wore black uniforms, unifying the setting in its collective darkness. The team fed off the crowd's electricity."The atmosphere couldn't have been better," Carlesimo said. "Before we did anything, they were great."The Nets pushed the tempo and tried to get center Brook Lopez in a rhythm early, attacking the Bulls' Joakim Noah, whose appearance in the game had been questionable because of plantar fasciitis in his right foot.The Nets were also rapacious defensively in the first half, collecting four blocks and four steals while forcing seven turnovers. They held Chicago to 8 points in the lane and none in transition.The Bulls missed 17 of their first 24 shots, and the Nets shot 16 of 20 from the field in the second quarter, scoring 35 points. Williams hit a running bank shot with two seconds left before halftime, the icing on the Nets' first-half masterpiece. They led, 60-35."That was one of our best halves of the season," Williams said.Chicago had no answer for Williams and Lopez, who took their connection to another level. Williams was a dynamic penetrator and distributor, as highlighted by an impressive drive and feed to Lopez for a one-handed flush with four minutes left in the half.Lopez, the only Nets starter making his first postseason appearance, looked every bit the All-Star center the team relied on all season. How he would handle the playoffs — the atmosphere, the intensity, the Bulls' defense, all of it — was a source of some anxiety. Lopez led all N.B.A. centers in scoring this season and played well against Chicago, but this was a different stage. Lopez rose to the occasion, finishing with 21 points."I wasn't worried about him," forward Reggie Evans said. "Shoot, he was ready."Lopez flummoxed Noah, who did not move well in the 14 minutes he played. Without him, Chicago had little to offer in the frontcourt. The Bulls were outrebounded, 39-35, and outscored inside, 56-36.Six Nets players scored in double figures. C. J. Watson scored 14 points off the bench, and Evans had 13 rebounds. One especially important contributor on both ends was Gerald Wallace, who suddenly emerged from what seemed like a monthlong slump, scoring 14 points, his biggest offensive output since March 23.Wallace added two blocks and one steal and held Luol Deng to 3 of 11 shooting. "It's a fresh start," Wallace said.Williams, who in February said his ankles were so sore he could not dunk, punctuated his 22-point performance with a reverse dunk in the third that caught even some of his teammates by surprise.He had been saving that one, Joe Johnson said. On Saturday, the Nets lifted all the stops.Nothing — not bad ankles, not gravity, certainly not the Bulls — was going to hold the Nets down.Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau left open the possibility that guard Derrick Rose could play in this series. Rose has not played since tearing the anterior cruciate ligament in his left knee in the first game of the playoffs last season and is considered doubtful. Thibodeau said if Rose woke up and felt confident enough to play again, he could do so. ... Before Saturday's game, Mikhail D. Prokhorov told the fans: "Thank you for your passion and support this season. This is only the beginning."
Andre Miller scored 28 points and sank a layup with 1.3 seconds left that lifted the Denver Nuggets to a 97-95 victory over the Golden State Warriors in the opener of their first-round Western Conference series on Saturday.Miller drove past the rookie Draymond Green, did an up-and-under between two defenders and banked the ball off the glass with his right hand.Stephen Curry's desperation 3-pointer was not close as the horn sounded and the Nuggets celebrated their 24th straight win at Pepsi Center. They were a league-best 38-3 at home this season."It could have went either way tonight, so we have to be better prepared on Tuesday," Miller said.The Warriors trailed, 93-92, when Ty Lawson stole the ball from Curry and hit a layup to make it a 3-point game with 35 seconds remaining.Curry, who had a record 272 3-pointers this season, received a whistling pass from Jarrett Jack and swished a contested 3 to tie the score at 95-95 with 14.5 seconds left.Miller inbounded the ball, then got it back and drove to the hoop for the winning bucket."We found a way to pull it out," Miller said. "This was a tough game."Game 2 of the best-of-seven series is Tuesday night in Denver.CLIPPERS TAKE GAME 1 At Los Angeles, the Clippers played above the rim, not enough to live up to their Lob City moniker but enough to beat Memphis at its own rebounding game. Chris Paul led seven players in double figures with 23 points, Eric Bledsoe had 15 and the Clippers dominated the boards in a 112-91 victory over the Grizzlies in their Western Conference playoff opener on Saturday. Chauncey Billups scored 14 points, and Caron Butler and Jamal Crawford had 13 apiece on a night when Blake Griffin was held to 10 points and 5 rebounds before fouling out with 3:32 left. The high-flying Clippers had just one dunk, but enjoyed a 47-23 advantage on the glass.' "I just decided not to dunk that often," Paul said, jokingly. "Just shoot floaters. I don't know what Blake's problem was."NASH LIKELY TO PLAY Steve Nash is expected to play when the Los Angeles Lakers visit the San Antonio Spurs in their first-round matchup Sunday. He missed the final eight games of the regular season with an injury to his hamstring and hip. Nash leads the team with 6.7 assists a game."Mentally, I'm chomping at the bit, and physically, I'm getting there," Nash said. "I'm very optimistic I'll be able to play on Sunday."
The question inevitably comes twice a year: once in November, when the N.B.A. season usually starts, and again in the spring, when the playoffs near.My under-the-breath response — "Yeah, I grew up a Nets fan, lived on Long Island, saw Dr. J" — is usually enough of an answer. But every once in a while, a follow-up question arises: But why are you still a Nets fan?My parents owned Chinese restaurants on Long Island that used unusual architectural details to stand out. One had a distinctive windmill. Then they opened one with a golden dome, and there, at a place that my father modestly named after himself, my love affair with the team truly began.Danny Chang's was as aspirational as Chinese restaurants could get at the time. Egg foo young? Not on the menu. The dishes were spoon-served by jacket-clad captains, and drinks were brought by attractive young women. My father, who had worked at Trader Vic's, had learned a thing or two about showmanship.The restaurant was a hit. A fair number of well-known people would come, but I was interested only in the sports stars: the Rangers, who came in their Corvettes, and the jockey Jorge Velasquez, who, to my family, may have been the biggest celebrity to grace the dining room.And then there was the night that would change my life as a basketball fan forever, the night I met the tallest man I had ever seen. My dad handled the introductions: Mr. Ladner, meet my son, Dean. He's a big fan.Wendell Ladner was a hard-nosed power forward on the Nets, a Kurt Rambis type with a better mustache. Fans loved him. I now loved him, too.We shook hands, mine disappearing into his. Then he told me to wait for a moment while he stepped out to his car. He returned with an A.B.A. basketball, signed it and handed it to me.I had seen the Nets play at Nassau Coliseum — they were still in the American Basketball Association then — and I was as much of a Dr. J fan as anyone else. But that was run-of-the-mill, childhood hero worship. This was something different.Ladner was my favorite player, my direct connection to a real-life pro — no small thing when you're 9. He began to visit the restaurant every once in a while; one time, he brought along Billy Paultz, the Nets center known as the Whopper. Another time, Ladner gave me a second A.B.A. ball, this one signed by all the Nets, Dr. J included.Danny Chang's was at the foot of the Atlantic Beach Bridge, close enough to Kennedy Airport that your body shook when a big plane went by. The village, not yet saturated with million-dollar homes, had its share of airline workers who shared small beach homes in town. So, on the night of June 24, 1975, the mood at the restaurant was understandably somber.Earlier that day, Eastern Air Lines Flight 66 crashed near Kennedy as it approached the runway; wreckage was scattered along Rockaway Boulevard. Of the more than 100 passengers and crew, only a few survived.I don't recall how the news came to me — whether my parents told me or I read it in the newspaper — but there it was: among the casualties was Wendell Ladner, his identity eventually confirmed, in part, because of the A.B.A. championship ring on his finger.I remember crying, primarily because Ladner was dead and I would never see him again. And then I thought of the first basketball he had given me, which I boneheadedly had been using on the driveway court. His signature was all but erased by gravel and backboard.My kinship to the Nets just became bulletproof.A year later, the A.B.A. and the N.B.A. merged, allowing the Nets to join the big league. If there was a high point in my 30 years of being a Nets fan, this might have been it: a chance for the Nets to prove their worth and justify my loyalty. But then the Nets sold Dr. J's contract to the Philadelphia 76ers for $3 million, in part to pay for the indemnity fee to join the league. And they moved to Piscataway, N.J., leaving Long Island and most of their fans.Better times would follow — some good years in the 1980s and '90s, and back-to-back N.B.A. finals appearances with Jason Kidd — but I never really put complete faith in the team. It remained cursed for the Dr. J deal, and my penance was still to be served for using, and eventually losing, the Ladner ball.Penance can take unexpected forms, and for me, it took the form of Duncan, the Nets' dragonlike mascot for many years. (History differs on whether Duncan was a dragon or a swamp monster; I would describe him differently.)In early 1987, in the midst of a dreadful season for the Nets, I dragged a few college friends to the Meadowlands to watch them play the Detroit Pistons. With the game falling out of the Nets' reach, Duncan began working the crowd, high-fiving fans and interacting with youngsters. He was several rows lower than us when he spotted me. He opened his arms theatrically, and then clasped his hands together beneath his chin and bowed slowly and deeply, as an idiotic mascot might to an Asian.Then he did it again. And in case the gesture was lost on me, he walked up to my row and repeated it.Come on. This was what a team mascot did to a fan? I said a few choice words. Duncan said nothing, continuing to genuflect until play resumed. I contemplated doing or saying more, but held back. It was as true then as it is now: nothing good can come of a scrap with a team mascot.I have not been back to see the Nets since, except for visits to the Garden to see them play the Knicks. But I'm still a fan.I wish I could say that I still own the A.B.A. balls, but I do not. They were lost somewhere in my family's trail of moves from New York to Florida to Mississippi — not far, coincidentally, from where Ladner grew up. I miss them, but I've come to realize I don't need to physically own them to retain the sentimental value of Ladner's gifts.The Nets retired Ladner's No. 4, but they have not hung his uniform in the rafters, where the other five retired numbers are displayed. I hope that will change, and if it does, I will be there when it happens. I hear Barclays Center is a nice place.And I hear they have a new mascot.
EAST RUTHERFORD, N.J. — Deron Williams had dunked in practice, reverse-dunked even, in certain bursts of energy, but his momentous throw-down late in the third quarter of Saturday's Game 1 playoff victory against the Chicago Bulls still caught teammates by surprise."I was like, whoa, are you serious?" Nets forward Reggie Evans said. "I was shocked he did that."Evans understood the significance: Williams, almost unprompted, had said only two months earlier that he could not dunk because his troublesome ankles remained sore and weak despite numerous cortisone shots and a rare plasma treatment.He has since transformed his body and his performance, leading the Nets through the second half of the season, averaging 24.6 points and shooting 52 percent in April. Still, the 6-foot-3 Williams had dunked just once in a game this season, on April 4 against Cleveland, until his two-handed reverse to finish a fast break with 40 seconds left in the third quarter on Saturday at Barclays Center."I was just trying to show the guys in the N.B.A. that I might be able to compete in the dunk contest next year," Williams said.He has looked, sounded and, most important, played like a different person since Feb. 19, when he returned to action against the Milwaukee Bucks after missing two games before the All-Star break and resting at a resort in Miami with his family.Eight days earlier, on Feb. 11, Williams underwent plasma-rich platelet therapy, in which his own blood was spun in a centrifuge and then injected into the affected area, in this case his ankles. At the time, General Manager Billy King said Williams was struggling with synovitis, essentially a form of inflammation. Williams has played with a bone spur in his left ankle since the summer.He also has received three rounds of cortisone shots in his ankles this season, the latest only 10 days after the platelet therapy. The treatment seemed to help immediately. In his first six games, Williams averaged 23 points and 7.3 assists, and made 48.7 percent of his 3-point attempts.He also redefined his body, dropping at least 15 pounds since the All-Star break. The sudden streamlining — through extra conditioning and a three-day juice diet — might have been prompted by comments from Jerry Colangelo, the president of the United States men's basketball program, who said Williams was "a little overweight" during the London Olympics in 2012."If you watch him prior to All-Star break and post," Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo said Sunday, "it's almost a different player."Carlesimo said Williams was still not 100 percent, and it is likely that he will still need off-season surgery to remove the bone spur. But Sunday, after Williams's 22 points and 7 assists against Chicago, Carlesimo made some of his most candid comments yet on Williams's turnaround."I'm very, very surprised that he and our medical people were able to turn it around that dramatically, that quickly," Carlesimo said. "Compared to where he was at, and to make as dramatic a change as quickly as he did, is really surprising to me and impressive."Williams has bristled at questions about his health since the All-Star break, at one point telling reporters not to ask him about his legs anymore. But he seemed happy to talk about how he felt after Saturday's game."I think the dunk showed it," Williams said. "My legs feel good, my ankles feel good right now. I'm excited."Williams pushed the pace against the Bulls, attacking the basket with ease. Seven of his nine field goals were in the paint, and his penetration led to easy feeds to center Brook Lopez. Williams also had three steals, including the one off Luol Deng's dribble that he used to take off down the floor.As Williams dribbled alone down the court, his teammates rose on the bench. Evans stopped jogging to watch. Joe Johnson said he had a feeling that Williams was planning to give the fans something to talk about on their trips home."I knew if he got a chance he'd try something special," Johnson said.The Nets' official scorebook reads: 3'FB Reverse Dunk. The score was 89-62. There were 12 minutes 39 seconds left in a blowout victory.And for a moment, Williams was weightless.
HOUSTON — At the peak of Linsanity last season, a certain 6-foot-10-inch fan walked into a sports bar to marvel at Jeremy Lin 's abrupt and dizzying performance with the Knicks .The Houston Rockets were on a West Coast swing at the time. Their coach, the former Celtics star Kevin McHale, had more than a passing curiosity in Lin, and perhaps even a twinge of regret."I was fascinated like everybody else," McHale said.Two months earlier, for 12 days in December 2011, a still-obscure Lin had been a member of the Rockets. But he had a minimum contract and thus a maximum chance of not surviving a lockout-shortened training camp."Everything he did was full-bore," McHale said. "I thought he'd be a great energy guy on our team."Before this season, Lin returned to the Rockets as a free agent with a better-known name and a three-year, $25.1 million contract that the Knicks declined to match. He also faced impossible expectations among Houston fans and a challenge that seems to confront artists more often than athletes.He was the equivalent of an unknown singer who had written a megahit or a nameless writer who had penned a great novel. After a flash of the extraordinary, could Lin sustain a career of the routine? Or would he fade as a one-hit wonder?"Linsanity was an unbelievable three-week period in his life," McHale said. "He'll look back when he's 80 and go, 'Man that was magical.' But magic don't last forever."Perhaps the most remarkable aspect of Lin's current season of discovery, full of predictable highs and lows, has been the achievement of the unremarkable. He has shown himself to be an everyday player in the N.B.A., a starting point guard who pushes the pace on a team that ranked second in the league in scoring and a leader who helped Houston reach the playoffs for the first time in four seasons.The Rockets opened their first-round series on Sunday at Oklahoma City, with Lin scoring 4 points in a 120-91 loss."It seems like everybody's perception of me is very bipolar," Lin said. "To one group, it's overpaid, overrated; to another group, it's underpaid, underrated, underdog. It's funny to me because there's no real balance. Why can't I just be a young player who's shown some potential and has a lot of learning to do?"Lin's Harvard education, his professed faith, his humility, his resolve and his athleticism have resonated with Asian-Americans in the Houston area, which Rice University researchers say has become the most diverse region in the country.As an American-born son of immigrants from Taiwan, an island that is 100 miles from mainland China and is democratic and self-ruling though not independent, Lin is regarded somewhat differently from Yao Ming, the retired Rockets center from Shanghai. Yet each has helped to change perceptions of how Asians are viewed and even how they view themselves, a number of the players' supporters said.On one hand, Lin "represents the model of the Chinese family," said Wea H. Lee, a Taiwanese-American who is the chairman of the Houston-based Southern News Group, which owns a digital television station and publishes The Southern Chinese Daily News. "Many parents want their kids to go to American schools to be lawyers, not athletes."On the other hand, Lee said, Lin's athletic achievement makes him a "unique symbol.""It's a new image for Asians," Lee said. "We need more Jeremy Lins, not just doctors."As an N.B.A. point guard, Lin, 24, is not yet fully formed. He has started 107 regular-season games, a total that amounts to less than a season and a half. He is still prone to commit critical turnovers. He moves reluctantly to his left, his shooting touch can abandon him, and he does not always fight insistently through screens on defense. Nor does Houston as a team always move the ball urgently, sometimes leaving its drag-strip offense stuck in neutral.Lin has essentially maintained his averages of last season. His scoring is down slightly, to 13.4 points a game from 14.6. His assist average is virtually identical (6.1, from 6.2), his 3-point percentage is higher, and his turnover rate is lower.In December, against San Antonio, Lin matched his career high with 38 points. A week later, he returned to Madison Square Garden with 22 points and 9 assists in a victory over the Knicks that aroused flashbacks of Linsanity.Mostly, though, Lin has concerned himself with the workaday chore of every young player: trying to improve by increments. He assimilated into the league's youngest team, flattened the arc on his jumper, tempered his drives with 3-pointers, pulled out of an early shooting tailspin, remained healthy and established a pick-and-roll and drive-and-kick rhythm with James Harden, a dominant scorer and ball handler."We're pleased," said Chris Finch, a Rockets assistant who works with the team's point guards. "Jeremy is superaggressive. For us, he's a big X factor.
At 7 feet tall, with broad shoulders and tree-trunk legs, Brook Lopez is massive even by N.B.A. standards. But in the Nets ' 106-89 Game 1 victory against the Chicago Bulls on Saturday night at Barclays Center, Lopez repeatedly sneaked undetected into the heart of the Bulls' defense. He had six layups in the first half alone, often by expertly drifting to the blind spots of Bulls defenders to create passing angles for his teammates."The thing that makes him hard to guard is you have Deron Williams and Joe Johnson out there as well," Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau said.As a defensive strategist, Thibodeau is widely regarded as the best in the N.B.A. His system floods the ball side of the court with defenders, using a combination of man and zone tactics to confuse and paralyze the offense. But systems can be predictable, and the Nets were ready with a plan that unraveled the Bulls' defense.The guards' chemistry with Lopez has been building all season, and in Game 1, Williams and Lopez were in lock step as they navigated the Bulls' defensive rotations.Williams said afterward, "I've been on Brook all year that when we get two on the ball on my penetration, just run to right in front of the rim, because he's going to get easy baskets."Williams bullied the Bulls' point guards with powerful drives to the rim and forced Chicago to offer more help than its defensive system typically accords. Lopez was the primary benefactor of all the attention paid to Williams."My guards just do such a good job of getting me the ball in the right position," Lopez said. "I know I just got to roll hard in the pick-and-roll, and they'll find me."Lopez is known for his scoring touch and surprising dexterity, but perhaps his most underrated contribution is as the hub of the Nets' ball movement. When Williams or Johnson drew multiple defenders, Lopez not only scored but also facilitated snappy ball movement to the opposite side of the court. The Bulls were aware of this threat but could not find a way to slow Lopez."It's on the film," Bulls forward Taj Gibson said of Lopez's repeated romps into the heart of the defense. "We just didn't do a good job of taking that pass away."The Bulls have struggled to score all season but finished eight games over .500 on the strength of their defense and rebounding. Their best chance to beat the Nets depended on creating a nasty, physical game in which they could dominate inside. But in Game 1, the Nets shot 55.9 percent from the field, the third highest rate allowed by Chicago all season.Even more worrisome for the Bulls than the lopsided score was the way the Nets controlled the interior. Led by Reggie Evans's 12 defensive rebounds and Lopez's dedicated defense at the rim, they overmatched the Bulls inside and out.The Bulls had hoped the All-Star center Joakim Noah, who is battling plantar fasciitis, would be able to limit Lopez, but Noah was able to play only 13 minutes and appeared hobbled on the court and in the locker room afterward.Noah is the Bulls' defensive leader, but without him at anything approaching full strength, it is hard to see how they can regain command of the precious space in front of the rim in Game 2 on Monday night at Barclays Center. Even when forward Luol Deng and others rotated to the right spot, Lopez and the Nets were able to use their size to finish over the top.It was an almost perfect performance from the Nets, from Gerald Wallace's long awaited breakout game — he scored 14 points after totaling 16 in the last seven games of the regular season — to Williams's emphatic fast-break slam.It has been a running joke in the Nets' locker room that Williams, who dealt with debilitating ankle pain early in the season, had for most of the season dunked fewer times than the 38-year-old Jerry Stackhouse. His reverse dunk seemed like just another sign that the Nets could be hitting their stride.The Bulls are reeling from injuries and trying to re-establish a rhythm on both ends. Noah is a contender for defensive player of the year, but he is also one of the best passers on the Bulls and often distributes to cutters from the high post. Without him able to create, it puts more pressure on players like Deng and Gibson to find offense for themselves — a task for which they are ill-suited.In their abysmal 35-point first half, the Bulls made only 3 of 15 layups. But if there is any team mentally equipped to handle the adversity, it is Thibodeau's team.During the regular season, the Bulls overcame their injuries and offensive woes with their intensity. But in the playoffs, everyone plays hard, as the Nets did in Game 1. That blowout made clear that if the Bulls cannot gain an advantage in effort — if Williams and Wallace are the players winning the scrambles for loose balls — the gulf in talent between these two teams is real and favors the Nets.Though Thibodeau said his team's diminished intensity was the primary concern after Game 1, he is certain to make some strategic adjustments to limit Lopez."We didn't make him play in a crowd," Thibodeau said.Noah's replacement, Gibson, said he was confident that the Bulls would make the proper changes and come back ready to win Game 2 and swing the series."We're looking forward to what Thibs has to say," Gibson said. "He'll probably have a new game plan; he's a guru."The ups and downs in the playoffs resemble the hill stages of the Tour de France. It is important the Nets keep pedaling hard, even as they carry a huge amount of momentum down the mountain. Game 2 promises to be another uphill climb.Williams said: "Don't expect this to happen on Monday. We know we're going to get a better effort out of the Bulls, and they're going to come ready to play."
BOSTON — In the Knicks ' current media guide, his name is at the bottom of the basketball staff list, below all the assistants, the advance scouts, a coaching adviser and even the equipment manager."Coaching consultant," reads the latest job description for Chris Ford, who, several decades ago, spent nearly four years as a player for the Boston Celtics and five more as the team's head coach. But that very modest position on the Knicks' masthead does not necessarily correlate to Ford's current importance for the team's basketball brain trust.Although Ford also played for Detroit and was a head coach for Milwaukee, the Los Angeles Clippers and Philadelphia, he is best remembered for playing with, and coaching, Larry Bird, Kevin McHale and Robert Parish. He won an N.B.A. championship as a Celtic in 1981 and two more as a Celtics assistant in 1984 and 1986. In all, he spent more than 15 years with the Celtics as a player, assistant and head coach.Now, however, he is plotting with Woodson to help defeat the Celtics in the first round of the playoffs. He is not doing it out of spite. He is doing it because Woodson asked him to help — an affectionate payback of sorts in that it was Ford who gave Woodson his first N.B.A. coaching job.Their relationship dates to the summer of 1996. Woodson was coaching a team in an N.B.A. summer league, paying out of his own pocket for the experience. He had done the same thing the two previous years. Cotton Fitzsimmons, under whom Woodson played with the N.B.A.'s Kansas City Kings, had suggested Woodson pursue a career in coaching. But in 1996, Woodson was six years removed from his last N.B.A. playing job, with Cleveland, and had only the summer league experience to offer as a coaching credential.Ford had just landed the job as the head coach of the Milwaukee Bucks, a year after the Celtics let him go following five years as Boston's head coach."I had just finished up practice, and Chris's summer league team was taking the floor," Woodson said, recalling that summer (the Knicks declined to let Ford be interviewed for this article). "I walked up to him, introduced myself, offered my congratulations and said I'd like to be considered as one of his assistant coaches."According to Woodson, Ford snapped, "There are a lot of guys who'd like to be considered."Then, after what he remembered as "kind of a smack in the face," Woodson recovered and said: "I'm not like most guys. Why don't you and I sit down and talk?"According to Woodson, Ford said, "There are a lot of coaches who want to sit and talk to me about a job."To which Woodson repeated, "I am not like most guys."Yes, a long-term, mutual-respect relationship was somehow forged out of that conversation, though neither man would have expected as much at the time. Ford agreed to interview Woodson and then, a couple of weeks later, called Woodson at his home in Houston to see if he was still interested in the job.Ford then told Woodson to fly to Milwaukee to meet the Bucks' owner, Herb Kohl, then a United States senator. Woodson did just that, but still had to wait until Kohl called Bob Knight, for whom Woodson had played in college, before finally getting the job.Woodson and Ford spent two years together in Milwaukee. They drove to the airport together. They drove to and from games together. The reticent, generally unrevealing Ford opened up over those years, Woodson said, and an enduring friendship developed."We became pretty close and stayed in contact all these years," Woodson said. "And we were able to hook back up, finally."It just took longer than expected. Ford was fired after two seasons. Woodson stayed on for another season in Milwaukee and then led the typical peripatetic life of an assistant, with stops in Cleveland, Philadelphia and Detroit, where he won an N.B.A. title in 2004 as an assistant under Larry Brown. The next season, Woodson began a six-year run as the head coach in Atlanta.Ford coached the Clippers for a season and a half, and then spent a decade as a scout, mostly with the Philadelphia 76ers. He also coached the Sixers for 30 games during the 2003-4 season.After the Knicks made Woodson their regular head coach for the 2012-13 season, removing the interim title, he placed a call to Ford to gauge his interest in coming aboard. Ford, 64, had no intention of returning to the life of an N.B.A. coach. But the consultant position intrigued him enough to say yes."It wasn't a case of me repaying him," Woodson said. "We had a great relationship. He gave me an opportunity. I trusted his basketball knowledge. I reached back out to him not knowing if he even wanted to coach or get back in the game. And when we spoke, he was excited about coming on board as a consultant."He always voiced his opinion, and I have a great deal of respect for his opinion," Woodson said. "He has been on the high end of winning basketball games. He's won titles. Anytime you can go through a Celtics system and experience that kind of life from a playing and coaching standpoint, I'd say you know a little bit about the game. He tells me about certain things — hey, my ears are going to be wide open, listening."And lest anyone question Ford's allegiance in this series, Woodson said of his consultant, in words that not too long ago would have been unimaginable in Boston: "He's going to root for the Knicks. He's a Mike Woodson fan and a Knicks fan."
Rutgers is set to introduce Eddie Jordan as the university's new basketball coach on Tuesday, less than a month after the former coach Mike Rice was fired after video of him abusing his players — including shouting homophobic slurs at them and throwing balls at them — was broadcast on television and on the Internet.Officials at Rutgers had seen the footage last November, and they had fined and suspended Rice at the time. The outcry after the video became public April 2 led to his dismissal and the resignation of the athletic director, Tim Pernetti, and several other university officials. There remain questions about how the episode was handled by the Rutgers administration, with state lawmakers, faculty members and students among those who have expressed outrage.This is the mess Jordan will step into Tuesday afternoon when he is introduced as the Scarlet Knights' coach. Jordan inherits a program trying to redefine itself as it gets ready to move into the Big Ten, perhaps last season's toughest conference, in 2014.Jordan, 58, played at Rutgers and represents a link to the program's glory days, having helped lead the Scarlet Knights to their only Final Four appearance in 1976. He will surely be trumpeted as a new leader for a new era. However, there will be questions: about the Princeton offense Jordan employs, about his previous head coaching experience in the N.B.A. and certainly about Rice's transgressions and how Rutgers can move past them.As a junior at Rutgers, Jordan was the most valuable player of the East Regional when the Scarlet Knights made the Final Four, and he finished his career as the program's leader in steals and assists. He played seven seasons in the N.B.A., with Cleveland, the Nets, the Los Angeles Lakers — with whom he won a title in 1982 — and Portland.After retiring as a player in 1984, Jordan started his coaching career at Rutgers as a volunteer assistant. He returned to the program as an assistant from 1988 to 1991, then joined the Sacramento Kings as an assistant. He later spent nine seasons as an N.B.A. head coach, with Sacramento, Washington and Philadelphia, going 257-343 (.428).He interviewed for the Rutgers job in 2010, when Rice was hired.Last year, Jordan coached the freshman boys basketball team at his alma mater, Archbishop Carroll High School, in Washington.The team ran a simplified version of the Princeton offense. Asked about coaching high school freshmen after years of dealing with professionals, Jordan said, "I'm learning how to be patient."He was an assistant with the Lakers this season. On Tuesday, Jordan will be back at Rutgers again.
In another time, another spring, the duel would have been tantalizing, electric and potentially epic: Carmelo Anthony versus Paul Pierce, for control of the Eastern Conference. The names alone inspire visions of a classic playoff scoring battle.In another era, it might have been. In this one, the duel has become an unfair fight, between a still-rising superstar and his superior supporting cast and a fading likely Hall of Famer, who has hardly any support at all.Anthony dominated the court again Tuesday night, overpowering Pierce and anyone else in his path, leading the Knicks to an 87-71 rout and a commanding 2-0 lead in this first-round series.Through two games, the Knicks have been sturdier defensively and simply better in the second half, but most of all they have Anthony, who has been brilliant in the critical moments. He scored 34 points Tuesday and might have gone for 40 had the Knicks needed it. He was at his best in the second half, making 8 of 13 shots from the field as the Knicks turned a close game into a stunning rout, outscoring the Celtics, 45-23, over the final 24 minutes."I'm playing," Anthony said with a verbal shrug. "I'm just playing basketball, trying to take advantage of what they've been throwing at me."The Celtics, playing without Rajon Rondo, have never appeared more rudderless, failing to hit the 80-point mark in both games. A younger Pierce would have simply assumed a greater load, but he no longer seems capable and finished with a relatively muted 18 points Tuesday night. Over two games, Anthony has outscored his rival Pierce, 70-39.The Knicks are halfway to winning their first playoff series since 2000. The series moves to Boston for the next two games, and a surely emotional scene at TD Garden. Game 3 on Friday will be the Celtics' first at home since the Boston Marathon bombings."We want to win for the city," Celtics Coach Doc Rivers said.The Celtics, energized by their bench, led by 9 points in the first half and seemed poised to steal a game, or at least make things interesting. For a moment, the Garden became a little quieter.But the Knicks blasted the Celtics with a 13-2 run to open the second half, and they never let up, winning the third quarter by 32-11."We just been locking down," Anthony said.Kevin Garnett and Jeff Green both picked up their fourth fouls in the period, handcuffing the Celtics' offense and leaving Pierce as a solo act. Garnett played just 24 minutes, finishing with 12 points, 11 rebounds and 5 fouls.Rivers, risking a fine from the league, called the fouls on Garnett "horrendous," adding, "I thought they had a huge effect on us."Rondo's absence has, too, and the Knicks have been all too happy to crank up the defensive pressure and watch the point-guard-less Celtics wilt."They're kind of a little fuzzy up top on who they want to get it to and why," J. R. Smith said. "We're doing a great job of pressuring them, making sure they don't have enough time to think about that."The Knicks got contributions from everyone in their third-quarter romp, with Iman Shumpert hitting two 3-pointers to start the festivities, Anthony scoring 13 points and Tyson Chandler making his first tangible impact on the series.Chandler, who had been limited by a neck injury, looked closer to normal as he powered through a Pierce foul for a layup and 3-point play, then followed up with a resounding block of Avery Bradley at the other end.Smith, the newly crowned sixth man of the year, celebrated his title with an efficient 19-point performance, and a booming pregame ovation when he received his trophy."Like an out-of-body feeling," Smith said of the crowd's response. "I never really thought I would get a standing ovation at the Garden the way I did. It was great."Smith sank his first four shots — each more difficult than the one before it — and hit a 36-foot buzzer-beater to close the first quarter, completing an 11-0 Knicks run.The Celtics answered with their own 11-0 run, as their bench finally came alive. Jason Terry, who was 0 for 5 in Game 1, hit three 3-pointers in the first half, and Boston surged to a 46-37 lead, which proved to be their high point.Anthony made just 3 of 11 shots against the Celtics' swarming defense in the half, but he found some room and his rhythm after halftime."He figures it out," Coach Mike Woodson said. "The great ones do that."Amar'e Stoudemire sounded upbeat about his recovery from knee surgery and said he would return "sooner than later," although he could not say when. Stoudemire was given a six-week timetable after having debridement surgery on his right knee on March 11. That would have placed his return sometime this week, but Stoudemire has yet to resume on-court workouts. It took Stoudemire more than eight weeks to return from a similar surgery on his left knee earlier in the season. "Hopefully it heals sooner than eight weeks," he said. "If not, I just have to be patient." ... Pablo Prigioni, his right ankle sound again, returned to the starting lineup after missing Game 1. ... Three NBA TV analysts, including Isiah Thomas, chose Mike Woodson as their coach of the year candidate, in an informal poll by the network. Woodson was unmoved. "That's nice," he said, adding, "I'm not in this for coach of the year. I'm in it to try to see if we can get this team to the championship round, to try to win a title." Woodson turned stone-faced when asked if he and Thomas — the controversial former Knicks executive and head coach — have spoken recently. "Isiah and I are friends," he said. "We talk all the time, absolutely."
For one night in what has been a long and grueling season devoid of Hollywood flourish, Joakim Noah and the Chicago Bulls produced the kind of happy ending Noah had wanted to see for the superstars in his life, from way back when as well as now.If ever there was a quintessential player made for the brilliant defensive-minded machinations of his coach, Tom Thibodeau, Noah is it — a nearly 7-foot mass of inelegant appendages. In the arena, around the rim, Noah is many useful things, just never a blur of transcendent creativity like the Bulls' still-recovering star, Derrick Rose, or the leading man of his New York City adolescence, Lenny Cooke.Not long ago, Noah attached his name as executive producer to an eponymously titled documentary on Cooke, a former A.A.U. teammate who was profiled last year in The Times under the heading, "Star-to-Be Who Never Was." The film, which premiered last week at the Tribeca Film Festival, notes that it wasn't drugs or criminality that nullified Cooke, who once outranked LeBron James and Carmelo Anthony in those arbitrary projections of greatness.It was, as "Lenny Cooke" makes painfully clear in almost 90 minutes of unvarnished access, a case of attitudinal and cultural perversions, the misunderstanding that talent alone is a winning lottery ticket."It's a hard story, it's real, and it happens a lot," Noah said as he walked to the interview room late Monday night, his attendance there requested for making the hustle plays on an injured foot that helped the Bulls beat the Nets, 90-82, at Barclays Center to even their Eastern Conference playoff series.Until the film — which is the brainchild of the producer Adam Shopkorn and directed by Josh and Benny Safdie — was into its latter developmental stages, Noah resisted a role, hoping that Cooke could provide a more optimistic outlook for the benefit of the youngest N.B.A. wannabes. An excruciating scene at Cooke's 30th birthday party, in which he serenades his fiancée but soon after is teary and morose, might suggest otherwise.Noah came around to the understanding that powerful cautionary tales often do not end in sunshine."His reality isn't easy, but he's trying to deal with it by allowing his story to be told," Noah said. "If it helps even one or two kids, it will have been worth it."In New York for the film's premier, Cooke, who lives in Virginia, visited with Noah at Barclays on Saturday, when the Nets hammered the Bulls in Game 1. Cooke saw them at their short-handed worst, still no Rose to illuminate an otherwise pedestrian offense, with Noah hobbling around ineffectively on a right foot plagued for months by plantar fasciitis.After receiving treatment between games, Noah had 11 points, 10 rebounds, 3 assists and 2 blocked shots in Game 2. More impressively, he scurried around on his bad foot to harass the Nets' Deron Williams in Thibodeau's effective double-team pressure."Playing in front of my family and friends, I've waited all my life for moments like this," Noah said.More than any of the major team sports, an N.B.A. playoff seeding creates a fine line between what can be considered an acceptable postseason or not. The chances for an upset in the N.F.L. postseason are enhanced because it is one game. Inferior teams in baseball can rise on a hot pitcher or two. In pro basketball, a team generally gets what it deserves — or in the case of the Bulls, sans Rose, what they've been dealt.Who can say why Rose has thus far refused to test his surgically repaired knee in game action, a year after he was injured in Game 1 of the first round? Before Monday night's game, he launched one step-back jumper after another, many hitting nothing but net.Noah and the others, by now as mystified as the rest of us, have had no choice but to go about their business. Even were Rose to declare himself ready with the series shifting to Chicago, and if the Bulls could push past Brooklyn, their reward would be likely second-round doom against Miami.This is also true of the Nets, who fell just short of third place in the East. That would have matched them with Atlanta, a far less formidable draw than even the injury-ravaged Bulls, and then a potential second-round series with the Knicks.Too bad, for all of basketball New York. An intracity showdown would have authenticated the nascent rivalry like nothing else. But the Nets' franchise player, Williams, struggled for months with aching ankles, perhaps exacerbated by excess weight. By the time Williams slimmed down and looked more like himself, the Nets were on their way to compiling the league's 15th-best home record, 26-15 at Barclays.In a virtually new market, with many people rooting for marquee teams like the Knicks, the Heat and the Bulls in their handsome new building, it was probably unfair to expect the Nets to be dominant at home. Monday was a microcosm of all that, the crowd less than fevered, Williams struggling, the Nets shooting poorly and failing to hold serve.The game's most pivotal play came when Noah outworked Kris Humphries for the carom of a Carlos Boozer jumper and saved the ball from going out of bounds on the baseline. Noah redirected it blindly to Kirk Hinrich, whose one-handed catch and feed to Nate Robinson produced a 3-point shot that gave Chicago a 10-point lead with 6 minutes 15 seconds left.It wasn't a Derrick Rose highlight, but more of a lesson learned from the life and times of Lenny Cooke."What happened with Lenny, I lived that with him and it motivated me to work even harder," Noah said on the way to the interview room. He walked with a limp.
The emotions will be powerful Friday night at Boston's TD Garden, a mix of cathartic release and desperation. This much, the Knicks and Celtics both know and expect.The Celtics will be playing their first home game in two weeks, their first since the Boston Marathon bombings, and that alone will infuse the arena with a different energy when tipoff arrives for Game 3 of this first-round series."It's just good to be back in Boston, period," said Coach Doc Rivers, whose team's final home game was canceled because of the attack. "It will feel great and be great."Regardless of context, winning Friday has become a virtual imperative for the Celtics. They are facing a 2-0 deficit, looking as frail and vulnerable as they ever have in the Paul Pierce-Kevin Garnett era. They may be days away from elimination, and another off-season of uncertainty, and that, too, will lend a different undercurrent to the evening.Against this backdrop, the Knicks will try to sustain the focus and the defensive tenacity that carried them to two victories at home."We can't get caught up in all of the hoopla that's going to surround this game," Coach Mike Woodson said Wednesday. "If we do that, we'll give ourselves a chance to win a game."Only 14 N.B.A. teams have won a series after losing the first two games. No team has won after trailing, 3-0.The Knicks have more playoff victories in the last week than they had in the previous 11 years combined. They are deeper, healthier and simply more talented, and seem well positioned to win their first series since 2000.Carmelo Anthony has been the best player on the floor by far, averaging 35 points and shooting 45.3 percent from the field, despite absorbing the brunt of the Celtics' defense. He is getting plenty of support from J. R. Smith (17 points per game) and Raymond Felton (14.5 points).The Knicks are shooting 41.3 percent, but their defense has been surprisingly formidable, holding the Celtics to 39.3 percent. Pierce has looked ordinary, averaging 19.5 points, and Garnett has been blunted by foul trouble. Other than Jeff Green (18 points per game), Boston has nowhere to turn.The Celtics scored only 25 points in the second half of Game 1 and 23 in the second half of Game 2. Their halfcourt offense has been handicapped by the absence of Rajon Rondo, or really the absence of any point guard. Still, Rivers said, "the game is not as difficult as we make it at times."The Celtics had the N.B.A.'s 20th-ranked offense this season, but they have been considerably worse in this series. Their offensive rating (points per 100 possessions) is a sickly 84, which would rank last in the league by a huge margin.Garnett sustained a minor hip injury on Tuesday night, but Rivers said he would play. The Knicks have no new injury concerns, although Tyson Chandler is still working his way back into game shape after recovering from a bulging disk in his neck. Woodson disclosed Tuesday that Chandler had lost some weight during the recovery."We got to get him back up to speed," Woodson said. "I think as each game comes, he'll improve and get back to where we expect him to be."
CHICAGO — Derrick Rose was the last player on the court after warm-ups an hour before Game 3 between the Bulls and the Nets at United Center on Thursday night. Bathed in a layer of sweat after going through a series of shooting and dribbling drills, Rose skied above the rim and dunked, eliciting a cheer from the handful of fans who had arrived early.He then walked to the locker room, only to return wearing a suit.Rose, a 24-year-old Chicago native, has not played at all this season after tearing his anterior cruciate ligament during the first round of last year's playoffs, and was scratched again Thursday. But not before he teased fans with a glimpse of the form that made him the league's most valuable player in 2010-11.Rose is a long shot to return at any point against the Nets. As the Nets' coach, P. J. Carlesimo, explained at the outset of the series, "it's hard to not have played for quite some time and come out and be effective."But Rose's stature, in addition to his public pregame practice sessions and the Bulls' refusal to rule him out for the series, have kept the intrigue surrounding him from dissipating. Come tipoff, he may be a shadow on the Bulls' bench, but Rose remains one of the top story lines. And his team seems more than willing to stoke the flames of a possible comeback and a dramatic return."If Derrick comes in this locker room and says he wants to play tomorrow, his uniform is ready," his teammate Luol Deng said after Game 2.On Thursday, Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau echoed that sentiment, saying, "We've said this all along — if he's ready to come back, he's coming back no matter when it is."Rose has remained mostly silent and out of uniform. He said before the playoffs that he would return when he felt ready, and he has not elaborated on that comment.It has become a familiar issue that has engulfed Chicago for the past two months. Rose was cleared to practice with the team in February, and his doctor reportedly approved his return to game action in early March. Since then, video footage of Rose shooting and dunking, including jumping off the left knee that was operated on, have fed the imagination of Chicagoans desperate for his return.The Bulls appear to want Rose back just as badly. Earlier in the series, Thibodeau brought up the example of the 1997-98 season, when he was an assistant coach with the Knicks and Patrick Ewing missed the last four months of the season because of a wrist injury. Ewing returned for a second-round playoff series against Indiana.Another Knick, Iman Shumpert, also offers some measure of hope — or frustration — for those wishing to see Rose in uniform. Shumpert tore his A.C.L. on the same day as Rose, but he returned to game action this January and has helped the Knicks to a 2-0 lead over the Boston Celtics in their first-round playoff series.As Rose continues to come under fire, his toughness questioned by the same fans who once adored him, his visibility on the bench can be seen through two different prisms. Thibodeau said Rose had taken well to his role as a cheerleader and coach. But as Rose jumped up and down on the sidelines during a run by the Bulls in Game 2, it also served as a reminder of what could be if he were in sneakers instead of loafers."We are only one thing," said guard Marco Belinelli, praising Rose's presence on the bench. "We are a group; we are all together."Then, as if anyone might have forgotten, Belinelli added, "He's still on the team."
CHICAGO — With one made basket, the Nets could have erased the 52 others they had already missed, wiped an ugly slate clean and started fresh in overtime, maybe tilting the momentum of this first-round series against the Chicago Bulls .Instead, C. J. Watson's last-second 3-point attempt fluttered across the rim as the buzzer sounded, another miss in a brutally long evening of misses. What was a forgettable game turned into a stinging loss, if only because the Nets had played so miserably and then fought back so late, only to be defeated, 79-76, at United Center.Now down two games to one, with Game 4 coming Saturday afternoon, the Nets have to figure out how to end the percussive beat rattling in their heads: clang, clang, clang. Brooklyn shot 34.6 percent on Thursday, and that was after the team hit 11 of 20 field-goal attempts in a fourth-quarter rally. The first three quarters were among the worst the team has played offensively all season."We are not shooting our 3 well at all," Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo said. "Not just the contested ones. The open ones."After Game 1, the Bulls adjusted their defense — or, rather, they challenged the Nets to adjust their offense, shove by shove. In Game 2 on Monday, the ultra-aggressive approach put the Nets back on their heels. On Thursday, Brooklyn's shooting legs were swiped from under them. "That's the style we like to play," said Luol Deng of the Bulls. "We love ugly games."The Nets fell behind by as much as 17 points. But the Bulls shot only 5 of 16 in the fourth quarter and Brooklyn managed to pull to within 78-76 with five seconds remaining.After a free throw by Joakim Noah, the Nets had time for one last heave, and the ball swung to Watson, who had a good look from the right wing. But, like almost everything else Thursday, it was not to be."We got a lot of good looks, looks that we've been getting," Watson said. "We just didn't make them tonight."The Nets had also blamed Monday's loss, in part, on their shooting struggles. Whatever malady befell their touch over the weekend was still kicking around in their system Thursday.For a prolonged stretch of the first half, Brooklyn's perimeter game was in utter paralysis. Nothing was happening offensively. After they began the game 5 of 8 from the field, jumping ahead by 17-5, the scorching start stopped like a light bulb bursting.The Nets missed 25 of 26 shots between 6 minutes 25 seconds of the first quarter and 3:38 of the second quarter. The Bulls went on a 28-4 run to take a 33-22 lead.There were airballs and blown layups, passes ricocheting off chests and hands, a shot-clock violation, a lot of puzzled looks.The silver lining for the Nets was that, somehow, they went into halftime trailing by only 7 after Gerald Wallace hit a 3-pointer at the buzzer to cut the Bulls' lead to 41-34. It was just the fourth Nets field goal of the second quarter, out of 18 tries."We were fighting an uphill battle all night," point guard Deron Williams said. "It's just tough to get it going."The Nets were distinctly more aggressive defensively to start the game, forcing six turnovers in the first eight minutes and preventing Chicago from scoring easily in the paint, two focuses of improvement during practice this week.With Williams leading the way offensively, Brooklyn jumped out to a 13-2 lead. Williams scored 8 of the team's first 17 points. The Nets did not seem daunted by the large and raucous crowd at United Center, playing like the team that won a franchise-record 23 games on the road this season.The Bulls began aggressively extending their defense, particularly on Williams, who began seeing double and even triple teams. The open man — often Wallace or Reggie Evans — was not hitting shots. The demise snowballed."We did not execute," Carlesimo said. "We have to understand to space the floor and take better care of the ball."Chicago ended the first quarter on a 14-0 run and with a 19-17 lead, momentum that carried into the second. Andray Blatche hit a layup a minute into the quarter and then the Nets did not make a field goal for more than seven minutes.Late in the fourth, a Nets lineup with MarShon Brooks and Blatche joining Williams, Johnson and Lopez staged the comeback with a 10-1 run. The Nets took some solace in the fact that their defense stayed tough, and they closed Chicago's gap despite playing about as poor offensively as they have all season.Joe Johnson scored 15 points on 6-of-14 shooting and appeared fine playing through plantar fasciitis in his left foot. He received a cortisone shot before the game.But their backs are getting pushed against the wall now. Falling behind by 3-1, Williams said, was likely to be insurmountable.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — Great expectations clung to every soul who joined the Knicks these past 10 months, whether by signing, trade, unretirement or via the N.B.A. career rehabilitation program. A simple, modest uptick in the wins column would no longer be enough to calm an antsy, dispirited fan base.The Knicks would have to win often, win big and keep winning deep into the spring. Carmelo Anthony would carry the greatest burden, to be sure, but no one accepted a more fraught assignment than Raymond Felton, the new starting point guard, whose responsibility extended far beyond running the offense.How, exactly, does a person go about replacing a sensation, a feeling, a once-in-a-lifetime phenomenon? Felton could capably replace Jeremy Lin, but he could never replicate Linsanity, the giddy frenzy that briefly overtook Madison Square Garden, and much of the free world, last year.When it came time to rejoin the Knicks last summer, Felton's only hesitation was the possibility that Lin might return too, that he might walk into the mother of all point-guard controversies."It would have made me think a little differently, no question," Felton said Thursday. "No question. But there's no need to talk about that."To Felton's credit, there really isn't. The Knicks have made Linsanity a distant, happy memory, outshined by a 54-win season and the first tangible hopes of a championship in 13 years. Felton has been integral to the revival, and he is a key reason the Knicks hold a 2-0 lead over the Boston Celtics in their first-round playoff series."He's killing us," Celtics Coach Doc Rivers said. "He's getting into the paint, he's attacking us. It doesn't look well on film, I can tell you that."Felton has scored 29 points over two games, behind only Anthony (70) and J. R. Smith (34). His penetration via the pick-and-roll has made a mess of the Celtics' vaunted defense. He had 16 points, 7 assists and 0 turnovers in Game 2 and helped spearhead the 32-11 third quarter that crushed Boston's spirit.Felton has also provided surprisingly effective defense against Paul Pierce, who has a six-inch height advantage and a finals M.V.P. trophy in his closet.This is the playoff future Felton envisioned when he returned to New York last July, on a four-year, $14.9 million contract (via a sign-and-trade deal with Portland). He had shined under the Broadway lights once before, starring alongside Amar'e Stoudemire in 2010-11, before getting shipped to Denver in the Anthony trade. It was, statistically and otherwise, the best three months of Felton's career.Felton wanted badly to return, to rekindle that feeling and to fulfill the expectations of a top-five draft pick. Felton was taken fifth, by Charlotte, in 2005, just after Deron Williams and Chris Paul. Those two have since become All-Stars and Olympians and playoff fixtures. Felton, who was not blessed with Paul's quickness or Williams's athleticism, is still chasing validation.In Charlotte, Felton endured four miserable seasons before leading the Bobcats to their first playoff appearance, in 2010. They were swept by Orlando in the first round, and management promptly broke up the team (which also included Tyson Chandler). Joining the Knicks, who had just signed Stoudemire, provided a chance for redemption. But Felton was gone two months before the postseason arrived. He did make the playoffs with Denver, as an unhappy backup to Ty Lawson. The Nuggets were knocked out in five games, by the Oklahoma City Thunder.Felton, like the Knicks, has won more playoff games in the past week than in the last eight years combined. This makes him a bit of an anomaly in a rotation featuring two N.B.A. champions (Chandler and Jason Kidd), a two-time finalist (Kenyon Martin), a scoring champion (Anthony) and numerous postseason veterans (Stoudemire, Smith, Marcus Camby).Never in his career has Felton been surrounded by this much talent, or expectations this high."That's the way I like it anyway," Felton said. "I don't like nothing given to me. I don't like no hype. Just let me earn what I get. So if I get that respect, then I get it."Felton might not be as decorated as Anthony or Chandler, but he walks with the swagger of a Broadway star and talks like a player with a far bolder résumé. "I'd like to have my respect, from my peers and from everybody else," Felton said. "Hopefully, that will finally happen. Finally I can get that respect that I should as a point guard, because I feel like I'm a guy that brings it every night. I'm a guy that's not necessarily going to score 20, 30 points like some point guards in this league. But at the same time, I do what I have to do for my team as a point guard."What the Knicks needed last summer — and what Coach Mike Woodson wanted — was a veteran who could keep the offense humming, keep the stars happy and command the respect of the locker room.In Felton, Woodson said he saw "a tough kid" who is "getting better in terms of knowing how to run a team." The Knicks have been at their best with a two-point-guard lineup, with either Kidd or Pablo Prigioni joining Felton to take on some of the playmaking duties.Yet Felton has unquestionably established his value and affirmed the Knicks' faith."I feel like I've taken that to every team I've had," Felton said, adding with a grin, "and it's nice to see that it's finally starting to get noticed."Doc Rivers was fined $25,000 by the N.B.A. for criticizing the referees after Tuesday night's 87-71 loss in Game 2. Rivers referred to the officiating as "horrendous," citing several fouls called against Kevin Garnett, who was limited by foul trouble all night.
The Miami Heat 's latest spurt put the Milwaukee Bucks on the verge of elimination from the playoffs.LeBron James scored 7 of his 22 points at the end of the third quarter as the Heat pulled away from the host Bucks on Thursday. Their 104-91 victory gave them a 3-0 lead in the best-of-seven series. The Heat, the defending champions, can close it out Sunday at Bradley Center.No N.B.A. team has overcome a 3-0 deficit to win a best-of-seven series.Ray Allen led the Heat with 23 points, and his five 3-pointers gave him the career playoff record of 322. Chris Bosh added 16 points and 14 rebounds for the Heat, who have won 11 straight dating to the regular season. Dwyane Wade scored only 4 points, but he had 11 assists.Larry Sanders and Brandon Jennings led the Bucks with 16 points each.GUARD SHORTAGE Steve Blake will not play for the Los Angeles Lakers in Game 3 against the San Antonio Spurs on Friday, and his fellow guards Steve Nash and Jodie Meeks are doubtful. Kobe Bryant is out with an Achilles' tendon injury.The Lakers are running out of healthy guards, and they trail in their series with San Antonio by 2-0. Blake, a backup point guard, has a strained right hamstring that will sideline him indefinitely.GRIZZLIES 94, CLIPPERS 82 Zach Randolph had 27 points and 11 rebounds, and host Memphis returned to form by beating Los Angeles. The Grizzlies trail, two games to one, in the teams' first-round series.The Grizzlies stopped the Clippers' nine-game winning streak by outrebounding them and dominating on second-chance points, the same things Los Angeles did so well on its home court to start the series. Game 4 is Saturday in Memphis.CURRY MAY MISS GAME 3 Golden State Warriors point guard Stephen Curry is unsure if his sprained left ankle will allow him to play in Game 3 against the Denver Nuggets on Friday night. Curry said his ankle became swollen after Tuesday's 131-117 win at Denver, which evened the series at 1-1.Curry said he was optimistic about starting the first home playoff game of his four-year career. He also said he would consider a pain-numbing injection, something he has never done in the regular season when his right ankle, surgically repaired twice, gave him problems.LIN AILING Houston Rockets point guard Jeremy Lin was listed as day to day with a bruised right chest muscle he sustained in a Game 2 loss to the Oklahoma City Thunder. Lin was injured in the first half of a 105-102 loss on Wednesday and did not return in the second half. He was trying to chase down a loose ball with Oklahoma City's Thabo Sefolosha.FRAUD CHARGED The founder and managing director of Prim Capital Corporation has been charged with attempting to defraud the players association out of $3 million with a bogus contract, federal prosecutors in Manhattan said. A complaint unsealed Thursday charged Joseph Lombardo, 72, with attempted wire fraud, attempted mail fraud and obstruction of justice. Carolyn Kaufman, 72, the president of Prim's advisory services component, was charged with obstructing justice. (REUTERS)
BOSTON — Doc Rivers said he felt his Boston Celtics team lost its spirit on Friday, an unimaginable concept given everything that appeared to be favoring them heading into Game 3 of their first-round playoff series against the Knicks .But the Celtics lost a lot more than their spirit. They also lost the game, crushed by the Knicks, 90-76. That means they trail by 3-0 in the series, a situation from which no team in N.B.A. history has recovered.On a night when their season was on the line, the Celtics laid an egg in front of 18,624 fans, most of them wearing Boston Strong T-shirts. The Celtics shot the ball poorly. They looked lethargic, uninterested, and they were careless with the ball and struggled again to make that most basic of N.B.A. plays — a basket."I thought they wanted to play well," Rivers said of his team, who had hoped to be buoyed by a raucous home crowd that included first responders from the Boston Marathon bombing last week. "You know, we didn't."The Celtics were counting on more than a boisterous crowd to get them back into the series. They had history on their side, or so they thought. Since 2008, the Celtics were 13-0 in home playoff games after a road loss.Forgotten, apparently, was the fact that the Celtics had lost the first two games of this series, and lost them badly. Forgotten, too, was the fact that their offense in New York looked like something out of the pre-shot clock era (74.5 points on 39.3 percent shooting).All the talk Friday focused on a victory that would get Boston back in the series. Rivers changed his starting lineup, inserting Jason Terry in an attempt to provide offense and relieve an overmatched Avery Bradley of some of the ball-handling duties."At the end of the day," Rivers said, "that didn't work."Little did. The Celtics ran a perfect play on their first possession — except that Paul Pierce missed a layup and Kevin Garnett followed with another missed layup. That sequence set the stage for the evening. The Celtics were never in a game they absolutely could not afford to lose. Over the final 27 minutes, they never got closer than 11 points. They trailed by as many as 21.The Celtics held one lead, at 2-0, but the Knicks then scored 10 of the next 12 points. Garnett did an admirable job on the boards (17 rebounds) but could not convert several shots from close range, finishing with 12 points and shooting 5 of 13. Pierce (17 points, 6-for-15 shooting) and Jeff Green (21 points, 8 for 17) led what passed for the Boston offense, but they also combined for 10 of the Celtics 18 turnovers.The sellout crowd at TD Garden was looking for any excuse to cheer, but the home team never gave them the opportunity. For two days, the talk in Boston was how the great home crowd would energize the team, how the team would feed off that energy and get back in the series.But the fans don't play the games. A while back, when the Celtics were facing a crucial home playoff game, Kevin McHale was asked if the fans would make a difference."Only if Bill Russell is in the stands and decides to come out and play," he said.
BOSTON — The suspense had long since dissipated, along with the Boston Celtics ' spirit, but Carmelo Anthony was still on the parquet floor late Friday, dribbling, firing, skipping with a childlike glee and then, finally, making a slow, purposeful walk to the bench.A faint chorus of "M.V.P." chants accompanied him — a final, appreciative salute from the few dozen Knicks loyalists at TD Garden.If Anthony lingered a bit longer than necessary, staying on the court until 94 seconds remained in an eventual 90-76 rout, the indulgence was understandable. So much is finally in reach: a meaningful postseason for New York. A sweep. A cleansing. A step forward.The Knicks took a stranglehold of the first-round series, three games to none, and can complete the sweep, which would be the first of Anthony's career, here on Sunday afternoon."To accomplish that would be spectacular," Anthony said after scoring 26 points. "It'd be a dream come true. I've never swept anybody."A win Sunday would clinch the Knicks' first series victory since 2000 and their first four-game sweep since 1999. For Anthony, who has advanced from the first round once in his career, it would be a particularly gratifying moment, coming two years after the Celtics swept him in his first postseason with the Knicks. As Anthony put it a day earlier, he would be "super duper happy."The Celtics, who fell one victory short of making the finals last spring, are facing their first sweep since 2004, the spring before Doc Rivers became coach.No N.B.A. team has come back from a 3-0 deficit, and this Celtics team — aging, depleted and missing its offensive engine in Rajon Rondo — hardly seems capable of breaking the trend. The Knicks pounced early, led by double digits for the entire second half and kept attacking until the final minutes. They converted half of their field-goal attempts, held Boston to 40 percent shooting and secured their second straight rout."I thought we lost our spirit," Rivers said.So did the fans, who began streaming for the exits with 10 minutes to play, the Knicks leading by 19 points.Celtics fans have enjoyed a riveting five-year run, and a 17th title, since Kevin Garnett and Ray Allen joined Pierce in 2008, but that era seems close to its end. Allen is gone, and Pierce and Garnett appear helpless to carry this storied franchise through another postseason.Pierce went 2 for 10 in the first half as the Knicks began the rout, and he never got much better, finishing with 17 points and a 6-for-15 shooting performance. Garnett had 12 points and 17 rebounds. Jeff Green led Boston with 21 points.The only real tension came with 7 minutes 6 seconds left, when J. R. Smith swung his elbow into Jason Terry's chin, sending Terry sprawling to the floor. Terry had to be restrained by officials as Smith walked away from the play, which was initially ruled a simple flagrant foul. It was upgraded to a flagrant foul-2 after a video review, triggering an automatic ejection for Smith."I was trying to draw the foul," Smith said. "He reached in one time. I thought he was going to reach in again a second time. I was going to try to get a quick shot off, but they made a call that the refs saw. Not really much I could do about it."Before heading to the locker room, Smith received an animated lecture from Coach Mike Woodson."He'll learn from it," Woodson said. "I don't think he was trying to hurt the kid."Rivers clearly felt differently. "I wish I was playing," Rivers said, his voice tense. "I didn't like that."Rivers stopped himself before going any further, then quietly left the dais.It was a taut evening from the start, as the Celtics played their first home game since the Boston Marathon bombings, an event that was invoked frequently.There were three standing ovations in the first half alone, as the Celtics honored first responders and others who assisted in the aftermath of the bombings. There was also a moment of silence for the victims, and a photo montage of scenes from the marathon, followed by a simple message: "Keep on running, Boston."The Celtics' deficit in the series created its own sort of anxiety, and that was palpable, too. Every turnover and every missed jumper elicited a collective groan, which finally gave way to boos as the Celtics ended the first half facing a 16-point deficit."You want it so bad, and you rush and get real anxious," Pierce said.Rivers shook up his rotation and hoped for the best. Jason Terry moved into the starting lineup, pushing Brandon Bass to the bench, giving the Celtics a smaller, quicker look. Courtney Lee, who had been benched for most of Game 2, was back as the first guard off the bench.Rajon Rondo's absence was always going to be determining factor in the Celtics' postseason fate, but the effects have been worse than expected. They have yet to hit the 80-point mark in this series."I didn't expect this coming in," Pierce said. "I knew this would probably be a long series being the way we matched up. So I am surprised we are down 0-3 right now."It was the lingering effects of an illness, and not the lingering effects of a neck injury, that slowed Tyson Chandler in the first two games of the series, Mike Woodson said. "He was sick," Woodson disclosed. "He wasn't really eating, so he lost a few pounds. We got to get him back pumped up a little bit." ... Doc Rivers was fined $25,000 by the N.B.A. on Friday, and was firmly unrepentant in his assessment of the Game 2 officiating as "horrendous." "I didn't get fined for being wrong," Rivers said with a smile. "I got fined for saying it."
CHICAGO — Early in the fourth quarter Saturday, Gerald Wallace set a hard screen on Nate Robinson in the Nets ' backcourt. Robinson weighs 35 pounds less and is 10 inches shorter than the 6-foot-7, 215-pound Wallace, and the collision had the feel of a puppy running into a Mack truck.Robinson lay on the floor, facedown, for several moments. But he soon shook his head, steadied himself and rose. He then delivered a memorable, and improbable, playoff performance.The Bulls trailed by 109-95 with three minutes to play in regulation when Robinson took over. He scored 12 straight points and led the Bulls on a 16-2 run, to the delight of the United Center crowd.He sank a 3-pointer, then made a driving layup, a jumper and all three free throws after he was fouled on a 3-point attempt. He capped his stretch with an acrobatic floater. Robinson scored 23 points in the fourth quarter, his off-balance runners sometimes finding the basket as if by tracking device."Kind of like the old-school game NBA Jam," Robinson said, referring to a video game. "You make a couple, and the rim's on fire or the ball's on fire. I feel like that at times."When the Bulls had finally secured a 142-134 triple-overtime victory and a 3-1 series lead over the Nets, Robinson was on the bench, having fouled out in the second overtime. But as he and his exhausted teammates celebrated and the crowd rocked, there was no mistaking that the game belonged to Robinson, the unlikely hero of a memorable battle.Robinson arrived in Chicago last off-season as a stopgap backup point guard, with the superstar Derrick Rose recovering from a torn anterior cruciate ligament. Robinson's shoot-first style can be seen as refreshing or headache-inducing. Fans and reporters around Chicago have taken to describing him as Good Nate when the shots fall and Bad Nate when they do not."He's a character," said Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau, who also coached Robinson when both were members of the Boston Celtics. "You got to take the whole package. The good outweighs the bad."Robinson said: "I tease Coach a lot because it seems like every shot I shoot, he's mad regardless. You got to hope to make them, and then he really can't say too much."Robinson, 28, does not shy away from the spotlight or big moments and relishes his lightning-rod status. A Seattle native, he was a first-round draft pick of the Phoenix Suns out of Washington in 2005, but a draft-day trade sent him to the Knicks. He played four-plus seasons with the Knicks, and he bounced from Boston to Oklahoma City to Golden State before arriving in Chicago.Because he is only 5-9, he is by default the ultimate underdog and has been a fan favorite wherever he has played. His flair and colorful personality sometimes appear to overflow from his small frame.In the first half Saturday, Robinson revved up the home crowd when he became tangled with C. J. Watson after guarding him aggressively. Robinson kept fighting for the ball after the whistle and drove Watson into the scorer's table. A few shoves were exchanged. Robinson and Watson had to be separated. Each was given a technical foul."Those plays will get you fired up," Robinson said.The unbridled exuberance has always come with the potential for big-time offense. For his career, Robinson has averaged 11.5 points a game in only 23.4 minutes. This year, he scored 35 points against the Knicks in an April game, and 34 against Denver in March. Playing mostly off the bench, he surpassed 20 points 12 times during the season.In Game 4, his final line was 14 for 23 from the field, 3 for 7 on 3-point attempts, and 3 for 3 from the free-throw line. He scored 34 points."That's what Nate's capable of," Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo said. "Nate's one of those guys who can change a game. Whether you want to call him an X-factor or whatever, there's nights when he gets it going that he's very, very difficult to defend."As Robinson heated up in the fourth quarter, he asked Thibodeau, a noted disciplinarian, not to run any plays. He said he preferred the spontaneity of a free-flowing game."Just let the ball find me," he said he told his coach. "It worked."
CHICAGO — The locker-room floor was strewn with towels, torn bandages and ice. Eyes were red and gaits were stilted. After two games and two losses, after 63 minutes in a triple-overtime thriller on Saturday, this is how the Nets left Chicago.There was little to say, and words could scarcely describe the emotional swings in a Game 4 matinee that pushed into the early dusk, drama building with each successive overtime, a sold-out crowd at United Center left hoarse and delirious. The grim reality for the Nets was enough.After the 142-134 loss to the Chicago Bulls, the Nets are down by 3-1 in this first-round series, with Game 5 at Barclays Center on Monday. But there is a price to pay for blowing a 14-point lead with less than four minutes remaining in regulation. There is a sting that will not be relieved easily.The Nets were inches from salting away an easy victory, ahead by 14 points with 3 minutes 19 seconds remaining, when C. J. Watson stole the ball from Nate Robinson, dribbled alone down court and missed an open, two-handed dunk.At the time, it was an embarrassing moment in what had been an altogether pleasant game for the Nets, who woke up from their offensive slump in the previous two losses to shoot 57.1 percent from the field in regulation. Watson smiled and shook his head. Some fans at United Center began trickling toward the exit."I was just a little tired," Watson said. "I shouldn't have missed it."The Bulls seized on the missed opportunity, particularly Robinson, the 5-foot-9 point guard. Robinson reeled off 12 straight points to bring the Bulls back within 2. With 55 seconds left, Robinson passed to Carlos Boozer, who tied the score.The game went into overtime after Deron Williams missed a fallaway jumper at the buzzer."They just took it to us," Williams said. "Nate got hot and he didn't miss a shot. We couldn't find an answer for him."In overtime, Robinson again led the Bulls. With time ticking down, Robinson waved a screening Joakim Noah away at the top of the key and drove past Williams to deliver a running bank shot with 1.7 seconds left. He hopped into Boozer's arms.That celebration proved premature. The Nets called timeout and managed to get Joe Johnson open for a game-tying runner in the lane, and he delivered, silencing the crowd and giving the Nets another chance."It was like a reset, a new start," Johnson said. "But we just didn't make the big plays defensively."The Nets were never able to build momentum in the second or third overtimes. Johnson missed a potential game-winning pull-up jumper with 5.5 seconds left in the second overtime, and the Bulls wore down the Nets in the third, outscoring them by 15-7 as the Nets missed 6 of 8 shots."I thought our team showed a lot of toughness," Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau said. "Nate made big plays and shots. We had a very hard time getting stops and were fortunate to get a win."After the game, the Nets struggled to comprehend how they let such a crucial game slip through their grasp, offering a few basic answers. They did not trap Robinson. They shot 29 of 45 from the free-throw line. The Bulls ended regulation on a 16-2 run."When it is all said and done, we did not do enough things to win," Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo said.Unlike the 79-76 loss in Game 3, in which the Nets took some solace from the way they battled back in the fourth quarter, there was little saving grace from Saturday's performance. Their offensive showing in the third quarter — when they shot 12 of 17 to turn a 58-55 deficit into an 84-76 lead heading into the fourth — was largely forgotten.Before the game, there were signs that the emotional strain of consecutive losses was starting to fray the locker room. On Friday, forward Gerald Wallace told reporters in the team hotel that he had apparently lost his way in the offense, saying, "I've got no clue what my role is."The sound bite was an added distraction for Carlesimo, who described his team as "agitated" before Game 4. It might have worked positively, though, as Wallace responded with 17 points, 9 rebounds and 4 assists before fouling out in the first overtime.Evans also played a key role offensively, scoring 15 points with 13 rebounds. For the first time in a week, the offense was not the issue. It was the defense."It was a shootout," Carlesimo said. "Neither of us did a good job at stopping each other."The Bulls finished shooting 53.2 percent from the field, with 17 second-chance points and 28 points off 19 Nets turnovers. Boozer continued his solid interior presence, finishing with 21 points, and Noah added 15 points and 13 rebounds.The catalyst, though, was Robinson. Earlier in the game, midway through the second quarter, Robinson scuffled with Watson, hurling him into the scorer's table after Watson appeared to extend an elbow. The incident incited both benches, but nothing more came of it.For a while, Watson appeared to have the upper hand in the confrontation. The Nets were winning, things looked good for them, but then he missed that dunk.The rest was history: a series potentially pivoting on a dunk that missed, a game that unraveled."It's a heartbreaker," Johnson said. "It was a game we let get away."
In theory, I shouldn't have. Both sides of my family have deep roots here. But I grew up in North Carolina, and any time spent in New York cultivated a distaste for the city that felt mutual. This was heightened almost three years ago when I found myself scrambling to make a living here and ranting about the inconsistency of the Q train to anyone who would listen.Then a funny thing happened. I started becoming obsessed with the Knicks. I'm sure that most of my interest came from the obvious appeal of sports as escape. But there was something else, because I became inexplicably distressed by the Knicks' difficulties. I wanted to see them succeed, and I couldn't figure out why. All I knew was that something in the dysfunction of the Knicks had reawakened part of me dormant since childhood, and it sparked a strange process of assimilation with New York, which had forever felt like a nemesis.In North Carolina, basketball is like a religion, so I was accustomed to the concept of living and dying with a team, trading stats from a previous night's game with a stranger and referring to players by their first names as if we were close friends.When I was young, the Chicago Bulls were my N.B.A. team (Michael Jordan grew up in Wilmington, N.C., where I spent my elementary school years), but the Knicks were a close second. I remember watching playoff games between the teams and thinking Patrick Ewing was terrifying but cool. So a part of that childhood passion for basketball had anchored itself, in a small way, to the Knicks. And when they caught my attention decades later, when I moved to Brooklyn , it slowly began transforming my relationship with the city.I found myself at work with one eye on my computer and the other on a television, watching the soundless broadcast and imagining the roar at Madison Square Garden when, for instance, the Knicks hit 14 3-point shots in the first half against the Boston Celtics last spring. While visiting North Carolina, I persuaded friends to let me take over their living rooms to watch the Knicks be run over by Miami on a nationally televised game. Swish by swish or brick by brick, I was slowly tilting my identity closer to New York through these newfound sympathy pains.People in North Carolina told me last year, "Oh, you just got caught up in Linsanity."But that wasn't really it.Maybe it was Mike Woodson, a coach who inherited a team of Bad News Bears, added two former North Carolina Tar Heels (Raymond Felton and Rasheed Wallace), and often had the same firm look that my stepfather used to adopt when I refused to understand why the yard couldn't be raked over a period of weeks rather than in one Saturday afternoon. Woodson's insistence on fundamentals spoke to something in the way I was raised.Maybe it was the moment when the crowd was chanting Wallace's name on opening night this season against the Heat and Woodson looked down the bench and yelled: "Rasheed! You want to play?"Maybe it was the misfit crew assembled at the beginning of this season that turned a casual interest into a fervor.Who wouldn't be intrigued by Pablo Prigioni, a 35-year-old rookie from Argentina whose stilted dribble would get him laughed off any street court in Brooklyn; the dazzlingly frustrating offense of J. R. Smith; Jason Kidd, a point guard whose resemblance to Elmer Fudd was repeatedly illustrated in side-by-side images texted to me by a friend in North Carolina; or Wallace himself, all 317 career technical fouls' worth of charisma?Maybe it was the good cop/mellifluous cop chemistry between Mike Breen and Walt Frazier on MSG Network's game broadcasts, perhaps the oddest pairing of commentators outside of Dick Vitale and, well, anyone Dick Vitale works with.Or maybe it was just the stunning highs and stupefying lows of this season's team, associated with the "New York" on the front of their jerseys, that made me realize something. A team that could beat the Heat three times but lose to the Toronto Raptors twice, that could come out of the gate any given night looking like a pride of lions or a herd of sloths, was an apt metaphor for my own experiences in a city of extremes.Sometimes, the subway train arrives as soon as I reach the platform; sometimes, the doors slam shut inches from my face and the train waits, maddeningly, for 30 more seconds before pulling away. Once, I saw a woman stop to help a man who was having a heart attack; another day, I was part of the faceless mass that barks at lost tourists who stop in the middle of the sidewalk. One day, I was balancing a tray of coffee mugs in Park Slope while a child at Table 3 was trying to wrestle it out of my hands; another day, I was somehow entering the New York Times building for a job interview.This city is the subject of countless clichés. Mine used to be "I hate it here." These days, watching Tyson Chandler's Viking warlord face after every dunk just reminds me that there are rewards to be had, and the struggle that comes before and after each one always makes them sweeter.
Iman Shumpert was not yet born when Darrell Walker made one of the best-timed steals in Knicks playoff history. Shumpert had heard about it, though, from Walker, the team's assistant coach and a known practitioner of on-court kleptomania as a young player in the mid-1980s."He took it from Isiah, right?" Shumpert said.Among memorable N.B.A. heists, Walker's strip of Isiah Thomas to send a decisive Game 5 of a 1984 first-round series between the Knicks and Detroit to overtime pales in historical significance to three famous Celtics steals: John Havlicek's against Philadelphia in 1965; Gerald Henderson's against the Los Angeles Lakers in 1984; and Larry Bird's, also against Thomas and the Pistons, in 1987.But Shumpert, Pablo Prigioni and the rest of these thieving Knicks won't soon be forgotten in Boston after their 14-steal show of hands — young (Shumpert) and old (Prigioni) alike — put a 3-0 chokehold on their first-round Eastern Conference series and may have strangled Boston's cherished Kevin Garnett-Paul Pierce era into submission.In what was supposed to be an impassioned show of Boston pride, the Celtics were booed at halftime Friday night and their coach, Doc Rivers, admitted his team lost its spirit on the way to a 90-76 defeat at TD Garden. It happens when the opposing defense is suffocating to the extent that, as Shumpert said, "they start to second-guess themselves, and that's what we want."We typically measure playoff achievement through names in lights — in this case, Carmelo Anthony is about to vanquish Pierce and Garnett — and that was no different in 1984. The aforementioned Knicks-Pistons series is remembered for a Bernard King scoring clinic that moved Chuck Daly, in his first year on the Detroit bench, to remark, "It was as if the ball was going right through his hands and into the basket without him even shooting it."But in the final two minutes of Game 5, after King had lifted the Knicks to a seemingly comfortable lead, Thomas somehow scored 16 points in 1 minute 33 seconds and had the ball for the final possession of regulation. Walker stripped him in traffic, and the Knicks won in overtime.King is a Hall of Famer now, but Walker won a championship as a role player in Chicago with Michael Jordan before getting into coaching. His boss, Mike Woodson, is also known for preaching defense. For those seeking evidence that this lopsided series represents more than the Knicks kicking a Celtics team on the way down, look no further than how they defend Boston on the perimeter.Rajon Rondo's absence has made the Celtics offense look pointless, without a playmaker, especially compared with a Knicks team often deploying two, in addition to the at-times-unstoppable Anthony. It has put Pierce and others in vulnerable positions while they try to create what they were used to having Rondo do for them.But watching Shumpert almost surgically attach himself to Pierce on Friday night, and making the proud veteran look much older than 35, provided the most encouraging projection for those daring to dream of the Knicks' upending Miami in the Eastern Conference finals.It was in Miami last April that Shumpert tore up a knee in Game 1 of the playoffs. At the risk of getting far ahead of ourselves, an increasingly mobile Shumpert in the grille of a less-than-100-percent Dwyane Wade might be the best way to imagine an upset.Jason Kidd, whose 40-year-old mitts have been ubiquitously wreaking havoc, blocked a shot by the 6-foot-9 Jeff Green in the first half Friday night and kept him out of the lane with positioning and upper-body strength.He said preparation and increased basketball I.Q. had much to do with the Knicks' being poised to reverse the Celtics' first-round sweep of them of two years ago — as good a reason for the Knicks' signing him as any."The young guys are looking at the older guys and seeing that it's not just what you do on the court," he said, referring to Shumpert, Raymond Felton and even Prigioni, who at 35 is an N.B.A. rookie.It's about watching film, studying an opponent's tendencies, he said. Shumpert has done plenty of that on Pierce and it showed.Early on, he harassed Pierce into an offensive foul; he poked away an entry pass by Green while defending Pierce from behind in the post; he stripped Pierce clean up top and forced Jason Terry into committing a clear-path foul. As the Knicks established defensive control, you could sense the Celtics were in trouble. The crowd felt it. The Celtics knew it.Asked if he could see frustration in Pierce's eyes, Shumpert shook his head."You never do that," he said. "You look at a guy's eyes, and you'll be lost in this league."It's about learning an opponent's habits, anticipating when he is going to make the ball available, moving one's feet, staying defensively balanced.Shumpert is the Knicks' best on-ball defender, but Prigioni continued to be a revelation by getting into passing lanes, deflecting or intercepting passes. He had five steals (Walker and Patrick Ewing hold the team playoff record with seven) and just missed a sixth when he knocked a ball away, dived after it and wound up with a courtside photographer's sneaker in his face.As they prepare for a long summer of major alteration, the Celtics can try to save face by evoking the Rondo factor. While that excuse may ring true, to a point, they are where they are, and Rondo, recovering from knee surgery, could only walk solemnly down a corridor late Friday night, in a well-tailored suit and dark shoes, with no socks.No one would have been surprised to find a pair that belonged to Rondo or any other Celtic on the feet of Prigioni or Shumpert.
MILWAUKEE — LeBron James and Dwyane Wade have pushed each other on the court since James joined the Miami Heat in the summer of 2010. On Sunday, James exerted his influence off the court.Wade, who has had continuing troubles with a sore right knee, was not sure if he would play against the Milwaukee Bucks. In the hotel before the team made the short trip to Bradley Center, James told Wade not to risk further injury."I told him, Hey, if you don't feel like you can be close to 100 percent, then don't push it," James said. "We've seen too many injuries already in this N.B.A. season, both regular and postseason of guys getting injured. That kind of came to my mind."Wade paid attention and sat out, avoiding for one day the possibility of sharing the fate of players like Russell Westbrook and David Lee, stars whose playoff futures are over or in doubt because of injuries."He gave me the nod saying he wasn't going to go," James said. "I knew I had to pick it up a little bit more. I just tried to bring this win home for us."With a strong performance in the second half, James finished with 30 points, 8 rebounds and 7 assists in leading the Heat to an 88-77 victory and a four-game sweep of the first-round playoff series. Wade will now have at least five more days to rest before taking on the Nets or the Chicago Bulls.James understands how important Wade is to the Heat's chances to repeat as N.B.A. champions. Wade said he would be ready for the next series, whether it starts Saturday or later."It's going to help," Wade said of the long layoff. "I'll get an opportunity to give my knee more rest and also work on my body."In Thursday's game, Wade did not move well at times. He had 11 assists and 9 rebounds but went 1 for 12 from the field. On Saturday, Wade was held out of the Heat's scrimmage in practice, and he said he was "getting treatment around the clock."About an hour before Sunday's game, Wade spent more than 20 minutes testing his knee. He simulated coming off screens to shoot midrange jumpers. He did a few layups and shot free throws.Wade sat with his teammates during the game, a large bag of ice wrapped around his knee.The Bucks were solid through three quarters. Monta Ellis, who led the team with 21 points, energized fans when he swished a runner in the lane to cut the Heat's lead to 69-67 early in the fourth quarter.From there, James asserted himself. He called for the ball, drove inside, drew several defenders and passed the ball to wide-open shooters. On back-to-back offensive possessions, Ray Allen and Mario Chalmers made 3-pointers to create distance that the Bucks could not make up. James had a role in the Heat's final 19 points, scoring 7 and giving out 4 assists (all on 3-pointers)."It's just good to be able to have the type of depth that we have where I can draw two defenders and be able to find my shooters," James said.SPURS 103, LAKERS 82 Tony Parker scored 23 points as San Antonio completed its first-round sweep of the injury-plagued Lakers with a victory in Game 4 in Los Angeles.Tim Duncan had 11 points and 6 rebounds for the second-seeded Spurs, who will face the winner of Denver's series with Golden State in the second round. They will get plenty of rest after flattening the Lakers, who staggered through back-to-back blowout losses at home without three regular starters in their first opening-round exit since 2007.In his final game before unrestricted free agency, Dwight Howard scored 7 points before being ejected early in the third quarter for arguing. (AP)WARRIORS 115, NUGGETS 101 Stephen Curry scored 31 as host Golden State beat Denver to take a 3-1 advantage in their playoff series. Curry was one of six players in double figures for the Warriors, who can advance with a victory in Denver on Tuesday. (AP)
It was all going so smoothly for the Knicks, and we have come to understand that they don't often do smooth. For the better part of N.B.A. time, they have not been known as a team that walks the straightest line to success, or anywhere, for that matter.But Sunday afternoon at a TD Garden that housed a fair number of New York fans ready to party, the Knicks had the Celtics right where they wanted them, wondering where a 20-point third-quarter lead had disappeared to and on the brink of following it into N.B.A. playoff oblivion.The Knicks were looking at a four-game sweep of their traditional rivals, the likelihood of a full week off before the next series and the right to claim that no team, not even Miami, had acquitted itself better in the first round.And that's when Jason Terry, who couldn't wait to hit the floor when J. R. Smith's tattooed right arm connected with his head Friday night in Game 3, rose to the moment of poetic opportunity. He scored the final 9 points of overtime in a 97-90 Celtics victory and claimed that Smith was on his mind only when he touched the area around his nose."Still hurts right now," he said, still playing Smith's inexplicable but hardly criminal mistake for all it was worth. "Long as I feel that, I'll be thinking about it."Let's just say that there have been acts of aggression far more severe across the playoff decades than what got Smith suspended for Game 4 — a fair number of them perpetuated by Knicks. More concerning was what the incident portended for a franchise infamous for tripping over its own intransigence.If this was how Smith and the Knicks were dealing with the good fortune of drawing the Rajon Rondo-less Celtics, how would they respond to anticipated adversity ahead?The absence of Smith, the Knicks' second-leading scorer, was felt most in the first half, when their second unit — which begged for an appearance by Chris Copeland but got Quentin Richardson instead — had not one player capable of creating his own shot.With the exception of a third-quarter burst by Raymond Felton while Carmelo Anthony sat with four fouls, the Knicks regressed in both halves to a style that will not beat Miami. Call it Melo and Four Statues."Honestly, as far as J. R. goes, we miss — I missed — him out there," Anthony said. "But J. R. being out doesn't change the way I shoot the basketball. Those are the shots I've been taking the whole series. I missed a lot. A ton."He missed 25 of 35, to be exact, including a bricked 3-pointer on the Knicks' last chance to tie. Anthony also committed seven turnovers. Felton, who has all but destroyed the defensive reputation of Avery Bradley, said of Anthony: "When the game is on the line, you're going to give the ball to No. 7. That's what we've been doing all year. There's no need to change it now."This speaks to the endless debate on how Anthony and the Knicks should play, too often argued in black and white when the color of the discussion should be gray. It's not as if Anthony makes a predetermination to take 35 shots and dominate the ball. He is not necessarily afflicted by selfishness as much as he settles into old habits — probably cultivated in too many Amateur Athletic Union showcases — of holding the ball for three or four seconds too long, breaking the team's offensive rhythm.But if Bad Melo had to emerge with the Knicks on the verge of sweeping a team they are clearly better than, so be it. They are not the Nets, choking away a 14-point lead in the last four minutes at Chicago and falling behind by 3-1 to a team without its best player.The Celtics will go to New York for Game 5 on Wednesday night, still without a competent point guard and with a bench pretty much imported from China. Despite that 20-point lead and stellar offensive games from Paul Pierce and Jeff Green, Boston was fortunate to survive regulation, when Anthony missed two free throws and the reserve forward Chris Wilcox deflected Jason Kidd's side-court inbounds pass intended for an open Tyson Chandler at the rim.From the looks of the Celtics, Sunday's win will be meaningful only if the late burst by Terry can take on the mystical quality of Dave Roberts's steal of second base against Mariano Rivera in Game 4 of the 2004 American League Championship Series.You remember that one? Bradley, who grew up in Tacoma, Wash., and was in middle school when the Red Sox overcame a 3-0 series deficit against the Yankees, did not."Don't know anything about that," he said, looking bewildered.Terry, out of Seattle, added, "Don't tell anyone — I'm a Mariners fan."How's this for fate? Terry's 3-pointer in transition that put Boston ahead for good came off an outlet from Green, who was in the right spot to catch a rare Chandler tap-out (off a missed Iman Shumpert jumper) that didn't land in the hands of a Knick.Terry, a veteran scorer who has made nobody in New England forget Ray Allen in his first Celtics season, was giddy in the locker room, promising that the Celtics would fight on in New York, even if the Knicks should suit up Patrick Ewing along with the returning Smith.Terry is old enough to remember the head butts and brawls that plagued the 1990s Knicks. Little came easy to Ewing, John Starks and those characters who walked a fine line between passionate and pugnacious. Based on the weekend in Boston, we may assume little has changed.
BOSTON — Jason Terry was upright again Sunday afternoon, his chin and his jump shot in working order, his conviction strong and his missions clear: Save the Boston Celtics ' season. Extend an era. If at all possible, irritate the Knicks just a little bit more.It took five flicks of the wrist, in 66 seconds, to make it all possible.Terry scored the Celtics' last 9 points in overtime, delivering a 97-90 victory at TD Garden, denying the Knicks a sweep and sending the series back to New York for Game 5.When he was finished, Terry, whose nickname is Jet, smiled and extended his arms into wings for a brief, celebratory flight."As long as there's time on the clock, as long as there is another game, it's an opportunity for me to do something special," Terry said.For Boston, this was poetic justice — repayment for the Knicks' J. R. Smith's elbowing Terry in the face in Game 3. While Smith served a one-game suspension Sunday, the Knicks ultimately buckled and Terry soared.The Knicks erased a 20-point deficit in the second half and a 5-point deficit in the final minutes of regulation, but there was little else to like after an afternoon in which they shot 34.4 percent and produced just 10 assists.Carmelo Anthony commandeered the offense, shooting 35 times, as if he intended to single-handedly replace Smith's offense. But he converted just 10 of those shots and had 7 turnovers."I was trying to win the basketball game," said Anthony, who finished with 36 points and was trying to complete the first playoff sweep of his career. "It would have been a great feeling to close it out here in Boston, so I was trying to do whatever I could to win the basketball game."As great a clutch shooter as Anthony has been in his career, this was a day the Knicks could have used Smith's uncanny touch.Anthony missed three of four shots in overtime, including a rushed 3-pointer with 20 seconds left and the Knicks trailing, 93-90. He missed his last five shots in regulation, including two attempts on the Knicks' last possession, with the score tied, 84-84. He also missed two free throws with 1 minute 50 seconds left in the fourth quarter and walked away shaking his head."When the game is on the line, you're going to give the ball to No. 7," Raymond Felton said, referring to Anthony. "That's what we've been doing all year; there's no need to change it now."Paul Pierce led the Celtics with 29 points, his best game of the series by far, and Kevin Garnett added 13 points and 17 rebounds in what might have been their final home game together. Jeff Green added 26 points.The Celtics were perhaps seconds away from elimination and an off-season of radical change, but Pierce said he never had any doubts."I already called my friends in New York yesterday, telling them I'd be there for dinner," he said.Terry, who was signed to replace Ray Allen last summer, had been a bust in the series until Sunday. He finished with 18 points, perhaps inspired by Smith's elbow."He was definitely vocal," Coach Doc Rivers said. "Someone said it yesterday — maybe that elbow, who knows — said it changed the events for all of us. Definitely, Jason Terry was angry that it happened."So the Knicks left Boston still in search of their first playoff series victory in 13 years. They will try again Wednesday night at Madison Square Garden.The sour finish overshadowed a thrilling second-half comeback, spearheaded by Anthony and Felton, who scored 16 of his 27 points in a blistering third-quarter rally. Felton also gave the Knicks their first — and only — lead of the afternoon, 84-82, with an 18-footer with 1:18 left in the fourth.The Knicks trailed by 19 points at halftime — their biggest deficit of the series, by far — having converted just 11 of 38 shots (28.9 percent), with Anthony going 3 for 15. He was beyond erratic, shooting air balls, picking up offensive fouls, committing five turnovers and negating a Felton free throw with a lane violation.Terry put the Celtics ahead for good on a pull-up 3-pointer, for a 91-88 lead. Anthony hit a jumper, but Terry answered with a 13-foot fadeaway, then put the game away with two free throws.Smith has been as indispensable as any Knicks star this season, providing points, clutch shots, defense and fire. Until Sunday, he had played in every meaningful game — sitting out only the last two regular-season games.The suspension could not have come as a shock — there was ample precedent — but the ruling rankled the Knicks all the same."I'm not even going to comment on that," Coach Mike Woodson said before the game. "Not at all."Under league rules, Smith was not permitted to attend the game. His Twitter feed has been silent since the suspension was announced."He's a little down, but he'll rebound from it," Woodson said.Without Smith, Woodson used Jason Kidd as his first guard off the bench, then filled the open minutes with Steve Novak and Quentin Richardson, none of whom could remotely replicate Smith's firepower. Woodson effectively tightened the rotation to seven players for the second half. The Knicks' bench produced just 7 points."We obviously missed J. R. tonight," said Tyson Chandler, who had 11 rebounds and kept the Knicks in the game with a series of tap-outs. "We still had our shots, though."The Celtics jumped ahead in the opening minutes and took their first double-digit lead of the series in the second quarter while the Knicks unraveled behind a series of turnovers and clanked jumpers.Pierce had 17 points by halftime, matching his Game 3 scoring total, every swish eliciting a powerful roar, as if any one of those shots might be his last here."We have to be confident going back home," Anthony said. He added, "We look forward to Wednesday, I can tell you that."
Like it or not, fair or not, the N.B.A. is under the microscope now, or once again, this time as a test case in how a major sports league responds to an active player declaring he is gay.If Jason Collins, whose first-person coming-out story appeared Monday on the Web site of Sports Illustrated, were 25 and averaging 25 points, the impact would be greater, but the path forward would be simpler. Talent and leverage would push the narrative and help it surmount obstacles predictable and unforeseen.Collins, however, is 34, a 12-year veteran of six N.B.A. teams, and one who has not averaged more than 2 points or rebounds in years. He began this season with Boston but was sent to Washington at the league's trade deadline in February.Although 7-foot centers often have staying power — the Celtics, in fact, could right now use Collins's ability to occupy space in the lane against the Knicks — he has for a while been a marginal player who could be deemed dispensable by any or all teams anytime.His career clock now becomes trickier to read, in part a reflection of how enlightened the sports world is beyond platitudes and pleasantries, how ready the N.B.A. and by extension the mainstream sports culture really is for an openly gay male in its locker rooms.Collins made it clear in his Sports Illustrated article that he had no plans to retire. That unquestionably places the burden on the league to not only avoid the antipathy it would encounter if Collins was not to have a job next season, but to allow him to play under the banner of perceived social progress."I do think it's important for him to be in the league as a visible symbol," said Richard Lapchick, a human rights activist and longtime sports industry watchdog. "If he makes this courageous stand but then disappears from the locker room, it would not do it justice."In the N.B.A. fraternity, Collins has been one of the more likable players, so, not surprisingly, many players — like Kobe Bryant and Tony Parker — took to Twitter on Monday to voice their support. In a telephone interview, Commissioner David Stern said that Collins had told him that he had spoken with several top players and was heartened by their responses.In a statement released by the league, Stern said it was proud that Collins has "assumed the leadership mantle on this very important issue." To the direct question of whether Stern might have to wield his power to make sure that Collins is on somebody's opening-night roster next season, he scoffed."Our mode of operation for years has been based on basketball-related decisions," he said, adding that story would be a news media frenzy for a few days but business-as-usual by next season, assuming Collins has a role in it.According to Lapchick, whose report cards on hiring practices in the sports industry have been widely cited, the N.B.A. has been and remains the leader on racial and gender inclusion in hiring.Perhaps more than anything, Stern is proud of his league's record. When Bryant Gumbel of HBO likened him to "some kind of modern plantation overseer" for locking out his players last season, he said: "I have worked harder for inclusiveness and diversity than he could ever understand. So when I heard what he said, I sat back and waited for the e-mails from the people who know me, who have worked with me."And yet professional basketball, back to its infancy, was no racial precedent-setter; the N.B.A. lagged three years behind baseball in integrating its first African-American players. Well into the 1980s, black players quietly complained that white players were sought for front office and coaching jobs at much higher rates.When Magic Johnson decided to return to the league in 1992 after contracting H.I.V. and sitting out a season, his announcement was greeted cheerfully. But the public face was partly superficial, masking fears and underlying tensions that were bared by Karl Malone in a 1992 interview with The New York Times.In ensuing years, Malone expressed some regret for saying players were worried about contracting the virus because of the cuts and scabs that were part of a physical game. Malone later said he was young and not informed enough by his cultural environment or the league, which was dealing with a medical phenomenon it had no time to prepare for.This case is different, Stern said, listing several league initiatives designed to raise awareness in recent years among its players along with "the direction of the national debate, to where we think this will be a nonissue."But if the Johnson saga has taught the league anything, it should be that players will often say what they believe the public prefers to hear.Some no doubt come from backgrounds where they have been influenced by different opinions from what the league chooses to collectively espouse. Others may be steeped in the religious belief that homosexuality, as the ESPN basketball reporter Chris Broussard said Monday on a broadcast, amounts to "walking in open rebellion to God."Many N.B.A. players attend pregame chapel. Golden State is coached by Mark Jackson, a pastor with his own ministry. Several players have gone there to pray with him. That, alone, obviously doesn't foretell intolerance.It does remind us that an entity as diverse as the N.B.A. guarantees diversity of thought, or no standard response to a story like the one Collins has bravely told. There are still new chapters to write, but only if Collins and anyone who follows continue to compete.His next contract will be a sign of the times.
The N.B.A. 's relocation committee on Monday unanimously recommended that the league's owners reject a request to move the Sacramento Kings to Seattle, a decision that will probably keep the team in California and settle a contentious bidding war.The league's Board of Governors, which includes representatives from all 30 teams, will vote on the recommendation May 13, They are unlikely to overrule the relocation committee, which includes Peter Holt of the San Antonio Spurs and Clay Bennett of the Oklahoma City Thunder.For months, an investment group led by the hedge fund manager Christopher Hansen and Steve Ballmer, the chief executive of Microsoft, has had the upper hand in negotiations for the team. In January, Hansen's group signed an agreement to buy the 65 percent stake in the Kings now held by the Maloof family. Hansen made it clear that he would move the team to Seattle to replace the SuperSonics, who were moved to Oklahoma City in 2008.Lawmakers have been paving the way for the building of a new arena for a team in downtown Seattle. Hansen's group compiled a list of about 48,000 people willing to buy season tickets.But prompted by Sacramento's mayor, the former N.B.A. player Kevin Johnson, a rival investment group was hastily assembled to make a competing offer. The city has also agreed to spend more than $250 million to help build an arena for the Kings to replace their aging home. The group, which includes the software mogul Vivek Ranadive; Mark S. Mastrov, the founder of 24 Hour Fitness; and Paul E. Jacobs, the chief executive of Qualcomm, has made an offer for the Maloofs' shares that is similar to Seattle's offer, which values the team at about $525 million.The recommendation that the team not move to Seattle gives Ranadive's group the inside track for the team, though it still much reach a formal agreement with the Maloof family. If the group takes over the team, Ranadive will become the face of the Kings. He would have to sell his stake in the Golden State Warriors, for whom he is the vice chairman.After the announcement, Johnson, who played 12 seasons in the league, wrote on Twitter: "I've never been prouder of this city. I thank the ownership group, city officials, but most of all the best fans in the N.B.A."HAWKS 102, PACERS 91 Josh Smith scored 29 points as Atlanta built a 17-point halftime lead at home and withstood an Indiana comeback to even the teams' playoff series at 2-2.After struggling much of the second half, Smith made every big play down the stretch. He swished a rare 3-pointer, came up with an offensive rebound to set up a 3-pointer by Kyle Korver and then finished off a fast break with a right-handed dunk."When he plays like that," Hawks guard Devin Harris said of Smith, "we're a very good team."Paul George scored 18 of his 21 points in the second half for the Pacers. The series returns to Indianapolis for Game 5 on Wednesday.Korver contributed 19 points off the bench for Atlanta, most of them coming on his specialty: the 3-pointer. He knocked down five from outside the arc, including the biggest one with 2 minutes 33 seconds remaining after Al Horford threw up a wild shot that missed. Smith snatched one of his 11 rebounds and spotted Korver lurking all alone on the outside.Indiana was better offensively but still struggled to make shots, finishing at 38 percent on a 32-of-84 performance. George came alive after halftime, connecting three times from beyond the arc, and every other starter was in double figures.The Hawks beat Indiana for the 13th straight time at Philips Arena, a streak that dates to 2006. But the Pacers can take solace with not having to win in Atlanta, as long as they take care of business on their home court."This is going to be one heck of a series right now," Indiana center Roy Hibbert said. "I thought we'd be able to at least split down here."Atlanta center Johan Petro rejoined the team for the game after witnessing the birth of his first child, Jacob Petro, at about 2 p.m. Monday at a hospital in the Miami area. After being assured that his child and wife were doing fine, Johan Petro hopped on a private plane sent by the Hawks' owners.He arrived at Philips Arena about two hours before tip-off and made his second straight start. He played 22 minutes, scoring 4 points and grabbing 8 rebounds. (AP)EX-PLAYER CHARGED The former N.B.A. All-Star Chris Gatling was facing several criminal charges after a police report said he squatted in a house in Paradise Valley, Ariz., and then tried to list the place for rent on Craigslist.The television station KPHO reported that Gatling was accused of breaking into a key box and living in the house from July 2010 to August 2011. A police report said the homeowners lived in California but had left the power on. (AP)
The public response Monday to Jason Collins's announcement that he was gay was overwhelmingly supportive, at least among other professional athletes.Collins's essay, in which he came out as the first player in a major American sports league while still pursuing his career, was published online by Sports Illustrated on Monday morning. It precipitated an outpouring of supportive comments on social media sites by his fellow N.B.A. players, former professional athletes and President Obama, among countless others.Current players posting in support of Collins included Tony Parker of San Antonio, Steve Nash of the Los Angeles Lakers and Knicks guard Jason Kidd, Collins's former teammate when both played for the Nets.The Lakers star Kobe Bryant wrote: "Proud of @jasoncollins34. Don't suffocate who u r because of the ignorance of others." He added the hashtags "courage" and "support."There has been much debate about how such an announcement would be received on the professional sports landscape, and it remains to be seen how Collins, 34, will be treated when he steps on the court for the first time since coming out. He will be a free agent on July 1.Bryant's Twitter message was reposted more than 20,000 times in the hour after his post, with some reminding him that he once sparked a controversy, and received a $100,000 fine, for directing an antigay slur at a referee who had called him for a technical foul. Since that episode, Bryant has voiced his support for the gay community.Outside the N.B.A., encouragement was posted to Twitter by President Obama and Michelle Obama, Bill Clinton, Martina Navratilova, Spike Lee, Michael Strahan and others.Michelle Obama wrote on Twitter: "So proud of you, Jason Collins! This is a huge step forward for our country. We've got your back! —mo"Athletes from other sports also took to Twitter to support Collins, including the retired tennis star Andy Roddick and the Hall of Fame running back Barry Sanders. Chris Kluwe and Brendon Ayanbadejo, two N.F.L. players who have openly supported gay issues, sent messages of support.Robbie Rogers, the American soccer player who recently came out as gay, posted, "I feel a movement coming."Collins started the day with fewer than 4,000 Twitter followers. By midnight, he had more than 76,000.In contrast to that widespread support, the ESPN reporter Chris Broussard drew criticism for comments he made calling homosexuality "a sin" on the network's "Outside the Lines" program.Broussard took issue with Collins's description of himself as a Christian because he was "openly living in unrepentant sin."He added: "I believe that's walking in open rebellion to God and to Jesus Christ. So I would not characterize that person as a Christian because I don't think the Bible would characterize him as a Christian."Late Monday, ESPN released a statement on Broussard's comments. "We regret that a respectful discussion of personal viewpoints became a distraction from today's news," it said. "ESPN is fully committed to diversity and welcomes Jason Collins's announcement."ESPN.com, like other sports Web sites, received an unusually high number of reader comments on stories about Collins's announcement. On ESPN.com, many of the comments were strongly critical of Collins; some included gay slurs."We are reviewing comments, flagging those that cross the line and handling according to our policies," the ESPN spokesman David Scott said.Chris Stone, the managing editor of Sports Illustrated, said that the magazine had prepared for inflammatory comments to be posted on its Web site as soon as Collins's essay was published."We've been pretty careful about curating the comments on our site because it did get a little bit out of hand pretty quickly," Stone said, adding that the comments had been largely positive."When I look at the general response, I see a message of overwhelming support and admiration," he said.One of the few negative public comments from a pro athlete came from Miami Dolphins wide receiver Mike Wallace, who wrote on Twitter, "All these beautiful women in the world and guys wanna mess with other guys."Wallace followed with a posting saying that he was not bashing anyone but that he did not understand homosexuality. He ultimately deleted both messages and posted another clarification in which he apologized for offending people.The rare negative reaction among N.B.A. players came from David West of the Indiana Pacers, who took issue with Collins's introducing his race as part of the story. He chose to not elaborate when pressed by his followers.One of the strongest messages of support among active N.B.A. players came from Kenneth Faried of the Denver Nuggets, who wrote: "Wow this is amazing all smiles. So so happy Jason Collins came out & announce he was openly gay all support over here."Jerry Stackhouse, a guard for the Nets and a former teammate of Collins's, spoke to reporters before his team's playoff game in Brooklyn on Monday night and said Collins had told him that "I'm probably about to become one of the most popular or unpopular guys in the next few days.""He's definitely become popular," Stackhouse said.Stackhouse added: "I don't think he's crossed the line in any way. I'm going to support him 100 percent and will encourage other guys to support him."Miles away, in the Bronx, in a baseball setting, Stackhouse's sentiments were echoed by Yankees pitcher C. C. Sabathia."Good for him," Sabathia said of Collins. "He can be honest and not have to live a lie."
The Nets did not give the impression they were a team playing its last game of the season on Monday. They prepared as if Game 6 in Chicago was inevitable. There was no fire-and-brimstone pregame speech by a veteran teammate to rouse emotions."The vibe around the room, you didn't have to," guard Joe Johnson said.Forward Reggie Evans said, "There was no sense of panic."This was surprising, given the way Game 4 had ended, with the Nets drifting ghostlike around the visitors' locker room on Saturday at United Center, having blown a double-digit lead in the fourth quarter and lost in three overtimes.The postgame mood was much lighter Monday, after a 110-91 victory over the Bulls in Game 5 at Barclays Center kept the Nets' season alive for at least three more days.Before the Nets could even think about coming back from a three-games-to-one deficit, they had to prove they could beat the Bulls just once to get the warm blood flowing again. It had been more than a week since the Nets won Game 1. In the subsequent three games, they had played poorly and lost, played really poorly and lost and played really well and lost.That last performance, squandering a 14-point lead with less than four minutes to go, was particularly damaging. Coach P. J. Carlesimo said Sunday that obviously it would test the Nets' resolve. The team decided not to practice, preferring to treat sore limbs and egos. By Monday's shootaround, the Nets said they had moved past it. They had no choice.And late Monday night, fighting back and forth until the final three minutes, when they pulled away, the Nets could celebrate a win."I would've been surprised if our guys didn't respond the way they did tonight," Carlesimo said. "It would've been out of character for them."Brook Lopez scored 28 points with 10 rebounds, continuing his impressive postseason stretch. He is averaging 23.6 points and 8 rebounds in the series, and he put in a complete effort Monday, shooting 11 of 20 from the field and 6 of 7 from the free-throw line."He had that look in his eye," point guard Deron Williams said. "He was rebounding the ball, scoring the ball. He's been great defensively for us all series. He was just a monster tonight."The Nets dominated the backboards, finishing with 54 points inside, 24 off offensive rebounds, and outrebounding the Bulls, 44-33. They finally seemed to get a handle on Carlos Boozer and Joakim Noah, who combined for only 21 points and 14 rebounds."That was the difference in the game, the rebounding," Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau said. "The rebounding was a big problem, and defensively, we've got to get it together."Chicago was also without its point guard, Kirk Hinrich, who was in a walking boot Monday after bruising his left calf in Game 4.Without Hinrich, who scored 18 points with 14 assists on Saturday, the Bulls started Nate Robinson, their sparkplug off the bench, a 5-foot-9 dervish who will undoubtedly be a haunting vision for the Nets if they lose the series. Robinson scored 23 points in the fourth quarter Saturday, and he was a pest again Monday, playing 44 minutes, scoring 20 points and adding 8 assists. But he did not lead his team back as he had Saturday.The Nets missed their first seven from beyond the arc before Joe Johnson and Gerald Wallace knocked down consecutive 3-pointers toward the end of the first half. Wallace pushed their lead to 8 points, and they took a 52-44 margin into halftime.Williams scored 13 points in the third quarter, increasing the lead to 77-73 entering the fourth. But the Bulls did not go quietly. Chicago shot 57.6 percent from the field in the second half, including 47.1 percent in the fourth, keeping pace with the Nets shot for shot."I told the team we had played 82 games to earn Game 5 and Game 7 in this building," Carlesimo said.The Nets' lead was 98-90 with less than three minutes remaining when Wallace drilled a 3-pointer from the corner. Moments later, he stole a pass from Luol Deng and brought it down court for a rousing one-handed slam dunk.The bench jumped to life. The Bulls called a timeout, but after logging so many minutes Saturday and fighting valiantly Monday, they seemed content to let the series head back to Chicago.The Nets will meet them there, the distaste from Saturday's loss washed clean."We didn't hold our heads down," Evans said. "We still got light at the end of the tunnel."
In 12 seasons as an N.B.A. player, Jason Collins has never been an All-Star or a scoring leader or even a full-time starter, but on Monday he shattered one of the last great barriers in professional sports."I'm a 34-year-old N.B.A. center. I'm black and I'm gay," Collins, who finished this season with the Washington Wizards, writes in the May 6 edition of Sports Illustrated. The magazine published the article online Monday morning.With that statement, Collins became the first openly gay male athlete who is still active in a major American team sport. Other gay athletes, including the former N.B.A. center John Amaechi, have waited until retirement to divulge their sexuality publicly.The announcement followed recent decisions by two other athletes — the American soccer player Robbie Rogers and the women's basketball player Brittney Griner — to acknowledge that they are gay. When Rogers, 25, revealed last month that he was gay, he also said he was retiring from soccer. (He has since indicated he may play again.) Griner, the No. 1 pick in the W.N.B.A. draft, will soon embark on her professional career.Collins's announcement was greeted with an outpouring of support from teammates, league executives and major National Basketball Association stars, Kobe Bryant and Dwyane Wade among them."Proud of @jasoncollins34," Bryant, the Los Angeles Lakers star, wrote on his Twitter account. "Don't suffocate who u r because of the ignorance of others." Bryant added two hashtags: "courage" and "support."Some of the league's biggest names followed suit, including the Lakers' Steve Nash, Oklahoma City's Kevin Durant, the Knicks' Jason Kidd and San Antonio's Tony Parker. Several teams sent out statements of support. Prominent coaches, including Boston's Doc Rivers, who has worked with Collins, gave support in interviews.However, one National Football League player, Mike Wallace of the Miami Dolphins, posted a comment on Twitter: "All these beautiful women in the world and guys wanna mess with other guys." He later deleted the comment and issued an apology.And on ESPN, the N.B.A. analyst Chris Broussard, citing his religious beliefs, said that living openly as a homosexual was a sin and that doing so was "walking in open rebellion to God and to Jesus Christ."But those comments were greatly outweighed by the supportive ones Collins received, particularly from his N.B.A. peers."The overwhelming positive reaction does not surprise me," N.B.A. Commissioner David Stern said in a telephone interview. "Our players are actually knowledgeable and sophisticated on this issue, and our teams understand it completely. I would have expected them to be supportive, and they are."President Obama called Collins "to express his support and said he was impressed by his courage," according to a Twitter post from the White House. Michelle Obama, on her account, called Collins's announcement "a huge step forward for our country."Collins becomes a free agent July 1 and intends to pursue another contract, which might be viewed as a truer test for how N.B.A. teams deal with a gay athlete. However, complicating that question is the fact that Collins, at 34, is a marginal player with limited skills, more valued for his locker-room presence than his play and not at the top of anyone's list of players to sign. He appeared in just 38 games this season, which he split between the Boston Celtics and the Wizards, and was used sparingly.Collins was never among the most skilled centers to begin with, instead relying on his size (7 feet, 255 pounds), intelligence and work ethic to carve out a niche after being drafted 18th over all in 2001.In his Sports Illustrated essay, Collins alludes to his future in the league: "I've reached that enviable state in life in which I can do pretty much what I want. And what I want is to continue to play basketball. I still love the game, and I still have something to offer. My coaches and teammates recognize that. At the same time, I want to be genuine and authentic and truthful."
It was 69 and sunny in Westchester County, the sort of irresistible spring day that makes a gymnasium seem dull and dreary. Naturally, J. R. Smith's mind drifted to outdoor pastimes."I would have been playing golf today," Smith said Tuesday afternoon as the Knicks prepared for a taut Game 5 against the Boston Celtics.By "would have been" Smith meant the Knicks would have been off Tuesday, if only they had swept the Celtics on Sunday. If only they had not sputtered in overtime. If only they had not fallen behind by 20 points in the first place. If only their offense had not disintegrated. If only they had had their second-best scorer available.If only Smith had played in Game 4."Oh yeah," he said, "it'd have been over. It would have been."And Smith might have been strolling a fairway Tuesday instead of being hemmed in by 40 reporters on the Knicks' practice court.This was Smith's doing, of course, a final ounce of penance for the angry elbow he threw at Jason Terry's chin in Game 3 last Friday. That gratuitous act of aggression got Smith a one-game suspension, leaving the Knicks short-handed and clumsy, denying them the chance to complete their first playoff series victory in 13 years.The setback will probably be temporary. Smith will rejoin the rotation Wednesday night at Madison Square Garden, and in all likelihood, the Knicks will close out the series. No N.B.A. team has come back from a 3-0 deficit, and the Celtics will probably not be the first. The Knicks have not lost a home game since March 7.The elbow, the suspension and the loss may ultimately become a footnote to an otherwise glorious season.But if the Knicks stumble in Game 5? If Tyson Chandler's neck flares up? If Raymond Felton's ankle turns? If Carmelo Anthony goes 10 for 35 again? Sometimes, it takes just a single sprain, one unlucky bounce or a shooting slump to turn a series around. The smart teams know this, and they act accordingly, treating each game as vital.Whether this series ends in five games, six or seven, the Knicks will have cost themselves vital recovery time — even more crucial for a team relying on so many older veterans. They need to preserve Jason Kidd's 40-year-old legs and Kenyon Martin's surgically repaired knees for the challenges ahead, and the expected showdown with the Miami Heat in the Eastern Conference finals.The Knicks have won 19 of their last 22 games, but their weekend performance in Boston underlined the frailties that were momentarily obscured by their strong finish to the season.Anthony, despite making great strides this season, remains a gunner at heart, and not always an accurate one, as his 10-for-35 performance showed. When the Knicks are under duress, his first instinct is to take on the entire defense by himself.And Smith, for all of his growth on the court, remains a volatile personality — a player who has been ejected from three games since Feb. 20.Striking Terry, blatantly and with obvious intent, in the fourth quarter of a rout was a foolish, self-destructive act that probably cost the Knicks a sweep and Anthony a chance to win his first series for New York. Yet Smith returned without a trace of remorse, referring to Sunday's loss as "a minor hiccup" and insisting that his teammates had "a great chance to win the game."Asked what he learned from his suspension, Smith said flippantly, "Don't throw elbows."Smith indicated he was provoked, that Terry had struck him in a sensitive spot moments earlier. That blow went unnoticed by the officials, leaving Smith to cast himself as the victim."Me and my teammates were the only people who suffered from it," Smith said, deflecting any responsibility for his suspension.Four days before the incident, Smith was celebrating his Sixth Man trophy, and Coach Mike Woodson was praising Smith's newfound maturity. A week later, standing in the same gym, Woodson seemed less certain, saying, "I hope he's learned his lesson."The Knicks will advance, but the tension and the pressure will increase in every round, with the Indiana Pacers and their top-ranked defense probably awaiting in the semifinals and the defending champion Heat in the conference finals. They cannot afford to have Smith lose his head, any more than they can afford to have Anthony lose his jump shot, or his conscience.After Game 4, TNT's Charles Barkley accurately noted that Smith's absence pushed Anthony "to try to do too much" — a point that Anthony essentially conceded Tuesday, saying, "Thirty five shots is a lot of shots for me, kind of out of character for myself."On the same broadcast, Kenny Smith suggested that until now, J. R. Smith had never mattered enough to a team to rein himself in, adding: "Now he sees that he matters. He will have to be more thoughtful about all of his in-game aggressions."If the Knicks are going to displace the Heat and make a run at the title, they will need a more balanced sense of aggression — a little less shot-hunting by Anthony, a little less headhunting by Smith.They can learn, evolve and move on, or they can spend May and June on the golf course.
EAST RUTHERFORD, N.J. — On the eve of Thursday's Game 6 of a back-and-forth, battering series between the Nets and the Chicago Bulls , both teams appeared to be surviving on ice, athletic tape and willpower, and not in that particular order.The battle of attrition was thought to be favoring the Nets, and still probably does. But on Wednesday, guard Joe Johnson detailed just how debilitating his left heel injury has been since Game 1, and he said that if this was the regular season, he would not be playing."It's kind of like I'm out there on one leg, honestly," Johnson said. "I'm just giving them everything I can at this point."Johnson, who has plantar fasciitis, or inflammation of the tendon at the base of the foot, is averaging 16.2 points in 39 minutes during the five postseason games, just around his regular-season numbers. He hit a game-tying jumper at the overtime buzzer in Game 4 to keep the Nets alive.But he acknowledged that he could not run breaks or work off pick-and-rolls as well as he should, limiting him to being mainly a spot-up shooter.Injuries are certainly taking their toll on both teams in this series. Bulls center Joakim Noah has played through a similar injury — Noah's in his right foot — while forward Luol Deng (hip injury) and Taj Gibson (bad knees) missed practice Wednesday because of illness.Point guard Kirk Hinrich, who missed Game 5, did not practice Wednesday after bruising his calf during the Bulls' Game 4 triple-overtime win. He shed the walking boot he wore after sustaining the injury, but was walking with a noticeable limp Wednesday. He said he had not been able to run, jump or cut, and his status will most likely be a game-time decision for Thursday night's game at the United Center."I've got to be able to get up on my toes and support my weight and really it's just been a tiring nonstop treatment of it," Hinrich said, adding, "I'm going to try and play if I can. That's my goal. Whether I'm going to be able to reach it or not, I'm not sure right now."With Derrick Rose still recovering from knee surgery, Hinrich has been even more valuable to the Bulls. Since Jan. 1, Chicago is 27-12 with him in the lineup and 5-14 without him. After winning three straight games to take a commanding 3-1 series lead, the Bulls were an altogether different team when Hinrich sat out Game 5 at Barclays Center. Their offense was less fluid, and their aggressive defense appeared a step slower.Nate Robinson, who started in Hinrich's place in Game 5, hit for 34 points in Game 4, but he is not as effective a defender. His style of play is better suited to the role of a scorer off the bench, rather than a player who can run Chicago's offense for four quarters."You want to play to your strengths, cover up your weaknesses and function well as a team," Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau said of Hinrich's absence. "We're capable of doing that."On the Nets' side, center Andray Blatche said he was "90 percent" after straining his right calf in the fourth quarter of Game 5, and center Brook Lopez hurt his ankle in Game 4. Not to mention Reggie Evans, who missed Wednesday's practice with an illness.And then there is Johnson, who essentially indicated he has been running on fumes, allowing adrenaline to push him through four quarters. Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo said Johnson's gutsiness has been inspiring. "They know what he's going through," Carlesimo said. "They appreciate it. That's what warriors do. That's what competitors do."The Nets might need Johnson's clutch shooting to give them a chance in Game 6 in Chicago, where they have yet to win in four games this season. During the regular season, Johnson was 9 of 10 from the field in the final minute of games in which the Nets were ahead or behind by 3 points.If the game is on the line, as it was with five seconds left in overtime of Game 4, Carlesimo described Johnson as "lethally effective."But it has been clear that, during the rest of the game, Johnson is not as effective as he wants to be."It's been frustrating," Johnson said, "for the simple fact that I can't do a lot of the things that I wish I could out there to help this team."
CHICAGO — When the Nets shuffled off the United Center court Saturday, after a triple-overtime loss in Game 4 of their series with the Chicago Bulls , a return here seemed doubtful. A win here seemed improbable. A series win seemed like a laughable pipe dream.They flew back "feeling sorry for ourselves," point guard Deron Williams said. They were ridiculed in an interview by a Chicago newspaper columnist, who reported that the Bulls considered them "heartless." They had one foot out the door to summertime.But in part because of injury and illness, this first-round series has taken an abrupt turn. And after Thursday's 95-92 win over the Bulls, the Nets will head back to Brooklyn for Game 7, set for Saturday."We did," Williams said, "exactly what we wanted to do."The Nets forged back from a three-games-to-one series deficit to force a Game 7, the 29th time in N.B.A. history that a team has done so, according to the Elias Sports Bureau.They will try to become just the ninth of those teams to win the series.In truth, the Nets have not beaten the Bulls in this first-round series so much as outlasted them, forcing them into a battle on two fronts, basketball and bodily harm. Without Kirk Hinrich (who missed his second game with a calf injury) and Luol Deng (who was a late scratch because of an illness), the Bulls were significantly disadvantaged.Still, they battled with the Nets for 48 minutes, never giving an inch. The Nets grabbed a double-digit lead only once. The game could have gone either way in the fourth quarter."There is not a team in the league that plays harder than them," Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo said.The Nets did not exactly make it easy on themselves. They missed 11 free throws and shot just 27.8 percent from the floor in the second half. They were outrebounded, 46-41, even though Chicago's big men were in foul trouble for most of the second half.But unlike in Game 4, when they coughed up a 14-point lead in the final three minutes, the Nets made just enough plays to hang on for a win.The Bulls trailed, 92-90, with 32 seconds left when Nate Robinson, who starred for Chicago in Game 4, missed a layup that would have tied the game. Then, with the Bulls trailing by 3 with 6.3 seconds remaining, Marco Belinelli missed an open 3-pointer.The Nets gave Chicago one last glimmer of hope as Joakim Noah forced a jump ball with Williams with three seconds left. But Joe Johnson managed to corral the tip and dribbled out the clock.The Nets exhaled — it was their first win over the Bulls in five tries at United Center this season — and salvaged some pride by evening up the hard-fought series.As low as the Nets were Sunday, after the Game 4 disappointment, they have maintained confidence in their ability to respond."I felt that we should," forward Gerald Wallace said. "We feel like we're the better team and we shouldn't have gone down, 3-1. They won three games in a row, and we can win three games in a row."It helped that the Bulls' injuries had continued piling up — before the game, Carlesimo described Chicago as a "medevac" unit — even before an illness ran through the locker room, affecting Deng, Robinson and Taj Gibson.Robinson and Gibson played Thursday — although Robinson was seen vomiting on the sideline — but Deng could not. Just before tipoff, Deng staggered out of the locker room, water bottle in hand, making his way to the arena exit.On Thursday, there were 15 lead changes in the first quarter, more than in the entire triple-overtime Game 4. The Nets exploited the luxury that they unequivocally hold over the Bulls at this point in the series: depth. The Nets' bench outscored the Bulls' reserves, 27-7, in the game.But Belinelli, who started for Deng, scored 22 points, stretching the Nets' defense, and Noah had 14 points and 15 rebounds. The Nets went into the fourth quarter clinging to a 75-71 lead.A 3-pointer by C. J. Watson pushed the lead to 81-73 with just under nine minutes remaining, but again the Bulls charged back. A jumper by Robinson cut it to 85-83 with about four minutes left.For the Nets, the scene seemed all-too-familiar: they were facing elimination because they could not contain Robinson in the final four minutes of regulation in Game 4, in which they had a double-digit lead. They sulked back to Brooklyn mentally extinguished, trailing by three games to one and seeming out of the series.But now the Nets have flipped the pressure back onto the Bulls, who will stagger into Barclays Center on Saturday to face a team that is soaring."We have a lot of heart," Carlesimo said. "We are a very resilient team. That is also true for the Bulls."The Nets have never won a playoff series (0-3) when trailing by three games to two, and the Bulls had won 13 consecutive Game 6s of series they were leading, dating to 1975.
BOSTON — They played "Don't Stop Believin' " before the game, perhaps a prophetic tune for the Celtics . But as it was for "The Sopranos" six years ago, the song proved to be endgame music for the Celtics on Friday night.A wild fourth-quarter rally, in which the Celtics scored 20 straight points, could not make up for three quarters of ineptitude, and the team's season came to a close with an 88-80 loss to the Knicks at TD Garden. Instead of being the fourth team in N.B.A. history to force a Game 7 after trailing by 3-0, they are the first Celtics team in the new Big Three Era to bow out in the first round of the playoffs.The game mirrored the roller-coaster season for the Celtics, who finished with only 41 wins and were devastated by injuries. The Celtics never led in the game, and they scored only 47 points over the first three quarters. Then they scored 33 in the fourth and nearly stole the game."I think it was a microcosm of the year," Coach Doc Rivers said. "We'd been counted out four or five times, and each time we fought back. And it happened again. We just didn't have enough at the end."Paul Pierce said: "We were up and down all year, and then it showed in this series how up and down we were, game in and game out. It just goes to show you can't turn it on when the playoffs come."Twice the Celtics cut the deficit to 4 points, buoyed by the heretofore shellshocked Avery Bradley. But a questionable foul on Brandon Bass gave Carmelo Anthony two free throws and, after a Bradley steal and dunk, Anthony hit a clutch jumper.The Knicks got the lead back to double digits in the final 90 seconds, and all that remained was for Rivers to get his stars out of the game for the proper acknowledgment of the fans, who, with 81 seconds left and with the Celtics down by 12 points, were still chanting, "Let's Go Celtics."Pierce was the first to leave, with 27 seconds remaining. His departure barely caused a ripple, with the fans still chanting and Jason Terry also leaving for good at the same time. It was a fitting reaction to what was one of Pierce's worst games as a Celtic.He was 4 of 18 from the field. He finished the series shooting 36.8 percent and had as many turnovers (32) in the series as assists.Rivers praised his captain after the game. "I hope he comes back, he said. "But I don't know much about anything."Pierce stood on the sideline, hands on his hips, looking bewildered by what he had just been through. He has said he wants to play one more year. But his reputation as Mr. Clutch in the postseason took a hit against the Knicks, including on his 32nd turnover — a lazy pass that Iman Shumpert stole and took in for an uncontested layup, stopping the 20-0 Boston run. The Celtics trailed by 6 at the time.Nine seconds after Pierce left to barely a ripple ("I don't think the fans knew," Rivers said), Kevin Garnett checked out to a large round of applause. He hugged his coach, asking if he was all right. He checked in with his fellow players and the layers of assistants and others behind the bench.Garnett, like Pierce, is under contract next year, but there is always the possibility of retirement given his age (37 on May 19) and his 18 years in the league. He needed the last month of the season to get healthy for the postseason and then went out and averaged 13.7 points and 12.7 rebounds in 35-plus minutes a game.Rivers did say that he did not want it to end this way for Garnett or Pierce. But he said he was speaking only for this season, not for their careers.Asked if he was returning, Rivers said, simply, "I don't know." Every year after the season ends, he said he takes time to unwind and consider the future, and, since 2005, has decided to return to coach the Celtics. Like his two stars, he, too, is under contract for next season.
The Nets' first-round series against the Chicago Bulls will end exactly two weeks after it began, at Barclays Center on Saturday night, after seven games that twisted and stretched and tested the teams in ways they probably never could have imagined.The series has felt like an odyssey. It started with a romp, a 106-89 Nets victory that heralded Brooklyn's arrival in the postseason. But it quickly turned, morphing into a taut and tense prizefight between two like-minded opponents who never lost faith in their ability to beat each other up.There was no shaking off the Bulls, the metaphorical zombielike antagonist that keeps getting up and trudging forward no matter how many wounds (in this case injuries or illnesses of five of their top players).There was no stamping out the Nets, who fell behind by three games to one but managed to exorcise their demons at United Center on Thursday to tie the series, 3-3."In practice yesterday, we just asked each other who wanted it badder," Nets guard Joe Johnson said after Game 6. "We knew we had to execute, and we did."Now on the threshold of an unlikely comeback — only eight teams in N.B.A. history have won a series after falling behind by three games to one — the Nets say their confidence has returned to where it was after Game 1, before Chicago reeled off three wins a row, and before critics took aim at Brooklyn's supposed mental fecklessness.Even Thursday, during halftime of the Game 6 telecast on TNT, the analyst Charles Barkley said the Nets "don't play with any passion." When the Nets nearly squandered another double-digit lead in the fourth quarter, Barkley's comments did not seem unfair. But, in contrast with Game 4, they held on to win."I've got a ton of confidence in these guys," Coach P. J. Carlesimo said Friday in a conference call. "We've been resilient all year."For Chicago, the enduring image from Game 6 was guard Nate Robinson's vomiting into a trash can during timeouts, while playing 42 minutes — a fitting symbol of the battered and bruised Bulls. A day off Friday will have helped, but Chicago will not be at full strength on Saturday night.Luol Deng, who averaged 16.5 points and 6.3 rebounds during the regular season, missed Game 6 with an illness that kept him away from Berto Center in Deerfield, Ill., for Friday's practice. Deng wrote on Twitter on Friday afternoon that his symptoms were so severe that he underwent a spinal tap in an attempt to play. Coach Tom Thibodeau was unsure whether Deng would travel with the Bulls to Brooklyn.Point guard Kirk Hinrich, who missed Games 5 and 6 with a left calf injury, practiced, but his availability for Game 7 is uncertain. Thibodeau said Robinson and Taj Gibson, who battled flulike symptoms during Game 6, were feeling better.Despite the injuries, the illnesses and the obstacles facing them, the Bulls somehow remained confident. After Game 6, in a locker room that felt more like a hospital ward, center Joakim Noah said he wanted to play Game 7 immediately and nearly guaranteed a victory. "I just think we're going to win," he said."I have great belief," Thibodeau said of his players. "I think we'll have the resolve and the fight that will put us in position to win."He added: "What wins is the work you put into it. It's not going to be hope or talk, fans or any of that stuff."Chicago has played nine Game 7s but has never won in six tries on the road. The most recent defeat came in 2009, in a first-round series against Boston.Overcoming their history and their health could come down to whether the Bulls can rediscover the hard-nosed defense that allowed 92.9 points per game, third in the N.B.A., during the regular season. The Nets have topped 100 points three times in this series."We didn't start off the game the way we would have liked defensively," Thibodeau said of Thursday's loss. "You have to have every aspect of your defense tied together. You have to have a multiple effort mentality."Barclays Center had to postpone a concert by Rihanna, who was scheduled to perform Saturday. Like the Bulls, the Nets probably did not expect to be playing this weekend.After Game 1, the Nets looked on their way to an easy series win. After Game 4, they looked on their way to a long and introspective off-season.Now back home for Game 7, they will look to end a hard-fought series the way they started it."We've stepped up many, many times when people didn't think we could step up," Carlesimo said. "The reward for the way we played in the regular season is that this Game 7 is in our building. I'm just very confident our guys are going to take advantage of the opportunity."
OAKLAND, Calif. — The end came the way the Denver Nuggets feared it could, with Golden State's Stephen Curry lobbing 3-pointers, Andrew Bogut crashing the basket and a hyper-charged crowd shaking the arena with earsplitting noise. By the time the first scrap of yellow celebratory confetti fell Thursday night, the Nuggets were off the court and through the tunnel, ushered out of the playoffs.The Nuggets, seeded third in the Western Conference and hoping this might be the season they reached their franchise's first N.B.A. finals, were instead bumped out of the postseason in six games by the No. 6 Golden State Warriors — a young, plucky and talented contender advancing with a 92-88 victory. Golden State is heading to San Antonio to face the second-seeded Spurs, who swept aside the Los Angeles Lakers in four games."They are clearly the favorite," Golden State Coach Mark Jackson said of the Spurs. "But it's going to be a lot of fun."The Warriors should have the unexpected benefit of the All-Star power forward David Lee. He tore his right hip flexor in the first game of the playoffs and was deemed out for the postseason.But as the Warriors took the court 20 minutes before Thursday's game, Lee lined up with teammates for layups, even dunking the ball. A buzz rolled through the crowd.It was a hazy reminder of Willis Reed, the hobbled Knicks center who surprisingly played Game 7 of the 1970 finals and helped lead a victory over the Lakers.Jackson said Lee had a surprisingly strong workout on Wednesday, and he decided to play him, partly for inspiration, in Game 6."I guess it's the New York City in me," said Jackson, who was born in Brooklyn, played in college at St. John's and starred for the Knicks.Lee did not start. But when he stood midway through a sloppy first quarter and removed his warm-up shirt, fans rose and cheered. He missed his first shot, grabbed a rebound, ran a bit creakily and sat down after less than 90 seconds.Lee's contribution — far different from the 18.5 points and 11.2 rebounds that he provided the Warriors on average during the regular season — would be an afterthought for the game, though it raised hopes for his participation in the next round.But the series was left mostly for Curry to decide.The Nuggets led, 34-23, midway through the second quarter. Curry and Golden State's two other top guards, Klay Thompson and Jarrett Jack, combined to shoot 4 of 20 in the first half.But the Nuggets held only a 42-40 lead. And Jackson had some words for Curry."I pulled him aside and said, 'There's going to be a point where you take over, because you're the best player on this floor,' " Jackson said.It had been an eventful series for Curry already. He sprained his ankle late in Game 2 and was questionable for Game 3, but then led the Warriors to victory with 29 points. He scored 22 points in the third quarter of Game 4 to spark the Warriors to a 3-1 series lead, but was later inadvertently poked in the right eye. Days later, the eye remained darkly bloodshot.In Game 5, with the Nuggets bumping and grinding him, Curry uncharacteristically struggled, shooting 7 of 20 and scoring 19 points. Jackson fumed about plays like a hard pick that nearly knocked over Curry, and a protruding foot from Denver's Kenneth Faried that tripped Curry.Jackson, a point guard for the Knicks in the rough-and-tumble late 1980s and early '90s, said that the Nuggets sent "hit men" to hurt Curry and that he had sources who told him that it was Denver's game plan."You take an attempt to kick him with your foot, with his foot, that's not a basketball play," Jackson said. "That's a cheap shot."The N.B.A. fined Jackson $25,000 on Thursday for "comments intending to influence officiating."The Nuggets came to Game 6 taking a higher road, but were desperate to get the series back to Colorado for Game 7. They corralled Curry with double teams and dared other Warriors to beat them. For half the game, it worked.Then the third quarter began. Curry's first 3-pointer gave Golden State its first lead since the game's opening minute. He followed with another on the next possession, sending the fans at Oracle Arena into ear-piercing delirium.An 11-point second-quarter deficit was turned inside-out, into an 11-point third-quarter lead. Curry had 14 points in the quarter, on his way to 22. Bogut was on his way to a season-high 21 rebounds, with 14 points, and the pendulum of momentum shifted hard away from the Rockies and toward the Pacific."We go back to Denver, I hate to say it, but we probably lose momentum and struggle to win that game," Bogut said.The Nuggets won 10 more games than the Warriors during the regular season, their 57-25 record the best in franchise history. But their home-court advantage was upended with a Game 2 loss at home, where the Nuggets were 38-3 in the regular season, enabling Golden State to capture the series by winning its three home games."We lost the series in Games 1 and 2," Karl said. "We gave back everything we earned by getting 57 wins and having the third seed."
The Nets fought back from a three-games-to-one deficit against the Chicago Bulls to earn this opportunity, a win-or-go-home game in their new arena and another chance for their black-clad fans to shower this rebranded franchise with full-throated adoration.They were confident because it was all right there, all on a platter, all for the taking. The Bulls' roster had been thinned by injury and illness. The Nets could surge into a second-round series with the top-seeded Miami Heat.But it all crumbled to pieces in a first-half performance that, for the Nets, could not have been scripted any worse. The Bulls went on to win, 99-93, on Saturday night, closing the inaugural season at Barclays Center with an anticlimactic thud and cutting short the season of a team with designs on a deeper postseason run."When we won Game 6," Nets point guard Deron Williams said, "we felt like this was our series."In front of a raucous capacity crowd — the first to watch a Game 7 in Brooklyn since the Dodgers hosted the Yankees in 1956 — the Nets shot 40.7 percent and fell behind by as many as 17 points in the first half. They closed the gap to 4 in the fourth quarter, but Chicago, which scored 52 points in the paint and had 19 offensive rebounds, managed to hold on.The Bulls followed the energetic lead of their center, Joakim Noah, who had 24 points and 14 rebounds and blocked six shots. After the game, Noah, grinning broadly, leapt into the crowd to hug his mother, Cecilia Rodhe."I'm so proud of this team," he said. "All of these experiences I'll never take for granted."In a dour and stunned Nets locker room, Williams tossed a crumbled score sheet to the floor. Joe Johnson, who shot 2 of 14 from the field and scored 6 points, barely whispered his explanation for what tied his lowest scoring output of the season."I was just out there trying to give the guys what I had," Johnson said. "It was tough not being able to come through."The Nets entered Game 7 calm and confident, saying they believed that they were better than the Bulls — that they were better than the Bulls without the injuries and were certainly better than them now.The bravado had some foundation. The Nets won 49 games this season, earning the fourth seed in the Eastern Conference with two of the N.B.A.'s highest-paid players, Williams and Johnson, and an All-Star center, Brook Lopez, at their core.They also had a full roster at their disposal, unlike Chicago, which was missing the starters Kirk Hinrich (calf) and Luol Deng (illness) on Saturday, not to mention its franchise player, Derrick Rose, who has not played this season.The Bulls got by mainly on heart and hustle, as well as the ingenuity of their coach, Tom Thibodeau, who was wringing a rolled-up statistics sheet in his hand for parts of the second half Saturday, looking the part of a mad scientist on the sidelines.The Nets were undone by the same inconsistent swings that plagued them all season and all series. They made two field goals in the third quarter of Game 2. They missed 25 of 26 shots in the first half of Game 3. They shot 27 percent in the second half of Game 6.On Saturday, they fell behind, 29-25, in the first quarter while relying on Williams, who scored or assisted on 15 of the team's first 20 points, to engineer the offense. Lopez was quiet, and Johnson struggled.The Bulls built up their lead in the second quarter, taking a 17-point lead into halftime. The crowd booed."They played like they weren't ready for their season to end," forward Gerald Wallace said. "They ran what they wanted, and we were on the back of our heels."After Game 6, Noah had sat at his locker and predicted the Bulls would win Game 7."We're going to go into a hostile environment in Brooklyn," Noah said, "and we're going to win."It was a head-turning pronouncement. The Nets had won two straight, and the momentum was clearly in their favor. It tilted even further that way when Hinrich and Deng were announced out for Saturday's game. But that hardly mattered.The Nets opened the second half firing, and after a 21-8 rally, the score was 69-65. Wallace was explosive, flying to the rim for several emphatic slams and scoring 11 of his 19 points in the third quarter. The crowd was back into the game.The Nets trailed by 7, at 82-75, entering the fourth quarter, but they missed their first six shots and quickly fell behind by 10. A layup-and-one by Williams with 2 minutes 26 seconds left cut the lead to 5, 93-88.It was 95-90 entering the final minute, and with 40 seconds left Johnson missed a 3-pointer from the corner. Fans began gathering their belongings. A 3-pointer by Williams offered a glimmer of hope, but the season ended on a missed 25-foot 3-point attempt by Johnson with nine seconds remaining.The Nets and the Bulls hugged at midcourt after the buzzer. After seven hard-fought games, which included moments of rage, there was nothing left in either tank.The Bulls were exhausted but victorious. The Nets were humbled and muted. In Game 7 on their home court, with all on the line, the Nets never led.
Turning down a narrow corridor on the way in from the court, here came a smiling but aching Carmelo Anthony, his left arm dangling from its injured shoulder, courtesy of a Game 5 tango with his least favorite opponent, Kevin Garnett.Here came J. R. Smith, his reworked but ever-fragile reputation showing cracks from the strain of postseason pressure, still holding together.Here came young Iman Shumpert on his surgically repaired knee and Jason Kidd on 40-year-old legs and the rest of the tired but contented Knicks. Here they filed, into the visitors' locker room Friday night, with no four-game sweep, but with the satisfaction of a more painful disposal.More than jubilation, the Knicks wore badges of competitive — or combative — honor after bringing closure in all likelihood to the Paul Pierce-Garnett era and the die-hard team that won Boston's 17th and most recent N.B.A. championship.After an 88-80 victory put the Knicks into the next round against Indiana on Sunday, a small but vocal welcoming committee that included Spike Lee, Allan Houston and Baron Davis awaited the newly minted Eastern Conference semifinalists with encouragement and back slaps.Lee greeted a perspiring Glen Grunwald, the executive vice president and general manager — seldom seen and less often heard — by shouting, "The mastermind!"But for making him sweat out a 20-0 fourth-quarter Boston run that served as a series microcosm — the outmanned Celtics rallying from far behind, falling short — Lee bellyached, "You got to make it hard all the time."Yes, the playoffs are hard and will no doubt become harder against a rugged Pacers front line and an overall team with younger legs than Boston's. The absence of a Knicks on-court celebration Friday night in an arena that has long tormented them was in grudging deference to the Celtics. In a larger and more important sense, it was respect for the process, the long and winding road."The beauty of a tough series like this is that you get to move on and put it behind you," said Kidd, who, with Tyson Chandler, won it all two years ago with Dallas. "But, hopefully, you learn from each step along the way."If the Knicks took anything from a 4-2 series that became much sweatier than it had to be, especially in the bizarre fourth quarter of Game 6 at TD Garden, it should be an appreciation for all that Pierce and Garnett have achieved in the past five springs, round after grueling playoff round.Welcome, Knicks, to the second round for the first time in 13 years and understand that every series has the plot twists of a stomach-churning novel, a tale of two basketball cities."They were down 26 and came back," Marcus Camby said of the Celtics rally that took them to 4 behind and flirted with legend until Shumpert's hands, one last time, forced a Pierce turnover for a fast-break basket that allowed the Knicks to exhale. "They showed a lot of heart. You expect that from a team with Pierce and Garnett."In the interests of what the next month might look and sound like with the Pacers and, should the Knicks survive, probably the Heat, Camby could tell a few stories about wrathful Indiana crowds, or bitter playoff scrums with Miami.One night in 1999, Stan Van Gundy, then an assistant to Heat Coach Pat Riley, ran down the bench after the Knicks' Latrell Sprewell hammered Terry Porter to the floor."Remember all that!" Van Gundy screamed. "Remember what they do!""They" were the players coached by Van Gundy's brother, Jeff."This time of year, you get tension, skirmishes and fights," Camby said, "but in the end, it's still a brotherhood. I mean, Garnett and Pierce left the court, but some guys like Jeff Green and Brandon Bass stayed out and congratulated us, wished us luck the rest of the way."Isiah Thomas once infamously led his Detroit Pistons off the court near the end of an elimination loss to Michael Jordan's Chicago Bulls. Such snubs seem unnecessarily petty, behaviorally small, but Pierce has been part of the Boston landscape since 1998 and was no doubt roiled by the realization that he might have played his last game as a Celtic.As for Garnett, he has long been a competitive extremist, steeped in old-school emotional zealotry. So we left it to another veteran with only one year's experience in this most provincial of sports cities, Jason Terry, to provide the most meaningful context from the Celtics' locker room."The media may see what happened in this series as one thing, but the players ultimately see it as another," said Terry, who took Smith's elbow to the face in Game 3 and became the Celtics' rallying symbol. "In the playoffs, whatever you could do to get under somebody's skin, to get an advantage, that's what you do. But, listen, I got friends over there. They know me and what I stand for."Terry won a ring with Kidd and Chandler in Dallas, delaying the inevitable coronation of King LeBron James. Late Friday night, while a horde of reporters staked out interview position for the dawdling and presumably deflated Pierce and Garnett, Terry — who didn't stay on court for the hugfest, either — did pay the Knicks the ultimate respect."I think they can go all the way," he said. "They have the pieces, the tough leadership. They have a dynamic scorer in Melo, and their motto is defense. Shumpert gives them someone who can guard 1 through 4, anyone on the perimeter, and Tyson is that presence in the middle, with high I.Q., willing to do anything for a team to win."Beating the Celtics is just a start, and it won't take long for new hostilities to form against Indiana. Along with schoolyard histrionics, war clichés inevitably and too easily accompany a grueling playoff series. Finally, after 13 years and in Season 3 of the Anthony era, the Knicks can appreciate how hard and educational it is in most cases to win one.
EAST RUTHERFORD, N.J. — The Nets ' off-season began late Saturday, after a Game 7 loss that will sting long into summer. Less than 24 hours later, the team took its first step toward the future, announcing that the interim coach P. J. Carlesimo would not return.General Manager Billy King made the announcement Sunday at the Nets' practice complex, and players said they were surprised by the swift turnaround. After Avery Johnson was fired Dec. 28, Carlesimo went 35-19, leading the Nets to the fourth seed in the Eastern Conference playoffs and the second-best record in franchise history.But the Nets could not advance past the first round, despite home-court advantage and a depleted Chicago Bulls roster, and King said he wanted to explore other directions."It was a difficult decision," King said. "Looking at the long-term future with this organization, I felt it was best to look elsewhere and try to find the right fit."King said he did not want to rush the search process, which was expected to include top N.B.A. assistants and established head coaches. He disputed the popular perception that the Nets' owner, Mikhail D. Prokhorov, would be looking to lure a higher-profile coach to make a splash."I don't know where that came from," King said. "It doesn't have to be a high-profile name. It has to be the right guy."But King also said he planned to contact the former Bulls and Los Angeles Lakers coach Phil Jackson. It is unclear whether Jackson would come out of retirement, but he has said he does not plan to coach again."I'll reach out to him like other candidates," King said. "He's one of the best coaches sitting on the sidelines, so you've got to reach out."Despite widespread speculation, the Nets are not believed to be interested in Jeff Van Gundy, a former Knicks coach, or Stan Van Gundy. King cited the Bulls and the Knicks as models for where he would like the next coach to take the team."We've got to get to the next level," King said.Nets point guard Deron Williams said he would like to see a new coach who is "creative on offense and has a good system on defense." He mentioned Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau as an example of the type of principled and commanding person he would prefer guiding the club. Williams added that toughness was the main quality missing from the team."I think we got out-toughed in that last series, especially yesterday, so I think that's the main thing," Williams said.Throughout the season, the Nets showed flashes of brilliance offset by stretches of ineptitude. In the biggest game of the season, maybe the biggest game for the franchise in nearly a decade, the Nets were done in by their inconsistency."Sometimes we got too relaxed, too comfortable, instead of just keeping that edge," forward Reggie Evans said. "You've got to overcome stuff like that."The Nets were criticized for appearing to play without passion at times during the series. In the first half Saturday, the home crowd began booing when they fell behind by 17 points.King conceded that he saw a lack of intensity."As a group, the sense of urgency wasn't there at the start the game," King said."It came in the second half, but when you are behind by that many points, you've got to dig yourself out of a hole, and that team is very well coached," he added, referring to Chicago.King's contract with the Nets was extended before Game 4, and the team's entire starting lineup is under contract for next season. The Nets are well over the salary cap, with several key pieces, including forward Andray Blatche and guard C. J. Watson, entering free agency.In surveying the team's needs, King said an objective in the off-season would be improving the athleticism of the defense, specifically to guard small forwards like Miami's LeBron James and Indiana's Paul George."We've got the ability to score," King said. "Defense, at times, has been a challenge, but I think we can play that well as well."Andray Blatche, soon to be a free agent, said he hoped to return to the Nets next season. "I can't tell you 100 percent yet," he said. "But that's the plan." Blatche averaged 10.3 points and 5.1 rebounds during the regular season. He was signed for $855,000, the veteran minimum, after the Washington Wizards used the league's amnesty clause to waive him last season. ... General Manager Billy King said that if the Nets had reached the second round, Joe Johnson would have probably sat for Games 1 and 2 because of plantar fasciitis in his left foot. Johnson disputed that, but he said he planned to rest and make sure the foot healed this summer. He said he would not need surgery. ... Deron Williams said he would not require surgery to fix bone spurs in his ankle.
When Carmelo Anthony joined the Knicks in 2011, he joined the ranks of New York's most debonair athletes, with a rotating collection of pocket squares, tailored suits, chunky glasses and skinny ties.But his look has a secret ingredient, one that has become nearly as crucial a part of his public image as his scoring prowess. That secret ingredient is Khalilah Williams-Webb.She is the owner of a cozy boutique in the Bedford-Stuyvesant neighborhood of Brooklyn, and she can talk about Michael Kors as easily as about Michael Jordan. Williams-Webb has been designing Anthony's look since 2008, when he played for the Denver Nuggets.With Williams-Webb's assistance, Anthony has become the latest in a long line of fashionable New York athletes that includes Joe Namath, famous for his fur coats, and Walt Frazier, champion of the fedora. Anthony favors custom-made suits, vintage jackets and high-end cargo pants, a look that has caught on among his peers in professional sports.He dresses with flair even when he struggles on the court, as he has recently. After shooting a dismal 10 for 28 from the field during a loss at home in the opening game of the second-round series against the Indiana Pacers on Sunday, Anthony wore a burgundy blazer over a black T-shirt, along with a black fedora, to the postgame news conference.When Williams-Webb met Anthony, he had cornrows and favored baggy clothes. She helped turn him into the kind of person who attends fashion shows and offers style tips in the British edition of GQ."The goal was to make him look more like a gentleman, to make him be more relatable, in a sense," said Williams-Webb, 31. "He was known for being kind of on the wild side, especially when it came to dressing for games, so we wanted to tone it down and take it to a level as far as style is concerned. And I feel like we've accomplished it tenfold."Her responsibilities include ridding Anthony's closet of oversize T-shirts and dated outfits. But she does far more than that.Every few weeks, Williams-Webb meticulously selects outfits for Anthony, down to his socks, underwear, belt and shoes. She then places each outfit into a garment bag, with instructions for Anthony pinned to the bag. She sometimes arranges more than a dozen outfits at once.Anthony was not available to comment for this article, his representative Jill Fritzo said. Fritzo added that she, too, was a fan of Wiliams-Webb, saying in an e-mail, "She's fab."Williams-Webb's client list includes the N.B.A. players Rudy Gay and Brandon Bass and the N.F.L. player Donte Whitner and the former player James Hardy. She spends her days shopping, meeting with designers and hunting for extra-long pants and size 14 shoes. It is all a long way from her years working in retail in Midtown Manhattan."She totally got the athlete lifestyle," said Hardy, a former receiver with the Buffalo Bills who is a model and an actor in Los Angeles. "You called and asked her about the Kanye West shoes, and she would have them at your door in 48 hours and knew about them weeks in advance."In 2005, the N.B.A. instituted a dress code that banned tank tops, sweats and chunky medallions in favor of sport coats and dress shoes. The unintentional effect has turned the sidelines into a runway."It's different now," Williams-Webb said. "Basketball players are into it, athletes in general are into it. They're into clothes, they're into suiting."As a child, Williams-Webb loathed when her mother dragged her along on shopping trips. But she later developed a passion for vintage clothing, and her boutique, Shirley + Alice, is named after her vintage-loving grandmothers.Williams-Webb was also exposed to sports early on, through her older brother and father, who were huge basketball fans."I always knew who people were because my dad and my brother forced me to watch ESPN," she said. She was voted best dressed in her high school senior class, then attended college in Maryland before moving to New York City with hopes of entering the fashion business.Williams-Webb worked at Express and Tommy Hilfiger, and as a cocktail waitress. But her life changed drastically in the next few years. First, she met her husband, Richard Beavers, an art dealer who now owns a gallery a block from her store.Then, she met Anthony through his manager, Robert Frazier, whom she knew from Baltimore. In an early meeting, Williams-Webb picked out a full suit for Anthony, down to the shoes. "He loved the look," she said. "And they were like, 'Let's do this.' "Now that Anthony lives in New York, Williams-Webb said she met with him at least two or three times a month.She finds inspiration in the glory days of the American Basketball Association and in Jordan's era, the 1990s N.B.A., as well as in old movies, photographs and contemporary street fashion.These days, she is juggling the playoffs, meetings with designers and creating Anthony's wardrobe."I'm always looking for what's next," she said.
MIAMI — When Nate Robinson chased after a loose ball in the second quarter of Monday's second-round playoff game, he quickly discovered that he had company in the form of the 6-foot-8, 250-pound LeBron James . At 5-8, Robinson paid the price. He retreated to the locker room to receive 10 stitches on his upper lip, and the Bulls pressed on without him.Robinson soon returned, and so did his team's determined attitude. During this most surprising postseason run, little has been able to slow the undermanned, injury-ravaged Bulls. No Luol Deng? No Derrick Rose? No problem. The Bulls opened their series against the defending champion Heat with a 93-86 victory that left a once-festive crowd at American Airlines Arena in near disbelief."Nobody had us winning any games," said Robinson, who finished with 27 points and 9 assists. "I heard we were going to get swept."Not quite, not after Robinson broke open a tie game by scoring the final 7 points. It was a one-man surge that featured a step-back, 19-foot jumper and a finger-roll layup over a cluster of Miami defenders. He stifled the crowd as well as James, who had done his best to keep the Heat involved late."He's as confident as they come," Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau said of Robinson, adding: "He always thinks he's hot. He's never afraid."The Bulls limited the Heat to 39.7 percent shooting, held a 46-32 rebounding advantage and seized early control of the series."We're not going to make excuses," Chris Bosh said. "We have to do a better job of getting into rhythm. We never found it."Coming off a seven-game series against the Nets, the Bulls have refused to buckle without the considerable services of Deng, who experienced complications after having a spinal tap to test for viral meningitis; Kirk Hinrich, who has a bruised left calf; and Rose, a former most valuable player who has not dressed at all this season after tearing the anterior cruciate ligament in his left knee in the playoffs a year ago."They have a no-excuse mentality," James said before the game. "No matter who's in the lineup, they play the same style of basketball: hard-nosed, together and with a sense of urgency each and every possession. That's why they continue to win games."The Heat, meantime, were fully rested and raring to go since sweeping the Milwaukee Bucks more than a week ago. The latest homage to James took shape in the hours before the game. The front facade of the arena suddenly featured a huge black-and-white mural of his profile, along with the headline "2013 MVP." In a pregame ceremony, Commissioner David Stern presented James with his fourth M.V.P. trophy.The Bulls took all this in and promptly made James's life as miserable as possible. He went 1 of 6 from the field in the first half, and much of the credit belonged to Jimmy Butler, who was dealt the challenge of defending James in Deng's absence. Butler, who played a full 48 minutes for the third straight game and finished with 21 points and 14 rebounds, said he conferred with Deng by telephone before the game."I just tried to make everything difficult for him," Butler said of guarding James. "It's all about containment."James finished with 24 points, and his 3-point play put the Heat ahead, 76-69, late in the fourth quarter. But the Bulls responded with a 9-1 run, which set the stage for Robinson's dramatics — stitches and all."I've played on some tough teams, but this is a little different," said Robinson, an eight-year veteran. "There's something special about this group."During the Heat's extended layoff since dispatching the Bucks, Coach Erik Spoelstra tried to keep his players sharp at practice by creating what he described as a "training camp" vibe. Despite his best efforts, he was unable to replicate the toughness of the Bulls, who are surviving and thriving against all odds.Bulls guard Marco Belinelli was fined $15,000 by the N.B.A. for making an obscene gesture in the fourth quarter of Chicago's 99-93 victory at Brooklyn in Game 7 of their first-round playoff series. Belinelli made the gesture as he made his way back down the court after connecting on a 3-pointer that gave Chicago a 91-81 lead. (AP)SPURS 129, WARRIORS 127 Manu Ginobili's 3-pointer from the wing with 1.2 seconds left in double overtime lifted the San Antonio Spurs to a thrilling victory Monday night over the Golden State Warriors and Stephen Curry, who had 44 points in the opener of the Western Conference semifinals in San Antonio.The game-winning shot came 43.7 seconds after Ginobili took an ill-advised 3 that appeared to cost the Spurs the game."I went from wanting to trade him on the spot to wanting to cook breakfast for him tomorrow morning," Coach Gregg Popovich said. "That's the truth. When I talk to him and say, 'Manu,' he goes, 'This is what I do.' That's what he's going to tell me. I stopped coaching him a long time ago."Ginobili's 3 capped an improbable comeback for the Spurs, who trailed by 16 points with 4 minutes left in regulation before going on an 18-2 run to close the fourth quarter and force overtime.Golden State trailed by five with one minute left in the second overtime before the Warriors scored 6 straight points to take a one-point lead on Kent Bazemore's reverse layup that gave the Warriors a 127-126 advantage with 3.9 seconds left.Bazemore's layup was set up by Ginobili's errant 27-foot 3-pointer with 44.9 seconds left."I took a really bad shot," Ginobili said. "I was on the top of the key. I had no chance whatsoever to make it to the basket. I couldn't penetrate; I was very tired. Jack gave me a couple of feet and I thought I could make it." (AP)
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — The search for answers began anew on Monday, the first day in two months that the Knicks were forced to confront their imperfections, rather than accent their strengths.They are facing their first deficit of the playoffs, 1-0, having been outmuscled in a 102-95 loss to the Indiana Pacers to open the Eastern Conference semifinals.They have lost three of their last four games, and their last two at Madison Square Garden, where they will try again on Tuesday night in Game 2 against Indiana.Carmelo Anthony is mired in a horrendous shooting slump. J. R. Smith has reverted to old, bad habits. And a once-fearsome offense has been neutered under the pressure of the postseason.The Knicks had other problems in Sunday's loss, which were readily conceded. They were outworked in the lane and on the boards, and their defense wilted against Indiana's beefy front line. Those are mostly effort issues, which are easily addressed.The offense is a more troublesome matter. Over the last four games — including three first-round games against Boston — Anthony has converted 35 of 110 shots from the field, for a .318 shooting percentage, a low rate even for him. He has not made half his shots in any game since the playoffs began.Smith, the Knicks' second best scorer, is 12 for 42 (.286) in the three games since he returned from a one-game suspension in the Celtics series.The Knicks will ultimately go only as far as Anthony and Smith can carry them; right now, they are having trouble generating any momentum. Their shooting woes were muted in the first round because Boston could not score, either. But this could become a fatal handicap against the Pacers, who score and defend better than the Celtics.For the first time since mid-March, Coach Mike Woodson had to talk about shot selection."They've got to try to take better shots sometimes," Woodson said of Anthony and Smith. "Sometimes, some of the difficult shots that you've been accustomed to making, that you're not making, you've got to figure out a way to get better shots. I think they're capable of doing that. Only time will tell."Although the Pacers' size presents difficulties for the Knicks — and perhaps contributed to Anthony's foul trouble in Game 1 — Woodson said he would stick with his small-ball lineup, with Anthony at power forward.Despite his shooting struggles and an injury to his left shoulder, Anthony is averaging 26.9 shots a game in the postseason, which would be the highest rate in his career. Woodson said Smith and Anthony should attack the basket more, and Anthony agreed.The Pacers and the Celtics are two of the league's best defensive teams, but Anthony said his woes had nothing to do with the opponents."I've been seeing the same defense all year long," he said. "As far as shots go, I'm not going to overanalyze that and start putting that under a microscope, because the shots that I'm taking I know I can make. They're just not going in at this point, for whatever reason."Defense carried the Knicks through the first round, albeit against a punchless Celtics team. But the Knicks' identity this season was built on their scoring prowess. They averaged 108.6 points per 100 possessions, according to N.B.A.com, the third best mark in the league. That has plummeted to 97.3 in the playoffs, a number that would have ranked last in the league.The Knicks' shooting percentage has also declined, to 41.5 percent in the playoffs from 44.8 percent in the regular season. They never broke the 90-point barrier in six games against the Celtics. They got to 95 on Sunday, but only after a 30-point fourth-quarter rally.Aside from Raymond Felton, the Knicks' supporting cast has disappeared. Jason Kidd is 0 for 10 from the field over the last five games. Tyson Chandler, whose pick-and-roll scoring was vital this season, is averaging 5 points in the playoffs."Everybody's got to play better," Woodson said. "It's not just Melo. I'm not putting it on Melo's head. This is a team."Amar'e Stoudemire played a series of full-court, three-on-three games after practice Monday — his first time scrimmaging since having knee surgery two months ago. Barring any setbacks, he should be available for Game 3 on Saturday, Mike Woodson said. The plan is for Stoudemire to scrimmage at least once more later this week. "I have no pain," Stoudemire said. "Playing, running, jumping, cutting, slashing, I felt explosive. The only thing now is getting my wind back up and see how it recovers for tomorrow." Stoudemire looked spry enough as he battled Chris Copeland and Earl Barron. But his jump shot and post moves were predictably rusty. He missed from just about everywhere. He looked exhausted after 20 minutes and conceded, "I had a tough day today." He added: "I want to get in better shape, and I will. Once my cardio gets to where I want it and my health feels great and 100 percent, then I'm back out there." Stoudemire appeared in just 29 games this season, sandwiched between two operations — on his left knee in October and on his right on March 11. Asked about the challenge of jumping into the postseason fray, after two months off, Stoudemire said: "There's no fear. Fear is false evidence appearing real. I have no fear at all." ...Steve Novak went through individual drills on the court, but his status for Game 2 remains unclear. Novak has missed two games because of back spasms.
LOS ANGELES — As a special guest for Southern California's spring football game on April 13, Andy Enfield had a sideline pass. After taking care of his news media responsibilities, which have become part of his daily routine, he wanted to pay close attention to the game. Enfield considers himself a big football fan.About midway through the game, a play developed in the vicinity of Enfield. A defensive back was chasing a wide receiver toward the sideline. After some quick calculations, Enfield realized he had a split-second to avoid being pulverized by 450 pounds of colliding muscle.He somehow hurtled to safety, his instincts as a college athlete still apparent, and yet the entire episode was basically business as usual for Enfield, whose career trajectory over the past five weeks has been fast and furious, everything coming at him at once."If I could pick one word," he said on a recent weekday morning, "it would be 'nonstop.' "Enfield was hired as the men's basketball coach at U.S.C. on April 1, vaulting from relative anonymity to the realm of pseudocelebrity because of the job he did at Florida Gulf Coast. Remember the Eagles? They became the first No. 15 seed in the N.C.A.A. men's tournament to advance to the Round of 16, employing Enfield's whiz-bang brand of offensive pyrotechnics to maul Georgetown and San Diego State while captivating the basketball world.Enfield, 43, now faces an even greater challenge: reviving a dormant program in a city with no shortage of distractions. Los Angeles has the Lakers, the Clippers and the Dodgers. Los Angeles has Hollywood starlets, warm beaches and In-N-Out Burger. In this crowded market, U.S.C. men's basketball has been an afterthought, hindered by decades of mediocrity. Enfield wants to change all that. If it happens, he said, it will not be by accident."You have to build something," said Enfield, who likened coaching to running a small business. "You have to communicate with your employees. You have to show up every day wanting to improve. You have to create a culture and a brand."Enfield is already making changes. Several weeks ago, he had a wall torn down in his office to create additional space for meetings. For now, he and his assistants are making do with dining room furniture.Though he is capable of improvising, Enfield also prepares. After every meeting, he prints spreadsheets for his staff. The material might cover recruiting, game strategy or coming travel."He's the most organized person I've ever met," the assistant Tony Bland said.At least until his family relocates from Florida at the end of the academic year, Enfield is living at a Radisson near Galen Center, which houses U.S.C.'s gymnasium and basketball offices.Enfield said he thought he had no choice but to pull 16-hour days, arriving for work at 5:30 a.m. He needs to recruit and he needs to promote, especially as he tries to extricate the Trojans from the morass of a 14-18 season that included the dismissal of Coach Kevin O'Neill.Pat Haden, U.S.C.'s athletic director, said it was a priority for him to hire a coach who would establish an up-tempo style of offense. Enfield was a check in that box. Florida Gulf Coast averaged 72.9 points a game last season and was at its most dynamic in the tournament, scoring 78 points in its opening-round win over Georgetown and 81 points against San Diego State in the Round of 32, giving rise to Dunk City as a cultural meme."It's what our fans want and our players want in Southern California," said Haden, a former U.S.C. quarterback and Rhodes scholar. "The half-court style, while I know it's been really successful at a lot of places, it just doesn't resonate in Los Angeles."Enfield's biography has become something close to hagiography at this point. After growing up in Pennsylvania (where he was his high school's valedictorian), he attended Johns Hopkins (where he set the N.C.A.A. Division III record for free-throw percentage in 1991, 95.3, which has since been broken) and worked for a stretch in the technology sector (where he helped build a successful start-up). He spent the past seven seasons coaching in Florida, first as an assistant at Florida State and then as the coach at Florida Gulf Coast. And yes, he married a supermodel.
DEERFIELD, Ill. — When Luol Deng approached a group of reporters Thursday afternoon after the Chicago Bulls' practice, he issued a warning: "You don't want to get too close."As he tried to give an update on his health, Deng paused to cough before he issued a statement befitting a player who looked gaunt and spoke in barely more than a whisper."I tried to shoot a little and I struggled," he said. "I couldn't do it."Deng met with the news media for the first time since complications from a spinal tap before Game 6 of the Chicago Bulls' first-round series against the Nets put him in the hospital. He was given the test, he said, because his flulike symptoms were so severe the team wanted to make sure he did not have meningitis. A second procedure, called a blood patch, required his blood to be used to help close the hole after Deng continued to leak spinal fluid.The side effects, Deng said, kept him mostly in bed until Thursday. He had excruciating headaches and bouts of diarrhea. He vomited, struggled to walk and lost 15 pounds in less than a week. "I couldn't control my body," he said. "It was scary."For the Bulls, a team barely standing up at this point, this postseason has been a painful journey bordering on the absurd. Deng has not played since Game 5 of the Bulls' series against the Nets. Point guard Kirk Hinrich has been out since Game 4 of that series with what has been called a bruised calf. Nate Robinson vomited into a bucket during Game 6 against the Nets, and in Game 1 against the Miami Heat, he received 10 stitches after a second-quarter collision with LeBron James.But with Hinrich and Deng at least rested, there was hope for good news on the injury front as the Bulls returned to Chicago with their Eastern Conference semifinal series against the Heat tied at one game each. Those hopes were misplaced.Although Deng was not ruled out for Friday's Game 3, he said he still felt dizzy whenever he tried to move around too much. His self-assessment offered little optimism that he would be available Friday, or at any point in the series."I want to play, but I don't know what I can do," he said. "I just haven't done anything."Hinrich did not even attempt to practice. Instead, he had a second magnetic resonance imaging exam on his ailing calf.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — With three full days between Games 2 and 3 of the Eastern Conference semifinal series between the Knicks and the Indiana Pacers, the replay of Iman Shumpert's one-handed slam dunk in the second quarter Tuesday has had a chance to really sink in, playing in highlight packages in what has seemed like an unending loop.It has been called the play of the Knicks' postseason, perhaps the N.B.A.'s dunk of the year. Shumpert's right arm extended almost perpendicular to the floor to cradle the ball, then swung forward with ferocious speed toward the rim. His legs curled backward.And when he finally landed on the Madison Square Garden floor, his surgically repaired left knee was fine."I've stopped thinking about it," Shumpert said after practice Thursday as the Knicks prepared for Game 3 on Saturday in Indianapolis. The series is tied at one game each.It has been little more than a year since Shumpert tore his anterior cruciate ligament in the third quarter of the Knicks' playoff opener against the Miami Heat last season. He returned Jan. 17, setting the standard for accelerated recovery in the N.B.A., but for weeks he only vaguely resembled the staunch defender and explosive leaper the Knicks saw last season, his rookie year.He was rusty and tentative, lacking confidence in his outside shot and his lateral quickness defending on the ball. He remained in Coach Mike Woodson's starting lineup, but his playing time dwindled to 18.6 minutes per game in February.He wore a bulky knee brace and a look of bewilderment, trying to swim with the swift current of the N.B.A. regular season while worrying just how much wear his leg could withstand."I was constantly thinking about it," Shumpert said. The scar along the side of the knee was not the issue as much as the conspicuous brace. "Once I took that off, I stopped," he said.In the postseason, with Shumpert's brace off, his playing time has risen and his production has flourished. He is shooting 46.2 percent from 3-point range and averaging 10 points, 6.4 rebounds and 1.5 steals per game. He is an unmistakable testament to patience, perseverance and the advances of medical science.And he is also, fairly or not, a constant reminder of the story in Chicago surrounding Bulls guard Derrick Rose, who tore his A.C.L. only hours before Shumpert injured his last April.With Rose watching, the Bulls and the Heat are tied at a game each in their Eastern Conference semifinal."Derrick Rose is a franchise player," Shumpert said. "It's a totally different situation than what I am."While there is truth to that, Shumpert has lately been an invaluable member of the Knicks, providing a newfound scoring punch to go with his characteristic defense ability.Woodson said he believed Shumpert was playing his best basketball since the Knicks drafted him in the first round in 2011."His minutes have gone up, and a lot of that has to do with the fact that he's gotten better," Woodson said. "His confidence level is high. We just have to make sure we keep his confidence level high and that he continues to play with that type of intensity to help us win games."Shumpert said the confidence in his jump shot, a source of frustration early in his return, stemmed from his teammates' willingness to keep letting him shoot."When you see a couple of them go in, you get more and more confident," Shumpert said. "My teammates are finding me when I'm open; they're finding me when I have a slight advantage. I guess the more confident they are in me, the more I play with."Lately, with J. R. Smith struggling and Carmelo Anthony having difficulty finding his rhythm, the Knicks have needed Shumpert's offense. He has hit as many 3-pointers (12) during the postseason as he did during April.And he has lifted the team in other ways, as he did with the dunk he unleashed Tuesday."Nobody saw that coming," Anthony said after Game 2. "It got the crowd going, got us going. Our energy picked up after that."The throwdown might reverberate more loudly in Chicago, signaling to Bulls fans what they hope to someday have again with Rose.Fortunately for the Knicks, they have it now."I've been waiting my whole life to play in the playoffs," Shumpert said. "I'm just living in the moment right now."Amar'e Stoudemire practiced Thursday and played in a full-court four-on-four scrimmage, and the Knicks will most likely list him as questionable for Game 3. Mike Woodson said Stoudemire could see between 10 and 15 minutes of action if he is able to play. ... Point guard Raymond Felton missed practice for personal reasons. Woodson said it had nothing to do with his health.
CHICAGO — The best player in the N.B.A. brought the ball across halfcourt. He was fouled. And then he was shoved — not lightly, but with two-handed force from a 6-foot-10-inch, 275-pound opponent.LeBron James went sprawling to the floor, sliding across the court after his second-quarter run-in with the Bulls' backup center, Nazr Mohammed. James sat on the United Center floor. He surveyed the scene, all eyes in the building waiting for his next move."I mean way too much to my teammates to retaliate," he said Friday night, sitting at his locker after the Heat's 104-94 win over the Chicago Bulls, which put them ahead in the Eastern Conference semifinal series, two games to one. He scratched his beard thoughtfully, looking every bit as cool as he did after the incident.He continued, "If Nazr Mohammed gets kicked out and I kicked out, they win."James was issued a technical foul for an elbow he looked to have delivered to Mohammed after the two came together, but Mohammed was the player ejected."I haven't been in a situation like that before," said James, who enjoyed the last laugh when the final buzzer sounded.It was not easy for the Heat, the East's top seed and winners of 66 games in the regular season. Nor was it clean. The short-handed Bulls posed a formidable and physical test. They battered the Heat two days after a Game 2 that featured 51 personal fouls — 9 of them technicals — as well as two ejections. That game was a blowout Heat win; this was a nip-and-tuck affair into the fourth quarter.But despite Chicago's best efforts to bully Miami, the Heat emerged triumphant from what felt as much like a 15-round prize fight as a basketball game.From the start, James was booed every time he touched the ball — never with more gusto than after Mohammed's push. Yet he delivered what turned out to be the game's biggest shot. After a Marco Belinelli 3-pointer closed the Heat's lead to 90-86 with two and a half minutes to play, James answered with a 3 from the top of the key. On Miami's next possession, Norris Cole nailed a 3 of his own. The Heat led by 96-88, and the exhausted Bulls were finished.James scored 25 points to go with seven assists and eight rebounds. He had just one turnover. Chris Bosh added 20 points and 19 rebounds, and Cole delivered off the bench, scoring 18 points and going 3 for 3 from 3-point range."Toughness isn't just built on throwing elbows after plays or something like that," Miami's Shane Battier said. "It's about making tough basketball plays. We have a bunch of guys who make those plays."Both teams played down any carry-over from the rough-and-tumble Game 2 in Miami, and this game began innocently enough. The Bulls scored the first 7 points and earned an early standing ovation from their home crowd. But before the first quarter was over, the placid start was a distant memory.Near the end of the quarter, after Chris Andersen fouled a driving Nate Robinson and the two lay sprawled on the floor, Joakim Noah shoved Andersen. Players from both teams rushed to the scene, and Noah was issued a technical. Still, it was an improvement from Game 2, when the first technical came 21 seconds into the game.A quarter later came Mohammed's push, when he appeared to track James from across the court and run right at him before he delivered the hard foul."From my angle, I just saw a guy basically flop," Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau told reporters. "And I'm going to leave it at that."Mohammed said: "Sometimes you have to fight your instincts and do what's right. I'm disappointed that I didn't fight my instincts well enough tonight because I probably could have helped the team."Still, the Bulls hung with the Heat. The game was tied, 70-70, after three quarters.Chicago was again without its starting point guard, Kirk Hinrich, out with a left calf injury, and the All-Star forward Luol Deng, who is still recovering from complications stemming from a spinal tap. Derrick Rose watched the action in a suit from his customary seat on the bench.It was a rugged test for the Heat. They passed."We're focusing on playing our identity and being able to do that on the road in a tough environment," Coach Erik Spoelstra said before the game.Although he may not have predicted how tough the environment, his team did exactly that.
INDIANAPOLIS — From the moment they took the court last fall, the refashioned Knicks held certain truths to be self-evident, that they were endowed with the inalienable right to shoot and score at will, the farther from the basket the better.No one really challenged these assumptions until the last week, when the Indiana Pacers made it their mission to deny the Knicks everything they have held dear, to deny them their very identity as a freewheeling, high-scoring, 3-point-shooting juggernaut.The Knicks lost it all Saturday night, looking tame and ordinary in an 82-71 loss at Bankers Life Fieldhouse, as the Pacers took a 2-1 lead in this second-round playoff series.When the final buzzer sounded, 15 Knicks and an assortment of coaches and support staff trudged away, all blank stares and grim expressions.The Knicks had converted just 35.2 percent of their field-goal attempts, their low point in the series, with season lows in 3-pointers made (3) and attempted (11). They had flirted with the franchise playoff record for fewest points (67), a threshold they did not cross until Kenyon Martin dunked with 1 minute 39 seconds left."We just didn't have any offensive pop for some reason," said Coach Mike Woodson, "so we got to figure that out."Carmelo Anthony scored 21 points, but he was held without a field goal in the fourth quarter and was just 6 for 16 for the game. The Knicks' starting backcourt produced just 6 points, all from Raymond Felton, who went 1 for 8 from the field. Iman Shumpert missed 7 of his 10 attempts. J. R. Smith, fighting through illness, nevertheless took 12 shots — the second most on the team — and made just four.For the second time in three games, the Pacers beat the Knicks up inside, winning the rebounding game by 53-40, while scoring twice as many second-chance points (20-10).Roy Hibbert dominated at both ends of the court, finishing with a game-high 24 points and 12 rebounds, again outworking Tyson Chandler, who is having a forgettable series. Chandler had three blocks Saturday, but finished with just 9 points and 5 rebounds.Game 4 is Tuesday, also at Bankers Life Fieldhouse, where the Pacers are 4-0 in the postseason.The Knicks set an N.B.A. record by hitting 891 3-pointers this season, every game becoming a shooting display. The Pacers were the N.B.A.'s best team at preventing 3-pointers — makes and attempts. They are winning this clash of styles."Our guys usually do what you emphasize," Pacers Coach Frank Vogel said. "We knew that if we take the 3-ball away from this team, they're going to struggle to score."The Knicks were never really in the game, falling behind by 10 points in the second quarter, by 14 in the third and by 16 in the fourth. Their rallies were rare and short-lived, as one shot after another clanged off the rim.Felton converted a 3-point play early in the fourth quarter, cutting the deficit to 9 points, but the Knicks then went 7 minutes 43 seconds without making a shot from the field."Defensively, we was there," Anthony said. "Offensively, we wasn't."For the second time in three games, Anthony fell into foul trouble while tangling with the Pacers' big men. He picked up his second, third and fourth fouls in a stretch of 3:24 in the third quarter — the first two while guarding David West and the last against Hibbert.The Knicks need big bodies in this series, so they were happy to see Amar'e Stoudemire back, even in a cameo role, after a two-month layoff following knee surgery. He scored 7 points in eight minutes, the shortest stint of his career, regular season or playoffs. He did provide a momentary thrill by hitting a pull-up 3-pointer at the third-quarter buzzer."I was in better shape than I thought I was," Stoudemire said, adding: "I wanted to be able to dominate, but it was my first game back. It was a matter of getting out there and seeing how I'd feel. I felt great tonight, and it's a great sign."It was Stoudemire's 1st game since March 7, and just his 30th of the season. Expectations were modest, and he met them.Playing off the bench for the first time in his postseason career, Stoudemire started the second quarter and promptly missed his first shot, a 7-foot fadeaway jumper. But he came back with a powerful dunk moments later, taking a feed from Pablo Prigioni and rising quickly to the rim, celebrating with a mighty "Yaaahhh!" His first stint lasted just 4:29.If anything, the Knicks had more concern over Smith, who was mired in a 15-for-57 shooting slump before falling ill. Smith's absence at the morning shootaround aroused some suspicion, given his reputation for late-night activity. Woodson said Smith had a 102-degree fever, although his condition had apparently improved by the evening.Smith looked dazed on the bench and a bit lethargic on the court, which on this night made him no different than most of his teammates."We couldn't put the ball in the basket," Felton said, adding: "You hate it, it makes you angry, makes you frustrated. I think our defense was great; our offense just couldn't put the ball in the basket."Amar'e Stoudemire had played fewer than 20 minutes in a playoff game only once in his career, and it was because of an injury. He played 18 minutes against the Boston Celtics on April 19, 2011, his game cut short by an injured back. Stoudemire also had not played fewer than 16 minutes in any game this season. Before Saturday, the fewest minutes Stoudemire had ever played in a game was 11, on three occasions.
MEMPHIS — Zach Randolph screamed at Lionel Hollins. Marc Gasol screamed at the officials. Tony Allen screamed at himself. No one will ever accuse the Grizzlies of being a quiet, understated team. They like to share their feelings. Hollins, the team's coach, prefers it that way."I've got a crazy, crazy bunch of competitive guys," he said.All that emotion was on display Saturday in Memphis's 87-81 victory over the Oklahoma City Thunder in Game 3 of their second-round playoff series. Gasol scored 20 points and hit two key free throws as the Grizzlies took a 2-1 series lead at FedEx Forum."Grit-and-grind basketball," Allen said, referring to the team's motto. "It's not going to look pretty. But we're going to play hard and play for each other."Allen, a high-energy wing, played solid defense on the Thunder's Kevin Durant, who finished with 25 points and 11 rebounds but missed 8 of his last 11 shots. He also missed two free throws in the game's final minute."We have to embrace the tough times and get better from it," Durant said. "I believe in my teammates."It was not the sharpest display of basketball, and perhaps that was to be expected in a hard-fought series. The teams had an extended break after Memphis's Game 2 win Tuesday in Oklahoma City, and it was a break that both needed. Thunder Coach Scott Brooks said he suspected that the Grizzlies watched game film "over and over and over and over," though Saturday's contest wound up being largely devoid of pristine ball movement and dead-eye shooting.The Grizzlies shot 40.5 percent from the field over all and just 28.6 percent from 3-point range. Oklahoma City was even worse, shooting 36.4 percent over all. Remove Durant's 9-of-19 effort, and his teammates combined to go 23 of 69.Durant kept the Thunder close for long stretches. Late in the first half, he made an end-to-end dunk, a 3-pointer and a runner. He looked determined to carry the team, probably because he had no choice in the absence of Russell Westbrook, who is out for the playoffs after knee surgery. Durant played almost 46 minutes. Brooks said the decision to play him so much was "easy," adding, "He had plenty of rest in timeouts."The effort must have taken a toll, though, especially against the relentless Allen, who also asserted himself at the other end, finishing with 14 points."When a guy takes the ball and has to score like that, it takes energy," Hollins said of Durant. "The more you make him work, that's the best you can do."Despite falling behind by 7 midway through the fourth quarter, the Thunder worked themselves back into contention with transition baskets. A deep 3-pointer by Derek Fisher tied the score at 81-81. Gasol then showed some nimble work in the post, drawing a foul on Serge Ibaka and going to the line with 1 minute 3 seconds remaining. Gasol sank both free throws, and that was the difference."He's our anchor," said Quincy Pondexter, who scored 9 points off the bench. "We need him in there."As for the vocal nature of his players, Hollins said it was the ultimate sign of a healthy team."That's part of competing," he said. "If they're not going at each other and challenging each other, then they're not very competitive."
MEMPHIS — Jason Peters was the boys' basketball coach at Lausanne Collegiate School in August 2001 when he received some important news. A new student was enrolling at Lausanne, a private school here on the city's east side. And that new student happened to be Pau Gasol's younger brother.Peters got on the phone and recommended that Jon Van Hoozer, his assistant, swing by. This was something he needed to see."Sure enough, the sky darkened and you look in the doorway, and here is this massive human being," Van Hoozer said. "It was exciting."Long before he became a standout center with the Grizzlies and the N.B.A.'s defensive player of the year, Marc Gasol moved to Memphis with his family from Spain. He was 16, barely spoke English and stood nearly 7 feet tall. He was just an overgrown boy living in his older brother's shadow.But as Pau Gasol prepared for his rookie season with the Grizzlies, Marc set about on his own journey. It started at Lausanne, where he played high school basketball for two seasons. No one considered the possibility that he would someday lead the Grizzlies into the playoffs, or that he would become the face of the franchise."He has a connection to this city like nobody else on the team," point guard Mike Conley said.On Saturday, Gasol led the Grizzlies to an 87-81 victory over the Oklahoma City Thunder in Game 3 of their second-round playoff series. Gasol finished with 20 points, 9 rebounds and 4 assists, a typical effort for him as Memphis took a 2-1 series lead. Each baseline jumper was punctuated by a surge from the crowd at FedExForum."He is beloved here," said Chris Wallace, the Grizzlies' general manager.The foundation was formed more than a decade ago, when Gasol's entire family — Agusti, Marisa and their three boys, Pau, Marc and Adria — relocated to a three-bedroom apartment in nearby Germantown. Pau, gainfully employed, got his own room. Marc and Adria had to share one."It felt like home," Marc Gasol said. At Lausanne, Gasol developed a feel for the game while dominating lesser competition. The school was not a member of a strong conference. Van Hoozer recalled games that were played in cafeterias with linoleum floors. As a senior, Gasol averaged 26 points, 13 rebounds, 6 blocked shots and 5 assists."I was just having fun because everybody was so much shorter than me," Gasol said. "Honestly, my stats in high school were ridiculous. They made no sense."His game was unconventional. He was the rare 7-footer who had the green light to launch 3-pointers on fast breaks. Whenever the team built a big early lead, the coaching staff would have Gasol play on the perimeter, just so he "wouldn't dominate so much," Peters said.Some opponents tried to slow the tempo. Playing with no shot clock was a foreign concept to Gasol, and no small annoyance. He was not shy about voicing his frustration."These kids would hold the ball for the entire game, so I'd yell at the referees," he said. "I got called for so many technicals."He could have been whistled for more, according to a former teammate, Jonnie West. "He'd cuss in Spanish," West said. "The refs had no idea what he was saying."The team was a motley crew. Several players were from Europe. Others came from tough parts of Memphis. There was an unusual chemistry at work. Jerry West, a basketball legend who was then the general manager of the Grizzlies, made regular appearances at practice to watch his son Jonnie. He liked to be involved."He was very respectful of the coaches," Van Hoozer said. "He would say, 'Coach Peters, would you mind if I stopped practice?' 'No, Mr. West. Go right ahead.' And then he would huddle the kids up. Sometimes, he'd really get on them. The whole thing was kind of surreal."As for Gasol, Van Hoozer said he could not have been more unassuming about his position on the team. Though his brother was a celebrity with a contract worth millions, Gasol blended into the framework. It probably had to do with the way he was raised, said Van Hoozer, who cited a trip the team made to Orlando, Fla., for a tournament. The team rented a bus for the 12-hour ride, and Van Hoozer figured that Gasol's parents would fly down and meet everyone in Florida."Nope," Van Hoozer said. "They rode the bus with the team. Sat quietly in the back. Marc got two seats."When Lausanne faced Briarcrest Christian School in the regional finals his senior year, Gasol found himself matched up against an imposing player named Michael Oher — the same Michael Oher who went on to become the principal subject of Michael Lewis's book "The Blind Side," and an offensive tackle for the Baltimore Ravens. He was, in short, a wrecking ball.
INDIANAPOLIS — On Friday afternoon, Indiana Pacers Coach Frank Vogel stood alongside the court at Bankers Life Fieldhouse with a group of reporters who playfully tried baiting him into giving an impromptu performance of the basketball trick he invented more than 25 years ago, the one he had once performed on "Late Night With David Letterman."Vogel demurred. "I thought that video was deleted," he said.Few things on the Internet die so conveniently. Vogel was informed that it had been rereleased, just in time for the postseason, and a quick search on Google would deliver footage of the 13-year-old Vogel, with neatly parted brown hair and a red polo shirt, spinning a basketball from the end of a toothbrush while brushing his teeth."I still do it all the time at backyard barbecues for my daughter's friends," Vogel said jokingly.He could turn heads with a toothbrush trick, but as a player growing up in Wildwood Crest, N.J., along the Jersey Shore, Vogel lacked the size or quickness or athleticism to garner much attention otherwise. He developed basketball acumen, though, and a feel for the game, which guided the Pacers to a Central Division title and into the Eastern Conference semifinals against the Knicks.Vogel says he has an "outwork-everybody-in-sight type of mind-set," one he needed as a graduate student manager at Kentucky under the demanding coach Rick Pitino and before that as a biology major studying feverishly to go to medical school.He had dreams of being in sports — as an orthopedic surgeon. At tiny Juniata College, a Division III liberal arts school in Huntingdon, Pa., Vogel played point guard and took 16 credits in biology and organic chemistry. He said orthopedics fit his basketball background and his intellectual curiosity."I liked medicine," Vogel said. "I liked helping people. I liked the biology of it and understanding how the body works."By his sophomore year, though, the heavy class workload on top of his basketball duties grew overwhelming."I was giving everything I had to classes, and I was getting a 2.6," Vogel said, referring to his grade point average. "I knew that wasn't going to get me into med school."He watched Pitino's Wildcats fall to Duke in the 1992 East Regional final and set his mind on joining that program in some capacity.As with his toothbrush trick, Vogel's determination paid off, and he transferred to Kentucky, where he was a student manager for Pitino, played point guard on the junior varsity team and finished his final two years of biology courses.Vogel soaked up all he could from Pitino and the assistant Jim O'Brien, whom he would wind up working under for 17 years, until he replaced O'Brien to become the interim coach of the Pacers in 2011.As a manager and then graduate assistant video coordinator who lived in the Wildcat Lodge, the basketball players' dormitory, Vogel immersed himself in the coaching rigor. He charted statistics in late-night games of one-on-one. He broke down film of summer scrimmages."It was almost like the guy didn't sleep," said Steve Masiello, the Kentucky point guard in 1996.Masiello, now the coach at Manhattan College, said Vogel's razor-sharp basketball I.Q., from a schematic standpoint, was eye-opening to him."Frank was probably 22 years old, not much older than me, basically the same type of goals as I had, and this guy would have cut me to shreds," Masiello said. "From that point on, I always knew he had a little different mind than most guys."Now at the highest level of basketball, Vogel has not lost that edge or that interest in the analytical and schematic approach to the game, still studying basketball as he might feverishly cram for a biology seminar."He's spent his whole career in the film room," Pacers point guard George Hill said. "He's watching film 24/7 and has been doing it for years."But when it is time to work, Vogel seems to know exactly what it takes to get the job done."It's easy for us to play for him," Pacers guard Paul George said. "The way he approaches practices, film, game-planning, everything is well thought out."
That was his first mistake.Only after Mohammed, a 6-foot-10 reserve center for the Chicago Bulls, returned to the locker room at United Center and saw a video replay did he realize that the referee Joe Crawford had called a technical foul on the Miami Heat's LeBron James for shoving him to the court, and there was no need to jump up and shove James back — a move that got Mohammed ejected from Game 3 of the Eastern Conference semifinals."If I saw the tech, maybe that would have stopped me," Mohammed said. "I don't know. It just kind of happened."His second mistake was thinking he would walk away from the encounter with only a technical foul for retaliating against a four-time N.B.A. most valuable player."I don't think it warranted an ejection," Mohammed said. "It warranted a tech. It was just a foul so a guy don't start a break."The ejection, with 9 minutes 29 seconds to go in the first half, left the already undermanned Chicago Bulls with seven players. With the defending N.B.A. champion Heat determined to take back the home-court advantage they lost in Game 1, the night played out predictably. The Bulls tired down the stretch, and a tie score going to the fourth quarter went Miami's way, 104-94, giving the Heat a 2-1 series lead.Heat Coach Erik Spoelstra called the altercation inconsequential. Not for the Bulls. The reaction of Mohammed, a 14-year veteran from Kentucky playing for his eighth N.B.A. team (the Knicks were his third), epitomized Chicago's mind-set in its surprising postseason run.Without Derrick Rose (left knee), Luol Deng (illness) and Kirk Hinrich (left calf), the Bulls were supposed to lose to the Nets in Game 7 of their Eastern Conference quarterfinal series at Barclays Center. But Chicago won, 99-93, then bounced up and stunned the Heat in Game 1 in Miami, 93-86.The havoc of Game 2 — nine technical fouls, two ejections and one flagrant foul — showed that although the Bulls lack Miami's scoring, firepower and depth, they will not be pushed around."We have guys who are fighters now," Chicago forward Taj Gibson said. "We're undermanned. Emotions are going to fly."The shoving match finished a series of physical altercations that seemed a natural continuation of Game 2. Miami's Chris Andersen fouled Bulls guard Nate Robinson hard late in the first quarter and landed on him. As Andersen rolled off Robinson, Chicago center Joakim Noah — one of those ejected from Game 2 — shoved Andersen. The referee David Guthrie spun Andersen away from the scrum.A few minutes later, Chicago forward Carlos Boozer had finished complaining about a noncall inside when James dribbled into the Miami forecourt. Mohammed tried to grab James to prevent a transition basket. James extended an arm to create space and sent Mohammed tumbling to the floor."I seen him hawking me down for a long time, and I seen him come with one of those club fouls, which was unnecessary," James said. "I basically just tried to protect myself, stand my ground."James reacted to the technical with disbelief, pointing his index fingers at his chest as if to say, who, me? That is when Mohammed went after him. James said that no opponent had ever shoved him as hard or as far."It definitely surprised me that he pushed me like that," James said.Was it a push, or an embellishment? "From my angle, I just saw a guy flop," Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau said. "Leave it at that."Mohammed, 35, would not talk about it. "I'm on my way out of this league, and it's his league," he said of James. "You guys make the decision."Crawford assessed personal and technical fouls on Mohammed before ejecting him."I look at some of the plays that happened in the series already," Mohammed said. "Guys jumping on Nate's face. Guy tackling Marco Belinelli out of bounds. Guy takes out Nate, first play of the game. There's been a lot of plays that didn't get an ejection. A push shouldn't get an ejection."But it did. James had no interest in further escalation."If I get kicked out and Nazr Mohammed gets kicked out, they win," James said. "It's that simple."If it would have happened on the playground, it would have been a different story because I had a bunch of friends and a bunch of buddies that wouldn't have allowed that. I haven't been in a situation like that before. But I'm too cool. My mind is in another place right now."Without Mohammed to spell him, Noah (15 points and 11 rebounds) played 42 minutes before fouling out. Small forward Jimmy Butler (17 points) went the full 48 minutes for the fourth time in five games. Guards Belinelli and Robinson also logged 40-plus minutes for a team that had nothing left at the end."I'm disappointed in myself because I let my teammates down because I could have been out there to help," Mohammed said. "I'm disappointed in myself also because my son probably was watching the game. I don't want him to see that type of behavior on the court. I'm also disappointed that it warranted an ejection for something like a push when I got pushed down first."
CHICAGO — The Chicago Bulls want to play rough, and they have made no secret of it. They have turned their second-round Eastern Conference playoff series against the Miami Heat into a black-and-blue affair, defined by bumps, bruises, elbows and shoves.But if the series is to become a war of attrition, as the Bulls seem to hope it will, there is a key tactical advantage enjoyed by the Heat: reinforcements.The Heat have a roster chock-full of All-Stars and a rotation that goes nine deep. The Bulls, depleted by injury and illness, are surviving with their bench players from the regular season playing the roles of starters and reserves.The Bulls swingman Jimmy Butler understands what his team is up against, and he is the most extreme example of the task facing Chicago: trying to stave off the Heat, as well as exhaustion.Butler, who started only 20 games during the regular season, is the only player to have played an entire game this postseason. He has done it four times, including the Bulls' final two games against the Nets in the first round and Game 1 against the Heat. After getting to rest in Game 2, he was back on the court for 48 minutes in Friday's Game 3, a Heat victory that gave them a 2-1 series lead.The Bulls appear to have little choice, with Coach Tom Thibodeau being forced to lean heavily on whatever healthy bodies he has. He did not expect to have more options for Monday night's Game 4 at United Center."It makes it a lot easier to do it whenever you know you got guys that are supporting you," said Butler, who is averaging 12.9 points during the playoffs. "Like, 'It's O.K. that you're tired; we know you're going to fight through it.' "Luol Deng, recovering from complications from a spinal tap, has missed the last five games, and Kirk Hinrich, sidelined with a left calf injury, has missed the last six. Before going down, they were leading the Bulls in playoff minutes; Deng, at 44.8 per game, remains the league leader in the playoffs.In the five games without Deng and Hinrich, center Joakim Noah has posted minutes totals of 43, 41, 39, 32 and 42. Marco Belinelli, who averaged 25.8 minutes during the regular season, is up to 43 against Miami. Nate Robinson has made a similar jump, to 38.3 from 25.4.By contrast, the Heat's stars are carrying playoff workloads consistent with their minutes in the regular season. LeBron James (38.3 minutes per game in the playoffs), Dwyane Wade (33.0) and Chris Bosh (31.7) are each within two minutes of their regular-season averages. Wade and Bosh are even playing slightly fewer minutes in the playoffs.The situation was never more dire for the Bulls than in Game 3, when four of their starters eclipsed 40 minutes after Nazr Mohammed was ejected for shoving James. The bench was essentially reduced to one player, Taj Gibson, who played 22 minutes; the rest of the reserves played a total of 14 (3 minutes for Mohammed and 11 for Marquis Teague). The Heat outscored the Bulls by 10 points in the fourth quarter in their 104-94 win.Thibodeau put the heavy workloads in the context of the quest for a championship."That's normally what happens in the playoffs," he said. "Guys play extended minutes. Most rotations are short."To his point, 11 players are averaging more than 40 minutes in the postseason while none eclipsed that mark during the regular season. Still, the Bulls' case is different because Thibodeau was already predisposed to riding his top contributors. Deng led the league in minutes per game in each of the past two seasons. Noah was averaging around 40 minutes per game before he was told he had plantar fasciitis earlier this season.Against the Heat, the big minutes and the big defensive assignments have fallen to Butler. He has guarded James, making Butler's playing time that much more grueling."He does so much, and he has the ball in his hands a lot," Butler said. "He plays every position on the floor, to tell you the truth. Back to the basket, dribbling the ball up the floor. It's tough; it's fun."James, who scored 12 points in the fourth quarter of Game 3, said: "We're a deep team, and everyone is healthy. Whether they're playing 10 guys or 6, we feel like we continue to wear on teams."On Sunday afternoon, reports from the league office said Mohammed would not be suspended for his shove. But the league did fine Thibodeau $35,000 for his comments after Friday's game, in which he said he felt James flopped on the play.It was a rare moment this postseason when Chicago received good news on the availability of a player. With or without Mohammed, though, the Bulls' message remains the same."We have more than enough," Thibodeau said.
The fight for ownership of the Sacramento Kings, one of the N.B.A.'s most beleaguered franchises, will take a big step toward resolution Wednesday when the league's owners vote on a recommendation that the team be prohibited from moving to Seattle.But in the run-up to the vote, which will take place at the league's board of governors meeting in Dallas, the two groups bidding for the Kings continue to raise the stakes.On Friday, the group led by Chris Hansen, a hedge fund manager who wants to buy the team and move it to Seattle, increased its bid for the 65 percent of the club owned by the Maloof family by about $49 million, a 14 percent jump. The additional money would raise the value of the team to $625 million from $550 million.The more lucrative offer prompted the Maloofs — who seek the biggest payday possible — to claim that if the N.B.A. blocked Hansen from buying the Kings, they would remove their offer to sell their 65 percent stake in the club, according to ESPN.com.Instead, the Maloofs would sell only 20 percent of the team for $125 million to Hansen.However, a person with knowledge of the negotiations said the Maloofs were also talking to the other group, led by the software mogul Vivek Ranadive.On April 29, the N.B.A.'s relocation committee voted unanimously to recommend to the league's owners that the team not be allowed to move to Seattle. The decision was a blow to the ambitions of Hansen's group, which wants an N.B.A. team in Seattle to replace the SuperSonics, who left in 2008 and became the Oklahoma City Thunder.Micky Arison, the owner of the Miami Heat and a member of the relocation committee, said in a reported exchange with a basketball fan on Twitter last week that the N.B.A.'s primary concern was whether Sacramento had done all it could to keep the Kings there, not whether Seattle was a good fit for the team.Arison reportedly said he thought Sacramento had done all it could.The Ranadive-led group hoping to keep the team in Sacramento includes Mark S. Mastrov, the founder of 24 Hour Fitness, and Paul E. Jacobs, the chief executive of Qualcomm. Until Friday, their offer was similar to the Hansen group's, except that Ranadive's group promised not to accept revenue-sharing money once a new arena opened.Sports industry experts said Ranadive's group had the upper hand. The Hansen group's latest bid "reeks of desperation," said Marc Ganis, who brokers team ownership sales. "They may have concluded this was their one shot at a team," he said. "But if so, they should not have lowballed their original offer. As they say in the N.B.A., they should have gone strong to the hoop."No matter what the N.B.A. decides this week, the bid to keep the team in Sacramento could be dogged by controversy. This month, the Coalition for Responsible Arena Development sued Sacramento, accusing the city of not fully disclosing the true value of the subsidies it offered the potential buyers of the team.The city voted to pay $258 million toward the cost of a new arena. The suit, however, accused Sacramento officials of essentially providing undisclosed subsidies to Ranadive and his group to help them buy the team.James C. Sanchez, the city attorney, denied that "secret subsidies" had been offered. "The term sheet contains the deal points and was publicly vetted," he said.
CHICAGO — A placard was laid on each seat at United Center before Game 4 on Monday night between the Chicago Bulls and the Miami Heat . In capital white letters on a red background, the words encapsulated these playoffs for the Bulls, an injury-riddled team that has made its way into the second round on grit and guile.Fans waved them during warm-ups and when the teams were introduced. They held them in their laps, ready to raise them again for much of the game. There were few chances. By the end of the Heat's 88-65 win that gave them a 3-1 series lead, the placards littered the arena's floor as Bulls fans trudged home after what could be the team's final home game.Game 5 will be Wednesday in Miami.The previous two games of the series featured eight Bulls technical fouls and three ejections, but Monday's contest was a much more staid affair. There were no elbows after the whistle nor highlight-worthy skirmishes. The only technical called on Chicago was for a three-second violation.After being bothered by the Bulls' hard-nosed attitude for much of the series, Miami was the aggressor from the outset in Game 4. The Bulls scored the first basket of the game but never led again after the Heat responded with an 11-0 run."They've been able to come out and jump on us," said LeBron James, who led the way for the Heat with 27 points, 8 assists and 7 rebounds. "It was good to see us reverse that."The Bulls looked little like the team that has repeatedly shaken off adversity and overcome long odds during this postseason. Chicago set playoff-record lows for points in a game, in a quarter (9 in the third), fewest field goals made (19) and lowest field-goal percentage (.257)."We didn't execute," center Joakim Noah said. "We didn't play well tonight. Our energy wasn't good. Mentally, we were a little drained because we weren't hitting shots."Luol Deng was active for the first time since having complications from a spinal tap after Game 5 against the Nets, but he did not play. Derrick Rose (knee) and Kirk Hinrich (calf) watched in street clothes from the bench.Without reinforcements, the catalysts from the Bulls' surprising run struggled.Nate Robinson, the 5-foot-9 point guard who electrified the league with several memorable playoff performances, shot 0 for 12 from the field and did not score."I just didn't make no shots tonight," Robinson said. "That's all."Jimmy Butler shot just 4 for 10 and scored 12 points. Noah, Chicago's energetic leader who played through plantar fasciitis for much of the second half of the season, scored 6 points and was 1 of 6 shooting."They're in a tough situation because of injuries and illnesses and whatever's going on," James said. "But that's not for us to worry about."Indeed, the Heat systematically built on their early lead. It was 21-15 after the first quarter and 44-33 by halftime. The Bulls hung tough for the first half with 10 offensive rebounds, but an inability to handle the Heat's pressure defense took its toll.Miami put the game out of reach in the third quarter. Leading by 46-39, the Heat reeled off a 15-3 run that separated them from the lethargic Bulls. Dwyane Wade scored his only 6 points of the game during the run, which also included two baskets from Udonis Haslem and a James layup. Norris Cole beat the buzzer with a running 3-pointer to push the lead to 19 points.Wade left the game briefly in the second quarter after a turnaround jumper that appeared to aggravate a bone bruise on his right knee. The injury has bothered him in the regular season and during the playoffs. He returned to play 29 minutes."Just a shooting pain," Wade said. "It hurt, but eventually I was able to come back, retape my knee and try to finish."Heat Coach Erik Spoelstra had spoken repeatedly about the need for his team to impose its identity in a series that before Game 4 had the Bulls' fingerprints all over it. Whether Monday night was the result of the Heat's presence, the Bulls' exhaustion or a bit of both does not matter. Chicago is on the brink of elimination.
At United Center, where no championship banner has been raised since 1998, Michael Jordan remains the bronzed guardian of greatness, firm and proud outside the building in midflight, 11 ½ feet above ground level.Nobody can commit too harmful a foul on the 2,000-pound Jordan statue. Nobody can knock the legend from its pedestal. And that is how shapers of N.B.A. lore and a generation of Jordan worshipers prefer to remember him, as opposed to being fouled to the floor by the likes of Bill Laimbeer and Anthony Mason.History will presumably repeat itself someday for LeBron James, increasingly recognized as Jordan of the 21st century. A playoff series like the one James and the Miami Heat are engaged in against the undermanned Bulls — rough and tumble as it was until the fight seemed to go out of the Bulls on Monday night — will probably be remembered as a pothole on the path to the top of the pro basketball mountain."I'm here to play basketball," James said, staking out high ground, before the Heat gave the exhausted Bulls an 88-65 conventional basketball pummeling to take a 3-1 lead in their Eastern Conference semifinal.Without Derrick Rose and Luol Deng, the Bulls had little choice but to turn what is normally combative playoff basketball into a holy war of rhetoric and redemption. For the sake of orchestration, they had the perfect conductor in Coach Tom Thibodeau, a disciple of Jeff Van Gundy's and thus a descendant of Pat Riley's.The names changes, along with the roles, but there is a thematic continuity to the playoffs, from one decade to another and another.Riley, Miami's grand architect and author of famous phrases of playoff bellicosity, once unleashed his inelegant Knicks in an attempt to bloody Jordan and especially Scottie Pippen. Twenty years later, Thibodeau inspired his undermanned army to leave no spot on the court untouched by skin and no foul uncommitted in a valiant struggle for survival against James and company."We're that hard-nosed, tough-guy team," said the Bulls' Jimmy Butler. "That's what we label ourselves as, and that's what we pride ourselves on. We're going to come out swinging and fighting."We roll our eyes at the hyperbolic talking points, but give James credit for not taking the bait when Nazr Mohammed shoved him in the chest in Game 3. James had the presence of mind to sit on his derrière from the supposed force of the contact, which underscored the difficulty for all Miami opponents of getting under the skin of a superstar who is as comfortable with himself as James has become.When the ringless Jordan was still in career ascension, the Bad Boy Pistons of suburban Detroit — with Laimbeer and Isiah Thomas — succeeded on numerous occasions in bullying and beating the Bulls. But that was before embarrassing outbursts of playoff violence forced Commissioner David Stern to confront a troubling double-standard:America was less enamored of large black men beating on each other than white hockey enforcers or helmeted football players.By the time Riley and Van Gundy were trying to yank Jordan and Company off their throne, the lines of acceptable physicality had shifted. "Meet force with force" — the axiomatic frothing espoused by Riley in New York and Miami, and by Van Gundy — typically backfired. N.B.A. officials were and remain trained to spare the league national embarrassment.Thibodeau, who spent seven years as a Knicks assistant, is an excellent defensive coach and motivator, a consumed lifer who breathes the game for sustenance.The look in his eyes, and the circles directly under them, bring to mind how Van Gundy often appeared when he was the popular Everyman coach in New York. It has been easy to root for and champion such dedication. It is easier still in the case of Thibodeau, who has been accompanied by the rotten luck of losing Rose, the league's most valuable player two years ago, for all but one game of two playoff seasons.Then again, Rose dealt with a variety of ailments last season before he blew out a knee in Game 1 of the first round. Chicago has waited and waited for Rose's return, but if the fear of reinjuring himself was holding him back, how could he talk himself into returning to a rugby scrum of a series?Is Thibodeau's grinding style ideal for a smallish point guard who spends so much time navigating the entanglement of larger bodies on the way to the rim? That may be a future quandary. For this playoff season, even Riley's team would have to agree that the Bulls deserve admiration and respect for winning five games so far. But Miami is no doubt grateful for the opportunity to show again that it is no South Beach softy, either."It's not as if they're trying to play a more physical style than we are," said Coach Erik Spoelstra, whose biggest worry Monday night had to be the condition of Dwyane Wade's aching right knee. "And that's a wide misconception about us. We've proven we can get our hands dirty."They proved it by holding the depleted Bulls to 25.7 percent shooting in Game 4. They got their hands figuratively dirty and are poised to get out of this series without getting bloody. That is the fine line not to cross when you have James — the best player on the planet — to protect.
INDIANAPOLIS — Some Knicks were ill, some Knicks were aching and some Knicks were bickering, or at least giving the appearance of it, all on the eve of a game labeled a "must win" by the franchise star, who is shooting too much or not shooting enough.Other than that, the Knicks seemed just fine Monday when they made final preparations for Game 4 of the Eastern Conference semifinals, a game that might very well define their season.A victory over the Pacers on Tuesday would tie the series and make it a best-of-three affair, with two of those games at Madison Square Garden. A loss would leave the Knicks in a 3-1 hole, with long odds of recovering."Tomorrow will tell us a lot about our team," said Carmelo Anthony, who called Tuesday's game both a "must win" and a "gut check," each an apt cliché.The Pacers have yet to lose a home playoff game. The Knicks are 0-3 at Bankers Life Fieldhouse this season and have seemingly forgotten how to score. Only eight N.B.A. teams have won a series after falling behind by 3-1.Team health remains a serious concern. J. R. Smith and Kenyon Martin were left at the team hotel Monday because of illness, with Martin showing some of the same feverish symptoms that sapped Smith of his strength in Game 3.Iman Shumpert was also held out of practice because of soreness in his surgically repaired left knee.Shumpert said it was "probably just a bruise" unrelated to the ligament tear he had last spring. He vowed to play, and Coach Mike Woodson indicated that was likely. The status of Smith and Martin might not be clear until game time.By then, the Knicks will presumably have sorted out their differences over what constitutes a smart shot and what constitutes selfish play, and whether Anthony is guilty of choking the offense.Tyson Chandler raised those concerns, albeit in cloaked terms, a day earlier, when he called for more passing and sacrifice and cited unnamed teammates for trying "to take over the game." Those remarks seemed aimed at Anthony or Smith — the only two Knicks who are capable of creating their own shots and taking over a game.Anthony seemed a bit perturbed by the discussion."I really don't want to go back and forth about that, because I really don't know exactly what he's talking about," Anthony said, referring to Chandler. "But if he feels that way, we're about to get together right now. We'll discuss that amongst ourselves and figure that out, just get his take, get his perspective on that comment. We'll handle that internally and figure it out amongst ourselves."Anthony attempted just 16 field goals — his lowest total of the postseason — in Saturday's 82-71 loss, in part because the game was played at a glacial pace (the Knicks had just 71 attempts). He also earned 11 free throws. Smith took 12 shots — modest by his standards but perhaps a bit high for a guy with a 102-degree fever.Chandler's dissertation on teamwork, however, seemingly had more to do with the quality of the shots the Knicks were taking and a general failure to keep the ball moving or to hit the open man.The Knicks' offense has been stagnant ever since the playoffs began."Offensively, we've been stinking lately," said Woodson, who echoed and welcomed Chandler's critique."Sometimes, bickering amongst each other is pretty healthy," Woodson said. "I don't call it bickering, maybe that's not the word to use. I just think he's being a good teammate. I say it. Sometimes, it's good that it comes from within the guys that are on the floor working. So I don't see anything wrong with it."Woodson agreed with Chandler's concerns about poor ball movement, saying, "You've got to sacrifice the ball for the sake of the team, and good things happen offensively when you do that."Anthony's 6-for-16 performance from the field Saturday — including an 0-for-3 mark in the fourth quarter — had some commentators suggesting he should shoot more, not less. Woodson waved off the entire discussion."It's just not Melo," he said. "I don't want this to be a one-man show."Rather, Woodson said he wants to see a return to the style that had five Knicks averaging double-digit scoring in the regular season.With Smith ailing and the Knicks desperate for 3-point shooting, Woodson said he might turn to Chris Copeland and Steve Novak on Tuesday.Or perhaps all the Knicks need is for Anthony — who is shooting .414 in the series — to simply take, and make, better shots."The shot that I took, I feel I can make," Anthony said. "And I'll continue to take those shots. I'll come out a little bit more aggressive come tomorrow."
NEWARK, New Jersey (Reuters) - Rutgers University picked a woman to head its athletic programs on Wednesday, as New Jersey's largest public college looks to move on from a scandal that saw several top sports officials resign.Julie Hermann, 49, who was a senior executive atheletic director at the University of Louisville, will be the first woman to hold the post of athletic director at Rutgers.Her predecessor, Tim Pernetti, resigned in early April after ESPN aired video showing the school's then-head men's basketball coach abusing players and berating them with homophobic slurs. The coach, Mike Rice, was fired.Rutgers President Robert Barchi, who had faced down calls for his own resignation during the uproar after the videos were aired, called Hermann "simply a remarkable leader."Hermann, who starts a five-year contract on June 17, acknowledged the school's sports programs will have a way to go to regain the trust of fans, alumni and students."I'm well aware that many people that support this institution were deeply hurt by what took place," she said.The scandal put a spotlight on the high-pressure world of college sports, where millions of dollars of television revenue are at stake, coaches can command six-figure salaries but players are unpaid.At Louisville, Hermann oversaw a nationally ranked athletic program that won the NCAA men's basketball championship earlier this year.
PISCATAWAY, N.J. (AP) — Rutgers named Julie Hermann its new athletic director Wednesday, and the former No. 2 athletic administrator at Louisville promised a restart for the scandal-scarred program following the ouster of its men's basketball coach and the resignation of other officials.Hermann replaces Tim Pernetti, who quit last month after the firing of basketball coach Mike Rice. Practice videos surfaced of Rice shoving and throwing basketballs at players and yelling gay slurs at them."No one on the coaching staff doesn't believe that we need to be an open book, that we will no longer have any practice, anywhere at any time, that anybody couldn't walk into and be pleased about what's going on in that environment. It is a new day. It is already fixed," Hermann said at a news conference Wednesday.Hermann will be paid $450,000 annually as a base salary with $50,000 in incentives and $35,000 contributed to a deferred compensation plan, according to a university release.Pernetti received $1.2 million in salary, plus an iPad, car allowance and more than two years of health insurance coverage under a settlement agreement, according to documents released under open public records laws.Hermann had been senior associate athletic director at Louisville. She becomes the first woman to head Rutgers' athletic program and one of three female ADs at the schools which make up the 124 playing at college football's top tier.Rutgers will join the Big Ten in 2014, and Hermann said the Scarlet Knights won't try to match schools like Michigan dollar for dollar. The athletics program already has come under criticism from some corners of the university for spending millions on expanding its football stadium while cutting some non-revenue sports."We do not need to spend what Michigan spends; I don't know how they spend all that money," Hermann said. "We will do more with less. That's what we did at Louisville. We need to be really smart stewards of the money that we have."At Louisville, Hermann supervised marketing and brand management. Prior to Louisville she coached Tennessee women's volleyball for six seasons and was an assistant coach for USA Volleyball in 1997.Rutgers President Robert Barchi called Hermann "a remarkable leader" and praised her involvement in Louisville's moving from Conference USA to the Big East and from the Big East to the Atlantic Coast Conference.Rutgers' problems started in December when Rice was suspended three games and fined $75,000 by the school after a video of his conduct at practices was given to Pernetti by Eric Murdock, a former assistant coach.The video showed numerous clips of Rice firing basketballs at players, hitting them in the back, legs, feet and shoulders. It also showed him grabbing players by their jerseys and yanking them around the court. Rice can also be heard yelling obscenities and using anti-gay slurs.The controversy went public in April when ESPN aired the videos and Barchi admitted he didn't view the video in the fall. Rice was fired and Pernetti, assistant coach Jimmy Martelli and interim senior vice president and university counsel John Wolf resigned.
DALLAS (Reuters) - The National Basketball Association denied a proposal on Wednesday to move the Sacramento Kings to Seattle following months of bitter wrangling among potential suitors, and strongly urged the team's owners to negotiate with a group fighting to keep the team in Sacramento.The decision, announced by NBA Commissioner David Stern, appears to put an end to a deal to sell the team to the Seattle group that would have valued the Kings at $625 million, a huge amount for an NBA team."It's nice to see two great cities so interested in an NBA franchise, but the winner here is Sacramento," Stern told a news conference in Dallas, where team owners who make up the league's board of governors met to decide the team's fate.In Sacramento, jubilant fans celebrated after watching Stern on TV at a pub in the city's hip mid-town district."It's the best thing that's happened to Sacramento since the Gold Rush," said Paul Maltby, a season ticket holder who was at the pub with his wife, Terry Bowman.Blocks away at the state capitol building, state Senator Darrell Steinberg, who represents Sacramento, praised Mayor Kevin Johnson, a former NBA star guard, for quickly pulling together a group of investors to counter the Seattle bid and keep the team in town."Good things come to those who wait and never give up - and that's Sacramento," Steinberg said. "This is about so much more than basketball."The mood was gloomier in Seattle, which lost its own basketball team, the SuperSonics, to Oklahoma City in 2008."It was just sad to hear that final verdict," said Tyler Olsen, 28, a Seattle teacher who attended his first SuperSonics game at age 8. "We were told in 2008 that the NBA would love to return."Seattle Mayor Mike McGinn said he shared the disappointment of fans, but promised to keep trying to attract a team to the Northwest city.The Kings' future in Sacramento has long been uncertain. The family of George Maloof, which owns a majority interest in the team, has struggled to persuade the city to build a new arena, and flirted with the idea of moving them.In January, the Maloofs reached a deal to sell the team to Seattle hedge fund manager Chris Hansen, Microsoft CEO Steve Ballmer and others who had formed a local investment group.Hansen has long vowed to bring a team back to Seattle, which he would name the SuperSonics after the city's lost franchise. He already has a deal with the city to build a new arena.But in an increasingly public tug-of-war, Sacramento began to fight back - hard.Johnson put together a team of technology titans lead by Vivek Ranadive, founder of data giant TIBCO Software Inc, who vowed to match Hansen's bid to keep the team in California's capital. The group also persuaded the city council to back a proposal for a new $450 million arena.Last month, a committee of NBA owners voted that the team should stay in Sacramento, but Hansen vowed to fight on, raising his bid for controlling interest in the Kings to $406 million, which valued the team at an unprecedented $625 million.The Maloofs backed Hansen and his group, writing a letter to the league saying that "there is no acceptable deal possible" with the Sacramento group.After Wednesday's vote, Hansen wrote on his blog, SonicsArena.com, "I love you, Seattle. Our day will come ... and when it does it will just be that much sweeter for the struggle."Speaking for the NBA on Wednesday, Stern urged the Maloof family to quickly reach a deal to sell the team to Johnson's group."It is my expectation that we will be able to reach a deal with the Maloofs," Stern said.After the meeting, George Maloof told reporters he was not opposed to working with the Sacramento group, and Johnson said he hoped a deal to buy the team would be reached "within 24 to 48 hours."Johnson said that retaining the Kings will be transformative for Sacramento and its downtown with the construction of a new arena that will create jobs and provide more economic development opportunities.Seattle, Johnson added, still deserves a team of its own."They know what it feels like to lose a team," Johnson said. "We just don't want that to happen to us."
INDIANAPOLIS — The stakes were higher, the desperation greater and the Knicks bigger, or at least as big as the laws of physiology and N.B.A. rosters would permit. They upsized. They expanded. They tinkered. Mostly, they hoped — for a turnaround, for a spiritual lift, for some magic solution to match the might of the Indiana Pacers .It started with a lineup change, Kenyon Martin replacing Pablo Prigioni, to match the Pacers' brawn. More big bodies followed, as Coach Mike Woodson deployed every possible combination Tuesday night in a desperate attempt to reverse the Knicks' fortunes and save a playoff series.Size ultimately did not matter. For the third time in four games, the Pacers were simply better, rolling to a 93-82 victory and pushing the Knicks to the edge of elimination in this Eastern Conference semifinal series.Only N.B.A. eight teams have overcome a 3-1 deficit to win a series. The Knicks' quest to become the ninth will start Thursday night at Madison Square Garden. If they survive, they will have to win a Game 6 at Bankers Life Fieldhouse, where they are 0-4 this season. The Pacers are undefeated at home in the playoffs."I believe," said Carmelo Anthony, who had 24 points on another tough shooting night. "I really believe that we can do something special here. I'm very confident that we can do something special here."To a man, the Knicks expressed unwavering confidence, but their body language said otherwise for 48 minutes. They hesitated. They passed up open shots. And they missed most of the open ones they took, shooting 35.6 percent from the field.Even a revival of their 3-point game, which had been bottled up in Game 3, provided no comfort, as the Knicks went 8 for 28 from beyond the arc. Their ball movement improved, after some pointed criticism from Tyson Chandler, but that was not enough either."We had good looks," Woodson said. "We just couldn't knock them down. I thought our offensive flow wasn't bad tonight."The Pacers led from wire to wire, by as many as 18 points and by double digits for nearly the entire second half. The Knicks cut the deficit to 9 with 57.8 seconds left, but that was as close as they got.Anthony went 9 for 23 from the field and fouled out with two minutes left. J. R. Smith scored 19 points but was 7 for 22 from the field, and 3 for 10 from behind the 3-point arc. Smith was still shaking off the effects of an illness, but his shooting woes began two weeks ago, after his suspension in the Boston Celtics series.The burden is weighing on him."My frustration level with myself is extremely high," Smith said. "I take the blame for this whole series." He made reference to the Boston series, adding: "I haven't been playing myself. I haven't played my part. I've been letting my teammates down. I've been letting my coaches down. It doesn't feel good."George Hill had a breakout game for the Pacers, scoring 26 points while going 9 for 14 from the field, outplaying Raymond Felton (14 points). Paul George added 18 points, 14 rebounds and 7 assists. The Knicks managed to contain Roy Hibbert (6 points), but he still finished with 11 rebounds and 3 blocks.Every member of the Pacers' frontcourt had double figures in rebounds as Indiana again dominated the boards, 54-36, despite the Knicks' lineup changes.Woodson used a big lineup for nearly the entire game, returning Anthony to small forward while using Martin, Chandler, Amar'e Stoudemire and Chris Copeland up front. Chandler finished with 10 rebounds and Anthony had 9.But the Pacers still outscored the Knicks in the lane, 36-26, and beat them on second-chance points, 19-16."I thought that's what hurt us in crucial situations, where we would make a slight run," Woodson said. "They'd get a second-chance opportunity and they capitalized on it. I've got to get us blocking out and rebounding the basketball."Iman Shumpert started and played 16 minutes, despite a sore left knee that kept him out of practice for two days. He went 0 for 6 from the field and failed to score, never quite looking like himself. Shumpert's availability was in doubt for much of the day, but he was cleared to play after a magnetic resonance imaging examination showed no structural damage in the knee, which he twisted twice in Game 3.The Knicks had thrived all season with a small lineup, and changing personality mid-series seemed risky. The new starting lineup — Anthony, Felton, Shumpert, Chandler and Martin — had never played a minute together. Chandler and Martin had not started together.Woodson's entire rotation changed as a result. He used Stoudemire, who just returned from a two-month layoff, to start the fourth quarter. Copeland, who had been out of the rotation, played 12 minutes in the second half. And Prigioni, a starter for nearly two months, played only 3 minutes 26 seconds. The Knicks had gone 20-6 with him as a starter."It can be difficult," Chandler said of the changes, "because of the continuity of the offense and movement."Nothing worked. The Knicks trailed by 8 points in the first quarter, by 14 at halftime and never made a run. In two games in Indiana, the Knicks held the lead for just 1:16.The infusion the Knicks really need is not size, but scoring. Their offense has been unraveling since the postseason began and has shown only rare signs of life against the Pacers' relentless pressure."They have a defensive game plan and they run it excellent," Chandler said. "They play hard. They play hard every possession." He added, "They beat us."On the greaseboard in the visiting locker room, someone had scrawled a simple, two-sentence rallying cry: "Stay the course. Win one, change everything."
It was fair to say that Carmelo Anthony was the best thing the Knicks had going for them Tuesday night as they tried and failed to keep their season from sliding to the Indiana brink.Anthony was good, not great, in the Pacers' 93-82 victory in Game 4, which gave them a 3-1 lead in the Eastern Conference semifinal series. Certainly he was not "great, great, great," in accordance with the unofficial Tyson Chandler ratings system for unquestioned superstardom and the freedom of shot selection he contended comes along with it.But all around Anthony was a Knicks supporting cast that was disintegrating before the eyes of the Bankers Life Fieldhouse crowd.If a season that soared with the expectation at least of a conference final showdown with Miami should end Thursday in New York or Saturday back here, who would deserve to wear the Knicks' burden of failure more?Anthony, who fought hard for his 24 points against the long-limbed defense of the Pacers' rising star, Paul George, and behind him inside, Roy Hibbert? Or the rest of a group, Chandler included, that in the heat of grinding series no longer resembles a divisional front-runner, much less an aspiring champion?J.R. Smith stood up to accept the blame, but after the Knicks were again pounded on the boards, 54-36, Chandler said it was on everyone. And for the record, he had not been singling out Anthony after complaining about the hero ball offense that haunted the Knicks in Game 3."I want to clear it up," he said. "I wasn't directing my comment at Carmelo Anthony. I was directing it at the New York Knicks. I ever have a problem with Carmelo or anybody else on the team, I'm going to discuss that closed doors, in-house."That said, Chandler has been around the N.B.A too long not to have known what he was doing when he subtly noted Anthony was no LeBron James. At the same time, he seemed to suggest that Anthony needed to become less of a single-minded shooter and more of a facilitator, à la LeBron.Chandler's conflicted outspokenness reflected the level of existential confusion the Knicks confronted Tuesday night but failed to conquer."I don't want it to be where we always have to depend on Melo," Coach Mike Woodson said after the Knicks shot 8 for 28 from behind the 3-point line and 35.6 percent over all. What choice did he have when Smith made 1 of 8 shots while the Knicks were falling into a 14-point hole at the half before draining most of his 19 points when it was too late?What does he do when Raymond Felton is outscored by George Hill, 26-14? When Iman Shumpert is plagued by a sore knee and can't make a shot? When Amar'e Stoudemire plays like a distraction the Knicks cannot afford at this time of the year? When Jason Kidd blows a layup and extends his remarkable run of scoreless playoff games that dates to Game 2 of the Boston series?"We haven't played well since Game 3 of the Boston series," Kidd said.The "we" includes Anthony, who has missed far more jumpers than he has made, ensuring that if the Knicks don't get out of this round, the debate will carry on into summer and next season: was Anthony unable to lift his team against an opponent the Knicks had a better record than, or did this aging, overrated cast drag him down?As the holder of a championship ring and typically a Knicks voice of reason, Chandler had earned the right to speak his piece — even if the notion that Anthony and by extension the Knicks could reinvent themselves in the middle of a fierce playoff series was fundamentally wrong.The dissections of Anthony, in particular, have too often dwelled on passing as a simple matter of intent, as if creativity is all about being less selfish, of free will.It's true that Anthony throughout his career has fiddled with the ball in isolation sets, run down the shot clock and drained fluidity from the offense. But this season, more than last, he has been a willing passer out of double-teams, setting the ball in motion to find an open 3-point shooter.Here's the thing: it is much easier to pass from a stationary position, when one can take measure of the onrushing defender and still see the floor. It is another matter entirely to be a playmaker in motion, which traditionally has been the domain of the proverbial little man, along with others not only athletically gifted but visually blessed.Of all the players on the court Tuesday night, George probably has the best chance to reach that exalted status. He often looks like the second coming of Scottie Pippen, perhaps even more athletic, and with an average jump shot that could still improve.George's impact was felt everywhere — 18 points, 14 rebounds, 7 assists, 2 steals, 2 blocks, along with the Velcro defense that made Anthony earn every point he scored.Anthony did what he could to keep the Knicks in it. He grabbed nine rebounds, fouled out near the finish. He is who he is. Is it unfair, a decade into his career, not to include him among the absolute best? Conversely, is it fair to continually assail him for falling short of the top? For failing to carry the Knicks against a bigger, stronger opponent that has imposed its methodical style for all but one quarter?The answer would seem to be obvious. This series — and the season — should not be a referendum on Anthony. If the Knicks lose it, don't put all of it, or even the majority of it, on him.
DALLAS (AP) — The Kings are staying in Sacramento, and Seattle will have to wait for another NBA franchise.As for the ownership question that has kept the Kings in limbo for years, Commissioner David Stern wants it settled now.League owners voted Wednesday to follow the recommendation of their relocation committee and reject an aggressive bid to move the Kings, and Stern promptly announced that he hoped to have a deal in place in 48 hours with a group that wants to buy the team from the Maloof brothers."And now we think that because the Maloofs have overall been very good for Sacramento and the Kings and the NBA, that they will be motivated to do something fast so that the franchise can get cracking," Stern said.The 22-8 vote by the Board of Governors rejected a deal that would have sold a 65 percent controlling interest at a total franchise valuation of $625 million to a Seattle group led by investor Chris Hansen, who boosted the offer twice after the NBA showed an unwillingness to relocate.Now the Maloofs will try to complete a deal at Hansen's original price of $525 million — still topping the NBA record of $450 million — with a group put together by Sacramento Mayor Kevin Johnson, a former All-Star guard, and fronted by TIBCO software chairman Vivek Ranadive. The plan includes a new downtown arena."The committee decided — didn't have any preconceived notions — but looking at both evenly they said that the edge went to the incumbent, so that's the way it came out," Stern said.The vote ended an emotional saga that has dragged on for nearly three years. Hansen wanted to move the franchise and rename it the SuperSonics, who left Seattle for Oklahoma City in 2008 and were renamed the Thunder.Hansen said in a statement posted on his website that he hoped to pursue a minority ownership role with the Maloofs, but Ranadive said his partners "haven't really considered" the Maloofs maintaining a stake in the franchise.Stern praised Hansen's proposal and said the NBA might consider expansion once a new TV deal is in place, but said "we don't have anything concrete.""Our day will come, and when it does, it will just be that much sweeter for the struggle," Hansen said.It's the second time since 2011 that the Maloof brothers have made plans that would have ended in relocation for the Kings. The first target was Anaheim, Calif., but Johnson convinced the NBA to give the city another chance to finance a new arena.Johnson delivered on a promise for a plan for a new downtown arena with help from Stern, but the Maloofs backed out, saying it didn't make financial sense.The Maloofs had another surprise when they announced a deal in January with Hansen's group, which includes Microsoft CEO Steve Ballmer and members of the Nordstrom department store family.Johnson fought back again, this time lining up an ownership group led by Ranadive and getting the Sacramento City Council to approve a non-binding financing plan for a $447 million arena with a $258 million public subsidy."This is an ownership group that's played to win and kept us in the game, and put us in a situation where ultimately over the next couple days, if things go right, we can close this out and move to a new chapter in Sacramento," Johnson said.The potential Sacramento ownership group also includes 24 Hour Fitness founder Mark Mastrov, former Facebook senior executive Chris Kelly and the Jacobs family that owns communications giant Qualcomm.In a letter sent to the relocation and finance committees during its April 17 meeting, the Maloofs said they preferred to sell to the Seattle group and expressed discontent with Sacramento's bid, saying it fell "significantly short."After Wednesday's vote, however, George Maloof denied that his family wasn't willing to sell to the Ranadive group and that the league was pressuring them to do so."It's been a fair process, a very fair process," Maloof said.Hansen spent nearly two years working to get an arena plan approved by the city and county governments and spent more than $65 million buying land in Seattle's SoDo neighborhood where the arena would be built. Hansen has a five-year memorandum of understanding with the city and county on the arena plan.A small crowd at a Seattle restaurant was subdued as word spread that the franchise wasn't coming, while horns blared and cheers erupted from bars in Sacramento."In Kevin Johnson we trust," said season ticket holder Jim Amen, who wore the jersey of No. 16 Peja Stojakovic, the Kings' first-round draft pick in 1996. "This meant a lot to our city. It's not just about basketball, but about revitalizing our downtown."About a dozen Sacramento supporters wearing Kings jerseys and "Small Market Big Heart" T-shirts waited most of the day in the Dallas hotel to hear what turned out to be good news. But Johnson didn't want to celebrate at the expense of a couple of men who showed up in green and gold Sonics gear."I went to Seattle," he said. "I played against those fans in that community. It's a great sports town, it's a great basketball community. And for them to come up a little short, especially with what happened in 2008 to have lost their team, that's devastating. That's why we fought so hard."Now Johnson's group just has to finish the deal.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. (AP) — Pablo Prigioni could return to the starting lineup. Jason Kidd will remain in the rotation.Whichever players are on the court for the New York Knicks when they try to save their season Thursday night, coach Mike Woodson just wants them to shoot with confidence."All you can do is continue to shoot and you shoot the next one, you've got to feel good about that it's going to go in," Woodson said Wednesday at practice while players took some jumpers that, indeed, did go in. "Right now we're kind of looking over our shoulders."And right at a daunting situation.The Indiana Pacers can eliminate the Knicks in Game 5 of the Eastern Conference semifinals Thursday. Only eight NBA teams have overcome a 3-1 deficit to win a series, and it's doubtful any of them looked as hopeless offensively as these Knicks.Averaging 88.3 points on 41.2 percent shooting in the series, the Knicks believe things can be different back on their home floor, though the Pacers looked perfectly comfortable at Madison Square Garden while winning Game 1."Every game is huge, it doesn't matter whether it's 0-0, 3-1. It doesn't matter," Indiana coach Frank Vogel said following the Pacers' 93-82 victory in Game 4."Every game is huge and we had one closeout game at Atlanta earlier this season in the first round and we were able to come out and give a great effort and we've got to follow the blueprint we shared tonight: great defensive effort, great rebounding effort and selfless passing offensively."The Knicks managed only 76.5 points per game in two losses in Indianapolis and were outrebounded by huge margins in both games. A change to a bigger lineup was futile Tuesday, so Woodson said he might return to his normal first five Thursday.New York went 16-2 after moving Prigioni into the starting lineup late in the regular season. Yet not only did he not start for the first time in the series Tuesday, but the Argentine point guard played only 3 1/2 minutes off the bench. Woodson said he is "contemplating" another change."I don't know what I'm going to do yet. That lineup has been great for us for two, three months and I went away from it last night to go big and a lot of that was based on guys not being in practice and not too sure about Iman (Shumpert) in terms of his knee," Woodson said."I mean there were a lot of things playing into why I did what I did but that lineup has been good and there's a strong chance we could go right back to that lineup."More Prigioni would likely mean less of Kidd or J.R. Smith, the two Knicks in the deepest slumps. Kidd is 0 for 7 and scoreless in the series, part of a 0-for-16 skid that began with Game 3 against Boston in the first round. The 40-year-old point guard, surely headed for the Hall of Fame, is 3 of 24 in the postseason and hasn't scored since hitting a 3-pointer against the Celtics in Game 2 on April 23. Yet he will get another chance Thursday."I'll never kick J-Kidd to the curb, man," Woodson said. "I mean, Kidd has been a positive for our club, our franchise, and these players that play around him. And we all still believe in Kidd. My thing is, I think he still does some of the intangibles — they might not show up in terms of scoring the ball — to help you win."Smith is 18 of 64 (28 percent) in the series and after Game 4 said he was to blame for the Knicks' problems. Woodson disagreed — "I'm the head coach of the team, blame it on me," he said — and Smith was alternately hard on himself and confident Wednesday."You're going to have those spurts during the regular season, but during the playoffs is when the good players become great," Smith said. "Right now, me myself, I'm playing just as average as can be, but my confidence is still up there and my teammates still have the confidence in me, and a lot of guys talked to me today and told me to keep my head up and keep playing. That not only goes for me, it goes for the whole team."Shumpert said his 0-for-6 performance in Game 4 wasn't caused by any problems with his left knee after he was forced to sit out practice between games because of soreness.The problems are almost all caused by the Pacers, perhaps the NBA's best defensive team in the regular season and completely locked in again now. All-Star Paul George is containing Carmelo Anthony, Roy Hibbert is protecting the paint and the Knicks just don't know where else to look.The Pacers haven't been to the conference finals since 2004. Game 6 would be Saturday in Indiana, where the Pacers are 4-0 against the Knicks this season, but say they want to wrap it up in New York."I feel like we have to go into New York like we're on our elimination game, like we're about to get eliminated, like we're down 1-3," guard George Hill said after scoring 26 points Tuesday. "So I think if we do that and play with the same type of energy and effort and passion that we played with tonight, we can come away with a win, but it's not going to be easy."The Knicks' first appearance in the second round since 2000 has been ugly, unable to make shots or grab nearly enough of the ones that miss. But Woodson believes the confident shot-making team that won 54 games can still show up in this series."If we can win tomorrow — and I think we'll put ourselves in position to win — then the series has got to go back and then we've got to see what they're made of back there in Game 6," he said. "But tomorrow's a must game."
Ousted NBA players' association executive director Billy Hunter alleges in a lawsuit that president Derek Fisher had a secret deal with owners during the 2011 lockout that benefited himself, his publicist and certain players.Hunter contends that Fisher undermined Hunter's efforts to make an agreement and interfered with his position by secretly negotiating with select owners in violation of union bylaws.Filed Thursday in California Superior Court, the suit seeks unspecified damages for defamation and breach of contract. It also names the National Basketball Players Association and Jamie Wior, Fisher's publicist, and says Fisher and Wior worked after the lockout ended "to terminate his employment without cause and in violation of his contract.""Wior harbored aspirations to assume a position of responsibility with the NBPA," the suit says. "She set out to craft a new public persona for Fisher, taking control of his media appearances and public statements and encouraging him to overreach his authority."Hunter was ousted in February following an investigation into his business practices that found no illegal conduct but cited several conflicts of interest, questionable business decisions and hiring practices. Fisher finished the season with the Oklahoma City Thunder."It's unfortunate that I must take this action against an organization where I had the privilege of working with many dedicated associates over 17 years," Hunter said in a statement. "I'm proud of our record of achievement on behalf of players during my tenure as Executive Director and will continue to stand up for their interests. But I cannot let stand attacks on my character or accept what has been done."The suit says owners were aided by Fisher when they locked out players in July 2011 after the expiration of the last collective bargaining agreement. It says the veteran guard realized he could have been on his last contract as a player, so he wanted to secure a "soft landing" after his career by keeping good relations with the league and team owners, even while Hunter was committed to a firm stance."Unbeknownst to Hunter, however, Fisher was secretly negotiating with the Certain Owners — on his own and without any authority — to settle the negotiations on terms less favorable to the players," the suit says."The NBPA's Constitution and By-Laws vest in Hunter the sole right to conduct collective bargaining negotiations on behalf of the Union. Fisher's interference in the negotiations exceeded his authority and undermined the Union's negotiating power. Wior's interference was completely without authority or basis. Ultimately, the players accepted a new CBA that left them with a greatly reduced share of the NBA's revenues."The lockout ended in November 2011 with players' receiving a 50-50 split of basketball-related income, after they were guaranteed 57 percent in the previous deal. The relationship between Hunter and Fisher at times seemed strained, with Fisher often speaking to reporters alone after bargaining sessions while Hunter left quickly.Fisher said he had just learned of the lawsuit before meeting with reporters in Oklahoma City and didn't want to comment."Obviously in any type of legal situation, you have to be very careful about what you say. So, I guess at the appropriate time I'll be able to respond or make a statement," he said.Hunter led the union since 1996 before he was voted out during the All-Star break with more than $10.5 million left on his contract.AP Sports Writer Jeff Latzke in Oklahoma City contributed to this report.
NEW YORK — Indiana Pacers point guard George Hill will miss Thursday's Game Five of the NBA Eastern Conference semi-finals against the New York Knicks because of a concussion, the team said.The Pacers lead the best-of-seven series 3-1 and can advance to the conference finals against the defending NBA champion Miami Heat with another win against the Knicks."He (Hill) had the test this afternoon," Pacers coach Frank Vogel told reporters before the game at New York's Madison Square Garden. "It happened when he had a collision with (Knicks center) Tyson Chandler in the first half of Game Four."Vogel said he did not know what Hill's status would be for a possible Game Six in Indianapolis on Saturday should the Knicks stave off elimination in the second-round playoff series.Hill had his best scoring performance of the series in Game Four, with a game-high 26 points along with three rebounds and four assists.Vogel said D.J. Augustin would play most of the minutes at point guard in place of Hill, and that Lance Stephenson and Ben Hansbrough could see some back-up time at the position.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — On the day he inherited the Knicks — the Linsanity, the insanity and the rest of it — Mike Woodson was handed a singular challenge: get Carmelo Anthony to play like Carmelo Anthony. Everything else would fall into place.At that moment, on March 14, 2012, Woodson was precisely the coach the Knicks needed. He was stern, direct, demanding, with a decidedly paternal touch — as quick with a lecture as with a supportive pat on the back. And, critically, he was not Mike D'Antoni, whose system and coaching style had been rejected by Anthony, the franchise star.Freed of a coach he did not want, Anthony responded and flourished, and Woodson reaped the benefits. The Knicks won 18 of their final 24 games in the 2011-12 season, earning Woodson universal praise, a 3-year contract and a rollicking honeymoon that unofficially expired Tuesday night at about 9:30 Eastern.It ended with the dissonant blare of the final buzzer at Bankers Life Fieldhouse, which was soon followed by the dissonant blare of countless Twitter timelines, bursting with bewilderment and outrage after the Knicks' 93-82 loss to the Indiana Pacers.The Knicks are facing a daunting 3-1 deficit in their Eastern Conference semifinal series. And Woodson is facing blistering criticism, for the first time since he assumed the job 14 months ago.Across fan forums and blogs, the questions were the same Tuesday night:¶ Why would Woodson abandon the small-ball lineup that got the Knicks this far?¶ How did Pablo Prigioni go from invaluable starter to four-minute reserve?¶ With the offense wilting for two weeks, why did it take so long to use Chris Copeland?¶ Why was Copeland benched right after he made a 3-pointer that cut the deficit to 10 points in the fourth quarter?¶ And what in the blazes is Jason Kidd still doing on the court after missing every shot he has taken in the last eight games?"Blame it on me," Woodson said Wednesday afternoon, in an attempt to deflect blame from J. R. Smith, who volunteered to take the heat a night earlier.The statement was classic Woodson, an old-school coach who prefers that all criticism and praise be distributed equally across the bench. It is a page ripped from the handbook of his mentor, Larry Brown, who in times of trouble is fond of saying, "I got to coach them better."If the Knicks fail to make the Eastern Conference finals, as it appears they will, there will be no shortage of worthy scapegoats.Anthony, presumed to be the N.B.A.'s best scorer, has converted only 40.9 percent of his field-goal attempts in this series but is still stubbornly dominating the offense, using 36.2 percent of the team's possessions. Smith is shooting a ghastly 28.1 percent, making a mockery of his Sixth Man of the Year award. Tyson Chandler has been outworked by Roy Hibbert. Kidd is scoreless for the series.The Knicks' once-fearsome offense is producing only 97.3 points per 100 possessions in the playoffs — a mark that would have ranked last in the regular season.The Knicks insist they are missing shots that they normally make, but the truth is they are finding few quality shots against Indiana's disciplined defense. Anthony has been blanketed by Paul George, whose ability to guard him one-on-one has allowed the Pacers to avoid double-teaming, thus leaving few openings to drive or shoot.The Knicks won 54 games this season on the strength of their offense and were at their most dominant when the ball was moving, the floor was spaced, and Anthony and Smith were alternating good shots with smart passes. That identity has been lost, and Woodson has failed to do anything to restore it.Instead, Woodson went the opposite direction in Game 4 on Tuesday. He abandoned the small lineup that gave the Knicks their edge. He started Kenyon Martin, a defensive-minded enforcer, in a failed attempt to counter the Pacers' size. He benched Prigioni, whose passing skills had been critical to the Knicks' offensive rhythm for two months. (Prigioni has the best plus-minus rating of any Knicks starter in the playoffs.)Though the Knicks quickly fell behind by double digits, Woodson stuck with the big lineup for most of the night, thoroughly revamping his rotation in the 90th game of the season.Amar'e Stoudemire started the fourth quarter, despite recently returning from a two-month layoff after knee surgery. It was a bewildering move on many levels, but Woodson stood by it."That didn't hurt us," Woodson said. "Last I checked, we won the third and fourth. It was a tie, I think, in the fourth quarter."The Knicks opened the fourth trailing by 11 points. By the time Stoudemire checked out, the deficit was 17.Woodson was as strident in addressing his loyalty to the 40-year-old Kidd, saying, "I'll never kick J-Kidd to the curb."Although he declined to explain Prigioni's reduced role, Woodson said he was "contemplating" a return to the small lineup, acknowledging, "That lineup has been great for us for two, three months, and I went away from it."Woodson has indisputably been a net positive for the Knicks, corralling a locker room of volatile characters and disparate talents and presiding over the franchise's best season in more than a decade. His failures in this series threaten to overshadow it all.On Wednesday, Woodson abruptly canceled his weekly radio spot with ESPN's New York affiliate — a first this season. If the Knicks falter again Thursday night at Madison Square Garden, there will be no escaping the backlash."Blame it on me," Woodson said. As if the city needs any encouragement.
In a decision that may end a long struggle over the Sacramento Kings , N.B.A. owners voted on Wednesday to prevent the team from moving to Seattle.The decision was expected, because the league's relocation committee recommended several weeks ago that the owners not let the team leave Sacramento.In January, an investment group led by Chris Hansen struck a deal to buy the 65 percent of the team, which is owned by the Maloof family. Hansen hoped to move the team to Seattle and rename it the SuperSonics in honor of the team that moved to Oklahoma City in 2008 and became the Thunder.At the urging of Mayor Kevin Johnson of Sacramento, a rival group willing to keep the team in their current home came up with a bid roughly equivalent to the Hansen's group.Hansen raised his bid 14 percent last week hoping to force the owners to choose between unevenly priced offers, prompting the Maloofs to claim they would only sell to the Hansen group.The league will now have to persuade the Maloofs to accept what is currently a less lucrative offer for the team from a group that includes the software mogul Vivek Ranadive, the founder of 24 Hour Fitness, Mark Mastrov, and the Jacobs family, which owns Qualcomm.
A team falls behind, three games to one, in a seven-game series, and the verdicts are quickly delivered.Latest vivid exhibit: the Knicks. Mike Vaccaro writes in The New York Post that after losing to the Indiana Pacers on Tuesday, they "looked like someone other than Will Hunting trying to figure out the math problem on the wall." The Pacers, he says, are the smarter team, and also: "They're the more poised team. They're the more relaxed team. They're the hungrier team."J. R. Smith is one New York culprit, Steve Serby says in The Post, a player who "has done more than anyone to sabotage the Knicks' championship dreams and ambitions. He should have stayed in bed with the flu."And Carmelo Anthony? Not his fault, Ian O'Connor writes at ESPN, "not with Anthony's teammates looking about as comfortable in this series as Sergio Garcia looked on Sunday on the 17th tee." Harvey Araton in The New York Times says that Anthony's supporting cast Tuesday was "disintegrating before the eyes of the Bankers Life Fieldhouse crowd."But Matt Moore at CBS Sports says that Anthony has to do more: "These are ugly games. He doesn't have to have 36 points on 13 shots. But 8 points on 10 second-half shots won't cut it. He's got to be the weapon that distracts the Indiana defense, makes them react."Indiana does not have anyone with the profile of Anthony (or Tyson Chandler, for that matter), which, Ian Thomsen writes at Sports Illustrated, is a good thing. "The Pacers' weakness is their lack of superstar leadership," he says, "yet in three of these four games they've turned that quality into an across-the-board strength" — sharing the ball, for example.This is not to say the Pacers are without standouts. Paul George is one, says Brian Windhorst at ESPN; he is "the third-year wing" who "is showing off a defensive skill set and confidence that is beyond his years."A series stands at 3-2, and no one is ruling anything out, although San Antonio, which took the lead against Golden State on Tuesday, is "reaching back to when the Spurs made their names on the defensive end of the court instead of getting caught up in the fast-paced, high-scoring modern N.B.A.," says J. A. Adande at ESPN.Marc J. Spears at Yahoo says "the Warriors have overcome long odds much of the season," but Monte Poole at The Oakland Tribune thinks that the Warriors' "most important players are wearing down, and it shows. It will be difficult to win two straight against a Spurs team accustomed to the suffocating air of the playoffs."The Mets are not a game or two behind in a seven-game series — they are 14-22 — but Matthew Kory at Sports on Earth says they are more or less done — in May! "If you give New York a third-place finish," he writes, perhaps overoptimistically, "then to win a wild card they have to beat out all but one of [as the standings now sit] Cincinnati, Philadelphia, Pittsburgh, Milwaukee, Arizona and Colorado. That's a tall order for David Wright and one 24-year-old pitcher."Brian Urlacher's career also looks to be finished, with the Minnesota Vikings the latest team not to be interested in signing the former Chicago Bear.The Bulls could use him. The Bulls, who have more players in suits than the latest Men's Wearhouse commercial, could use anybody. They're expected to end their season Wednesday night against the Miami Heat, per ESPN and, oh, absolutely everyone else.Chicago is down, three games to one.
(Reuters) - The owners of the Sacramento Kings basketball franchise have struck a tentative deal to sell the California team to local investors after the National Basketball Association denied a proposal to move the team to Seattle, Sacramento Mayor Kevin Johnson said on Friday.The deal by an investor group led by tech developer and philanthropist Vivek Ranadive followed months of bitter wrangling between Seattle investors, who wanted the team to replace a beloved franchise the Pacific Northwest city lost in 2008, and California investors, who wanted it to stay put.The deal replaces an earlier agreement struck in January between the King's current owner, the wealthy Maloof family led by George Maloof, which has made real estate and other investments in the western United States, and a Seattle-based investor group led by hedge fund manager Chris Hansen, Microsoft Chief Executive Steve Ballmer and others.Johnson declined to provide details of the deal to keep the Kings in the California capital, but a source close to the negotiations said it values the franchise at roughly $535 million and that the group has placed more than $341 million in escrow.For Ranadive to buy a 65 percent stake in the Kings he must divest his minority ownership stake in the Golden State Warriors, which could happen as early as Friday, the source said."In concept and in theory, everything has been agreed to," said the source, who is close to the Maloof family but declined to be identified because he was not authorized to discuss the deal. "Money has not changed hands and George has not signed a piece of paper."The deal also will require NBA approval.Sacramento Mayor Kevin Johnson, appearing triumphant and sleep-deprived at a City hall press conference, heralded the deal as a "defining moment" for the city."It's a new era today," Johnson said, flanked by politicians, local team investors and supporters."We know it's about a team, yes, but it's about jobs, it's about revitalizing our downtown community, it's about civic pride," Johnson said."It's about not letting somebody take something away that's not theirs," Johnson said, drawing raucous applause. "We don't take a backseat to anyone."Johnson said the investor group behind the deal includes 24-Hour Fitness founder Mark Mastrov, members of the Jacobs family with ties at Qualcomm Inc, among others from California.Former Facebook Inc executive Chris Kelly has also been identified as an investor.Fund-manager Hansen has long vowed to bring a team back to Seattle and rename it the SuperSonics after the sorely missed franchise the city lost to Oklahoma City. He already has a deal with the city to build a new arena.Last month, a committee of NBA owners voted that the team should stay in Sacramento, but Hansen vowed to fight on, raising his bid for a controlling interest in the Kings to $406 million, which valued the team at an unprecedented $625 million."(The team) will change hands once the deal closes and the league approves," said NBA spokesman Tim Frank.
SACRAMENTO, Calif. — Sacramento Mayor Kevin Johnson announced to screaming throngs of Kings fans Friday that the deal to sell the NBA franchise to a group led by software tycoon Vivek Ranadive has been signed.The announcement at a City Hall rally brings to an end nearly five months of maneuvering by Johnson to secure a new ownership group, convince the council to commit to building a new downtown arena, and to show the NBA that the capitol city of the most populous state in the nation has the fan base to make the venture successful."This was one heck of a comeback," Johnson, a former NBA All-Star, said on a stage shared with two dozen investors, fans and politicians who had worked to keep the franchise in the city.Earlier this week, NBA owners rejected a bid to move the franchise to Seattle. Investor Chris Hansen, whose agreement to buy the team from the Maloof family and move them to the Pacific Northwest shocked the city in January, fought to acquire the team to the bitter end. He even negotiated to buy a minority share when it became clear the league opposed relocation.Johnson said that the deal reached between the Maloofs and the Ranadive group did not include an investment from Hansen.NBA Commissioner David Stern praised Hansen's proposal and said the NBA might consider expansion once a new TV deal is in place.The mayor was conciliatory toward Seattle, but said he focused throughout the negotiations on promoting Sacramento as thriving city with 19 sellout seasons, one of the longest streaks in the NBA."Seattle is a great city and we want them to get a team. For us, it was never a competition. It was about our community telling our story," Johnson said, adding: "It's about not letting someone take something that's not theirs."The NBA is expected to officially approve the sale next week.A person familiar with the deal previously told The Associated Press that the Maloofs had reached an agreement to sell a 65 percent controlling interest at a total franchise valuation of $535 million. The person spoke on condition of anonymity because they weren't authorized to talk publicly.The plan for the Kings' future includes a $447 million downtown arena that will be built on at the western gateway to the city near the Sacramento River.The Sacramento ownership group also includes 24 Hour Fitness founder Mark Mastrov, former Facebook senior executive Chris Kelly and the Jacobs family that owns communications giant Qualcomm.
Elimination hovered over the Knicks , menacingly, like the cartoon version of death, waving his pointed sickle, threatening their postseason existence. The end seemed near Thursday night, with only the details to be determined and the last rites recited.For more than a week, the Indiana Pacers had been bigger, tougher, steadier, smarter, reducing the Knicks to a muddled mess in these Eastern Conference semifinals, pushing them to the edge of extinction. But only to the edge.The Knicks are still teetering there, happily and with a renewed confidence, after bullying their way to an 85-75 victory at Madison Square Garden, where the mood went from tense to boisterous to relieved in a matter of hours.The Pacers still lead the series, 3-2, and have another chance to finish it Saturday night at Bankers Life Fieldhouse, where they are undefeated in the postseason. But the Knicks have restored a little faith."Everybody in this locker room, we believe," Raymond Felton said. "That's just been our No. 1 statement. We believe. We believe in ourselves. We believe in each other."Only eight teams have overcome a 3-1 deficit to win a series. "So we're just trying to be that ninth team," Felton said.Game 7, if necessary, would be Monday at the Garden.Carmelo Anthony provided the offense (28 points), Tyson Chandler the muscle (with several hard fouls) and Chris Copeland the 3-point shooting on Thursday, carrying the Knicks to their first win in 10 days.The Knicks still struggled to score, shooting 41 percent, but they turned their defense up a notch and capitalized on all of Indiana's mistakes and misfortune. There was plenty of both.The Pacers missed 14 of their 33 free throws and committed 19 turnovers, their offense impaired by the loss of George Hill, the starting point guard, who was out because of a concussion. Hill apparently sustained the injury in Game 4, in a collision with Chandler, but the condition went undetected until Thursday afternoon. His status is in doubt for the series. The N.B.A.'s concussion protocols might not allow his return for several days.Hill had scored a team-high 26 points in Game 4, and he is by far the Pacers' best playmaker."We got plenty to beat the Knicks, with or without George Hill," Coach Frank Vogel said. "The guys in uniform got to play better." He added, tersely, "We had a lot of problems. We didn't play a good basketball game."Paul George scored 23 points, and David West had 17 points and 10 rebounds for the Pacers. D. J. Augustin stepped in for Hill and had 12 points but no assists in 39 minutes. When Augustin was off the court, the playmaking duties often fell to Lance Stephenson, with disastrous results.The Knicks led wire to wire, by as many as 11 points. George briefly rallied the Pacers in the fourth, hitting a 3-pointer that cut the Knicks' lead to 4 points. But Anthony answered with a jumper and two free throws, and the Pacers disintegrated down the stretch."We played like we really wanted it," Anthony said. "I think this probably is the best game that we've played, for 48 minutes, throughout this whole series, just from an effort standpoint."Having experimented with a big lineup in Game 4 — and lost anyway — Coach Mike Woodson returned to the small-ball group that carried the Knicks this far. Pablo Prigioni returned to the backcourt. Kenyon Martin returned to the bench. Anthony went back to power forward and regained his shooting stroke — at least in the first half, long enough for the Knicks to establish the lead.They raced to a 7-0 lead in the opening minutes and never looked back. Despite the smaller lineup, the Knicks were only outrebounded by three. The Pacers still scored a lot of second-chance points (24), but the Knicks did enough to survive.After spending two days defending himself, Woodson effectively reversed every questionable decision he had made in Game 4. He shelved the slumping Jason Kidd (5 minutes) and the rusty Amar'e Stoudemire (7 minutes) and instead gave an extended run to Copeland, a forgotten figure for most of the series.
On Saturday, it produced the biggest payoff for the Pacers in nearly a decade.Roy Hibbert's block of Carmelo Anthony's dunk attempt midway through the fourth quarter spurred an 11-2 run that rallied the Pacers to a 106-99 victory in Game 6 of their second-round series, sending them into their first Eastern Conference final since 2004.New York native Lance Stephenson scored nine points in the run, finishing with a playoff career-high 25."That's why they pay me the big bucks this summer, so I have to protect the paint," said Hibbert, who signed a $58 million contract last summer. "If all else fails, meaning the offense, I have to protect the paint."With players from both teams standing on the court as the final seconds ticked off and Pacers fans roaring in appreciation, the sellout crowd wasted little time breaking into chants of "Beat The Heat!"For Indiana, it sets up a postseason rematch with the defending NBA champs, the team that eliminated them last May after the Pacers had taken a 2-1 lead in the best-of-seven semifinals. The Heat wound up winning Game 4 at Indiana and followed that with two more wins as Danny Granger struggled with a knee injury.Indiana used the lessons from that series as motivation to improve this season and wound up beating the Heat twice at home before losing the third game of the season series at Miami. The Pacers will return to South Florida for Game 1 on Wednesday night.With Granger missing all but five games this season because of the lingering knee injury, the Pacers put an even greater emphasis on playing defense and it showed.Indiana led the league in rebounding, defensive field goal percentage and defensive 3-point percentage while finishing second in points allowed per game during the regular season. It was no different in the playoffs, as the Knicks found out.New York had another subpar shooting night Saturday, making just 40 percent of its shots, and again wound up on the wrong side of a 43-36 rebounding discrepancy. In the paint, New York was outscored 52-20, and Anthony, who finished with 39 points, scored just four points in the final 12 minutes when he went 2 of 7 from the field.Iman Shumpert added 19 points, hitting five 3-pointers, and J.R. Smith scored 15. Nobody else was in double figures.The combination, as it had been in the previous three losses to Indiana, produced the same frustrating result."They have a hell of a defense. They hold down the paint. They do a great job, do a hell of a job of controlling the paint, closing it down, making it tough for guys," Anthony said. "You've got to give them guys credit, especially when they got a chance to set. Roy Hibbert gets to sit in the paint, causes havoc."It's not just that.The biggest question coming into Saturday's game was whether starting point guard George Hill would play. He took part in the team's morning shootaround, was cleared by the team doctors and wound up returning two days after missing Game 5 with a concussion. His return gave the Pacers a big boost.Hill finished with just 12 points on 2-of-10 shooting but had five rebounds and four assists, and kept the Pacers composed enough to commit only nine turnovers — 10 fewer than Thursday night's loss in New York.The results showed up everywhere on the floor.Paul George had 23 points, five rebounds and four assists. David West added 17 points, five rebounds and four assists, and Hibbert finished with 21 points, 12 rebounds and five blocks, none bigger than the stuff on Anthony that changed the game. Stephenson had 10 rebounds and three assists in his best postseason game ever.The reason: He wanted to avoid a trip home."I just didn't want to go back to New York and play Game 7," Stephenson said. "Just get it done with now and I'd do whatever it takes to do that today. It showed tonight."The New York native made sure of it.After George grabbed the rebound off of Hibbert's block, Stephenson took a pass from West and scored on a layup to tie the score at 92 with 4:51 left in the game. Stephenson followed that with a steal and drove in for a layup, drawing a foul and completing a three-point play. After grabbing another rebound and making two more free throws, West tipped in a miss and Stephenson closed the decisive spurt with another layup. Suddenly, the Pacers led 101-94 with 1:53 to go.New York never got another chance to tie the score or take the lead again despite making a far more typical 13 of 30 from 3-point range."It's tough to go out this way," coach Mike Woodson said. "I didn't make it happen for us and that's what's disappointing."The Pacers have a far different goal now as they get ready to face LeBron James, Dwyane Wade and Miami."We're not satisfied with where we're at," coach Frank Vogel said. "We feel like there's no ceiling on this team this year."Notes: New York failed to become the ninth team to rally from a 3-1 deficit. ... Indianapolis 500 pole winner Ed Carpenter made the short trip from the track to Bankers Life Fieldhouse, where he is a regular attendee. ... Colts coach Chuck Pagano also attended the game. ... The Knicks were 18 of 18 from the free throw line.
Reggie Miller rose from his broadcaster's seat late Thursday night, resplendent in a dark gray suit, and smiled at the familiar sight of a reporter whose deadline playoff stories he had helped rewrite almost two decades ago.But there was a flip side to the classic Knicks-Pacers playoff battles of the mid-1990s often remembered for Miller's shooting heroics that tormented Spike Lee and deflated Madison Square Garden. The Knicks broke a few hearts in Indianapolis, as well, in consecutive years going into the old Market Square Arena and staving off Game 6 elimination.Upon mention of 1994 and 1995, Miller knew where the conversation was headed after the Knicks clung to postseason life by winning Game 5 of their Eastern Conference semifinal, 85-75."It was a house money game tonight for the Pacers," he said. "But now all the pressure shifts back to them, going home, because you're expected to close them out there. Not easy for a young team against a group of veterans."The arena — Bankers Life Fieldhouse — will be different, but the challenge will be the same for Carmelo Anthony's Knicks as it was for Patrick Ewing's: turn an expectant crowd nervous, along with the Pacers, by not allowing them to take control of a game early, as the Pacers most recently did in Games 3 and 4.On June 1, 1994, the legend of Miller was born on Broadway when he scored 25 fourth-quarter points, including five 3-pointers, one deeper than the last, to send Indiana home with a chance to close out the Eastern Conference finals.Two nights later, on a humid Friday night, Market Square Arena was packed and stoked to watch the Pacers advance to their first N.B.A. finals.The arena, which opened in 1974 and was demolished in 2001, had an interior configuration that was more like a college arena's. It was loud and usually raucous, in a time when the Pacers had a more rabid fan base that carried over from their American Basketball Association days.At Bankers Life, the Pacers this season ranked 25th of 30 teams in attendance, averaging 15,269 in an arena that holds 18,165. Game 4 was announced as a sellout but there were several pockets of empty seats."I was in the new arena for Games 3 and 4 this year, and I can tell you it's not the same type of atmosphere that it was in Market Square," the former Knicks guard John Starks said. "That place was much louder, a lot more tense. It was hostile."For no one more so than Starks, who had Darth Vaderized himself by head-butting the trash-talking Miller in Game 3 of a first-round series in 1993 that was the genesis of the Knicks-Pacers rivalry.But in Game 6 of the next season, playing on a knee that had been surgically repaired two months earlier, Starks poured in 26 points. He converted 5 of 6 from behind the 3-point line in a 98-91 victory. Ewing's put-back of a missed Starks driving layup clinched Game 7 in New York. But in Coach Pat Riley's heart, Starks endeared himself by getting the Knicks home in the first place, and that best explained why Riley would not pull the plug on Starks even as he shot 2 for 18 in a crushing Game 7 defeat at Houston in the finals.In 1995, the Pacers held a 3-1 series lead in the second round but the Knicks won a close game at home and returned to Market Square, where by then they were Indiana's most despised opponent. Some fans around the visitors' bench were profane and, in the opinion of some Knicks, borderline racist.Even Dancing Harry, who had cast hexes on Knicks opponents during their 1970s championship days at the Garden, resurfaced as a cape-wearing turncoat in the employ of the Pacers."I guess it was the style of play, too," Starks said. "It was really physical, and it brought out the passion."On May 19, 1995, Ewing's 25 points and 15 rebounds led the Knicks to a 92-82 Game 6 victory. But back in New York, his endgame finger-roll rimmed out, Miller kissed the Garden floor and the Riley era came to a close.Starks included the consecutive Game 6 victories in Indianapolis among the highlights of his career."Oh, that was the best, to hear that place go so quiet," he said.Of course, those Knicks, fueled by Riley — who by then had won four titles as the Lakers coach — were a physical, ornery bunch. The 2012-13 Knicks won 54 games largely on the strength of their jump-shooting.Still, as Starks said: "Most of the season, in their darkest hour, they seem to have risen to the occasion. And the psychology changes now. The Pacers start thinking, 'Oh, no, we don't want to go back to New York for 7.' "Added to the possible loss of point guard George Hill for the remainder of the series, the Pacers still must consider the possibility that Anthony and J. R. Smith could erupt simultaneously."Even tonight they didn't shoot the ball particularly great," Miller said after Game 5, in which the Knicks made 41 percent of their shots. "But they got some second shots, Chris Copeland was great off the bench. So if I'm Frank Vogel I'm a little worried because the Knicks are due to have that kind of night where they are making 3s from all over the place."Speaking from the painful experience of having twice lost a closeout Game 6 at home, he added, "If that happens, it's a whole different story."
INDIANAPOLIS — The news came late in the afternoon again, as time ticked toward another potentially series-deciding game against the Knicks , but this time it was good news for the Indiana Pacers : George Hill, their starting point guard, had been cleared to play.The lift from Hill's return — four days after he sustained a concussion in the first quarter of Game 4 — helped Indiana defeat the Knicks, 106-99, in Game 6 on Saturday.His presence offered his teammates a chance to slip back to their accustomed roles. Hill, a fifth-year player, freed Paul George and Lance Stephenson from additional ball-handling duties and gave Indiana its veteran floor leader again."I told him I'll protect him as much as possible on the court," center Roy Hibbert said. "I'll call every screen."Hibbert was alluding to Hill's collision with Knicks center Tyson Chandler early in Game 4, which knocked him out of Game 5 on Thursday and left his return in doubt for Saturday until about 1 p.m. That was when he was informed he had passed the tests of the N.B.A.'s concussion protocol to return to the court."I was very excited," Hill said. "I had a lot of tests that I had to do last night to get out there with my teammates and just try to help them win this game."Hill was relatively quiet statistically — 12 points while he shot 2 of 10, with 5 rebounds and 4 assists in 42 minutes. He had only one turnover; the Pacers made 9, compared with 19 in their loss Thursday.One of his most important plays Saturday came with 55.7 seconds left, when he drove hard to the basket with the Pacers ahead by 4 points and drew a foul from Kenyon Martin, his sixth. Hill smacked the floor but bounced up and hit two free throws, all but clinching the victory."George is a veteran, he knows what it takes, he's been on a championship team," George said. "He steps into that role and he's a floor general for us."Hill's presence specifically helped Stephenson, who carved up the Knicks' defense and carried Indiana for most of the first half and the fourth quarter.Stephenson looked shaky filling in for Hill in parts of Game 5, forced into an unaccustomed role as point guard. Without that burden, he was a revelation Saturday, scoring 25 points while shooting 9 of 13 and collecting 10 rebounds."We know the type of ability that he has," forward David West said of Stephenson. "This was a great game for him to show up. He's ultimately the one that got us over the hump."As late as Saturday morning, the Pacers' chances of getting Hill back did not look promising. He participated in the team's shootaround, but according to Coach Frank Vogel, the Pacers were preparing as if Hill would not play.Hill had demonstrated he was at least symptom-free at rest and passed a baseline examination by the team's medical staff, based on a computerized cognitive assessment each player receives in the preseason, as the N.B.A.'s concussion protocol requires.But Hill still had to show he was symptom-free after a series of exertion exercises. He did."We was happy, of course we was happy," George said. "He gets us into stuff. He's the reason we're in this position right now."Hill did not come out of the Pacers' locker room for warm-ups until about 12 minutes before tipoff, and as soon as his image was shown on the Bankers Life Fieldhouse video screen, the fans began cheering.There was concern about whether Hill, who was born and raised in Indianapolis, would return in this series, knowing how tricky concussions can be."This was a game I couldn't miss," Hill said. "I had to get out there."According to ESPN Stats and Info, entering Saturday the Pacers had been outscored by 37 points during the postseason without Hill on the floor. With Hill playing, the Pacers had scored 61 more points than their opponent.On Saturday he gave the Pacers something to celebrate: a series victory and a spot in the Eastern Conference finals against the Miami Heat.
INDIANAPOLIS — Carmelo Anthony launched himself from the baseline, rising swiftly, his arm cocked, his eyes on the rim, carrying the Knicks ' playoff existence, a city's hopes and his own postseason legacy with him. In that moment, ever so briefly, all things still seemed possible: A date with the Miami Heat . A run to the finals. A championship.In a split second, the vision was shattered — smacked away by Roy Hibbert's massive left palm and ultimately crushed by the sheer force of the Indiana Pacers.Hibbert rejected Anthony at the rim late Saturday night, triggering a frantic, game-sealing 16-9 run as the Pacers seized a 106-99 victory and a six-game triumph in the Eastern Conference semifinals.The Pacers are heading to Miami to play the defending champion Heat in the Eastern Conference finals, which open Wednesday night. The Knicks are heading into another off-season of discontent, their 40th straight spring without a championship."It's tough," Anthony said, his voice low and his gaze impassive. "We all know what was the goal that we had set. Everybody wants to go to the championship, win a championship. That's the ultimate goal."From the moment they gathered last fall, the Knicks were convinced they had the requisite talent. They won 54 games, claimed the Atlantic Division title and won a playoff series for the first time in 13 years. But they fell two rounds and 10 victories short of their goal, their star power trumped by Indiana's superior resolve and balance.The Pacers outworked the Knicks throughout the series, beating them to rebounds and loose balls, outscoring them in the paint and stifling the Knicks' once-fearsome offense. Anthony and J. R. Smith worked under maximum duress, rarely finding a rhythm or room to operate.Anthony had his best game of the postseason Saturday, scoring 39 points and making 15 of 29 shots. But he spent most of the series struggling just to shoot 40 percent. Smith never was the same after his suspension in the first round, robbing the Knicks of a key offensive weapon. He had 15 points and 10 rebounds in the finale, but he was 4 for 15 from the field."I feel I left shots out there that I should have made," said Smith, who also blamed himself for losses in Games 3 and 4 here. "I wasn't there for my teammates. You have the quote-unquote season that I had, teammates are supposed to be able to rely on you."Many others could have volunteered to take the blame. Other than Iman Shumpert — who scored 19 points and sparked a third-quarter comeback with a series of 3-pointers — the Knicks' top players came up empty.Raymond Felton missed all seven of his shots and was thoroughly outplayed by George Hill, who returned from a concussion to score 12 points, with 5 rebounds and 4 assists. Tyson Chandler never could contain Hibbert, who had 21 points, 12 rebounds and 5 blocks in the finale.In a transformative, often thrilling season, this was the biggest game of all, the greatest test of the Knicks' apparent evolution.After playing sturdy defense for most of the series, the Knicks wilted with their season on the line, allowing the Pacers to shoot 50.7 percent from the field. All five Indiana starters scored in double figures, led by Lance Stephenson's 25 points and 10 rebounds. The Pacers outrebounded the Knicks by 43-36. They earned 46 foul shots, making 34."They were still the aggressor tonight," Coach Mike Woodson lamented. "And we had our chances."The Knicks never did figure out how to win here, losing all three road games in the series and going 0-5 for the season on the Pacers' court. They arguably lost this series in Game 1, when they lost home-court advantage. The Knicks were trying to become just the ninth team to win a series after falling behind, 3-1. The franchise still has not made it past the second round since 2000.Anthony did everything he could to stave off elimination, and his determination Saturday was unquestioned. But his play was faulty again in the fourth quarter, going 2 for 7 with two critical turnovers. In the Knicks' three losses in Indiana, Anthony went a combined 2 for 14 in fourth quarters.And his potential signature moment was erased.The Knicks had a 92-90 lead when Anthony leaped for the baseline dunk. Hibbert's left-handed swat sent fans, all draped in bright gold shirts, into a delirious roar."It was a helluva block," Anthony said, adding, "It kind of shifted the momentum a little bit at that point."Hibbert said, "That's why they pay me the big bucks."It all unraveled from there for the Knicks. Anthony committed two straight turnovers, bowling over Paul George for an offensive foul, then throwing away a pass that Stephenson turned into a fast-break layup and a 3-point play.Stephenson added two more free throws after fouling out Chandler. David West's tip-in completed a 9-0 run, giving the Pacers a 99-92 lead with 2:34 to play.Anthony, who was 0 for 5 in the quarter to that point, hit a 10-footer to stem the tide, and Smith followed with a 3-point play cut the deficit to 101-97. They never got any closer.Hill hit two free throws to make it a 6-point game with 39.5 seconds left. After Chris Copeland missed a 3-pointer, the Pacers gathered the rebound and the Knicks essentially gave up, allowing 16 seconds to tick off the clock before Anthony fouled George, with 9.6 seconds left.As the final seconds ticked away, choruses of "Beat the Heat" echoed through Bankers Life Fieldhouse.Jason Kidd, who looked worn out and did not score a point in the series, played just 6:23 in the finale. He left without speaking to reporters, perhaps to avoid questions over whether he will retire.Amar'e Stoudemire played just 5:47 in Game 6, his activity still restricted after he had knee surgery in March. Stoudemire was supposed to be Anthony's co-star, sharing the burden of lifting the Knicks back into title contention. It has not worked out that way. He played just 29 games this season, sandwiched between two knee operations, all as a reserve."We never gave it a chance," Stoudemire said. "I think just the opportunity of allowing them to understand exactly what my style of play is, what I bring to the table, is something that I think I have to sit down with Coach Woody and express to him."The title chase over, the Knicks are left with only regrets and recriminations.
When Tony Allen was interviewed on live television after an otherwise meaningless midseason game in 2011, nobody could have known that he would wind up altering the culture of the Memphis Grizzlies , or that the words he delivered would soon adorn billboards and T-shirts, posters and towels."All heart," Allen said at the time. "Grit. Grind."The Grizzlies are not the flashiest collection of superstars remaining in the N.B.A. playoffs. Far from it. They play a physical brand of basketball that borders on Greco-Roman wrestling, and it will be on display Sunday when they face the San Antonio Spurs in Game 1 of the Western Conference finals.In lieu of high-flying pyrotechnics, the team is best known for its grit-and-grind mentality, an approach that resonates in a lunch-pail city hard by the muddy banks of the Mississippi River. That a defense-minded player with a broken jump shot was its architect made the marriage even more authentic."Something happened with this team that spoke our language," said Craig Brewer, a Memphis-based filmmaker who explored the city's rough-and-tumble side in the 2005 movie "Hustle and Flow.""Before all this happened with the Grizzlies, Memphis was going through a little bit of an identity crisis," Brewer said. "All these other cities were in the spotlight for being cool places to live. And then we were always on these lists for, you know, having a lot of crime and being really fat."He added: "I know the cliché thing is to say that it's bigger than basketball, but it is. That Tony Allen line might be the best description of Memphis ever."As in all great redemption stories, Allen had to start from the bottom. He signed with the Grizzlies before the 2010-11 season after he helped the Boston Celtics reach the N.B.A. finals. But he suddenly found himself languishing as a seldom-used reserve in Memphis."My thinking was that this was the Memphis Grizzlies, so they needed all the help they could get," he said in a telephone interview.When the Grizzlies visited Oklahoma City on Feb. 8, 2011, Allen finally got an opportunity. Rudy Gay was out with an injury and O. J. Mayo was serving a suspension, so Coach Lionel Hollins pushed Allen into the starting rotation and had him defend Kevin Durant. It caught Allen by surprise."I was upset because I hadn't gotten a chance to watch much film on Durant," he said. "I didn't complain. I just let it all out."In the Grizzlies' 105-101 victory, Allen collected 27 points, shooting 9 of 12 from the field with 5 steals and 3 blocks. It was a monster effort, and a turning point for the Grizzlies. (Worth noting: Gay and Mayo are no longer on the team.) And yet Allen probably made his most important contribution during his postgame interview when Rob Fischer, the sideline reporter for the team's television broadcasts, asked Allen about his effort.At the time, Allen said, he was still feeling frustrated about his role. Nothing had ever come easily for him. Not as a boy growing up in a rough part of Chicago. Not as an injury-prone player with the Celtics. And not during the early part of his tenure with the Grizzlies, who seemed to have little use for him. Allen said he could still remember a game against the Utah Jazz in which Hollins played him a total of 23 seconds."Coach wanted me to go in there and get a stop," Allen said. "I got a stop."So when Allen spoke with Fischer after the win over Oklahoma City, he had more to say. He gave a shout-out to his teammate Zach Randolph as he walked past and acknowledged Durant's brilliance before highlighting the importance of defense. Allen, who spoke in a low growl, enhanced the entire interview by waving his arms like an orchestra conductor."I was just saying the first things that came to my mind," Allen said last week. "It just related to how I live my life. I've always been having to use heart, grit and grind. It ain't just no phrase. That's my whole career. And if it wasn't for that game, I'd probably still be buried on the bench."Pete Pranica, the team's play-by-play broadcaster, was sitting nearby and had an immediate reaction: "This is television gold."The next day, Chris Vernon, who hosts a sports-talk radio show in Memphis, played the grit, grind audio clip for his listeners. And kept playing it, day after day. "Because I thought it was the greatest thing I ever heard," he said.Vernon, who had long considered himself an Allen fan, saw an opportunity to get the message out. He designed a T-shirt that featured Allen's unsmiling visage framed by the words "All Heart" and "Grit. Grind." When Vernon approached Allen with the concept, Allen was flattered: only stars got their own T-shirts."I don't know if there's an athlete who'd ever be more appreciative," Vernon said. "Here's a guy who was collecting cobwebs on the bench in Memphis."In late March, on the day Vernon received his first shipment of T-shirts from the manufacturer, he received a significant public-relations boost when Michael Heisley, who was then the team's owner, wore one while he watched the Grizzlies play the Golden State Warriors from his courtside seat at FedExForum. At the time, Vernon was concerned that he might not sell enough shirts to recoup his investment."And Michael Heisley tells me: 'Whatever you don't sell, I'll buy from you. You have no risk,' " Vernon said. "Can you believe that?"As it turned out, Vernon had no problems unloading the shirts. Soon enough, the team adopted Allen's bit of unscripted poetry on its merchandise. For Allen, the rise of the grit-and-grind mantra coincided with the growth of his own role. He was recently named one of the league's top defenders for the third straight season."I feel like I helped trigger something here," Allen said. "Teams know you've got to really come and prepare to play the Grizzlies now, because we're going to put that grit and grind on you. Everything has changed."
About a week before the playoffs, Knicks point guard Raymond Felton, who had never been on a team that won a playoff series before this season, his eighth in the N.B.A. , thought he needed extra time on the court. So he sent a text message to his shooting coach, Ivorie Manning."If you have some free time, I'd like for you to come down," he wrote.Three days later, the two of them were alone in the Knicks' practice center about 7 p.m., shooting from several spots on the court: the free-throw line, the 3-point arc, the corner.Manning critiqued Felton's technique on each shot, watching his elbow, his shoulders and his release. A former assistant for the Harlem Globetrotters, Manning is in demand as a shooting specialist.He has worked with the N.B.A. players Ty Lawson, Rajon Rondo and Jerry Stackhouse, but it is his work with Felton, a client since 2010, that would be of most interest to Knicks fans this spring.Felton has been the steadiest shooter from the perimeter among the Knicks' main contributors in the playoffs, and if they were going to rally to defeat the Indiana Pacers in the Eastern Conference semifinals, they were going to need his consistency. He shot 46.5 percent (72 of 155) in 11 postseason games entering Saturday's Game 6, up from 42.7 percent in the regular season. The Pacers led the best-of-seven series, 3-2.Although Felton had his worst game of the postseason in Game 3, making 1 of 8 shots, he had made 13 of his last 30 shots before Saturday.He credits much of his success this season to Manning."He's been big for me," Felton said last week. "He's taught me no matter if you miss two or three shots, shoot the same way."He added, "He's one of the best out there."Manning, 45, who lives in Las Vegas, has helped N.B.A. players improve their shooting for 14 years, traveling from one team to another.His life is as hectic as the lives of the players he works with, and he sometimes coaches opposing players, as he did this year when the Boston Celtics faced the Knicks in the opening round. Chris Wilcox, a power forward with the Celtics, is another Manning client.He also traveled to Atlanta to help Devin Harris work on his jumper.The N.B.A. playoffs are a long way from the California playgrounds where Manning honed his coaching skills in the Venice Beach Basketball League, winning nine consecutive outdoor championships.He began working with N.B.A. players in New York during the 1998-99 lockout, when some players were struggling to stay in shape. He helped with their ball handling, defense and conditioning. But the players most wanted Manning's lessons on shooting.Allan Houston was his first major client, and then Stackhouse. Since then, Manning has focused on teaching shooting, to professionals and to younger players."I had no idea this would happen," he said of his career path.Felton, who lives in North Carolina in the summer, heard of Manning from other N.B.A. players and first met him in Myrtle Beach, S.C. Manning has visited Felton for workouts during each of the past three seasons, and in the off-season.Manning wants players to hear his voice when they shoot. For Felton, the mantra is "Keep your elbow in, shoulders straight and the ball on your right.""I think that most coaches, whether you're a shooting coach or a basketball coach, they're kind of saying the same things," Manning said. "You think people don't yell to Dwight Howard to bend his knees? I think it has to be transformed to the player where he is almost thinking as you as he's approaching the shot."Manning is one of many shooting coaches working in the N.B.A., some on team staffs, others hired by individuals. This season, the Knicks hired Dave Hopla, and they shot 37.6 percent on 3-point attempts, compared with 33.6 percent last season. The Knicks made 891 3-pointers this season, an N.B.A. record.Walt Frazier, a Hall of Fame player and an analyst for MSG Network, shook his head at the trend of specialized shooting coaches."When I played we had only one coach: the head coach," said Frazier, who won two championships with the Knicks. "We didn't have shooting coaches. Shooting is a lost art."Manning agreed that most players could use help with their shooting form. That is why he stands on call, ready to pack his bags and take a trip when his phone rings.
INDIANAPOLIS — The gap between expectations and reality stung hard, leaving Carmelo Anthony to split the difference Saturday night in his final postgame soliloquy of the season.Sitting on the dais at Bankers Life Fieldhouse, where his Knicks had been vanquished by the Indiana Pacers, Anthony leaned into the microphone, his expression pained, his words hopeful."Over all, we had a hell of a season, hell of a year," Anthony said, adding, "To get to this point right now, where we had a chance to get to a conference finals, we'll take that."It was a mixed message, ripe for overinterpretation. Where some observers heard optimism, others heard a tacit acceptance of failure after the Knicks fell short of their goals.The Knicks did not set out this season merely to improve or to win a single playoff series. They set out to challenge the Miami Heat's supremacy — a quest cut short by a Pacers team that was younger and tougher, less glamorous but more polished and determined.Beat the Heat? The Knicks never even earned the chance to meet the Heat in the games that matter most.Anthony is right to accentuate the positive, having delivered a 54-victory season, an Atlantic Division title and the franchise's first playoff series victory in 13 years. But so much more was expected of a team stocked with high-priced talent and distinguished veterans.The Knicks decorated their lockers with Larry O'Brien Trophy decals, crowed when they routed the Heat twice and harrumphed when anyone suggested that the road to the title still went through Miami.Their bravado often outpaced their play, especially in the middle of the season, when the Knicks played at a .500 level for 40 games. From a team based in New York, the bravado and star power only inflated expectations: if the Knicks look and act like championship contenders, then they must be championship contenders.That thinking was as flawed as the roster itself, a hard truth that the front office must confront once again, now that the illusory title chase is over.For better or worse, the Knicks are defined by Anthony, a splendid scorer who has not learned to expand his game or to consistently involve teammates. After being rightly praised for a more team-oriented approach in the regular season, Anthony regressed in the playoffs, taking a career-high 25.8 shots a game and converting just 40.6 percent.At their best this season, the Knicks were a well-orchestrated, ball-moving, 3-point-shooting offensive juggernaut. That worked well as long as Anthony and J. R. Smith were participating in the ball movement part, and not so well when they reverted to predictable isolation play.The Knicks can win with Anthony, but they have to surround him with playmakers to offset his ball-dominating ways and find him a suitable co-star.Amar'e Stoudemire was supposed to fill that role, but his game and Anthony's have never meshed, and now Stoudemire's health is betraying him. He played 29 regular-season games between knee operations and sparingly in the playoffs.The idea that Anthony and Stoudemire might approximate the harmonious partnership of LeBron James and Dwyane Wade has never seemed more outlandish.Stoudemire could still be useful as a second-unit scorer, but it is hard to envision him back in a starting role. Anthony thrived this season at power forward, Stoudemire's position, and the Knicks had their most success when Stoudemire was out, going 21-9 to start the season and 21-5 after his second knee operation.Team officials will surely shop Stoudemire again, as they have repeatedly for two seasons, but his suspect knees and his contract — which has two years and $46.8 million remaining — make him virtually impossible to trade.Smith briefly auditioned for the co-star's role, even winning sixth man of the year honors while earning praise — clearly premature — for his apparent maturation. Then came the playoffs, and he reverted to old, bad habits, on and off the court. He will be remembered for poor play and poor judgment this postseason, for elbowing Boston's Jason Terry and for clubbing with Rihanna.It is the most twisted of silver linings that Smith's erratic spring will probably help the Knicks keep him this summer. No team is going to overbid for him now.That still leaves the Knicks with a talent deficit and a payroll with no flexibility. Anthony, Stoudemire and Tyson Chandler are due $58.2 million next season — the equivalent of this season's salary cap — and the Knicks are committed to at least six others who will push the payroll well into luxury-tax territory if Smith stays. That means the Knicks cannot acquire players through sign-and-trade deals and will be limited only to cap exceptions.They cannot count on much growth from within. Iman Shumpert, who turns 23 next month, is the only rotation player younger than 29.The Knicks are paying the price for their obsessive pursuit of aging veterans last summer. Rasheed Wallace and Kurt Thomas did not last the season. Marcus Camby barely played but is guaranteed $4.4 million next season. Jason Kidd was invaluable in the locker room and for a time on the court, but he faded badly in the playoffs and is owed $3.1 million in each of the next two seasons, unless he retires.What the Knicks called the three-year plan — acquiring older players to complement Anthony, Stoudemire and Chandler until their contracts expire — turned out to be a one-year plan. They now need a new plan and new players.In the final analysis, the problem is not that the Knicks got so close to their goal and failed. It's the illusion that they were ever close at all.
INDIANAPOLIS — Another season of not-good-enough ended, unofficially, with a grim-faced James L. Dolan leading a lock-step entourage in a quick-striding getaway across the bowels of Bankers Life Fieldhouse. Dolan, the bewildering strongman of a Madison Square Garden empire that includes the Knicks , wasn't waiting around for the buzzer to sound on a deflating Eastern Conference semifinal series and one more championship-less N.B.A. season.He was gone into the humid Indiana night by the time his 54-win team trudged off the court and into a fourth decade of franchise failure, underachievement marked this time by a blurring narrative and newsreel.In falling to the younger, bigger and more athletic Pacers, 106-99, Saturday night to lose in six games, the Knicks were haunted by a Georgetown center (Roy Hibbert), an explosive 25-point, 10-rebound performance by a product of Stephon Marbury's Brooklyn high school (Lincoln's Lance Stephenson) and an alumnus of Dolan's school of hard-to-fathom Knicks (Donnie Walsh).In the case of Walsh, 72, maybe we should consider him more gulag escapee than graduate.Walsh was hired by Dolan in 2008 to fix an organization broken in large part by Dolan's erratic and at times inept stewardship. A native New Yorker, Walsh could take only three years of Dolan's oppressive environment before returning this season to his longtime adoptive home with the Pacers as a self-described caretaker.Larry Bird — not Walsh — built the intriguing team that gets the crack now at Miami's defending champion Heat in a conference final the Knicks believed would be theirs. And Walsh's reconstruction in New York is not above scrutiny and second-guessing — perhaps even the acquisition of Carmelo Anthony as the centerpiece, after a dreadful fourth quarter in the midst of an otherwise stellar 39-point Game 6 performance.But on the Sunday afternoon in New York that began the Knicks-Pacers series, the sight of Walsh sitting courtside, chatting up reporters, was a reminder of an all-too-brief period at the Garden that was akin to what the Soviets once called glasnost, or openness.It wasn't that Walsh divulged state secrets as much as he believed that an organization asking people to pay startling sums of money for tickets and glorified happy meals was obliged to be public and accountable. Not suspicious and dismissive, the Dolan way.The Knicks fought hard Saturday night, desperate to reclaim the home-court advantage they surrendered in Game 1. They erased a 12-point Pacers lead in the third quarter with a spasmodic barrage of trademark 3-point shooting and held a 92-90 lead with five and a half minutes to play.But after three quarters of brilliant shotmaking, Anthony wilted under the defensive pressure of Paul George, while Hibbert, at 7 feet 2 inches, blocked Anthony's right baseline shot that was all but dunked and would have given the Knicks a 4-point lead.The Anthony-Hibbert collision was a synopsis of a game in which the Knicks were outscored, 52-20, inside, had zero points in transition and saw the game slip away when Anthony committed two turnovers while trying to pass in a maze of active and long-limbed Indiana defenders.Prodigious scorer that he is, Anthony struggles as a playmaker off the dribble, trying to read defenses, a weakness of comprehension, not intention.In the interview room, a subdued Anthony graciously gave credit where it was due, calling Hibbert's block "a hell of a defensive play" and the Pacers a "hell of a defensive team."He has evolved to where he doesn't point fingers (unlike Tyson Chandler, who conspicuously underachieved in the series) or bark at people in defeat. How many N.B.A. stars are amiable enough to swing their long legs sideways to accommodate reporters rushing over to Iman Shumpert in the neighboring dressing stall?Until the fourth quarter, it appeared that Anthony would be the last to blame for a season's termination that will leave Knicks fans feeling that a title, last won in 1973, is very far away.Their veteran-laden team was supposedly built for now. Based on regular-season results, they believed the Knicks could compete with Miami, especially with Dwyane Wade struggling with a balky knee.But what now? Where does optimism come from when the Knicks couldn't beat a Pacers team that was without one of its best players, Danny Granger, and is presumably getting better?How do the Knicks figure as a serious playoff contender next season in a conference that LeBron James will continue to dominate and that Derrick Rose will return to in Chicago?And the axiomatic question: how — if at all — will losing to a lower-seeded team affect Coach Mike Woodson?"I didn't make it happen for us, and that's what's disappointing," Woodson said.Yes, his rotation was a work in progress during a grueling series, never a good idea, but was that all on him? Did a coach who reportedly had to fire his longtime agent for Knicks-approved representation in order to get a new contract have the juice to decide if Amar'e Stoudemire's untimely return was worth the trouble?Leadership under duress is difficult to plan, harder to provide, but it typically starts at the top. In the 1990s, a decade in which the Knicks made runs to the finals and worthy if futile climbs up Mount St. Jordan, Dave Checketts was calm and collected as the face and voice of the Garden, through victory and defeat.He was not one to make recluses out of his key personnel, as Dolan has done with his current Knicks vice president and general manager, Glen Grunwald — and what Dolan was unable to do when Walsh occupied the office.Like most good administrators, Walsh understands that leadership begins with presence — although, not surprisingly, he was nowhere to be found in or around a euphoric Pacers locker room late Saturday night.Much as he is his own man, Walsh is also a good company man, even if Dolan never quite got that. In his hour of triumph, Walsh was not going to entertain hackneyed questions about last laughs and revenge.He gave his coach, Frank Vogel, and the players the space they deserved. Walsh stayed away after Dolan ran away, presumably to watch his hockey team lose Sunday in Boston. He left the Knicks behind to stare at a pile of soiled underwear and towels on the locker room floor, the untidy remains of another season in ruin.
MIAMI — Dwyane Wade's rookie season ended with a playoff loss to the Indiana Pacers. The next year, the Miami Heat were headed to the Eastern Conference finals and certain that an NBA championship was in their sights.That's when Wade learned a valuable lesson: Never take playoff chances for granted.Wade hurt his rib cage on a simple crossover dribble during that 2005 East title series, and the Heat season ended with a Game 7 home loss to Detroit. He's been to the East finals three times since, prevailing in them all, and on Wednesday will look to take a first step toward a fourth conference championship when the Heat play host to the Pacers in Game 1 of their playoff rematch from a year ago."I know I'm blessed to be going to the Eastern Conference finals for my fifth time," Wade said. "But I would like a lot more in my career. It's a good thing. We've been very successful in my tenure here. But I want more."For Wade and Udonis Haslem, this marks five East finals appearances in nine years. For LeBron James, it's a fifth trip to this round in the past seven years, now three straight with Miami after a pair of trips to the East finals with Cleveland. For Ray Allen, it's a fourth East title-round trip in six years, the first three of those coming with Boston.For the Pacers, this is pretty much uncharted waters. Only one current Pacers player has ever appeared in a conference-final game, and that was backup big man Ian Mahinmi, who played exactly 71 seconds in one game of the 2011 West title series without so much as taking a shot. Nonetheless, the Pacers seem far from bothered by the fact that this stage is a new place for them."There's four teams left playing basketball in the NBA and this is something we've been looking forward to all year," Pacers forward David West said. "We lost to this team in the second round last year, so we've already gotten a step farther this season."Indiana took Miami to six games last season, leading the series 2-1 at one point, and left an impact on the Heat with words, actions and play. The series was always physical, at times bloody, and it took some superb efforts by Wade and James for Miami — which was without Chris Bosh for 5½ of those six games — to put the Pacers away.It's not in the nature of either of these teams to back down from physicality, and tough play will almost certainly be a theme in this series. But if there's one thing the Pacers and Heat agree upon, it's that this series will be decided by execution, not intimidation."I think this will be about substance," Pacers coach Frank Vogel said. "This series has plenty to offer without hard fouls and trash-talking. It's going to be about basketball."The Heat are overwhelming favorites, at least according to the Las Vegas oddsmakers, who apparently aren't putting much stock in that it was the Pacers who prevailed in two of the three meetings between the teams this season.In turn, the Heat aren't putting much stock in expectations. Even though it's starting to seem like an annual event, getting to the conference final round, Heat players insist that it's still as big a deal now as it ever was."It's an opportunity for me to continue my dream and that's to compete for a championship," said James, the league's reigning MVP for the second straight year and fourth time overall. "I'm happy that I'm in the position I'm in, with great teammates and a great organization. I've just got to do my part."Heat coach Erik Spoelstra was an assistant on that team — Shaquille O'Neal's initial season in Miami — that fully expected to be Finals-bound in 2005.Then Wade got hurt, and everything changed."I let myself get too far ahead," Wade said. "I was thinking, 'Championship, we're on our way.' I was riding the wave. It was awesome. Then it smacked me — Pow! — and it just takes one moment to change. Stupid. All I did was crossover. Did a stupid crossover pullup, I don't know what happened and it changed everything for us. That's when you learn, you don't know what's going to happen."Wade isn't 100 percent this time around either, though has said in recent days that his bruised right knee is good enough for him to play. He doesn't even plan on missing any more practice time this season.The Pacers have some mild injury concerns as well, with West dealing with an injury to his lower right leg and 7-foot-2 center Roy Hibbert needing a tape job on his right thumb after a hit in practice earlier this week. They're both expected to play Wednesday."I think it will be a good series," Pacers forward Paul George said. "Obviously, we remember what happened last year and it will be on our mind when we face this team. We're not just happy to get to this stage, we want to get past this one, too."George has deservedly earned high marks this season for his offensive growth. The Pacers' hopes in this series might hinge upon his defense.He went from guarding Carmelo Anthony in the second round to knowing that he'll be facing off plenty in this series against James — who Vogel called "the best player, the best offensive player in the world.""He has to do the same kind of thing he did on Carmelo," Vogel said of George. "He has to come out and compete the best he can and do it without fouling."James told teammates on Tuesday that he's raring to go, especially so since the Heat haven't played in about a week. He was working after practice on his floating jumpers, something he employed against the massiveness of Hibbert last season and a trick he won't be afraid to pull out and use again in this series."It's been go time," James said. "Since the playoffs started, it's been go time. And I love the way we've been playing so far."
NEW YORK — What's not to like? Being in the lottery every year.Nick Gilbert expects the Cleveland Cavaliers are through with it, and if so he sent them out a winner again.The Cavaliers and their owner's son beat the odds for the second time in three years, winning the lottery Tuesday night to give them the No. 1 pick for the June 27 NBA draft.Two years after charming viewers by responding to a question about being on stage by saying: "What's not to like?" the bowtie-wearing son of Dan Gilbert wore a stern look before this one. He said he expected he was done coming here and that he believed the Cavs would be in the playoffs next season.Then they got a great jump on that goal, earning the first pick even though they had only the third-best odds to do so.And 16-year-old Nick Gilbert delivered it, just as he did in 2011, when the Cavs used the pick to take eventual Rookie of the Year Kyrie Irving."Kyrie is a hell of a player ... but this also felt almost as good," Nick Gilbert said. "That was the first time. This is the second time, but man does it feel good to get the first pick this last time. Get that last player to give us a push."The Orlando Magic fell back one spot to No. 2, while the Washington Wizards vaulted from the No. 8 spot to third.Ten years after winning the lottery that landed them LeBron James, the Cavaliers picked up another opportunity to help speed up the rebuilding process since his departure to Miami in 2010.James' exit shook a franchise that had become a perennial contender with the Ohio native, but the Cavs aren't thinking about that now."It's so long ago already. I knew it is only three years but in NBA years it's like dog years. It seems like it is 15 or 20 years," Dan Gilbert said. "We've been just so focused on building the team the last few years, I can't look back. There is nothing you can do. I am just happy about today."The potential No. 1 pick this year, Kentucky freshman Nerlens Noel, is no James. But he could be a nice addition for the Cavs once he's recovered from a torn ACL — if they keep the pick. They also have Nos. 19, 31 and 33 for new coach Mike Brown, who they rehired after firing Byron Scott following a 24-58 season."We were hoping regardless of what pick we got that this would be our last lottery," Dan Gilbert said. "We thought originally after everything had to be reset that it would be a three-year process. You never know. It could be four. We thought three years, but having No. 1 and 19, we've got a pretty good chance of this being the last one for a while."Dan Gilbert and the rest of the Cavs entourage — all wearing wine-colored bowties as well — celebrated their latest victory, which came with 15.6 percent odds after they finished with the NBA's third-worst record at 24-58.When they won the lottery in 2011, the Cavs had the eighth best odds."For everyone in Cleveland who has supported us through these three years, I think this is for them," Dan Gilbert said. "Is that right, Nick?""It feels good," said Nick, who was born with Neurofibromatosis (NF), a nerve disorder that causes tumors to grow anywhere in the body at any time.Not even having four-time winner Pat Williams on stage and 25 percent odds could get the No. 1 pick for the Magic. The team with the best odds hasn't won since 2004, when Orlando won for the third time with Williams representing them and drafted Dwight Howard. The franchise hadn't been back since 2006."We had such a nice run up here, over the years. Yeah, we came to win, so when they turned Cleveland over it was like "How did that happen? Absolutely! How did that happen?" Williams said."We had a better shot, a better percentage. ... I think the Lord was looking out for that little guy from Cleveland."Even heading back to their Hornets name couldn't change the luck of the Bobcats, who were lottery losers for the second straight year. Hours after owner Michael Jordan announced they were planning to get back the original nickname of the Charlotte franchise, the Bobcats fell from No. 2 to the fourth spot.Last year, Charlotte had the best odds of winning after the worst season in NBA history but fell back one spot to second.The lottery sets the top three teams, and the remainder of the 14 teams finish in inverse order of their record.Phoenix will pick fifth, followed by New Orleans, Sacramento, Detroit, Minnesota, Portland, Philadelphia, Oklahoma City, Dallas, and Utah.The Thunder got the Raptors' pick as payment of a previous trade because it didn't move into the top three. Bryan Colangelo represented the team on stage on the day the Raptors announced he would stay on as team president but they would hire a general manager.Guards Ben McLemore of Kansas and Trey Burke of Michigan, the college player of the year, and Georgetown forward Otto Porter Jr. are considered other top available players.With uncertainty at the top, this is another year when the No. 1 pick could've been a high school player if eligible. Kansas-bound prep star Andrew Wiggins may have been the choice, but the age limit requiring players to be 19 years old and a year out of high school will remain unchanged at least until the players' association has a new executive director to replace the ousted Billy Hunter.The union would like the limit to be lowered or scrapped entirely, while the NBA has expressed interest in raising it to 20. It's on a list of "B-list" items from the 2011 collective bargaining negotiations that the sides still plan to discuss.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — Amare Stoudemire will go into next season with $45 million left on his contract and no guarantee of a starting job.He also could remain a reserve who plays restricted minutes.Searching for ways to improve next season, the New York Knicks could use a reliable second scorer and dependable low-post option. They have no way of knowing if Stoudemire can provide either because of his knees."He's a heck of a player and I think we all know that. The question is his health and how much he can play," general manager Glen Grunwald said Tuesday. "So we've got our medical staff and training staff working with him to design an offseason program that will get him to full health, and we hope he'll be able to play significant minutes for us next year. How much that will be, we don't know at this time."Stoudemire was limited to just 29 games in the regular season and four brief appearances in the postseason because of a pair of knee surgeries.Following a 54-28 finish and their first playoff series victory since 2000, improvement won't be easy for the Knicks. Their options will be limited by salary cap rules, and it's unclear if they even want to make many changes. Grunwald agreed with players that the best strategy might be giving this season's roster more time together."Our focus is to continue to build this core team," Grunwald said in a rare meeting with reporters. "I think some continuity, some familiarization, further growth as individual and as a team, I think that's what we have to do."That could mean re-signing sixth man J.R. Smith if he becomes a free agent, though Grunwald wouldn't comment on specific plans. He also said 40-year-old Jason Kidd, who has two years left on his deal, gave no indication during his exit meeting that he planned to retire after a dismal postseason.Grunwald said the Knicks won't be allowed to acquire players in sign-and-trade deals and have only the exception for taxpaying teams, starting at about $3.2 million next season. They won't get much top talent for that, but they would if Stoudemire could come back and play at anywhere near his former All-Star level.He has to show the Knicks he can be healthy before showing them he deserves to start again."I haven't made that decision. I'll have the summer to kind of evaluate where I go with that, but I think first things first, he's got to come back healthy," coach Mike Woodson said. "I mean, that is the major part of this. Our struggles in terms of where we wanted to go this season was the fact that we had the injury with STAT. STAT was ready I thought when he came in, but he got hurt."A lot is going to depend on where he is once he steps foot in vet camp in terms of where he is health-wise and minute restrictions, that may be the case. All of that's going to play a major role in STAT in terms of where we go with our ballclub and him playing, because I just don't know at this point."Stoudemire worked hard last summer following an injury-plagued 2011-12 season, training with Hakeem Olajuwon to add low-post moves. But he had surgery to clean up and remove tissue from his left knee in training camp and was sidelined until New Year's Day. He was playing well in March but then ended up needing the same procedure, called a debridement, on the other knee.He returned for the second round but was clearly rusty and played just 33 minutes, Woodson hardly using him in the final two games. The Knicks didn't get nearly enough scoring in the paint against Indiana, something a healthy Stoudemire could have changed."I think STAT ... could've really helped us in that area because we had developed him over the summer to give us some low scoring, and the fact that he just wasn't, I don't think, where we needed him based on his injuries, that kind of hurt us a little bit," Woodson said, acknowledging the Knicks were a jump-shooting team this season and may have to look at adding someone with a low-post game.The Knicks gave Stoudemire a five-year deal worth nearly $100 million in 2010, but he's been unable to remain healthy. He and Carmelo Anthony haven't played enough to be comfortable and productive together, and when Stoudemire was sidelined to start the season, Woodson moved Anthony to Stoudemire's power forward spot. Anthony ended up winning his first scoring title and the Knicks their first division title since 1994.Once Stoudemire returned, he was limited at first to about 20 minutes a game, which was gradually increased to 30 before he was hurt again. Woodson never seemed to consider starting him, even when frontcourt injuries left few other options, and will have to hope Stoudemire can be healthy enough to give him something to think about next season."That'll be for us to determine where our roster winds up next year and where everyone else is," Grunwald said. "I thought he had a great role in terms of where Woody put him in to be successful, in terms of coming off the bench as Woody said, and whether that continues next year or not will be determined. But there's no grand plan per se that he'll start or not start. It'll be determined on what Woody decides is best for the team that will give us the best chance to win."
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — The youngest player on the N.B.A.'s oldest team offered the bluntest assessment of a season that ended too soon."I think we failed," Iman Shumpert said Monday, two days after the Knicks were ousted by the Indiana Pacers in the second round of the playoffs. "We know we were supposed to go farther, and we didn't. I'd say that's a failure."Shumpert turns 23 next month and will enter his third N.B.A. season next fall. On a roster thick with seasoned veterans and imminent retirees, he represents a marginalized demographic: the prospect with upside.Already a defensive ace and a developing scorer, he also could be growing into the role of locker-room conscience.As the Knicks cycled through team headquarters for their annual exit interviews — first with Coach Mike Woodson and General Manager Glen Grunwald, then with the news media — Shumpert was by far the most candid player, and the most glum.Carmelo Anthony and Tyson Chandler stressed how far the Knicks had come in winning 54 games and a first-round playoff series, the franchise's first such victory in 13 years. They spoke with the steady perspective of veterans who had had their share of success and disappointment in the last 10 years.Shumpert, whose boundless intensity made him the Knicks' best perimeter defender, expressed no such satisfaction. He said the Knicks should have advanced "at least to the Eastern Conference finals" to play the Miami Heat. And he suggested that the Knicks had only themselves to blame for falling short.The slide began with a Game 1 loss at Madison Square Garden. They never led in the series and were eliminated in six games."We got to hold each other accountable," Shumpert said. "And come next year, little things like not playing hard should never come into play. Letting a game slip at home should never come into play. Getting beat on the boards, when we know that's a point of emphasis in the series, shouldn't happen. We got to take care of the little things, and we didn't. It finally caught up with us."As he spoke, that Game 1 defeat played on a television screen in the press room.The process of unpacking what went wrong and how to fix it will play out in the months to come. Grunwald and Woodson will meet with reporters on Tuesday morning to offer their perspective.After a lost decade, the Knicks have firmly established themselves as a force in the East, a position they figure to occupy as long as Anthony is here and upright. Title contention is another matter. The Heat are still clearly the class of the East, and the pack of challengers will only get stronger next season, with Derrick Rose (Chicago), Danny Granger (Indiana) and Rajon Rondo (Boston) returning to their teams."Everybody to a man is going to have to come back better," Chandler said, "because obviously, we didn't cut it this year — including coaches and everybody included."Chandler, who faulted teammates for individualistic play during the playoffs, again hinted at concerns over the team's makeup and strategy on Monday."I would like for us to develop some consistency with the offensive game plan," he said. "Right now, we're a jump-shooting team. I would like us to have a free-flowing offense that we all can be comfortable with."Chandler had a difficult postseason, after an illness in late April that caused him to lose more than 10 pounds and sapped his strength. But he said he has recovered from a bulging disk in his neck.The Knicks' core will probably remain unchanged, but they do have significant bodies in play, including J. R. Smith, who won the Sixth Man Award, and 40-year-old Jason Kidd.Smith is expected to decline his $2.9 million option for next season and become a free agent. Although Smith has said he wants to stay, the most the Knicks can pay him, using "early-Bird" rights, is about $5.5 million, leaving the possibility that they could be outbid.Kidd is under contract for two more years, but his decline in the postseason could push him toward retirement.Marcus Camby, 39, could also consider retirement after having hardly played this season.Pablo Prigioni, Kenyon Martin and Chris Copeland — all key rotation players — will be free agents. Martin and Copeland indicated a desire to re-sign with the Knicks. Prigioni has hinted that he might return to Europe.Other than minimum contracts, the Knicks have two salary-cap exceptions they can use this summer: the mini-midlevel exception ($3.18 million) and the biannual exception ($1.96 million), each of which can be split among multiple players.Several players declined to speak to reporters on Monday, including Amar'e Stoudemire, Kidd, Smith and Camby.Anthony made a pitch for Smith to return, calling him "a special player," despite Smith's horrendous playoff slump and concerns over his night life."He's made a huge step forward as a basketball player," he said.Anthony said he would have his injured left shoulder examined in the next few days, but he said he was confident there was no major damage.The Knicks are 1-3 in playoff series since Anthony arrived in 2011, but he said this season was more like Year 1 — his first 82-game season in New York and his first with a stable, veteran roster.Although the Knicks had aspirations of knocking off the Heat, Anthony said, "I don't think we underachieved." He attributed the loss to Indiana to "little details.""We kind of teased the city of New York a little bit, because now everybody expects us to play at this level, this high level," Anthony said. He added: "We want to win a championship. That's the goal, and we're going to keep striving for that."
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — Twelve months from now, the Knicks hope to be playing in the Eastern Conference finals, competing for the right to win a championship, with a roster nearly identical to the one that just collapsed in the second round.If that sounds irrational or fantastical, then you understand just how steep the challenge is for Glen Grunwald, the Knicks' resourceful but cap-strapped general manager.There is an urgency to win now, while Carmelo Anthony is in his prime and under contract. There is an unquestionable need for a talent infusion, preferably young talent. There are more obstacles than obvious solutions.The Knicks have no salary-cap room, an untradeable former star making $21.7 million, aging role players and three key free agents who could walk away this summer. As a team paying the luxury tax, the Knicks are even more limited."I think we can be creative," Grunwald said Tuesday morning, sitting alongside Coach Mike Woodson for a postseason post-mortem.The next 27 minutes were instructive, both for what the two men said and what they did not say.They mentioned the words "grow" or "growth" six times, "improve" or "improvement" nine times and invoked the word "better," in one construction or another, 14 times. "Get better." "Play better." "Be better." "Do better."With limited ability to acquire new talent, Grunwald and Woodson repeatedly stressed the need to squeeze more from the talent they have."There will be something to be said for keeping this group together, letting them grow and improve, learn from our past mistakes and overcome those past difficulties," Grunwald said.Continuity was also a major talking point, and it had some merit.The core group of Anthony, Tyson Chandler, Amar'e Stoudemire, Iman Shumpert and Raymond Felton have yet to play a full season together. A little stability could be beneficial, or so they hope.Really, though, the continuity agenda is born more of necessity than choice.The Knicks have $73.7 million committed to eight players next season, putting them well into luxury-tax territory before they even re-sign J. R. Smith (who could make about $5.5 million if he returns).Starting this summer, taxpaying teams are barred from acquiring players via sign-and-trade deals, which eliminates any chance of the Knicks landing, say, Chris Paul.Losing the sign-and-trade option is a significant blow. Last summer, the Knicks used the provision to acquire Felton from Portland and Marcus Camby from Houston, allowing them to offer each player more than the minimum salary.Although the Knicks could theoretically drop below the tax "apron" of $74 million, it would take extreme measures. "It's probably not likely," Grunwald said, adding, "I don't think that's our focus."The Knicks would get modest cap relief if Jason Kidd ($3.09 million) or Camby ($4.38 million) were to retire, but neither is expected to do so."He sounded like he's coming back," Grunwald said of Kidd.Taxpaying teams also lose the biannual exception, worth $1.96 million. So the Knicks will have only the $3.18 million mini-midlevel exception to spend, and Grunwald acknowledged that he might need it to re-sign Pablo Prigioni and Chris Copeland.The Knicks do have the 24th pick in the June 27 draft, allowing them to add some needed youth.Otherwise, the Knicks will have only minimum contracts to offer this summer as they try to polish the roster. Thus, Woodson and Grunwald spent 27 minutes talking about continuity and growth.Growth will be hard to buy, too. Most of the Knicks' core players are 28 and older, a bit beyond the development stage of their careers. Shumpert, who turns 23 next month, is the only rotation player with a clear upside.So the Knicks have to hope that Anthony becomes a better passer, Smith a smarter shooter and Chandler a more skilled scorer, while praying for Stoudemire's knees to hold up.
Mike Krzyzewski will remain the head coach of the USA Basketball men's national team through the Summer Olympics in 2016. Since he took over in 2005, Krzyzewski helped to lead the program's resurgence, collecting Olympic gold medals in 2008 and 2012 and a world basketball title in 2010.At the London Games last summer, most signs pointed to Krzyzewski leaving the job, which he performed in addition to his regular work as head coach at powerhouse Duke.His decision was first reported by Sports Illustrated on Wednesday and confirmed by a person with knowledge of Krzyzewski's plans. That person was not authorized to speak publicly because USA Basketball had scheduled a media teleconference for Thursday morning.In an e-mail message, USA Basketball did not name Krzyzewski but said the coach it would name Thursday would conduct a 2013 mini-camp and work the 2014 F.I.B.A. World Cup and the next Olympics.Krzyzewski, 66, is the winningest coach in college basketball, his victory count now at 957. His record in international competition is 62-1.After the Summer Olympics in 2008, Jerry Colangelo, managing director of USA Basketball, met with Krzyzewski in Chicago and convinced him to return over deep dish pizza and red wine. No word on if similar methods were employed this time around.
For six games over the last two weeks, Paul George of the Indiana Pacers had one of the tougher assignments in the N.B.A. playoffs. His job was to guard the Knicks' Carmelo Anthony one on one, to keep the offensive damage that Anthony can inflict to a minimum, to do whatever he had to do, within the rules, to wear down one of the league's top scorers.In the end, George did his job. When Game 6 ended Saturday night in Indianapolis, with the Pacers advancing to the next round and the Knicks staggering back to New York, Anthony approached George at midcourt, congratulated him and patted him on the head, an affectionate acknowledgment of the toughness and poise the 23-year-old George had displayed for 40-plus minutes a game with so much riding on the outcome.And the Pacers expressed their appreciation, too. As a reward for his determined efforts against Anthony, George will be asked to keep LeBron James, the league's most valuable player, at bay when the Pacers and the Heat begin the Eastern Conference finals on Wednesday night in Miami.Anthony. James. At least the Pacers are not asking George to fly the team plane from Indianapolis to Miami. But what he will be asked to do against James, considered the most complete player in the N.B.A., is to keep him just a little farther from the basket, to keep him out of the lane and to lower the number of shots he takes from eight feet or less, where he has shot 68 percent (52 of 76) in the postseason."You've got to try to eliminate all the easy stuff," George said when asked about defending first Anthony and now James, whose Heat had won eight of their nine postseason games going into Wednesday's matchup against the Pacers.To do that, George will rely at least in part on his height. An unheralded first-round pick out of Fresno State in the 2010 draft, he is listed at 6 feet 8 inches, but is closer to 6-10. He uses that length to contest shots and his athleticism to stay close to whomever he is defending.George, a swingman who plays shooting guard and small forward, has developed into a reliable scorer for the Pacers, averaging 17.4 points a game in the 2012-13 regular season. But defense is where he has made his mark."I think that's where I really like to stand out and be special because it's fun, the crowd loves it and I get energy off of it," George said.George did not think much about defense as a youngster when he was playing basketball in his hometown, Palmdale, Calif. He wanted to be a mix of Kobe Bryant and Tracy McGrady, which is to say he wanted to be an offensive player.As a senior in high school, he was 6-7 and thin. Still, he wanted to play on the perimeter. But most of the college coaches who recruited him wanted to make him a power forward. In the end, he decided to play at Fresno State. When he showed up on campus, the coach, Steve Cleveland, gave him an ultimatum: if you want to play on the perimeter, you better learn how to defend smaller, quicker players."I said, 'Paul, one of the biggest challenges you're going to have is you're going to be defending guys who are 6-2, 6-3,' " said Cleveland, who is now a broadcast analyst."To his credit, he really started to develop his body. He got stronger, quicker and he had determination defensively," said Cleveland, who added: " He wanted to play the perimeter so badly that he was willing to do anything."Fresno State did not reach the N.C.A.A. tournament with George. It even had a losing record in George's sophomore season, his last at the university.The Pacers, however, saw how George could fit their philosophy, especially on defense. So on June 24, 2010, they drafted him with the 10th overall pick. The initial reaction from Pacers fans was bewilderment, or worse. Pacers fans at Madison Square Garden for the draft booed when his selection was announced."It was like that amongst the whole city when I got here," George said of his arrival in Indianapolis. "Nobody really knew who I was."But three years later, the fans in Indiana love the player George has become.As a rookie, he guarded the Chicago Bulls' Derrick Rose in the first round of the playoffs. Last year, he tried his best to limit James and Dwyane Wade as the Pacers fell to Miami in the second round.Not long after that series, which went six games, George joined the United States select team, a group of N.B.A. players who scrimmaged in Las Vegas against the N.B.A. veterans on the national team, helping prepare them for the 2012 Summer Olympics in London.A Pacers assistant coach, Brian Shaw, who has mentored George the last two years, told him to watch James, Anthony and Bryant at those scrimmages and learn their tendencies.Watch their intensity on offense. Watch their focus. Watch which spots on the floor they like to shoot from. To be successful on defense, Shaw said to George, he needed knowledge.In the end, George guarded the N.B.A.'s biggest stars for six consecutive days. It was an invaluable experience, he said."Competing against those guys and being around them, you kind of understand their style of play," George said.Knicks Coach Mike Woodson, who was in Las Vegas at that time to watch Anthony and Tyson Chandler, said he kept noticing George's defense in practice."I was really impressed with him," Woodson said.Last Saturday, Woodson was watching again as George went up against Anthony. Although Anthony scored 35 points in the first 36 minutes, George never flinched. And in the fourth quarter, he prevailed.Anthony scored only 4 points in that final quarter, and George also helped force him into several turnovers."You have to give him credit," Anthony said afterward.George is happy to accept it. But now comes James.
MIAMI — The Birdman is most comfortable when he is soaring above the chaos, over the rim, poised to swat the basketball away or to slam it home. Elevation has always suited him best.At the moment, however, the Birdman is sitting, maybe a little uneasily, the focus of two dozen reporters and television cameras, all seeking colorful insight from the Miami Heat's most colorful player, who generally avoids these messy scrums.Chris Andersen — known universally as the Birdman, or sometimes just Bird — responds dutifully, his answers concise, his expression warm but wary.When he is flying around the court, with his blond hair gelled up into a Mohawk, his brightly tattooed arms flapping and fans screeching in delight, the Birdman seems the consummate entertainer. The real-world Andersen is more reserved, almost shy, a self-described "country boy" from Texas who somehow blends perfectly into the South Beach vibe, and the Heat locker room, where N.B.A. icons and low-wage specialists live in basketball harmony.Andersen is no attention seeker, but he was impossible to miss in Wednesday night's opener of the Eastern Conference finals, whether he was flying from the baseline to score 16 points or rising high to block the Indiana Pacers' attempts in a 103-102 overtime victory.The points were a career postseason high for Andersen, 34, in his 11th N.B.A. season. His 7-for-7 shooting — every shot within 2 feet of the basket — set a franchise playoff record, besting the 6-for-6 mark by the Heat's Alonzo Mourning in 2007."An honor," Andersen said, sitting on a stool for this rare group interview. "But at the same time, my main focus is the Indiana Pacers and trying to get to that championship."That goal seems imminently attainable, which is incredible considering that just four months ago Andersen was unemployed, a Bird with nowhere to fly.The Denver Nuggets waived Andersen last July under the league's amnesty provision, a move that cleared millions of dollars from the salary cap and made room for their younger centers — JaVale McGee, Kosta Koufos and Timofey Mozgov — to play and develop. At the time, several teams seemed to shy away from Andersen because of possible off-the-court issues. He also had minor knee surgery.Despite his sound reputation as a high-energy rebounder, shot blocker, dunker and crowd pleaser, Andersen remained a free agent until the Heat signed him on Jan. 20."I was hunting hogs and living that country-boy life," he said Thursday.But Andersen has been through much tougher stretches. In 2006, he was dealt a two-year suspension for violating the N.B.A.'s drug policy. He returned in 2008, clean and sober. So even as he waited for months for the phone to ring last fall and winter, Andersen would not consider the possibility of his career ending."I didn't think about that," he said.The 6-foot-10 Andersen was exactly what the Heat needed: a rangy, athletic big man who could protect the rim at one end and finish at the other, a sure-handed receiver to catch all those lobs from LeBron James and Dwyane Wade after they broke down the defense."He's changed their team dramatically," said Pacers Coach Frank Vogel, whose team lost to the Heat in six games in the 2012 playoffs. "Just phenomenal rim protection, great finishing at the basket, toughness, size — all the things that everybody was critical of this team for the last two years, he's brought that. I think it's been a major, major difference maker."Andersen's postseason shooting statistics are startling, even for a player who lives around the rim: 35 attempts, 29 makes, for an .829 field-goal percentage. But one statistic shines above them all: the Heat are 48-4 since his arrival."He fit in with this team like he's been here the whole time, the whole three years," Wade said.
Give LeBron James an inch or two, a second or two, a half-step or a slight gap, and he will turn you into a historical footnote, a foil for his Hall of Fame highlight reel. This much, the Indiana Pacers had already learned, painfully, deeply, in the opener of the Eastern Conference finals.To avoid further infamy, they would have to squeeze and pressure and clutter up his field of vision and pray for James to falter.The Pacers were clinging to a 2-point lead late Friday, with less than 50 seconds to play in a game that would inevitably be decided by a James pass, drive or shot, as he dribbled, probed and surveyed."It's only like one person that's more scarier than that, and that's God," the Pacers' George Hill would say later.Even basketball deities who go by the name Chosen One will, apparently, occasionally stumble.Twice, James saw an open Ray Allen, waiting for the ball. Twice, James had his pass deflected by David West. Two plays, two turnovers, and soon the Pacers were strutting out of American Airlines Arena with a hard-earned 97-93 victory over the Miami Heat and a 1-1 tie in the series.To fluster James into a crunch-time turnover is rare enough. To do it twice, unfathomable."It's near impossible," Pacers Coach Frank Vogel said, marveling at the outcome. "I'm not really sure how we did it, other than just exhibiting great will."They exhibited great offense, shooting 50 percent and getting double-digit scoring from all five starters. They exhibited muscle, with Roy Hibbert powering for 29 points and 10 rebounds. And in those fateful final seconds, the Pacers exhibited a steady diligence that belied their youthfulness.James had locked up Hibbert on successive fourth-quarter possessions, blocking him at the rim on the first, and tying him up from behind to force a jump ball on the second. Chris Bosh followed with a 3-pointer, giving the Heat an 88-84 lead, their biggest of the night, with 6 minutes 9 seconds to play.The Pacers retook the lead on a Hibbert layup. James took it back with a 3-point play. Hibbert responded with a jump hook, tying the game at 91-91. The score was tied again at 93-93 when Hill went to the line for what turned out to be the decisive free throws, with 48.9 seconds left.The rest was left to James, the greatest playmaker of his generation, who had 10 assists in the series opener, who can go days without throwing a bad pass and who had, not incidentally, won Game 1 with a 2.2-second burst to the basket for a layup at the overtime buzzer.James was near the top of the arc, surveying, when he whipped the ball to his left, toward Allen. West, with his back turned, raised his arms and batted it away. Indiana failed to score, leaving James one chance at redemption. This time, he drove to the edge of the lane, spun around and fired the ball into traffic, where West batted it and Hill retrieved it."We knew there was going to be some stuff for Ray Allen," West said, adding, "We prepared for that."Hill made the clinching free throws with 8.3 seconds left, dealing the Heat just their fourth loss in their last 50 games, and their second in 11 playoff games.Paul George had 22 points and 6 assists while again taking on the challenge of defending James all night. Hill came up with 18 points, including the last 4 of the game.Heat Coach Erik Spoelstra would bemoan his team's failure to build on the late 4-point lead, and his players would bemoan the many missed shots by key figures, with Bosh and Dwyane Wade each going 6 for 14 and the reserves coming up empty. Shane Battier missed all three of his attempts. Allen went 2 for 5 and Norris Cole 1 for 6.The box score showed an otherwise brilliant effort from James: 14 for 20 from the field, 36 points, 8 rebounds, 3 assists, 3 steals. The only blemish came in the turnover column: 5."Very disappointing," James said, adding, "That's the first thing I always look at on the stat sheet is my turnovers."James called himself "careless" four times and said, "I am very disappointed in my judgment."Told that Hill had just compared him to the Almighty, James shook his head."I'm nowhere near close," he said. "I made two mistakes tonight. That hurt our team. And that hurt more than anything."This is hardly new territory for the young Pacers, who a year ago lost the opener of a second-round series to Miami, then boldly took the next two games. They lost that series in six games, but this version of the Pacers is a year older and steadier and possibly even bolder."This whole team is just showing great heart and great desire and great belief," Vogel said.The third quarter closed with another memorable exchange in the growing James-George duel.With less than 10 seconds left, George blew past James near the arc and flew through the lane for a powerful dunk over Chris Andersen, drawing a foul in the process.After George hit his free throw, James raced back upcourt and drilled a 29-footer at the buzzer. Smiling, James turned around and yapped at George, then slapped hands with him before they headed to their benches — two rivals enjoying the moment.Indiana seized control early, built a 13-point lead, weathered a flurry of technical fouls in the second quarter (to Sam Young, Tyler Hansbrough and the assistant coach Brian Shaw) and turned back every Heat rally. They absorbed a few more hard fouls, including Wade striking Lance Stephenson in the back of the head in transition late in the game.If not for James's buzzer-beating layup on Wednesday, the Pacers would have a 2-0 lead in this series, which now shifts to Indianapolis for the next two games. Game 3 is Sunday at Bankers Life Fieldhouse."We're not going to back down," Hibbert said. "They can be the champs, but we're coming for them."
EAST RUTHERFORD, N.J. — Several rows of long tables were arranged around the basketball court, each covered by a black cloth with a white sheet of paper bearing one word, "Reserved." Decision makers for the 30 N.B.A. teams chose their seats.On one end of the court sat Danny Ainge, the Boston Celtics' president for basketball operations. Daryl Morey, his counterpart with the Houston Rockets, sat close to midcourt. John Hollinger, the vice president for basketball operations with the Memphis Grizzlies, took a table farthest from the court. They said little and jotted down notes.Inside the Nets' practice facility last Wednesday and Thursday, more than 50 executives and scouts evaluated 44 players who hope to be selected in next month's N.B.A. draft. Yet none of the athletes who participated are expected to be lottery picks. Or even first-round picks.A week earlier in Chicago, players projected to be taken in the first round worked out at a far more glamorous event, one covered live by ESPN and NBA TV. There were no television cameras here to document that every team was represented, aiming to find a second-round draft pick who can contribute as a reserve or even as a starter someday."We do the novel idea of 5 on 5 here," Morey wrote on Twitter last Wednesday.The New Jersey combine was the only time before the draft when players participated in five-on-five full-court scrimmages. That is the old-school way — and perhaps still one of the best approaches — to judge a player's talent and potential.In the past decade, teams have found valuable players after the 30th overall pick. At No. 35 last year, Golden State selected Draymond Green, who played significant minutes as the Warriors reached the second round of the playoffs for the first time since 2007.With the 34th pick in 2002, the Cleveland Cavaliers selected Carlos Boozer, an accomplished N.B.A. veteran who is now an important part of the Chicago Bulls. Luis Scola (No. 55, 2002), Paul Millsap (No. 47, 2006) and Monta Ellis (No. 40, 2005) eventually became starters. Memphis's Marc Gasol (No. 48, 2007) was named defensive player of the year this season.Recent history suggests that at least one of the 44 players trying to make an impression last week will succeed in the N.B.A."There's always a few, of course," said Gregg Polinsky, director for player personnel for the Nets. He added: "Usually when the draft is top-heavy and then it drifts in the first round, it naturally pushes guys down. And that's when you generally have your better second-round drafts."The players took part in strength testing and individual drills. Two of the most intriguing prospects were Peyton Siva and A. J. Matthews.As a senior, Siva averaged 10 points and 5.7 assists and led Louisville to the national championship. Matthews, a 6-foot-11, 215-pound center from Division III Farmingdale State on Long Island, led the nation with 16.3 rebounds a game. He also averaged 22.4 points as a junior this past season.Although they were successful in college, it is unclear whether Siva and Matthews will hear their names called during the June 27 draft.Many scouts and executives are worried about Siva's height (5-11 without shoes) because most point guards in the N.B.A. are taller and stronger. Siva, however, has been praised for his intangibles and his leadership. His supporters say Louisville always succeeded with him.Some mock drafts list Siva as a second-round selection. Others project that he will not be drafted."I just want to show teams I'm a capable leader and that I can continue to run teams and find open people and get them open shots," Siva said. "A lot of people always say, 'Why didn't you score a lot in college and why didn't you up those big numbers?' For me, it wasn't my job to do that. I'm all about winning."Most teams had not seen Matthews play in person until last week. But his size and athleticism have made it hard for them to ignore him."In individual drills, there is no defense," said Matthews, who grew up in Brooklyn. "You're either making jumps shots or missing them. When you play five-on-five and you're running up and down, it shows your stamina, your speed against other big men and your jumping ability. This gave me a lot of confidence to show I can play with these guys."The Nets do not have a second-round pick this year, but Polinsky said Siva and Matthews had a chance to become reliable N.B.A. players."I thought that he was impressive," Polinsky said of Matthews. "I thought he did a nice job. He's a big, long guy who has not played at a Division I level but showed that he is capable of doing so. I think that will earn him some workouts and some looks."Polinsky said of Siva: "Real competitive, great speed. What do you say? Winning culture, been coached and can take all you can give him. He's going to get some looks."Some teams spent time interviewing players after the scrimmages to inform their second-round strategy. Siva and Matthews, along with the other 42 players, have five weeks to prove they should not be overlooked."Of course you want to be a first-round draft pick," Siva said, "but getting drafted is getting drafted."
Since arriving in New York last October to become the head coach and general manager of the Liberty, Laimbeer has been approached by more than one fan who has said, "When you were with Detroit, God, I hated you." The next line would be, "But I'm so glad you're here."Although he is two decades removed from his playing days as a core member of the Detroit Pistons' Bad Boys teams of the 1980s, Laimbeer is still remembered as a bully and an agitator, but also as a tenacious rebounder and a rugged interior force who provided instant credibility to the frontcourt.The Liberty have sorely lacked an identity in recent years, playing .500 in a temporary home in Newark. Laimbeer is determined to put his stamp on the organization, which has never won a W.N.B.A. title. The Liberty are set to open the season Saturday night against the Connecticut Sun."The last couple of years they weren't very fun to watch," said Laimbeer, who won three championships as coach of the Detroit Shock from 2002 to 2009. "They were actually kind of boring for a multitude of reasons we don't need to get into, but that has to change."The Liberty and their fans were ready for a change after a 34-34 record the last two seasons under John Whisenant. Ticket sales were noticeably down as the team played its home games at the Prudential Center while Madison Square Garden was being renovated. This season is the team's last in Newark.During a recent preseason practice, Laimbeer was back in his familiar home in the paint. With sweat dripping from his brow and soaking his gray T-shirt, Laimbeer elbowed up against center Kara Braxton in the post, dictating how to pivot to the basket and swing the ball low across her body to explode toward the goal.Despite the early good vibes, Liberty fans have reason to wonder how long Laimbeer will be committed to rebuilding the team. By the end of his eight-year run with the Shock, Laimbeer's focus was elsewhere, looking toward a coaching job in the N.B.A. When the Pistons fired Lawrence Frank on April 18, fans took to Internet message boards and began clamoring for Laimbeer.Asked if he still wanted to coach in the N.B.A., Laimbeer said: "I'd be a liar if I said no. It's the pinnacle of professional basketball."By the 2009 season in Detroit, the coaches on his staff were well aware he was ready to move on."The great thing about Bill is, we knew his intentions all along the way," said Cheryl Reeve, an assistant with Detroit from 2006 to 2009, now the coach of the Minnesota Lynx. "He told us each year to get ready to be hit by a bus, to be ready for what's next."If he had a do-over, I think he'd do it differently. I think he may have been in a different place. He really wanted to pursue the N.B.A. side of things. That's how Bill operates. He's about as straightforward as it gets."Laimbeer did not give any indication that the Liberty job was a placeholder for his next career step, and he said he was enjoying the expanded role as general manager. Among the perks, his sister and a number of family friends live in the area."The familiarity of having people around was one of the positives," Laimbeer said. "And hey, everyone's got to experience New York once in their life."Laimbeer also has many familiar faces surrounding him at work, on the court and in the front office. Braxton and Plenette Pierson, both former Shock players, were already on the roster, but the Liberty also brought in Katie Smith, who played with the Shock from 2005 to 2009 and was the 2008 finals most valuable player. Laimbeer also persuaded Cheryl Ford to sign with the team after three years away from the league; Ford played her first seven years with Detroit, from 2003 to 2009."I'm a unique kind of coach," Laimbeer said. "I have my own personality. I'm relentless and I'm sarcastic and I just don't go away, I'm always on players. The players that played for me before understand that. They can smooth those waters, and say, 'Don't worry about it, that's just him.'
INDIANAPOLIS — The Indiana Pacers ' Paul George got to shake LeBron James 's hand again Sunday night, but this time he was not basking in a show of respect from James, the N.B.A.'s most valuable player.This time, it was more of a "nice try, kid."The Miami Heat's 114-96 victory in Game 3 of the Eastern Conference finals was full of statements.Like the one made by Heat forward Udonis Haslem (17 points), who showed that it does not take a single 3-point shot for someone other than James, Dwyane Wade or Chris Bosh to play a decisive role in the team's offense."He was hitting a lot of shots he wasn't normally hitting," Pacers center Roy Hibbert said. "And he was letting me hear it."Or the one made collectively by the Pacers, who responded to Coach Frank Vogel's pregame call for the "different sort of poise and composure required at home" by declaring — with a giant defensive whiff — that they are not yet mentally tough enough to kick Miami while it's down.The Heat made clear they can win anywhere, moving to 5-0 on the road in the postseason, with 10 straight road wins over all, while handing Indiana its first loss of the playoffs at Bankers Life Fieldhouse.The biggest message, though, was sent by James (22 points), whose one-on-one matchup with George (13 points, 3-for-10 shooting) showed that George, a third-year Pacers forward, has some work to do to reach the top tier of his sport. At the very least, James put a whole lot of distance between himself and George.Miami put the game away with a 10-3 run, capped by a Ray Allen 3-pointer, to make the score 99-78 with 9 minutes 35 seconds left. But James put away George throughout the first half, especially during the final 5:09, after George re-entered the game and resumed defending James. The next four Heat possessions went like this:■ James dribbled left, bumped George out of the way and hit a leaning jumper.■ James caught the ball deep on George and scored.■ James drew a foul on George and hit two free throws.By the end of that brief stretch, which could not have felt brief at all to George, he was exhausted and James had all but given the Heat a 2-1 lead in the series. The Heat opened a 70-56 halftime lead when James drilled a 14-foot runner."We wanted to be a little more aggressive, a little more committed to getting into the paint and seeing what would happen," Heat Coach Erik Spoelstra said. "And LeBron was very committed and focused not to settle. That aggressiveness set the tone."James started slowly, probably by design. More than halfway through the first quarter, Miami led by 20-19 — with James not having attempted a shot. Over the final 17:39 of the half, though, he scored 18 points and was 7-for 11 from the field."I saw I had a one-on-one matchup, so I just tried to take advantage of it," James said. "My teammates gave me space." He added, "I tried to anchor myself down on the block and go to work."George, who opened the scoring on a driving layup 23 seconds into the game, attempted only two shots the rest of the half — none in the second quarter, even though he played nearly nine minutes.Haslem, who scored only 3 points combined in Games 1 and 2 in Miami, was brilliant. He was 4 for 4 from the field in the game's first eight minutes, with three jumpers from his familiar spot on the left baseline and one impressive drive into and over Hibbert, the Pacers' 7-foot-2 center.Hibbert, the so-called rim protector, protected nothing Sunday, nor did his teammates. The Pacers, the N.B.A.'s second-best defensive team during the regular season — extremely effective against James and Co. down the stretch of a Game 2 victory — tried to run and gun with the Heat. Needless to say, it did not work.Hibbert (20 points, 17 rebounds) and David West (21 points, 10 rebounds) kept the Pacers within range for much of the game, but only in theory.Game 3 began with a motivated Bankers Life Fieldhouse crowd booing Wade lustily for his elbow to the head of Lance Stephenson in Game 2. Miami's Chris Andersen soon drew his share of invective, too.Well before the Heat had called it a night, though, the arena was more than half empty, and familiar questions were confronting the Pacers.Can they really challenge the Heat, let alone beat them in a seven-game series? Are they really such a daunting matchup for the defending champions?And is George truly an elite-level player yet? When James offered him a handshake after the two had traded dazzling plays to end the third quarter of Game 2, it seemed something like a coronation.A game later, James was the undisputed king once again, and the Heat looked every bit like the team that has not lost consecutive games since January."Look, Game 2, I'm sure there's so many story lines out there, but the fact is they beat us," Spoelstra said.The Heat found added motivation in that loss, according to forward Shane Battier."It's just maturity," Battier said. "We've got a lot of old guys in this locker room. When we lose a game, we usually understand why."
INDIANAPOLIS — It is tempting to view the Eastern Conference finals as an upstart, unafraid Indiana Pacers team versus the greatest player of this era, LeBron James. But Dwyane Wade, another Miami Heat superstar, is doing what he can to elbow his way onto James's stage.The Pacers may not fear Wade's play, but they are certainly well aware of his history with elbows — not always his own. The N.B.A. allowed Wade to play in Game 3 here after issuing him a retroactive flagrant foul-1 penalty Sunday afternoon. The ruling followed Wade's elbow to the head of Lance Stephenson during the fourth quarter of Indiana's Game 2 victory Friday.At Sunday's morning shootarounds, it was clear that the incident at midcourt, intentional or not, had kicked up a lot of dust around a growing rivalry. For the remainder of this series, which will resume here with Game 4 on Tuesday, dealing with James will be Job No. 1 for the Pacers. Inside Bankers Life Fieldhouse, though, Wade will be Public Enemy No. 1."It was an uncalled-for play," Pacers forward Paul George told reporters before the N.B.A. issued its ruling. "Whatever the league does about that situation, for what he did to Lance, it's well deserved whatever the punishment is."Wade did not make himself available to the news media. His coach, Erik Spoelstra, offered a not-so-stirring defense of a player who has often been accused of being dirty."We think it was just a play that happens sometimes during a game," Spoelstra said. "He was scrambling. That was during a very competitive time of the game."He added, "It was just one of those inadvertent collisions."Wade has been at the center of several controversial plays the last three seasons.In the 2011 playoffs, a two-man scrum with the Boston Celtics star Rajon Rondo resulted in a dislocated elbow for Rondo.Wade broke Kobe Bryant's nose on a hard foul in the 2012 All-Star Game. Shortly after that, in a late-season game against the Chicago Bulls, Wade sent Richard Hamilton flailing out of bounds with a two-handed shove to the chest. For that, Wade blamed Hamilton's active elbows.In last year's Eastern Conference semifinals, Wade charged into Indiana's Darren Collison on the dead run, sending the much smaller Collison sprawling.Wade has been banged up himself down the stretch of his 10th season in the league, no doubt affecting his production on the court. And, perhaps, souring his mood.INDIANAPOLIS RARITY Game 3 was only the third time Indiana had hosted a playoff game on the day of the Indianapolis 500. It was the first such massive sports day in this city since May 30, 2004, when the Pacers lost Game 5 of the Eastern Conference finals to the Detroit Pistons after Buddy Rice's victory at Indianapolis Motor Speedway. On May 30, 1999, Kenny Brack's win at the Brickyard was followed by the Pacers' Game 1 loss to the Knicks in the conference finals. Indiana went on to lose both series.NOT LOOKING AHEAD With the San Antonio Spurs holding a three-games-to-none lead in the Western Conference finals, Pacers and Heat players were asked about a potential championship matchup against the Spurs. Predictably, none bit.There is not much relevant history to consider between the Heat and the Spurs; both teams rested key starters in matchups this season.The Pacers, on the other hand, have a history with San Antonio, the West's No. 2 seed, that they would love to forget. The Spurs have won 12 consecutive games against the Pacers. Their last loss, by a single point, occurred here on April 1, 2007.Perhaps of more relevance, the Spurs topped 100 points in both meetings this season. That should be cause for some concern given Indiana's second-ranked defense, which allowed 90.7 points per game in the regular season and was at 90.6 for the playoffs heading into Game 3.
Two years ago, the filmmaker Ted Green began working on a segment about the early days of the Indiana Pacers . During his research, Green repeatedly came across the name Roger Brown. Brown's imprint was all over the Pacers' history and record books.When the Pacers became a charter member of the American Basketball Association in 1967, Brown was the first player the team signed. He was Reggie Miller before Reggie Miller, combining long-range shooting with an uncanny knack for getting to the basket."I really had no idea who he was," Green said by telephone last week, referring to Brown, who died in 1997.With each new piece of information, Green became more intrigued by Brown, an important but relatively unknown figure of Pacers lore. He read piles of clips. He spoke to Pacers officials and to Brown's friends, former teammates and former opponents. He became especially close with Brown's second wife, Jeannie, and his younger sister, Judy.Green also read "Foul! The Connie Hawkins Story," an eye-opening book by David Wolf that tells the story of Hawkins and Brown, schoolboy basketball stars in New York whose association with a notorious gambler nearly ruined their lives.Two years later, Green has released "Undefeated," a fascinating hourlong documentary that brings Brown's story out from the shadows."I was just flabbergasted that his odyssey had not been told before," Green said. "The more I got to know Roger's family and friends, it really became more of a cause for me. I saw how much his story meant to them."Green added: "That's what drove me through some really tough, bleak times. When the money was running out, and I had no idea how this was going to end up, it was the family that really kept me going."Green's documentary traces Brown's journey from Bedford-Stuyvesant to Dayton, Ohio, to exile and finally to the A.B.A., where he led the Pacers to three championships. He later won a seat on the Indianapolis City-County Council.Green saw Brown's life as an unfortunate convergence of powerful opposing forces."You have these gamblers out to fix games, and they're willing to reach the depths to do it — wining and dining, and more, teenagers just to help get them on their side," he said."On the other side, you got the district attorneys who are dead set on stopping the gamblers and would do anything it took to do that. Even if that meant stomping all over the rights of teenagers. In the middle of that, you have guys like Roger Brown and Connie Hawkins, arguably the best young players New York had seen at that time. They got caught in this vise, and it changed their lives forever."In Brooklyn, Brown was a star at Wingate High School, Hawkins at Boys High. They were the best players in New York City, easily among the top five in the country. Hawkins accepted a scholarship to Iowa, and Brown to Dayton.During their senior year of high school, they were befriended — seduced is probably a better description — by Jack Molinas, who had been kicked out of the N.B.A. in the 1953-54 season for gambling on his own games with the Fort Wayne Pistons. Molinas later served time for a 1961 point-shaving scandal that erupted soon after Brown and Hawkins had started college.Brown and Hawkins were not accused of shaving points. Their sin was accepting favors from and associating with Molinas, a former Columbia star. The association was enough to cost them their scholarships and to lead the N.B.A. to bar them. They never played a varsity game for their universities.Brown lost six seasons of his basketball life: three when he lost his college scholarship and eligibility, three because the N.B.A. had banned him. Years later, Brown won a settlement from the N.B.A. Hawkins eventually played in the league, but Brown remained with the Pacers and the A.B.A.In February, Brown was selected for induction into the Basketball Hall of Fame.Brown and his first wife, Carol, had a son, Roger Brown Jr. He and Jeannie had a daughter, Gayle Brown Mayes. Brown's children will speak for him in September when he is inducted."I only wish he could have been here to see this," Mayes said. "I probably learned more about my dad this past year from doing this documentary than I have ever known my whole life."She was 21 when her father died from liver cancer in 1997 at age 54. She did not yet grasp the magnitude of what happened to him early on and how it affected him.Mayes, a model living in Los Angeles with her husband and their 7-year-old son, Hudson, said she never fully grasped how deeply the expulsion from college and the ban in the N.B.A. hurt her father."I was probably too self-centered, too wrapped up in myself to really know how that affected him as a person," she said. "I came back to it a little wiser, a little older, and really seeing and feeling that impact that I know it had on him. That really put things in perspective for me. I was captivated — and crying my eyes out."When the A.B.A. was formed in 1967, the Pacers' general manager, Mike Storen, signed Brown on Oscar Robertson's recommendation.Brown was reluctant to sign with the Pacers: he had been disappointed so many times and did not want to see his hopes dashed."He did not want to be defeated," Green said.In 1967, at 25, Brown left his job as the night-shift injection machine operator at the General Motors plant in Dayton to become the first player to sign with the Pacers. He played in five A.B.A. finals.I spoke with a weak Brown shortly before he died, and he described how the scandal had affected him."I went into a shell; I became an introvert," he said. "The fact that here you had a life, and you had a future. Now it's gone, taken away from you."Brown said the experience, for all of the pain and heartbreak, built inner strength and character."What happened to me and what happened to Connie could have been a blessing; obviously it was," he said. "We got a chance to get up and show our wares from a professional standpoint."We took some real hard knocks, but we both rose above that, and we're better for it. I know I am."Brown's legacy will be memorialized in the Hall of Fame, and his memory will be extended through the new documentary. Roger Brown was resilient, unbowed and unbroken.
(Reuters) - The National Basketball Association's Board of Governors on Tuesday unanimously approved the sale of the Sacramento Kings to a California investor group, effectively ending a tug-of-war with competing potential bidders, one of whom had hoped to move the team to Seattle, a league official said.The deal to sell a majority stake in the team to investors led by tech developer and philanthropist Vivek Ranadive followed months of wrangling between Seattle-based investors who wanted the team to replace its beloved Seattle SuperSonics franchise lost in 2008, and California investors who wanted it to stay put.The deal replaces an earlier agreement struck in January between the Kings' current owner, the Maloof family, which has made real estate and other investments in the western United States, and Seattle-based investors led by hedge fund manager Chris Hansen, Microsoft Corp Chief Executive Steve Ballmer and others.The new deal for a 65 percent stake is expected to close late on Friday and values the franchise at roughly $535 million, according to a source close to the negotiations."Congrats to Vivek & the new ownership group!" Sacramento Mayor Kevin Johnson, a former NBA player who mounted a campaign to keep the team in California, wrote on Twitter. "NBA's unanimous vote sends a strong statement of support for the Kings' bright future in Sac!"Johnson has said the investor group behind the deal includes 24-Hour Fitness founder Mark Mastrov, members of the Jacobs family with ties at Qualcomm Inc, and others from California. Ex-Facebook Inc executive Chris Kelly has also been identified as an investor."It is an honor and a privilege to be part of such an amazing community," Ranadive, the Chairman and CEO of business software maker Tibco Software Inc, tweeted on Tuesday.Ranadive and his group also plan for a new downtown arena.Fund-manager Hansen has long vowed to bring a team back to Seattle and rename it the SuperSonics after the team the city lost to Oklahoma City.As wrangling over the team mounted, Hansen increased his bid for a controlling interest in the Kings to $406 million, which valued the team at an unprecedented $625 million. He already has a deal with the city to build a new arena.But last month, a committee of NBA owners voted that the team should stay in Sacramento.
INDIANAPOLIS — This is not the first time the Miami Heat and the Indiana Pacers have been tied 2-2 in a playoff series. Just last year, in the Eastern Conference semifinals, the teams were deadlocked heading into a Game 5 in Miami.Somehow, though, after the Pacers' 99-92 win Tuesday at Bankers Life Fieldhouse effectively turned the East finals into a three-game series, there's a far different feel than there was in 2012. On both sides of this growing rivalry, the intensity has been heightened."It was, like this whole series has been, just great play after great play after great play," Pacers Coach Frank Vogel said.Heat Coach Erik Spoelstra said simply, "It's playoff competition at its best."For the Pacers to advance to the finals against the San Antonio Spurs, at some point they'll have to hang a losing streak on the Heat. Miami hasn't lost consecutive games since early January.If LeBron James was under enormous pressure to win his first championship last season, the expectations for him and his team have only swelled. A 53-8 record since Jan. 10 will do that."We were able to come here and get home court," James said, a reference to the Heat's 114-96 victory in Game 3. "We feel good about that. It's a three-game series now, with two on our home floor if needed. We look forward to Game 5."A year ago in Game 4, the Pacers raced to an early lead but ultimately lost the game as James and Dwyane Wade combined for 70 points and 27 rebounds. On Tuesday, the Pacers jumped out to an 11-0 edge, and this time they protected their home court in eye-opening fashion. They outrebounded the Heat, 49-30, limited James in the post-up game and finished down the stretch as the team with better composure.The teams exchanged runs in the fourth quarter. The Pacers led by 81-72 early before Miami went on a 14-2 spree. With 5 minutes 13 seconds to play, the Heat held an 89-86 advantage, but the Pacers went on an 8-0 tear and never trailed from there."We knew we were going to take their punches," said Pacers guard George Hill. "And we knew we were going to have to throw punches back."Spoelstra lamented the fourth-quarter lead that disappeared. "They got us there in the fourth," he said. "We got what we wanted; it was a fourth-quarter lead, 89-86, going down the stretch. And they made bigger plays."The Pacers were clutch when it mattered most. Roy Hibbert (23 points, 12 rebounds) played like the best player on the floor in the fourth quarter. Lance Stephenson (20 points, 9-of-15 shooting) had his best outing since he scored 25 points in Indiana's closeout game against the Knicks.James scored 24 points to lead Miami before fouling out with 56 seconds to play. Mario Chalmers had 20, his high game of the playoffs.It was the first time James had fouled out since last June, in a playoff game against the Celtics."They did a good job of taking away our first option," James said. "Sometimes our second option. I believe, though, that we had some really good looks and some of them just didn't go down. You give a lot of credit to their D."The game picked up intensity as Indiana closed the third quarter on a 23-10 run. With the score 71-67 in favor of Indiana, James closed in on a Hill breakaway and swatted his layup attempt out to center court. George and Ray Allen collided going for the ball, with George whistled for a foul. As George smacked the flood in frustration, Vogel gestured angrily from the bench and was called for a technical foul.In the final moments of the quarter, James threw a left elbow as he dribbled by West and was hit with a foul. The Pacers inbounded under their own basket with two seconds on the clock, giving Stephenson just enough time to nail a 3-pointer from the corner as time expired. Indiana led, 77-70.With this series tied, all the pregame talk looking ahead to a possible Heat-Spurs final suddenly seems premature. The focus is on Game 5 of a series that looks every bit as competitive as it did after the Pacers' Game 2 win in Miami."The most important game is Game 5," West said. "And we're going to do whatever we have to do to win that ballgame."
INDIANAPOLIS — In 765 career regular-season games, LeBron James had fouled out of four of them. In 127 playoff games, he had fouled out once. Then came Tuesday night.With under a minute to play in the fourth quarter, and Miami trailing the Indiana Pacers by 4 points, Heat guard Dwyane Wade stood dribbling at the top of the key. James stepped above the free-throw line to set a screen and Wade dribbled toward him. James made contact with Lance Stephenson, the man guarding Wade, and a whistle was blown.James was called for his sixth foul. He held out his hands and stared, mouth agape and incredulous, from referee to referee, as if to plead for a second opinion. Then he trudged toward the bench, done for the night."I didn't believe it was an offensive foul," he said after the Pacers completed a 99-92 win to even the Eastern Conference finals at two games apiece. "I felt like I was stationary. Lance actually ran into me."In a league rife with conspiracy theories about officiating and star players getting preferential treatment from referees, James's relegation to the bench for the closing moments of a playoff game was every bit as surprising as the Pacers bouncing back from a blowout loss in Game 3."Without him, they're not the same team," Stephenson said. "That helped us a lot."The only other time James had fouled out in the postseason was in Game 4 of last season's conference finals against the Boston Celtics, a Heat loss that knotted that series at two apiece, as well. That instance, though, came in overtime.As against the Celtics, the Heat would again falter down the stretch Tuesday night without their best player. After forcing a turnover on the Pacers' ensuing possession after James's foul, Wade passed to Shane Battier, who nailed a 3-pointer and appeared to cut the lead to one. But Wade was called for traveling. It was another call that drew quizzical looks from the Heat players."I have two kids and I need to put them through college, so I'm not going to respond to anything about the officiating," Battier said. "It was a hard-fought game. We didn't play well enough to win."In the postgame news conference, James, too, questioned more than just his sixth foul. He wondered about a call that went against him when he stepped in front of Paul George on a drive, and another when he was called for a push against David West in the third quarter."It was a couple of calls that I didn't feel like were fouls on me," said James, who finished with 24 points, 6 rebounds and 5 assists.As the series has progressed, the officiating has become an increasingly popular story line. Before Games 3 and 4, the Heat faced questions about flopping, and James said it was a useful tool if it could give his team an advantage. In the Heat's previous series, Chicago Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau said James flopped. Last year in the playoffs, Pacers Coach Frank Vogel was fined for accusing Miami of the same tactic.In Game 3 against the Pacers, Wade appeared to exaggerate contact along the baseline when he fell out of bounds without much of a push. In Game 4, bodies continued to hit the deck, and at several points in the game the Bankers Life Fieldhouse crowd chanted, "Beat the floppers."The Pacers also appeared to do a little acting of their own. Stephenson recoiled from contact from what looked to be a phantom elbow from Ray Allen as the two ran down the court. No foul was called."You just want to protect yourself," West said of exercising caution when players are on the floor so often. "You don't want somebody falling into your knee or legs or something like that."Heat players insisted that come Game 5 in Miami on Thursday, there would be no attention paid to the referees."We just have to concentrate on what we can do, control what we can control," Heat forward Chris Bosh said. "That's something we always talk about. No matter how the game is called or what the pace is, if we do what we do, we'll have a chance."James agreed, despite his disappointment on a night when he was forced to watch the game's deciding moments from the bench."You would like to be out there on the floor, especially me," he said. "Be there for my teammates, especially in the closing minutes when we have a chance to win."
A new owner is in place. A new coach is on the way. And for the first time in 14 years, Sacramento Kings fans can celebrate a new era.The Maloof family completed the sale of the Kings and Sleep Train Arena to a group led by TIBCO Software chairman Vivek Ranadive on Friday, officially transferring ownership of the NBA franchise. Ranadive's group acquired a 65 percent controlling interest in the team at a total franchise valuation of more than $534 million, topping the NBA record of $450 million that Joe Lacob and Peter Guber paid for the Golden State Warriors in 2010."We are pleased for both the Maloof family and the Ranadive group, but particularly pleased for the fans of the Kings," NBA Commissioner David Stern said.Brothers George, Joe and Gavin Maloof also released statements thanking NBA owners, Stern and the family's limited partners with the Kings. George Maloof specifically praised Sacramento Mayor Kevin Johnson and the City Council "for their efforts and loyalty to the Sacramento community."Ranadive, a former minority owner of the Warriors, already has been busy making moves to rebuild the fallen franchise.The Kings have an agreement in place with Warriors assistant Mike Malone to become their head coach, a person familiar with the decision told The Associated Press. The person, speaking on condition of anonymity because they weren't authorized to speak publicly, said Malone was Ranadive's top choice.The Kings released a statement late Friday afternoon confirming Keith Smart, who had one year remaining on his contract, was fired as coach. Smart took over the Kings for the fired Paul Westphal in January 2012, and he was dismissed by the Warriors in similar fashion by new owners following the 2010-11 season."I enjoyed my time immensely in Sacramento," Smart said. "From working with the people in basketball operations to the business side of the organization to interacting with the people of the city, it was a pleasure to be around such a classy group."Ranadive still has to hire a general manager — a move that typically comes before finding a coach; the contract for president of basketball operations Geoff Petrie ends June 30.In a statement released through the Kings, Ranadive thanked all involved."Mayor Kevin Johnson and the leadership group of Sacramento should be commended for their relentless efforts, hard work and tireless drive to keep the Kings in the city where they belong," Ranadive said. "We also extend our thanks to the Maloof Family for their support and cooperation throughout the sale process. Because of their efforts, this team has risen to an impressive legacy, which includes the most passionate fanbase in the NBA."Again, thank you to Sacramento Kings fans for their unwavering commitment and loyalty to myself and this organization. Without them, this success would not have become a reality. At the end of the day, this team belongs to the people of Sacramento, and our mission is to support them. We are excited to begin the process of building a 21st century franchise that will be a source of pride and excitement for years to come."The sale's completion capped a comeback few outside California's capital city believed would happen.After owners blocked the Maloofs' agreement with investor Chris Hansen to buy and relocate the Kings to Seattle earlier in May at a total franchise valuation of $625 million, the family pushed ahead with the "backup offer" to sell the team to Ranadive's group.The Sacramento group also includes 24 Hour Fitness founder Mark Mastrov, former Facebook senior executive Chris Kelly and the Jacobs family that owns communications giant Qualcomm."We congratulate Vivek Ranadive and the entire Sacramento investor group for their willingness to come forward and purchase the franchise for the people of Sacramento. We are confident they will provide the stewardship necessary to continue to guide the organization to successful levels," George Maloof said."Congratulations Sacramento!" Johnson wrote on Twitter. He also thanked the NBA, the outgoing and incoming owners of the Kings, and Sacramento residents.The transfer of the team ended the Maloof family's topsy-turvy reign as majority owners of the team.The Kings reached the playoffs for the first seven years under the Maloofs and missed each of the last seven. Sacramento won back-to-back Pacific Division titles in the 2001-02 and 2002-03 seasons, advancing to the 2002 Western Conference finals, when it lost in heartbreaking fashion to the eventual champion Los Angeles Lakers in seven games.After that, the franchise started its slow and painful decline.The Maloofs, once the toast of Sacramento, fell out of favor with fans. The suburban arena aged rapidly. Ticket sales declined. And the family explored moving the franchise to Las Vegas, Anaheim and Virginia Beach over several years until announcing an agreement with Hansen's group in January.Led by Johnson, Sacramento fought back and made it too difficult for NBA owners to allow the Kings to move to Seattle. The mayor, a former NBA All-Star guard, got the Sacramento City Council to approve a non-binding financing plan for a $447 million downtown arena with a $258 million public subsidy.The Maloofs still had to agree to sell the franchise to Ranadive's group. And in the end, they did — after raising the value of the franchise to a record price."The success of the Sacramento Kings has been due largely in part to the dedication and enthusiasm of our team members, coaches, players, and fans," Joe Maloof said. "Since our family has owned the franchise, the people of Sacramento have warmly brought the Kings into their hearts and for that we will always be grateful. As we look forward to an exciting new chapter in our family business enterprise, we will never forget the people of Sacramento and everything they have done for the Kings organization."
INDIANAPOLIS — Indiana staggered Miami with one more big punch Saturday night.Now the Pacers have a fighting chance to pull off a stunning playoff upset.Roy Hibbert did everything but pull out the boxing gloves in Game 6, finishing with 24 points and 11 rebounds, and continually contesting Miami's shots to help Indiana stave off elimination with an emphatic 91-77 victory over the defending champs.Paul George scored 28 points, had eight rebounds and five assists, and the Pacers held Miami to 36.1 percent shooting as they booked a trip back to Miami for Game 7 on Monday night."Myself and David (West), we throw ourselves in the fray, in the paint. We like to muck it up," Hibbert said. "Paul and myself, we wanted to make sure we got this for him as well. We didn't want this to be our last game."Instead, after winning their first division crown since 2004, the Pacers are one win away from advancing to the NBA Finals for only the second time in franchise history. They lost to the Lakers 4-2 in 2000. They haven't played a decisive seventh game in the conference finals since losing to Chicago in 1998.And amazingly, they've done it this time against the defending champions who many considered virtually invincible after winning 27 straight during the regular season, finishing with a franchise-record 66 wins and having won 23 of their last 24 road games before losing Games 4 and 6 in Indianapolis.But the Pacers have pushed four-time MVP LeBron James and his high-scoring, high-profile teammates to the brink of elimination by punching back, and Game 6 followed a familiar story line. The Pacers had a 53-33 rebounding advantage, outscored Miami 44-22 in the paint and limited Miami's shooters to 16 of 54, 29.6 percent, from inside the arc.James led the Heat with 29 points on 10-of-21 shooting. Nobody else scored more than 10.How have the Pacers done it? With Hibbert controlling the inside after adding MMA training to his offseason regiment."Roy Hibbert is making extraordinary plays in the pocket, poise in the pocket we call it," coach Frank Vogel said. "He's getting paint catches and just having great poise, great reads. He's not plowing over guys. He had a charge in Game 5, but has been under control."It was everything an elimination game should be. The teams traded baskets and jabs, sometimes literally, and players ignored the bumps and bruises of yet another wrestling match that has made this tough-guy series compelling.Both teams attacked the basket, sometimes with problematic results. Indiana missed about five dunk attempts in the first half and a series of short jumpers, too, costing them precious points.The Heat struggled, meanwhile, starting the game just 3 of 22 from inside the 3-point line. Miami's Big Three — James, Dwyane Wade and Chris Bosh — went just 14 of 40. Excluding James, Miami managed only 16 baskets — eight 3s and eight 2s.With Chris "Birdman" Andersen suspended for the game because of a shoving incident with Indiana forward Tyler Hansbrough on Thursday, the Heat couldn't keep up with Indiana's big rebounders inside. Even Lance Stephenson, who was not effective at Miami, finished with four points, 12 rebounds and four assists.Indiana's loud crowd created a hostile atmosphere, too. Fans chanted "Heat Are Floppers!" sporadically throughout the second half, urging the Pacers to play harder, to defend better and to make another trip home. The only way to do that is to win Game 7 and avoid a second straight playoff elimination at the hands of the Heat.For Miami, the stakes were so high that when James was called for an offensive foul midway through the fourth quarter, he lost his cool. James protested by running from one end of the court to the other, drawing a technical foul, and when Miami assistant coach David Fizdale showed his support for the league's four-time MVP, it drew another technical.George Hill answered by making free throws and Hibbert followed that with a layup, ending any chance of Miami making a late comeback.James said he was trying to avoid an ejection and would up spending the last 66 seconds sitting a few seats down from the Heat bench cheering on his teammates."Explain it? You seen it. It was total domination by the Pacers in the third," James said when asked what happened to the league's most dominant team on Saturday. "They made a lot of shots, we didn't get too many stops and we missed some very, very easy shots."It was a complete reversal from Game 5, when Miami took control by outscoring the Pacers 30-13 in the third.This time, against one of the league's top offensive teams, the Pacers gave up only six points in the first eight minutes of the quarter, using a 14-2 run to turn a 40-39 halftime deficit into a 66-49 lead with 1:15 left in the quarter. Hibbert scored nine in the quarter.Miami did close to within 68-55 after three, but it was too big a deficit to overcome — even with James running the show."They just flat-out beat us in every facet of the game. They just outclassed us in that (third) quarter," Miami coach Erik Spoelstra said.The Heat rallied early in the fourth, taking advantage of Indiana's 1 for 6 start from the field. When Mike Miller hit back-to-back 3s, the Pacers' lead was down to 70-64 and when James scored on a layup with 5:54 to play, the Heat were within 72-68.But the run ended abruptly when George hit a 3, Miami's Joel Anthony was called for a loose ball foul on the offensive end and David West grabbed an offensive rebound and scored on a dunk to extend the lead to 77-68. Then came the technical flurry that finished it off.West scored 11 points and had 14 rebounds despite playing with an upper respiratory infection that prompted Vogel to send him home early from the Pacers' morning shootaround.He played with a fighter's mentality and gave the Pacers one more shot at the champs."We've come too far not to play," West said. "I'm not feeling good now although this win helps. I'm sure I'll be better tomorrow and I'll be ready for Monday."Notes: Miami matched its season-low point total (77), which also occurred against the Pacers at Bankers Life Fieldhouse on Jan. 8. ... Miami finished the season 1-4 at Indiana, losing twice in the regular season and twice in the playoffs. ... After the game, Hibbert criticized the media for not recognizing the Pacers as a good team — using a foul two-word expletive that will almost certainly draw a fine from the league. ... Former Brooklyn and Los Angeles Dodgers pitcher Carl Erskine performed the National Anthem on a harmonica.
MIAMI — Perched on a familiar dais, sitting on the verge of another trip to the N.B.A. finals, LeBron James took a moment to reflect, while his train of thought took a curious detour, to another time and place and state of mind.James had been brilliant (again) Thursday night, making every critical pass, rebound and jump shot to lead the Miami Heat to a 90-79 victory and a 3-2 lead over the Indiana Pacers in the Eastern Conference finals. Dwyane Wade was hobbling, Chris Bosh was drifting, and so it was left to James to seize control of the game, the series, his own fate.This was not an unfamiliar feeling."I kind of just went back to my Cleveland days," James said, comparing his 16-point third-quarter outburst to his former solo act with the Cavaliers.The statement was semi-startling — in part because James so rarely refers to his Cleveland years, but mostly because his migration to South Beach was supposed to lift the taxing burden that made those years ultimately unfulfilling.James left home and risked his reputation three years ago because he knew, better than anyone, that he needed highly skilled help to win a title, and that help was never coming to Quicken Loans Arena. There were no Wades or Boshes in Cleveland, to say nothing of Battiers, Allens or Haslems.James already has his vindication — a glittering, diamond-encrusted ring that says World Champions — but repeating may prove as great a challenge as dragging Boobie Gibson and Drew Gooden to the 2007 finals.The Heat's vaunted Superfriends alliance has been diminished in this postseason and in this series in particular, leaving James to carry a heavier load once more. Bosh has been overpowered and outshone by Roy Hibbert, the Pacers' towering and quickly blossoming young center. Wade is clearly not himself, or at least not the Wade who ranked as a top-three player on the day that he and James joined forces.Although the Heat prefer to avoid the topic, Wade has been hampered throughout the spring by a right knee injury that has been described as a bone bruise but might be more serious, based on Wade's production.Through 13 playoff games, he is averaging 13.9 points — nearly 9 points below his average in Miami's 2012 title run, and well below his 21.2 this past season. He is earning a mere 3.5 free throws a game, less than half his career average.There are nights when the knee feels sturdy and the old Wade returns, with a drive, a fast-break dunk, a nifty maneuver in the lane. But he does not know which nights or which quarters the knee will cooperate.Despite the obvious limitations, Wade has been effective in spots, shooting 46 percent while averaging 5.5 assists and 4.8 rebounds. He has had three games of 18 or more points in this series, so the potential for a breakout is always there, but the Heat cannot expect it.On Friday, Wade said he was focused on doing "small things" — passing, defending, drawing the defense — "until my body lets me do more." He hinted at the possibility of a deeper issue, and perhaps off-season surgery, when he said, "I got five more games to win, and then I can get better."So the Heat might require much more of Cleveland LeBron than of Miami LeBron as they try to finish off the Pacers and advance to their third straight finals, to meet the San Antonio Spurs — the team that swept James in his first career finals.If there is one thing we know about James — every version, from the man-child who entered the league in 2003 to the fully evolved superstar who claimed his first title last June — it is that he will do whatever is necessary, making the right decisions more often than not, elevating his teammates as few players in N.B.A. history have.In Cleveland, James routinely carried overmatched, under-talented rosters much further than was reasonable. The Cavaliers went at least two rounds in each of his last five seasons, including one finals appearance and two trips to the conference finals."No matter who's on the court with him, he's capable of doing great things," Wade said, "because of his ability not only to score the basketball in many ways, but his ability to make others better and get other guys easier looks."Fun water cooler debate: name the second-best Cavaliers player during James's seven-year tenure. Zydrunas Ilgauskas? Mo Williams? Anderson Varejao? Larry Hughes? A 38-year-old Shaquille O'Neal?Here's another: has any star taken a team with less talent to the N.B.A. finals than James did in 2007? The Cavaliers' second option that year was Hughes, a vastly overpaid high-volume shooter. Their starting lineup included Gooden, Gibson and the plodding Ilgauskas.It was little surprise when that group was swept by the Spurs of Tim Duncan, Tony Parker and Manu Ginobili. At the time, James could only gaze across the court with envy."Obviously, I needed more," James said Friday. "Our team, we were really good, but we weren't great. That was a great team." He added, "We continued to get better over the years, but we never got to that level."More to the point, the Cavaliers never brought James a worthy co-star, so he had to go find his own in Miami. Even with an ailing Wade, James will be much better armed for his rematch with the Spurs should the Heat advance to the finals.On the night the Spurs claimed the 2007 championship, Duncan and James happened upon each other in an arena corridor, the decorated veteran offering prescient insight to the neophyte star."This is going to be your league in a little while," Duncan told James then, before adding wryly, "I appreciate you giving us this year."The two men burst into laughter, but the truth was apparent and inevitable. James was coming for the crown. The league is his now. And if the two men meet again next week, he surely won't be as charitable.
At some point Thursday night in Game 5 of the N.B.A. Eastern Conference finals LeBron James realized he was not only on a stage but on it by himself. His supporting cast had deserted him, leaving him as a one-man show. He was not the least bit happy about it, but the N.B.A. was not going to give him longer than a quarter to round up his Miami Heat cast members again, and screaming at them wasn't working, so the LeBron Show went on.Against the Indiana Pacers, it worked. It brought the house down. It was LeBron in full, particularly in the third quarter, when his annoyance reached its peak and all of the indignities of the past few games cranked his furnace up to high. As Dave Hyde points out in The Sun-Sentinel, when he sat down to rest for a few minutes in the fourth quarter, the Heat's lead instantly shrank. Not that he needed any reminding at that point what was happening, but you could almost see him thinking, even a king needs to sit down for a few minutes, guys. Sheesh.At this point, the Big Three was a fantasy, Adrian Wojnarowski writes on Yahoo.com, a relic of what suddenly felt like a bygone era. While plenty of people were happy to cheer James's dominance, Ian Thomsen writes on SI.com, he made his unhappiness painfully clear to his teammates, writes Ken Berger on CBSSports.com, and his comments about returning to "my Cleveland days" were certainly meant to shame them into returning to the stage.Yes, as Greg Cote writes in The Miami Herald, James on his own is more than enough to hold off the Pacers. He could cut through all the noise, the pregame fixation on flopping by him and others, the idea that someone like Lance Stephenson could be taunting him in this series — yes, Brian Windhorst writes on ESPN.com, Stephenson provided any extra motivation James might have needed — and carry the whole show by himself.But surely he also realized the San Antonio Spurs, the quintessential ensemble cast, were sitting in their ice baths at the home for aging basketball players, waiting for the N.B.A. finals, saying, "Hmm, the Big Three reduced to a Big One, a medium and a small. ..." That explains the anger in even the most dazzling of one-man shows.With James swatting aside any thoughts of an upset, one had to flip over to the Mets-Yankees baseball series to find any real sporting chaos Thursday night, as the Mets were polishing off an unthinkable four-game sweep, the final two at Yankee Stadium. This did not go over well in Dynastyville, with Ian O'Connor of ESPN.com picturing an afterlife tirade by George Steinbrenner. For some reason the Yankees have served as a sort of rehab program for the bedraggled Mets, Filip Bondy writes in The Daily News, although Mike Vaccaro argues in The New York Post that the series may end up helping both teams in their own way. The Yankees have an influx of regulars coming back to the lineup, Mark Feinsand writes in The Daily News, which did not seem that crucial until now, and the Mets have not exactly been cured of being the Mets.An extended convalescence by Yankees outfielder Curtis Granderson gave him time to think about donating $5 million to his alma mater, Illinois-Chicago, for a baseball stadium. And everyone else sitting around in rehab most likely took note of the events in Boston Thursday, when Jacoby Ellsbury stole a team-record five bases and took one home as a souvenir, Gordon Edes writes on ESPN.com.It was, after all, a good day for one-man shows.
MIAMI — Indiana Pacers center Roy Hibbert was fined $75,000 by the National Basketball Association (NBA) on Sunday after a post-game press conference outburst which included an anti-gay slur.Hibbert scored 24 points as the Pacers beat the Miami Heat 91-77 on Saturday to force a deciding game seven in South Florida on Monday but the 26-year-old responded with a rant in the televised press conference.Hibbert used the phrase "no homo" to describe his play and also attacked the media, using foul language when asked to discuss his low place in voting for the Defensive Player of the Year.The league said in a statement that Hibbert had used "inappropriate and vulgar language".Before the fine, Hibbert had issued an apology on the Pacer's official website."I am apologizing for insensitive remarks made during the postgame press conference after our victory over Miami Saturday night," read Hibbert's statement."They were disrespectful and offensive and not a reflection of my personal views. I used a slang term that is not appropriate in any setting, private or public, and the language I used definitely has no place in a public forum, especially over live television."I apologize to those who I have offended, to our fans and to the Pacers' organization. I sincerely have deep regret over my choice of words last night," he said.The NBA noted Hibbert's statement but said he still deserved a fine."While Roy has issued an apology, which is no doubt sincere, a fine is necessary to reinforce that such offensive comments will not be tolerated by the NBA," said commissioner David Stern.After the press conference, Hibbert sent a tweet to fellow NBA player Jason Collins, who in April became the first active player in the league to come out as a gay."Hey can I get a follow? Would like to discuss somethings with you," read the tweet from Hibbert which was later deleted.
INDIANAPOLIS — Ninety minutes before tipoff Saturday night, LeBron James stretched out his lengthy frame on the floor of the visitors' locker room at Bankers Life Fieldhouse, headphones over his ears, lyrics flowing from his lips."No, it can't get no better for me," he repeated several times, while stretching various limbs before Game 6 of the Eastern Conference finals.For the last three springs, that has generally been an indisputable point, or at least one not worth arguing in the vicinity of the Miami Heat. They take the victories when they want them, treating each opponent like an inconvenient speed bump on the road to the finals.Some bumps are larger, bolder and more intractable than others.The Indiana Pacers — young, proud, boisterous, too stubborn to cede the stage — refused to send the Heat to the finals on Saturday night, instead sending them to a stunning 91-77 defeat, knotting the series at 3-3.Paul George was electric, with 28 points, 8 rebounds and 5 assists in the Pacers' most impressive victory of the postseason. Roy Hibbert was unyielding, scoring 24 points, grabbing 11 rebounds and turning back James at the rim on the night's most critical play in the paint.The plucky upstart role no longer seems to fit. The Pacers are one victory from dethroning the defending champions and heading to the finals themselves."There's a lot of fight in those guys, a lot of heart, a lot of guts," Pacers Coach Frank Vogel said. "And some pretty good talent, too."For the second straight year, the Heat will need to win a Game 7 to make the finals. Tipoff is Monday night at 8:30 in Miami.Heat Coach Erik Spoelstra called the all-or-nothing game "a treasure" — a euphemism to conceal the disappointment and utter disarray of his star-studded lineup.James had 29 points, 7 rebounds and 6 assists in 42 minutes on Saturday, but he was hardly transcendent, and his co-stars were practically translucent. Dwyane Wade and Chris Bosh shot 4 for 19 from the field, combining for just 15 points and turning James, again, into a soloist. After James, the Heat's highest scorers were Wade and Mario Chalmers, with 10 points each.Miami's point total, assists (10) and field-goal percentage (.361) were all low points in this postseason. The Heat had not been held under 80 points since Jan. 8 — also in a loss to Indiana. As it happens, the Heat also have not lost consecutive games since losing to Indiana and Portland that week.That streak seems less meaningful at the moment than the utterly fragile appearance of Wade, who is coping with an injured right knee, and Bosh, who is coping with a complete deterioration of his game.Wade missed a series of point-blank shots at the rim. Bosh mostly shot jumpers, going 1 for 8."I believe in my teammates," James said. "They are struggling right now, obviously."Miami had a 40-39 lead at halftime, but the Pacers erupted in the third quarter, pouncing on a series of miscues for a 21-4 run that turned the tide for good. Hibbert had 7 points in the run, including a powerful driving dunk after he spun away from Joel Anthony at the top of the key. George had 7 points in the rally, which was fueled by six Heat turnovers.Indiana pushed the lead as high as 17 points in the quarter."It was total domination by the Pacers in the third," James said.The Heat rallied early in the fourth, with Mike Miller hitting consecutive 3-pointers and James driving for consecutive layups, cutting the deficit to 72-68. But George hit a 3-pointer and David West followed with a dunk, and soon the Heat were unraveling again.James was called for a questionable offensive foul as he drove into Hibbert deep in the paint. Shocked, James turned up his palms and sprinted the length of the court in protest, drawing a technical foul from Monty McCutcheon. The Heat assistant David Fizdale drew a second technical for complaining. George Hill — who had a resurgent game, with 16 points and 6 assists — made both free throws, pushing the lead back into double digits."I had to run down the court to stop from being kicked out," James explained, indicating that he would have otherwise blown up at the official who made the call, Tony Brothers. "I thought it was a pretty bad call. I don't complain about calls too much, but I thought me and Hibbert met at the mountaintop. And I didn't throw an elbow; basically, I went straight up."The subsequent technical foul apparently was triggered by James's full-court sprint of protest, and nothing more. "I said absolutely nothing," he said.Miami had won its last six elimination games, dating to the first round of 2012, the start of their title run. The 14-point defeat was the Heat's biggest of the postseason.
ATLANTA — Former NBA player Mookie Blaylock was charged on Monday with vehicular homicide after a head-on traffic crash in Georgia that left a 43-year-old woman dead, police said.Blaylock, 46, was driving a 2010 Cadillac Escalade on Friday in Clayton County, south of Atlanta, when he crossed over the center line into oncoming traffic and struck a minivan carrying the woman, police said.In addition to facing a second-degree vehicular homicide charge, Blaylock has been charged with driving with a suspended license and failure to maintain his lane.Authorities are investigating whether drugs or alcohol contributed to the accident and whether Blaylock suffered from a medical condition that caused seizures, Jonesboro Police Chief Frank Allen said on Monday.The woman's husband, who was driving the van, was not seriously hurt.Blaylock remains hospitalized in stable condition after being injured in the crash. He refused to talk to police investigators who attempted to interview him on Monday, Allen said."His attorney had advised him not to speak with us," the police chief said.Blaylock's attorney was not publicly identified and could not be contacted for comment.Blaylock had already been the subject of an arrest warrant before Friday's accident. A warrant was issued on May 21 for failure to appear in court on drug possession and drunken- driving charges in a nearby county, Allen said.Upon his release from the hospital, Blaylock will be jailed in one of the two counties where he faces charges, Allen added.Blaylock played in the National Basketball Association from 1989 to 2002. His ability to shut down opposing players twice earned him a place on the NBA All-Defensive First Team, and he was an NBA All-Star in 1994.He played with the Atlanta Hawks from 1992 to 1999 and also spent time with the New Jersey Nets and Golden State Warriors.
The news that Mookie Blaylock, a former N.B.A. point guard, was involved in a car accident over the weekend hit the members of Pearl Jam like a tragedy in the family. In many ways, it was one.After all, before Pearl Jam was called Pearl Jam, the band was called Mookie Blaylock. The band's first album, "Ten," which became one of the iconic albums of the 1990s, was named after Blaylock's jersey number."I was a huge Mookie fan," Jeff Ament, Pearl Jam's bassist, said in an interview.Out of all the players in the world, why Blaylock? He had quick hands and made the All-Star team once, but he was hardly a franchise player.Part of it was his "superunique name," Ament said, but Pearl Jam also includes some serious basketball fans, and the band admired Blaylock's game."He was really unselfish; great shooter; great fundamentals," Ament said.Blaylock became forever entwined with the band around the time that Eddie Vedder, Ament and the other founding members started recording music together in Seattle. As Ament tells the story, the band would rip open packs of basketball cards during lunch breaks, competing to see who got the best players."One of the cards that went to my manager, and ended up in a cassette, was Mookie's card," Ament said. "Fast-forward a couple of weeks: we got offered the Alice in Chains tour on the West Coast. The cassette was sitting on the desk, and somebody said, 'What about Mookie Blaylock?' "The name stuck, at least for a while."As time went on, we sort of created a little bit of a monster out of the name," Ament said. "We never intended it to actually be the name of the band."The band changed its name to Pearl Jam, released "Ten" and went on to become one of the most successful bands of the past 20 years. But the ties to Blaylock remained.Blaylock, who retired in 2002, was driving a sport utility vehicle Friday afternoon in an Atlanta suburb when he was said to have crossed the median and slammed into a van. A passenger in the van, Monica Murphy, 40, died. Blaylock, who is in serious condition, is charged with driving on a suspended license and failing to stay in his lane, according to the Jonesboro police.Ament said he had been in touch with people involved in basketball to get updates on Blaylock's condition. The band posted a get-well message on its Instagram account along with a photo of an old Pearl Jam T-shirt featuring a picture of Blaylock, now 46, in a Nets jersey.Ament remembers watching Blaylock play in college for Oklahoma, and he tracked Blaylock through his career, first with the Nets and later with the Atlanta Hawks and the Golden State Warriors.Ament said he got to meet Blaylock when his team traveled to Seattle to play the SuperSonics. They talked about fishing, a shared passion, and played H-O-R-S-E. "I think I did get a couple of letters on him," Ament said.Ament said: "You always worry when you meet people who have been on your radar for that long, rock stars included. He was one of the one out of 10 guys who exceeds your expectations, in terms of how nice he was."Last week, just a few days before the accident, Ament came across a photo he had not seen in more than a decade, he said. It was a picture of him and Blaylock together; he put it aside to get it framed.Ament suspects that Blaylock probably does not have a framed photo of Pearl Jam in his house and that Blaylock probably does not dwell on his status as a rock 'n' roll footnote."It doesn't have to be reciprocating props," Ament said. "I went and played basketball with him, and he said: 'You do have game! You have a good shot; you have a nice rotation.' I was like, 'Awesome.' That was all I was looking for."
NEW YORK — With the Miami Heat playing in Game 7 of the Eastern Conference finals, fewer television viewers tuned in than last year.The Heat's 99-76 win over the Indiana Pacers on Monday night still drew the highest rating ever for an NBA game on TNT with a 7.1.The 11.5 million viewers were down from 13.3 million for Miami's Game 7 victory over the Celtics last season on ESPN. Boston is a much larger market than Indianapolis, and the Celtics have more of a national following than the Pacers. That decisive game was also more competitive than Monday's, when the Heat led by 15 points at halftime.Ratings measure the percentage of U.S. homes with televisions tuned to a program.
MIAMI — The beacon that drew LeBron James to South Beach on that fateful July day three years ago was not a glowing trophy or the bright, bright Florida sun. It was the promise of a partnership and the certain glory that would come with it.James and Dwyane Wade. Wade and James. Two basketball titans, one powerful friendship, and a parade route to be determined.The arrangement has occasionally been tested at times this spring, by the Indiana Pacers' stiff defense and by Wade's bothersome knee, but the two found themselves back in perfect harmony Monday night, just in time to save the postseason and their championship defense.James blitzed the Pacers, Wade reclaimed his game and soon the Miami Heat were celebrating their third straight finals berth with a 99-76 rout in an anticlimactic Game 7 of the Eastern Conference finals.Miami will battle the San Antonio Spurs for the title, with the series opening Thursday night at American Airlines Arena.The Heat's return to the this stage had long been assumed, but their fate suddenly seemed shaky after a taut six games against the Pacers, amid nagging concerns that their offense had devolved into a one-dimensional, LeBron-centric affair.Then Wade broke loose for 21 points and 9 rebounds on Monday, supporting a 32-point, 8-rebound, 4-assist effort by James, and all seemed right again."We wasn't going to win this game with just LeBron being amazing tonight," Wade said. "He's been amazing, but we need timely scores, we needed everyone to be really involved."That was the plea Wade broadcast publicly after the Heat absorbed a 14-point drubbing in Game 6, and it became the agenda for closing out this series. James was still dominant, making 8 of 17 shots and 15 of 16 free throws, but he made a point of feeding Wade and Chris Bosh early and often. Their equilibrium restored, the Heat built a 15-point lead in the first half and never relented."Obviously, we're a much better team when we have everyone clicking at the same time," James said. "We've had more games where everyone was clicking than not so. It just happened that this series, guys were just not in a rhythm, not feeling like themselves."James volunteered at the morning shootaround to guard Paul George, the Pacers' star forward, allowing Wade to take a breather on defense and channel his energy into driving to the basket."Any little pressure I could take off D-Wade, I wanted to do that," James said.The lopsided finale left a skewed final image of what had been a highly charged, intensely competitive series that revealed the Pacers — an understated, underestimated team all season — to be worthy title contenders. Neither team won consecutive games in the series. And Indiana came within 2.2 seconds, and one James layup, of what could have been a 2-0 lead to start the series.George and Roy Hibbert led the Pacers this far, beyond all expectations, but the task of closing out the defending champion Heat proved overwhelming. George, who turned this postseason into his personal launching pad for stardom, scored only 7 points before fouling out early in the fourth quarter. Hibbert finished with 18 points and 8 rebounds, but he was limited by foul trouble and largely contained all night.Bosh, who felt the need to apologize to his teammates for his passive play in the series, stood tall again, blocking three shots and grabbing eight rebounds.With the season on the line, the seasoned Heat eased into the moment, while the young Pacers seemed to tremble, committing 21 turnovers and getting knocked on their heels by Miami's aggressive play."They've taught us a lesson," Pacers Coach Frank Vogel said, adding: "They know how to ratchet up their defense at a level that just imposes their will on a basketball game. Our guys didn't handle it well."After getting outworked so many times this series, the Heat flipped the critical categories to close it out. They won the rebounding battle (43-36), outscored the Pacers in the paint (30-28) and buried them in second-chance points (22-12).
MIAMI — Besides going the distance and sparing the N.B.A. a yawning gap at the height of its 2013 postseason, the Eastern Conference finals may best be remembered for fast forwarding the overriding narrative for the 2013-14 regular season.With a nod to the itinerant tale of LeBron James's talent, we may prepare ourselves for what's certain to become an obsession that will take us to Decision II a year from now.Granted, it's a long way off. Much can happen, including a second straight title for the Heat after it blew away the too-turnover-prone Indiana Pacers, 99-76, on Monday night in Game 7 behind James's 32 points.But suffice to say that the presumed countdown to another Miami championship has at times sounded like a rush of sands moving south through an hourglass on the multiple title aspirations of James, Dwyane Wade and Chris Bosh.It wasn't so much that the Heat were taken the distance by the young-and-coming Pacers, while Tim Duncan and the San Antonio Spurs awaited the winner. Many a championship team has struggled with and arm-wrestled worthy opponents to reach the finish. The Heat were pushed to the brink by Boston in this round last year.But Miami's subplots seemed more serious than the standard playoff swings. The valiant challenge from the Pacers should not have obscured the looming threat from within a Miami foundation showing small but unmistakable signs of fracture.It's hard to argue with three consecutive trips to the finals, but for a good chunk of this series, the Heat, at best, looked like a team clinging to its mojo, James at the helm of an aging, fraying cast.From the beginning, the Heat were an arranged marriage of convenience, a business partnership of longstanding expectation. Strip that away, and what will be left?The finals outcome notwithstanding, the Heat and especially James will have to renew their vows after next season, with the principals capable of opting out after four years together. How attractive Wade, possibly in a state of irreversible decline, and the enigmatic Bosh will be to James next summer is difficult to say, but a risk-free speculation.Wade could, of course, be one surgical procedure from having his powers restored as the co-star James embraced after failing to win a championship as a lone star in Cleveland. At 31, Wade is hardly too old to recover. But the abandon with which he has played — a 6-foot-4 contortionist with a knack for being smacked to the floor by bigger men — may have altered his career body clock.His struggles in the playoffs last season were well documented, and this year, buckling under the strain of a damaged right knee, they have been worse.Wade's complaints after Game 6 that the Heat — but mainly James — needed to move the ball more to help create better shots for others may have been said more in frustration of what he physically could not do than what James could do for him.But Wade's comments may also have been a rebuttal to James's remark after Game 5, when he said he "went back" to his "Cleveland days" to explain his monopolizing of the ball in the third quarter. Was the reference an innocent commentary on a necessary decision he made to seize control of a swing game, or a peek inside the mind of a man already disappointed by being back in that position so soon?The team president Pat Riley recruited James during the summer of 2010 by dropping a bag of championship rings accumulated over decades onto a table. Wade also pitched James hard and the two by all appearances forged a close friendship, promising many more rings to come and happiness ever after.Before Game 7, Bosh promised that he and Wade would "do what we're supposed to do." Above all, except for the indefatigable James, Wade flashed his old familiar hops on the way to the hoop and to an occasion-rising 21-point night. But the Heat won with a swarming defensive assault that especially overwhelmed Paul George and had the Pacers turning over everything but their first born."I just felt better," Wade said, referring to the troublesome knee. It helped that James, in a morning conversation, told him that he would guard George to allow Wade to focus on his offense. With Mami rolling late in the game the two shared a tight hug.All good in the here and now. But at some point next year, James will have another gut-wrenching decision to make, much as it was in 2010. Stay home, where the heart is, or find a younger, more athletic version of Wade in another celebrating city.When he left Cleveland, James was comically treated like an enemy of the state for the crime of wanting to play on a better team. By now, he should know that even one title is enough to win back the capricious mainstream.Back on the league's biggest stage, Miami and San Antonio will make for a compelling series of ultimate contrasts in team-building cultures. There will be, or should be, a great deal of sentiment for Duncan, 37, and the small-market organization that has endured with him as its centerpiece in three decades.Matched against a more freewheeling opponent that does not play brawny basketball, Indiana style, the smallish Heat could well resemble the team that ran off 27 straight regular-season victories. So perhaps James and Wade will look back on the Pacers series and squabbles as nothing more than scenes from a marriage, the low end of thick and thin. But once these finals are over, get ready for a 2013-14 N.B.A. story line that will be dominating, fascinating and ultimately enervating.Even now, with Miami again four victories from a title, this microwaved championship city has to be asking itself: when Decision II is made, will it be lights, camera and a South Beach retraction for the best player on the planet?
In early April, as the Rutgers president, Robert L. Barchi, was working to defuse a coaching abuse scandal, he named Gregory S. Jackson, a university administrator, to be his chief of staff.Jackson, though, was already facing his own legal problems. About three months earlier, Jackson was sued by four longtime employees in the university's career services office, all in their late 50s and early 60s. They said that he had engaged in a "campaign of discriminatory actions" against them because of their age, ostracizing them and ultimately forcing their retirement. Barchi was aware of the lawsuit when he promoted Jackson, according to Rutgers officials.Knowledge of the lawsuit comes as Barchi is struggling to steer the university out of a public-relations crisis that has already upended the athletic department, drawn the ire of elected officials across New Jersey and threatened to snarl ambitious plans pushed by Gov. Chris Christie to restructure the university.Jackson is the third Rutgers official to face public criticism for discriminatory or abusive behavior in recent months. Mike Rice, the former men's basketball coach, was fired in April for hurling slurs and epithets at his players; Julie Hermann, the new athletic director, has been under fire amid allegations of misconduct at her previous jobs.One of the plaintiffs, Richard L. White, said in an interview that Jackson had created "an environment that was toxic, intimidating, bullying." He said he was "stunned" to learn of Jackson's promotion."It was unbelievable that the abuser was moving into an elevated role in what I would call a culture of abuse," said White, who was the director of career services at Rutgers for more than 20 years.Lawyers for Jackson and Rutgers, which was also sued, have denied the allegations of the four former employees and asked a New Jersey Superior Court to dismiss the complaint. Rutgers declined to comment on the specifics of the case because it is pending, but said that it did not disqualify Jackson from the job, and that lawsuits were common in such situations."The University views the plaintiffs' claims in this lawsuit as lacking merit, and plans to vigorously defend its business decisions made in restructuring the University's Office of Career Services," John Bennett, a lawyer for Rutgers, said.Rutgers officials pointed to an investigation last year by the university's Office of Employment Equity. That office "examined complaints of discrimination based on age and or sex in career services and found no evidence of such and no violation of university policy," Rutgers said in a statement.The plaintiff's lawyer, Juan Fernandez, dismissed that investigation as "a sham." Jackson did not respond to multiple requests for an interview, and Rutgers declined to make him available.Barchi announced Jackson's promotion April 10, eight days after video of Rice's abusive behavior was first made public. In a memo, Barchi called Jackson "an ideal person to fill this new position" and praised his "talent, experience, and knowledge of academic affairs."A Rutgers spokeswoman said in a statement Sunday night, "President Barchi believes that Professor Jackson is an effective administrator capable of confronting challenging and complex problems."In 2011, soon after Jackson took the job as associate vice president for undergraduate education that included oversight of career services, he began making changes to the department, which an external review later found to be "dysfunctional," a Rutgers spokesman said Monday. Jackson quickly clashed with leaders there, some of whom were sent to work in a nearby building that the employees referred to as "the island of misfit toys," the lawsuit said.Four career services employees — White, Chrystal McArthur, Dorothy Kerr and Mark Kerr — eventually sued Jackson, Rutgers and another department official for age discrimination.
He affected games without looking at the basket, made pinpoint bounce passes in transition to teammates and often left fans wondering what he was going to do next. Jason Kidd was the ultimate point guard for much of his 19-year career in the N.B.A., but at the end of his one season with the Knicks, his magic was no more.So it was not a surprise that the 40-year-old Kidd, the third-oldest player in the league, announced his retirement Monday with two years left on his contract with the Knicks. In his last month in a Knicks uniform, Kidd could barely put the ball in the basket. He did not score a point in the Knicks' second-round playoff series against the Indiana Pacers, and he missed his last 18 shots of the postseason.In the final two games against Indiana, Coach Mike Woodson played Kidd only 11 minutes."I've played the game for a long time," Kidd said in a radio interview Monday on ESPN. "This was the time to move on."Kidd's departure leaves three guards on the Knicks' roster: Raymond Felton, J. R. Smith and Iman Shumpert. However, Smith is expected to opt out of his contract to pursue free agency and is not certain to return. Shumpert may be needed in the frontcourt.Another useful guard, Pablo Prigioni, is a free agent and could also play elsewhere next season.But that is not Kidd's concern. Instead, he can let his career résumé speak for itself. As a distributor, rebounder and defender, he helped the Dallas Mavericks win a championship in 2011 in his second stint with the team. He drastically raised the visibility of the Nets when he led them to the N.B.A. finals in 2002 and 2003. The Phoenix Suns made the playoffs in all five seasons he played there."I wasn't a guy who looked to score first," Kidd said in the radio interview. "It was to get your teammates involved, to understand time and clock management and having fun with your teammates."Steve Kerr, a former N.B.A. player and executive who is now an analyst for TNT, said: "What impresses me the most is he went from in his prime being the flashiest passer in the league — much like Magic Johnson — to becoming one of the most efficient passers in the league in terms of generating ball movement. It's interesting that he had that kind of range. His passing was always making an impact."But perhaps Kidd's biggest, and most surprising, transformation was in becoming a reliable shooter from the perimeter. He is third on the career list for 3-point baskets, with 1,988."Early in his career, you'd give him a 3-pointer," Kerr said, "and later, he was a killer from there. He has a brilliant basketball mind. He figured out things and how to battle age. He morphed into a totally different player."Although Kidd displayed class and composure on the court, his behavior off it could be more unpredictable.Soon after he signed with the Knicks, Kidd was charged with drunken driving after crashing his vehicle into a telephone pole on Long Island. In 2001, when he was with Phoenix, Kidd was charged with domestic assault after he acknowledged striking his wife, Joumana. The charges were dropped as part of a plea deal in which Kidd agreed to counseling. The two divorced in 2007.The Knicks wanted Kidd for his influence on the court and in the locker room, and the team benefited from his savvy. Carmelo Anthony and Smith said Kidd's pass-first mentality helped them play smarter.Kidd's retirement will give the Knicks a chance to become younger after using the oldest roster in N.B.A. history last season. They will also receive modest payroll relief.As part of his decision, Kidd has agreed to forgo the final two years of his contract, which means his $3.09 million salary will be removed from the Knicks' cap figure. However, the Knicks will still be far over the cap and almost certainly over the luxury-tax threshold, barring a major payroll reduction. That means they will be subject to a ban on acquiring players via sign-and-trade deals.
MIAMI — Maybe Gregg Popovich knew something on that late November evening when he put his three best players on a Southwest Airlines flight and sent them back to Texas.Perhaps Erik Spoelstra was simply planning ahead on that Sunday in late March when he left his two superstars in the locker room.Popovich and Spoelstra, the coaches of the San Antonio Spurs and the Miami Heat, have two of the sharpest minds in the N.B.A. Is it too great a stretch to believe that they also share the gift of precognition? That they withheld lineups and concealed strategies each time they met this season, anticipating they would eventually battle for the championship?When the Spurs and the Heat take the court Thursday night in Game 1 of the finals, it will be the first time they have seen each other at full strength this season. There is no relevant game film to analyze, no template for how Kawhi Leonard might guard LeBron James, or how the Heat might attack Tim Duncan.Despite combining for nine finals appearances in the last 15 seasons, with six championships between them, San Antonio and Miami arrive on the N.B.A.'s biggest stage as virtual strangers in the night."It's crazy that it worked out this way," the Heat's Dwyane Wade said Monday night, chuckling at the memory of those incomplete box scores.It is safe to assume that the steely Popovich will not chuckle quite so readily on the topic.The N.B.A. fined the Spurs $250,000 after Popovich, without providing proper notification or justification, sent home Duncan, Tony Parker, Manu Ginobili and Danny Green before a Nov. 29 game in Miami.The circumstances and the punishment were unprecedented, with Commissioner David Stern rebuking the Spurs for sending away four healthy starters "virtually under cover of darkness."It was not quite that sinister. Popovich has a long tradition of resting his veteran stars over the course of an 82-game season, to save their legs for all those deep playoff runs. The game in Miami was the Spurs' fourth in five nights, all on the road, and Popovich decided it was one too many, considering the mileage on his stars."We've had an 8-day trip and a 10-day trip, and we're ending it with four in five nights here," Popovich said then. "I think it'd be unwise to be playing our guys in that kind of a situation, given their history."The Spurs' crime, as Stern saw it, was in resting four starters simultaneously, and without first informing the league, the Heat and the public. It surely mattered, too, that this marquee game was being carried nationally on TNT.The Spurs gave the Heat a scare that night anyway, as Tiago Splitter, Gary Neal and Nando de Colo nearly matched the production of James, Wade and Chris Bosh. It took a late flurry of scoring from James, Wade and Ray Allen for Miami to pull out a 105-100 victory.When the teams met again, on March 31 in San Antonio, the script was flipped. Parker and Duncan were back in the lineup (although Ginobili was out with a hamstring injury). But Wade, James and Mario Chalmers were in the locker room, nursing minor injuries and resting for the playoffs — their reward for having just completed a 27-game winning streak that helped Miami secure the top seed in the Eastern Conference."That's below the belt," Popovich said then, in mock horror. "There's no place for that."There was neither a fine nor a controversy, and Miami won again, 88-86, with Bosh leading the way. Spoelstra dismissed speculation that he was responding to Popovich's ploy."I could see where you guys would draw those conclusions," Spoelstra said then, "but no."The last time James, Wade and Bosh faced Duncan, Parker and Ginobili was March 11, 2011. The Heat routed the Spurs that night, 110-80.But these teams have been eyeing each other from afar for more than a decade, each dominating its conference for long stretches.The Heat are playing in their third straight finals with this core, and their fourth as a franchise since 2006, when Wade paired with Shaquille O'Neal to win the title.The Spurs won four championships between 1999 and 2007, taking the last one with a four-game sweep of James's Cleveland Cavaliers.Duncan, James and Wade have combined for six regular-season Most Valuable Player awards and five finals M.V.P. trophies."Obviously, San Antonio has a system," Wade said Monday. "Obviously, they have certain players that's featured in the system, that have been featured awhile, many years for them. That's not a surprise."James has vivid memories of what the Spurs look like in the finals. He was only 22, and leading a team of spare parts, when Duncan, already a legend and surrounded by veteran stars, dealt him that stinging defeat in 2007.Since then, James has upgraded his surrounding cast and expanded his basketball portfolio, adding a post game, a 3-point shot and countless nuances to his repertory.He will be much better armed for this rematch."I'm 20, 40, 50 times better than I was in the '07 finals," James said, breaking into a slight grin as he increased the multiplier.The Heat and the Spurs have never met on this stage, but there might be just enough familiarity to breed a healthy contempt.
MIAMI — Before reaching the top of basketball, LeBron James was run over by the San Antonio Spurs.The Spurs swept James' Cleveland Cavaliers in the 2007 NBA Finals, so long ago that the winning game plan focused on exploiting James' weaknesses. Those are nearly impossible to find now, and James essentially warned the Spurs that they shouldn't bother looking.The Spurs already know."He'll be a lot more of a problem than he was in '07, that's for sure," Spurs coach Gregg Popovich said Wednesday.Tim Duncan told the beaten James minutes after that series that the league would someday belong to him, and he was right. The NBA's MVP guided Miami to last year's championship and the league's best record this season.Now the Spurs will try to take it back.But James is now the best player in the game, is surrounded by more talent in Miami than he ever had in Cleveland, and still carries the memory of the beating the Spurs laid on him six years ago."I have something in me that they took in '07. Beat us on our home floor, celebrated on our home floor. I won't forget that. You shouldn't as a competitor. You should never forget that," James said.He joined the Heat in 2010, experienced more finals failure a year later, then was finals MVP last year when Miami beat Oklahoma City in five games. Another title now would put him halfway to the four that Duncan and Popovich have won together."That's what I'm here for," James said. "I'm here to win championships, and you're not always going to be on the successful side. I've seen it twice, not being on the successful side."He was just 22 at the end of his fourth year in the league when he carried to the Cavs to their first finals appearance. But there were holes in his game, from an unreliable jump shot to an undeveloped post game, and the Spurs took advantage of every one of them.James shot 36 percent in the series, including a ghastly 10 for 30 in Game 4, and committed 23 turnovers."Well, LeBron is a different player than he was in '07," Popovich said. "That was like ancient history. He was basically a neophyte at the time, wondering how all this stuff worked and how it's put together. We were very fortunate at that time to get him so early. But at this point he's grown."James wasn't interested in discussing much of that series, but he recalled the way the Spurs' strategy kept him from getting into the paint and dared him to shoot jumpers.There's no blueprint now that would encourage a guy who made 56.5 percent of his shots this season to shoot the ball."If you go under my pick-and-roll now, I'm going to shoot. And I'm confident I'm going to make every last one of them," James said. "I'm just more confident in my ability to shoot the ball."But at the same time, I also have a lot more weapons this time around going against this team, where in '07 they loaded three guys to me a lot on the strong side of the floor. So like I said, I'm a better player, and you can't dare me to do anything I don't want to do in 2013."Duncan and James probably wouldn't have thought it would take so long to see each other in the finals again after their meeting in the hallway of Cleveland's Quicken Loans Arena. San Antonio had built a quiet dynasty, winning four titles in nine years, and the core of Duncan, Tony Parker and Manu Ginobili would keep giving the Spurs chances.But they couldn't get out of the West even while finishing with the best record in the conference the last two years, just as Cleveland couldn't in the East during James' last two seasons there."I hoped to be back here. Whether he would he here or not, I couldn't predict that," the 37-year-old Duncan said. "Knowing the player that he was then and the trajectory he was on, I had no doubt he would be back here. I had no doubt he would be tops in this league at some point. And I'm glad and honored to be back here playing against him."The Spurs have been off since finishing a sweep of Memphis on May 27. The Heat were forced to overcome a rugged Indiana team and the struggles of Dwyane Wade and Chris Bosh in a seven-game series that wrapped up Monday.That set up a finals between teams built in decidedly different ways but with mutual respect. While others around the league seethed, Popovich even called Pat Riley to offer congratulations after the Heat architect signed James and Bosh in 2010.It gives James a chance to pay the Spurs back for their 2007 romp, when they forced the Cavaliers into the worst offensive performance in finals history."I believe that after that finals he probably always obviously wanted to get back again. But I think he probably always wanted to get back and play them," Wade said. "So obviously having this opportunity right now is probably something he always dreamed of, of getting back to the finals and playing the Spurs again."The Spurs' Big Three didn't have to endure the same wait to win. Duncan won a title in just his second season, and Parker was only 21 when he earned his first. Yet eventually they stalled, so they're as eager for this opportunity as James."When I was 21 and I won my first one, it was kind of fast and we think it's going to happen every year. We think it's easy. But after a lot of years in the league, you realize it's really hard to go to the finals," Parker said. "Now we take nothing for granted. We appreciate every moment, and we'll see what happens."
CHAPEL HILL, N.C. — Durham police have charged North Carolina leading scorer P.J. Hairston with marijuana possession following a traffic stop.In an email Thursday, Durham Police Department spokeswoman Kammie Michael said officers stopped Hairston at a license checkpoint Wednesday night. Police also arrested two passengers — Miykael Lael Israel Faulcon and Carlos Devone Sanford, both of Durham — and charged all three men with possessing a half-ounce of marijuana or less.They were released on $1,000 unsecured bonds.Michael said Hairston, 20, was also charged with driving without a license, though that charge isn't mentioned in his arrest report.UNC athletic spokesman Steve Kirschner said in an email that both coach Roy Williams and athletic director Bubba Cunningham are aware of the incident."We're currently looking into it to gather the facts," Kirschner said. "We will issue a statement when we have enough information to do so."Hairston averaged 14.6 points for the season, though he averaged 18 points and shot 40 percent on 3-pointers over the final 13 games after becoming a sophomore starter in a four-guard lineup. That helped the Tar Heels (25-11) dig out of an 0-2 start in the Atlantic Coast Conference to reach the ACC tournament final and the third round of the NCAA tournament before losing to Kansas.Hairston announced in April that he would return for his junior season instead of entering the NBA draft, saying returning was "my way of supporting" Williams and his teammates. He also tweeted that day: "My junior year will be one to remember."
DENVER — The starless Denver Nuggets just lost their biggest name on the bench.George Karl was ousted Thursday less than a month after winning the NBA's Coach of the Year award. His tenure with the Nuggets is over after 8½ seasons.The longtime coach is following general manager Masai Ujiri out the door in Denver after Ujiri, the league's executive of the year, recently left to become GM of the Toronto Raptors."So, we lost a GM now and a coach, what's next?" tweeted Nuggets big man Kenneth Faried.Karl had just a year left on his contract, which may have played a role in this decision. Calls and emails to Karl's representatives were not returned Thursday.But Karl did take to Twitter, posting on his certified account: "I want to thank Nuggets fans for their support over the past 8 yrs. The karma on the street was incredible. Denver will always be home."There are quite a few teams currently on the lookout for a new coach. The Los Angeles Clippers, Brooklyn Nets and Philadelphia 76ers also have head coaching vacancies and the Memphis Grizzlies have given coach Lionel Hollins permission to speak with other teams."George has been an instrumental part of our success over the past decade, and we appreciate everything he did to keep us among the top teams in the Western Conference," team President Josh Kroenke said in a statement. "He is a Hall of Fame coach whose legacy in Denver will last for years to come. George is a legend in the game of basketball and I could not have more respect for him as a person and coach.""I had a great relationship with him and I was honored to be coached by him," forward Danilo Gallinari told The Associated Press in an email. "Hopefully the management now will do smart choices."Karl guided the third-youngest team in the NBA to the third-best record in the Western Conference with a franchise-record 57 wins, but the Nuggets were bounced from the first round of the playoffs for the fourth straight season. The news of Karl parting ways was first reported by Yahoo! Sports.Recently, reports have surfaced that the Clippers might be interested in talking to Karl about their vacancy. All this week, Karl was evasive when he showed up at the team's facilities to watch potential draft picks work out for the Nuggets. Karl declined interview request after interview request as he made his way from the gym to his car.Karl is the latest to pack up and leave the team. Last week, the Raptors lured away Ujiri, a rising star among the league's front office ranks. Ujiri earned respect for his handling of the Carmelo Anthony trade to New York and his ability to assemble a relatively starless roster that still managed to be a formidable foe in the West.Ujiri helped assemble Karl's kind of team this season, one featuring a deep roster full of up-tempo and unselfish players. Only, the year ended in an all too familiar fashion for the Nuggets — another early exit.The only time Denver advanced past the first round under Karl was when the team reached the Western Conference finals in 2009.Karl did a masterful job this season with a lineup that had nary an All-Star, was riddled by injuries to several starters and wound its way through a grueling early-season schedule in which 22 of the team's first 32 games were on the road.His teams simply wore out opponents, especially in the thin air of the Mile High City, where they went an NBA-best 38-3 at home. The Nuggets won their last 23 games at the Pepsi Center in the regular season and went 24-4 overall after the All-Star break.That's why the Nuggets were a big favorite heading into the Golden State series to open the playoffs. But Denver sorely missed Gallinari (knee) and fell in six games to a Warriors squad that was led by the sharp-shooting Stephen Curry.Still, his work in the regular season was recognized by the league as he received 62 first-place votes, followed by Erik Spoelstra of the Miami Heat with 24 votes, for Coach of the Year. It was the first time Karl had won the award in his career and he joined Doug Moe as the only Denver coaches to earn the honor.The 62-year-old Karl kidded down the stretch that he'd rather not be Coach of the Year, only because of the track record of those coaches eventually being let go. He led the Nuggets to nine straight playoff appearances and a 423-257 mark in the regular season. Those 423 wins rank second in team history behind Moe (432).A two-time cancer survivor, Karl changed his coaching style after returning from throat cancer in 2010. He delegated more duties at practice, relying on his assistant coaches to do much of the teaching.In addition to Denver, he's also had coaching stops in Cleveland, Golden State, Seattle and Milwaukee during his 25-year career. His 1,131 regular season wins are among the most in NBA history for a coach.
MIAMI — David Stern thinks that when it comes to the NBA Finals, his last might be the best.Stern's 30-year reign as NBA Commissioner will end Feb. 1, making this Miami-San Antonio series the final championship matchup of his tenure overseeing a league that has grown into a wildly successful international corporate giant under his watch.Still, there's plenty of items remaining on Stern's to-do list, which is one of the reasons why he hasn't turned his final months into a victory lap of sorts."I'll savor it when it's over," Stern said Thursday in his annual pre-Finals news conference. "I'll look back on it. I do know every day that I have the best job in the world ... and I will remain committed to the continued success of the NBA. That's the thing I think about more than I think about looking backwards. I'm actually looking forward to helping the NBA in any way possible as it rises to continued new heights."His last Finals might help the league reach those heights.The Miami-San Antonio series features four former NBA Finals MVPs in Tim Duncan, Tony Parker, Dwyane Wade and LeBron James. It will almost certainly have a tremendous international following, because James is a global marketing icon, Wade wears shoes from a Chinese company and more than half of the Spurs' players were born outside the United States."I would say this is probably the most anticipated Finals in, who knows, 30 years," Stern said. "We've had a great run up to it."Under Stern's watch, the league has become a $5 billion annual industry, with the NBA Finals broadcast in 215 countries — instead of being shown on tape-delay, as was the case in the early 1980s.The NBA had 23 teams when Stern began; it now has 30. The Heat weren't even an idea when Stern began his tenure, and they're now a global brand themselves, having made the title round four times in the last eight seasons."He saved the league," Heat forward Shane Battier said. "People forget how drug-riddled and really on how much thin ice the league was on in the 1980s. Obviously, Magic Johnson and Michael Jordan and Larry Bird were the talents sort of behind that movement, but without David's marketing genius the league wouldn't be in its present form. He turned a small, professional, struggling league into a global giant. And it's not just about basketball anymore."Stern announced last year that he would retire and be replaced his longtime deputy, Adam Silver, who has worked with him in five different capacities over the last 22 years.Silver, in Stern's eyes, is more than ready for the job, and the current commissioner said providing for a plan of succession was vital."At some time an organization can use an infusion of different ideas," Stern said. "And at the same time, along the 30 years, there are a group of colleagues that now work at the NBA who have been doing it for a while, but they're very, very young at heart and push us and push each other. And I think it's their turn to shine as well a little bit more. So it's time to step down and step aside, while at the same time being willing to assist in any way I can, particularly internationally."The global game has been of importance to Stern for years. He has often spoken of the idea of having European teams in the NBA, which many people in the league believe will eventually happen. NBA players have starred in the Olympics since 1992, the league has had over 100 games contested in international cities, and Stern will keep trying to expand the league's reach abroad after he retires.Heat coach Erik Spoelstra has already seen Stern's fingerprint on the game around the world."I've seen that when we go to the Philippines every summer," said Spoelstra, who is of Filipino descent. "You go into any sports store now anywhere in the world, you see NBA paraphernalia. And just the interest worldwide, how our game has grown globally, not only international players but the interest outside. Even though I was just a kid, I remember what the NBA was like before. And it was a far cry from right now. He deserves a large part of the credit."Stern touched on a number of other issues, including:—The league is looking into changing how it handles replay reviews in-game, including possibly having them handled off-site in a broadcast center. "We've got to find a way to make it a little smoother," Stern said.—Flopping, which was a key point of emphasis for the league this year, will be discussed again at the league's competition committee meeting in San Antonio next week. "There's always a challenge of getting it right," Stern said.—He called coaching changes, which have been plentiful since the regular season ended and even including the league's reigning coach of the year in Denver's George Karl, "a natural consequence" of a team having expectations to win immediately.But most of Stern's final address revolved around memories, such as what the league went through in recent years with its most recent labor stoppage that led to the current collective bargaining agreement, and some of the other unforgettable moments of his tenure, like his fear for Magic Johnson when he learned that he had the HIV virus in 1991 and retired, followed by the joy of watching Johnson win the All-Star MVP award in Orlando a few months later."I would just say that you look at the body of work and you say that he steered the good ship NBA in a productive way," Stern said. "We have had a lot that we've had to deal with in terms of crisis on the one hand and opportunity on the other. And we've dealt with the crises to protect the motherlode. We've dealt with the opportunity to take this league to a place we not only couldn't have anticipated, we couldn't have imagined."
Spurs vs. Heat: Fans Weigh In: Fans take sides ahead of the N.B.A. finals between the San Antonio Spurs and Miami Heat.MIAMI — On one side of the 2013 N.B.A finals is Tim Duncan , a quiet superstar who has stayed put for 16 years in south Texas. On the other is the world-renowned LeBron James , who left home in blue-collar northern Ohio for the glitterati of South Beach.Starting with the no-drama Duncan in 1997, the San Antonio Spurs have been a model of player development and long-term stability. Upon signing the free agents James and Chris Bosh in 2010, the Miami Heat became the essence of microwaved title contention.The Spurs were largely built through the draft and trades, and most of their players are not from the continental United States. The Heat's only drafted player of consequence is Dwyane Wade, and only a spare center, the Canadian-born Joel Anthony, qualifies as an international.Both franchises have succeeded doing it their way, and perhaps the stylistic differences are more attributable to conversational details than core values."You have very similar structures and a commitment to a culture where there's a structure, a discipline, a style of play, a type of player," Heat Coach Erik Spoelstra said.Starting Thursday night with Game 1 at American Airlines Arena, each team will look to enhance its legacy. On the line for the Spurs is a fifth championship in the Duncan era and what would be their first since 2007. At stake for the defending champion Heat is establishing a pattern of dominance that could avert a breakup after next season when James, especially, can opt out of his contract.Systematic ties notwithstanding, the antithetical operational approaches of these franchises should help make for a most compelling matchup in a series that has something for everyone, including critics of the outgoing commissioner, David Stern.Stern has said he will leave his post next February, or almost three months before the 2014 playoffs begin. The last finals of his 30-year tenure will cover both sides of an endless debate about his beloved league's ulterior motives and best business practices.Many have believed that the contemporary N.B.A. has preferred to showcase sexy teams with at least one transcendent star. But Stern has long insisted that franchises in smaller markets could hold on to their best players and thrive under smart management. By a wide margin, the Spurs have been the most shining example of that with Duncan, Tony Parker and Manu Ginobili.According to Nielsen, San Antonio is the 36th-largest television market in the United States, or fourth smallest of the 30 N.B.A. cities. Miami is 16th, only the league's 14th largest. But James is a big enough celebrity to be his own market."I don't want to say what's a big market or a small market," the veteran Heat forward Juwan Howard said. "But the Spurs have an unbelievable legacy. They're a franchise and a team that everyone recognizes, everyone knows and respects."Respect has not necessarily translated to widespread acclaim, or prevented the Spurs from being saddled with baseless charges of being boring. Coach Gregg Popovich has at times carried a Texas-size chip on his shoulder for the lack of a national aura. But Duncan, for one, has preferred it."It doesn't matter," he said Wednesday. "We play the same way. We do the same things. We've been blessed to have won four championships. And we're blessed to be back and have a chance to win the fifth one."He added that he would never want to walk in James's sneakers, or "have that kind of pressure on me, absolutely."After sweeping James in the 2007 finals when James was with the Cleveland Cavaliers, Duncan told James that the league, in effect, would soon belong to him. But James had to first exit Cleveland, and team up with Wade and Bosh.After Miami's president, Pat Riley, landed James and Bosh and re-signed Wade, he took a congratulatory call from Popovich, of all people."He put together a team fairly, within the rules, that is a monster," Popovich said. "So why wouldn't he get credit for that? Why wouldn't you congratulate him for that?"Within the basketball establishment, Popovich and the Spurs have been admired for their knack of finding stalwart players where others weren't looking. The Spurs lucked into Duncan with the first pick of the 1997 draft but stole Parker with the 28th pick of the draft in 2001 and Ginobili with a second-round pick in 1999.Asked to explain the team's continuous success, Popovich said: "It's a total function of who those three guys are. What if they were jerks? What if they were selfish? What if one of them was, you know, unintelligent? But the way it works out, all three of them are highly intelligent. They all have great character."This is where the Heat and the Spurs are more alike than not, said Ray Allen, who joined Miami this season after five seasons with Paul Pierce and Kevin Garnett in Boston. That so-called Big Three won a title in its first season together."You can't put a time frame on what works and what doesn't," Allen said. "It's more a question of maturity, of the people who are coming together."In three seasons, James, Wade and Bosh have not failed to reach the finals, and that has made them the instant sensation they were supposed to be. But in returning after a six-year absence, and finally against an opponent they can be measured against for greatness, Duncan, 37, and the Spurs may finally have won what might be considered a team lifetime achievement award, or their warmest welcome yet to the N.B.A. finals.Whoever wins can croon that they did it their way.
The N.B.A. finals are saturated with story lines. A fifth title for the 37-year-old San Antonio star Tim Duncan would solidify his case for being his generation's best player. A second straight title for LeBron James would cap one of the most dominant seasons in league history. The series pits the glitz and bombast of South Beach against the quiet diligence of the small-market Spurs.The action on the court will be no less compelling. Spurs versus Heat is a basketball purist's dream: two teams with savvy coaches, smart schemes and enough skill to execute the high-wire act of adjusting on the fly at the pinnacle of competition.In many respects, the Spurs' precise, high-scoring offense presents a formidable danger to the Heat. Though the Spurs have great size — Duncan and Tiago Splitter are both 7 feet — they will offer a challenge far different from the Indiana Pacers' strategy of inflicting blunt force trauma via offensive rebounding.The Heat's mobbing defense gambles on the proposition that its intense pressure and hard traps will be so disruptive that an offense will not have the time or wherewithal to find the open player. The Spurs will respond with basketball judo. They will invite the Heat defense to attack, then use that aggression to their advantage. As the Dallas Mavericks proved in 2011, rapid ball movement and accurate 3-point shooting are a deadly counter that can turn Miami's defense from sweltering swarm to frantic scramble.Tony Parker, a whirring blur of deceptive dribbling and crafty scoring, is the proverbial head of the snake of the Spurs' attack. He personally engineered the destruction of the Memphis Grizzlies' top-ranked defense, and his ability to evade the Heat's pick-and-roll coverage may well decide the series. If the Heat opt for a more conservative approach on Parker, they are likely to concede long 2-point jump shots, a difficult shot that Parker has nonetheless buried with efficiency throughout the playoffs.The Spurs may play with near flawless precision, but this is not a team without weaknesses. One of the biggest is that Parker shoulders so much responsibility on offense. When he cannot consistently score or penetrate the defense, the whole Spurs attack falters because no one else is much of a threat to beat his man off the dribble. They need a big series from Manu Ginobili, a dazzling but aging creative force, to keep pace with the Heat offense.Parker's importance suggests we will almost certainly see James, who loves to take on the other team's best player in the fourth quarter, cover Parker for crucial stretches. These will no doubt be some of the most dramatic moments in the series.Who guards Parker, and when, is almost as interesting as how the Spurs will choose to cover James. The Spurs' game plan will certainly include denying James the ball when possible and forcing him to take jump shots. Though Spurs Coach Gregg Popovich loathes double-teaming, he may have no choice because his most capable defender, the second-year player Kawhi Leonard, will be no match for James's strength and guile in the low post. Unlike Grizzlies forward Zach Randolph, whom the Spurs double-teamed relentlessly, sometimes even before he touched the ball, James is a superlative passer. More important, James's Heat teammates are excellent shooters who know how to make themselves available when James draws extra attention.Leonard will start on James, but when he leaves the game, for a rest or with foul trouble, who will take his place? There is no good answer, especially because the Spurs' second-best wing defender, Danny Green, is best equipped for shadowing point guards.Will we see Boris Diaw absorb some minutes on James? Diaw has a beefy frame and is nimble for a forward, but can he chase James around screens on the perimeter?Like the Heat with Parker, the Spurs will try to keep James off balance by showing him a number of different defensive tactics.The real test will be what the Spurs do when the Heat go small with James at power forward. This look gave the Spurs fits in their second-round series against Golden State, and they do not have the muscle to punish the Heat as the Pacers could when James is surrounded by shooters. Furthermore, neither Duncan nor Splitter will bother James and Dwyane Wade at the basket the way Roy Hibbert did.The Spurs and the Heat are well positioned to profit from each other's vulnerabilities. Both shoot a high volume of 3-pointers, the most variant shot in basketball, so the series may well hinge on which team makes more open shots.The coaching matchup leans in the Spurs' favor. Popovich is a clipboard-toting wizard with a stronger track record of preparing his team than his counterpart, Erik Spoelstra. But Spoelstra has James and a Heat defense with a talent for reducing even good teams to a bumbling pile of nerves. The Heat cannot do it all the time, but when they reach their fever pitch, it is as if they have entered the other team's house and changed all the locks. Nothing works; there is nowhere to turn.It will take a team effort, starting with Parker, for the Spurs to keep the passageways of their offense clear, and the Spurs' young role players must continue to capitalize on the space they will inevitably have.This promises to be a high-scoring, breathless series of wild runs and dramatic reversals. The Spurs have every right to expect an upset, and all the tools to make it happen. But they do not have James. In a series between such evenly matched opponents, James's heavy influence on everything the Heat do tilts the odds in their favor.
MIAMI — The play should have been over, two, three, four times. It should have died when Tony Parker nearly lost the ball driving past Chris Bosh. Or when he nearly lost it again trying to evade LeBron James . Or when he slipped to the floor, his left knee down, his legs splayed awkwardly. Or when he launched a shot that maybe — maybe — beat the 24-second buzzer by a hundredth of a second.Like an alley cat spending all nine lives at once, Parker flirted with disaster at every turn late Thursday, before sinking the most improbable of jump shots, helping the San Antonio Spurs secure a 92-88 victory over the Miami Heat in the opener of the N.B.A. finals.The ball barely slipped past James's outstretched hand, 16 feet from the basket. It struck the backboard, struck the front of the rim, bounced up and dropped through with 5.2 seconds left. Replays would show that the ball left Parker's hand just as the shot clock expired.The play seemed to take forever, "like a 26-second possession," Heat Coach Erik Spoelstra said."The longest 24 seconds I've been a part of," James said with a rueful smile.It was a dizzying, chaotic, fantastic sequence that effectively showed what this series will come down to: inches, microseconds, happenstance."Tony did everything wrong," James said, "and did everything right in the same possession."The Heat had held the lead nearly all night, by as many as 9 points, and by 3 early in the fourth quarter. James delivered a triple-double with 18 points, 18 rebounds and 10 assists. Dwyane Wade produced 17 points. And yet the night ended with the Heat losing home-court advantage, after an unusually sloppy finish.Miami had five turnovers in the final quarter and converted just 5 of 18 shots, while being outscored 23-16.So for the second straight year, the Heat are facing a 1-0 deficit in the finals. Game 2 is Sunday, also at American Airlines Arena, before the series shifts to San Antonio for three games.The last time the Spurs appeared on the finals stage, six years ago, they were walking off with a four-game sweep of James's Cleveland Cavaliers. Parker left clutching the finals M.V.P. trophy.Parker was still magnificent Thursday, scoring 21 points on 9-of-18 shooting, including 10 points in the final quarter. James himself checked Parker down the stretch, to little effect. Tim Duncan added 20 points and 14 rebounds.The Spurs seized control with an 11-3 run, sparked by Parker and capped by a Danny Green 3-pointer, for an 88-81 lead. The Heat got few good looks after that, but they cut the deficit to 90-88 on James's two free throws with 31.3 seconds to go.The game then came down to Parker, dribbling for an entire possession, dribbling to his left, then back to his right and then right into the heart of the Heat defense and into trouble."It was a crazy play," Parker said. "I thought I lost the ball three or four times. And it didn't work out like I wanted it to. At the end, I was just trying to get a shot up."Wade missed a layup at the other end, finishing a scoreless fourth quarter.Because the Spurs rested their stars in November and the Heat did the same in March, these teams had not faced each other at full strength in two years, leaving no road map for what the night, or the series, would bring."You don't have no rhythm of what they're going to do," James said before tipoff. "They don't have a rhythm of what we're going to do. So it's like the first test we've had with one another in a while."Really, there were few surprises as the game unfolded. Miami did what it does best, spreading the floor with shooters, letting James orchestrate and, whenever possible, taking advantage in transition. The Heat hit 8 of 25 3-pointers and scored just 9 points on the fast break.The Spurs did what they do best, scoring inside (40 points in the paint) and on second-chance points (21), essentially picking up where the Indiana Pacers left off in the Eastern Conference finals.The Spurs had not played in nearly 10 days, since sweeping the Memphis Grizzlies in the Western Conference finals. There figured to be a little rust in their game.The Heat had the opposite concern, having survived a taut, seven-game series against the Indiana Pacers that ended just three nights earlier. There figured to be a little fatigue in their game.As it turned out, rest proved to be a more critical factor than rust. Wade and James both cited fatigue as a factor in the Heat's poor finish."We looked like a team that came off a seven-game series," Wade said. "I thought we got some shots we wanted, but we were a little careless at times as well."The Spurs, by contrast, committed just four turnovers for the game, tying a finals record set by the Detroit Pistons (against the Spurs) in the 2005 finals.By the end of the first quarter, the Spurs had already used three players, of varying sizes, to check James: Kawhi Leonard (6 feet 7 inches, 225 pounds), Danny Green (6-6, 210) and Boris Diaw (6-8, 235).When James easily backed down Green, the Spurs sent two more bodies, leaving half the floor open. Later, James plowed right through Green, driving for the layup and then looking at Green as if to say, "You cannot possibly guard me."James had 10 points, 8 rebounds and 5 assists by halftime, methodically building toward his third triple-double in a finals.Duncan had a rough start, missing his first five shots and picking up two fouls in the first 11 minutes, sending him to the bench. He recovered nicely, however, hitting 5 of 7 shots in the second quarter, including a 20-footer at the halftime buzzer that cut the Heat's lead to 52-49.It was a promising start to what promised to be a compelling finals, pitting the league's premier glamour team (the Heat) against its greatest small-market success story (the Spurs). Between them, the Spurs and the Heat have six championships, nine finals appearances and at least five probable Hall of Famers.You could call it a matchup made in N.B.A. heaven, a nice send-off to David Stern before he steps down as commissioner next February."A heck of a series," Stern said in his pre-finals address, "probably the best that I could possibly expect for my last finals."LeBron James has scored 3,712 points in the postseason, moving into 11th on the career postseason list, passing Magic Johnson (3,701). ...Tony Parker, Manu Ginobili and Tim Duncan have 99 playoff victories as a threesome, the second most in N.B.A. history, behind the Lakers' Kareem Abdul-Jabbar, Magic Johnson and Michael Cooper, who won 110. ... Teams that have won Game 1 of the finals are 47-19 in the series.
MIAMI — In the lead-in to Game 1 of the N.B.A. finals Thursday night, which Tony Parker helped steal from the Miami Heat, 92-88, much was made of how he became the driving force of the San Antonio Spurs , the little engine that could replace Tim Duncan in that role.A decade ago, in a muscular and moneyed move that belied their reputation as the most prudent and prescient of small-market franchises, the Spurs did everything they could to replace Parker with the league's premier point guard, Jason Kidd.So when Parker followed Coach Gregg Popovich to the podium during Wednesday's news conferences after Popovich spoke of the best free-agent signing he never made, Parker told him, "I heard the bad things you were saying about me."Not one to let sarcasm go unrequited, Popovich said: "You're lucky. Kidd could be sitting there."Where would the Spurs be today had they persuaded Kidd to trade the view of the New York City skyline from Bergen County, N.J., for the towering sight of Duncan on the low block in San Antonio? How would the decade have played out had Kidd grown old and leg weary as he was at 40 with the Knicks in the playoffs before announcing his retirement this week?Popovich knew where the question was leading and — credentialed coach that he is — decided he had no interest in following. "Your question infers that there was an either/or, and that would be false," he said.Popovich explained that he foresaw Parker, who in two seasons had established an ability to score off the dribble before his 21st birthday, shifting to the shooting guard position to make room for Kidd."I thought that Jason Kidd being there, being the mentally tough person that he is and with his skills, would be the greatest education for Tony Parker," Popovich said. "And Tony can go play the 2; he was a scoring guard, anyway. As Jason gets older, let him move over to the 2; let Tony take 1. Brilliant, brilliant. Let's go get this thing done."Popovich laughed, presumably at himself."Tony did not love that idea at all," he said. "We still tried to do it. And Jason didn't come."After two unsuccessful Nets runs to the finals — the second one against the Spurs, immediately preceding their run at him — Kidd resisted the temptation to team with Duncan on a defending champion. He stayed in New Jersey, a move he came to regret when the Nets were sold to the developer Bruce Ratner and plans for a move to Brooklyn began with reducing costs.We'll never know if the Spurs would have fouled up a blueprint that would produce additional titles in 2005 and 2007, and a return to the finals this season with Parker, now 31.Popovich's protests notwithstanding, there is no way to assume that Parker would have thrived in or embraced the role beside Kidd. He struggled against the Nets in the 2003 finals and most likely would have interpreted the Kidd signing as a demotion.Then there is the issue of how the Spurs would have kept Parker and/or Manu Ginobili if they had added a top-of-the-scale, multiyear contract for Kidd to go along with the franchise player, Duncan. Somebody would have become expendable, most likely Parker, with Kidd still in his prime.It is also possible that the Spurs, with Kidd, might have won more championships during those years at the expense of the Lakers. But they certainly would have compacted their contending era and perhaps even lost Duncan to retirement by now.For all the recent applause for Parker, he was reportedly on the trading block as recently as 2011 after the Spurs lost in the first round to Memphis. Popovich on Wednesday alluded to Parker's being outplayed in that series by Mike Conley. The Spurs shopped him while seeking a high position in the draft. They contemplated the far less creative George Hill as Parker's replacement.But the right deal could not be found, and the Spurs wound up dealing Hill for the rookie forward Kawhi Leonard, now an entrenched starter. Parker, according to Popovich, had an off-season epiphany and "committed himself to being mentally ready to play night after night after night."This season, Parker made more than 50 percent of his shots for the fifth time in his career, no small feat for a 6-foot-2 guard. Game 1 on Thursday night was vintage Parker: 21 points, 6 assists, 0 turnovers in 39-plus minutes against a swarming Heat defense. He also hit the game-clinching shot, stumbling against the airtight defense of LeBron James and stepping inside him for a right-side banker from 18 feet out as the shot clock expired.Kidd, Parker's superior in passing and intangibles, finished his career by going scoreless in the Knicks' last 10 playoff games.Much as Popovich would acknowledge Kidd as an all-timer, there is no doubt he knew he was he was lucky that Parker, and not Kidd, was "sitting there" on the eve of the 2013 finals.
The WNBA debuted a new camera Saturday worn by official Lamont Simpson during the Phoenix Mercury and Indiana Fever game that was nationally televised. The camera was mounted above the ear on the right side of a device that looked like a pair of glasses. Simpson said it took a little while to get used to it."The first half, it took some adjusting to, especially when you started running and actually broke a sweat," the veteran official said. "The goggles started to loosen up and the sweat around the band started to loosen up. The first half was pretty much just adjusting the headset."By the second half, Simpson said he barely noticed he was wearing it."It was fun. We made some adjustments at halftime and the second half it was almost like it wasn't there," he said."I think it's hilarious when I'm not on it," Los Angeles Sparks star Candace Parker said before her game Saturday night. "I think that's a very interesting addition to the cameras."Parker, who quickly tweeted about the new innovation while she was watching the Mercury's 82-67 victory, was surprised by the view when the cam was first used."I thought they were really close to the camera when I first saw it on television. I was like, 'Why are they that close to the camera? Why are they yelling at the camera?'" she said.The cam definitely got the fans a different view. While some of the images with Simpson running were a little shaky at first. It was much more solid when he wasn't moving. ABC showed the angle during free throws and the cam even happened to catch Simpson giving the Mercury's Candice Dupree a technical foul in the second quarter of Phoenix's 82-67 win."Today's broadcast was a great opportunity to be at the forefront in terms of providing viewers with unique perspectives on our game," WNBA President Laurel Richie said. "The use of Ref Cam certainly offered a previously unseen point of view that really brought viewers into the action, adding a whole new visual and audio component to the experience."Broadcast Sports Inc. developed the camera and general manager Peter Larsson said that the idea came from two other projects."We were working on onboard cameras for NASCAR and also with the X Games and married the two of them together to come up with the perfect size for referees."Larsson said they had a number of different options for officials ranging from a hat to a strap that fits around the head like a headband. They finally settled on the glasses which didn't have lenses, but seemed like the best option for a basketball official."It was good," he said of the debut. "The whole concept is to get the viewer down on the court, get them as close as you can. Technology isn't there to get the size down to put it on the player. So this was the next best bet."Larsson said that the camera has also been used in a European rugby game as well as an MLS reserve league contest. It might be a while before they can have it ready for a sport like baseball or football."We're another generation or two away," he said. "That's on our developmental road map."For now it will just stay in the WNBA and Simpson said he'd be up for wearing it again."I'd like to see it done again," he said. "I would gladly do it again. Seriously, I think it's something they should really consider."ESPN, which broadcasts the league, and the WNBA will jointly decide when the cam will be used moving forward."The Ref Cam is the latest effort in keeping with our tradition of innovation," said ESPN senior vice president and executive producer Mark Gross. "We are always looking for new ways to provide fans different angles and a feel for the game they may not have gotten in the past."Freelance writers Justin Albers in Indianapolis and Curtis Zupke in Los Angeles contributed to this report
Spurs vs. Heat: Fans Weigh In: Fans take sides ahead of the N.B.A. finals between the San Antonio Spurs and Miami Heat.MIAMI — Before a ball had been shot or a basket had been made in San Antonio's 92-88 Game 1 victory Thursday night, David Stern anointed the Heat-Spurs series as "probably the most anticipated finals in, who knows, 30 years."We will have to forgive Stern, who is presiding over his last championship round in what will conclude next February as — you guessed it — a 30-year run as N.B.A. commissioner. He really could not help himself from suggesting such a thing.In three decades of marketing the league he has loved and protected like his own child, Stern has perfected the hard sell the way Tony Parker and the Spurs have mastered the use of the high screen.Most anticipated? In Stern's first playoff season after succeeding Larry O'Brien in 1984, Larry Bird's Boston Celtics defeated Magic Johnson's Los Angeles Lakers in seven thrilling games in the first of three N.B.A. finals showdowns between rising megastars whose rivalry was born in the N.C.A.A. championship game four years prior.Later there was the coming of Isiah Lord Thomas and the Detroit Pistons to unseat the Lakers and then Michael Jordan blasted the sport to uncharted heights.It is true that these days, in sheer number, the N.B.A. has more fans than ever in a world digitally connected and thoroughly internationalized. We dwell on the impact of big and small American markets, but the Spurs have nine players born outside the Continental United States and from as far away as Australia.What does it mean to the Spurs fan in Parker's France and Manu Ginobili's Argentina that San Antonio is not New York?And yet the N.B.A. does suffer in many corners domestically from the perception that it is not as good, not as competitively pure, as it was back in the day. What day that is usually depends on one's age. Around New York, we often are told by folks that they have not watched pro basketball since the Knicks' 1970s championship teams. Around the country, disconnect is typically said to have occurred post-Jordan.As a lifelong fan and career-long chronicler, it is kneejerk for me to defend the N.B.A. Every generation has had the great and not so great. Every champion has been worthy.Without going to Stern's hyperbolic lengths, I would argue that LeBron James is as complete and spectacular a player as the league has ever presented. As for the Spurs, I have been saying for years that if they had existed in New York, they would have been spiritual successors to the Old Knicks, with Tim Duncan starring as the honorable Willis Reed.The team-first and fundamentally brilliant Duncan has too often been dismissed as boring in a culture where the industries of sports and entertainment have blurred and commercial appeal has been based on who makes the most noise.In a W.-like moment Thursday night, Stern could not or would not elaborate on specific regrets during his commissionership. One might or should have been the pumped-up volume in his arenas that obscures the nuances of five superior athletes working in concert in the way the Spurs have for so long.The league's partner networks and shoe companies, which helped make rock stars of players beginning with Jordan, have never quite figured out how to market quiet class.For much of Game 1, the fans at American Airlines Arena were cued into a frenzied state by a carnival barker posing as a public-address announcer. The Heat's Chris Bosh screamed back after making an occasional jump shot until he missed the most important ones in the fourth quarter.Led by James's triple-double, the Heat led for much of the game, but the free-flowing, efficient Spurs ran their high-post offense, spaced the floor, turned the ball over only four times and closed out with key contributions from every player on the court.From Kawhi Leonard's reflex steal of a James pass to Duncan's offensive rebound leading to a Danny Green 3-point shot on a nifty crosscourt pass from Ginobili to Parker's drunken sailor banker from 16 feet under James's harassing defense, the Spurs' egalitarianism prevailed on a night when Leonard's persistent defense helped hold James to 18 points. That's 8 below his playoff average.If the Spurs had gone to a factory that produced N.B.A. players and ordered one to fit their team personality, Leonard would have been handmade and delivered to their doorstep. He is a 21-year-old Californian, a 6-foot-7 forward out of San Diego State and the old school where one learns to fit seamlessly into what his team does.Leonard answered reporters' questions in the jammed locker room Thursday night professionally but blandly, the Duncan way. Standing nearby, General Manager R. C. Buford was asked if Leonard had shown any sign of nerves before his first N.B.A. finals."He doesn't say enough for anybody to understand how he feels," Buford said with a laugh.Leonard, Buford and the Spurs knew that one victory had earned them the right to say nothing, especially as Miami has trademarked starting slowly in playoff series. But after four championships with Duncan and a chance for a fifth with their best-known player and least-known person now 37, Buford did venture to say, "I'm happy to see Tim and these guys at this point of their careers be recognized for how good they are."Combined with the celebrity of James and the obsession with the Heat, perhaps good enough to produce a memorable finals that will rank as one of Stern's best, if not the most anticipated. Hard, clean basketball was played Thursday night. Skills and sharing were on display by both teams. The Old Knicks were no doubt proud.
MIAMI — The NBA Finals. Just being here can be memorable — and miserable.And surprise, it's those supposedly stoic Spurs who are having more fun, while the South Beach bunch is a little grumpy and grouchy.The Miami Heat may be on top of the basketball world, but there's no joy unless they stay there."Playoffs ain't fun, man. I'm sorry to bust anyone on the outside's bubble," Dwyane Wade said. "As a player in the playoffs, you have no joy until it's over and you won. If you don't win, you have no joy for a while."Down 1-0 after a record regular season that goes for naught without another title, the Heat can turn their moods around with a victory over San Antonio on Sunday night in Game 2.Back in the finals for a third straight year, the Heat have lost some of the ability to enjoy the ride. With exorbitant expectations, all that matters is the destination.But San Antonio, absent from this stage for six years, is soaking up what could be its last shot for Tim Duncan, Tony Parker and Manu Ginobili.After all, Duncan is pretty ancient — at least, according to those wise-cracking Spurs."Older than dirt," coach Gregg Popovich called him this week.Parker listed him at age 50 — Duncan is actually 37 — and the repeated ribbing appears almost out of character for a franchise that was often considered the definition of basketball blandness."My friends and everybody on the team, we get like the funny Instagram doctored-up photos or jokes where they're making fun of how old some of the people on our team are who shall remain nameless," reserve Matt Bonner said. "And we get a kick out of that."Despite the notion they're old, the Spurs are actually overall the younger, less-experienced team in these finals. Miami has nine players in their 30s to the six on the Spurs, and their Big Three and Bonner are the only Spurs to have played in the NBA Finals.That makes it easier for the Spurs to enjoy this trip more than when they were the team expected to be here every year."We definitely are having fun," Parker said. "I think we appreciate every moment. We don't take anything for granted, because it's been a long time. It's been six years. Felt like forever. After the Memphis series, there was a lot of emotion."Heat veteran Shane Battier wasn't exactly sold on the notion of this Spurs transformation into a happy-go-lucky group."Don't believe them, first of all," he said. "They are extreme competitors and they have a level of self-deprecation I think that is part of them, but don't buy it for one second. Those guys are killers. They're cut-throat and they will stomp on you if need be, and we're the same way."We appreciate the opportunity to play in the finals. Difficult to get here. Hardest thing you'll do in this game is to try and win a championship, so we appreciate the opportunity and we want to make the most of it," he said.But he agreed with Wade that the playoffs aren't fun."No, they're not," he said. "They're stimulating. You feel alive. I wouldn't say fun, but there's no other place I'd rather be. It's kind of a misery you enjoy. You're cranky, especially after a loss. You don't like the other team. You're just a general grouch, but it's the time you feel most alive as a basketball player and there's nothing like it. Once you taste it, you don't want to live without it."It's a grind, though, for a team that will be playing its 100th game of the season Sunday. Wade has battled a painful right knee for a while, Chris Bosh is in a shooting slump, and the minutes are adding up for LeBron James, who has played deep into June the last three years and then competed in the Olympics last year."It's a toll for myself to go through what I've been through the last 2½ years. But I've been blessed, I've been blessed to be able to be in three finals, I've been blessed to be a part of a great Olympic team and to play basketball, the game that I love," James said."I'm not going to be able to do it forever. The opportunities that the game has given me for the last couple of years, I wouldn't substitute that for rest," he said.James and the Heat at least got some with two days off following the Spurs' 92-88 victory in Game 1. Both James and Wade had mentioned fatigue when talking about Miami's poor fourth-quarter performance, just three nights after the end of a difficult, seven-game series against Indiana to decide the Eastern Conference championship.The break gave the Heat more time to examine ways their own Big Three can be successful on offense, as well as get some more defensive pressure on the Spurs, who committed just four turnovers — none by Parker — in the opener."I think it's been great for us, these last I don't know how many hours it's been since Game 1," James said. "But we've used the time, I think, wisely in this case."They showed up in better spirits Saturday, James and Wade among several players taking part in a post-practice shooting contest, the kind of fun it seemed they would always have from the moment they debuted as Miami teammates three years ago in a welcoming party that rivaled a rock concert.There will be time for partying if they rally to win the series after a one-game deficit, just as they did last year in the finals. The Heat haven't lost consecutive games in five months, and they know this is no time to start."We're not a team that really says too much this is a must-win game, but this is a must-win game for us," Wade said. "We have to win this game at home."
JONESBORO, Ga. — Former NBA All-Star Daron "Mookie" Blaylock is out of the hospital and in jail, charged with vehicular homicide in a car crash south of Atlanta.Blaylock is also charged with driving on a suspended license, making an improper lane change and crossing the median in the head-on crash that killed a 43-year-old woman in Jonesboro on May 31. Blaylock surrendered Monday and is being held without bond.Blaylock's attorney has said the former player blacked out just before the crash. Authorities have said Blaylock was also wanted elsewhere for failing to appear in court on a DUI charge.The 46-year-old Blaylock was a first-round draft pick by the New Jersey Nets out of Oklahoma in 1989. He played for the Atlanta Hawks, Golden State Warriors and in the 1994 NBA All-Star game.
MIAMI — For a few seconds last Monday, the TNT cameras focused on Tramar Dillard and the empty courtside seat next to him in the final minutes of the Miami Heat 's 99-76 victory against the Indiana Pacers in Game 7 of the Eastern Conference finals. Sitting on the opposite side of Dillard was Phyllis Katz, who unintentionally helped provide a study in contrasts.Dillard, 33, is the Southern rapper Flo Rida. Katz, 70, is the wife of Raanan Katz, a minority owner of the Heat.During their time on camera, Dillard smiled and was relaxed in his seat as he wore large sunglasses and a big gold chain around his neck; Katz sat in her chair with proper posture as she stared straight ahead with her arms in her lap. She wore a thin silver necklace.In many ways, the snapshot captured the atmosphere at Heat games during the playoffs: the celebrity fan who wants to be seen and the noncelebrity fan who is there to watch the game. Within minutes, the two became a hit on Web sites and a local news station. Dillard became the headline, but most people were fascinated by Katz. On the Web site Deadspin, one commenter joked that Katz was thinking, "Just keep looking straight ahead and keep your hands in your lap ... you can do it ... only two minutes left ... come on ... no eye contact."WPLG 10, a Miami news station, had a caption contest on Facebook, asking, "What is this woman sitting next to Flo Rida thinking?" More than 1,050 people submitted captions by Sunday afternoon.Katz, who was sitting six seats away from the visiting team's bench, was in the middle of the altercation between Miami's Norris Cole and Indiana's Jeff Pendergraph, who were both ejected. Dillard's manager, Lee Prince, was also escorted off the court for jumping out of his courtside seat and yelling at the two players to fight. That left the empty seat, a smiling Dillard and a stoic Katz to enjoy a few seconds of airtime.Katz, who has been to almost every game this season, was stunned that she received so much attention after the Heat's most significant win of the season."I just wasn't paying attention," Katz said of that moment. "I must have been thinking of something else that was going on. It was funny, but one of my kids was angry, saying, 'Why weren't you laughing or smiling?' I was just in the zone. I was thinking of something else."Celebrities have flocked to Miami to watch LeBron James play ever since he came here three seasons ago. Some of those celebrities have sat next to Katz. Her favorite was Randy Moss, who she said made her laugh the entire game. The rappers Birdman and Lil Wayne call her "Ma." So does Warren Sapp. Katz has watched games with Will Smith and Beyoncé."They're not a big deal to her," said Dina Katz-Wosk, Katz's daughter. "To me, I find it fascinating. She could care less. All she cares about is the game."Basketball has always been a part of Katz's life. She and her husband grew up in Boston, and they watched the Celtics win championship after championship. The couple moved to Miami in 1986, when Raanan became one of the original owners of the Heat."You have to like the game to come as often as we do," Katz said. "You can't come here just for the scene. I could not sit here and not watch the game."Early in Monday's game, Katz and Dillard made small talk. She told him one reason the Heat could beat the Pacers and advance to the N.B.A. finals was Indiana's lack of depth beyond its starting lineup. She was right, as the Pacers' reserves scored only 14 points compared with the Heat's 27 points off the bench.The two sat together again Thursday for Game 1 of the finals.
Dr. J's Slam Dunk: Julius Erving, known as Dr. J, was a basketball legend in the A.B.A. and then the N.B.A. when the leagues merged in 1976. A new documentary about his life, called "The Doctor," will air on NBA TV.Julius Erving emerges from "The Doctor," a new documentary (Monday, 9 p.m. Eastern, NBA TV), as he would like to be portrayed: as an arrestingly beautiful player, a hang-time levitator, a slam-dunk specialist and a soaring eagle of the A.B.A. and N.B.A.Highlights of Dr. J's feats are skillfully curated from his college career, Rucker Park performances and 16 seasons with the Virginia Squires, the New York Nets and the Philadelphia 76ers. Eyewitnesses like Magic Johnson, Pat Riley and Bob Costas are still goggle-eyed by his amazing jams and flights to the hoop that began at free-throw lines.About Erving, Riley said, "We always thought of him as an alien."Tom Hoover, who played against him at Rucker Park in Harlem, said Erving once dunked the ball with such force that it hit him on his head and knocked his teeth out."He's the first guy I ever saw with air brakes," Darryl Dawkins said.It also gives us Erving as a family man who discusses with genuine emotion the death of his younger brother, Marvin, at age 16 and, years later, the accidental death of his 19-year-old son Cory, who drove his car into a pond near the family home.But hagiographies eventually stop at some point before a full portrait has been completed. NBA TV, the league-owned network, evidently decided that his on-court feats, his struggle to win an N.B.A. title, his influence on Michael Jordan, his sensitivity as a father, his coolness and his role as a basketball ambassador were enough for 90 minutes. And that might be all that many fans might need to know. After all, few things in sports are more entertaining than a Julius Erving highlight reel.But that was not all to his life. "The Doctor" leaves out significant information.■ He fathered two children with other women when he was married to his first wife, Turquoise. One is the tennis player Alexandra Stevenson, now 32; after a long estrangement, the two have a relationship. The second is Jules, whose mother — Dorys Madden — Erving married. They later had two more children.■ Erving and Turquoise had an acrimonious divorce that she connected in part to his out-of-wedlock children. In the documentary, Erving attributed their split to the difficulty of relating to one another after their son Cory's death in 2000. Cory's drug problems are not mentioned.■ After his first season in the American Basketball Association with the Squires, he tried to jump to the N.B.A. by signing a huge contract with the Atlanta Hawks (he was also drafted by the Milwaukee Bucks, which would have put him on the front line with Kareem Abdul-Jabbar). A federal judge kept him in Virginia for a second season, after which he was dealt to the Nets, where he won two A.B.A. titles before the leagues merged.■ And what of the fight between Erving and Larry Bird in a bench-clearing brawl in 1984 that led them to be fined $7,500 each? Nothing here.Erving is publishing an autobiography in November. Perhaps he will explore what was not broached or was left on the cutting room floor of "The Doctor."
HARTFORD, Conn. — Connecticut's men's basketball team, which was barred from the 2013 postseason because of past problems with its Academic Progress Rate, has qualified academically for next year's NCAA tournament.The Huskies APR for the 2011-12 school year is 947 out of 1000, giving it a two-year score of 962.5, which meets the NCAA's standard.Under rules implemented in 2011, the NCAA requires a team to have a 900 average over four years or a 930 over two years to qualify for its postseason.The team's four-year APR of 897 is still lower than the NCAA goal.The team scored a 978 out of 1000 in 2010-11, the season it won its third NCAA Championship, after two years of scores in the low 800s.Warde Manuel, the school's athletic director, said he is proud of team's academic effort, especially because they were penalized for problems that predated their enrollment at the university."These kids didn't get down on themselves," he said. "They didn't stop performing on the court and they didn't stop performing academically, and that is a credit to those kids."UConn went 20-10 on the court during the 2012-13 basketball season and likely would have been an NCAA tournament team. But it was barred from both the Big East tournament and the NCAA tournament based on the APR scores from the 2007-08 through 2010-11 academic years.The school's four-year score last year was 889 and its two-year average was just 902.Over the past several years, the program put into places changes in an effort to boost the scores. Those include mandated sanctions for any player who misses three or more classes during the academic year and daily checks of course work for student-athletes who have a grade-point average of 2.3 or lower.Players also are required to attend at least nine hours of summer school each year and adhere to a "graduation plan" created to ensure each player is on a path to graduate, even if they leave school early for the NBA or other opportunities."The players really took pride in saying, 'This is not us. We are student-athletes in the true sense of the word'," said Manuel. "They have showed that a one-year ban in the past is not a real indicator of how much they really focus on their academics as well as their athletics. That's the thing that made us, internally, happiest."Manuel said coach Kevin Ollie has also made it clear to recruits that academics will be a priority, and the school has every reason to believe the APR scores will not be a problem in the future."All of the student athletes that are coming in, as well as the current student athletes understand the strong sense of focus we have on the academic side here," he said.
MIAMI — In the interests of understanding Jason Kidd's iconoclastic mind-set, Chauncey Billups was a suitable stand-in after news circulated Sunday night that Kidd was pursuing the Nets' head coaching vacancy. And what veteran point guard worth his handle wouldn't think himself capable of making the transition from player to coach in seven seconds or less?"For a point guard, you've got to be thinking for everybody out there," Billups said. "You've got to massage egos, got to deal with all the politics of the whole team. You're basically already doing it."Billups proceeded to endorse Kidd's candidacy, which was first reported by Yahoo Sports. "Obviously, Jason is a guy I think would do well with that," he said.Bill Russell won championships as a player-coach of the Boston Celtics in 1968 and 1969. Dave DeBusschere was handed the same role with an unwatchable Detroit Pistons team at 24. In semirelated news, a wrestler was elected governor of Minnesota and an action-movie actor occupied the California Statehouse.Making Kidd the coach just weeks after he walked out of the Knicks' locker room in Indianapolis and retired as a player would not be the most radical transaction in the history of the N.B.A., much less the country.That does not mean it would be the best choice for the Nets as they attempt to build on this season's successful residency in Brooklyn, or even a very wise one. In terms of giants among men, Kidd is certainly not Russell. As a leading man of unquestioned character, Kidd has a 19-year N.B.A. track record that suggests that he is no Billups, either.The Nets should be careful not to confuse visionary point guard play with the ability of a person to see life's big picture. Even at the advanced playing age of 40, Kidd has provided reasons to wonder just how much of a grown-up he really is outside the lines.This is a man who, last July, drove his car into a light pole, reportedly after a night of drinking, and has been accused of everything from chronic coach killing to domestic abuse.Before Miami routed San Antonio in Game 2 on Sunday to even the N.B.A. finals, the league honored Billups as the recipient of a new leadership award named for Jack Twyman and Maurice Stokes.Asked about his postplaying aspirations, Billups, 36, said: "To be honest, my desire has been the front-office-type thing — president, general manager, put the team together. But it's funny that I say that because I'm actually coaching while I'm playing now. So, do I think I could be a good coach because of my experiences now? Of course. Of course."No doubt Kidd expressed the same confidence when he met on Monday with the Nets' general manager, Billy King, according to reports. Doc Rivers and Mark Jackson will hover over continuing discussions. Both were savvy point guards who, like Kidd, passed through Madison Square Garden as players and have become successful head coaches (to varying degrees) without the benefit of an assistant's apprenticeship.But there is an important difference in the approaches Rivers and Jackson took from the one Kidd is apparently proposing. Both transitioned out of playing by working in broadcasting. Calling games on television did not hurt their analytical skills and, in Jackson's case, certainly raised his profile. The true benefit was that it allowed them to evolve from the lifestyle of a player and the culture of entitlement.Kidd may think like a coach, but he still acts like a player. As he often has done when the result did not suit him, he left without talking to reporters after the final game of his career last month in Indianapolis. Is he ready to deal with hard questions every day next season and three times on game days?It is one thing to coach talent on the court and another thing to coddle it behind closed doors. Being Deron Williams's pal is not like having to call him out for bad body language or shot selection.As Spurs Coach Gregg Popovich said in a parsed but mostly positive assessment of Kidd, "If he's crazy enough to want to be a head coach in this league, I wish him all the best."There would be less hesitancy here to question such a move if it were made by the likes of Billups, who did not receive the inaugural Twyman/Stokes trophy by accident. Having toured the league as a young journeyman before emerging as a championship point man in Detroit, Billups was never a playmaker in Kidd's class. But nobody had to question his character or his understanding of authority.With Kidd, you do have to wonder about a guy who was traded for Stephon Marbury. Kidd was always a big enough star to call the shots along with the plays in Dallas, Phoenix and especially New Jersey, where his greatest hits included leaning on management to oust Byron Scott as the coach after consecutive runs to the finals.The Nets were still a franchise run on a shoestring then. Kidd was a revelation, the best player they ever had after Julius Erving. In Brooklyn, with a handsome new arena and the Russian owner Mikhail D. Prokhorov's billions behind them, the Nets are a joke no more. But having fired two coaches in the past six months, they should not act hastily to land a big name and tweak the Knicks.Kidd no doubt knows the game, but do the Nets really know Kidd? Bringing him back in some capacity would be a good idea. Indulging him by putting him in charge without an intermediary step would be an unnecessary risk for the team and possibly a disservice to Kidd.After 19 years as the brilliant maestro of basketball games, he could first use a taste of the real world. If a first-rate and overdue candidate like Brian Shaw is available, Prokhorov's team should tell Kidd nyet, or at least not yet.
The Brooklyn Nets hired Jason Kidd as their coach Wednesday, bringing the former star back to the franchise he led to its greatest NBA success.Kidd retired earlier this month after one season with the New York Knicks, his 19th in the NBA. The Nets decided to hire him to replace P.J. Carlesimo despite his absence of coaching experience."Jason Kidd has a long and legendary history with the Nets and with the city of New York," Nets owner Mikhail Prokhorov said in a statement. "He has the fire in the belly we need, and has achieved as a player everything the Brooklyn Nets are striving to achieve. We believe he will lead us there. Welcome home, Jason."The move reunites Kidd with the franchise he led to consecutive NBA Finals in 2002-03, when they played in New Jersey. He spent 6½ seasons with the Nets, averaging 14.6 points, 9.1 assists and 7.2 rebounds, and is their career leader in numerous statistical categories."Jason is a proven winner and leader with an incredible wealth of basketball knowledge and experience," general manager Billy King said. "This will be a natural transition for him to move into the role of head coach, as he embodies the tough, smart and team-first mentality that we are trying to establish in Brooklyn."Terms of the deal that made Kidd the 18th coach in franchise history were not disclosed. The Nets will introduce Kidd on Thursday during a press conference at Barclays Center.Carlesimo wasn't retained after leading the Nets into the playoffs, where they lost to the Chicago Bulls in the first round. He went 35-19 after replacing Avery Johnson, who was fired in December.The 40-year-old Kidd was considered one of the smartest players in the NBA, which he believes will help him make the transition into coaching."This is a tremendous opportunity to be named head coach of the Brooklyn Nets, and it's a role I have been studying for over the course of my playing days," Kidd said. "Championship teams are built on being prepared, playing unselfishly and being held accountable, and that's how I expect to coach this basketball team."The Nets interviewed him this week and chose him as their coach after talking with Indiana Pacers assistant Brian Shaw earlier Wednesday.Kidd has a close friendship with Nets point guard Deron Williams and the respect of many in the organization for his achievements as a player. He is second on the NBA's career list in assists and steals, won an NBA title with Dallas and has two Olympic gold medals.
SAN ANTONIO — It is a colossal challenge to stand out on a stage crowded with global stars, corporate pitchmen, living legends and future Hall of Famers. The N.B.A. finals cater to celebrity more than quiet workmanship, and these finals are thick with celebrities of every brand, stripe and vintage.Trump LeBron James and Dwyane Wade? Outshine Tony Parker and Tim Duncan? Good luck to the souls who may try.It happened Tuesday night, before an announced 18,581 euphoric witnesses at the AT&T Center, where two of the least-known players on the stage swiped the spotlight and powered the San Antonio Spurs to a stunning 113-77 rout of the Miami Heat at AT&T Center.World, meet Gary Neal and Danny Green. They have earned your attention.The two guards combined for 51 points, burying the Heat with a barrage of 3-pointers, pumping up the crowd and uplifting the Spurs, who seized a 2-1 lead in the series, with two more games at home. Game 4 is Thursday.One could hardly imagine a more unlikely scoring duo. Neal (24 points) went undrafted and started his career overseas. Green (27 points) was a second-round pick who was cut three times — twice by the Spurs — before becoming a starter here. Each outscored James (15), who had his worst game of the series."It's an unbelievable story, to see where they come from," said the Spurs' Tim Duncan, who is now two victories away from his fifth title.Neal went 6 for 10 on 3-pointers, as he set a career playoff high in scoring. Green, a onetime teammate of James's in Cleveland, went 7 for 9 from the arc."When I saw daylight, I was just letting fly," Green said.No one from the Heat could match their prowess, not even James, the four-time M.V.P. He went 7 for 21 from the field, his every drive cut off or cluttered with bodies. He finished without a single free throw, for the first time (regular season or playoffs) in more than three years.The 36-point margin of defeat was the biggest in James's playoff career, the biggest in Heat playoff history and the third biggest in an N.B.A. finals."I have to do better," James said, adding, "I'm putting everything on my chest and on my shoulders, and I have to be better."James said his teammates "are doing a great job," although that did not exactly ring true. The Heat shot 40.8 percent for the game and meekly scored just 33 points in the second half, when the Spurs blew the game open. Wade scored 16 points, continuing a blasé postseason, while Chris Bosh finished with 12. Mario Chalmers, the Heat's Game 2 hero, went scoreless in 20 minutes, going 0 for 5 from the field. Their only consistent shooter was Mike Miller, who went 5 for 5 from the field, all 3-pointers, scoring 15 points.Yet it was the Heat's complete collapse on defense that had Coach Erik Spoelstra fuming."We got what we deserved tonight," he said, a phrase he used three times. He was not referring to the offense."I don't even want our guys bringing up that side of the floor," Spoelstra said. "If that's what we're going to pinpoint this to, we're kidding ourselves."San Antonio set a finals record by hitting 16 3-pointers and tied the record for 3-point attempts, with 32. Green was one 3-pointer shy of tying Ray Allen's finals record.The Spurs led wire to wire, by as many as 37 points, a remarkable reversal from Game 2, which they lost by 19 points after trailing by as many as 27. They got a stout 12-point, 14-rebound effort from Duncan and a spirited 14 points, 12 rebounds and 4 steals from Kawhi Leonard.The game was never close in the fourth quarter, allowing the home fans to cheer a rare Tracy McGrady appearance and enjoy a group singalong to the chorus of the White Stripes' "Seven Nation Army."The only concern afterward was Parker, who reported pain in one of his hamstrings (he did not specify which) and indicated that he would be having a magnetic resonance imaging examination on Wednesday. Though he played down the concerns, Parker said he was unsure if he would be able to play Thursday."Hopefully, it's nothing," said Parker, who sat out most of the fourth quarter, with the game well in hand. He added, "I'm trying to stay positive, and hopefully I just think it was tight and there was cramping, a little bit of everything."
Eighteen Division I teams will miss postseason play, and another 18 in men's basketball and 9 in other college sports will trade practice time for remedial classroom sessions as a result of the N.C.A.A. academic progress reports released Tuesday.Poor academic progress rate scores mean postseason bans in the 2013-14 academic year for teams from 10 universities: Alabama State, Arkansas-Pine Bluff, Florida A&M, Florida International, Grambling, Mississippi Valley State, New Orleans, Norfolk State, Savannah State and Southern. In the 2012-13 postseason, 15 teams were ineligible.Five teams received so-called Level 3 A.P.R. penalties, which can include financial aid reductions and multiyear postseason bans: the men's basketball teams at Grambling, Mississippi Valley, New Orleans and Louisiana-Monroe and the Chicago State women's volleyball team.Most of the penalized universities, including 11 historically black institutions, have significantly more limited resources than top N.C.A.A. programs.The overall four-year A.P.R. score across Division I is 974, a 1-point increase from last year. Scores are calculated by individual Division I teams based on eligibility and graduation and retention rates. A minimum four-year average of 900, or 930 over the most recent two years, is required for postseason participation. The minimum required A.P.R. scores will increase to 930 over four years or 940 over two years, starting with the 2014-15 postseason.Under the A.P.R. standards, the N.C.A.A. defines "limited resource" universities as those ranking in the bottom 15 percent in athletics spending. Those universities have to earn a four-year A.P.R. of 910 for the 2014-15 postseason.The Connecticut men's basketball team, which was banned from the 2013 postseason because of its A.P.R. problems — the first Bowl Championship Series university so sanctioned — has qualified academically for next year's N.C.A.A. tournament.The Huskies' A.P.R. for 2011-12 was 947 out of 1,000, giving them a two-year score of 962.5, which meets the N.C.A.A. standard. The team's four-year A.P.R. of 897 is still lower than the N.C.A.A. goal.Warde Manuel, UConn's athletic director, said he was proud of the team's academic effort, especially because it was penalized for problems that predated the players' enrollment at the university."These kids didn't get down on themselves," he said. "They didn't stop performing on the court and they didn't stop performing academically, and that is a credit to those kids."UConn went 20-10 last season and probably would have been an N.C.A.A. tournament team. But it was banned from the Big East and N.C.A.A. tournaments based on its A.P.R. scores from the 2007-8 through 2010-11 academic years.Connecticut's four-year score last year was 889, and its two-year average was just 902.The squads that have lost postseason eligibility include six in men's basketball; three in football; two each in baseball, women's volleyball and men's indoor and outdoor track; and the New Orleans women's basketball team. Data for eight of the sanctioned teams remains under review, meaning the penalties could be reversed or reduced.The ineligible men's basketball teams include Arkansas-Pine Bluff and Mississippi Valley for a second consecutive year. Both are members of the Southwestern Athletic Conference, as are Grambling and Alabama State, whose men's basketball teams must also sit out the next postseason.
NEW YORK — Meet the new guy, Jason Kidd.Less than two weeks after ending his long, All-Star career, Jason Kidd acknowledged he has "a lot to learn about coaching" Thursday as he took the Brooklyn Nets job despite having no experience leading a team from the bench.Now a point guard who was all about assists in his 19 years on the court will be looking for a little help."Nervous," the 40-year-old Kidd said when asked how he felt. "I'm a rookie. I go from being one of the oldest players in the league to now a rookie coach. I'm very excited about this challenge. We have a special opportunity to achieve a championship-caliber team."Kidd retired earlier this month after one season with the New York Knicks, and the Nets decided to hire him to replace P.J. Carlesimo — a move that comes with some obvious risks since Kidd has never been a head coach."Jason Kidd embodied everything that we were looking for," Nets general manager Billy King said. "One thing people always thought about Jason is he was somebody who always worked hard and that's a sort of thing I think will translate into coaching. Does he have a learning curve? Yes. I think if you know Jason, he doesn't take something and want to be good at it, he wants to be great."Kidd is rejoining a franchise he led to consecutive NBA Finals appearances in 2002-03 when they played in New Jersey. He spent 6½ seasons with the Nets, averaging 14.6 points, 9.1 assists and 7.2 rebounds, and is their career leader in numerous statistical categories.He is second on the NBA's career list in assists and steals, won an NBA title with Dallas and has two Olympic gold medals.Terms of the deal that made Kidd the 18th coach in franchise history were not disclosed."This is a great challenge, so I'm looking very forward to this," Kidd said. "Yes, I have a lot to learn about coaching, but when I played I felt I was an extension of the coach."Carlesimo wasn't retained after leading the Nets into the playoffs, where they lost to the Chicago Bulls in the first round. He went 35-19 after replacing Avery Johnson, who was fired in December.Kidd said he was also contacted by Dallas Mavericks owner Mark Cuban to offer him the opportunity to rejoin that franchise and learn the business operations. But he interviewed with the Nets on Monday and they chose him as their coach after talking with Indiana Pacers assistant Brian Shaw."In my meeting with him he talked about our team," King said of his discussion with Kidd. "He knew the personnel. When I talked about how he would use them in certain ways, how he would defense, how he would operate offensively, he said, 'What I want to do, I want to get uptempo, I want to get the ball moving.'"Kidd, who has a close friendship with Nets point guard Deron Williams, said his message to players will be simple: "Understand you've got to play hard, you've got to play defense and we're going to grow together. That's what's going to make it special."He also credited Golden State coach Mark Jackson's success in his first year as coach of the Warriors for possibly playing a role in Brooklyn's decision to hire him."He did give guys the opportunity, maybe crack the door open for guys who were playing to be able to go into coaching because of the success that he's had," Kidd said. "There are guys that are examples out there that have done it. Hopefully I can carry the torch and have the same success."Kidd also has a court date next month on Long Island stemming from a drunken-driving arrest last year. He has pleaded not guilty to misdemeanor DWI and is due in Southampton Town Court on July 11, according to the Suffolk County prosecutors' office.
For the second time in his storied N.B.A. career, Jason Kidd has been asked to play savior for the Nets , a franchise that has been moved and transformed but is forever seeking credibility.The Nets signed Kidd as their coach on Wednesday, banking that his basketball acumen and his Hall of Fame credentials can lift them into championship contention, despite his lack of coaching experience.It was a stunning and unconventional move. Kidd, 40, just retired as a player on June 3, after one season with the rival Knicks. Although many former players have become successful head coaches without first serving as an assistant, few have gone straight from playing to coaching so quickly."Jason is a proven winner and leader with an incredible wealth of basketball knowledge and experience," General Manager Billy King said in a statement. "This will be a natural transition for him to move into the role of head coach, as he embodies the tough, smart and team-first mentality that we are trying to establish in Brooklyn."The precise terms of Kidd's contract were unknown. A person with knowledge of the deal said reports of a three-year deal were inaccurate. Kidd will be introduced Thursday at a 2 p.m. news conference at Barclays Center."This is a tremendous opportunity to be named head coach of the Brooklyn Nets, and it's a role I have been studying for over the course of my playing days," Kidd said in a statement.  "Championship teams are built on being prepared, playing unselfishly and being held accountable, and that's how I expect to coach this basketball team. I am truly excited about this next phase of my basketball career."The hope is that Kidd can do for the Brooklyn Nets what a younger Kidd once did for the New Jersey Nets. Twelve years ago, the Nets acquired Kidd from the Phoenix Suns and were instantly transformed, from a laughingstock to a title contender. Behind Kidd's playmaking, the Nets made the finals in 2002 and 2003. They made the playoffs in each of his six full seasons."Jason Kidd has a long and legendary history with the Nets and with the city of New York," Mikhail D. Prokhorov, the Nets' owner, said in a statement. "He has the fire in the belly we need and has achieved as a player everything the Brooklyn Nets are striving to achieve. We believe he will lead us there. Welcome home, Jason."As one of the greatest players in Nets history, Kidd will surely resonate with fans, an important consideration for a franchise still working to carve out its niche in New York. On a more practical level, Kidd should have a strong influence on a Nets lineup that was notably lacking in intensity last season.The Nets won 49 games — their most successful campaign in seven years — but they were bounced in the first round of the playoffs by the grittier Chicago Bulls, who won Game 7 on the Nets' home court.With no salary-cap room and little roster flexibility, the Nets will need improvement from within. Much now depends on Kidd's ability to motivate and inspire his three star players: Deron Williams, Joe Johnson and Brook Lopez.In his interview this week, Kidd gave a detailed rundown of how he would use each player on the roster. He also impressed team officials with his analysis of the Nets' playoff demise, offering insights on specific games and situations.The Nets seriously considered only two candidates: Kidd and Brian Shaw, another former N.B.A. guard with a sharp basketball mind. Shaw, currently the associate head coach of the Indiana Pacers, has been an assistant for nine years and is highly regarded around the league. He remains a candidate for several other openings.While Shaw has the stronger résumé, Kidd brings assets that are more difficult to quantify but are possibly more valuable. He is among the greatest point guards to play the game and is universally respected by players. During his season with the Knicks, Kidd was highly influential in persuading Carmelo Anthony to play a more team-oriented game and in helping to corral the volatile J. R. Smith.It was Kidd's knowledge and commanding presence that proved to be the critical factors, along with his reputation for improving every team he has ever joined. Kidd helped the Dallas Mavericks win a title in 2011.Team officials hope that Kidd can follow the model set by Larry Bird, who took over the Indiana Pacers in 1997 and guided them to the finals three years later. Bird had no coaching experience, but he hired a staff of veterans, led by Rick Carlisle and Dick Harter. Kidd intends to do the same, and he has reached out to Lawrence Frank — his former coach with the Nets — and Tim Grgurich, a longtime N.B.A. assistant, among others.Kidd will be the Nets' third coach since they moved to Brooklyn, following Avery Johnson, who was fired in mid-December, and P. J. Carlesimo, who was let go after the season.While Williams has a shaky history with coaches and chafed under Johnson, Kidd has a built-in advantage: he and Williams are friends who share an agent and mutual respect."Excited to get to work under our new head coach @RealJasonKidd," Williams said on Twitter Wednesday night. "Great leader and great basketball mind. Will be a great head coach."
SAN ANTONIO — The injured point guard and his coach spoke 10 minutes apart on Wednesday, but they still managed to issue the same vague answers about the most scrutinized hamstring in South Texas.No, Tony Parker said, he does not know whether he will play in Game 4. And no, Gregg Popovich said, he will not know until Thursday.Their uncertainty ensured another restless night here, with any delight derived from the San Antonio Spurs' 36-point drubbing of Miami tempered by the possibility that Parker, their facilitator and scorer par excellence, would spend Thursday night watching Game 4 from the bench."It depends on when I wake up tomorrow how I feel," said Parker, 31, who has a strained right hamstring. He added: "Obviously it's the finals, you know. I know Pop is always going to prefer we take no risk."The timing — and the nature — of the injury complicates matters. Popovich has long favored a conservative approach in managing his 30-something players, most notably in November, when he sent his three best players back to Texas before their fourth road game in five nights, a nationally televised matchup against the Heat. If this were a regular-season game, Parker would almost certainly sit.But it is not, and Parker played with a bruised right calf in Game 4 of the Spurs' second-round series against Golden State.Hamstring strains are particularly temperamental and vexing, though. A Grade 1 strain, like Parker's, is considered the least severe, but it is still a tear of the muscle fibers. It still restricts Parker's movement, his explosiveness and his ability to come off screens and run the offense.Parker, averaging 21.3 points and 7.1 assists in 17 games this postseason, joined his teammates on the court for practice Wednesday, but he did not participate during the 30-minute portion that was open to the news media. Asked what would influence his decision whether to play Parker, Popovich said, "A lot of it will be what he feels, I think."Popovich bristled at the suggestion that he would be willing to concede Game 4 if it meant Parker would be at full strength for Game 5 on Sunday and beyond, saying that the notion "confuses my whole brain.""Suffice to say, everybody has a different approach to playing time or when to sit or not sit players," Popovich said. "And we do it one way; other teams do it differently."Parker is unsure how or when he injured his hamstring, and he declined to say whether his late arrival to AT&T Center on Tuesday — stuck in traffic for two hours, he pulled in less than an hour before Game 3 — affected his usual warm-up and stretching routine. He finished with 6 points and 8 assists, playing only 8 of his 27 minutes after halftime.Parker said he did not feel pressure to play through the strain, and it would be a disservice to Tim Duncan, Danny Green, Kawhi Leonard and others to say that the Spurs cannot function in his absence. In 16 games without Parker this season, the Spurs went 11-5. And three of those five losses came when Duncan did not play, either.Still, Parker will be, at best, limited, and Manu Ginobili said it would be "very, very difficult" to thrive without him. It is unrealistic to expect that Green and Gary Neal, who together made 13 of 19 3-pointers in Game 3 and combined for 51 points, will provide the same boost. Duncan said he expected to shoulder more of the offensive burden."We know we need his speed, his judgment, his pick-and-rolls," Ginobili said of Parker. "Because after that, from that we create a lot of offense."It is possible that Popovich would give Neal, who scored 24 points in Game 3, minutes at point guard, but it is more likely that he would elevate the second-year player Cory Joseph, who has backed up Parker for most of the postseason.Still, that is not the situation that San Antonio would prefer. Although his team would theoretically gain an advantage if Parker could not play, Miami Coach Erik Spoelstra seemed to agree."We're hoping he plays," Spoelstra said. "We want both teams to be healthy. We don't want any excuses, and they don't want any excuses either."
On the night before a friend's wedding in Sea Island, Ga., Jason Kidd and his agent, Jeff Schwartz, sat in a hotel room discussing what Kidd might do after retiring from the Knicks. They talked about finding a front-office role, or maybe a broadcasting gig, or just stepping back and spending time on a golf course. But the subject soon turned to coaching.For years, Schwartz had quietly told Kidd to consider coaching as a future career. In 2010, Kidd, then with the Dallas Mavericks, began taking notes on how his coach, Rick Carlisle, handled certain situations — a diary of sorts.As it happened, the Nets, the franchise that Kidd led to N.B.A. finals appearances in 2002 and 2003, were looking for a new coach when Kidd announced his retirement. It did not take Kidd long to convince General Manager Billy King that he could handle the role. Kidd was hired Wednesday."I'm a rookie," Kidd said at his introductory news conference Thursday. "I go from being one of the oldest guys in the league to being a rookie coach. I'm very excited about this challenge."Ten days after he announced his retirement, and 13 days after the wedding in Georgia, Kidd, 40, stood on the main concourse level above the Barclays Center court. Digital banners proclaimed: "Hello Coach! J. Kidd Back Where He Belongs."He heard the "Brooklyn" chants twice during the regular season, while wearing the jersey of a rival. Now he inherits a re-branded franchise that went through two coaches, Avery Johnson and P. J. Carlesimo, last season and lost a disappointing seven-game series to the Chicago Bulls in the first round of the playoffs."You have to start with structure, understanding we're here to build something," Kidd said. "It starts with your leader."Kidd was referring not to himself but to Deron Williams, the Nets' star point guard. Williams sat in the front row Thursday, soaking in everything from Kidd, whom he considers a close friend."I think it's great," Williams said. "It's exciting, an exciting hire for us and this organization and me personally. I grew up watching Jason, trying to emulate him, and now I get to really learn from him."King's relationship with Kidd began at the Olympic basketball qualifying tournament in Puerto Rico in 1999, when King was on the United States national team committee. King said he recently spoke with Mike Krzyzewski, who coached Kidd at the Olympics in 2008. King also mentioned Kidd's relationship with the former Nets executive Rod Thorn as being instrumental in the decision to hire Kidd.King rejected the notion that hiring Kidd, who has no coaching experience, was too great a risk."Any time you hire a coach, you could say it's a risk," King said. "I just feel confident in him. I don't look at it like I'm taking a risk. I'm hiring a coach, somebody I believe in, and we're going to work our butts off to make it work."When the Knicks played Golden State in late February, Kidd approached Warriors Coach Mark Jackson and had a message for him: "Thanks."Jackson, a former All-Star point guard, went on to finish seventh in the voting for coach of the year. He was hired by the Warriors in 2011 despite not having any prior coaching experience, and Kidd viewed that as inspiration."He did give guys an opportunity and maybe cracked the door open for guys to be able to go into coaching," Kidd said. "Because of the success that he's had."King mentioned Jackson as well as Larry Bird, who, despite his lack of experience, was named coach of the Indiana Pacers ahead of the 1997-8 season, when he won the coach of the year award."Until Donnie Walsh hired him, they never thought of Larry Bird coaching," King said. "And they won a few games."But Kidd's inexperience was not the only consideration for King. Last July, Kidd was arrested on suspicion of drunken driving after he crashed his Escalade into a telephone pole near his home in Southampton, N.Y. Kidd, who pleaded not guilty, is scheduled to appear in Southampton Justice Court on June 20.Reached by telephone, Kidd's lawyer, Edward Burke Jr., declined to comment. King and Kidd declined to comment specifically, saying it was a legal matter, but King said he spoke with Kidd and Burke about the matter and felt comfortable with their responses.Now Kidd will jump right in to evaluating players for the N.B.A. draft and hiring a staff. The Nets still have several roster moves to iron out. A core of veterans will return to a team that fizzled in the postseason.But Kidd would not need to glance far back to find the Nets at the top of the league — he was there, the dynamic floor leader, in 2002 and 2003, and he will seek to return them there, without the ball in his hands."I'm a rookie; why wouldn't I be nervous?" Kidd said. "Just understanding there is a lot of work to be done. I'm up for that challenge, and I'm going to put in my time."
ATLANTA — Former professional women's basketball player and Olympic gold medal winner Chamique Holdsclaw will have to take anger management classes after pleading guilty to charges that she shot into a player's car and smashed the windows with a baseball bat, prosecutors said on Saturday.Holdsclaw, 35, pleaded guilty on Friday to aggravated assault, criminal damage and possession of a firearm during the commission of a felony, prosecutors said. She will be on probation for the next three years.The charges stem from a November 13 incident involving Holdsclaw and Jennifer Lacy, a player for the Tulsa Shock Women's National Basketball Association team.Lacy, who said Holdsclaw was her former girlfriend, was driving on a busy Atlanta street when she spotted Holdsclaw in a car behind her, the Fulton County District Attorney's Office said.When Lacy stopped her car, Holdsclaw, allegedly began striking the vehicle with a bat and shattered several windows. Holdsclaw then fired a gunshot into the still-occupied vehicle, the district attorney's office said. Lacy was not injured in the attack, prosecutors said.In addition to probation and anger management classes, Holdsclaw will be required to pay a $3,000 fine, and perform 120 hours of public service by speaking with youth "about depression, overcoming adversity and the consequences of one's actions," prosecutors said in a news release.Holdsclaw, who played for the University of Tennessee, joined the WNBA in 1999 when she was drafted by the Washington Mystics. She retired in 2010 after playing for the Los Angeles Sparks, the Atlanta Dream and the San Antonio Silver Stars.As a player for the U.S. women's basketball team, Holdsclaw won a gold medal at the 2000 Olympic Games in Sydney.
SAN ANTONIO — The national debate over immigration touched down in an unusual spot this week: the N.B.A. finals.Sebastien de la Cruz, an 11-year-old Mexican-American, sang the national anthem here on Tuesday night wearing a mariachi suit. Within minutes of his performance, he had become the target of racist tweets about his heritage and his immigration status (Sebastien was born in San Antonio).The episode could have ended there, with a sour finish on what should have been an uplifting moment for the city and the league. But the Spurs decided to play it differently.The team invited Sebastien back for an encore performance on Thursday night, sending a strong message of support to the de la Cruz family. Mayor Julian Castro rallied around Sebastien as well when he introduced him to the sellout crowd. Castro called Sebastien "a phenomenal young man."De la Cruz did not alter his performance on Thursday. He again wore a mariachi suit, raised his right hand at the end of the song and took a bow as the crowd gave him a standing ovation. Spurs Coach Gregg Popovich and Miami Heat Coach Erik Spoelstra, rivals in this championship series, walked to midcourt to congratulate de la Cruz. Spoelstra shook his hand and said: "Good job. You keep on doing what you're doing.""I want to thank Coach Popovich and all the Spurs for helping me keep my head up," de la Cruz said Thursday. "It makes me feel real good about myself."His father, Juan, served in the Navy, and his mother, Stacy, is a physical education teacher. De la Cruz was featured on "America's Got Talent" last year and also performed with the San Antonio Symphony in April.Before Thursday's game, Popovich, whose Spurs have a league-record nine international players, said he was disappointed, but not surprised, that some people disrespected Sebastien."What I was surprised by was how proud these idiots were of their ignorance, by printing their names next to their comments," he said. He called de la Cruz a class act. "Way more mature than most his age. And as much as those comments by the idiots saddens you about your country, he makes you feel that the future could be very bright."
SAN ANTONIO — The swings in momentum in these NBA Finals have been so wild that it has been difficult to grasp just who is in control of the series. Maybe that's because with San Antonio and Miami tied at two games apiece, neither team really is, or feels like it has, any semblance of control.The Heat won Game 2 by 19, lost Game 3 by 36 and then cruised to a 16-point win in Game 4 on Thursday night to even things up. This series may be on a run of blowouts, but each game was close at halftime and felt like it could have gone either way until one or two factors conspired to bring on the avalanche."This series is being decided by this," Heat coach Erik Spoelstra said, pinching his index finger and thumb together. "It might not be that way in the (scores), but in terms of how competitive it actually is."It's a three-game series now. First team to two wins, with a pivotal Game 5 on Sunday in San Antonio."It's a play here, a shot here or there with three minutes to go or could be a period at the end of the third period where you turn it over two or three times and the other team makes two shots," Spurs coach Gregg Popovich said. "It's a seven-point lead and you never recover. It's just those little moments in the game that determine the outcome. It could be a call or a turnover. Very, very fine line."With that in mind, here's a look at some of the keys and the obstacles for both teams.WHY THE HEAT CAN WIN:—They've got the best player in the world, and he's finally playing like it: LeBron James was locked down in the first three games of the series, unable to get to the paint or knock down open jumpers that he always had. Finally in Game 4 he looked like the four-time MVP: 33 points, 11 rebounds and four assists.—They don't have to win on the road again: The Heat's victory Thursday assured them that the series will end on South Beach, where Games 6 and 7 are scheduled to be played.—Their small lineup worked like a charm: Spoelstra's gamble to insert sharp-shooter Mike Miller into the lineup worked like a charm. Miller didn't score a point in Game 4, but his mere presence forced Popovich to abandon his best defensive lineup that included big men Tim Duncan and Tiago Splitter prowling the paint. Game 3 rebounds: Spurs 52 (19 offensive), Heat 36. Game 4 rebounds: Heat 41, Spurs 36 (5 offensive).WHY THE HEAT ARE IN TROUBLE:—Dwyane Wade's health: The All-Star's right knee has been aching throughout the postseason, and his teammates and coaches have seen it zap the energy and spring he normally has. He was brilliant in Game 4 with 32 points and six steals. But will his knee allow him to sustain that effort going forward?—Inconsistency: The Heat haven't won two straight games since about three weeks. For some reason, it seems to be a team that needs adversity to get it going. They've already fallen behind in the series twice. A third time would definitely be playing with fire.—They're not as intimidating: Even with their three All-Stars and a 27-game winning streak this season, the Heat are not striking fear into their opponents' hearts anymore. The Pacers took them to seven games in the Eastern Conference finals, and the Spurs — from the veterans down to the youngsters — have not backed down. "I just think that teams are not afraid of them," Hall of Famer Magic Johnson said.WHY THE SPURS CAN WIN:—Game 5 is in San Antonio: The Spurs have the early advantage in this best-of-three by getting the first one at home in front of their loyal fans. It's a crucial one for them so they don't have to go to Miami needing to win two in a row.—They have already won in Miami: Winning Game 1 last week gives the Spurs the confidence to go to South Beach and get the job done. They played almost flawlessly in Game 1, with only four turnovers and holding James to 18 points. So they know what it takes to go in there and come out on top.—They have had success against LeBron: Prior to Game 4's monster line, the reigning MVP was completely flummoxed by Kawhi Leonard, Danny Green and the paint-clogging Spurs defense. In the first three games, he averaged 16.7 points and shot 39 percent. Rediscovering the LeBron antidote would bode well for the Spurs' chances.WHY THE SPURS ARE IN TROUBLE:—Manu Ginobili has disappeared: Not just in the finals, but for almost the entire postseason. He is averaging 7.5 points on 34 percent shooting in the series and has played with a tentativeness and hesitancy that just hasn't been there for most of his outstanding career. If the Spurs are going to have a chance, they have to get him going.—Tony Parker's health: The one player the Heat have no answer for is Parker, the shifty point guard who carved up Miami's defense in Game 1. But he has been slowed by a strained right hamstring that he said "could tear any time now." If it does, the Spurs are sunk.—They've been sloppy: Since tying a finals record for fewest turnovers in Game 1, the Spurs have given it up 47 times. Miami's defense certainly deserves a lot of credit, but the precision and cohesion that have been hallmarks of San Antonio's offense for years were nowhere to be found in Game 4. All the mistakes allowed the Heat to get out in transition, and they turned 19 turnovers into 23 points.
SAN ANTONIO — Manu Ginobili ran onto the floor as fans stood and screamed.He went to the bench, and they chanted his name.The sights and sounds of so many San Antonio spring nights were back Sunday — and the real party might be just a few days away.Ginobili broke out of a slump in a big way with 24 points and 10 assists in his first start of the season, and the Spurs beat the Miami Heat 114-104 to take a 3-2 lead in the NBA Finals.Tony Parker scored 26 points, Tim Duncan had 17 points and 12 rebounds, and Ginobili had his highest-scoring game of the season as the Spurs became the first team to shoot 60 percent in a finals game in four years."He's such a huge part of what we do and how far we've come. You can see it tonight in how we played and the results of the game," Duncan said. "We're always confident in him. ... we know he has it in him. We hope he can bring it forward for one more win."Danny Green smashed the NBA Finals record for 3-pointers, hitting six more and scoring 24 points. Kawhi Leonard finished with 16, but the stage was set when Ginobili trotted out with Duncan, Parker and the rest of starters in what could have been the last finals home game for a trio that's meant so much to San Antonio.One more victory and the Spurs' Big Three, not Miami's, will be the one that rules the NBA.And a big reason was Ginobili, as he's been for so long — just not during what had been a miserable series for the former Sixth Man of the Year."I was angry, disappointed," Ginobili said. "We are playing in the NBA Finals, we were 2-2, and I felt I still wasn't really helping the team that much," Ginobili said. "And that was the frustrating part."On Sunday, it was all forgotten."He's obviously very popular. He's been here a long time. He's helped us have a lot of success over the years," Spurs coach Gregg Popovich said.LeBron James and Dwyane Wade each scored 25 points for the Heat, who host Game 6 on Tuesday night. They need a victory to force the first Game 7 in the finals since the Lakers beat the Celtics in 2010.Miami's Big Three formed a few weeks after that game, with predictions of multiple titles to follow. Now they're a loss away from going just 1 for 3 in finals to start their partnership, while the Spurs could run their perfect record to 5 for 5."This is the position we're in and the most important game is Game 6," James said. "We can't worry about a Game 7, we have to worry about Game 6."Duncan won his first title in 1999, and Parker and Ginobili were with him for three championships since. They have been the perfect partnership, keeping the Spurs in the hunt virtually every year while teams like the Lakers, Mavericks and Suns have all risen and fallen in the Western Conference during that time.They remained unbeaten in Game 5s, including two previous victories when the series was tied at 2-2. Of the 27 times the finals have been tied at 2-2, the Game 5 winner has won 20 of them.Miami was the most recent loser, falling to Dallas in Game 5 in 2011 before being eliminated at home the next game."We're going to see if we're a better ballclub and if we're better prepared for this moment," Wade said.San Antonio shot 42 of 70, right at 60 percent. The last team to make 60 percent of its shots in the finals was Orlando, which hit 62.5 in Game 3 against the Lakers in 2009, according to STATS."They just absolutely outplayed us," Heat coach Erik Spoelstra said. "At times they were just picking one guy out at a time and going at us mano-a-mano. That's got to change."Ray Allen scored 21 points on the night for the Heat as he watched Green shatter his finals 3-point record. Green has 25 3s in the series. Allen made 22 3-pointers in six games in 2008 finals for Boston.Chris Bosh scored 16 for Miami, Wade had 10 assists, and James had eight assists and six rebounds, but it was their defense that let the Heat down in this one.The Heat were within one with 3:05 left in the third before Green hit yet another 3-pointer and Ginobili followed with the stretch that turned the game into the fourth straight blowout of the finals.The crafty lefty plays with a flair developed on the courts of Argentina and perfected in Europe before coming to the NBA. He sees angles other players can't and takes risks few others would, but his style has been the perfect fit alongside Duncan and Parker.He converted a three-point play, tossed in a floater with his left hand as he drifted right, and found Tiago Splitter under the hoop with a pass to make it 85-74. He flipped in another runner with 2.9 seconds to go, sending the Spurs to the fourth with an 87-75 lead as fans chanted "Manu! Manu!" during the break between the third and fourth quarters.Ginobili had been averaging just 7.5 points on 34.5 percent shooting in the series, making only three of his 16 3-point attempts. But Popovich made the finals' second lineup change in two games, after the Heat inserted Mike Miller to start Game 4.Ginobili didn't make a start this season and certainly hadn't been playing like someone who belonged with the first five. But in the Spurs' biggest game of the season, they remained confident he would break out, and they were right."I knew that I was not scoring much and I felt it in the air. But I tried not to care about it. I know I'm critical enough of myself to be worrying about what other people say," Ginobili said.It was the first time he scored 24 or more points since having 34 on June 4, 2012, against Oklahoma City, according to STATS.The AT&T Center crowd roared when Ginobili was the last starter announced, the cheers growing louder when he made a jumper — originally ruled a 3-pointer but later overturned by replay — on the first possession. He assisted on the Spurs' next three baskets, and it was 15-10 when he later hit a 3 that did count.Parker picked it up from there, dancing his way into the lane repeatedly and scoring seven points in a 12-0 run that made it 29-17. Leonard's 3-pointer with 4.7 seconds left, on an assist from Ginobili, made it 32-19 and gave the Spurs 12 makes in 19 attempts (63 percent) in the opening 12 minutes.Green's third straight 3-pointer made it 45-28 about 5 minutes into the second quarter, and it seemed the trend of blowouts would continue. But James suddenly got rolling during a 14-2 Miami spurt that cut it to five on his third consecutive Heat basket.San Antonio made 21 of 34 shots (62 percent) in the first half, opening a 61-52 lead on Parker's drive with 0.4 seconds left.Miami then ran off eight in a row to start the second half and get within one. They cut it to one again later in the period before Ginobili led the flurry that finished the Heat for good.It was a fitting finish if it was the last home game in the finals for San Antonio's star trio, which has combined for 101 playoff victories together. Ginobili has said he might think about retirement as he turns 36 next month, and Duncan is 37.Both coaches said it was difficult waiting two days between games — Popovich said it was "like death" — though he did say it was great for the Spurs because they have some older players.The break seemed to help his team early, particularly Parker, whose energy sagged in the second of Game 4 as he struggled with a strained hamstring that he said could tear at any time and would've had him sidelined during the regular season.If things fall right for the Spurs, he'll have plenty of time to heal after Tuesday.Notes: The last team to lose Game 5 of a 2-2 series and then win the title was the Los Angeles Lakers, when they beat Boston in 2010. ... The Spurs said Sunday that reserve guard Patty Mills had surgery to remove an abscess Friday and would miss the rest of the series. Mills had an infection in his right foot and the abscess developed between his fourth and fifth toes.
SAN ANTONIO — Win or lose, Sunday marked the final home game of this season for the Spurs. The series shifts back to Miami for Game 6 on Tuesday night, and the winner will be decided on South Beach.That also means that Spurs fans may have had their last chance to cheer for Manu Ginobili in the black and silver. Ginobili will turn 36 in July and is a free agent at the end of this season. He has struggled mightily in these playoffs and entered Game 5 averaging 7.5 points and shooting 34 percent in the series.Ginobili simply hasn't looked like the dynamic, unpredictable playmaker he's been for most of his career, leading some, including himself, to wonder if he has another season left in him."Everything is a day-by-day basis," Ginobili said. "Once the season finishes and I see how I feel, I can't imagine me not playing at least one more year here, but time will tell. We'll see."He's played his entire career in San Antonio, a stay that was extended when he signed a three-year, $39 million extension three years ago. He's struggled with hamstring injuries this season, but said he feels fine physically right now.At the end of a long season, Ginobili admits to being tired and wondering how much more basketball he has left in him. Then he thinks about what the game, and San Antonio, has meant to him, and has trouble picturing himself walking away."Sometimes I do think about retirement," he told reporters Saturday. "But then I say, 'No, no. I love what I do. I'm very lucky to be in a franchise like this. So I really can't picture myself being retired already.'"There's a small chance. It's not that I'm really considering, but I can never say 'no' for sure, because I sometimes consider it."The Spurs faithful aren't giving up on him just yet. A banner at AT&T Center on Sunday night read, "We Gino-believe."MIAMI FINISH: This season did not actually start in Miami; there was a game in Cleveland that tipped off an hour before the Heat opened defense of their NBA title against the Boston Celtics.But for the third straight season, the NBA schedule will end in Miami.Dallas won its 2011 championship in Miami, and the Heat closed out the 2012 finals against Oklahoma City at home as well. And with Games 6 and 7 (the latter if necessary) of this series also to be played in South Florida, it marks the first time that one team has hosted the final NBA game in three consecutive seasons since Boston did so in 1984, 1985 and 1986.The luxury of going home for the end of the NBA Finals wasn't something the Heat were all that interested in discussing before Game 5 in San Antonio."It doesn't matter where our next game is," Heat forward Shane Battier said. "It could be on Mars."NO FIGHTING: There was a fair amount of pushing and shoving in the Miami-Chicago series, and certainly no love lost between Miami and Indiana in the Eastern Conference finals.In the NBA Finals, the Heat haven't been dealing with vitriol.Heat guard Dwyane Wade told NBA TV that not only is this series just about basketball — and rest assured, that's OK with both teams — but that Miami thinks San Antonio's players are "nice.""Nothing is happening in the games that has been chippy," Wade said. "I don't really know how a lot of them even sound. They don't speak much to you or say anything."It has been rather gentlemanly, as indicated earlier in the series when Miami's Mario Chalmers extended an arm and pulled San Antonio's Tim Duncan up after the Spurs' forward took a tumble near the baseline.NBA TV: Commissioner David Stern, who is presiding over his last finals after 30 years on the job, has watched the league's television channel — NBATV — grow from just an idea to a full-fledged production that is celebrating its 14th year of broadcasting at the NBA Finals.The channel has grown into one distributed to 61 million homes, provided 40 hours of live coverage of the finals and, with a partnership with NBA Digital and Turner, has put together an impressive product with analysts that include Barkley, Rick Fox and Steve Smith, who were at the game on Sunday night. Postgame shows, highlight packages, televised press conferences, it's all there."It's a whole new world for us and we're very excited by it," Stern said.The NBA is also encouraged by the league's reach on social media. The league has received 410 million likes and followers combined across all platforms, including 60 million in China. The NBA's first tweet came in 2009 and the account has grown to have 7.3 million followers and the league's videos posted on YouTube have been viewed 1.45 billion times."Our ability on Twitter and Facebook and Instagram to reach out to millions of fans is really very exciting," Stern said. "And it becomes really a digital ecosystem, and that's a big deal for us."NOTES: With his final point of Game 4, Miami's LeBron James increased his career postseason total to 3,777 points, one more than John Havlicek for ninth on the league's all-time list. And in Game 5, San Antonio's Tim Duncan was breaking a tie with Scottie Pippen for sixth place outright in NBA history with 209 career playoff appearances. ... James entered Game 5 just 52 minutes shy of matching Indiana's Paul George for the total-minutes-played lead (including playoffs) in the league this season. It puts James on pace to lead the league in that category for the second time in three years. ... Neither team is expected to practice Monday, as both settle again in Miami to prepare for Game 6 on Tuesday night.
SAN ANTONIO — Across three NBA championships and more than 100 playoff victories together, Tim Duncan, Tony Parker and Manu Ginobili have built a bond most teammates will never share.So maybe Ginobili could ignore it when he was suddenly being criticized around San Antonio.You better believe it bothered the others."Yeah, of course," Parker said. "Because for everything he did for the franchise, I thought it was a little bit too harsh. We understand it's a business. He came out big tonight."Just like Parker said he would.Ginobili broke out of a slump in a big way with 24 points and 10 assists in his first start of the season, and the Spurs beat the Miami Heat 114-104 on Sunday night to take a 3-2 lead in the NBA Finals.Parker scored 26 points, Duncan had 17 points and 12 rebounds, and Ginobili had his highest-scoring game of the season as the Spurs became the first team to shoot 60 percent in a finals game in four years."He's such a huge part of what we do and how far we've come. You can see it tonight in how we played and the results of the game," Duncan said. "We're always confident in him. ... We know he has it in him. We hope he can bring it forward for one more win."Danny Green smashed the NBA Finals record for 3-pointers, hitting six more and scoring 24 points. Kawhi Leonard finished with 16, but the stage was set when Ginobili trotted out with Duncan, Parker and the rest of starters in what could have been the last finals home game for a trio that's meant so much to San Antonio.One more victory and the Spurs' Big Three, not Miami's, will be the one that rules the NBA.And a big reason was Ginobili, as he's been for so long — just not during what had been a miserable series for the former Sixth Man of the Year."I was angry, disappointed," Ginobili said. "We are playing in the NBA Finals, we were 2-2, and I felt I still wasn't really helping the team that much," Ginobili said. "And that was the frustrating part."On Sunday, it was all forgotten."He's obviously very popular. He's been here a long time. He's helped us have a lot of success over the years," Spurs coach Gregg Popovich said.LeBron James and Dwyane Wade each scored 25 points for the Heat, who host Game 6 on Tuesday night. They need a victory to force the first Game 7 in the finals since the Lakers beat the Celtics in 2010.Miami's Big Three formed a few weeks after that game, with predictions of multiple titles to follow. Now they're a loss away from going just 1 for 3 in finals to start their partnership, while the Spurs could run their perfect record to 5 for 5."This is the position we're in and the most important game is Game 6," James said. "We can't worry about a Game 7, we have to worry about Game 6."Duncan won his first title in 1999, and Parker and Ginobili were with him for three championships since. They have been the perfect partnership, keeping the Spurs in the hunt virtually every year while teams such as the Lakers, Mavericks and Suns have all risen and fallen in the Western Conference during that time.They remained unbeaten in Game 5s, including two previous victories when the series was tied at 2-2. Of the 27 times the finals have been tied at 2-2, the Game 5 winner has won 20 of them.Miami was the most recent loser, falling to Dallas in Game 5 in 2011 before being eliminated at home the next game."We're going to see if we're a better ballclub and if we're better prepared for this moment," Wade said.San Antonio shot 42 of 70, right at 60 percent. The last team to make 60 percent of its shots in the finals was Orlando, which hit 62.5 in Game 3 against the Lakers in 2009, according to STATS."They just absolutely outplayed us," Heat coach Erik Spoelstra said. "At times they were just picking one guy out at a time and going at us mano y mano. That will change."Ray Allen scored 21 points on the night for the Heat as he watched Green shatter his finals 3-point record. Green has 25 3s in the series. Allen made 22 3-pointers in six games in the 2008 finals for Boston.Chris Bosh scored 16 points for Miami, Wade had 10 assists, and James had eight assists and six rebounds, but it was their defense that let the Heat down in this one.The Heat were within one with 3:05 left in the third quarter before Green hit yet another 3-pointer and Ginobili followed with the stretch that turned the game into the fourth straight blowout of the finals.The crafty lefty plays with a flair developed on the courts of Argentina and perfected in Europe before coming to the NBA. He sees angles other players can't and takes risks few others would, but his style has been the perfect fit alongside Duncan and Parker.He converted a three-point play, tossed in a floater with his left hand as he drifted right, and found Tiago Splitter under the hoop with a pass to make it 85-74.He flipped in another runner with 2.9 seconds to go in the period, sending the Spurs to the fourth with an 87-75 lead as fans chanted "Manu! Manu!" during the break between the third and fourth quarters.Ginobili had been averaging just 7.5 points on 34.5 percent shooting in the series, making only three of his 16 3-point attempts. But Popovich made the finals' second lineup change in two games, after the Heat inserted Mike Miller to start Game 4.Ginobili didn't make a start this season and certainly hadn't been playing like someone who belonged with the first five. But in the Spurs' biggest game of the season, they remained confident he would break out, and they were right."I knew that I was not scoring much and I felt it in the air. But I tried not to care about it. I know I'm critical enough of myself to be worrying about what other people say," Ginobili said.It was the first time he scored 24 or more points since having 34 on June 4, 2012, against Oklahoma City, according to STATS.The AT&T Center crowd roared when Ginobili was the last starter announced, the cheers growing louder when he made a jumper — originally ruled a 3-pointer but later overturned by replay — on the first possession. He assisted on the Spurs' next three baskets, and it was 15-10 when he later hit a 3 that did count.Parker picked it up from there, dancing his way into the lane repeatedly and scoring seven points in a 12-0 run that made it 29-17.Leonard's 3-pointer with 4.7 seconds left, on an assist from Ginobili, made it 32-19 and gave the Spurs 12 makes in 19 attempts (63 percent) in the opening 12 minutes.Green's third straight 3-pointer made it 45-28 about 5 minutes into the second quarter, and it seemed the trend of blowouts would continue.But James suddenly got rolling during a 14-2 Miami spurt that cut it to five on his third consecutive Heat basket.San Antonio made 21 of 34 shots (62 percent) in the first half, opening a 61-52 lead on Parker's drive with 0.4 seconds left.Miami then ran off eight in a row to start the second half and get within one. They cut it to one again later in the period before Ginobili led the flurry that finished the Heat for good.It was a fitting finish if it was the last home game in the finals for San Antonio's star trio, which has combined for 101 playoff victories. Ginobili has said he might think about retirement as he turns 36 next month, and Duncan is 37.Both coaches said it was difficult waiting two days between games — Popovich said it was "like death" — though he did say it was great for the Spurs because they have some older players.The break seemed to help his team early, particularly Parker, whose energy sagged in the second half of Game 4 as he struggled with a strained hamstring that he said could tear at any time and would've had him sidelined during the regular season.If things fall right for the Spurs, he'll have plenty of time to heal after Tuesday.Notes: The last team to lose Game 5 of a 2-2 series and then win the title was the Los Angeles Lakers, when they beat Boston in 2010. ... The Spurs said Sunday that reserve guard Patty Mills had surgery to remove an abscess Friday and would miss the rest of the series. Mills had an infection in his right foot and the abscess developed between his fourth and fifth toes.
SAN ANTONIO — Just days after fielding questions about retirement amid recent struggles, San Antonio Spurs guard Manu Ginobli turned in his best game of the season on Sunday to put his team on the cusp of a NBA championship.The 35-year-old Argentine guard turned back the clock with a 24-point performance as San Antonio beat the Miami Heat 114-104 and took a 3-2 lead over the defending champions in the best-of-seven series."I really didn't expect a 24‑point game. It didn't happen all season long," Ginobli told reporters. "But I needed to feel more important, more of a threat attacking the rim, and good to see it happen."Following his team's Game Four 109-93 loss on Thursday in which he shot 1-for-5, the three-time NBA champion said he was pondering retirement after a season where injuries have taken a toll.Ginobli averaged 7.5 points over the first four games of the Finals and his 38 percent playoff shooting percentage heading into Sunday's game was a career worst.On Sunday Ginobli had the AT&T Center crowd chanting his name during a game in which he went 8-of-14 from the field and added a team-high 10 assists."He's come to practice and worked on his shot. He's seen film. He has confidence in himself that he should just continue to compete," said Spurs head coach Gregg Popovich."That's what he's done his whole career. And tonight he played his best game in a while."He was instrumental during a dazzling stretch that spanned the third and fourth quarters, scoring 11 points as the Spurs built a game-high 20-point lead with nine minutes to play.His performance could not have come at a more opportune time for the Spurs, who head to Miami needing to win one of the next two games for their first championship since winning a fourth NBA title in 2007.There were questions as to whether Ginobli, a two-time All-Star who has spent his entire career with the Spurs, would even be in the team's starting lineup for the pivotal Game Five. He found out he would start ahead of Saturday's practice."I told you Manu was going to play good. You didn't believe me," Parker said before the gathered media could ask the opening question of his post-game news conference."Everybody was behind him. I defended him the whole time. I was feeling a big game for Manu. I've been playing with him for a long time."I said this morning 'it's a great opportunity for Manu'."
SAN ANTONIO — It was fair to wonder, as Manu Ginobili staggered and drifted across eight days and four games, whether a glorious era was fading at last, whether the time of Timmy and Tony and Manu was nearing its fateful end on the muddy banks of the San Antonio River.There had been doubts before, these last several years, but they seemed more urgent now, with the aging Spurs dueling the Miami Heat in the finals, San Antonio's championship window perhaps reduced to mere days.The fretting reached a fevered pitch over the weekend, with even Ginobili wondering whether retirement was nigh. That might still be the case, but the end would not come without one more vintage performance, one more rich memory, one more happy chant to fill AT&T Center.Ginobili made his first start in a year Sunday night, joining Tim Duncan and Tony Parker, and suddenly it was 2003 all over again, the Spurs' three stars dominating the night in a 114-104 victory to take a 3-2 lead in the series.Ginobili was electric — darting and slashing and launching from odd angles — in a 24-point, 10-assist performance that statistically ranked among the best of his career. Parker — his strained hamstring apparently sturdy enough — had 26 points, Duncan added 17, and San Antonio led from wire to wire in this pivotal fifth game."I knew he would come out tonight," Duncan said of Ginobili. "I knew he would play well."The Spurs are one victory from their fifth title, their fourth with Duncan, Parker and Ginobili together. To win it, they will have to prevail on the road: Game 6 and a potential Game 7 will be at American Airlines Arena.There should no longer be any doubt that the Spurs, despite their age and injuries, can finish the job. They have never trailed in this series, and on Sunday they answered every Heat run with a powerful counterpunch.And the Spurs look whole again, now that Ginobili has found himself. He had scored only 30 points in the first four games of the series, looking listless and feeble. But with the Heat having moved to a small lineup in Game 4 — with Mike Miller replacing Udonis Haslem — Spurs Coach Gregg Popovich needed to make a countermove."I just had a better game," Ginobili said, "but I'm not sure it was just because I started."The decision to start Ginobili and bench Tiago Splitter was, on the most basic level, a strategic move: the Spurs needed another guard on the floor. Starting Ginobili might also have been a way to snap him out of his funk. Perhaps there was a bit of sentiment involved, too.This was the Spurs' last home game of the season, and quite possibly the last for the Spurs' Big 3. Ginobili becomes a free agent on July 1. He turns 36 on July 28. There is no guarantee he will be back.If the Spurs were going down, they were going down together."I was feeling a big game for Manu," Parker said. "I've been playing with him for a long time."Duncan, Parker and Ginobili combined for 67 points, 1 more than the output of LeBron James, Dwyane Wade and Chris Bosh. The Heat got their own throwback performance from Ray Allen, who had 21 points and made four 3-pointers. But the Spurs had an answer for him, too, with Danny Green scoring 24 points, while breaking Allen's record for 3-pointers in one finals.Allen hit 22 3-pointers in the 2008 finals for Boston. Green now has 25 (on 38 attempts), with at least one more game to go."I had no idea," said Green, the breakout star of this series. He added, "The basketball gods are in our favor right now."For the second time in three years, the Heat are heading home down by 3-2 in the finals, and it ended badly the last time — with the Dallas Mavericks claiming the 2011 championship in Game 6 at American Airlines Arena."We're going to see if we're a better ball club and if we're better prepared for this moment," Wade said.To defend their title, the Heat will have to do what neither team has done in this series: win two straight games.After trailing by 17 points in the first half, the Heat cut the deficit to 75-74 late in the third quarter. But Green hit a 3-pointer to stem the tide, and Ginobili followed with two beautiful shots — a baseline floater and a running jumper — triggering chants of "Ma-nu" and launching a spectacular 19-1 run that put the game away.Ginobili closed the third quarter with a running bank shot and opened the fourth with a jumper, the arena rocking with every swish. Kawhi Leonard's two free throws made it 96-76 with 9 minutes 12 seconds to play.Miami cut the deficit to 8 points with 1:37 left, but Parker answered with a layup, and Green hit his sixth 3-pointer to secure the victory.Since the adoption of the 2-3-2 format, the finals have been tied at 2-2 on 10 occasions. The Game 5 winner has claimed the championship seven times.Ginobili made the first shot of the game — a long 2-pointer — and assisted on the Spurs' next three baskets, hitting Green for a layup and Duncan for a dunk and a jumper. By the time he checked out midway through the period, Ginobili had accumulated 7 points, 3 assists and several ovations."I'm really excited for Manu, for his performance tonight," Duncan said. "But we need him to do it one more time."Manu Ginobili had not started a game since June 6, 2012, in Game 6 of the Western Conference semifinals against the Oklahoma City Thunder. The Spurs lost the series that night. ... Since the adoption of the 2-3-2 format in 1985, the home team has won the last two games only twice. ... Neither the Heat nor the Spurs have lost consecutive games in this postseason.
MIAMI — LeBron James shrugged off a poor start to get 30 points, nine assists and eight rebounds and Ray Allen hit a 3-pointer with 5.2 seconds to play that helped put Game 6 of the NBA Finals between the Miami Heat and San Antonio Spurs into overtime tied at 95 on Tuesday night.James missed nine of his first 12 shots, but scored 16 points in the fourth to rally the Heat from a 10-point deficit. The Heat trailed 94-89 with 28 seconds to play, but James hit a 3 with 20 seconds to go and Allen drilled another to tie it.Tim Duncan had 30 points and 16 rebounds in a performance straight out 2003. But he was scoreless in the fourth and the Spurs squandered a golden opportunity to close out the series and win their fifth championship.Game 7, if necessary, is on Thursday night in Miami.Mario Chalmers scored 20 points and Shane Battier hit three 3-pointers for the Heat, who trailed 75-65 after three quarters thanks to a throwback performance from Duncan.But Chalmers and Miller hit 3s and James scored on a drive out of the fourth-quarter gates to get the Heat back in it at 77-73.James eschewed his trademark headband in the fourth quarter, then spearheaded the ferocious comeback. He scored six straight points for the Heat, then fed Andersen, who made a free throw to pull the Heat within two at 82-80 with seven minutes to play.James then blocked a layup by Duncan and scored on the other end to tie it and Ray Allen's reverse layup gave the Heat an 84-82 lead with six minutes to go.The Heat led 89-86, but Tony Parker hit a step-back 3 and a layup to take back the lead.After a vintage first three quarters from Duncan had the Spurs steamrolling toward the championship, James delivered a vintage performance of his own in the fourth. Tentative and flustered through the first three, James went into full-on attack mode in the fourth to force a Game 7.It was the force-of-nature showing that had been all too rare for James in these finals, but the Heat have never needed it more after Duncan took it to them the first 36 minutes.Duncan hit his first eight shots of the game, conjuring the dominant form that brought four titles to San Antonio between 1999 and 2007. But he long ago handed the reins of the Spurs offense over to Parker, letting the speedy French point guard take over as Duncan grew older.After getting a vintage performance from Manu Ginobili in Game 5 to take control of the series, the Spurs got a throwback effort from Duncan to start Game 6.With the Heat leading 40-33 and threatening to pull away with 7:30 to go in the first half, Duncan scored San Antonio's next 13 points to start a 17-4 run that gave San Antonio a 50-44 lead at halftime.Duncan has never scored more points the first half (25) of a finals game in his career, a performance reminiscent of his 32-point, 20-rebound, seven-block game in Game 1 of the 2003 finals against New Jersey. But this one was so much more important.They entered the game with title No. 5 sitting right there in front of them. They had two cracks to bring the trophy back home to San Antonio, but the last thing they wanted was to have to play a Game 7 against LeBron James on the road for the championship. There have only been five Game 7s in the finals since 1978, with the home team winning all those contests. The last road team to win a Game 7 for the title was the Washington Bullets over the Seattle SuperSonics in 1978.Chalmers was 4 for 19 over his last three games, but came alive in this must-win for Miami. He made 5 of 7 shots, including two 3s, to get the Heat out quickly.Wade seemed to tweak his left knee after being whistled for an offensive foul early in the first quarter, but he looked fine moments later when he dunked over Duncan to tie the game at 16.It's been 12 games since the Heat have won two in a row, a startling stretch of inconsistency for a team that won 27 straight in the regular season and figured to turn this postseason into a coronation rather than a competition.But the short-handed Chicago Bulls put up an inspired fight in the Eastern Conference semifinals, the Indiana Pacers took them the full seven in a rugged conference finals and the Spurs picked them apart in three of the first five games in this series.For most of the last two months, the Heat have preferred to wait until they were in serious trouble before finding that extra gear that only they seem to have. Down 2-1 in the series, James, Wade and Bosh combined for 85 points to even the series.It doesn't get any more serious than what the Heat faced when they walked into American Airlines Arena on Tuesday night.One more uninspired performance from their three All-Stars, one more lazy night on defense, one more loss and the Heat were done for the season. The prospects of falling to 1-2 in NBA Finals appearances since James, Wade and Bosh united in 2010 loomed over a team that was constructed to win not just one title, but multiple crowns.In the unflappable Spurs, the Heat may be facing their biggest challenge yet. Duncan, Parker and Ginobili have teamed to win three championships, so they know what it takes to deliver in the finals. And youngsters like Green and Leonard have shown that even when LeBron and Co. flex their muscle, like they did in Games 2 and 4, they come right back at them.For as much as James and the Heat had riding on this finals appearance, the Spurs may have even more. Duncan is 37, while Ginobili will soon turn 36 and is in the final year of his contract, giving the feeling that after so many premature proclamations of demise for this core group,And the Spurs have played with the urgency and desperation that comes with those stakes. Game 5 was essentially a must-win for them if they wanted to avoid having to win the last two games of the finals on the road, something no team has ever done.
BOSTON — They once traded franchises. They took months to formalize what should have been a simple deal for Bill Walton. Now, the Boston Celtics and the Los Angeles Clippers are discussing a trade involving a coach.These teams just do not do the predictable when it comes to trades. The Celtics and the Clippers are discussing a proposal to send Coach Doc Rivers and forward Kevin Garnett to Los Angeles in return for center DeAndre Jordan and a No. 1 pick. There could be additional draft picks or spare parts added to make the deal pass salary-cap muster.Clippers point guard Chris Paul reportedly is pushing hard for the deal as a condition of his re-signing with the team, moving the historically difficult-to-deal-with Clippers owner Donald Sterling to the background.If the deal is completed, it will most likely signal the end of Paul Pierce's 15-year career with the Celtics. The team has a $5 million buyout option on his contract, which must be exercised by June 30.If the Celtics do not trade him before then, they will probably exercise the option to continue the rebuilding process, which Pierce wants no part of. He has one year left on his contract, at more than $15 million, and has said he intends to play next season. He turns 36 in October.There has been speculation that Pierce may join the Clippers if the Celtics waive him.A person briefed on the discussions said Monday that Danny Ainge, the Celtics' president for basketball operations, originally wanted the young point guard Eric Bledsoe included in the deal and was trying to persuade the reluctant Celtics owner Wyc Grousbeck to allow Rivers to leave two years into a five-year, $35 million deal. The Clippers have since said the inclusion of Bledsoe is a nonstarter, which caused an earlier proposal to collapse.Reports on Monday, however, indicated the teams were talking again, with Ainge asking the Clippers to take either Jason Terry or Courtney Lee. That could involve the Celtics taking back the expiring contract of Caron Butler.Garnett, who turned 37 in May, would have to waive his no-trade clause for the deal to be completed, something he reportedly would do if it meant staying with Rivers, whom he admires.Should no deal occur, the person briefed on the discussions said the Celtics would hasten the rebuilding process by using their amnesty card on Garnett, who is due more than $18 million over the next two years, and then exercising the Pierce buyout.Attempts to reach Rivers and Ainge on Monday were unsuccessful.The inclusion of Rivers in the proposed trade is fitting seamlessly into the tortured history of complicated, unconventional Celtics-Clippers transactions.In 1978, the owner of the Celtics was Irv Levin, a Hollywood film producer and business executive. He wanted a franchise in Southern California. He persuaded the owner of the Buffalo Braves, the Kentucky Fried Chicken mogul John Y. Brown, to exchange franchises and moved the Braves to San Diego.Several players also were included in the deal, including Nate Archibald, Marvin Barnes, Sidney Wicks and Kermit Washington. Levin sold the San Diego team, renamed the Clippers, to Sterling in 1981, and in 1984, Sterling moved the team to Los Angeles.In 1985, the Celtics had their eyes on Walton, who had signed with the Clippers as a free agent in 1979, but who played in only 14 games in his first three years because of injuries. The Celtics offered Cedric Maxwell and a No. 1 pick for Walton, but the Clippers and Sterling made things difficult.Alan Cohen, the Celtics' owner in 1985, once said of Sterling: "Donald is the nicest, sweetest guy who will give you two dimes for a quarter and think he's doing you a favor."Sterling's own general manager at the time, Carl Scheer, said of his boss: "Dealing with Donald was impossible. He could not make up his mind. If he took an elevator down, he'd ask the operator what he thought and by the time he reached the lobby, he'd changed his mind."Both sides called the trade dead, but it eventually went through in September 1985. Walton helped the Celtics to an N.B.A. title the next season, earning Sixth Man of the Year honors. He appeared in a career-high 80 games.Now the key player is not a player at all, but Rivers, a highly regarded coach who spent one season with the Clippers as a player. Rivers just completed his ninth season with the Celtics. He would replace Vinny Del Negro, whose contract was not renewed.
(Reuters) - The Miami Heat face the San Antonio Spurs in Game Seven of the NBA Finals on Thursday, marking the 18th time the league's championship series has gone the distance.Here are five of the most memorable Game Sevens in NBA Finals history.Boston's Larry Bird and Los Angeles' Magic Johnson added another chapter to the Celtics-Lakers rivalry in a series that is credited with lifting the NBA to new levels of popularity. This best-of-seven series concluded with the host Celtics withstanding a late Lakers rally.The Lakers cut a 14-point deficit to three with one minute remaining when Cedric Maxwell, who had a game-high 24 points for Boston, took the ball from Magic Johnson. Dennis Johnson drained two free throws to seal the win. Bird was named the series MVP.The first NBA title of the record 17 won by Boston was won at their infamously hot Boston Garden under legendary coach Red Auerbach and featuring Hall of Famer Bill Russell. With Boston leading 103-101, Bob Pettit sank two free throws in the final moments of regulation to force overtime. Boston held a 113-111 lead but Jack Coleman hit a jumper to force a second overtime before the Celtics prevailed.The first of the Knicks' two NBA titles is remembered almost as much for the man who barely played than those who delivered the points. Willis Reed had picked up a leg injury and was not expected to play but he scored two early baskets to set New York on their way and ignite the crowd before stepping out of the game. Walt Frazier was the star of the night for the Knicks as he had 36 points, 19 assists and seven rebounds.The Celtics won their 11th title in 13 years as Bill Russell bowed out of the game with another memorable triumph, this time against a Lakers team featuring Wilt Chamberlain and Jerry West. The game in Los Angeles is remembered for the Lakers placing celebratory balloons in the rafters in anticipation of a win that never came due to some costly late turnovers.In the last five seconds of regulation Los Angeles' Frank Selvy missed an open 12-footer from the baseline that would have clinched the title and ended the Celtics' dynasty. Instead, the game went into overtime and Boston prevailed.It was the start of an awful run of form for the Lakers against the Celtics in the Finals - six more defeats to Boston came before they finally ended the run in 1985.
MIAMI — It is not an issue that should keep him, or anyone, up much later than an N.B.A. finals game ends, but someday Tim Duncan is going to be remembered as the greatest power forward in league history — or one of its most distinguished centers.Perhaps it will be both, depending on the eye of the beholder.Or neither, for the millions who watched the valiant Duncan come so close to a fifth championship, only to have the Spurs lose a 5-point lead in the final minute of regulation and lose Game 6 to LeBron James and the Heat, 103-100, in overtime Tuesday night at American Airlines Arena.Duncan finished with 30 points — all in the first three quarters — and 17 rebounds in what looked like a vintage performance from one of his generation's very best players, who can't be categorically fit into any assigned place."It's a big mistake to try to put Tim Duncan into a position," said Bill Walton, who, when fully healthy early in his career, was as complete a conventional center as the game has seen. "He's not a forward, not a center, he's a basketball player."He's like Larry Bird or Michael Jordan or Magic Johnson," Walton continued. "They play the position that their team needs them to play or the game dictates they play. They define their eras by their ability to do whatever it takes."Not one ever to be accused of understatement, Walton may have been the first to include Duncan in such exalted company of do-it-all superstars. Many would consider that a reach. But whatever we called him, Duncan, for 16 years, has been the face of the franchise with the best winning percentage in any of the major North American professional sports.For years there have been questions about Duncan's true position, many of them technical, for the purpose of All-Star ballot listings, and some of them broader and addressing his eventual legacy. Back in South Florida with the San Antonio Spurs, it's safe to say that Duncan would not have object to being called a point guard if that would have assured him the fifth ring of his 16-season professional career — the same number as Magic, and one fewer than Jordan.But if the decision of Spurs Coach Gregg Popovich to start a small lineup in Game 5 and again in Game 6 achieved anything beyond rousing Manu Ginobili from a series-long slumber, it confirmed that Duncan, at his core, is a center. He was the guy towering over the rest of the Spurs' starters, none of whom stood taller than 6-foot-7, or 4 inches shorter than Duncan.At 37, Duncan has remained the Spurs' hub at both ends of the floor, although Tony Parker has undeniably become the engine of the offense. Duncan's ability to set the high screen and handle and shoot the ball away from the basket has formed the basis of the case for him as a forward.But even when he teamed with David Robinson for his first six years in San Antonio, Duncan had the more potent post game of a traditional center, while both were forces to fear in the lane on defense.After Robinson retired in 2003, Duncan was paired with a variety of interior (and inferior) players nominally referred to as the center. This season, again listed as a forward on the Spurs' roster, he started alongside the rugged but limited 6-11 Tiago Splitter until Game 5.Of course, eras change, styles evolve. The influence of players imported from Europe and the greater reliance on the 3-point shot have opened up the game and unclogged the lane. In some respects, basketball analysts reacted to the Indiana Pacers' 7-2 Roy Hibbert and his impressive post play as if he had been teleported from games played 30 years ago.Meanwhile, the Pacers were eliminated in the Eastern Conference finals by Miami, which considers Chris Bosh, with his face-the-basket, perimeter-shooting skills, to be its center.Playing in three decades, Duncan has been a major force in the paint, if not to the extent of Shaquille O'Neal. He has also been an effective jump-shooter, if not in the class of Dirk Nowitzki. But put it all together, while making the indisputable argument that no star in Duncan's generation has been a better overall teammate, and what you have is a player who has soared above the sum of his hybrid parts.It has long been speculated that the Spurs began listing Duncan as a forward to avoid having him compete with O'Neal and later Yao Ming, who benefited from the powerful Chinese voting bloc, for the starting position on the Western Conference All-Star team. Maybe there has also been some consideration of posterity.It would no doubt be easier to sell Duncan over Karl Malone than Bill Russell, Wilt Chamberlain and Kareem Abdul-Jabbar.For now, Walton said: "I can guarantee you that all he's thinking about is getting that title. And this is the hardest, against LeBron James and the defending champions, on the road."Duncan found out just how hard on Tuesday night after coming so heartbreakingly close. Game 7, Thursday night.
MIAMI — LeBron James, one win away from a second consecutive NBA title, is refusing to let relentless critics shift him from his goal of earning a place as one of the game's greatest.Despite a remarkable 12 months that has included a maiden NBA title with the Miami Heat, leading the U.S. to a second straight Olympic gold medal and winning a fourth league Most Valuable Player award, James still has his critics.Two costly turnovers late in regulation of Tuesday's Game Six of the NBA Finals versus the San Antonio Spurs would surely have been grist to the mill for critics who often question if James has the necessary fortitude in the biggest moments.Instead, James drained crucial baskets on either side of regulation as Miami rallied for an unlikely 103-100 overtime win that evened the best-of-seven NBA Finals at 3-3 with the decider set for Thursday in Miami.Miami's All-Star forward finished the game with 32 points, 10 rebounds and 11 assists.Veteran NBA writer Steve Aschburner describes the constant scrutiny and judgment of the 28-year-old James as "relentless referenda" and it remains a perplexing element of the player's career that he generates so much doubting and even hostility.Perhaps it is still a hangover from his decision to leave Cleveland as a free agent to join Miami rather than head to New York or another traditional market. Or maybe some still cannot forgive him for announcing his move on a live television show.James, after trying so hard to prove his critics wrong in his first year in Miami and facing widespread mocking when the team lost to Dallas in the 2011 Finals, has long since learnt that he gains little by engaging with the critics."Yeah, it is what it is. That's OK. It won't stop me from loving the game, playing at a high level, doing it for my teammates, putting that uniform on," James said on Wednesday before offering an insight into how a man born in a rough part of Akron, Ohio, copes with the outside pressures."I mean, I'm blessed. I don't even know how I got here. I wasn't supposed to be in the NBA, if you go by statistics and things of me growing up where I grew up," said James."Every time I go into my locker room and see the 'James' on the back of an NBA jersey, I'm like wow. No criticism can deter me from playing this game because of that. I'm not supposed to be here. The fact that I'm doing what I'm doing and doing it for my teammates, it's all that matters."But there is no escaping from the fact that his own legacy is inevitably linked with the Heat and a victory on Thursday would enter the team and him into the exclusive club of those to have won back-to-back championships."I thought about it for sure. It's human nature. I want to go down as one of the greatest. I want our team to go down as one of the greatest teams. And we have an opportunity to do that," said James."There haven't been many people who have won back-to-back championships. It's so hard. It's the hardest thing. I said last year it was the hardest thing I've ever done, winning my first. Last year doesn't even come close to what we've gone through in this postseason and in these Finals."What is not going to factor in to James's thinking is whether another title will settle the debate over the rights and wrongs of him and Chris Bosh joining Dwyane Wade to form Miami's 'Big Three' which upset some who felt he should have tried to win as a lone ranger."I mean, I need it because I want it, and I only came here ... to win championships," said James."As far as validation of me being here, I don't really think so. That side doesn't really matter to me about what validates us coming together. The camaraderie and the friendship and the teammates and what we've done over the three years can never be replaced."So for that side, no. But I want it. And I'm going to do I'm not going to cut no corners. I'm not going to cheat the game. I'm going to work for it. We're not entitled to win it. We have to work for it. So that's what I'm here for."
MIAMI — He ended the bromance of one so-called Big Three and might have saved the future for another. There was symmetry to Ray Allen's fateful and figurative moment in the South Florida sun, coming on a day when his former Celtics teammates and their popular coach produced the biggest off-finals N.B.A. news ."They went in their direction and obviously I went in mine," Allen said in summary remembrance after a truly unforgettable Tuesday night at American Airlines Arena spilled exhaustively into Wednesday morning.Kevin Garnett refused to acknowledge Allen when the Celtics opened the season here against the enemy Heat last fall. We better understood why when Allen hit a game-tying 3-pointer from the far right corner in regulation Tuesday night that sent Miami to a 103-100 overtime victory over the heartbroken San Antonio Spurs in Game 6 of the N.B.A. finals."I've been on the other end of seeing him get them feet down, putting them stupid two fingers after he makes the shot," LeBron James said after the Heat survived to force Game 7 on Thursday night. "Not so stupid anymore now that he's my teammate."Allen spared the lightning rod we know as James a summer of torment for two last-minute turnovers that seemed to have sealed a fifth title for Tim Duncan and the Spurs. He pardoned Dwyane Wade for another dalliance with mediocrity on the game's grandest stage. He made a hero of the much-maligned Chris Bosh for merely grabbing the rebound of a missed James jumper and having the good sense to pass it to the N.B.A. career leader in 3-point shots.In doing that and subsequently what he has always done best, Allen at least temporarily quelled the inevitable speculation that Miami's Big Three will by next summer become Balkanized, consigned to league archives.The subject of legacies — primarily James's and Duncan's — was unavoidable and in James's case typically overstated before Allen's shot. The sequences that preceded it were instructive in reminding us just how many variables, luck included, go into the construction of a title.In San Antonio and elsewhere, millions had to wonder why Spurs Coach Gregg Popovich sat Duncan (as he often does in such situations) for two late Heat possessions when Miami had to shoot 3s and wound up making two on second-shot chances. Or why Popovich did not foul (as he never does) when the Spurs, after an otherwise stalwart Kawhi Leonard left the door ajar by missing a free throw, were defending a 95-92 lead with 19.4 seconds remaining.Of course James had the first look — after a 3-pointer off a fortunate rebound bounce landed in Mike Miller's hands — at keeping the Heat's title defense alive. He missed badly, but Bosh, unencumbered by Duncan's size in the lane, grabbed the rebound to the right of the rim.It was the second time this spring that an opposing coach — Indiana's Frank Vogel was the first — curiously made his team smaller and not better at a crucial time. That was not Bosh's problem."I was just trying to win the play," he said. "To be honest, I couldn't tell you who was in the game, except Ray."Allen instinctively moved closer to the basket when James's shot was launched but backpedaled quickly when he saw the ball in Bosh's hands. James, wanting another crack, was waving frantically for the ball up top, but Allen was in Bosh's line of vision.Allen is a sprightly 37, but the sight of his jump shot never gets old. As smooth and effortless as it appears, as unpretentiously classy as Allen has been, he was compelled to say that the art of retreating, catching and getting his legs set under him most certainly was not as easy as it looked."It's tough, but believe it or not, I work on it quite often," he said. "I try to put my body in precarious situations coming from different parts of the floor, different angles to try to get my momentum going moving forward."I honestly can say I gave myself a great opportunity, a great chance to make that shot. And it wasn't unfamiliar to me positionally. When it went in, I was ecstatic. But at the same time, I was expecting to make it."No doubt that Doc Rivers, Paul Pierce and Garnett — wherever they were — recognized the gravity of the situation for the Spurs when the ball left Allen's hands, with Tony Parker running at him. Those who have played with or guarded Allen know he has impeccable timing — including the sense of when to change uniforms.With the Celtics on the verge of sliding precipitously in the East and now facing dissolution of their 2008 championship core, Allen made the smart career choice. He moved south with the mantra, jump shot for hire.Pat Riley, the Heat's president, already had shooters surrounding James, but he and James knew Allen was one for the ages."I called him, texted him," James said after 50 minutes, 32 points, 10 rebounds, 11 assists. "I just knew what he could bring to our team. He's big time, big time!"Allen acknowledged seeing James begging for the shot. But in the scramble of bodies, trusting his feel for the floor that he was behind the 3-point line, he had space. He had the season in his soft hands."If there's one guy you want to have the ball in that situation, it is Walter Ray Allen," said the Heat's Shane Battier, going all formal. Asked if he had time to process a thought when the ball went from Bosh to Allen, Battier went theological."Thank the Lord for Jesus," he said.The man called Jesus Shuttlesworth in Spike Lee's "He Got Game" saved Miami's Big Three with a divine bolt from the corner. In the aftermath of Game 6, it looked like a mortal wound for the Spurs.
MIAMI — Five things to note as the NBA offseason opens the same way it did last year, with everyone chasing LeBron James and the Miami Heat:THE L.A. STORY: The two best free agents on the market share the same building. Dwight Howard had a disappointing first season with the Lakers, Chris Paul led the Clippers to their greatest success, and now they have decisions to make on July 1. Will they stay put? Follow James' model and go somewhere to play together? Leaving Los Angeles means leaving money — we're talking more than $20 million — on the table, so the best guess is both will be back at Staples Center next season.WORTH THE PAIN: The last team standing in the Eastern Conference next season? Maybe the one with the healthiest knees. Specifically, the one whose star has the best recovery from a knee injury. Derrick Rose should be back in Chicago after sitting out all season with his torn ACL. The Indiana Pacers, who took Miami to a seventh game in the East finals, could have leading scorer Danny Granger back after he played just five games this season. Rajon Rondo could have the ball back in his hands in Boston. And imagine how much better the Heat can be if Dwyane Wade, bothered by a painful right knee all spring, is fully healthy this time next year.BIG THREES, BIG QUESTIONS: Long before James, Wade and Chris Bosh came together, San Antonio and Boston proved the best route to a title was through a Big Three. Now, both could be broken up. Tim Duncan, Tony Parker and Manu Ginobili might've had their last, best chance for another title in Game 7 after more than 100 postseason victories together. Ray Allen's already gone in Boston, having moved on to Miami, and now the Celtics have to decide if they're keeping Paul Pierce and Kevin Garnett around.TAKE YOUR PICK: It's 10 years ago this month that James, Wade and Bosh were all taken in the first five picks in what may go down as one of the best drafts in history. This one doesn't look as good. The Cleveland Cavaliers have the No. 1 pick, just as they did when they selected James in 2003. Will it be Nerlens Noel, the Kentucky defensive star coming off a torn knee? A trade? The rebuilding in the post-James era depends on making the right decision.COACHING CAROUSEL: The NBA's Coach of the Year is out of work. So is the coach of the Western Conference runner-up. It's a turbulent time in the coaching ranks, and George Karl and Lionel Hollins are proof that winning games can still mean losing jobs. Even the Clippers are looking for a coach, firing Vinny Del Negro after he led them to their first division title. With so many good candidates out there, teams looking for a leader can still get a good one.
MIAMI — Miami Heat fans pumped fists jubilantly, uncorked champagne bottles and swarmed into the streets by the thousands to celebrate overnight after their team captured its second straight NBA title."The Heat they did it again! Best team in the world!" one fan shouted. Others chanted raucously: "Let's go Heat! Let's go Heat!"The street celebration erupted in the closing seconds of the Heat's 95-88 win over the San Antonio Spurs. It was a winner-takes-all final game that brought fans streaming into the area around the AmericanAirlines Arena to exchange high-fives, blow whistles and scream themselves hoarse.Some clambered up street signs. Others clanged on pots and pans in Miami's Little Havana neighborhood. And after the partying faded in the wee hours Friday, some streets were strewn with trash from the merrymaking.Lt. Ignatius Carroll of the City of Miami Fire Department said early Friday that authorities had gotten no reports of major problems arising from the post-game celebrations. He said there had been no gun-related incidents as of 1:30 a.m., with the main problems arising from fans jumping on cars and limousines outside the arena soon after the Heat won."It's a very peaceful celebration," Carroll said, adding a heavy police presence near the arena helped maintain control.Unlike last year's final game blowout of the Oklahoma City Thunder, which ended a 4-1 Heat series win, the year's decisive Game 7 was close until the end, adding to the jitters and excitement. A late run by Miami finally put the Spurs away."It's euphoria in the city of Miami," said Alex Vailon, a 20-year-old Miami resident. "How many teams have took two in a row?"Several, actually, but Miami fans were not interested in history lessons as their team celebrated its third NBA title in the last eight seasons. As with the Heat's two previous titles, officials said the city's celebration was largely peaceful — though police chased away the few celebrants who were jumping atop limousines leaving the arena.A few miles away in Miami's Little Havana district, thousands gathered in the streets to bang pots and pans and hold up Heat signs and chant "Let's Go Heat!" People in the cars driving by rolled down their windows, stuck their bodies out and waved their hands."This is what we Latin people do," said Carlos Gonzalez, 33, who was holding up a sign with an image of LeBron James' head.In San Antonio, meanwhile, disappointed Spurs fans left viewing parties in a somber mood. Some waved Spurs flags anyway and honked horns in the streets. One cluster of fans cheered a passing pick-up truck emblazoned with the words: "Go Spurs Go!" But one Spurs fan said he would cry himself to sleep.Spurs fan Sovia Lauriano told the San Antonio Express-News ( http://bit.ly/12f9QeT ) she loved her team "unconditionally." Hoarse from cheering, she vowed the Spurs would return to the NBA Finals."They'll be back. This is not the last time," she vowed.
MIAMI — LeBron James and Maverick Carter have been inseparable since they were little kids. Extremely close friends, James trusts Carter with virtually every aspect of his life.For the last few days, they were not on speaking terms."I told him he's got to be great," Carter said. "I told him, there's nothing wrong with a great player playing great."With a cigar in his mouth, and champagne and beer dripping off his T-shirt, James celebrated a second straight NBA championship Thursday night. He scored 37 points, grabbed 12 rebounds and simply controlled everything down the stretch, as the Heat won the third title in franchise history with a 95-88 win over the San Antonio Spurs in Game 7."This team is amazing," James said. "And the vision that I had when I decided to come here is all coming true."Two days after helping the Heat survive a wild Game 6 in overtime, James' final numbers went like this: 12 for 23 from the field, 5 for 10 from 3-point range, 8 for 8 from the line.And in a season where he was the league's MVP for a fourth time, he's now added a second ring to the collection. Suddenly, his resume is looking as complete as some of the other all-time greats. Here's a club: He joined Michael Jordan and Bill Russell as the only players in league history to win back-to-back Finals MVP and regular-season MVP awards."Listen, I can't worry about what everybody says about me," James said, as confetti fell around him. "I'm LeBron James, from Akron, Ohio, from the inner city. I'm not even supposed to be here. That's enough. Every night I walk into the locker room, I see a No. 6 with James on the back. I'm blessed. So what everybody says about me off the court don't matter. I ain't got no worries."Dwyane Wade scored 23 points and won his third NBA title. The man who wears No. 3 on his uniform insisted that he wanted to be called "Three" afterward, for obvious reasons. Shane Battier — benched earlier in these playoffs — had 18 on six 3-pointers and said "it's better to be timely than good," afterward. Mario Chalmers scored 14 for the Heat, who won despite no points from Chris Bosh.It didn't matter. James was good enough to mask any problem the Heat had Thursday night. A series that started with three games of the Spurs supposedly bottling him up and solving the riddle of how to stop the MVP ended with him doing pretty much whatever he wanted."It became time," Heat coach Erik Spoelstra said. "He always rises to the occasion when it matters the most, when the competition is fiercest."He rarely acknowledges this much, but James has to be exhausted. He worked out furiously during the lockout in 2011, in part because he convinced himself that the season would begin on time, in part because he was still smarting from how sub-par he played during the Finals loss to the Mavericks in his first season with the Heat.Last season began on Dec. 25, 2011. The Heat went through the rigors of that ultra-compacted 66-game schedule and won a title. James went right into training with USA Basketball, eventually helping that team win a gold medal at the London Olympics. After that, he took about two weeks off, then started getting ready for this season, which went all the way down to the last possible day.That's more basketball, under more pressure, than anyone else on the planet has seen in the last two years.James took all the criticism when the Heat lost those 2011 finals. He took all the criticism in 2010, as well, when the Heat welcomed him and Bosh as Wade's newest star teammates with a star-studded party that was planned long before James made his infamous "decision" to sign with the Heat.Now he's won two titles, and refuses to take all the credit."All it's about now is what's in front of us," Heat President Pat Riley said. "Not what's behind us. I wish people would stop talking about that. He's been to the Finals three years in a row. He's won two championships, two MVPs. He definitely controlled the game tonight. I believe in LeBron."There he was, a championship at stake, taking the jumper with 27.9 seconds left that made it a two-possession game and put the Heat on the cusp of a repeat. He marched back to the Heat huddle, punching the air. The score was 92-88, everyone in the sold-out building seemed to be standing, and a championship celebration was mere moments away.Sure enough, it happened."I put a lot of work into it and to be able to come out here and see the results happen out on the floor is the ultimate, the ultimate," James said. "I'm at a loss for words."Two years ago, James probably wouldn't have taken that shot. Now, there's no way he would not. And he drilled it, too, the ball going through with a soft swish for his 34th and 35th points."What he brings every night is unbelievable," Wade said.James arrived at the arena in a convertible on Thursday, waving to the fans who were waiting to take a photo. An hour or so later, standing at his locker, he tried to insist that Game 7 was obviously huge but would have to be treated really like any other game.In short, that was his way of saying that he cannot change the way he plays now.Then he went out and did what he does best, making the right plays, hoping they become winning plays."He only plays one way," said Carter, James' longtime friend and associate. "He plays the right way."On the possession after James made the jumper for the four-point late lead, he got into the passing lane and intercepted a ball thrown wildly by San Antonio's Manu Ginobili with 23.5 seconds left and was immediately fouled.The first free throw went in, and James stepped off the line to set up Miami's defense.The second free throw dropped, as well, and James made a beeline for Ginobili, dribbling upcourt. Ginobili took a 3-pointer that the regular-season MVP contested, and it sailed well wide of the rim.That was the Spurs' last gasp. It was over. The Heat reign will continue for another year, and so will James' spot as the unquestioned best player in the world."This is the hardest series we ever had to play," Wade said. "This is what it's all about."Including playoffs, the Heat became just the 10th team in NBA history to win at least 80 games — they won 82 this season. And like the other nine, the Heat won it all.James will be getting married this summer — "Now it's going to be one the best weddings ever," he said — and another ring ceremony awaits him this fall when Miami tries for a three-peat. And a season that began with the addition of Ray Allen to a championship core, saw a 27-game winning streak, even a "Harlem Shake" video that broke up some needed midseason tension, and ended with Miami in the same place it was a year ago — on top of the basketball world."They pushed us to the limit," James said.Near the limit, maybe. James fended off everything the Spurs threw at him."Credit to the Miami Heat," Spurs forward Tim Duncan said. "LeBron was unbelievable. ... We just couldn't find a way to stop him."He was great, as Carter demanded."To be able to come through for my teammates," James said, "in the biggest moment on the biggest stage makes me more satisfied than anything in the world."
MIAMI — Legacies are generally determined after the fact, written by others, imposed on the subjects without their input. For the last three years, LeBron James has endured daily revisions to his legacy, a chorus of critics framing his career based on a single game, a single series, the shots that swished and those that missed, never waiting for a fuller picture to emerge.James at last seized control of his own narrative Thursday night, leaving nothing to chance and no more room for debate. He drove hard, shot brilliantly, scored every critical basket and finally pushed the Miami Heat past the San Antonio Spurs for a 95-88 victory in Game 7 of the N.B.A. finals.As red and white confetti rained from the rafters at American Airlines Arena, James — oft vilified, perpetually scrutinized — soaked in the revelry and embraced a new identity: back-to-back champion.There were still doubters out there, somewhere, beyond the clouds of fluttering paper, but their ranks are surely shrinking."I can't worry about what everybody says about me," a joyful James said on the championship podium after receiving his second straight finals Most Valuable Player trophy. "I'm LeBron James, from Akron, Ohio, from the inner city. I'm not even supposed to be here."James came here three summers ago in pursuit of championship glory, to join Dwyane Wade and Chris Bosh in a superstar lineup for the ages, to start collecting championships — "Not one, not two, not three ... " he infamously declared in July 2010. The banners are indeed starting to accumulate, with James earning this second title despite diminishing returns from his co-stars.With Wade slowed by an injured right knee, James carried a greater burden this June than he did a year ago. And he faced a tougher, more seasoned opponent, a decorated Spurs team with three Hall of Fame talents in Tim Duncan, Tony Parker and Manu Ginobili.It took seven games, including a furious comeback and an overtime in Game 6, to earn this moment. And then it took everything James had in the final minutes of the final game."The toughest series we've ever been in," Heat Coach Erik Spoelstra said.After leading the Heat's comeback two nights earlier, James carried them to the finish with a 37-point, 12-rebound outburst on Thursday. He had 8 points in the final 5 minutes 39 seconds, repelling every attempt by the Spurs to take the game back.The lead dropped to 2 points just once, on Kawhi Leonard's 3-pointer with two minutes to go. James answered with an 18-footer, then a pair of free throws. The building rumbled in anticipation and then finally exploded, the Heat celebrating their third title since 2006.Wade pushed through the knee pain and limitations, delivering 23 points, 10 rebounds and 2 blocks. Afterward, he insisted on being called "Three," in reference to his third championship."They played Hall of Fame basketball tonight," Spurs Coach Gregg Popovich said of James and Wade. "That's some of the best basketball they both played at the same time throughout the entire playoffs, from what I saw."The Heat, despite a scoreless game from Bosh, joined the Los Angeles Lakers as the only teams with back-to-back titles in the post-Michael Jordan era. They did it by becoming only the fourth team to win Games 6 and 7 at home after facing a 3-2 deficit. It was the first time in this series that either team won two in a row.It was a heartbreaking conclusion for the Spurs, who came within seconds of winning the championship in Game 6. Duncan was aiming for his fifth title, which would have placed him alongside Kobe Bryant for the most by any star in the post-Jordan era. This was his first defeat in the finals, and it hit hard.Sitting on the postgame podium, Duncan looked inconsolable. He stared down at the table, his left hand on his head, and paused frequently between phrases. He bemoaned his "bad decisions" and missed shots, in particular two point-blank shots that could have tied the game at 90-90 with about a minute to play.Still, Duncan was mostly brilliant, finishing with 24 points, 12 rebounds and 4 steals. Ginobili added 18 points and 5 assists but had four turnovers, all in the fourth quarter.
MIAMI — Legacies are generally determined after the fact, written by others, imposed on the subjects without their input. For the last three years, LeBron James has endured daily revisions to his legacy, a chorus of critics framing his career based on a single game, a single series, the shots that swished and those that missed, never waiting for a fuller picture to emerge.James at last seized control of his own narrative Thursday night, leaving nothing to chance and no more room for debate. He drove hard, shot brilliantly, scored every critical basket and finally pushed the Miami Heat past the San Antonio Spurs for a 95-88 victory in Game 7 of the N.B.A. finals.As red and white confetti rained from the rafters at American Airlines Arena, James — oft vilified, perpetually scrutinized — soaked in the revelry and embraced a new identity: back-to-back champion.There were still doubters out there, somewhere, beyond the clouds of fluttering paper, but their ranks are surely shrinking."I can't worry about what everybody says about me," a joyful James said on the championship podium after receiving his second straight finals Most Valuable Player trophy. "I'm LeBron James, from Akron, Ohio, from the inner city. I'm not even supposed to be here."James came here three summers ago in pursuit of championship glory, to join Dwyane Wade and Chris Bosh in a superstar lineup for the ages, to start collecting championships — "Not one, not two, not three ... " he infamously declared in July 2010. The banners are indeed starting to accumulate, with James earning this second title despite diminishing returns from his co-stars.With Wade slowed by an injured right knee, James carried a greater burden this June than he did a year ago. And he faced a tougher, more seasoned opponent, a decorated Spurs team with three Hall of Fame talents in Tim Duncan, Tony Parker and Manu Ginobili.It took seven games, including a furious comeback and an overtime in Game 6, to earn this moment. And then it took everything James had in the final minutes of the final game."The toughest series we've ever been in," Heat Coach Erik Spoelstra said.After leading the Heat's comeback two nights earlier, James carried them to the finish with a 37-point, 12-rebound outburst on Thursday. He had 8 points in the final 5 minutes 39 seconds, repelling every attempt by the Spurs to take the game back.The lead dropped to 2 points just once, on Kawhi Leonard's 3-pointer with two minutes to go. James answered with an 18-footer, then a pair of free throws. The building rumbled in anticipation and then finally exploded, the Heat celebrating their third title since 2006.Wade pushed through the knee pain and limitations, delivering 23 points, 10 rebounds and 2 blocks. Afterward, he insisted on being called "Three," in reference to his third championship."They played Hall of Fame basketball tonight," Spurs Coach Gregg Popovich said of James and Wade. "That's some of the best basketball they both played at the same time throughout the entire playoffs, from what I saw."The Heat, despite a scoreless game from Bosh, joined the Los Angeles Lakers as the only teams with back-to-back titles in the post-Michael Jordan era. They did it by becoming only the fourth team to win Games 6 and 7 at home after facing a 3-2 deficit. It was the first time in this series that either team won two in a row.It was a heartbreaking conclusion for the Spurs, who came within seconds of winning the championship in Game 6. Duncan was aiming for his fifth title, which would have placed him alongside Kobe Bryant for the most by any star in the post-Jordan era. This was his first defeat in the finals, and it hit hard.Sitting on the postgame podium, Duncan looked inconsolable. He stared down at the table, his left hand on his head, and paused frequently between phrases. He bemoaned his "bad decisions" and missed shots, in particular two point-blank shots that could have tied the game at 90-90 with about a minute to play.Still, Duncan was mostly brilliant, finishing with 24 points, 12 rebounds and 4 steals. Ginobili added 18 points and 5 assists but had four turnovers, all in the fourth quarter.
A proposed deal that would allow Doc Rivers to leave the Boston Celtics for the Los Angeles Clippers — with players and draft picks changing teams as part of the transaction — violates N.B.A. rules, Commissioner David Stern said in a radio interview Thursday.Stern did not say outright that such a deal would be vetoed, but he cast serious doubt on its prospects of reaching fruition as currently constructed."I would say, in the language of diplomacy, that the teams are aware that the collective bargaining agreement doesn't authorize trades involving coaches' contracts," Stern told ESPN New York.Generally speaking, trades can include only players, draft picks and cash, Stern said. "But coaches' contracts don't qualify as extra consideration, or acceptable consideration in player transactions. The teams know that. It has been confirmed to them."Rivers wants to be released from his Celtics contract, which has three years left and includes a noncompete clause that would keep him out of the coaching ranks unless Boston grants permission.The Clippers are also interested in acquiring the Celtics veteran Kevin Garnett, who, like Rivers, would prefer a change of scenery, rather than stick around for Boston's planned rebuilding effort. The Celtics are also expected to trade or release Paul Pierce.The teams have been discussing a deal that would send the young center DeAndre Jordan and draft picks to Boston in exchange for Garnett, with an understanding that Rivers would also be set free.The deals are clearly intertwined and thus in violation of the collective bargaining agreement. Teams cannot make any trades that involve unwritten side deals or considerations. In the interview Thursday, Stern said those rules "can't be gotten around by breaking it up into two transactions."Asked if the teams could simply consummate a trade of players and picks, with Rivers let out of his contract at a later time — presumably as a separate matter — Stern replied with a sarcastic "Riiight."Stern mocked the notion that the proposed trade and the proposed release of Rivers could be viewed as separate, saying, "I have a bridge that I would very much enjoy selling to you."Asked if the deal could still happen, Stern said: "I'm not saying more. That's it."
MIAMI — If there was one thing we knew about a thrilling N.B.A. finals that carried David Stern on its shoulders to the finish line of his three-decade playoff run as commissioner and chief baby sitter, it was that the series and the season would not conclude with Jeff Van Gundy signing off the network telecast by suggesting the Miami Heat consider trading LeBron James for Dwight Howard.Two years ago, in what was celebrated in 49 states and especially in northern Ohio as James's deserved comeuppance for the way he literally staged his departure from Cleveland, Van Gundy closed with that provocative commentary after James's well-documented failure in the six-game finals won by Dallas."I did say they should consider that to better balance the team, not because I didn't think LeBron was good enough," Van Gundy said a little sheepishly before James took to the floor Thursday night for Game 7 against San Antonio.We all have our hot airtime to fill. We all jumped to conclusions ranging from impulsive to irrational back then and again along the precarious road to James's masterpiece in closing out the Spurs, 95-88, at American Airlines Arena.It is human nature to pontificate and prejudge, but the moral of the 2013 finals should be that on the complicated subject of legacy, never hazard a guess at halftime of a series or, worse, a career.Michael Jordan was 28, or exactly James's age now, when he won his first championship with Chicago. Kobe Bryant — who, like James, entered the league out of high school — had three rings with the Los Angeles Lakers by his 28th birthday.But what if we had microanalyzed Bryant the way we chronically do James and ended up mischaracterizing Bryant as a born Tonto, or second banana, to Shaquille O'Neal?Everyone should understand by now that James is only clearing his throat, settling into the prime of his emotional maturity. In all basketball-related ways, he is no man-child anymore. The numbers alone — 37 points, 12 rebounds, 4 assists, 2 steals, 2 turnovers in 45 minutes of owning the ball and the burden — fail to explain his dominance of Game 7.And like a good and generous teammate, James made it about the collective when he sat in the interview room afterward. "This team is amazing," he said.After hugging James at midcourt, Spurs Coach Gregg Popovich kissed Dwyane Wade's cheek and told him, "You were Dwyane Wade tonight," and that was certainly true. The Heat also needed all of Shane Battier's stunning 3-point marksmanship (6 for 8). But let's not kid ourselves. Miami was no superteam in the finals, those 27 straight regular-season victories notwithstanding.With Wade hurting, or declining, and Chris Bosh demonstrating again that he is no max-salary player, James's supporting cast was not as good as Jordan's on any of his six Bulls title teams.When Jordan took his sabbatical in 1993-94, the so-called Jordanaires won 55 games and were probably one lousy call (the infamous Hue Hollins judgment that Scottie Pippen fouled Hubert Davis) from reaching the Eastern Conference finals. Without James, would this Miami team be guaranteed 45 victories and even the second round in the postseason?It was the sheer force of James's all-court versatility and his Jordanesque obsession with exerting himself on every play that finally gave Miami separation from the Spurs. Dared to shoot the jumper, he made five 3-pointers. And after a leg-weary Tim Duncan missed a short jump hook over the undersized Battier that would have tied the score, James drained the Spurs of a pulse with a 19-footer from the right side that gave the Heat a 92-88 lead with 27.9 seconds left."I mean, I watched film, and my mind started to work and I said, O.K., this is how they're going to play me for the whole series," James said. "I looked at all my regular-season stats, all my playoff stats, and I was one of the best midrange shooters in the game. I shot a career high from the 3-point line. I just told myself: Don't abandon what you've done all year. Don't abandon now because they're going under."The Spurs finally knuckled under when Manu Ginobili, on the baseline, tried to pass the ball behind him to Duncan. Stepping into the passing lane, James got the steal.
In the N.B.A. , perhaps more than any sport, how tall and how heavy, or light, a player is matters. Football may require size at certain positions, baseball may value height in pitchers, but at every position in basketball, a player's height and weight become a continual topic of discussion.In this year's N.B.A. draft, which will be held Thursday at Barclays Center in Brooklyn, height and weight could be the determining factor in who becomes the first pick in the draft. But in contrast to other years, when height was a main issue being discussed, this week's draft has as much talk about weight, specifically that of Nerlens Noel, the Kentucky center considered by many to be the top prospect of this draft class.At the N.B.A. scouting combine in May, Noel was measured at 6 feet 10 inches in his stocking feet, but he weighed only 206 pounds. A defensive specialist, Noel would seemingly need to put on quite a bit of weight to be expected to bang bodies nightly with players like Roy Hibbert (280 pounds), Dwight Howard (265 pounds) and Marc Gasol (265 pounds).Noel, 19, can hardly be blamed for weighing in on the slim side, as he has spent the last few months working his way back from a torn anterior cruciate ligament in his left knee. But when a team is looking to spend the No. 1 overall pick on a player, especially one with a leg injury, adding another negative to the mix complicates things.For the Cleveland Cavaliers, who have the first pick, a streak is in jeopardy should they decide to go with Noel, who is considered a bit of a project. The Cavaliers have had the top pick four other times, each time having selected a player who became a first-team all-rookie selection. All four players (Austin Carr, Brad Daugherty, LeBron James and Kyrie Irving) made at least one All-Star appearance as a Cavalier as well. Unfortunately for Cleveland fans, none of the four, not even James, were able to lead the team to its first championship.Before he injured his knee in a game against Florida in February, Noel was leading the nation in blocked shots a game and was living up to the hype that had surrounded him coming out of high school. At the time, his weight was estimated at 220 to 225 pounds. While still not the big-bodied center of yesteryear, at that weight he would at least be in the same range that Joakim Noah of the Chicago Bulls and Larry Sanders of the Milwaukee Bucks were in when they entered the league. Two of the finest defensive players in the league, Noah and Sanders have filled out since being drafted, but they are still slender.Serge Ibaka, a power forward for the Oklahoma City Thunder, would seem to be a reasonable comparison for Noel as a raw offensive player and shot-blocking specialist, and he was listed at 220 pounds before being drafted in 2008.John Calipari, Noel's coach at Kentucky, made it clear that he did not consider Noel's weight a long-term problem."We know he's going to gain 40 pounds," Calipari told The Cleveland Plain Dealer, saying the Cavaliers had tracked Noel's progress closely. "We know the trajectory. They know where he was at the beginning of the year and they know how much he improved because they were here."Adding to Noel's chances of being taken with the top pick, regardless of concerns about weight or injury, is that few of the other prospects are considered to have nearly as much potential. Noel is a natural shot-blocker with tremendous leaping ability. His main drawback is how raw he is on offense, something that would be largely helped if he were teamed with Irving, one of league's most deft passers.Among the other players expected to go early in the draft are Alex Len, a center from Maryland; Ben McLemore, a shooting guard from Kansas; Otto Porter, a small forward from Georgetown; and Victor Oladipo, a shooting guard from Indiana. Each is expected to contribute at the N.B.A. level, but none have a ceiling to rival Noel.The most intriguing pick in the draft may be Oladipo's teammate at Indiana, Cody Zeller. A 7-footer with a chance to be a sweet-shooting power forward, Zeller was considered somewhat disappointing during his sophomore season. Things turned around when he tested as the most athletic big man in the draft at the N.B.A.'s draft combine. Now teams just have to figure out which is the real Zeller: the underwhelming player at Indiana or the superstar from the combine.
MALIBU, Calif. — Former Chicago Bulls star Scottie Pippen was questioned Monday about his weekend fight with an autograph-seeker that left the man hospitalized with a head injury.Pippen came in voluntarily to a Los Angeles County sheriff's substation after he was named as a suspect in the altercation outside Nobu restaurant, a celebrity hangout on the beach in Malibu. He spoke to police for about an hour and was released pending further investigation.Whitmore described the case as "complicated" and said there was no timetable for announcing whether charges would be brought.The unidentified victim was inside the restaurant taking photos as Pippen dined with his family Sunday evening, sheriff's Capt. Patrick Davoren said. When Pippen went outside to the parking lot, the man continued taking pictures and sought the Hall of Famer's autograph, Davoren said.An argument ensued that led to the violence, investigators said. The man was taken to a hospital with a head injury and was treated and released.Investigators were interviewing several witnesses to determine whether Pippen should be charged with assault with intent to commit great bodily harm."Right now it's under investigation," Whitmore said. "We have to interview everybody to find out what happened."Several witnesses described the man as intoxicated, Whitmore said.Nobu has been a Malibu mainstay for nearly 15 years and is frequented by celebrities. The restaurant recently moved to a beachfront location that offers views of the Pacific Ocean from nearly every seat.The 47-year-old Pippen won six NBA titles with Michael Jordan and the Bulls, and in 1996, was named one of the NBA's 50 greatest players. He was inducted into the Basketball Hall of Fame in 2010.Pippen is a special adviser to the Bulls' president and chief operating officer. The team declined to comment Monday.
MIAMI — The last piece of confetti had landed, the Miami Heat championship celebration was officially over and many in the crowd of revelers were starting to make their way to the exits.Players and coaches remained on the stage.They were in no hurry to leave. Every member of the NBA champions stood and watched a giant video board play highlights of Miami's march through the playoffs, from LeBron James' MVP-caliber plays on both ends to Ray Allen's season-saving 3-pointer in Game 6 of the NBA Finals and countless moments in between."It's a special group," Heat coach Erik Spoelstra said. "You know what? This season started over nine months ago with that trip to China and we were able to experience so many cool things together in the regular season. But at times, it just seems to be going by so fast."So maybe that's why the Heat aren't ready to stop celebrating this title just yet.With an estimated 400,000 people lining the downtown Miami streets, the Heat held their parade and an in-arena rally afterward Monday. James stood atop a double-decker bus with a cigar in his mouth for the parade. Shane Battier blew kisses to the crowd, Dwyane Wade raised three fingers aloft and Chris Andersen flapped his arms in a nod to his "Birdman" moniker."It's the ultimate," James told Sun Sports, the Heat broadcast partner. "It's the ultimate. This is what I came down here, to be able to have a parade at the end of the year. I'm extremely blessed, man. It doesn't get any better than this."Several players held super-soaker squirt guns and sprayed water on fans, confetti dotted the streets, and horns honked from all directions. Heat managing general partner Micky Arison and team president Pat Riley stood in the front of one bus, while Spoelstra — his championship cap turned backward — waved and clapped at fans."Miami parties better than any city in the world," Spoelstra said. "But it took nine months, nine months of incredible sacrifice, not only by these men right here but everybody in our organization, grinding it out every single day, ups and downs, highs and lows. And to have a culmination like Game 7 in front of all of you here is incredible."Wade said that without the fans, Miami wouldn't have found a way to win the title."It's humbling. It's very humbling to be here," Wade said, gazing out at the enormous crowd. "I envision a lot of things. I can't say I envisioned this. This parade down Biscayne Boulevard was once a vision by Coach Riley and now we've taken this ride three times. It's special."When Riley got hired by the Heat, he talked at his introductory news conference about his vision of a parade down Biscayne Boulevard. It took Riley until 2006 to deliver on that hope, but now with three parades in eight seasons, the Heat are getting used to these celebrations."Their names are going to be respected and honored," Riley said. "And that's all we have. All we have is the name on the front of the shirt, which is the Heat, and the name on the back of the shirt. And that's why we play."Miami became the sixth franchise in NBA history to win consecutive championships, after topping the San Antonio Spurs in this year's finals for the third title overall for the Heat franchise, needing a Game 7 to get it done. Wade and Udonis Haslem — a Miami native who said "this is what it's all about" — are the only players to be part of all three titles, and Wade insisted Monday that the city is going to be his home now for good."This is my home. They've treated me well since Day One," Wade said. "I'll be here for probably the rest of my life in this amazing city. I thank the Miamians for accepting me as one of their own."Miami needed to win Games 6 and 7 of the finals to capture the title, and needed a huge late comeback in Game 6 just to force the ultimate game. Down by five with less than a half-minute left in regulation, James and Ray Allen made 3-pointers — Allen's coming with 5.2 seconds left — to force overtime, and the Heat ultimately prevailed to get into Game 7."I have to say that is the biggest shot I ever hit in my career," Allen said.Along the parade route, one vehicle carried a number of uniformed military personnel. The Heat have honored military members before every home game in Miami for the past several seasons.Police reported no major problems, and bomb- and drug-sniffing dogs were spotted working their way through the crowd. City officials banned fans from carrying backpacks, though several were spotted along the route and some people were searched randomly for security reasons. The huge crowds and parking difficulty did not seem to take away from the fans' celebratory mood."It's the excitement of something that doesn't come around too often, even though we've been lucky to experience it two years in a row," said Heat fan Blake Thames, who made the trip down from Palm Beach County.Some fans began arriving before sunrise Monday, and traffic into downtown was extremely heavy as people hoped to get close enough for a glimpse of the celebration."It hasn't hit me yet," James said. "This is unbelievable to be a part of such a great franchise and to be able to go back-to-back."Players spent the weekend celebrating. Some are planning to start vacations later this week, while others will remain in South Florida for at least a few more days."All the fans that we're seeing here is who supported us throughout the whole season, man," James said. "This is the least we could do is ride through the city and show our appreciation."Associated Press Writers Jennifer Kay and Kelli Kennedy in Miami contributed to this report.
CHICAGO — Since 1980, the basketball team at DePaul University , the largest Roman Catholic college in the United States, has played its home games in the suburb of Rosemont, Ill., at a nondescript and, lately, mostly empty arena.For several years, DePaul, which is in the leafy Lincoln Park neighborhood on the North Side and a member of the Big East, has declared its interest in moving back to the city to try to recapture its glory days, when the team was a national powerhouse in the 1970s and '80s.In May, Mayor Rahm Emanuel and the university announced a proposal for a 10,000 seat, $173 million arena near McCormick Place, a convention center along the lakefront south of downtown. DePaul and the quasi-government agency that runs McCormick Place would chip in $70 million each for the publicly owned venture. The city's tab would be $33 million, and that has created a bit of a stir.The unveiling of the plan, which came six days before the Board of Education voted to close 50 public schools because of a $1 billion deficit and underutilization issues, has troubled some."This project could not be worse for human priorities," said Bob Fioretti, the alderman of the ward that would house the arena. "We can't afford neighborhood schools, but we can bankroll an unnecessary basketball arena for a private university?"Since the deal was announced and an accompanying bill was passed by the Illinois Senate and House, a report from Crain's Chicago Business detailed DePaul basketball's attendance woes. Estimates that the new arena would be a moneymaker sooner rather than later were pegged to DePaul's announced crowds of about 8,000 a game, but the actual numbers were closer to 2,600, according to the report. (DePaul is 7-83 in conference play over the last five years.)"School closings were a real horror for people," said Karen Lewis, the president of the Chicago Teachers Union, who noted that most of them were on the South and West Sides. "And here is another project for the central business district. There are other parts of town, and we don't have any plans for them."The city counters that calling the project only an investment in a basketball arena is shortsighted and incomplete. DePaul represents one piece of a $1.1 billion investment to boost tourism, a plan that includes adding amenities to McCormick Place, which has lost convention business to cities like Orlando and Las Vegas, and sprucing up Navy Pier, the state's No. 1 tourist attraction, which is just north of downtown.The arena is part of a goal to revitalize the South Loop neighborhood, and the project includes two hotels, new restaurants and areas for entertainment, and potentially a casino.The arena would be an events center for concerts and conventions when DePaul is not playing, and the university has agreed to pay rent at $25,000 a game for men's home dates and $7,500 for women's games.DePaul's $70 million investment was needed, Tom Alexander, a city spokesman, said, because it would ensure that construction at Navy Pier and McCormick Place could proceed in tandem. "This is really a facility the entire city can use," he said. "DePaul is helping facilitate it."Then there are the 10,000 construction and 3,800 permanent jobs that it would create, by the city's math. The unemployment rate in the Chicago metro area is more than 9 percent."I would be safe to assume any city in the country would love to have these jobs and these types of announcements," said Jorge Ramirez, the president of the Chicago Federation of Labor.He added, "Tax dollars that come in from convention and tourism can be spent anywhere in the city, and should be."The city declined to address the timing of the announcement but said in a statement that its "challenges are equal in urgency and priority."Still, the public financing remains a sticking point for critics. The teachers union says that the $33 million promised by the city, which comes from a complex method called tax increment financing, might otherwise be spent on education and other city functions (the figure reaches $55 million when the next-door hotel is included). Alexander called that charge "utterly wrong."In addition to the round of school closings, school budgets are expected to be cut next year, and that, too, puzzles some observers. "We're told there's no money, and suddenly there's money for this," said Allen Sanderson, an economics professor at the University of Chicago. "It's a mixed message."Sanderson also alluded to the long-rumored casino as the elephant in the room. "If that's the ultimate plan, I'd like to know about it," he said.The city is acquiring the land for the arena and hotel. Once a deal is reached, the City Council will vote whether to approve it."I wish the best for DePaul," Fioretti said. "I would love to see them go back to having a good basketball team. But I don't understand this, and neither do my constituents."
MIAMI — LeBron James has this summer on his mind, and is already starting to plan for next season.The summer of 2014, that can wait.James said Tuesday that he is not thinking about the possibility of becoming a free agent in 12 months, though he did acknowledge that the prospects of competing with Dwyane Wade, Chris Bosh, Erik Spoelstra and Pat Riley for several more championships with the Miami Heat is more than a tiny bit intriguing."That's the goal," James said. "That's the ultimate finish. And we all hope that can happen, obviously."James' final interview session of this season revealed plenty in 17 minutes, including that he's already feeling an itch to get back on the basketball court after just a few days off, that he'll stop at nothing to give longtime girlfriend Savannah Brinson anything she wants on their wedding day in a couple months, and that he's making no secret of his hope that the Heat bring back at least the majority of this year's championship roster.The most interesting news, however, was when he spoke of his short- and long-term plans. First, he's vowing to come back better next season, which is no small promise from someone with four MVP awards, two Finals MVP awards and who carries the tag of "best player in the world." And then next summer, it certainly sounds as if he's going to give the prospects of staying in Miami a good, long look."This is what we came here for, so that would be the ultimate," James said. "But you can never ... I don't know, life changes, things happen, and we have to be prepared for that. But this is what we all want to be here for, that's to be able to compete for a championship each and every year. And if we can do that, then it'd be awesome."James scored 37 points in Game 7 of the NBA Finals against the San Antonio Spurs, carrying the Heat to their second straight championship in a season where he picked up his fourth MVP award. He's gotten to the championship series in all three of his seasons with Miami, falling to Dallas in 2011, then beating Oklahoma City last season and the Spurs this year.The team gathered for physicals and a quick meeting on Tuesday, and now begins the process of scattering for vacation and other business. James will make his annual trip with Nike to China next month, not long after Wade does some business there.And already, James sounds like he's missing the group that he spent the past nine months with."It's like, 'Damn, I wish we could come back in the locker room, have another practice, take another flight, have another bus ride with those 15 guys,'" James said. "That's what it's all about. You miss the guys throughout the summer. I know my family probably doesn't want to hear that, but it's the truth."It was not a Finals without speed bumps for James, who failed to score 20 points in any of the first three games against the Spurs. And after Miami lost Game 5 in San Antonio, James had to prepare without one of his most faithful sounding boards.Maverick Carter, James' longtime friend and perhaps his most trusted confidant, wouldn't talk with him for days after Game 5, other than challenging him by saying that great players have to be great in the biggest moments.James responded with 32 points, 10 rebounds and 11 assists in Game 6, then the 37-point outburst in Game 7."That's why I like the guys around me, off the court," James said. "It's not just a bed of roses with us. They've been around me too long to allow me to be careless or not stepping up to the plate at the highest level, not in basketball but in everything."The Heat are expected to announce by Sunday that they will pick up an option on point guard Mario Chalmers, one of three potentially departing players — Ray Allen and Chris Andersen being the others — identified by James on Tuesday as being "huge parts of our team." James, who was completely exhausted after Game 7, said he's already feeling rejuvenated physically and is eager to get back to work, which may not be great news for opponents."I'm going to come back a better player," James said, "because I owe it to my teammates. ... I'm obsessed with success."James said he hasn't taken much of a look at who might be available for Miami this summer in free agency yet, in part because the season just ended and in part because he thinks the current Heat roster, if brought back essentially intact, would be good enough to contend for the title in 2014.If Riley, Spoelstra, managing general partner Micky Arison and salary-cap guru Andy Elisburg find a way to improve the roster, then James — who plays just about every position on offense and defends them all on defense — certainly wouldn't complain.Still, it says something that he's not demanding upgrades, either."My mindset is at a point where there is no relief," James said. "I love the burden. I love what I have to do for this team to win. If it happens and we get someone who relieves something from me as far as a big or a wing guy or something, then it'd be good for our team. But I'm not going up to those guys or approaching this summer saying 'I need help.' I'm coming back saying if we come back with this roster, we're going to compete for a championship."The way he sees it, if he gets better and the Heat get healthier and other players find ways to improve, then he likes his chances next year."This year coming, which will be here soon, that's our focus," James said. "Our focus is on how we're going to get better this year coming up, and how we're going to prepare to be better with all these other teams getting better, to be able to keep that trophy here."So he gets one ring when next season starts, and another a couple months beforehand, when he and Brinson finally tie the knot.He's let his fiancée do most of the planning, though James has been involved in some decisions. His approach has been steadfast since proposing shortly after the clock struck midnight and the calendar flipped to Jan. 1, 2012 — it's her day."I'm involved enough to where everything's going to go right," James said. "The most important person is Savannah. She's happy, then I'm happy. That's all that matters. I don't really care about nothing else. I don't really care about nobody else there on that day besides her."Then comes a new season — and the same questions he heard going into his infamous 'Decision' summer of 2010, when he left Cleveland for Miami."I've been in this position before," James said. "I've heard it before. It can't get any worse than my season before I became a free agent in 2010."
ORLANDO, Fla. — The NBA remains the industry leader among men's professional sports leagues for racial and gender hiring practices, according to a study released Tuesday.The University of Central Florida's Institute for Diversity and Ethics in Sport gave the NBA an A in a report on its hiring practices, with an A+ in the race category.The league slipped from an A- to a B+ in gender hiring practices, but scored an overall mark of 90.7."There's no question that the NBA has been for almost 20 years now the leader among men's sports when it comes to racial and gender hiring practices," said Richard Lapchick, the primary author of the report.Using data from the 2012-13 season, TIDES found that African-Americans made up 43.3 percent of all NBA head coaches, and set a record last season with 45.6 percent of all assistant coaches being of color.According to the study, 35.7 percent of all professional employees in the NBA are people of color and 41.1 percent are women at the league office.Lapchick said NBA Commissioner David Stern, who will step down in 2014, has embraced the moral imperative for diversity."I think he's charted a course from the time he took over," said the 67-year-old Lapchick. "I'm old enough where I was around at the point and a lot of people were criticizing the NBA for being quote, unquote too black. They were referring to the players at the time. But David Stern was right from the start someone who said we're going to put the best players on the court and the best people in the front offices. And I think the result is what the NBA is today in terms of racial and gender hiring practices."It will be interesting to see if under (Stern's future replacement) Adam Silver that leadership level continues. I fully expect it will."On the court, African-Americans comprise 76.3 percent of all NBA players, and that 81 percent were people of color.According to the study are four African-American chief executive officers and presidents in the NBA. There are no Latinos, Asians, or those classified as "others" in CEO/president positions. Sacramento's Matina Kolokotronis was the NBA's only woman president as of the beginning of the 2012-2013 season.While that number may sound low, Lapchick said "there isn't another president of color in any of the other professional sports and baseball has only had one for less than one season. In more than 20 years the NFL has never had one. So for the NBA to have four, even if that number is down one, is still a significant statement about the NBA."Only 23.3 percent of NBA general managers are of color, down slightly from 25.8 percent the year before. There are six African-American general managers/directors of player personnel in all, along with one Asian GM.The percentage of women holding team professional administration positions decreased by 4.3 percentage points. That's down from 39.4 percent the year before to 35 percent in 2012-13, which Lapchick said is a concern.The number of NBA on-court officials of color increased by 1.5 percentage point to a record 47.5 percent last season. In all, 52.5 percent of officials last season were white, 45.9 percent African-American and 1.6 percent Latino. Of the 61 officials, one is a woman.TIDES will follow with the release of report cards for the NFL, the WNBA, MLS and college sports.
EAST RUTHERFORD, N.J. — On a day that had been set aside to discuss the Nets ' plans for Thursday's N.B.A. draft , attention at the team's training facility shifted from potential future players to a current star. General Manager Billy King spent a majority of his time Monday talking about a bent screw that had been replaced in Brook Lopez's surgically repaired right foot.King said the bent screw was discovered on X-rays when Lopez had his physical after the Nets were eliminated by the Chicago Bulls in the first round of the playoffs. The procedure, which took place sometime after the Nets' season ended on May 4, was strictly precautionary, according to the Nets. They expect Lopez to return to basketball-related activities sometime in August.Lopez, who averaged 19.4 points and 6.9 rebounds in 74 games last season as he made his first All-Star team, has now had three operations on his right foot since 2011. Two unrelated fractures in the foot cost him most of the 2011-12 season.King said that Lopez was in a walking boot and that his rehabilitation would take place in the New York City area. King stressed several times that Lopez would be fine, and that he had not experienced any pain by the bent screw."For me, I don't have any concern," King said. "It didn't prevent him from playing."Faced mostly with questions about Lopez and what appears to be a weeks-old surgery, King dealt with fewer inquiries than expected about the Nets' plans for their first-round pick, the 22nd over all, on Thursday.King did mention that the Nets could benefit from a draft class that is projected to produce more solid, complementary players than stars."For where we are, it's better because you're going to get guys who are more polished and more who they are," he said. "They may not be a franchise guy, but they could be a good piece."King said his priorities this off-season would be to acquire athletic players who could shoot from the perimeter.One of the Nets' biggest needs is finding a suitable backup point guard for Deron Williams. The Nets expect C. J. Watson, who held that role last season, to opt of out of his contract and become a free agent. King did not mention Watson on Monday, instead saying he wanted to bring in another guard who could compete for the role with Tyshawn Taylor, whom the Nets obtained from the Portland Trail Blazers in last year's draft.Two such players who could fit that bill and have been projected to be selected somewhere in the high teens to low 20s in the draft are guards Tim Hardaway Jr. and Erick Green, the most notable of the six players the Nets invited for a workout. King, who was not asked about Hardaway or Green, brushed off the suggestion that he would consider taking a center as insurance for Lopez."No, not at all," he said.King, after pausing for few seconds, then laughed and added: "There's nobody as good as Brook Lopez in the draft, either. We know the guys we want to have, and Brook is going to be our starter."
MIAMI — When the Miami Heat won their first championship in 2006, then-coach Pat Riley decided to enter the following season without major roster changes.Many players showed up for training camp out of shape, and the Heat eventually got swept in the first playoff round.This time, Riley believes, things will be much different. He doesn't see any way that a core of LeBron James, Dwyane Wade and Chris Bosh would go into any season — much less one where they could win a third straight title — not prepared to chase another championship. So this summer, the Heat aren't planning any major roster changes, the clear belief being that the team in Miami now should be good enough to contend again in 2014."We're the fugitive and they're still coming after us," said Riley, the Heat president. "And that motivates the hell out of me. It really does, because I don't want to get caught, not with what we have. And I don't the players feeling like they can get caught, either. That's why the improvement needs to come from within and we need to be smart about what we're doing."Riley wrapped up the season with a 40-minute interview session Wednesday, opining on everything from his ninth championship season ("I've been lucky," he said in a clear understatement) to coach Erik Spoelstra's story that his boss came knocking on the door of his hotel suite after the 113-77 loss in Game 3 of the NBA Finals against San Antonio with three bottles of wine ("The wine was already there — and it was opened," was Riley's recollection).Occasional laughs aside, Riley also pointed out repeatedly that the work awaiting the Heat in the coming months is serious."We're just going to keep everything very fluid," Riley said. "I think that's the key. What we just experienced, three straight years, (297) games, two consecutive world championships, we are so giddy about that and proud of our team and also excited that what we did three years ago has led us to this. The challenge is not 'Can we win another championship?' The challenge is how to manage it within the confines of a very punitive collective bargaining agreement."None of Riley's proclamations about his hopes for next season's roster were exactly surprising. First, as expected, he announced that the team is exercising its $4 million option on point guard Mario Chalmers, who has started every game in which he's appeared in the past two seasons, with a knack for coming up big in the biggest moments.He also wants Chris Andersen and Ray Allen back, as do their teammates from this season. Andersen has given indications that he wants to return, including announcing at the team's championship rally on Monday that he wants to chase a "threepeat" — a word Riley actually trademarked several years ago. And as Riley was speaking Wednesday, Andersen was in the nearby weight room, getting in a workout."We love Chris Andersen and we want him back," Riley said. "He will obviously be informed by his agents as to all of the ramifications of what's out there, as to what we can do. So until July 1, we won't know. But we would love to have Chris back."Allen could opt to leave, though said several times that he enjoyed the makeup of this Heat roster.Allen wound up hitting perhaps the biggest shot in Heat history, the 3-pointer with 5.2 seconds left in regulation of Game 6 of the finals that forced overtime and saved the Heat season. That shot by Allen was part of a wild sequence where the Heat rallied from a five-point deficit with 28 seconds left to play, and where security workers had already dragged out a yellow rope to seal the court in anticipation of a Spurs' celebration."He's a very, very smart man and that playing with LeBron James and Chris Bosh and Dwyane Wade and all of the other players that he has become very close to, I think he'll make the wise decision," Riley said.There are some difficult luxury-tax-related decisions for the Heat to make in the not-so-distant future, and one of the ways Miami could create some flexibility for itself would be to use its one-time amnesty provision. Mike Miller, who's due to make about $13 million over the next two seasons, has been often mentioned as someone who could be jettisoned by the Heat.For now, Riley doesn't sound like an advocate of that plan, saying he'll leave the money decisions up to managing general partner Micky Arison and the rest of the Heat executive branch."He's a great player," Riley said. "So unless I get a mandate about (amnesty), we haven't talked about it. We just want to keep this team together."Still, some changes will almost certainly happen.The Heat had a two-day visit this past season with Greg Oden, the No. 1 overall pick in 2007 who has played exactly 82 games in his NBA career because of relentless knee issues. And with the Heat almost certainly not having the financial flexibility to get into the mix for big-money free agents, taking a flyer on someone like Oden might be the sort of move Miami makes this summer."We will explore that and see where it goes," Riley said.One guy who isn't going anywhere, for now, is Riley himself.With nine championships now and a Hall of Fame legacy as a coach, there is obviously nothing left for the son of Schenectady, N.Y. to prove in the NBA. But he remains driven by more, perked up Wednesday when talking about how he may have "I ain't got no worries" — a line James used after winning this title — inscribed on the 2013 championship rings, and how the challenge of the next 12 months should energize the franchise.If the Heat had lost Game 6 of the finals, he said major changes might have been forthcoming. But now, there's no need for wholesale departures, and that applies to him as well."Why would I want to get off this train?" Riley said. "As long as Micky will have me, I will be here."
LOS ANGELES — Newly-appointed Los Angeles Clippers head coach Doc Rivers arrived at his team's practice facility on Wednesday in casual attire that showed just how surprised he was to be there.Rivers, one of the most successful active coaches in the National Basketball Association, was wearing low-top sneakers and a short-sleeved shirt at his introductory news conference a day after he was acquired from the Boston Celtics.Weeks of on-again, off-again talks between the two teams finally resulted in a deal on Tuesday that saw the Celtics release the 51-year-old former coach of the year from his contract in exchange for a 2015 draft pick."This was a strange ordeal over the last couple weeks, to the point, as you can see my attire, I don't have any suits because they're all in Boston right now," Rivers told reporters."I flew in from Orlando, that's where I stay in the off-season, and I basically wear shorts and T-shirts all summer."The Clippers did not release terms of the contract given to Rivers but multiple media reports say he agreed to a three-year, $21 million deal.Prior to joining the Celtics in 2004, Rivers spent just over four seasons as head coach of the Orlando Magic, earning NBA Coach of the Year honors in his first season when he led a team that was expected to finish last to a playoff berth in 2000.Under Rivers, the Celtics won six Atlantic Division titles in nine seasons and the league championship in 2008. He also owns the NBA's third-best record since 2007 among active coaches, according to the Clippers.Despite telling the dozens of reporters gathered at the Clippers practice facility that he was uncomfortable being the center of attention, Rivers was less bashful about his goals for himself and his new team."It's nice to do a lot of winning, it's nicer to be the winner and that's why I'm here, that's what I want to do," said Rivers. "And quite honestly, at this point in my life, that's the only reason I'm coaching, is to try to win titles."The Clippers won the Pacific Division last season with a 56-26 record but lost to the Memphis Grizzlies in the first round of the playoffs. Shortly after, the team decided not to resign Vinny Del Negro as coach after three seasons.The Clippers are led on the court by six-time All-Star point guard Chris Paul and the arrival of Rivers, a high-profile coach with proven success, is expected to help ensure the club does not lose their top player to another team in free agency."We're just going to have to wait until he makes his decision and signs his contract, but all the indications are that he likes and respects Doc and I hope that helps," Andy Roeser, president of the Clippers, told reporters.Roeser called Rivers a "seasoned and steady hand that we're going to rely on to take us to the championship level."Paul was not at the Clippers training facility on Wednesday, but teammate Ronny Turiaf was on hand to see Rivers."He might be one of the major missing pieces to success," Turiaf told a small group of reporters on the edge of the gym."One thing that we as a team was lacking a little bit down the stretch was a couple (defensive) stops. One stop here, one stop there, our season is totally different."Celtics general manager Danny Ainge officially announced the departure of Rivers on Tuesday, but the veteran coach said as recently as a few days ago he thought the deal was dead."I called Danny I said, 'I'm staying, I'm coming back, I'm coaching (in Boston), that's what I am and let's move forward.' Two hours later he called me and said, 'No you're not staying. You're going,'" Rivers said.The coach also said that as recently as Sunday he was going over the Celtics player roster with Ainge for the upcoming NBA season, but that on Sunday night the deal was agreed upon."I'm hope this is the last time that I'm the center of attention here," River said, "I can say that honestly. It will be about the players."
In honor of Thursday night's NBA draft, The Associated Press takes a look at the best and worst all-time picks for each of the league's 30 franchises.The starting point for this exercise was 1966, when the territorial pick system went away and the draft began to look more like it does today. We're judging picks not on how sensible they seemed at the time, but on how much they ended up being worth to the selecting team — taking into account where each pick was in the draft and who else was available.When it came to trades, we tried to use common sense, crediting whichever team was actually making the selection.Best Value: Doc Rivers, No. 31 pick, 1983. Plenty of teams passed on Rivers, who was part of a draft that also included talented point guards Derek Harper and Darrell Walker. Rivers played eight solid seasons in Atlanta.Worst Value: DerMarr Johnson, No. 6, 2000. The second Cincinnati product to go in the top six that year behind No. 1 pick Kenyon Martin, Johnson played two seasons with Atlanta before breaking his neck in a car crash. After missing the entire 2002-03 season, he was able to play again in the NBA — but his career with the Hawks was over.Best Value: Larry Bird, No. 6, 1978. Red Auerbach drafted Bird in the first round even though it would be another year before the Indiana State star became a professional. Worth the wait, to say the least.Worst Value: Chauncey Billups, No. 3, 1997. The most tragic pick for the Celtics was Len Bias, whose death shortly after the 1986 draft transcended the game, but in terms of mismanagement, Boston's handling of the third pick in '97 probably still stings a bit. Billups was a perfectly reasonable pick, but he had not even played a full season before the Celtics traded the future Finals MVP for Kenny Anderson.Best Value: Buck Williams, No. 3, 1981. Williams is still the franchise's career scoring leader thanks to an impressive eight-year run in New Jersey.Worst Value: Dennis Hopson, No. 3, 1987. The No. 3 pick wasn't as kind a few years later. Hopson played only five seasons in the NBA, three with the Nets.Best Value: Emeka Okafor, No. 2, 2004. This young franchise has never picked No. 1 overall. Okafor gave Charlotte five solid seasons before being traded to New Orleans.Worst Value: Adam Morrison, No. 3, 2006. Morrison averaged 11.8 points as a rookie, but a knee injury cost him the whole 2007-08 season and he was traded in 2009.Best Value: Michael Jordan, No. 3, 1984. No surprise here — and we'll have plenty more on the '84 draft a little later.Worst Value: Jay Williams, No. 2, 2002. The Bulls were already running in place a bit after drafting Marcus Fizer in 2000 and Eddy Curry in 2001. Williams, the charismatic point guard from Duke, played only one season in the NBA before a career-ending motorcycle accident.Best Value: LeBron James, No. 1, 2003. The Cavs won the NBA draft lottery, parlaying that good fortune into the selection of James, who single-handedly resurrected a flopping franchise. James led the Cavs on their most successful run — five straight playoff appearances and a Finals trip in 2007. Obviously, this story took a dramatic, disappointing turn for Cleveland, but his seven years there will never be forgotten.Worst Value: Dajuan Wagner, No. 6, 2002. One year before taking James, the Cavs went out on a limb and took the 19-year-old Wagner. It broke. He had a solid rookie season (13.4 ppg) but couldn't stay healthy and was released after three years.Best Value: Dirk Nowitzki, No. 9, 1998. Milwaukee technically drafted Nowitzki, but that was part of a prearranged deal with Dallas. It was viewed as a risk because of the possibility Nowitzki might stay in Europe for a couple years, but he came to Dallas for that first season and quickly emerged as a star for the Mavs.Worst Value: Bill Garnett, No. 4, 1982. Garnett averaged only 5.5 points and 4.3 rebounds in four seasons — two with Dallas and two with Indiana. The first three picks in '82 were James Worthy, Terry Cummings and Dominique Wilkins.Best Value: Carmelo Anthony, No. 3, 2003. The Nuggets had eight straight losing seasons before Anthony came on board. They went 43-39 in his first season, with Anthony averaging 21 points as a rookie. Denver made the playoffs seven straight seasons with Anthony leading the team before he was traded to the New York Knicks in a blockbuster 2011 deal.Worst Value: Nikoloz Tskitishvili, No. 5, 2002. The 7-footer from the Republic of Georgia never blossomed in Denver. He averaged 3.2 points in three seasons with the Nuggets and was traded to Golden State in 2005.Best Value: Joe Dumars, No. 18, 1985. In a draft heavy on big men, the Pistons were able to land Dumars late in the first round, and he would team up with Isiah Thomas to form a championship-winning backcourt. In 1986, the Pistons came up with another steal when they took Dennis Rodman in the second round, but Dumars played with Detroit his entire career and is now the team's president.Worst Value: Darko Milicic, No. 2, 2003. Milicic was the man picked between LeBron James and Carmelo Anthony. The Pistons won the NBA title in 2004 — but this choice still haunts them.Best Value: Chris Mullin, No. 7, 1985. Included in Mullin's terrific run with the Warriors was a five-year stretch in which he averaged at least 25 points every season.Worst Value: Joe Smith, No. 1, 1995. Smith had a perfectly decent career, playing over 1,000 games in the pros, but he was with the Warriors for less than three seasons, and it was clear pretty early that he wasn't the type of franchise player you'd hope to draft at No. 1. Chris Washburn, who Golden State picked at No. 3 in 1986, played even fewer games for the Warriors, but that was a disappointing draft in general. Smith was taken ahead of Rasheed Wallace and Kevin Garnett.Best Value: Hakeem Olajuwon, No. 1, 1984. Olajuwon's career was so transcendent that the Rockets have drawn little criticism for passing on Michael Jordan. An honorable mention goes to Calvin Murphy, a second-round pick by the Rockets in 1970.Worst Value: Lee Johnson, No. 17, 1979. Johnson did not play in the NBA at all in the 1979-80 season. He appeared in 10 games for the Rockets the following season, scoring 17 points — and that was pretty much that.Best Value: Reggie Miller, No. 11, 1987. The selection of Miller — over the objections of Pacers fans who wanted Indiana to take hometown favorite Steve Alford — changed the direction of the franchise. Miller turned the fans' draft-night boos into cheers by helping the Pacers become perennial contenders from the mid-1990s until his retirement in 2005.Worst Value: Rick Robey, No. 3, 1978. Larry Bird was eligible for this draft, but the Pacers decided not to wait a year for the Indiana native, who was headed back to college for his senior season. Bird was taken by Boston at No. 6. The Pacers actually had the top pick, but traded down to No. 3 to acquire Johnny Davis. Davis played fine for Indiana. Robey played only half a season for the Pacers — although he later won a title alongside Bird in Boston.Best Value: Blake Griffin, No. 1, 2009. Let's be honest: There's not a lot of competition for this honor. Griffin missed the whole 2009-10 season because of a broken kneecap, but he's now one of several reasons this downtrodden franchise is finally enjoying some buzz. Danny Manning put up good numbers for the Clippers after they took him with the top pick in 1988, but the team remained largely irrelevant.Worst Value: Michael Olowokandi, No. 1, 1998. Olowokandi was picked ahead of Mike Bibby, Antawn Jamison, Vince Carter, Dirk Nowitzki and Paul Pierce. Ouch.Best Value: Kobe Bryant, No. 13, 1996. Charlotte drafted Bryant but immediately announced that his rights would be traded. He ended up in Los Angeles in exchange for Vlade Divac. Details have always been sketchy, but years later, Bill Branch — a scout for the Hornets in '96 — told the Winston-Salem Journal that the deal was already in place, and the Lakers had told Charlotte whom to pick. If you don't want to count Bryant as a Los Angeles pick, Magic Johnson at No. 1 in 1979 worked out OK, too.Worst Value: Kenny Carr, No. 6, 1977. The Lakers haven't had too many significant whiffs. Carr averaged 11.6 points per game in his NBA career but spent just over two seasons with the Lakers. He was taken one spot ahead of Bernard King.Best Value: Pau Gasol, No. 3, 2001. Atlanta took the 7-footer from Spain, but the Hawks were picking for the Grizzlies as part of a trade. Gasol's impact was immediate, and he may have been the best player taken in that draft.Worst Value: Steve Francis, No. 2, 1999. Francis made little attempt to hide his displeasure when picked by the Grizzlies, who played in Vancouver back then. He was traded to Houston before his rookie season, and the team would spend only two more seasons in Canada before moving to Memphis. In 2009, the Grizzlies took Hasheem Thabeet at No. 2. He struggled so much he was assigned to the D-League during his rookie season.Best Value: Dwyane Wade, No. 5, 2003. The Heat, of course, now have three of the top five picks from 2003 in their starting lineup, but before teaming up with LeBron James and Chris Bosh, Wade led Miami to its first NBA title in 2006.Worst Value: Harold Miner, No. 12, 1992. A college star at Southern California, Miner was one of a handful of young, athletic players who at one point or another drew comparisons to Michael Jordan. He did follow Jordan's footsteps in one respect — by winning multiple titles in the dunk contest.Best Value: Kareem Abdul-Jabbar, No. 1, 1969. This was back when the league would determine the top pick with a coin flip. The Bucks got to draft Abdul-Jabbar despite winning 11 more games than the Phoenix Suns in 1968-69.Worst Value: Joe Alexander, No. 8, 2008. Alexander never started a game for the Bucks, and Milwaukee eventually traded him and his expiring contract to Chicago in 2010.Best Value: Kevin Garnett, No. 5, 1995. Drafting players straight from high school wasn't common in 1995, when the Timberwolves took the skinny Garnett out of Chicago's Farragut Academy. All he did was become the best player in franchise history and one of the best power forwards in league history.Worst Value: Jonny Flynn, No. 6, 2009. Flynn was chosen right after the Wolves took another point guard, Ricky Rubio, as part of then-president David Kahn's ill-fated scheme to have the two play in the backcourt together like Isiah Thomas and Joe Dumars did in Detroit. Then Kahn hired a coach, Kurt Rambis, who employed a system that did not suit Flynn's ball-dominant style of play, and the league quickly overwhelmed him. Oh, and the Wolves passed on Stephen Curry to take him.Best Value: Chris Paul, No. 4, 2005. Paul was taken between Deron Williams and Raymond Felton — a nice little run of excellent college point guards. Paul is the shortest of the three, but his game translated just fine to the pros, and he spent six terrific seasons with New Orleans.Worst Value: J.R. Reid, No. 5, 1989. This was a rough year for highly touted big men — Reid, Stacey King and Pervis Ellison never developed into NBA stars.Best Value: Patrick Ewing, No. 1, 1985. There's a reason the Knicks were so thrilled when they won the first draft lottery for the right to take Ewing. New York was a 24-win team the previous season and desperately needed a franchise player to build around.Worst Value: Frederic Weis, No. 15, 1999. Let's get one thing straight: There's no shame in being dunked on by Vince Carter. The bigger problem for New York was that Weis didn't play a game for the Knicks. They held onto the Frenchman's draft rights all the way until 2008, when they swapped them for ... Patrick Ewing Jr.Best Value: Gary Payton, No. 2, 1990. Kevin Durant might eventually hold this title, but Payton still stands out, especially since other teams struggled to find impact players in the draft that year.Worst Value: Mouhamed Sene, No. 10, 2006. Sene scored exactly 100 points in 46 games for the Seattle-Oklahoma City franchise.Best Value: Dwight Howard, No. 1, 2004. This is where longevity factors in. Were Howard's eight seasons in Orlando more valuable than Shaquille O'Neal's four? Howard is first on Orlando's career scoring list. Shaq is fourth.Worst Value: Fran Vazquez, No. 11, 2005. Vazquez surprised the Magic by staying in Europe, leaving Orlando with nothing to show for that first-round pick. Danny Granger was taken six spots later.Best Value: Maurice Cheeks, No. 36, 1978. Talk about a diamond in the rough — Cheeks gave Philadelphia a decade of solid point guard play, and the team won an NBA title in 1983. Charles Barkley (No. 5 in 1984) could have been the pick here, but he played only half his career in Philly.Worst Value: Marvin Barnes, No. 2, 1974. Barnes signed with the Spirits of St. Louis of the ABA and never played for the 76ers. Jamaal Wilkes was among the players available when Philadelphia picked Barnes.Best Value: Amare Stoudemire, No. 9, 2002. Stoudemire won rookie of the year honors to begin a fine eight-year run in Phoenix. The Suns also drafted Steve Nash at No. 15 in 1996, although his best seasons in Phoenix were during his second stint there, which came about via free agency.Worst Value: William Bedford, No. 6, 1986. Bedford averaged 6.7 points as a rookie in his only season with the Suns.Best Value: Clyde Drexler, No. 14, 1983. In addition to Drexler, the Blazers also nabbed Terry Porter late in the first round in 1985 and Jerome Kersey with the 46th overall pick in 1984.Worst Value: Sam Bowie, No. 2, 1984. Not even Kersey could make up for the fact that Portland infamously passed up Michael Jordan in '84. Bowie could never stay healthy enough to live up to his potential, and the Blazers have been re-living that misfortune recently with Greg Oden. Portland also took LaRue Martin over Bob McAdoo with the top pick in 1972.Best Value: Peja Stojakovic, No. 14, 1996. In a testament to how deep that '96 draft was, the Kings ended up with a quality player one spot after Kobe Bryant was taken.Worst Value: Joe Kleine, No. 6, 1985. The pick itself wasn't as bad as the opportunity cost. Chris Mullin went next, followed by Detlef Schrempf and Charles Oakley. Karl Malone was picked at No. 13.Best Value: Tim Duncan, No. 1, 1997. Duncan has been nothing less than one of the best No. 1 draft choices in any sport. Of course, the Spurs were able to build around him by adding Manu Ginobili late in the second round in 1999 and Tony Parker late in the first in 2001.Worst Value: Alfredrick Hughes, No. 14, 1985. Hughes played only one season in the NBA, averaging 5.2 points per game.Best Value: Chris Bosh, No. 4, 2003. Bosh, Toronto's career leader in scoring and rebounding, gets the nod for a franchise that has won only one playoff series.Worst Value: Aleksandar Radojevic, No. 12, 1999. The 7-foot-3 Radojevic played all of three games for the Raptors. He was limited by back problems, and they traded him to Denver in 2001.Best Value: John Stockton, No. 16, 1984, and Karl Malone, No. 13, 1985. These two seemed joined at the hip during their playing days, so why not keep them together? What Utah pulled off with a pair of mid-first round picks was remarkable.Worst Value: Kris Humphries, No. 14, 2004. Picked before Al Jefferson and Josh Smith, Humphries played a couple nondescript seasons in Utah before the Jazz traded him to Toronto for Rafael Araujo — another first-round pick who hadn't panned out. Humphries has produced more for the Nets in recent years, but that doesn't do Utah much good.Best Value: Wes Unseld, No. 2, 1968. Unseld pulled off a rare double by winning rookie of the year and MVP honors in 1968-69. He later helped Washington to the 1978 championship.Worst Value: Kwame Brown, No. 1, 2001. A missed opportunity. Taken ahead of Tyson Chandler, Pau Gasol and Joe Johnson, Brown has posted a double-figure scoring average only once in his career.
LOS ANGELES — Even Doc Rivers got weary of the two-week saga of his move to the Los Angeles Clippers. He thought the unusual deal was dead several times, and he insists he really didn't mind the prospect of returning to the Boston Celtics."I felt like I was the only guy in all this that was in a win-win," Rivers said.The Clippers think they've got plenty of winning in store after landing one of the NBA's most respected veteran coaches.The Clippers formally introduced Rivers at their training complex Wednesday after dealing a first-round pick to the Celtics. Rivers was simply grateful to end his self-described "strange ordeal" ever since the Celtics floated the possibility of moving the NBA's highest-paid coach to a talented team determined to replace Vinny Del Negro with a topflight leader."The reason I wanted this when it was made available was because of what we have," said Rivers, who also will be the Clippers' senior vice president of basketball operations. "I clearly think this is an extremely talented basketball team. There were times last year they were the best team. I like the talent we have here."Rivers believes the Clippers have the ingredients to be a title contender, although unrestricted free agent Chris Paul is a major part of that recipe. Rivers' arrival is widely expected to cinch a new deal for CP3 — and Rivers believes their partnership will lead to chances for championships."We're going for it, let there be no mistake," Clippers President Andy Roeser said. "We're going for it. We want to win, and we think Doc will help us get there."Rivers largely sat out the negotiations about his fate over the last two weeks, staying at his offseason home in Orlando while Celtics President Danny Ainge and the Clippers' top brass hammered out details of the move. Rivers gave up on the deal multiple times, even discussing the Celtics' roster for next season with Ainge on Sunday, convinced he would return for a 10th season in Boston.Rivers turned off his phone and watched his youngest son, Spencer, in an AAU game. When he turned it back on, he found out he might be on the move after all — and a few hours later, the deal was done.With all of his formal clothes in Boston, Rivers couldn't even wear a suit when he headed out to the West Coast to accept his next coaching challenge."Things always find their path," Rivers said. "This took a long and winding path, but it found a way. ... I didn't intend it to be this way. I didn't want it to be this way. Danny and I thought it was something we would explore, and it would be quick."But it's finally over, and Rivers has started to consider what he'll do with his new team, which won a franchise-record 56 games and its first Pacific Division title last season, only to lose to Memphis in the first round of the postseason. Rivers is eager to improve the Clippers' defense while maximizing the potential of Blake Griffin and Paul, whose return is the franchise's top offseason priority.Paul and Griffin didn't attend the news conference, but backup big men Ronny Turiaf and Ryan Hollins showed up for a look at their new coach. Rivers said he had already spoken to most of his new players and most of the Celtics."Very excited about the future with Coach Rivers and his staff," Griffin tweeted. "Can't wait to get to work. Thanks for all the support clipnation!"Rivers was understandably cagey about any conversations with Paul, who was widely thought to desire an established, veteran coach in Los Angeles. Roeser has been steadfastly confident the Clippers will hang on to CP3, and Rivers' arrival only made him more optimistic."I think we're just going to have to wait until he makes his decision and signs his contract, but all the indications are that he likes Doc and respects him," Roeser said of Paul.Rivers was greeted in Playa Vista by a huge Hollywood media contingent, baffling a few longtime Clippers employees used to toiling in the glitzy Lakers' shadow. With each passing month, the Clippers are stealing the spotlight from the 16-time champions who share their hallway at Staples Center."I don't understand what the fuss is," Roeser said with a laugh. "It's not even the first time we gave up a first-round pick for Doc."Roeser referred to the 1991 trade that brought the veteran point guard to the Clippers for one season in 1991-92. Rivers wore Los Angeles' No. 25 jersey that year — the same number on the ceremonial jersey he held Wednesday to herald his return.Rivers' front-office title means he'll have a say in the Clippers' personnel moves, but Rivers clearly indicated he's only one part of a decision-making team including Roeser and Gary Sacks, their vice president of basketball operations."I think titles don't mean that much," Roeser said. "What matters is we're going to sit down together and find a way to make this team better."Roeser confirmed the Clippers won't be making any player transactions with Boston in the near future, but said the Clippers "will be active in the free-agent market." A reunion between Rivers and Kevin Garnett in Los Angeles remains unlikely after the NBA banned any potential trades including both men, but Rivers seems confident the Clippers already have enough talent to be even better."That's the only reason I'm coaching, is to try to win titles," Rivers said. "We've got to prove we can win a series first."
NEW YORK — Nerlens Noel is coming off a major knee injury. Alex Len is in a walking boot.One of them could be the No. 1 pick Thursday in an NBA draft that appears short on stardom, and neither looks ready to get his career off to a running start."This draft is really unpredictable, a lot of guys with injuries and you don't have any, like, LeBron James," Len said Wednesday. "So it's going to be interesting."Ten years after James climbed on stage to start a draft that goes down as one of the best in recent memory, the No. 1 pick again belongs to Cleveland.The Cavaliers won't find anyone who can play like James on the court — if they keep the pick — and even the climbing the stage part will be a challenge for the big men who opened their college seasons against each other and are competing again now.Noel tore the ACL in his left knee on Feb. 12, ending his lone season at Kentucky. The 6-foot-11 freshman led the nation in shot blocking and his conference in rebounding, but hasn't been able to show the Cavaliers if his offensive game has grown.The only basketball work he did during his visit to Cleveland was shooting some free throws. Perhaps the pants he wore with his sports jacket and orange tie were just too tight, but Noel was walking gingerly as he exited a hotel ballroom after meeting with the media Wednesday."I wanted to do more. Unfortunately I got hurt, but I mean I definitely felt right before I got injured I was really coming along as a player and just really coming into my own during that part of the season," Noel said. "But like I said, unfortunately I got hurt, so I wasn't able to show as much as I wanted to."Nor has Len, but that hasn't stopped the 7-1 center from the Ukraine who spent two seasons at Maryland from climbing into the mix at No. 1. His left foot started bothering him around February, and he found out after the season that it was a stress fracture.He was aware he was projected as a top-10 pick before the draft combine, but may go much higher even though his visits to teams have consisted of nothing more than interviews. He no longer needs crutches but will be in the boot for perhaps two more weeks.So, with all these injury questions, what about playing it safe and picking a healthy guy?"I mean, probably a lot of people wish it could be that easy," Kansas guard Ben McLemore said. "But it's a process for the teams, they've got to see what's available and what they really need. And like I said, this draft is up in the air and nobody knows what's going to happen, who's going to get drafted in which order."Orlando has the No. 2 pick, followed by Washington, Charlotte and Phoenix.McLemore, Indiana's Victor Oladipo, Georgetown forward Otto Porter and national player of the year Trey Burke of Michigan are among the other players who will hear their names called early at Barclays Center by NBA Commissioner David Stern in his final draft.It's a class that won't draw any comparisons to the one that James led, which featured future Miami Heat teammates Dwyane Wade and Chris Bosh, along with NBA scoring champion Carmelo Anthony among the first five picks.Brooklyn Nets general manager Billy King said a number of teams are trying to trade out of the draft and acquire extra picks for next year, which is expected to be a stronger class. But he doesn't know if there will be enough teams interested in being trade partners to get those deals done."There are good players in this draft, but right now, there are not impact players. What I mean by that is that there's no one you look at in this draft that within two years will be an All-Star, say like Kyrie Irving was, players like that," said Minnesota Timberwolves president Flip Saunders, referring to the guard Cleveland took with the No. 1 pick in 2011."And so in order for you to move up and dilute your talent pool and your roster, you've got to get an impact-type player, and I just don't believe ... there's good players, probably pretty good players in this league, but are they going to be that impact player who's going to be an All-Star or future Hall of Famer? That's what you don't see. And sometimes that's something you don't see for two or three years in a row."McLemore has in some ways been hurt by healthy, since by being able to work out he's given teams something to nitpick. Noel and Len have been largely free of criticism while sitting on the sideline.Instead, Len is hoping his first impression of the season is one that holds up, when he had a career-high 23 points, 12 rebounds and four blocks against Noel in Maryland's loss to Kentucky, right in the building where they will be Thursday."I did well against him. So, it's not up to me, it's up to teams," Len said of a team choosing between the two.Neither player said he knows what the Cavs will do. There has been speculation they are open to dealing the pick, something teams rarely consider in a year with a clear-cut No. 1.Noel said he had gotten no sense from the Cavs that they had concern about his knee, which could keep him off the court until early in the regular season. And in a draft full of questions, he believes selecting him is the right answer."I'm a good teammate, I definitely love to work," Noel said. "I want to get better. I want to be great, I want to reach my potential, be the best player I can be. I definitely do countless hours in the gym and I'm definitely working to get there."AP Basketball Writer Jon Krawczynski in Minneapolis contributed to this report.
NEW YORK — The Brooklyn Nets will acquire Paul Pierce and Kevin Garnett from the Boston Celtics in a deal that was still developing as the NBA draft ended, according to a person with knowledge of the details.The trade can't be completed until July 10, after next season's salary cap is set, so pieces were still being discussed early Friday. But the person says the Nets will get the two perennial All-Stars, signaling the breakup of the Celtics' veteran core.The person was granted anonymity because details of the trade were not being made public.Nets general manager Billy King refused to comment on the deal during his press conference to discuss the drafting of Mason Plumlee.Yahoo Sports, which first reported the talks, said the Nets would also get veteran Jason Terry from Boston and send Gerald Wallace, Kris Joseph, the expiring deal of Kris Humphries and three future first-round picks to Boston.On the day they hosted the NBA draft, the Nets were making much bigger noise with the transaction that will send Pierce and Garnett to a new Atlantic Division home.The Celtics already let Doc Rivers leave after acquiring a draft pick from the Los Angeles Clippers. Ray Allen departed last summer for Miami, and now the other two members of the Big Three that led the Celtics to an NBA title and within a victory of a second will soon be gone as well."Sort of sad," said Chicago coach Tom Thibodeau, an assistant to Rivers on the 2008 NBA champions."You hate to see it. I certainly hate to see them go to Brooklyn, Doc of course going to the Clippers. But that's the NBA. It's constant change, and you have to be ready to adapt. I think what Paul Pierce did for that franchise and Kevin — I think's it's good for them. They have an opportunity to continue on. Good for the Celtics, where they can start their rebuilding, and it was good for Doc."Garnett had to waive a no-trade clause, which he had been reluctant to do previously. But the Nets hoped he would consider this time with Pierce joining him and the Celtics' best days seemingly behind them.The Celtics tumbled down the Eastern Conference standings this season, falling all the way to the No. 7 seed and getting eliminated by the New York Knicks in the first round. They have been considering moving one or both of the veterans, and this triggers the start of a true rebuilding process.And it provides a huge boost to the Nets at two of their weakest positions. They struggled to settle on a starting power forward all last season, and Pierce would be immune to the lengthy offensive slumps that plagued Wallace, the starting small forward.In Pierce and Garnett, rookie coach Jason Kidd gets veteran leadership from two longtime opponents as he makes the transition to the sideline after retiring as a player last month.AP Sports Writer Andrew Seligman in Deerfield, Ill., contributed to this report.
C. J. McCollum understands how rare an N.B.A. prospect he is. After all, no N.B.A. team has drafted a Lehigh player.That trend will be broken Thursday night when McCollum, a 6-foot-3 guard, is expected to be a lottery pick, even though he played only 12 games as a senior."I'm thankful I can be the first player to get drafted from Lehigh University," McCollum, who graduated with a degree in broadcast journalism, said Wednesday. "It means a lot to me. They accepted me and they gave me a chance."McCollum, the first freshman to be named Patriot League player of the year, averaged 23.9 points, 5 rebounds and 2.9 assists as a senior before breaking a bone in his left foot in January. As a junior, he averaged 21.9 points, the fifth highest in the country. He also led Lehigh to Patriot League tournament championships in 2010 and 2012.Duke fans and a national television audience were introduced to McCollum and his teammates in the first round of the 2012 N.C.A.A. tournament, when the 15th-seeded Mountain Hawks, from Bethlehem, Pa., stunned the No. 2-seeded Blue Devils, 75-70.Coach Mike Krzyzewski said McCollum, who had 30 points, 6 rebounds and 6 assists, was the best player on the court."It increased the overall perception of the university," Lehigh Coach Brett Reed said.When Commissioner David Stern calls McCollum to the Barclays Center stage Thursday, it will be a proud moment for him, his family and Lehigh. The university's athletic department and alumni association have worked all week to alert students, faculty and alumni to watch the draft.Mike Connor, the alumni association's president, said he remembered missing most of an Allman Brothers concert at the Beacon Theater, along with other Lehigh graduates, in order to watch McCollum and the Mountain Hawks beat Duke on television."We all feel really strongly about him and the kind of image that he is going to reflect on the university," Connor said. "Basketball has that visibility and that spark, and I think it's going to be enormously valuable to the university."Four years ago, most midmajor Division I programs worried that McCollum could not be successful at that level. Akron and Eastern Michigan recruited him but did not offer him a scholarship.The Lehigh assistant coach Matt Logie was the first to urge McCollum to think about becoming a Mountain Hawk. Logie, who was one of the first scholarship players in the university's history, said he wanted to find a player who could transform the program."We were looking for the type of players that would have better careers than I did," said Logie, now the coach at Whitworth University in Spokane, Wash. "To be a part of that process in bringing in somebody like C. J. has really done wonders for the program."McCollum said that, growing up in Canton, Ohio, he was better at baseball than basketball. He learned how to pitch from his grandfather, James Harrison Andrews, who he said played in the Negro leagues. But McCollum's mother, Kathy Andrews, made him pick one sport to master. McCollum said he chose basketball for two reasons: he was allergic to grass, and he thought baseball was boring.McCollum, the Patriot League's career scoring leader, could have jumped to the N.B.A. after his junior year. Some analysts projected him to be a late first-round pick. But he returned for his senior year because he had promised his mother he would earn his degree and he wanted to be loyal to Lehigh. He also wanted to return to the N.C.A.A. tournament."He was willing to risk injury and to risk additional scrutiny because he thought his game could continue to grow," Reed said.Still, he said that was not the biggest challenge for him at Lehigh."I'm at a school where the academic load is very hard," McCollum said, adding: "We were forced to go to the class. I think the professor-to-student ratio was nine to one. They knew me as Christian James McCollum from Canton, Ohio."His foot injury healed, McCollum impressed teams at the N.B.A. scouting combine and in individual workouts. He also knows how to promote himself."I always tell teams when I meet with them that I'm a guy who could have played yesterday in the N.B.A. game," he said."A lot of guys in this draft can't say that," he added. "But I can confidently say that because I know the time and work I put in and how serious I take the game."
Names will be read, team caps distributed, futures assigned. There will be cheers and tears and groans and tension, and of course a steady torrent of hope. The N.B.A. draft is built on it.Sixty players will be selected Thursday night at Brooklyn's Barclays Center, and a few might even change the fates of their new employers. Although this class is supposedly devoid of elite talent, draft watchers insist it is deep and brimming with long-term potential. This is, after all, a festival of hope.The Nets and the Knicks will take their turns, with the 22nd and 24th picks, and they might even find a spare shooter or a backup point guard in the draft bin. But hope? They spent their allocations long ago. Oh, did they spend.In the race to catch the Miami Heat, the Knicks committed $240 million to Amar'e Stoudemire, Carmelo Anthony and Tyson Chandler. In the race to catch the Knicks, the Nets committed $249 million to Deron Williams, Joe Johnson and Brook Lopez. The spending sprees pushed both teams into the Eastern Conference's upper tier, ensuring high playoff seedings, low draft picks and large luxury-tax bills for the foreseeable future.Now comes the reckoning and the cold reality for these budding New York rivals. As constructed, neither the Nets nor the Knicks are fit to dethrone the Heat, or even sturdy enough to dislodge the Indiana Pacers, who are younger, deeper and more versatile, with payroll to spare and assets to deal.The Heat, having survived the Spurs — and dodged the treacherous overpasses on their parade route — are firmly entrenched as N.B.A. overlords. The Pacers are ascendant. The Chicago Bulls will soon have Derrick Rose directing their offense again.In this season of hope and possibility, the Knicks and the Nets may actually be slipping."We're not where we want to be," Knicks General Manager Glen Grunwald said last month after a second-round loss to the Pacers. "We're going to do all we can to get where we want to go."The words could just as easily have come from his Nets counterpart, Billy King, who has constructed a similar puzzle across the East River.They have assembled marquee talent and raised expectations — to possibly unreasonable levels. Their rosters are not championship worthy, and their prospects for upgrading are slim. Under the N.B.A.'s increasingly punitive luxury-tax system, adding talent will only get tougher for teams with bloated payrolls.That is the challenge confronting Grunwald and King as they prepare for the off-season that officially starts Monday, with the opening of the free-agent market.The Knicks have $70.6 million committed to seven players for next season, placing them firmly in luxury-tax territory before they have signed a single free agent. The Nets have $84.5 million committed to 10 players (assuming C. J. Watson declines his option, as expected).As taxpayers, both teams will be barred from acquiring players via sign-and-trade deals. That means there is no possibility of landing a Dwight Howard, a Chris Paul, a Josh Smith, a David West or an Andre Iguodala this summer, or any other free agent of note.The only useful spending chip available to either team will be the "mini-midlevel" exception, worth $3.18 million. After that, it will be nothing but minimum salaries and prayers.When free agency opens, the Knicks will try to re-sign J. R. Smith, Pablo Prigioni and Chris Copeland, knowing that they could be outbid for all three. With Jason Kidd now coaching the Nets, instead of tutoring Anthony, the Knicks will again be in search of point-guard help. They are in dire need of big bodies, having gambled and lost on last summer's 38-and-over strategy. Rasheed Wallace and Kurt Thomas are gone. Marcus Camby is still here, making $4.4 million, though he did not play a single meaningful minute in the playoffs.The Nets have only one significant free agent, Andray Blatche, who is likely to stay. But they desperately need a starting power forward, as well as depth at point guard, shooting guard and small forward. Their $3.18 million exception might already be spoken for — they will probably need it to sign Bojan Bogdanovic, a 2011 second-round pick who has been playing in Europe.The Nets believe they can turn Kris Humphries's $12 million expiring contract into something useful, via trade, possibly in a package with MarShon Brooks. If the Knicks get desperate, they might consider trading Iman Shumpert.Otherwise, New York's teams are hemmed in, handcuffed by their own wild spending and by a new collective bargaining agreement that specifically set out to punish the spendthrifts and stop them from hoarding talent.If the Knicks are going to challenge the Heat, it will have to be with Anthony, Chandler and Stoudemire. If the Nets are going to make the leap from respectable to indomitable, it will have to be Williams, Johnson and Lopez leading the way.The championship-or-bust signs are hanging outside Barclays Center and Madison Square Garden. In New York, the festival of hope runs year-round.
PLAYA VISTA, Calif. — When Doc Rivers sat at the dais at the center of the Los Angeles Clippers ' practice court, he looked out of place. Flanked by a pair of Clippers executives in suits, Rivers wore a gray polo shirt, black slacks and black sneakers, which served as an indicator of how unlikely the deal was that had brought him from the Boston Celtics .All of his suits were in Boston. As recently as Sunday morning, Rivers thought he would return to the Celtics for a 10th season and a likely reconstruction of an aging roster.Instead, when he turned his phone back on after watching his youngest son's basketball game near their home in Orlando, Fla., Rivers found out that the nearly two-week on-again, off-again negotiations between the Clippers and the Celtics for his rights had resulted in a deal."I was like, wow," Rivers said Wednesday at a news conference. "That's amazing."That roughly echoed the feeling around the Clippers' facility, where a franchise that had for years built a reputation for its penurious ways had become a destination not only for elite players but also for the league's highest-paid coach.Rivers has agreed to a three-year, $21 million deal — what he had left on his deal with Boston. That is nearly $5 million more per season than the man he replaced, Vinny Del Negro."Let there be no mistake," said Andy Roeser, the Clippers' president. "We're going for it."Roeser's championship-or-bust message was directed primarily at an audience of one: Chris Paul, the Clippers' star point guard. Paul and Dwight Howard, the star center of the neighboring Lakers, are the marquee names on the free-agent market that opens Monday."It weighs on me," Rivers said, referring to Paul's next move. "He's a priority."Rivers said he did not know Paul well. Their first meeting, Rivers said, occurred when he tried to break up a fight between Paul and Celtics guard Rajon Rondo."That was the first time I ever touched Chris Paul; I was trying to pull him away from my guy," Rivers said. "I like his feistiness. I've always liked that in guards. I like players that have a fire about them."Rivers was lured west by the opportunity to chase another title, like the one he won with the Celtics in 2008, and the opportunity to have a greater hand in personnel decisions, similar to Gregg Popovich's role in San Antonio.The Clippers won a franchise-record 56 games last season on the strength of a deep bench that excelled when the tempo was fast. But that style did not translate well to the playoffs, where the pace was slower and where weaknesses like the Clippers' poor interior defense and predictable offense were easily exposed. The Clippers lost four consecutive games to the Memphis Grizzlies after taking a 2-0 lead in their first-round series."He's going to bring the little things and that championship attitude," Ryan Hollins, a free agent who spent last season with the Clippers but played the previous year with Boston, said of Rivers. "He's a great teacher and a great motivator."Rivers, who played one season with the Clippers, said he looked forward to working with Blake Griffin, the highlight-reel power forward, and DeAndre Jordan, the center whose maturity and development have been criticized within the organization. Rivers said they could be the best defensive combination in the league, but he added that it was a tougher challenge than the one he faced in 2008, when he melded the newly acquired Ray Allen and Kevin Garnett with Paul Pierce."The older guys are already over themselves," Rivers said. "They've already made the All-Star teams. The only thing they have left is to win a title. The young guys haven't all established themselves as being the greatest or whatever, so it becomes more difficult because you have to convince them that this stuff comes by winning, not by individual success. That's easier said than done."The unusual trade was finally completed when the Clippers agreed Sunday to include an unprotected first-round pick in 2015. The teams have agreed not to make any trades, even through a third party, to gain the approval of Commissioner David Stern, who said he would not approve a trade that included players because it could be a way to circumvent salary-cap rules. However, the Clippers could acquire Garnett — who was included in some iterations of the deal — or Pierce if they are released. The Celtics would save $10 million if they released Pierce before Monday."We'll pursue whatever free agents are out there," Roeser said, the implied message being that when the Clippers chase something these days — a coach, a star player or a championship — it is no longer a trivial pursuit.
BOSTON — Letting Doc Rivers go to the Los Angeles Clippers was the first sign. Getting rid of Paul Pierce and Kevin Garnett clinched it.The Celtics have agreed to the terms of a deal that would send the two remaining members of the Big Three that won the 2008 NBA title to the Brooklyn Nets for a package of draft picks and players. Garnett is a future Hall of Famer, but it's Pierce's departure that signals the end of an era for the league's most-decorated franchise."It's sad to see everybody leave Boston. You just want them to go someplace where they have a chance to win, and they have," Rivers said at Clippers draft headquarters late Thursday night. "It's a great trade for Boston, too; not now, later. Danny wanted to rebuild, and that's what he's doing."The longest-tenured member of the Celtics, Pierce is the team's captain, a 10-time All-Star and a likely Hall of Famer. He is the second-leading scorer in the history of the NBA's most-decorated franchise, and also is in the team's top seven in rebounds, assists, steals, games and minutes played.Garnett is also a future Hall of Famer, though only the last six years of his career were in Boston. It's Pierce, who slipped to 10th in the 1998 draft and has been a Celtic ever since, who had a chance to spend his entire career with the franchise and add his name to a list that includes Hall of Famers Larry Bird, Bill Russell and John Havlicek."(It's) sort of sad. You hate to see it," said Chicago Bulls coach Tom Thibodeau, who was an assistant on the Celtics 2008 championship team. "But that's the NBA. It's constant change, and you have to be ready to adapt. I think what Paul Pierce did for that franchise and Kevin — I think's it's good for them. They have an opportunity to continue on."Good for the Celtics, where they can start their rebuilding."Pierce was drafted in the Rick Pitino era when the Celtics, already in the midst of the longest championship drought in franchise history, were a year removed from the second-worst record in the NBA (a mark that was not good enough to land them the top prize in the draft, Tim Duncan).He helped the team reach the Eastern Conference finals in 2002. But, convinced that they were not likely to go farther, Ainge was brought in the next year to tear things apart again.Boston plummeted back into the NBA lottery and again bad luck prevented them from landing a franchise player like Kevin Durant. Instead, Ainge swung deals for Garnett and Allen that earned the Celtics their NBA-record 17th championship in the very first year.But Garnett was injured the next year, and Kendrick Perkins went down in Game 6 of the finals in 2010, when the Celtics lost to the Los Angeles Lakers in seven games. Then came two eliminations by Miami and, after five straight division titles, a third-place finish and first-round loss to the New York Knicks.Ainge was convinced that the time had come to start over.Rivers' exit was negotiated with the Clippers, landing Boston a first-round draft choice in 2015 and freeing the Celtics from the $21 million remaining on his contract. Garnett and Pierce will go to Brooklyn as soon as the deal can be finalized on July 10.Yahoo Sports, which first reported the talks, said the Nets would also get veteran Jason Terry from Boston and send Gerald Wallace, Kris Joseph, the expiring deal of Kris Humphries and first-round picks in 2014, 2016 and 2018 to the Celtics. Boston is left with Rajon Rondo, Jeff Green and Avery Bradley, along with Jared Sullinger and first-round draft pick Kelly Olynyk, a 7-footer from Gonzaga.Tim Hardaway, a scout for the Miami Heat, said: "We don't have to worry about Boston no more."Not next year, at least.But the Celtics will have two first-round picks in four of the next five drafts, including the loaded one expected for next year."The Celtics wanted draft picks and they wanted to drop contracts. I was one of those contracts," Rivers said from California on Friday in an interview with CBS radio in Boston. "It's a hard thing to do, but I think it's the right thing to do."
(Reuters) - Canada is famed as a hotbed of hockey, but basketball dominated headlines in the Great White North after Anthony Bennett became the first Canadian to be taken first overall in the NBA Draft.With more Canadian talent on the way, Bennett's selection by the Cleveland Cavaliers on Thursday could serve as a red-letter moment in a golden era for Canadian basketball.Even Canadian Prime Minister Stephen Harper, an avid hockey fan, took to Twitter, writing "Congrats to @AnthonyBennett for being the first Cdn ever drafted #1 overall in the NBA draft. Good luck in Cleveland, we're all behind you."Bennett will have Canadian company on the Cavs, joining compatriot Tristan Thompson, who had held the distinction of being the highest-drafted player from Canada when he was taken fourth overall last year by Cleveland.The team's newest forward, who entered the draft out of the University of Nevada, Las Vegas, following his freshman year, left New York after the draft to meet reporters in Cleveland.Bennett thought a moment when asked if there was anything special about his day of non-stop activities. "Yeah, the private jet that I flew in on this morning," he told Reuters with a chuckle in a telephone interview on Friday."It's not really something I do, but I can get used to it."As for reaction from back home, the versatile forward said: "Just been getting a lot of love."Joining the prime minister with a Twitter reaction was Steve Nash, the two-time NBA Most Valuable Player now of the Los Angeles Lakers, who went 15th overall to the Phoenix Suns in 1996 as the previous top Canadian pick before Thompson.Bennett was also proud of some other history made Thursday as the selection of British Columbia's Kelly Olynyk, headed to the Boston Celtics as the 13th pick, marked the first time two Canadians were among the top 14 so-called lottery picks awarded to the non-playoff teams.Canadian basketball is on the rise, according to Bennett."For sure. We have a couple of players now in the league, a couple just got drafted and more on the college level and others in high school. I feel like on every level in basketball, there is a strong Canadian group of guys."Later on, it's going to be pretty crazy," he said, admitting to dreams of Olympic glory. "Everyone is going to want to bring back a medal."Popularity of basketball in Canada should not be that surprising.Canada, after all, can lay claim to its invention as Canadian sports coach James Naismith is credited with devising the game in Springfield, Massachusetts, first played with soccer balls shot into peach baskets hung above a gym floor in 1891.NBA Canada General Manager Dan Mackenzie said the launch of National Basketball Association (NBA) franchises in Toronto and Vancouver in 1995 had a great impact."In '95 the Raptors and Grizzlies hit the floor and this is really the first generation of kids that have grown up having the NBA in their backyard," he told Reuters in a telephone interview.The Grizzlies lasted only six seasons in Vancouver before they moved to Memphis in 2001, but general interest across Canada in basketball has skyrocketed in recent years."Having the league more present both on television and on media platforms and in live events has really had a great impact on kids' desire to pick up a basketball versus a hockey stick," he said.Mackenzie pointed to statistics showing that over the last four years basketball was growing faster than soccer and hockey in terms of participation and said Canadians have embraced digital platforms providing nearly non-stop NBA action."When you layer on top of that the macro factors of immigration, we think immigration has been a big part of the growth of the sport here," the NBA executive said."We think a lot of that is due to people coming to Canada from countries where basketball is very popular. For our country, the two largest sub-groups of newcomers to Canada are folks from the Philippines and from China. Those are two countries where basketball is very popular."He said the general hoops interest in Canada combined with "the individual passion, talent and desire of these kids that are starting to excel, it really makes for a great movement.""When you look at the pipeline of talent coming through, if you look at the NCAA pipeline, high schools in Canada and/or in prep schools in the U.S., the Canadians are coming."One of the most eagerly anticipated Canadian players, Andrew Wiggins, will be hitting the major U.S. college basketball scene next season as a freshman at Kansas, where Naismith went on to coach basketball at the turn of the 20th Century.Even Bennett is excited by what Wiggins, who has been dubbed the "Maple Jordan," could accomplish."He's just real dominant, can take over games any time he wants," Bennett said. "He's athletic, he can shoot."I feel like in the next draft coming up, he can go number one, too, and make history again. Two Canadian players going number one, back-to-back. That would be something else."
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — The Knicks took a back seat to their Brooklyn rivals Thursday on draft night. Less than an hour before the Nets reportedly completed a huge deal with the Celtics, the Knicks drafted a player who they hope will provide immediate production.General Manager Glen Grunwald used the Knicks' first-round pick, at No. 24, to draft shooting guard Tim Hardaway Jr. of Michigan."We only have two players under contract next year at the guard position; it's a definitely a need," Grunwald said. "The primary reason we drafted him was we felt he was the best player available."We were impressed with his interview," Grunwald added. "We were impressed with his shooting, his athleticism and his overall demeanor."Hardaway spent his childhood around the N.B.A. His father, Tim, played 14 years in the league and was a five-time All-Star. The elder Hardaway, a member of the Miami Heat for six years, battled Allan Houston and the Knicks in the postseason in the late 1990s. Now, as the Knicks try to catch the two-time defending champion Heat, the younger Hardaway will be on the opposite side of the rivalry."I think the wound has healed for Allan," Grunwald said of Houston, who is the Knicks' assistant general manager. "I know Allan is excited about this, too. Hopefully, Allan can add something to his development because they are similar players."Tim Hardaway Jr. spent three years at Michigan, averaging 14.5 points and 4.7 rebounds per game last season and helping the Wolverines reach the N.C.A.A. title game."I feel like I'm a guy that can definitely knock down a wide-open jumper," Hardaway said at the Nets' pre-draft workout Monday. "I'm a better passer than what I've shown the last couple of years."If the Knicks' plan is to continue to surround Carmelo Anthony with perimeter shooters, Hardaway fits Coach Mike Woodson's style. Hardaway was one of Michigan's best 3-point shooters as he made 37.4 percent of his shots from the behind the arc last season.With the addition of Hardaway, the Knicks will focus their attention on re-signing three free agents: J. R. Smith, Chris Copeland and Pablo Prigioni.Grunwald understands he could lose all three players to teams that have more salary-cap flexibility. Smith, who won the sixth man of the year award, could be a starter on another team. Copeland, a forward the Knicks found overseas last year in Belgium, has grabbed the attention of several teams after he became a viable role player who scored from the perimeter. Prigioni, an Argentine, could decide to play next year in Europe.Smith, Copeland and Prigioni were all strong 3-point shooters last season. In case the Knicks lose any or all of them, Grunwald added another shooter in Hardaway.In the past 10 years, the Knicks have drafted better when they have not been in the lottery.In 2009, they drafted Jordon Hill with the eighth pick. In 2003, they selected Michael Sweetney with the ninth pick. Danilo Gallinari, the best one of the group, was the sixth pick in 2008.The Knicks selected Landry Fields in the 2010 draft with the 39th overall pick. Wilson Chandler, another solid player, was taken at the No. 23 spot in 2007. The best player the Knicks have drafted in the past decade was David Lee at No. 30.But the one thing they all have in common is that none currently play for the Knicks.
MEMPHIS — Dave Joerger's road through professional basketball's minor leagues has finally landed him in an N.B.A. head-coaching seat.His first job is at a familiar spot, with a team he has been a part of for six seasons.Joerger (pronounced YAY-gehr) was introduced as coach of the Memphis Grizzlies on Thursday after a season in which they won a franchise-best 56 games but split with Coach Lionel Hollins."I am ready for this opportunity," Joerger said. "I have won in the past. I know how to win. We're going to win."Joerger, 39, was a successful head coach in the minor leagues and was the lead assistant under Hollins the last two seasons.The Grizzlies are coming off a Western Conference finals appearance, but there was a disconnect between Hollins and the new ownership group led by Robert Pera. Hollins's contract was not renewed despite his 196-155 record since becoming coach of the Grizzlies in January 2009."Lionel Hollins did some great things for this organization. Now we turn the page to the Dave Joerger era," said Jason Levien, the Grizzlies' chief executive officer and managing partner.Terms of Joerger's contract were not released, but The Commercial Appeal in Memphis reported Joerger signed a four-year deal with a starting salary of about $1.5 million."This is a blue-collar town, and I'm a blue-collar guy," Joerger said. "I came up the hard way. I came up through the minor leagues."Joerger had been mentioned as the heir apparent to Hollins even as ownership and the former Grizzlies coach were trying to patch things up. On June 10, team leaders decided they had reached an impasse with Hollins and announced they would not keep him."This is something I've been dreaming about for a long time," Joerger said. "This is something I've been preparing for for a long time. This is Lionel's job. When it wasn't Lionel's job, then I'm interested in coaching this team and leading this team. When that happened, then we started talking and going forward. The last couple of days, it went really fast."The Grizzlies also interviewed George Karl, the N.B.A. coach of the year before being fired by Denver, the Chicago Bulls assistant Ed Pinckney and the former Phoenix Suns coach Alvin Gentry.Through it all, Joerger's name remained the one most mentioned. Levien said he was "positively inclined" toward Joerger as the coaching search began, but they had never talked about specific direction or style."I thought it gave us an opportunity to spend real serious time in evaluating who the other options were," Levien said. "There aren't too many times you get a first-time N.B.A. head coach who has won professional basketball championships as much as Dave has."Joerger won an International Basketball Association title and two Continental Basketball Association crowns with the Dakota Wizards. A third C.B.A. championship came as coach of the Sioux Falls Skyforce in 2005. He won a fifth minor league championship in 2007 with the Wizards after they had moved to the N.B.A. Development League.Joerger was the Grizzlies' lead assistant coach this season and helped coordinate a defense that allowed a league-low 89.3 points per game.
Kevin Garnett and Paul Pierce, two almost certain Hall of Famers, are heading to Brooklyn in a blockbuster trade that could tip the balance of power in the Eastern Conference.The Nets and the Boston Celtics agreed to the trade late Thursday night in the midst of the N.B.A. draft, which was largely overshadowed by the negotiations. The deal, which cannot be consummated until July 10 for salary-cap purposes, was confirmed by two people involved in the talks.The teams completed the deal when Garnett agreed to waive his no-trade clause. In exchange, the Nets agreed to fully guarantee the $12 million he is owed in 2014-15.The Celtics will receive Gerald Wallace, Kris Humphries, MarShon Brooks, Keith Bogans and Kris Joseph as well as three first-round draft picks, in 2014, 2016 and 2018. The Nets will obtain Garnett, Pierce and Jason Terry. Bogans, a free agent, will be sent to Boston in a sign-and-trade deal. An earlier version of the trade had Reggie Evans going to Boston.Neither team would confirm the deal, although Nets General Manager Billy King broke into a wide smile when asked about it late Thursday at Barclays Center, the Nets' home, where the draft was being held.King's news conference was ostensibly held to discuss the Nets' draft pick, Duke's Mason Plumlee, whom the Nets selected with the 22nd pick. He batted away a half-dozen questions about the trade but acknowledged it obliquely, saying: "At the time when it's appropriate, I will address it if possible. But at this point in time, I can't."Danny Ainge, the Celtics' team president, also demurred when asked about the deal, telling Boston reporters, "I can't talk about that."The trade thrusts the Nets squarely into contention in the East, with the size, experience and versatility to challenge the Miami Heat, the Indiana Pacers and the Knicks. Pierce and Garnett will provide the defense and the tenacity that the Nets sorely lacked this past season, when they won 49 games but failed to get out of the first round of the playoffs. They join a lineup that already features three All-Star talents in Deron Williams, Joe Johnson and Brook Lopez.Garnett had preferred to finish his career in Boston, but the departure of Coach Doc Rivers opened the door for a trade, and the inclusion of Pierce, his close friend, made the deal palatable.Details of the trade were first reported by Yahoo Sports.In Pierce and Garnett, the Nets will also get a dose of locker-room leadership to support Jason Kidd, the team's rookie head coach. Garnett, even at 37, remains one of the fiercest defenders in the league. Pierce is no longer an elite scorer, but he will not need to score much in a lineup with Williams, Johnson and Lopez.The Celtics, who won the title in 2008, have been moving toward breaking up their core since their first-round playoff loss to the Knicks. They let Rivers out of his contract last week to join the Los Angeles Clippers, and they were prepared to send Garnett and Pierce there along with him until the N.B.A. vetoed the deal as a salary-cap violation.For Boston, the trade with the Nets will provide a combination of cap relief and future prospects. The picks in 2016 and 2018 would be unprotected — and potentially quite valuable because Pierce and Garnett will most likely have retired by then. As part of a previous trade, the Atlanta Hawks have the right to swap picks with the Nets in 2014, so the Celtics would receive the lower of the two picks.To make the deal work under salary-cap rules, the teams will have to wait until after July 1, when Pierce's $15.3 million salary for next season becomes guaranteed. But the deal cannot be made official until July 10, after the league's annual moratorium on signings and trades is lifted.Pierce, 35, is under contract for just one more season, adding additional risk for the Nets, who will be under immense pressure to contend immediately. Garnett is under contract for two more seasons, at $12.4 million in 2013-14 and $12 million in 2014-15. Terry also has two years left on his contract, earning $5.3 million next season and $5.5 million in 2014-15.When the deal goes through, the Nets' payroll will skyrocket to nearly $93 million for just nine players. It could reach $100 million by the time they are done filling out the bench, which would trigger a luxury-tax hit of about $84 million — a record.The deal will allow the Celtics to drop below the luxury-tax line for next season, but the real savings will come in 2014-15, when their payroll would drop to $49.4 million — $9 million below the current salary cap.The draft itself was rendered an afterthought, as much as King tried to promote his selection of Plumlee, a 7-foot, 238-pound center from Duke, King's alma mater. Plumlee could become the Nets' primary backup to Lopez if Andray Blatche leaves as a free agent. With Humphries, Evans and Wallace heading to Boston, the Nets will need all the big men they can find.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — Tim Hardaway Jr. stared at his No. 5 Knicks jersey, surrounded by photographers prepared to capture the moment. Hardaway, the Knicks' first-round pick, then flashed a familiar smile as cameras clicked.Minutes later, he was joined by his father, Tim, the five-time All-Star who tormented the Knicks in the late 1990s as a member of the Miami Heat. When he stood beside his son, the resemblance between the two was clear. Only the setting was odd.Hardaway will start his N.B.A. career with the Knicks after spending most of his childhood in Miami, cheering for his father. The elder Hardaway said it felt strange to walk around the Knicks' practice facility."He's happy for me," Hardaway Jr. said. "That's what a father should do, whether it's a rivalry or not."Hardaway Jr., a shooting guard who starred for three years at Michigan, said he felt blessed to have the opportunity to contribute as a rookie and to play with veteran stars like Carmelo Anthony, Tyson Chandler and Amar'e Stoudemire.When Hardaway Jr. walked into the facility, one of the first things he noticed was a photograph of an emotional Allan Houston moments after his winning shot against the Heat in the deciding game of their playoff series in 1999."I was sitting across the bench from the Miami Heat," said Hardaway Jr., who was 7 at the time. "He shot that floater and it hit the front of the rim and the backboard and went in. After that, all I see is him running down the court and pumping his fist. It was a historical moment."Houston and Hardaway Sr. were reunited Friday as the Knicks' public relations staff released a photo of them on its Twitter account. Houston is the Knicks' assistant general manager. Hardaway is a scout and community liaison for the Heat."I could remember that shot like it was yesterday," Hardaway Sr. said.He added of his son: "Now it's coming full circle. I'm very happy for him. It's not about me. It's about him."One story line of the N.B.A. draft is the reaction of fans to their teams' selections. Knicks supporters almost always boo their team's pick, even Iman Shumpert two years ago and Danilo Gallinari in 2008.But on Thursday, the Knicks fans attending the draft at Barclays Center, including Spike Lee, cheered passionately when Commissioner David Stern announced Hardaway's name — giddy that he could be more than just a role player.Hardaway Jr. said it was not fair, or correct, for people to compare him to his father. He pointed out their differences, notably their height (he is 6 feet 6 inches, his father 6 feet) and position (shooting guard rather than point guard). He also said confidently that he was more athletic than his father."He's short and stubby," the younger Hardaway said. "I'm definitely not the same. One shoots better the other; one handles the ball better than the other. You got to go out there and make a name for yourself. That's what he wants me to do and that's what I want to do."Hardaway Sr. said he would root for the Knicks. Even when the Knicks play the Heat?"When they play against us," he said, "I don't know what I'm going to do."
LOS ANGELES — When two billboards with an image of Dwight Howard accompanied by the word "STAY" went up last week in Los Angeles — one on Hollywood Boulevard and the other across the street from Staples Center — it was rather unbecoming.The Lakers are not supposed to grovel.That is a ritual for Cleveland or Orlando, one to which the privileged are unaccustomed. For the Lakers, levers are pulled and juice is spent and marquee big men are delivered their way, be they Wilt Chamberlain, Kareem Abdul-Jabbar, Shaquille O'Neal or Pau Gasol. Smiles, Hollywood's embrace and championship parades ensue.When the Lakers acquired Howard last summer, it was not supposed to be simply a bridge back to an N.B.A. title, but one to the not-so-distant future without Kobe Bryant. That Howard would be a free agent was hardly a concern because being a Laker has always sold itself: in Howard's initial tour of the Lakers' practice center, General Manager Mitch Kupchak pointed to the retired replica jerseys that line the practice court and told Howard his jersey would one day be there too. Left unsaid were all the endorsements, celebrity pals and entertainment opportunities also there for the taking.And yet a nightmare of a season later, after the Lakers fired Mike Brown as coach, declined to hire Phil Jackson, endured a string of injuries capped by Bryant's torn Achilles' tendon and were swept out of the first round by San Antonio, the concern is all too real.Howard, whose vacillating over whether he would leave Orlando earned him widespread scorn, is now uncertain whether he wants to return to the Lakers. He may go to Houston or Dallas or any other team that will come calling once free agency opens Monday. He is expected to reach a decision by July 10, the first day deals can be made official.The drama around Howard is sure to be the most compelling of the free-agency period. The other prized free agent, Chris Paul, shares an arena, but he is widely expected to re-sign with the Clippers after they landed Coach Doc Rivers from Boston.Others available free agents include Atlanta forward Josh Smith and Milwaukee guard Monta Ellis, and the two other principals in last summer's trade for Howard, Denver forward Andre Iguodala and Philadelphia center Andrew Bynum, who did not play last season because of knee trouble. Dallas guard O. J. Mayo, Golden State guard Jarrett Jack and Utah forwards Paul Millsap and Al Jefferson also figure to be coveted. And restricted free agents like Bucks guard Brandon Jennings and Sacramento guard Tyreke Evans could be available.A difference maker of another sort is also on the open market: the journeyman center and cultural pioneer Jason Collins, who announced publicly that he is gay. Collins ended last season with Washington.But the Lakers will be the center of intrigue.Though Howard was celebrated upon his arrival, he has not won over fans, in part because of the Lakers' foibles and in part because of his inconsistent effort, his habitual carping at officials instead of hustling back on defense and his woeful free-throw shooting. Howard also expressed discomfort in Coach Mike D'Antoni's perimeter-centric offense and clashed with Bryant. If Howard was widely considered the best center in basketball last summer, now Marc Gasol, Brook Lopez and Roy Hibbert are part of the discussion. The disenchantment is such that some in Los Angeles believe the team would be better off without him.Kupchak is not one of them. He has regularly been in contact with Howard, who has also received assurances from Bryant and Steve Nash, among others, that they want him back. And the Lakers, under league rules, can offer Howard a five-year, $118 million contract; the maximum others can pay him is $87.6 million over four years.In case there was any equivocation, the Lakers offered up a public display of affection: the billboards."The message is simple: we care about you, and we want you to stay," Kupchak told reporters Thursday night after the draft. "I understand that there's a possibility he won't. I probably don't have any more information than anybody in this room does. I'm aware of a lot of the stuff that's flying back and forth, a lot of the rumors, so there's a realistic possibility that he won't be back. But I'm optimistic that he will."If Howard does not return, it is unlikely the Lakers will begin tearing the team apart, as the Celtics have done. Instead, they are likely to retool and hope for better health from Bryant, Pau Gasol and Nash, and a better supporting cast. And then wait until next summer, when Nash is the only player under contract and a potential bonanza of free agents awaits, led by the tantalizing possibility that LeBron James will opt out of his deal in Miami.For now, the Lakers will chase Howard with billboards and buckets of money. That a potential franchise cornerstone would take many millions less to leave town and pass on the opportunity to play for one of the N.B.A's storied teams is a possibility the Lakers are having to confront. A franchise not used to having a Plan B may be getting ready to resort to it.
DEERFIELD, Ill. — Chicago Bulls general manager Gar Forman insisted it was his call to let Tom Thibodeau's top assistant go and downplayed the idea there's friction with the coach.The Bulls announced Monday that they were not renewing Ron Adams' contract for next season, raising a few eyebrows."The decision was made by me because I felt it was the best decision for the Bulls going forward," Forman said.Why was it the best decision? Forman wouldn't say.Adams rejoined the Bulls in 2010 after serving as an assistant with Oklahoma City following a five-year run in Chicago from 2003 to 2008. The way this move came down was unusual because head coaches generally set their staff, yet it was the general manager pulling the plug in this case."Here's what I don't want to get into," Forman said. "We make tens if not hundreds of decisions every year. I don't think we want to evaluate every decision, who's on board. We communicate about every decision, and at the end of the day, I've got to make the decisions I feel are best for this organization moving forward. We'll unite and we'll move forward. Tom makes the decisions on the floor. He's our head coach. I think he's as good a coach as there is in the NBA. He does a great job."Do I agree with absolutely every decision he makes?" he continued. "We'll communicate, probably not. But at the end of the day, I'm going to support the decisions he makes and I think he's going to support decisions that I make. As long as once they're made, we unite and move forward because the goal is to continue to get this team better and to compete for a championship."Thibodeau praised Forman and his staff after the draft on Thursday night, and they're locked in for four more years after agreeing to an extension last fall. But that didn't come without a bump or two. Thibodeau waited until later in the season to sign the deal, saying some legal issues needed to be ironed out.Throw in Derrick Rose's season-long recovery from a torn anterior cruciate ligament in his left knee and there was no shortage of side stories as the Bulls clawed their way to 45 wins and a second-round playoff loss to the champion Miami Heat.Forman found himself answering questions about an assistant coach on the day the Bulls introduced first-round draft pick Tony Snell of New Mexico and second-rounder Erik Murphy of Florida. Thibodeau was not available to reporters to discuss the Adams move, though he said in a team statement: "Ron is a great friend, an outstanding coach and I will miss him."Forman said he and his coach "have a very good working relationship." He also said the GM has "final say" over assistants and that the rest of the coaching staff remains in place.As for free agency, the Bulls have no cap room and are in luxury-tax territory, so they don't have much flexibility. T"I think it's still a feeling-out period as far as what the market is and what players are available," Forman said. "At this point, we're limited because of being in the tax. But within that, I think we'll look at every avenue we have to move forward."He said the Bulls did reach out to point guard Nate Robinson's representatives and the team will wait and see "where the market's going." The same goes for Marco Belinelli.There's a good chance Robinson could be squeezed out with Rose returning and veteran Kirk Hinrich and 2012 first-round pick Marquis Teague in place. Belinelli might find a bigger role and a bigger paycheck with another team. Forman would like to bring back veteran center Nazr Mohammed."Really like Nazr," he said. "First of all, it's good to have veterans like Nazr that have been around the league, that understand what it takes to be successful. He's great in our locker room. I think he's great on the practice floor, and I think he was very good in games, especially late in the year."
INDIANAPOLIS — Baylor basketball coach Kim Mulkey was suspended from her team's next NCAA tournament game for criticizing the officiating after a loss to Louisville last spring.The NCAA on Monday also reprimanded Mulkey and withheld Baylor's team championship per diem from the regional round.After Louisville upset top-seeded Baylor 82-81 in March, Mulkey said the game was far too physical and she singled out the officials."I thought that all three of them, if they go past this round of officiating, it will be sad for the game," she said then. "I thought the two critical calls at the end of the game were really bad."The NCAA said it was issuing a more severe penalty because Mulkey is a repeat offender. She was reprimanded in 2011 for criticizing the NCAA for the decision to put the Lady Bears in the same tournament bracket with Texas A&M, a team they had faced three times already that season. The Aggies beat Baylor on their way to the national title.The NCAA Division I Women's Basketball Committee said the "latest misconduct act by Mulkey" warranted the more stringent suspension."The committee unanimously felt that the behavior of Coach Mulkey was unacceptable and has no place in the women's basketball championship," said Carolayne Henry, committee chair and senior associate commissioner for the Mountain West Conference.
INDIANAPOLIS — Hours after Brad Stevens told athletic director Barry Collier he was leaving Butler for Boston, he sat down to explain the decision to his players.Tears were shed and hearts were broken.Yes, this is going to take some to get over.On Wednesday, the 36-year-old Stevens stunned the city of Indianapolis by leaving the tiny school he led to back-to-back national runner-up finishes to take the Celtics job. The news hit hardest inside historic Hinkle Fieldhouse where, just two days earlier, players, coaches and administrators were celebrating their official entry into the re-formed Big East."When all the guys came in, we really didn't know what the meeting was about," Bulldogs forward Khyle Marshall explained in a hushed tone. "Me, personally, I cried a lot because we've been through so much together. Me, personally, I took it very hard, and so did a lot of other guys."Stevens did not attend the news hastily called news conference.For years, the departure of Stevens seemed preordained.Rumors swirled each offseason about some other job that would land him more money, a bigger recruiting budget or put him on a bigger stage to showcase his coaching talent. Each time, Stevens said no. So when the latest rumors, after UCLA hired Hoosiers native son Steve Alford in March, the Bulldogs figured they had again avoided losing Stevens.Collier said the Celtics never contacted him about talking to Stevens and that he didn't realize anything was different from the previous job overtures until Stevens walked into his office Wednesday morning."Brad did not make his decision until he talked to me," Collier said. "But he had given it great thought and he was really torn."On Monday, he seemed so inclined to stay that when asked about the large banner hanging outside Hinkle touting the conference move, he said: "All I see is a Bulldog."On Wednesday, the same man who left his job as a marketing analyst at Eli Lilly to take a volunteer coaching job on Thad Matta's Butler staff in the summer of 2000, suddenly had an offer he couldn't refuse.It has forced the Bulldogs to quickly find a new coach, much to Marshall's chagrin.The timing couldn't be worse. Butler's six incoming freshmen have already begun summer school. Stevens' longtime top assistant, Matthew Graves, accepted South Alabama's head coaching job three months ago. Next week, recruiting kicks into high gear and in early August, the Bulldogs are off to Australia for a summer tour. Meanwhile, most of the big-name coaches have already landed jobs for next season.Callers to local radio shows wondered whether Collier might try to find an interim coach to fill the job until a longer search can be conducted next year.One possibility that was floated included Collier, the former head coach at Butler and Nebraska, returning to help out his alma mater. Don't bet on it."I thought about this and then I decided I was going to come here to announce that Brad had taken the job with the Celtics and that I had hired myself as basketball coach and it took me about that long to fire myself," Collier cracked, infusing humor into an otherwise straight-laced news conference. "So now I'm going to go find a good coach."One that can, perhaps, begin the healing process."What I know for sure is it's going to be a Butler guy, a guy who knows our identity as a team and who is not going to change our identity," Marshall said. "I think we'll be pretty comfortable with whoever the guy is."
Brad Stevens is going from a mid-major to the major leagues.There is no debate within basketball that he can coach, having taken Butler to consecutive NCAA championship games with players who schools such as Kentucky and Kansas weren't exactly lining up to sign.But coaching in college has hardly ever guaranteed success in the NBA, definitely not lately and certainly not with the type of situation Stevens will be walking into in Boston.The Celtics are going to be young — younger even than the boyish-looking Stevens — and not expected to be competitive. Kevin Garnett and Paul Pierce will be gone, it's unknown when or even if Rajon Rondo will be back, and even a playoff berth might be out of reach for a franchise that had grown used to competing for championships again.Success at a school such as Butler was easy to judge. If Stevens won 20 games, got the Bulldogs into the NCAA tournament and knocked off a school from a power conference, that was considered a great year.But in the NBA, where multiple, established coaches just led teams to their best seasons ever and still lost their jobs, Stevens will have to prove he's more than just a guy who can oversee some big upsets.The Celtics believe he is."Brad and I share a lot of the same values," president of basketball operations Danny Ainge said in a statement.Las Vegas certainly wasn't swayed. The Celtics' odds to win a championship remained at 100 to 1, the same as before Stevens was hired, according to the gambling website Pregame.com.The Celtics have had plenty of success with guys from small schools. Ainge himself played at BYU, and they won big with another guy from an Indiana mid-major, a pretty fair player from Indiana State named Larry Bird.But they also know as well as anyone how quickly a college genius can turn into a professional flop.They went nowhere with Rick Pitino when he left Kentucky in 1997, before he went back to college and won last season's national title at Louisville. Once the Celtics missed out on Tim Duncan in the '97 lottery and never found the type of talent Pitino had his choice of in college, the Celtics never contended.Remember when a frustrated Pitino once said that Bird, Kevin McHale and Robert Parish were never walking through the locker room door?Well, neither are Garnett, Pierce and Ray Allen.That makes the 36-year-old Stevens' challenge a daunting one. He has to try to win with a rebuilding roster that's expected to lose. He has to get through to Rondo, a brilliant point guard recovering from a torn ACL whose mood swings can rub anyone the wrong way.If the Celtics were still a title threat, would Doc Rivers really have wanted out of his contract to go somewhere else? Would Ainge really have signed Stevens, respected as he may be in the coaching ranks, when Coach of the Year George Karl was available, as were Lionel Hollins and Vinny Del Negro after leading the Grizzlies and Clippers, respectively, to their best seasons ever?Maybe so, given the changes to the coaching ranks lately.Teams are willing to take chances on younger guys who haven't gone from successful playing career to longtime assistant before proving they deserve an opportunity.Erik Spoelstra was the model, working his way up from the Miami Heat's video department to two-time NBA champion as coach. Indiana's Frank Vogel is another young coach who got his shot when Bird hired the former advance scout, and Vogel had the Pacers within a game of the NBA Finals.Stevens' success at Butler, where he won 77 percent of his games, did wonders for mid-majors. The NCAA tournament selection committee grew more willing to extend bids to smaller schools over mediocre ones from the power conferences after watching teams like the Bulldogs prove they could compete with any of them.Now he can have a similar influence in the coaching ranks. If he shows there's no difference in coaching at legendary Hinkle Fieldhouse as there is at the new Boston Garden, that solid X's and O's work just as well in the Atlantic Division as in the Atlantic 10, other guys like him may start getting their shots.They already are. Vogel was only 37 when the Pacers turned to him in 2011, so he knows Stevens can get it done."The Celtics got one heckuva basketball coach," he said through the Pacers. "Congrats to Danny Ainge and Brad."
The Los Angeles Lakers want Dwight Howard so badly they put up billboards urging him to stay in town, then got Kobe Bryant and Steve Nash to get on bended knee before him.The Houston Rockets want Howard pretty badly themselves, promising the free agent everything but a Texas oil well and bringing in Hall of Famers Hakeem Olajuwon and Clyde Drexler to try to seal the deal.Around the NBA there's a rush to lock up talent just a few days into the free agency period. Indiana will keep power forward David West for another three years, Martell Webster agreed to a four-year deal to stay with Washington, and Minnesota filled a key need by agreeing to a deal with shooting guard Kevin Martin.Interestingly enough, no one is talking much about Jason Collins, whose signing could be very important to the NBA for reasons that have nothing to do with basketball. The veteran center would be the first openly gay player to share a locker room in the league, should a team come forward with a free agent offer.But for now Collins goes to the back of the line because of what he is, not who he is: a backup center just hoping to get a job."It's strictly basketball," said TNT analyst and former Phoenix general manager Steve Kerr. "A team will sign a guy like him for basketball reasons, but it will more than likely happen late because you can always sign a guy at the league minimum."The good news for Collins is that he's a 7-footer known as a smart and physical center who can play defense. His numbers last year for Boston and Washington were minuscule — averages of 1.1 points, 1.6 rebounds and 10.1 minutes per game in 38 games — but he's a role player who can fill a final position on a team that has specific needs. And at the veteran minimum of $1.4 million, he comes relatively cheap.Kerr believes a team in the Eastern Conference may sign Collins just to have him on the roster in the playoffs to guard someone like Indiana's Roy Hibbert on the inside. He said the Suns did the same thing when he was running the team by signing Collins' brother, Jarron, on the theory they needed someone to guard San Antonio's Tim Duncan in the playoffs."I think Jason probably fits in that mold somewhere," Kerr said. "He's well regarded around the league and I think he still has some life left in his legs. You can sign a guy for one game, one matchup, and it becomes worth it if it works."The question then becomes whether it's worth it for a team to pursue Collins when factors other than basketball come into play. Though his announcement in April that he was gay was widely acclaimed throughout the league, there's a lot of attention that will come to any team he plays for simply because of the fanfare it received.And there still is a question on how a gay player will be accepted by teammates in the locker room, no matter how publicly supportive they are. There is still plenty of homophobia in the NBA, as evidenced in the playoffs when Hibbert uttered a gay slur — though he later reached out to Collins on Twitter to apologize.Kerr believes that Collins would not only fit into a locker room, but thrive in his role as a senior statesman in what would be his 13th year in the league."The key with Jason is you have a guy who's a pro and who adds to the fabric of your team," Kerr said. "I know that in talking with Doc Rivers last season that he was raving about Jason's preparation and work ethic and effect on the younger guys. That's the key with a guy like Jason. You might be getting him for just one play but also to help fortify the character of the team."A representative for Collins said he wasn't available to talk about his chances of signing, in contrast to the media blitz he went on when he announced he was gay. But others who support him say it's almost as important that he be signed by a team as it was for him to come out as a gay athlete."It's very significant because it's a big obstacle to overcome," said Hudson Taylor, a former college wrestler and founder of Athlete Ally, an organization working to end homophobia in sports. "It would make it clear that a player's sexual orientation doesn't affect their viability as an athlete."That's already the case in the WNBA, where Brittney Griner's sexuality didn't stop her from becoming the first pick of the Phoenix Mercury in this year's draft. But while attitudes in society may be changing rapidly, there's still a big difference in how gay female athletes are viewed as compared to gay male athletes.That Jason Collins is a trailblazer is undeniable. That he is a man of great courage is undisputed.But he waited until his season was over before announcing he was gay. He did it knowing there was a real possibility there would not be a job available and he wouldn't be the gay player who finally broke down the locker room barrier.He might not be. But you have to think there's a team willing to take a chance on a player who has already taken a big chance himself.
CHICAGO — Chicago Bulls star Derrick Rose says he's still recovering from knee surgery and vows to show sitting out last season was the right decision.In an interview posted Wednesday on the team's website, Rose said he had to be selfish in his rehab as he tried to work his way back from a torn anterior cruciate ligament in his left knee even though sitting out was "one of the hardest things I've had to go through in my life.""I'm not a selfish guy at all, but having this injury and going through what I had to go through and being smart, it's something that I had to be selfish with," he said. "I couldn't worry about anyone else but myself and my health."He thinks fans who questioned him will realize sitting out was the right call once they see him playing again."I think me going on the court and showing them and letting them know it was the right decision," he said.Rose hasn't played since he crumbled to the court near the end of the 2012 playoff opener against Philadelphia, sending the top-seeded Bulls to a first-round exit. He had surgery on May 12 that year, and his doctor said the recovery would probably take about eight to 12 months — the final stage being playing in games.Rose practiced without restrictions the last few months of the season but never suited up for a game even though he had medical clearance. He and the Bulls never publicly ruled out a return, either.Without him, Chicago clawed its way to 45 wins and knocked out the Brooklyn Nets in the first round of the playoffs before bowing out to the champion Miami Heat. They were particularly banged up during the postseason, with players fighting through injuries and illnesses and Rose serving as a spectator.The Chicago product saw his image taking a hit, with analysts such as Charles Barkley and Steve Kerr, not to mention some fans, questioning why he wasn't playing."When you're in practice, of course it's not like game-like speed, unless it's like training camp," Rose said. "Game-like experience is totally different when you have strategy, this and that, double teams. When I play, I get double-teamed a lot. We play the same defense (in practice) we play in the game, so there wasn't any double-teams. So I was able to roam around freely. And in a game ... I wasn't able to take on that double-team yet."Every day I was working out like my leg is going to feel better," he continued. "I was pushing myself every day, eating right, trying to take care of my body so that I can be out there as soon as possible. But it didn't happen."Rose insisted he had his teammates' support."They saw how hard I was working in practice, just trying to rebuild my leg," he said. "All my teammates that were going through injuries, they used to tell me don't rush back just because they were going through stuff. So just to hear them say that, they knew I was trying to get back on the court as quickly as possible. They made a huge run at it. When they were playing, I told them things that I saw if they didn't see, or I was just working with them, just to show them I really cared about the team, and like I said they fought for me."
It is summer league time in the N.B.A., when teams gather in Las Vegas and in Orlando, Fla., for a handful of games that allows any number of rookies to get a taste of professional basketball and gives undrafted players a chance to show off their skills.The teams are usually supervised by their top assistant. Some head coaches are in attendance, but they are generally in the stands, observing or maybe just gossipingBut when the Nets play their first summer league game Sunday night against the Detroit Pistons in Orlando, Jason Kidd will be on the sideline, getting his first experience as a coach.About six weeks removed from his final N.B.A. game as a player with the Knicks, the 40-year-old Kidd will be using the six-day league to start getting comfortable with the next chapter of his life.Despite having 19 seasons as an N.B.A. player, during which Kidd justly earned a reputation as one of the smartest players in the game, as a point guard who could read the court better than almost anyone, he is frank about his lack of experience as a coach and recently addressed it in an interview."I don't know all the answers," Kidd said. "I have a lot to learn, and I'm a sponge right now."But Kidd is Kidd, competitive, confident and brimming with ambitious plans to revamp the Nets on offense and defense, drawing especially on lessons he learned while playing for Dallas Mavericks Coach Rick Carlisle, under whom Kidd won his only N.B.A. championship, in 2011.In particular, Kidd is a believer in the power of sharing in basketball — sharing the ball on offense and sharing the responsibility for stopping opponents on defense.As such, he wants to implement a modern defense that makes use of zone principles employed by the league's top defensive teams."If you look at the good teams on the defensive side of the ball, they all have team concepts of helping one another," Kidd said. "I guess you can say zone in Chicago and Indiana."The Pacers' defensive system provides an especially alluring example for Kidd. Like Pacers center Roy Hibbert, who uses his size to control the inside, the Nets' Brook Lopez is so tall and long that he can swallow up drives without even jumping.If Lopez is joined in the starting lineup by the newly acquired Kevin Garnett and Paul Pierce, and by the two other incumbents, Deron Williams and Joe Johnson, the Nets would have a very sizable starting five, perfectly suited for clogging passing and driving lanes."The principle of helping one another has become really big with the rules now, and that's kind of what we did in Dallas," Kidd said.In overhauling the Nets' sloppy defense, Kidd could have important allies in Garnett and Pierce. Both are excellent communicators and could help teach and explain the zone principles that made Boston one of the league's toughest defenses to crack for nearly five seasons.In last season's playoffs, the Bulls routinely scored on the Nets in the first round with basic side screen-and-rolls, a play most teams defend easily. A failure to come up with consistent effort and execution on defense was what primarily kept the Nets from being one of the top teams in the N.B.A. last season. Their offense generally had things figured out when Williams and Lopez were both healthy.That doesn't mean that Kidd does not want to make changes to how the Nets play when they have the ball. Last season, they often scored by exploiting their stars' individual abilities, relying on isolation plays to beat weaker opponents. But against more disciplined and athletic defenses, one-on-one play was not enough. Kidd wants to inject more ball movement, and he speaks in reverential tones when discussing how selfless passing opens doors that even the least talented players can stroll through."When the ball is moving, you don't want to be the guy where it sticks, so everyone gets involved, everyone has fun," Kidd said. "I think the beauty of it is it's hard to guard. Because the ball is moving, you don't know who is going to get a shot. You can scout it all you want."Kidd added, "I would love to have a structure where they can just play off each other."At times last season, the Nets seemed so keen to set up mismatches for their best players that the offense bogged down. With proper ball movement and spacing, Kidd said, "mismatches tend to happen.""A lot of times you don't force or seek it out," he said.One of the great fast-break point guards, Kidd said he would emphasize moving the ball up court more quickly and hunting early scoring opportunities. The Nets played at about the slowest pace in the N.B.A. last year, so no one would expect them to start running like the Denver Nuggets.But playing with pace is different from trying to run fast breaks all the time. Often, simply getting into the offense as quickly as possible and starting the ball movement early, even before the entire offense has arrived, creates mismatches that can be exploited toward the end of the shot clock.By virtue of his immense skill and his role as the floor general, Williams will bear responsibility for promoting this more democratic style of play."For Deron, the biggest thing that I will push, or talk to him about on a daily basis, is being encouraging," said Kidd. "Put your guys in position to be successful, and if it doesn't work out, always continue to be positive."Kidd added: "We have to trust each other. When you do make a pass, sometimes a guy might miss a jump shot. You can't be upset, because it's the right play. And the majority of time in this league, if you make the right play, you tend to put yourself in a position to win."Kidd's playing career offers convincing support for this belief. Even as his overall game began to deteriorate as he moved into his late 30s, he retained an ability to make other players better.So it was not surprising to hear him enthusiastically promote team basketball. His success may hinge on whether he can effectively get everyone on his team to buy in, on offense and defense.
WALTHAM, Mass. — Brad Stevens says he had no desire to leave Butler — until the Celtics called.Seventeen championships. Bill Russell. Red Auerbach. It was all too much for the 36-year-old Stevens to resist.Boston introduced its 17th coach at a news conference on Friday at the team's practice facility, and president of basketball operations Danny Ainge said Stevens was his first choice to replace Doc Rivers. Boston received a first-round draft pick from the Los Angeles Clippers for the rights to Rivers last week, and then Ainge called Stevens."First of all, the Boston Celtics, like, wow - that is an incredible feeling," Stevens said about last week's phone call from Ainge. "It's an incredible honor and it's certainly flattering."Stevens received a six-year deal worth a reported $22 million and became the youngest head coach in the NBA."My first phone call was to Brad Stevens. Brad was my first choice," Ainge said. "I have watched and admired his poise, his intelligence, his teams - their effort, their execution under pressure and I've always looked at him the last few years as a guy who was a great candidate to be a head coach - never really thinking that it was going to be this soon in Celtic history but he's a guy that I have targeted for a long time as a potential great coach."Under a veil of secrecy, and a Celtics' contingent visited Stevens' home Wednesday and finalized the contract, with the coach's wife/agent, Tracy."I'm the only coach in the country that pays 100 percent of his salary to his agent," said Stevens, who left a deal with Butler set to run through 2022 for this "awesome opportunity.""I am absolutely humbled to be sitting in this room and looking around at the (17 championship) banners that hang," he said. "I'm in awe of the Boston Celtics and the Boston Celtics organization and what has been accomplished by the players."Butler made it to the NCAA championship game twice with Stevens leading the way. Becoming a mid-major powerhouse helped Butler land a lucrative spot in the new Big East basketball conference.Stevens said it was hard to leave that behind, but he now looks toward helping the Celtics start a rebuilding process which officially started with Rivers going to the Clippers. The next step comes new week when Paul Pierce and Kevin Garnett are traded to the Brooklyn Nets.What's left isn't really known, and the natural questions are about Rajon Rondo, hardly considered the easiest guy to get along with - and that was with Rivers, a coach with an NBA resume.Stevens said he had already reached out to Rondo by phone and will spend time with him soon."There's no bigger fan of Rajon Rondo than me," Stevens said. "I think the way he plays, his instinct, his ability to make other people better, he sees plays ahead of the play, he is an incredibly, incredibly talented person and everyone I've talked to has just raved about how intellectual he is, about how great he is. I'm looking forward to it.""I think Brad and Rajon will get along great," said Ainge.Ainge said the length of the contract shows the team's commitment to Stevens, who will now try to break the trend of college coaches moving into the NBA and failing (John Calipari and Rick Pitino are two of the most notable)."I think a difference is his humility," Ainge said. "I think as an organization, a six-year contract speaks loud. I don't think there's any other coach in the NBA with a six-year commitment from their team."We understand - we're investing in him as a person. I think a lot of times with the college coaches, I think with those people that you mentioned, Rick Pitino, John Calipari, are fantastic basketball coaches. They didn't fail because they can't coach. Failure was from an organizational standpoint, giving them the support . there were a lot of factors and I think those guys could easily succeed in the NBA."Stevens said: "Certainly I'm aware of those names and I'm aware of everybody that's made the transition. Each situation is different, too. What I would look for in any work environment are people that are all on the same page, that all believe in getting the right people on the bus and believe in supporting each other."I think we really feel strongly about how we've been treated right from the get-go . it was the kind of working environment that I was used to. We felt at home. It was the right decision. It was obviously the right decision."Ainge, who reportedly first interviewed assistant Jay Larranaga (one of two assistants staying on Stevens' staff) noted it was "a leap of faith" for Stevens to leave Butler, where he was 116-49 in six years and led team to the 2010 and '11 national title games."As much as I took a leap of faith, so did they," Stevens said.
DAYTONA BEACH, Fla. — Shaquille O'Neal says the Los Angeles spotlight was too bright for Dwight Howard.Speaking at Daytona International Speedway on Saturday, Shaq hammered his former colleague as if they were battling in the post.O'Neal opened his mouth agape when asked about Howard, who chose to leave the Lakers for the Houston Rockets late Friday, and joked about cheering on Dale Earnhardt Jr. and Danica Patrick in Saturday's race.A few seconds later, he threw an elbow Howard's way."It was expected," Shaq said. "We've all been in L. A., and not a whole lot of people can handle being under the bright lights. Everybody wants to do it, but when you get there, there are certain pressures. I think it was a safe move for him to go to a little town like Houston. That's right, little town. I said it."O'Neal didn't want to spend much time talking about Howard, though, and quickly tried to stay focused on favorite driver Patrick."Danica Patrick is one of my favorites. I hope she wins. She's very feisty. I love the way she competes," O'Neal said.Asked later what specifically he liked about Patrick, O'Neal was quite specific."Honestly? She's hot. Smokin'," O'Neal said. "Hey, Danica, call me. Danica, call me."The big man got to briefly meet the diminutive Patrick at the pre-race driver meeting. He removed his hat from the top of his head, placed it over his heart and told Patrick "I'm a huge fan." He then asked her if she'd pose for a photo, which she eagerly did, passing off her own phone to make sure someone got a shot for her to keep.O'Neal served as one of the grand marshals for the race at Daytona, joining Sandler and fellow comedian Kevin James. The trio was on hand to promote their movie "Grown Ups 2." They sang the command to start engines, a rendition that was widely panned on social media sites.
ORLANDO, Fla. — The greatest point guard in Nets history quietly shifted into the next stage of his career Sunday night, in a 150-by-100-foot gymnasium in the shadow of Interstate 4. There were no screaming fans to witness the event, no cheerleaders or T-shirt cannons, no blaring music and no bellowing public-address announcer.Jason Kidd made his N.B.A. coaching debut without a proper introduction. Also, without a proper N.B.A. team.The game was part of the Orlando Summer League, a 10-team tournament for rookies and developing players. The site was the Magic's practice court, tucked into a tight corner of the towering Amway Center. The games are closed to the public, creating a more intimate atmosphere where about 150 spectators — mostly team executives, scouts and reporters — can hear every shoe squeak and every barked instruction from the bench.Kidd, the Nets' newly installed coach, did his share of barking Sunday in a 76-67 loss to the Detroit Pistons. He instructed, applauded, cajoled and occasionally smiled. He also received a technical foul, for wandering outside the coaching box late in the fourth quarter. Actually, he wandered way outside — beyond midcourt and into the playing area, where the referee Curtis Blair promptly blew his whistle."So it's a lesson learned, that I know I can't go past halfcourt," Kidd said later with a wry grin, drawing laughter. "Hey, I've seen some of these coaches be all the way down on the other end. I can't follow their lead in that aspect. I learned really quickly where the box is."It will surely be the first of many lessons for Kidd, who played in his final N.B.A. game just 50 days earlier. There are schemes to install, philosophies to develop, timeouts to manage. These things take time, even for a basketball genius who could see plays unfold before anyone else on the court."This is summer school for me," Kidd said. "So hopefully, I'm going in the right direction."Kidd retired June 3 after 19 seasons. Nine days later, the Nets stunned the league by naming him their coach, placing him in charge of a talent-rich roster with title aspirations. The talent and the expectations only increased when the Nets made a deal to acquire Paul Pierce and Kevin Garnett in late June.This week, Kidd is coaching relative neophytes for five games. The summer league roster includes Tyshawn Taylor and Toko Shengelia, who just completed their rookie seasons with the Nets; Mason Plumlee, their first-round draft pick; and a cast of hopefuls who will probably end up in the Development League.Kidd is the only N.B.A. coach who is coaching his own team here. But at this stage, he needs all the on-the-job training he can get. For now, he is leaning heavily on his staff — in particular Lawrence Frank, his lead assistant, who was Kidd's coach for four-plus seasons with the Nets during the mid-2000s.Frank sat to Kidd's right. To Kidd's left was John Welch, a former longtime assistant to George Karl who is expected to be named to the staff soon. Both were active and vocal during the game.During timeouts, it was often Frank who drew up plays on the hand-held grease board, while motioning and talking to Kidd, away from the bench. Kidd would then enter the huddle, take a seat and impart the play to his team."I'm going to lean on my staff," Kidd said, "Not just L-Frank, but Welch will get in there with the board a little bit. A lot of guys bring a lot to the table."Kidd noted that summer league timeouts last 60 seconds, a half-minute shorter than in the regular season, increasing the degree of difficulty for a rookie head coach to draw up a play."Once I can get comfortable with that and be able to get everybody's name in the right spot, we'll be fine," he said.The change of job descriptions also demands an adjustment in demeanor. When Plumlee threw down a driving two-handed dunk early in the game, Kidd leapt to his feet to cheer then quickly sat back down, smiling and chuckling a bit. Later, when Plumlee blew a dunk, Kidd simply applauded encouragement. He yelled out defensive signals, but sometimes he was outshouted by the energetic Frank."I think he did a great job," Taylor said. "I think he was real positive with us."In huddles, Taylor said, Kidd's tone was no different from what it would be for a news conference — "Like, mad soft-spoken, just cool."Taylor said the division of labor between Kidd and Frank worked well."You know, Coach Frank is a mastermind when it comes to drawing up plays and things like that, so I think Coach Kidd was talking to us mostly about defense," Taylor said.Down the stretch, the Nets intentionally fouled Andre Drummond, the Pistons' poor-shooting big man. Drummond, who played last year under Frank, said he was not surprised."Look at their coach, Lawrence Frank," Drummond said with a smile. "So he knows."Drummond was joking, but it may indeed take some time before everyone gets used to the idea of Jason Kidd, head coach. That includes Kidd, who was not sure how to respond when asked if it felt normal."Didn't it look normal?" he said with a grin. "O.K., well, we're working on it. I felt great."
The market for aging, modestly skilled centers is not exactly robust in the National Basketball Association. That was true more than two months ago, when Jason Collins was celebrated as the first openly gay male athlete still active in a major American team sport. And it is true now.It was at the end of April that Collins, his season with the Washington Wizards having ended, first disclosed that he was gay, seemingly shattering a barrier in professional sports.Now, a week into the N.B.A.'s summer signing period, he remains without a new team, and it could be weeks or even several months before he knows what his future holds. As he waits, he finds himself in a historic position as the first openly gay free agent seeking another contract. It is a moment being watched closely for its perceived sociological significance, although Collins himself is determined to keep his focus on basketball."I look at it, honestly, like any other free agency in the past several years, where I know I have to stay patient," said the 34-year-old Collins, who played in only 38 games last season, averaging 10 minutes a game as a defensive-minded center for Boston and later Washington. "And I know that at this point in my career, you remain hopeful that there's a job and an opportunity waiting for you once teams start to fill out their rosters."Actually, as free agency went into effect on July 1, Collins found himself engaged in the same obsessive pastime as nearly every other N.B.A. player, coach, executive and fan: wondering what Dwight Howard would do.Howard, a notoriously indecisive star, was weighing offers from five teams in an anxiety-inducing drama that stifled the free-agent market for days and kept lower-tier players like Collins waiting for Howard to make up his mind."Just like the whole country," Collins, chuckling, said in a telephone interview late last week.A short time later, Howard announced his intention to leave the Los Angeles Lakers and sign with the Houston Rockets, jolting the rest of the market to life and sowing the seeds for whatever may eventually come Collins's way.Unlike Howard, Collins is not a superstar. Nor, at this stage of his career, is he even a coveted rotation player. His age works against him. He has not been a full-time starter in six years. His skills, modest even at his peak, are in decline. Indeed, his prospects were uneven before he disclosed his sexuality in a cover story in Sports Illustrated.So neither Collins nor his longtime agent, Arn Tellem, know what to expect this summer.Despite his limitations on the court, Collins is widely respected for his intelligence, loyalty and strong work ethic, which are accompanied by a wicked sense of humor. Those traits make him the sort of prototypical locker-room leader that teams often seek in a 14th or 15th man. Such players practice hard, dispense wisdom to younger teammates and help keep everyone on track. In a pinch, they can contribute on the court.These lower-tier spots on a roster are generally not filled until late July or August, after the superstars, the second-tier stars and the top role players have all found new homes. Collins knows the drill well. Boston did not sign him until July 31 last year. In 2009, it took until Sept. 2 before the Atlanta Hawks gave him a one-year deal.Regardless, Tellem said he was "cautiously optimistic" that Collins would be on a roster by opening night. Tellem has represented both Jason and his twin brother, Jarron, since the two entered the league in 2001, and they all refer to each other as family."Obviously, I feel the pressure to do my very best for him, which I always do," Tellem said. "But even more so now."From Collins's standpoint, the disclosure of his sexuality was an act of personal fulfillment first, but he says he appreciates the broader significance of this moment. When he signs his next contract — assuming there eventually is one — it will be hailed as another step forward for society, a sign that gays can find acceptance even in the macho culture of an N.B.A. locker room. If he goes unsigned, no matter the reasons — and those reasons might never fully be known — it could be interpreted as a setback for gays in general.
SANTA BARBARA, Calif. — Kobe Bryant is working hard to get back on the court and not wasting any time thinking about Dwight Howard.Bryant said Wednesday his surgically repaired Achilles' tendon is "progressing faster than anybody expected," though he won't start shooting again until next month."I could shoot right now, but you just don't trust that the tendon's holding yet," the Lakers' All-Star guard said. "Typically it's four months minimum until the tendon's holding and it's not going to overstretch."Bryant spoke at a brief press conference at the start of his annual youth basketball camp at UC Santa Barbara. He said he will be on the court with the campers and walk through some drills."I'm not going to be able to go out there and do too much without the Lakers having a heart attack," he said.Last week, he joined the Lakers in their meeting with Howard, who eventually chose Houston instead of re-signing in Los Angeles.Bryant said he doesn't know why Howard left."You think once a guy decides to go someplace else I'm going to waste my time trying to figure out why that happened?" Bryant said.Bryant created a stir shortly after Howard's decision when he stopped following the center on Twitter."It's just me. It's just how I am," Bryant said. "I have a hard time following people that, you know, want to beat us. I have a hard time doing that. Not to say we're not friends, I don't respect him. It's just hard for me to do that."Bryant and Steve Nash sat in on a meeting with Howard and Lakers executives three days before the center decided to leave the team. Nash took Howard's rejection harder than he did, Bryant said."Steve's like a quintessential teammate. Steve takes that stuff to heart. I didn't really care," Bryant said.Bryant implied that Howard was not a good fit with the Lakers, who offered a contract worth about $30 million more than Houston."Everybody's cut differently," he said. "He has his way of leading that he feels like will be most effective and work for him. Obviously, the way we've gone about it with this organization, the leaders we've had — myself, Magic (Johnson) and Kareem (Abdul-Jabbar) — we've done it a different way."Of the Lakers' struggles during the past season, Bryant said, "It was a lot of moving pieces going around, a lot of things that happened."He repeated a word Nash had used to characterize it."Nightmare's a pretty good description," Bryant said of a season that ended with a first-round sweep against San Antonio after his late-season injury.The Lakers recently agreed to a deal with veteran center Chris Kaman. Bryant said the team needs "a couple guys with length and the ability to cover ground at the defensive end of the floor."Asked if he might be writing off the 2013-14 season, looking ahead to next year when the free-agent market and the draft will be more favorable to rebuild the team, Bryant responded sarcastically"Fold the tent. White-flag it. We have no shot," he said. "Come on, guys. Jeez."
JACKSON, Miss. — The Oxford police chief says Mississippi guard Marshall Henderson appeared to be in possession of a small amount of marijuana and cocaine during a traffic stop in May.Henderson, a 6-foot-2 senior from Hurst, Texas, was suspended indefinitely by coach Andy Kennedy on Wednesday for "violation of team rules," but no other reason was given.The Wall Street Journal first reported the traffic stop, citing a police report.Chief Joey East confirmed the incident Thursday, saying Henderson was cited for not having proof of insurance. He said no other charges were filed and Henderson was never arrested.An Ole Miss spokesman declined comment. Kennedy did not immediately return a message seeking comment.East said officers told him Henderson was "very cooperative" during the stop and "it's not uncommon" for police to find small amounts of a suspected controlled substance but file no charges because of a cooperative suspect.The Wall Street Journal says police reports show Henderson was pulled over May 4 on suspicion of speeding. An officer smelled marijuana in Henderson's vehicle and Henderson handed the officer a bag with "a small nugget of marijuana." The report also says a search by a police dog found a clear plastic bag that contained "a small amount of what appeared to be cocaine."According to the newspaper, the officer noted in the report that the district attorney wouldn't prosecute such a small amount of cocaine.East said the suspected marijuana and cocaine were not tested and officers did not determine Henderson was under the influence of any drugs or alcohol."If they had suspected that, he would have been arrested," East said.Henderson averaged 20.1 points per game last season, helping the Rebels advance to the NCAA tournament for the first time since 2002.Henderson came to Ole Miss — his fourth college — with a history of discipline problems. He was arrested in 2009 for misdemeanor forgery after buying marijuana with counterfeit money and again in 2011 for misdemeanor possession of marijuana. He served time in jail after the second arrest because he violated his probation.Ole Miss has said the coaches were aware of Henderson's past when he signed with the program.It's not the first time Henderson has made headlines during this offseason.He wrote a message in April for the university's website, thanking Ole Miss fans for their support and vaguely apologizing to "anyone I offended." The flamboyant guard rarely hesitated to needle opposing fans during one of his frequent scoring sprees.He was also reprimanded by the NCAA in June for making an "inappropriate gesture" following the Rebels' loss to LaSalle in the third round of the NCAA tournament.Now comes his most recent suspension, which puts his future with the program in doubt."Since the season ended, we have talked a lot about Marshall taking a greater leadership role with our team," Kennedy said in Wednesday's statement. "With that comes greater responsibility, and he must do a better job of living up to the high standard we expect from him and he desires from himself."
EL SEGUNDO, Calif. — It's Peace out for the Los Angeles Lakers.They waived Metta World Peace on Thursday under the NBA's amnesty provision, which will save the team about $15 million in luxury tax. He was set to earn $7.7 million next season, which the Lakers still must pay.He averaged 12.4 points and 5.0 rebounds in 75 games last season, having joined the Lakers in 2009. The 33-year-old tore knee cartilage in March and clearly wasn't the same player afterward. He didn't play in the last game of San Antonio's four-game sweep of the Lakers in the first round.The former Ron Artest legally changed his name during his tenure with the team. One of the highlights of his time with the Lakers was his clutch play in Game 7 of the 2010 NBA Finals, which helped them beat Boston for the franchise's 16th championship."It's tough to say goodbye to a player such as Metta, who has been a significant part of our team the past four seasons," Lakers general manager Mitch Kupchak said. "For anyone who's had the opportunity to get to know him, it's impossible not to love him."Kobe Bryant wanted to keep him, tweeting earlier this week that he'd hold onto World Peace and try to make a run with the team the Lakers had.A 14-year veteran, World Peace has also played for Houston, Sacramento, Indiana and Chicago during his career.He won the league's citizenship award in 2011 for his off-court contributions.World Peace tweeted thanks that Kupchak had called him first.In a follow-up tweet, World Peace, well-known for kidding his followers on the social media site, wrote, "I'm going to play for Yao Mings team in china! I can't wait to arrive in Shanghai !!"Former All-Star center Yao played for the Sharks before coming to the U.S. to play in the NBA and he and World Peace were teammates in Houston.In another move, the Lakers signed free agent Nick Young, who starred at Southern California during his college career. The 6-foot-7 guard-forward averaged 10.6 points, 2.2 rebounds and 1.4 assists in 59 games for Philadelphia last season.Young previously played in Los Angeles for the Clippers, and was with Washington during his six-year NBA career.
LAS VEGAS — The Knicks owe Amar'e Stoudemire $21.7 million next season. The cost per minute might be extraordinary.Coach Mike Woodson said Wednesday that Stoudemire, who missed 53 games last season because of knee injuries, would start the season with a restriction on his playing time.Enter Andrea Bargnani, a 7-foot power forward whose struggles with the Toronto Raptors in recent years made him expendable. The Knicks sent Steve Novak, Marcus Camby and Quentin Richardson to the Raptors. Toronto also received the Knicks' first-round pick in 2016 and second-round picks in 2014 and 2017.Bargnani might be the Knicks' highest-profile addition this off-season."The fact that he was available was good enough for me," Woodson said before practice with the team's summer-league team.The N.B.A.'s annual moratorium on signings and trades was lifted Wednesday, so teams were finally permitted to publicly discuss moves they arranged in recent weeks.Although Bargnani made 30 percent of his 3-pointers the last two years and averaged 12.7 points last season, Woodson stressed that he was still talented enough to be an offensive threat, providing support and creating space for Carmelo Anthony."He fits everything I'm about, I think, in terms of our style of play," Woodson said.Woodson acknowledged Bargnani's struggles the last two seasons, which compelled the Raptors to unload him. But Woodson said elbow injuries were the main cause of that slip in production. Bargnani said during a phone conversation that he was healthy, Woodson said."Players go through ups and down in this league," Woodson said. "It's a part of playing professional sports. This is a new slate. I think Bargnani has an opportunity to get back on his game with us. I'm going to try to put him in the best position I can to see that that happens."Even though Woodson did not say how he planned to use Bargnani, it is clear the Knicks are hoping he can be a reliable contributor off the bench, especially if Stoudemire continues to struggle with injuries.The Knicks are also hoping that Bargnani will be motivated to return to his earlier form — when he averaged 21.4 points and 5.2 rebounds in the 2010-11 season — by playing in a new place."Seven-foot versatile players with good midrange offensive game and an ability to stretch the other team's defense are hard to come by in this league," General Manager Glen Grunwald said of Bargnani in a statement.Woodson also talked about the rest of the Atlantic Division, where the balance of power seems to have shifted, especially after the Nets acquired Kevin Garnett and Paul Pierce.Woodson said that move would make the Nets a contender in the Eastern Conference. He also thinks coaching against Jason Kidd will be fun."Jason is special; I hated to see him leave," Woodson said of Kidd's decision to retire before becoming the Nets' coach.Woodson would not say whether the Nets were better than the Knicks or if the Knicks should still be favored to win the division."I like the moves that they've made because I think Paul and Kevin are two big pieces that can still play," he said. "But again, I like our team and the fact that we got Bargnani. We still have to play the games."Pablo Prigioni, 36, the backup point guard last season, re-signed on Wednesday. Prigioni, an Argentine, agreed to the two-year deal last week. ... J. R. Smith, who agreed to a four-year, $24.5 million contract with the Knicks, is expected to sign his contract in the next day or two. ... Mike Woodson said Carmelo Anthony would not need surgery on his left shoulder. The team announced that Anthony partly tore his labrum against the Indiana Pacers on April 14.
ORLANDO, Fla. — The transaction is simple on the surface, familiar and mathematically sound. An N.B.A. team creates salary-cap room. An N.B.A. star signs a rich deal using that room. The Houston Rockets sign Dwight Howard and become instant contenders.That sequence unfolded last week, in a logical and linear fashion. There was, in fact, nothing simple about it.When the Rockets persuaded Howard to dump Kobe Bryant, spurn the Lakers and trade Hollywood for Houston, it was the culmination of a two-year campaign based on hope and hunches. It was the success of a strategy no one had tried. It may be the new template for rebuilding in the modern age.For 24 months, Rockets General Manager Daryl Morey did nothing but shuffle bodies — acquiring talent, trading that talent, then packaging the new talent with draft picks to acquire newer, better talent, until those assets could be cashed in for a franchise star — like a kid at the carnival trading up for the grand prize.Last October, the Rockets converted some of those assets into James Harden, an electrifying young shooting guard. Last week, they landed Howard, using Harden as the main draw.Two years ago, the Rockets were a 43-win team loaded with role players. Next fall, they will be one of the top contenders in the West, anchored by two of the top 15 players in the league."I think obviously it requires preparation and good fortune," Morey said, speaking generally about the Rockets' approach. "I think we've had a little of both."It also requires a bold, creative vision, and the conviction to carry it out — qualities that are not found in every front office.Until now, there have been three conventional paths to land a superstar: the draft lottery, trades and free agency. But the draft is fickle, and high picks require a lot of losing. Trades for superstars are rare and tough to execute. The free-agent route requires cap room, and when the stars don't come, that room is often filled by flotsam (see Bobcats, Charlotte).Morey's impulse in 2011 was to strip down Houston's roster and gamble on the lottery — the "bottoming-out" approach. According to the statistics-minded Morey, that route has the highest probability of success.There was just one problem: no one in the Rockets brain trust had the stomach for losing, least of all the owner Les Alexander."There's this other way we can try it," Morey told Alexander then, "but no one's ever done it."Thus began the roster churning and the asset hoarding and a truly revolutionary rebuilding process.In March 2012, Morey sent Jordan Hill, a former Knicks lottery pick, to the Lakers for Derek Fisher and a 2014 first-round pick. He sent two other young players, Jonny Flynn and Hasheem Thabeet, to Portland for Marcus Camby.Two months later, Morey swapped the promising Chase Budinger for Minnesota's first-round pick, which he used to take Terrence Jones. He sent Samuel Dalembert to Milwaukee in a deal that allowed him to swap picks with the Bucks and select Jeremy Lamb.That was just a warm-up.Last July, Morey sent his starting point guard, Kyle Lowry, to Toronto in exchange for the Raptors' 2013 first-round pick — with conditions that practically guaranteed it would be in the lottery. He flipped Camby to the Knicks for three players and two second-round picks. He picked up three more players and a second-round pick in a deal with Boston."A mad scientist," a rival team executive said of Morey last July.The payoff came in October, when the budget-minded Thunder deemed Harden too expensive. They sent him to Houston in exchange for Lamb, Kevin Martin and two first-round picks — including the lottery pick from the Lowry trade.Every team in the league theoretically had a shot at Harden. The Rockets had the best assets to make the deal."It required a lot of pain and too much turnover, more than anyone would want," Morey said. "It wasn't safe to buy a jersey for awhile."There was also no guarantee it would work. In recent years, Morey had chased Carmelo Anthony, Pau Gasol, Chris Paul, Chris Bosh and Howard, failing in every pursuit. But he kept churning.
LAS VEGAS — The most intriguing player on the Knicks ' summer league team is not Tim Hardaway Jr., the team's first-round pick, or Jeremy Tyler, who is trying to prove he belongs in the N.B.A. after a couple of stops around the league. He is Iman Shumpert, who has a guaranteed contract and a guaranteed spot in Coach Mike Woodson's rotation next season.Seldom do players like Shumpert, a starter entering his third year, spend part of the off-season playing in the summer league, where rookies become accustomed to the league and where teams try to find players to fill out the ends of their benches."I thought it would be good to come out and play," Shumpert said. "I'm just looking to get better. You can't get mad at somebody for coming to play basketball."Shumpert's introduction into the summer league was similar to that of most of the barely known, undrafted players who have dreams of playing in the N.B.A.: the public-address announcer mispronounced his first and last names before Friday's game against the New Orleans Pelicans.But Shumpert's mission is different from most others'. He is focusing on becoming a more polished offensive player who can be as good a playmaker as a dynamic scorer.Shumpert played point guard for a majority of the Knicks' 77-72 loss to the Pelicans. At times he showed an ability to control tempo and find open teammates. On one play, Shumpert hooked up with Hardaway Jr. for an alley-oop dunk. On another, he made a nice transition pass that led to a layup by Tyler. He did not focus on scoring, finishing with 2 points and adding 4 assists. He also made a few errant passes that resulted in four turnovers.Before the game, Woodson said he wanted to give Shumpert more responsibility next season, and the first step to gaining that trust is to be a leader of the summer league team."I think it's good for young guys to play in these games," Woodson said. "He needs reps. He needs to play a little bit more. It's good. He's going to work. I want to see him mature a bit more. Offensively, he's got to add more to his game — and more to our team."General Manager Glen Grunwald said Thursday that he would like to add a point guard behind Raymond Felton and Pablo Prigioni. But if the Knicks do not sign one, Grunwald said, Shumpert could spend time running the offense if he does well here.Last season, Shumpert averaged 6.8 points and 3 rebounds in 45 games. He performed best in the postseason, averaging 9.3 points and 6 rebounds and showing his ability to be a consistent 3-point shooter and one of the league's best perimeter defenders. In the Game 6 elimination loss to the Indiana Pacers, he hit 5 of 6 3-pointers. He said his confidence grew as his teammates showed more trust in him.Shumpert is the rare player who in his first two years did not participate in the summer league. The lockout two years ago canceled the league, and Shumpert spent last summer rehabilitating his left knee after tearing the anterior cruciate ligament and the lateral meniscus in the playoffs against the Miami Heat.Shumpert said he knew that some fans were worried about the risk he could be injured again — in games that did not count."I could get hurt working out by myself in the gym," he said. "I'm not thinking about me getting hurt. I feel like the worst has already happened when I tore my A.C.L. in a freak accident."Shumpert said he was too excited not to play, not to find new ways to become a high-level player. He is set to go through his first full training camp in October."I'm here with a smile," Shumpert said. "I'm not here with the angry eyes. I'm here with a smile. I'm just happy to be healthy and working on my game this summer."
Billy King and Danny Ainge, the respective top executives for the Nets and the Boston Celtics, had agreed last month to the general parameters of a trade that would send Paul Pierce to Brooklyn. Then came the query from King: What about a larger deal? What about Kevin Garnett?It would be complicated. Garnett had a rare no-trade clause and was fiercely loyal to Boston. It would take some selling. It would take more assets to make the deal work."Danny said, 'I don't know,' " King recalled Friday, "and we just kept talking."When they finally stopped talking, King and Ainge had constructed a landscape-altering deal that would spark championship visions in Brooklyn and end an era in Boston. The Nets would acquire Pierce, Garnett and Jason Terry in exchange for a package of role players and three future first-round draft picks.The deal, consummated in principle two weeks ago, became official Friday, allowing King to discuss it for the first time. The Nets also signed Andrei Kirilenko on Friday, completing a stunning summer makeover. Kirilenko and the three former Celtics will be introduced Thursday at a news conference at Barclays Center."Today, the basketball gods smiled on the Nets," the team's owner, Mikhail D. Prokhorov, said in a statement. "With the arrival of Kevin Garnett and Paul Pierce, we have achieved a great balance on our roster between veteran stars and young talents. This team will be dazzling to watch, and tough to compete against."It will also be expensive. The addition of Kirilenko pushed the Nets' payroll to $101 million and their projected luxury-tax bill to $82 million, an N.B.A. record, though a manageable sum for Prokhorov, one of the world's richest men."I think our fans should thank Michael Prokhorov for everything he's done to help us get here," King said.The Nets entered the off-season with seemingly little flexibility, because they were already far over the salary cap and had few tradable assets. But Boston was the perfect partner, a former title contender ready for a demolition and in need of cap relief and draft picks."Honestly, did I think we could pull something like this off? No," King said. "From the beginning, no. But Danny and I just kept working at it and got to the point where we both were comfortable."Garnett agreed to waive his no-trade clause after heavy lobbying from the Nets, including phone calls from Deron Williams, the star point guard, and Jason Kidd, the new head coach and a respected peer."It was a tough decision for him, because he is very loyal," King said, adding, "I just felt that if we did things the right way and were first class, he would be willing to join us."The new Nets will be much deeper and much tougher than the team that won 49 games and got bounced in the first round of the playoffs last season. Even at 37, Garnett is one of the savviest frontcourt defenders in the league. Pierce, 35, remains a feared 3-point shooter. Neither one can carry a team any longer, but both should fit well with a lineup that is already stocked with scorers.The Nets gave up nearly every available asset they had, including first-round picks in 2014, 2016 and 2018, in addition to the right to swap picks in 2017. King admitted: "We had a lot of pause. We had a lot of hesitation."The Kirilenko deal was no less stunning. He was one of the top free agents on the market this summer and had been seeking a deal for $10 million a year. The Nets had only a $3.18 million cap exception to use, and they had intended to use the bulk of it to sign Bojan Bogdanovic.But the Bogdanovic deal fell apart. And most of the teams capable of giving Kirilenko a big contract elected to spend their money elsewhere. By Thursday, the Nets and Kirilenko needed each other. The contract is for one year, with a second-year player option, so Kirilenko could conceivably recover some of the money next summer.Looking back over the whirlwind of the last few weeks, King said it had been an up-and-down ride. But, he added, "I'd say ending today is a great day for the organization."
HOUSTON — Dwight Howard has a new team and catchy new nickname."He's not Superman anymore. He's Rocket Man now," longtime Rockets broadcaster Bill Worrell said Saturday as he introduced the team's major free agent acquisition.As Howard took the stage and greeted several Houston officials including owner Leslie Alexander and coach Kevin McHale, a couple of his new teammates playfully repeated his new moniker — 'Rocket Man, Rocket Man' — and were met with a huge, toothy smile from Howard."It means a lot to me just to have a fresh start and have an opportunity to write my own story," Howard said. "I don't think people understood the fact that I got traded to L.A., and now I had a chance to really choose my own destiny, and this is the place where I chose and I'm happy about it."The Rockets gave him a four-year deal worth about $88 million, a year less and far below the $118 million the Lakers could have offered.The center was formally introduced in Houston on Saturday after spurning the Lakers to sign with the Rockets. He was greeted by some of the brightest stars in team history.Hall of Fame center Hakeem Olajuwon and Yao Ming were among those on hand to celebrate Howard's signing. Also joining the party were Ralph Sampson, Clyde Drexler and Elvin Hayes.He will be the latest in a storied line of centers to play for the Rockets. He has long worked with Olajuwon to improve his game, and "The Dream" was among the contingent that flew to Los Angeles to woo him into joining the Rockets.Olajuwon didn't shy away from raving about his student."He is the missing piece where he can really bring the team to a championship contender," he said.Howard joins a team starring James Harden that reached the playoffs for the first time since 2009 and battled back from a 3-0 deficit before being eliminated by the Oklahoma City Thunder in Game 6.General manager Daryl Morey, who led the effort to land Howard, is excited about upgrading his team and knows this puts the Rockets among the preseason favorites to contend for a championship."I think it absolutely gives us a chance," he said. "What you do this job for is to have a chance. The reality is five to seven teams have a chance any given year. The way it is in this league, you've got to have multiple All-Stars, you generally have to have dominant top players and we have two guys that we think are in the top 10 in the league in James and Dwight."Howard was traded from Orlando to the Lakers in a four-team trade that also included Philadelphia and Denver last year. He recovered from back surgery last season and averaged 17.1 points and 12.4 reboundsHis one season in Los Angeles was filled with unrest, including an admission that there were times that he wasn't having fun and what many believed to be a less than positive relationship with Kobe BryantThe Rockets believe that will change in Houston."If you can be a great player and can't be happy, what difference does it make? He'll be very happy here," Alexander said. "Dwight recognizes that his boyhood dreams will come true as a Rocket."Yao made a call to Howard to help recruit the 27-year-old player to Houston. As the most recent star center to play for the Rockets, Yao is eager to see Howard take the team to "the next level.""I feel so happy that he chose the Rockets and I feel the Rockets will be the best fitting team for him because we have such a great, rich history of big men," Yao said.Howard is perfectly happy dealing with lofty expectations from outsiders because he believes he should control the game every time he sets foot on the court."That's what I've always expected out of myself," he said. "Before I got injured, that's what I did every night — I dominated the game on both ends of the floor. It's not about putting up big numbers, none of that; the biggest thing is just going out there and having fun and dominating and that's what I'm going to do."Of all the people the Rockets enlisted to help lure Howard to Houston, the star admitted that his new teammate Chandler Parsons made the biggest impact."Chandler is probably the guy you should really thank," Howard said. "He's been blowing my phone up every day. He's been great."Howard couldn't pinpoint one thing Parsons said that helped sway his decision, but noted that they had numerous conversations about Houston's great team chemistry and the feeling of family.Parsons, a second-round pick in 2011 who has developed into a solid starter, said he tried to sell Howard on the idea of winning."I just told him: 'We're going to be really good without you, we're going to win games without you. Come make us great,'" he said.The Rockets also got a push in a rather random way.Howard was in Aspen, Colo., while mulling his options and prayed for a sign of what he should do."I believe in signs ... and when I was in Aspen it seemed like everybody I met was from Houston," he said. "I just had a good feeling in my soul about everything, the direction of the team, and just had a great feeling about what they were trying to accomplish."Though his nickname got switched on Saturday, the Rockets unveiled a Superman-inspired marketing campaign this week that features a man's torso with hands ripping back a suit to reveal a red shirt that says 'Rockets,' above their slogan 'A New Age.'That picture along with several other shots flashed on a video screen above the stage during Saturday's introduction.After he was done speaking with reporters, Howard and the other Rockets' stars made their way outside where the street in front of the Toyota Center was blocked off for a rally to allow fans to welcome him to Houston.
Metta World Peace hit the open market on Sunday, freeing him to consider possible job offers in New York, Los Angeles and perhaps Shanghai. His destination should become clear within a few days.World Peace, who was waived Friday by the Los Angeles Lakers, became a free agent at 5 p.m. Sunday after no team put in a claim for him. The Knicks and the Los Angeles Clippers had interest, but no formal offers had been made as of Sunday evening.Publicly, World Peace has continued to flirt with the idea of playing in China — for the Shanghai team owned by his former Houston Rockets teammate Yao Ming — a possibility that is not as far-fetched as it sounds, but one that he is more likely to pursue after his N.B.A. career.So the decision will probably come down to the Knicks and the Clippers, assuming that each makes an offer. That is not a certainty. Knicks officials are considering a number of options to fill out their roster, and they were still deliberating how aggressively to pursue World Peace. Other teams could enter the picture.An eccentric personality but still a hard-nosed defender, the 33-year-old World Peace, formerly known as Ron Artest, would fit well on a Knicks team that is desperate for frontcourt help. With his local roots — he was born in Queens and played at St. John's — he would probably be an extremely popular addition.Earlier in his career, Artest spoke often about wanting to play for his hometown team, although he was less enthusiastic when Los Angeles reporters raised the possibility Friday.The Clippers also hold appeal; they are one of the top contenders in the Western Conference and have one of the N.B.A.'s most respected coaches, Doc Rivers. World Peace has lived in Los Angeles since joining the Lakers four years ago.In a text message sent to The Los Angeles Times, World Peace said: "Of course I'm interested in Clippers. I have to meet them first."He is also likely to meet with Knicks officials this week in Las Vegas, where the N.B.A. is holding its summer league.World Peace continued to tease fans via Twitter on Sunday. In the morning, he wrote, "#Mettacomehome," seemingly alluding to New York. Hours later, he wrote: "Great talks with Yao. What a great guy. #Shanghai."
Ron Artest is coming home, with a more whimsical name and a more expansive biography, dotted with asterisks and footnotes and curious detours, some glorious and some less so. He returns as an N.B.A. champion and a mental-health advocate, a reformed villain-turned-Mr. Congeniality, but mostly as a proud New Yorker eager to hang a banner at Madison Square Garden.Fourteen years after bypassing him in the draft — a decision etched in franchise infamy — the Knicks finally signed Artest on Monday. He is 33 and goes by the name Metta World Peace. He is a bit slower, but no less tenacious. He is downright giddy about the possibilities."I'm getting more excited to play with the players," World Peace said by telephone Monday night. "I'm more excited to play with the players than I am to be in New York City, you know? I'm more excited to play with the team. That's what make me excited."That was four uses of "excited" in 12 seconds, as if to erase any lingering ambiguity.The Knicks signed World Peace to a two-year deal worth up to $3.25 million, the second year a player option, according to a person with knowledge of the contract. He became available when the Los Angeles Lakers waived him under the N.B.A.'s "amnesty" option, removing his $7.7 million salary from the books while still paying him.World Peace joins a Knicks team that won 54 games last season but wilted against the bigger, tougher Indiana Pacers in the playoffs. Bulking up the frontcourt was a top off-season priority.A muscular 6 feet 6 inches and 244 pounds, World Peace can play either forward position. He should add defensive grit and locker-room levity to a team that was short on both. Despite his tough-guy reputation — and his role in instigating the player-fan brawl at the Palace of Auburn Hills in 2004 — World Peace is famously warmhearted and playful off the court, and popular with teammates, coaches and fans.He spent the last several days musing on Twitter about playing in China, or in the Arena Football League, or just about anywhere."I'm so happy to be Metta this morning," he tweeted on Monday, "because at 4 a.m. I turned into the Geico lizard. I was so scared I would be in NY as a Lizard!!"As his agent Doug Davis — a Knicks season ticket holder — said later, "This is a team that could use a smile."Four teams, including the Los Angeles Clippers, pursued World Peace after he cleared waivers on Sunday. But the Knicks were in the lead from the start, and they clinched his commitment Monday morning in Las Vegas, the site of the N.B.A.'s summer league, where Coach Mike Woodson, General Manager Glen Grunwald and the assistant general manager Allan Houston made their pitch.Woodson laid out his vision for World Peace in detail, highlighting his championship experience and his leadership role, as well as describing how he would fit in with the current roster. The meeting went so well that World Peace and his agents stopped the recruiting process immediately afterward."He was sold," said the agent Marc Cornstein. "It was the appeal of everything — hopefully bringing a title to New York for the first time since 1972-73, about coming home, about playing with this group of players."In the phone interview, World Peace mentioned the allure of reuniting with Tyson Chandler, his former teammate with the Chicago Bulls and another defense-first player. He was bursting with praise for Iman Shumpert, the Knicks' young swingman, a defensive demon who is rapidly evolving into a true two-way player."He's one of my favorite players," World Peace said, adding that he has been texting encouragement to Shumpert all season. "I can't wait to be on the floor and watch him every night. I think he has a chance to be whatever he wants to be."With World Peace, Chandler and Shumpert, the Knicks could have the core of a solid defensive unit, although it is unclear how Woodson plans to play World Peace — as a starting power forward next to Carmelo Anthony or as Anthony's primary backup.
ANN ARBOR, Mich. — Fresh off the first Final Four appearance of his career, Michigan coach John Beilein has a new contract.Athletic director Dave Brandon told The Associated Press on Wednesday that Beilein has signed a three-year extension that replaces his previous contract and keeps him with the Wolverines through the 2018-19 season. The 60-year-old Beilein will make $2.45 million a year in total compensation."I am very excited to have this opportunity to coach at the University of Michigan for at least five more years," Beilein said in a statement. "My staff and I will continue to work every day with our student-athletes to ensure they grow from this incredible educational opportunity."The Wolverines lost in the NCAA title game last season to Louisville. Beilein's previous contract extension kept him under contract through 2015-16.Michigan hired Beilein in March 2007, a week after he led West Virginia to the NIT championship. Last season was the Wolverines' first national championship game appearance in two decades."John is a tremendous ambassador of the University of Michigan and one of the most highly respected coaches in the country," Brandon said in a statement. "He recruits outstanding young men to represent the men's basketball program and develops them as players, students and future leaders. John has built a program that will compete for Big Ten Championships on a regular basis and make exciting NCAA tournament runs."Everywhere Beilein has been, from little schools to one of the biggest, he has won.The native of Burt, N.Y., has a career record of 673-403. His first job was at Erie (N.Y.) Community College in 1978, and he went on to coach at Nazareth, LeMoyne, Canisius, Richmond and West Virginia.With his first contract at Michigan, Beilein became the school's highest-paid basketball coach ever with a six-year deal that was worth $1.3 million a season plus bonuses.Former athletic director Bill Martin, who hired Beilein to replace Tommy Amaker, said back then that negotiations with Beilein took 10 seconds in part because Beilein said his $2.5 million buyout at West Virginia was his responsibility.Beilein has taken Michigan to the NCAA tournament four times, and in 2012, the team shared its first Big Ten title since 1986. Guards Trey Burke and Tim Hardaway Jr. were both taken in the first round of this year's NBA draft.
Jason Kidd pleaded guilty to a drunken-driving charge on Tuesday, exposing him to a likely suspension from the N.B.A. that could postpone his coaching debut with the Nets this fall.Although the league has not commented on Kidd's case, a two-game suspension will probably be handed down based on league precedent. In 2007, Sacramento Kings Coach Eric Musselman was barred for two games after pleading no contest to driving under the influence. Jerry Buss, the Los Angeles Lakers' owner, was also suspended for two games — and barred from attending his team's games — after being found guilty of a misdemeanor drunken-driving charge in 2007.As a member of the Miami Heat, Dorell Wright was suspended two games in 2010 for a similar offense, as was Jason Richardson in 2009 when he was with the Detroit Pistons. There are other examples as well.The N.B.A. handles suspensions on a case-by-case basis, and without any specified timeline. Nevertheless, there is a good chance that Kidd will have to serve his suspension at the start of the 2013-14 season. The league has not released the schedule for next season.Kidd's lawyer, Edward Burke Jr., said in a telephone interview that Kidd participated in negotiating a plea deal that is designed to have him take part in a number of community-service events before he returns to court Sept. 30.If Kidd fulfills his part of the agreement, Burke hopes to have his  charges reduced to a noncriminal traffic violation. But he would probably still face an N.B.A. suspension.A year ago, Kidd, 40, crashed his sport utility vehicle into a telephone pole in the Hamptons around 2 a.m. after attending a charity event. Kidd declined a breathalyzer test but was wobbly, smelled of alcohol and had glassy eyes, according to the Southampton (N.Y.) Town Police.The accident occurred only days after Kidd signed with the Knicks to be one of their guards. As part of his plea deal, Kidd has agreed to speak at high schools on Long Island. He will share his story of what happened in the drunken-driving incident, discuss the dangers of driving impaired and discourage teenagers from text messaging while they drive."He looks forward to these next few months," Burke said of Kidd. "He want to connect with the kids who just got their license. He wants to put a touch on kids who look up to him and, hopefully, they will listen intently."Had Kidd entered into a plea deal months ago, he presumably would have served his N.B.A. suspension as a Knick, not a Net. As it was, he retired in early June, and became the coach of the Nets 10 days later.At Tuesday's plea hearing, Town Court Judge Andrea Schiavoni told Kidd he could have killed himself or someone else because of his actions. Kidd nodded his head, but he declined to speak with reporters outside the courthouse."He's standing up and taking responsibility in the community he just moved into last year," Burke said. "He is a coach now, and his players need to look up to him."
RALEIGH, N.C. — North Carolina athletic officials have ordered a company that makes designer mouth guards to stop using a Tar Heels basketball player to promote its brand.The university has sent a cease-and-desist letter to Iceberg Guards about rising senior guard Leslie McDonald, who until recently had been listed on the company's website as a user of its products. It's the second off-court issue involving a UNC player the school has faced this offseason, following leading scorer P.J. Hairston's June arrest on a misdemeanor drug charge while driving a rental vehicle.That vehicle was linked to a man with a criminal history — who also has a business connection to one of the founders of Iceberg Holdings LLC.NCAA rules generally prohibit athletes from endorsing or promoting a company or product."We sent a cease-and-desist letter to Iceberg regarding Leslie McDonald," said Steve Kirschner, UNC's senior associate athletic director for communications. "They took his name off their site as a customer last week."North Carolina has spent much of the past three years dealing with off-field issues that began with an NCAA investigation of the football program. Now the school is trying to determine whether there are issues with its men's basketball program.Kirschner said the school has no official relationship with Iceberg to provide mouth guards or services to UNC athletes, nor with the two men — Spencer Howard of Durham and Lee Gause of New York — who formed Iceberg Holdings LLC and are listed on incorporation documents filed with the North Carolina secretary of state's office. Howard is an oral surgeon who graduated from UNC's School of Dentistry, while Gause is a dentist who earned his undergraduate degree from UNC.A request by The Associated Press for a copy of the letter under the state's public records law hasn't yet been granted. The school has declined an AP request to interview McDonald, who made at least one post on social media about wearing a Tar Heel-themed Iceberg mouth guard in a game last season.Neither Howard nor Gause have responded to requests for comment over the past week. Howard also started a different business with Haydn Patrick "Fats" Thomas, who is now linked to rental cars driven by Hairston during a traffic stop in May and during his June arrest.David Ridpath, a former compliance officer at Marshall and Weber State, said schools can send a cease-and-desist letter to warn a business that using a college athlete in a promotion can jeopardize the player's eligibility. Now an associate professor of sports administration at Ohio University, Ridpath said those often-inadvertent cases typically amount only to a secondary violation."If the company complies (with the letter), it's usually a nonissue from there on out," Ridpath said.The NCAA sanctioned North Carolina last year for football players receiving improper benefits from people from outside the program. In that case, the NCAA said UNC should've done more to monitor its athletes on social media.On Feb. 21, two days after the Tar Heels won at Georgia Tech, a photographer whose work is featured on the official UNC athletics website tweeted a photo of McDonald wearing a distinctive mouth guard featuring the school logo as well as the argyle pattern that trims the team's uniforms.McDonald tweeted in response that it was "made by Iceberg."Alex Gause, Lee's brother and a UNC graduate who works as a dentist in the same practice, tweeted the photographer and McDonald that the mouth guard "looks great! Custom made via IcebergGuards 4 anyone who's curious." He also linked both his and his brother's Twitter feeds in the post. Lee Gause retweeted his brother's post.The school has declined to say how McDonald acquired the mouth guard. Iceberg's website shows customized mouth guards — including one endorsed by former Tar Heel and current NBA player Danny Green of the San Antonio Spurs — ranging from $150 to as much as $1,500.Last week, UNC athletic director Bubba Cunningham said the school is gathering information on potential improper conduct by student-athletes, though he didn't name any player specifically. His statement came a month after Hairston's arrest at a license checkpoint in Durham for misdemeanor marijuana possession.That was the second time in a month Hairston was stopped by authorities while driving a rented luxury SUV or late-model sports car. In both cases, rental records connected the vehicle to either Thomas' name or his home address in Durham.A review of the Twitter accounts of current and former UNC athletes show numerous friendly messages exchanged with Thomas, including by McDonald.Howard, the Durham oral surgeon listed on incorporation documents for Iceberg Holdings LLC, also formed a business corporation with Thomas called Kairobi Exotic Rentals and Transport Inc., according to filings with the North Carolina Secretary of State's office.Thomas was convicted in 2006 of a felony charge of accessing computers to defraud or obtain property, according to the Durham County clerk of court's office. He's facing pending drug charges as well as a charge of possession of a firearm by a felon from a December arrest, and has a hearing scheduled for next month.UNC coach Roy Williams issued a statement Monday saying Hairston — who returned for his junior season instead of entering the NBA draft — would face "serious consequences" following the arrest, including a potential suspension.Hairston has court hearings scheduled in August for his speeding citation as well as the drug charge.Follow Associated Press writer Michael Biesecker at Twitter.com/mbieseck and AP Basketball Writer Aaron Beard at Twitter.com/aaronbeardap
LAS VEGAS — The playgrounds and the schoolyard courts come alive when the temperature warms up, with children watching the N.B.A. finals and mimicking their favorite players. High school players hit the Amateur Athletic Union circuit, crisscrossing the country for premier tournaments. College recruiting is in full swing.And for years, the N.B.A. simply sat out. The finals would end in June, the draft would take place a week later and then the league would go dark for the rest of the summer."The problem was in the old days, they would build up the draft, then nothing because they'd concede to baseball," said Warren LeGarie, an agent who represents several N.B.A. coaches. "That was a mistake."LeGarie has helped turn the Las Vegas summer league into an event that keeps the league in the headlines well into July. What started as a six-team gathering that was thrown together on the fly in 2004 has blossomed into a 22-team assembly that includes a tournament, owners' meetings and one of the few chances for agents and representatives from all 30 teams to meet in one place to hash out contracts, discuss trades and lay the groundwork for future deals."We want it so that people know that there's great basketball, but there's also a way to break down the walls so that people can reacquaint, develop new acquaintances or in some cases repair old acquaintances," LeGarie said. "There was a lot of face to face. We created something like the winter baseball meetings, where people can come in, converse, do business, and then get down to the business of basketball."LeGarie had been lobbying the league to bring the summer league to Las Vegas for a centralized event. Several satellite leagues had been run in the past in places like Colorado and Boston and on the campus of Loyola Marymount in California. But the fractured nature of the meetings made it difficult for schedules to be coordinated, and the door opened for LeGarie in 2004. Boston hosted the Democratic National Convention, leaving a dearth of hotel rooms for the teams scheduled to participate in the summer league.LeGarie enrolled Boston, Washington, Cleveland, Phoenix, Denver and Orlando for the first Vegas summer league, and it quickly grew to a 16-team field. At the behest of Adam Silver, who will take over for David Stern as the N.B.A. commissioner in February, the league got directly involved in 2007, paying LeGarie, Albert Hall and VSL Properties to put on the event while helping with promotion and organization."The competition is terrific," Silver said. "We feel very much a part of the community in terms of our participation; our owners, G.M.'s and coaches feel very welcome here; and it's created fantastic programming."The summer league games are broadcast on NBA TV, and ESPN has a "SportsCenter" set at Thomas & Mack Center. The games feature high-profile rookies, but most of the scouts and the executives watching from the stands are more interested in evaluating the many players who come to Las Vegas with no contract for the coming season. The teams are searching for the next diamond in the rough, the unknown talent who is coming off an injury or has not been put in the right situation.A player like Gary Neal, the Spurs guard who went undrafted in 2007 and played in Spain, Turkey and Italy for three years before San Antonio invited him to play for its summer league team in 2010. He played well enough to earn a three-year contract. And Jeremy Lin started to make a name for himself with the Dallas Mavericks summer league team in 2010, earning a contract with the Golden State Warriors.There are also mirages in the desert, players like Anthony Randolph, Jonny Flynn and Randy Foye, who starred in the summer league but had trouble gaining traction in the N.B.A. And although most of the rosters are peppered with no-names, journeymen and guys who will never become stars, it feeds the hard-core basketball fans who were left for too long without anything to sink their teeth into once the draft concluded."They never understood the kind of appetite there was from not the normal fan, the rabid fan," LeGarie said. "The guy who lives and breathes with stats, with information and stories and background and all these things that sound quaint, but to these guys it's the lifeblood, their passion."Over the years, the summer league has expanded to two gyms on the Nevada-Las Vegas campus and is holding a tournament that will crown a champion for the first time. "That's making it way more competitive out here," said Shabazz Muhammad, the Minnesota Timberwolves' first-round pick, out of U.C.L.A. "Guys are trying on defense and making each other better for the season, which is a good thing."
NEW YORK — Midway through their first WNBA season, Brittney Griner, Elena Delle Donne and Skylar Diggins are already leaving their mark.And not only on the court. They are helping the league boost viewership, attendance and merchandise sales."I think we've seen that they've had an impact on the game and the league," WNBA President Laurel Richie said.Television household ratings have doubled on ESPN2 as compared with last season. The three rookies were all featured in a Memorial Day doubleheader to start the season, and the game pitting Griner against Delle Donne drew the league's highest regular-season ratings in nine years."A lot of people are tuning in and watching our games and coming to our games," Griner said. "When I go into a sports bar some of the people I wouldn't think would watch women's basketball are there watching. ... There's definitely more awareness."That awareness is carrying over to stores. There's been a huge upswing in sales of merchandise this season, with Chicago, Phoenix and Tulsa leading the way. The Shock are No. 1 in the league in sales at the WNBA online store in no small part due to Diggins despite not being able to buy her signature headbands there.To no surprise, the three rookies are the league's top selling jerseys, with Griner No. 1. The 6-foot-8 Phoenix Mercury star was used to seeing fans wear her No. 42 — in honor of Jackie Robinson — in college at Baylor. But, in keeping with NCAA rules, her name wasn't on them. Now that she's a pro, she looks in the stands and sees young girls wearing jerseys with her name on the back."That's humbling," Griner said. "Just to know I have so many fans out there buying my jersey means a lot. It means I'm doing something right."Despite not being able to play recently because of a sprained left knee, Griner is still making the rounds. She was at the ESPYs, winning for best college player, and appeared on Conan O'Brien's late-night talk show."The Conan show was sweet. I loved that," Griner said. "He was very funny and he's really tall, too."While Griner hasn't been able to help the Mercury much on the court lately, Delle Donne has been instrumental in guiding the Chicago Sky to first place in the Eastern Conference. She scored in double figures in her first 15 games and is trying to lead the Sky to their first playoff appearance since the franchise began in 2006. The Delaware star is averaging 18.6 points and shooting nearly 95 percent from the foul line.She was honored as June's rookie of the month and the Eastern Conference player of the week twice this season."One of my goals has always been to bring as much positive attention to the WNBA and the Chicago Sky as I can," Delle Donne said. "The fact that a lot of people out there are wearing Chicago jerseys makes me very happy!"More important to her, the team is winning. Chicago has just two fewer victories then all of last season, and fans are taking notice. The Sky are averaging nearly 2,000 more fans this season and are on pace for their best season at the gate. Many of those fans, as well as those on the road, are wearing Delle Donne's jersey.Griner and Delle Donne were voted last week to start in the All-Star game Saturday. The 6-foot-5 Delle Donne was the leading vote getter, the first time a rookie has done that."I definitely feel good that the WNBA is in great hands and where the league is headed," said Sheryl Swoopes, one of the original stars of the league. "It does great things for the league to have Skylar, Elena and Brittney. They all bring something different to the game."
MEMPHIS, Tenn. — Mike Miller is going back to a former home, agreeing to a deal with the Memphis Grizzlies.Miller confirmed the deal to The Associated Press on Wednesday, about a week after the Miami Heat designated him as their amnesty player after three seasons with the team. Miller will still collect more than $12 million in salary from the Heat over the next two seasons, but will not count against their salary cap or luxury tax.The Grizzlies have not yet formally announced the deal.Miller spent parts of six seasons with the Grizzlies from 2003 through 2008. He helped the Heat win the past two NBA titles, and has averaged 12.3 points while shooting 41 percent from 3-point range in his 13 NBA seasons.
LAS VEGAS — Kevin Durant shied away from swarming media after Wednesday's Team USA practice in UNLV's Mendenhall Center.There is one thing he won't be able to escape."Kevin Durant is the face of USA basketball going forward," said Jerry Colangelo, managing director for the national team. "He loves to compete, he has a passion for the game, he's won a lot of gold medals, he's just going to win more — we hope."Oklahoma City forward Durant and Minnesota Timberwolves center Kevin Love announced Wednesday they've committed to Team USA for next summer's 2014 World Cup in Spain. Durant said he made the commitment to Krzyzewski late Tuesday night, while Love officially made his announcement during the news conference."It's an opportunity to represent my country ... and I'm looking forward to the opportunity to playing against the best in the world and playing with the best in the world," said Durant, who set a record for most points scored in an Olympic basketball tournament with 156 at London.The two NBA stars made the announcement in an impromptu news conference after Wednesday's practice, alongside Colangelo and head coach Mike Krzyzewski."The fact (Durant has) committed as early as he has is a statement," Colangelo said. "We think there will be a few others that will come along, along with Kevin Love, who is a big part of our program. So we're excited about the early announcement."Colangelo and Love both mentioned Thunder point guard Russell Westbrook and Houston shooting guard James Harden as potential targets for the 2014 team, while Love added Chicago Bulls star point guard Derrick Rose's name to the mix."Hopefully this will have a snowball effect to where other guys will then commit from previous years, guys who have experience with FIBA basketball," Love said.And while Colangelo and Krzyzewski were excited about both players' return — and as the Team USA coaching staff remains in scouting mode — the 28 minicamp participants know this week has been nothing short of a tryout for next summer's squad."This is definitely an audition," Los Angeles Clippers center DeAndre Jordan said. "Everybody is taking it seriously, it's really competitive and it's intense. That's the thing I love about it. You're learning from Hall of Fame coaches, there's everybody here who's everybody. The young talent in the league here is great, and it's going to help us improve for next year."Added New Orleans Pelicans guard Jrue Holiday: "This is a really good opportunity. You want to prove you can play on this team, but at the same time you want to have fun, you want to get better, become a better teammate and better player."The minicamp concludes Thursday night with the USA Basketball Showcase, an intrasquad game at the Thomas and Mack Center. Krzyzewski said after running the players hard over the first two days, he treated Wednesday like the day before a medals-round game so they wouldn't be burnt out Thursday."I think they'll be fresh, excited and it'll be an exciting game," Krzyzewski said. "We're not making any announcement right after this ... so we get a chance to watch these guys during at least half of the NBA season. I'm sure somewhere in January, or somewhere along the line, a pool will be announced."Today was a huge day for Kevin Durant and Kevin Love to announce their commitment going forward. The more we learn about who we might have helps us in making decisions about who we need to add."
UNCASVILLE, Conn. — Elena Delle Donne will miss the WNBA All-Star game on Saturday while recovering from a concussion.The No. 2 pick in the draft was injured in the Chicago Sky's loss to Washington on Wednesday when she was going for a loose ball with a minute left in the third quarter."It's unfortunate that I am unable to be a part of All-Star weekend," Delle Donne said. "I was very excited to join the other players for a memorable experience. It's upsetting not only for me but also for the fans who voted for me. The most important thing for me at this time is to rest and recover for the second half of the season."Delle Donne, who is averaging 18.2 points a game, is the first rookie to lead the All-Star voting and will be replaced on the Eastern Conference roster by Atlanta's Erika de Souza.Top draft pick Brittney Griner won't play but will attend the league's showcase game this weekend at Mohegan Sun Arena. Griner is still recovering from a sprained left knee and was replaced on the roster by veteran Tina Thompson on Thursday.A former star at Delaware, Delle Donne helped guide Chicago to first place in the Eastern Conference, and the Sky are looking to make the playoffs for the first time in franchise history.Had Delle Donne and Griner both played, it would have been the first time in league history that two rookies from the same class started an All-Star game. Sue Bird and Catchings started in 2002. Catchings missed her entire 2001 rookie season because of a knee injury.Griner, Delle Donne and fellow rookie Skylar Diggins have already provided a boost to the league, increasing ratings, attendance and merchandise sales. TV household ratings have doubled on ESPN2 compared to last season, and the game pitting Griner against Delle Donne drew the league's highest regular-season ratings in nine years.
UNCASVILLE, Conn. — Brittney Griner and Elena Delle Donne were poised to make history as the first pair of rookies from the same class to start the WNBA All-Star game.Now, neither will be playing Saturday as both are sidelined with injuries. Griner has been saddled by a sprained left knee, which has forced her to miss the Phoenix Mercury's last five games. Delle Donne suffered a concussion in the Sky's game on Wednesday and didn't even make the trip to Connecticut. She's home in Delaware."Definitely sad that I can't play," Griner said. "There's nothing I can do about that. Day-by-day, that's my motto. I'm not a trainer, so I'd probably be lying anyway. I'm also sad that Elena can't be here."It's a tough blow for the league, which has been marketing the two budding stars along with Skylar Diggins since they were drafted with the top three picks in April.Delle Donne was the leading vote-getter, marking the first time a rookie has led the balloting."It's unfortunate that I am unable to be a part of All-Star weekend," Delle Donne said. "I was very excited to join the other players for a memorable experience. It's upsetting not only for me but also for the fans who voted for me. The most important thing for me at this time is to rest and recover for the second half of the season."It's not just the rookies who aren't playing on Saturday afternoon on ABC.Veterans Sue Bird, Lauren Jackson and Becky Hammon — perennial All-Stars — have been sidelined with a variety of injuries. Bird and Hammon have played in every All-Star game since 2003.FOND FAREWELL — Seattle star Tina Thompson will be playing in her final All-Star game. Thompson previously announced she will retire after the season.The 17-year veteran has played in a record nine All-Star games and was a last-minute injury replacement for Brittney Griner. She joked on Thursday that she would have "appreciated the break," but was happy to be part of the festivities one last time."I'll try not to get sentimental with it, it's definitely an honor to be here," Thompson said. "To have been here since the start and see this league grow is really amazing."The 38-year old Thompson is the league's all-time leader in points, field goals and minutes. She was the first player selected in the inaugural WNBA college draft and was chosen as one of the league's top 15 players all-time during the WNBA's 15th season.Thompson addressed the fans after the West practiced and received a standing ovation from the crowd."It's special that she's here for the final time," West coach Cheryl Reeve said. "She's been a big part of this league's success."Diana Taurasi took it a step further, saying "every WNBA arena should retire her jersey."RETURN OF REF CAM — Official Lamont Simpson became an overnight sensation when he wore the referee cam during a nationally televised game in June.The veteran official will don it again for the All-Star game on Saturday."The emails and texts didn't stop coming until about two weeks after I wore it," Simpson said. "It seems everyone saw it. The players still joke with me about it when I do games now. It really was a great experience and I'm happy to do it again."Simpson wore the innovative device, which looks like a pair of glasses, when the Indiana Fever played the Phoenix Mercury. The cam not only provided a different vantage point, it also caught Candice Dupree bumping into Simpson, which resulted in a one-game suspension."Maybe we should fly in 'Pree' for it," said Taurasi, joking around. "I'm not going near that thing."Taurasi missed Phoenix's last game because she accumulated her seventh technical foul, which resulted in a one-game suspension.MINNESOTA TAKEOVER — For the second consecutive All-Star game, the Lynx are fully represented.West coach Cheryl Reeve has four of her Minnesota players on the roster and her staff on the bench. Maya Moore and Seimone Augustus were elected as starters and Lindsay Whalen and Rebekkah Brunson were chosen as reserves. The same four played in the 2011 All-Star game.Augustus was excited again to play with her teammates."To get to share in that experience with Maya, Whalen and Brunson, just kind of get to enjoy it, it's kind of a Los Lynx family reunion," she said.Reeve will get all four of them on the court together at some point in the game. Brunson was announced as a starter replacing Griner.FIRST TIMERS — Surprisingly, Candace Parker is playing in her first All-Star game.She was selected to the team in 2011, but was unable to play because of a knee injury."It's really cool because I haven't been able to play because of injuries," the Los Angeles Sparks star said. "It will be a great time."If you count Parker, eight players will be making their debuts in the game. Griner and Delle Donne would raise that total to 10 if they were healthy.Another first-timer, Washington's Ivory Latta, is already making the most of her All-Star experience. She hit a half-court shot in practice Friday worth $100.While there was some question whether Latta's foot was behind the line, the answer came when an ESPN producer showed Latta video footage that proved it."See, I told everyone," Latta said. "It just means that I'll have to buy everyone appetizers for dinner."
MOBILE, Ala. — South Alabama's fast track from having no program to being in college football's top division has helped increase revenue, name recognition and perhaps even enrollment in a state where the sport is king.Now the Jaguars are hoping that joining the other four Football Bowl Subdivision teams in football-crazy Alabama will bring them bowl berths and championships. Less than six years after deciding to add football, South Alabama is entering its first season as a full member of the revamped Sun Belt Conference."Football has, in my humble opinion, shed a whole different shade of color and of perception of who we are," Athletic Director Joel Erdmann said. "We have a great university. We always have. We have a great athletic program, and we always have. But the addition of football has just framed it and provided that little extra jolt, that I think if you step back and look at those qualitative things that are hard to put numbers on — school spirit and school pride and how we're perceived by the public and how we're perceived nationally — I think it's been enhanced."In 2007, when trustees approved the creation of a football program that made its debut in 2009, South Alabama's sports program had operating revenue of $9.03 million. In the fiscal year that ended last fall, athletic revenue leapt to $17.7 million with football breaking even, according to documents posted on the United States Department of Education Web site.Higher student fees have paid a portion of the bill.Enrollment has climbed by about 1,000 students to about 15,000 since fall 2007, said the university spokeswoman Jennifer Eckman, who added that football was one "among many other factors."South Alabama's revenue remains small change compared with that of the Southeastern Conference's Auburn and Alabama, which are each several hours away but cast long shadows. Emphasizing the gap, during South Alabama's four seasons of football, Alabama and Auburn combined for all four national titles. The state's top-tier football programs also include Troy, a five-time Sun Belt champion, and Conference USA's Alabama-Birmingham.The Jaguars went 2-11 over all and 1-7 in the Sun Belt last year during a transitional season when they were not eligible for a title or a postseason berth.South Alabama Coach Joey Jones, a Mobile native who played receiver for the Crimson Tide under Bear Bryant, said his team would be significantly better because of that experience."If you look at when we started in 2009 to where we are in 2013, we went from having nothing to being a big-time Division I football program in a great conference," Jones said. "The thing is, we've made great strides to get here to this point, but obviously, we've got to take some more strides to get to where we want to be, and that's the great thing about it."Wide receiver Bryant Lavender is among the fifth-year seniors who have been along for the entire ride. Lavender said the $10 million field house completed in 2008 was just "slabs and posts" during his recruiting visit."I knew coming in in '09 that this year would mean a lot to the program and the university and the community," he said. "It's really big, because we have a lot of opportunities that we didn't have before in the first few years. We can go to a bowl, get the conference championship and possibly get on a national stage that we haven't been on before. The possibilities are endless. The ball's in our court. All we've got to do is win."South Alabama won its first 19 games, mostly against junior colleges, Division II teams and prep schools.The Jaguars' basketball program has been to 8 N.C.A.A. tournaments and the baseball team 25. But Erdmann, the athletic director, knows football tops the pecking order of college sports in the state."It's a piece of our geography and our culture here in the Deep South that people hold onto very dearly," he said. "We're still right on the ground floor of that, but I think we've got a chance to do something very special."He said the excitement leading to this season was similar to that of the Jaguars' debut. The players are certainly noticing."It's exciting stuff," quarterback Ross Metheny said. "The students are excited. We're excited. The faculty is excited. You go to class, and the faculty knows you're a football player, and they're excited and they're talking to you about it. There is a lot of buzz, and we want to live up to that excitement."Jones, who was hired three months after the trustees voted to add football, says the players, coaches and staffers will always be able to savor being part of the program's move from the "slabs and posts" that greeted the early recruits."It's easy to go to Alabama, where you've got tradition and you can win and win immediately and all that," Jones said, "but the bottom line is we can look back and say we were the first to do a lot of things here."
LOS ANGELES — The Forum, the erstwhile home of pro basketball's Los Angeles Lakers and hockey's Los Angeles Kings, will reopen in January following a $100 million renovation, event venue operator The Madison Square Garden Co said on Tuesday.The company, which owns the fabled New York arena, purchased the venue, located in the Los Angeles suburb of Inglewood, a year ago for $23.5 million in a bid to return it to its former prominence and compete with the Staples Center in downtown Los Angeles.During its 1970s and 1980s heyday, the Forum hosted NBA basketball championships and top-billed rock and pop concerts, but its star faded after the Lakers and Kings moved to the new Staples Center in 1999.Madison Square Garden Co - which also owns Radio City Musical Hall in New York, and venues in Boston and Chicago - said the Forum would expand the company's presence to the West Coast."Our acquisition and revitalization of the Forum is a perfect complement to the Madison Square Garden arena," Hank Ratner, MSG president and CEO, said in a statement. "It now allows us to have world-class venues in both New York and Los Angeles, linking the two top entertainment markets in the country."Rock group The Eagles, whose peak years in the 1970s mirrored those of the Forum, will be the refurbished arena's first event, playing three consecutive concerts in January.The venue, which was used for a church's Sunday service, will be renamed The Forum Presented by Chase and primarily focus on music and entertainment. It will seat up to 17,500 people.
INDIANAPOLIS — The NCAA announced changes Thursday to the way it will select teams for the men's basketball tournament, adding flexibility in hopes of keeping teams properly seeded.The selection committee voted last week to change the bracketing principles in hopes of keeping teams where they naturally belong, Chairman Ron Wellman told reporters. In previous years, the committee has had to move a team up or down one or two lines to accommodate rules such as when conference teams can meet in the tourney.Previously, conference teams couldn't meet until the regional final — unless a conference had nine teams in the field.The move comes in the wake of realignment that has seen league numbers swell over the past few seasons and has made the old rules difficult to navigate. The Big East, for instance, had 11 teams make the tournament in 2011 and 2012, and with more league expansion, conflicts seemed more likely to pop up.The changes will not affect which teams get into the tourney. But they will allow conference teams that have played only once during the season — including league tournaments — to meet as early as the third round. Teams that have played twice will not face one another until the regional semifinals and teams that have played three times cannot meet until the regional championship.Most of the conflicts didn't show up until the Sunday of selection weekend, when the bracketing debate is going full bore."It was a real struggle because we feel the seed lines are really important to the competitiveness of the tournament. The committee spends hours scrubbing the seeds," Wellman said. "We compare No. 1 to No. 2, No. 2 to No. 3, so on right through No. 68. At the end of the day, we feel that the seeds are in proper order. ... Then we go to bracketing, and oftentimes we move a team either within the line or we have moved a team two lines a couple of years ago, and a number of teams one line. So there was great discomfort with that."During the call, NCAA spokesman David Worlock noted that in recent years, two teams were dropped two lines — Marquette in 2007 and Brigham Young in 2012. Wellman also said there was a long debate in the selection room last year regarding Oregon, which wound up with a No. 12 seed and played in one of the First Four games at Dayton, Ohio.The concern is that by moving teams from line to line across the field, it impacts the entire 68-team tournament."The debate was considerable as to what we should do and what was best for not only Oregon but the tournament, and of course the teams that were going to be playing Oregon," Wellman said. "When you move a team off of its seed line, you're not only affecting that team, but you are affecting the team that it plays and the teams that it might eventually play. So it has a tremendous impact."To see how the new guidelines would work, NCAA staffers looked at the last three tourneys and found 90 percent of the moves were eliminated.The biggest fans of the change might be coaches, who expressed their concerns this summer in a meeting between Wellman and representatives of the National Association of Basketball Coaches.What else will be different?Top teams from the same conference could find themselves playing in the same region sooner than in the past.Under the old rules, the committee was barred from placing more than two teams from one conference into the same region unless that league had at least nine teams in the field, and the top three teams from a conference had to go into different regions.Now, committee members will get more flexibility. The top four teams from each conference will be separated by region only if they appear among the top 16 overall seeds, the top four in each region.Committee members also voted to try and avoid non-conference rematches during the First Four and the second round, and agreed to relax the rules if two or more teams from the same conference are among the last four at-large bids. Those last four would meet in the First Four.The committee also discussed imposing a deadline for when information would no longer be considered, a move that likely would lead to playing league championship games earlier in the day or week. That was rejected.The overall goal remains the same: Making the NCAA's marquee championship event even better."We do believe that the seed lines are going to be honored to a greater extent, much greater extent, than they have been in the past," Wellman said. "The coaches and other groups have overwhelmingly supported the concept of honoring seed lines as a priority going forward."
LOS ANGELES — Kobe Bryant isn't sure he'll be ready to play when the Los Angeles Lakers open the season on Oct. 29, although he remains ahead of schedule in rehabbing his surgically repaired Achilles' tendon.Bryant turns 35 next week and he vowed that his 17-year career is "definitely not over.""I just want that jewelry," he said, referring to the possibility of claiming his sixth NBA championship."People just don't understand how obsessed I am with winning."Bryant made his comments to late night host Jimmy Kimmel during "Kobe Up Close," a one-on-one conversation with the NBA superstar on Thursday night at Nokia Theatre across from Staples Center.He had a one-word answer when Kimmel asked whether he would finish his career with the only team he's ever played for: "Yeah," Bryant replied.The 7,100-seat venue was full of Bryant's fans that cheered, jeered and interrupted freely during the one-hour program. Ticket proceeds benefited the Kobe and Vanessa Bryant Family Foundation, which works to help end homelessness.In keeping with the reason for the event, Kimmel asked, "If there was only one homeless person in the world, would you be happy if it was Dwight Howard?"The audience roared, mere weeks removed from Howard's decision to leave the Lakers for Houston after one season."Dwight is a great kid," Bryant said, nearly drowned out by boos. "We have different perspectives on what it takes to win."Kimmel kept the questions light while touching on a variety of topics well known to Bryant's most ardent fans.Bryant recalled that before he was drafted in 1996 by Charlotte and then traded to the Lakers, he worked out for Boston and the Clippers."I had a really fun and good workout with the Clippers," he said. "They told me, 'This is the best workout we've ever seen.'"But he said the team told him it wouldn't be drafting him out of high school."We want to turn things around with our organization and we felt like if we drafted a 17-year-old kid, the city of L.A. wouldn't take us seriously," Bryant said the Clippers told him.Kimmel retorted, "They always make the best decisions."Bryant said Chris Paul should have ended up with the Lakers instead of the Clippers. The NBA office, which owned New Orleans at the time, decided against a deal team officials had agreed to with the Lakers."Chris called me and told me it was a done deal," Bryant said. "Then he calls me back 30 minutes later and says, 'You won't believe it. David Stern killed the deal.'"Before Bryant jumped directly from high school to the pros, he said he was recruited by Duke, North Carolina, Kansas and West Point. The military academy sent him his first college letter.If he had gone to college, Bryant said he likely would've chosen North Carolina because Vince Carter had gone to Chapel Hill the previous year, and Bryant would have wanted to compete with him at practice every day.As a teenager with a lucrative NBA contract, Bryant said he wasn't interested in big expenditures."The game consumed me," he said.Bryant recalled his first meeting with Shaquille O'Neal over dinner at a Beverly Hills restaurant."I thought it was the coolest thing in the world that he had a cellphone that was the biggest in the world," he said.Together, they won three consecutive NBA titles from 2000-02. But they eventually fell out and O'Neal was traded after the Lakers lost in the 2004 finals."It was a tough period. He and I just weren't going to play together anymore," Bryant said. "I had to prove I could win without him."It would take a while, though. Bryant and the Lakers didn't capture another NBA title until they won two straight in 2009 and 2010.Bryant credited Michael Jordan for giving him "phenomenal advice" on how to elevate his teammates."My demeanor and my temper probably calmed down a little bit," he said. "I go into games today looking at what are my guys going through, who is struggling, what can I do to help."Among the famous faces in the audience were Lakers owners Jeanie and Jim Buss, general manager Mitch Kupchak, Hall of Fame baseball player Dave Winfield and former NFL receiver Terrell Owens.Jeanie Buss was visibly touched when Bryant spoke about why so many Lakers players loved her late father, Jerry."He knew exactly what his vision was," Bryant said. "He was very patient, he was very understanding. He allowed me room to grow as a person."Bryant said his daughters, ages 10 and 7, are playing sports, although he didn't specify which ones.He described them as "insanely, insanely competitive."
WASHINGTON — Sonny Vaccaro, a former sports marketing executive, said he was well aware of Curtis Malone's checkered past when the two reached a sponsorship deal in 1993.In his role with Adidas, Vaccaro was responsible for making sure that many of the country's top young basketball players were outfitted in his company's gear. As the coach of D.C. Assault, a high-octane Amateur Athletic Union team based in Washington, Malone was suddenly the man to know. Malone had served a prison sentence in 1991 after he pleaded guilty to drug charges, but he assured Vaccaro that those days were over."I got a good vibe from him," Vaccaro said. "He convinced me that he was going to make this thing really big, and I believed him."Malone's team made good on Vaccaro's investment by emerging as one of the country's most successful A.A.U. programs. In the coming years, as D.C. Assault collected titles, it became a magnet for college coaches. Dozens of the team's best players earned scholarships to elite college programs like Illinois, Villanova and Georgetown.At the center of it all was Malone, a power broker in the business of youth basketball.Malone's world came apart last week when he was arrested and charged with drug trafficking after a yearlong investigation by the Drug Enforcement Administration. He was indicted Wednesday by a grand jury in a United States District Court on charges that he had conspired to distribute large amounts of cocaine and heroin with two other men since at least August 2010. Malone, 45, who reportedly went by the aliases White Boy and Daddy, was denied bail.Malone's arrest appeared to come as a shock to those associated with D.C. Assault, many of whom quickly sought to distance themselves from him. In a statement, the team said that Malone had been less involved in D.C. Assault's day-to-day activities in recent years and that he would no longer have a role with the organization. He had been serving as its president.Damon Handon, D.C. Assault's general manager, declined to comment when reached by telephone. "It's a sensitive situation," he said.Two of the program's coaches also declined to comment, referring all questions to Handon. Three other coaches did not return messages.D.C. Assault has become a sprawling venture over the last 20 years, with nine youth basketball teams — including one for players age 11 and younger — that compete in national and regional tournaments. Its notable alumni include the Phoenix Suns' Michael Beasley and the Boston Celtics' Jeff Green and Keith Bogans. Three others are on Duke's roster.Mark Karcher, a former D.C. Assault player who went on to play at Temple, said he had known Malone half his life and described him as a "big brother." When Karcher launched an A.A.U. program in Maryland two years ago, he leaned on Malone for guidance, he said."He was a role model to a lot of kids," Karcher said. "He helped a lot of kids get to college, and he helped a lot of guys get coaching jobs."Fran Fraschilla, a former coach at Manhattan College and St. John's, said he got to know Malone in the mid-1990s when Fraschilla made regular recruiting trips to Washington. Fraschilla said he remembered Malone as a soft-spoken and savvy presence on the A.A.U. circuit. Fraschilla said he was unaware that Malone had a criminal record until his arrest last week. He simply ran a prominent program that produced talented players."In the high school recruiting landscape, you deal with a lot of guys who are street guys, so to speak," Fraschilla said. "It takes on a negative connotation when you're involved with these types of things, obviously. But I had no idea what he was doing. I don't think anyone did."Malone was arrested on Aug. 9 after federal agents searched his home in Upper Marlboro, Md., and reported that they had recovered a kilogram of cocaine, 100 grams of heroin and a handgun. The arrest came after law enforcement officials identified Malone as a drug supplier and wiretapped his phone, according to the court documents.
NEW YORK — Naismith Hall of Famer Don Haskins, who led Texas Western to one of the most memorable NCAA championships, women's basketball pioneer Theresa Grentz and former Iowa and USC coach George Raveling have been selected as the 2013 recipients of the Lapchick Character Award,The winners of the sixth annual awards were announced Monday. The award is named after the Hall of Fame coach and is presented by a group that includes Joe Lapchick biographer and former player Gus Alfieri. It recognizes those who have shown the character traits of Lapchick, who coached at St. John's and with the New York Knicks.The awards will be presented at a luncheon on Nov. 21 with the recipients honored that night during the 2K Sports Classic, benefiting the Wounded Warrior Project at Madison Square Garden.Haskins, known as "The Bear," coached at Texas Western — which became UTEP — for 38 seasons, winning 719 games and leading the Miners to 14 NCAA appearances. None was bigger than the 1966 run that culminated with the 72-65 championship game victory over Kentucky and coach Adolph Rupp. Haskins started five black players that day, a barrier-breaking event recalled in the book and movie "Glory Road."Haskins' last UTEP team finished 16-12 in 1998-99, his 32nd winning season in 38 years. He was inducted into the Naismith Memorial Basketball Hall of Fame in 1997. Haskins played for Hall of Fame coach Henry Iba at Oklahoma State when the school was still Oklahoma A&M and was his assistant coach for the 1972 U.S. Olympic team. Haskins died in 2008 at age 78.Grentz played for Naismith Hall of Fame coach Cathy Rush at Immaculata College, winning three AIAW national championships from 1972-74. She began her 33-year coaching career immediately after graduation, starting at Saint Joseph's in her native Philadelphia. She went on to Rutgers, becoming women's college basketball's first full-time head coach. After 19 seasons at Rutgers, which she led to the AIAW national championship in 1982, Grentz coached 12 seasons at Illinois, finishing with 671 victories.She was selected as the head coach for the U.S. women's Olympic team in 1992, winning the bronze medal at Barcelona. In 2007 she was presented the Eckman Award by the Women's Basketball Coaches Association, an organization she served as president for two years.Raveling was a star player at Villanova before getting into coaching as an assistant to Lefty Driesell at Maryland. He was head coach at Washington State, Iowa and Southern California from 1972-1994, amassing 337 victories and six NCAA tournament appearances.Raveling became Nike's director of international basketball when he retired in 1994. He has written books on basketball and served as an analyst on college broadcasts. In 2013 he received the John W. Bunn Lifetime Achievement Award from the Naismith Memorial Basketball Hall of Fame.Previous winners of the Lapchick Award, which was first presented in 2008, include Naismith Hall of Famers Lou Carnesecca, Dean Smith, Pat Summitt, John Thompson, Bob Hurley Sr., Pete Carril, Jody Conradt, Rush, Morgan Wootten, Pete Newell, C.M. Newton and the late Kay Yow.
ROSEMONT, Ill. — Chicago trailed the Minnesota Lynx by 3 points late in the fourth quarter on Aug. 11. The game clock ticked under 10 seconds. Elena Delle Donne, a 6-foot-5 do-it-all rookie for the Sky, rose and fired a 3-point shot over two pairs of outstretched hands. Swish.After she was mobbed by teammates, Delle Donne sneaked a quick glance toward the stands. She found perhaps her two biggest fans, five rows back, in their usual seats: Ernie, her father, and Gene, her brother. Like the rest of the crowd, they were fist-pumping and exchanging high-fives. "There you go!" Ernie shouted, pointing an outstretched arm at his daughter.After the Sky's overtime win, Delle Donne, who scored a career-high 32 points, had a wide smile in the locker room."It means a lot when I can look up and see them here," she said.Delle Donne, 23, has emerged as one of the top players in the W.N.B.A. She was fourth in the league in scoring entering Sunday, averaging 18.2 points, and she became the first rookie to lead the W.N.B.A. in the All-Star voting. The first-place Sky are in line for their first playoff berth in their eight-year history. Most of all, Delle Donne is clearly happy and comfortable in her new home.It was not long ago that this seemed impossible to imagine.In 2008, Delle Donne, the top recruit in the country, headed to Connecticut. But after two days of practice, she left Storrs in the middle of the night and drove home to Wilmington, Del. She quit basketball, saying she was burned out and could not be away from her family, including her older sister, Lizzie, who has cerebral palsy and is blind and deaf.She enrolled at Delaware and took a year off from basketball, playing volleyball instead. Delle Donne returned to basketball the next season and finished her college career fifth in women's Division I history in career points.But as April's W.N.B.A. draft approached, the prospect of once again moving far from home brought renewed scrutiny to Delle Donne's past. How committed was she to basketball? Could she handle being away from her family? And, more than anything, what was different now, five years later?The days leading to the draft were anxious ones for her family and uncertain ones for teams."After the UConn episode, obviously, we were watching this real closely," Ernie said.Delle Donne had hated everything about college recruiting — the mail, the phone calls, the pressure. The draft was different, she said, because this time, teams were forced to make the decision."I had no say," Delle Donne said. "Wherever I'm drafted, that's where I'm going. It was so much less stressful."A week before the draft, the Sky's owner, Michael Alter, met with Delle Donne for an hour. He knew he had his player."Given her background, we needed to know her motivations," Alter said. "I was really impressed with how direct she was about her past."The Sky took Delle Donne second, and she soon moved with Meghan McLean, her close friend and former teammate at Delaware, to a town house in the northwest suburbs of Chicago. The first few days, McLean said, it felt as if the whole world were e-mailing and texting her, checking on Delle Donne."Of course we were worried," Gene said. "That's my little sister."But Delle Donne clicked with her new team and her new city. She bought a Great Dane puppy and named him Wrigley, after Wrigley Field. She took trips downtown and to Lake Michigan and ate deep-dish pizza."I don't know what else to say other than I've grown up," Delle Donne said.Chicago turned out to be a stroke of luck geographically, too. An Eastern Conference team, the Sky play near Wilmington in Connecticut, New York and Washington, which has allowed Delle Donne to visit Lizzie during the season. And because of the short flight, Gene and Ernie, a real estate developer, have missed only a few Sky games this year.Then there is the close-knit operation that surrounds Delle Donne like a cocoon. McLean doubles as her personal assistant, and Gene, who played college football at Duke and Middle Tennessee State, is her agent."She has this tremendous support system around her," Gene said. "We're happy to be here for her, and it works as a great security blanket."Delle Donne said she did not think about the past anymore. She once needed to find herself, and she did."The Connecticut question always resurfaces," she said. "I'm like, You got to be kidding me; this is over with. I'm playing in the W.N.B.A., loving life. Let's move on."Delle Donne sprained her left foot against Los Angeles on Tuesday, and she could miss the next two weeks. That still leaves her plenty of time to return for a potential playoff run.Her family, of course, will be there every step of the way."It's like now I need to be here more for me than for her," Ernie said. "But that's a good thing."
CUMMING, Ga. — Before her husband's funeral a year ago this month, Bernadine Roundfield recalled another one they had attended together. After the eulogies, on the way home, he told her, bluntly, "When I go, make sure no one tells any lies or makes me out to be something I wasn't.""That," she would say recently, "was typical."And that was one reason Bernadine — or Bernie, as she is known — asked mourners who filled the chapel on that saddest of summer afternoons in suburban Atlanta to share fun stories. The kind Dan Roundfield loved and told and for which his onetime Atlanta Hawks teammate Dominique Wilkins called him Top Cat."Cause whenever you told a story, he immediately had a better one," Wilkins said.Truth be told, it would have taken some determined mythmaking to distort the sum of Dan Roundfield's life given the evidence that he had played and lived selflessly — and died heroically.Many would say they would sacrifice their life for the person they love. "But very few people are given that test, and Danny was," Bernie Roundfield said. After a pause came a candid admission that living with the result could be a blessing and a curse.Other than brief interviews she gave last summer, she had not shared the most haunting details of the death of her husband, who drowned at 59 in Aruba last summer while attempting to save her from a similar fate.It had been all she could do to return the body home and to organize the funeral 10 days after his death so his family and friends could say their goodbyes. But she could not find the strength to read the cards and letters that poured into the family home. Nor could she reach out to express her gratitude, with one major exception."I hadn't talked about it because it was so hard," she said. "But I had decided that I wanted — I needed to — find a way to say thank you."That is what brought her to an interview, along with her adult son, Christopher, on a sunny Monday morning, Aug. 5. Dan Roundfield had died on Aug. 6, 2012, but that was a Monday. "So today, it seems like a year," she said.Dan and Bernie had met in college — students from Detroit — at Central Michigan University. He was more than 6 feet tall on the way to 6-8; she topped out at about 5-5. They married as seniors on a January day so cold that Dan's suit froze in the trunk of his car. He wore jeans instead and immediately returned to college (in Mount Pleasant) for basketball practice.Bernie went to lunch with her parents and back to the Roundfield family home to pick up the ring Dan had inadvertently left there."That ring cost $57," she said. "But it was everything to me."Unlike many professional basketball marriages, theirs went the distance, 37 years, through stops in Indiana (beginning in 1975 in the American Basketball Association), Atlanta, home to Detroit for one season and finally Washington.It was in Atlanta — where the family later settled — on midlevel Hawks playoff teams in the early 1980s that Roundfield made his reputation as a three-time N.B.A. All-Star and second-team all-league player in 1979-80. His position was power forward despite his being typically outweighed by opponents while playing at about 205 pounds."But Danny was strong, really strong," said Wilkins, the former Hawks star and now an executive and broadcaster with the team.In his best days, Roundfield bounded about like a man on a pogo stick. His ability to throw down dunks with either hand earned him another nickname, the Hammer."But he was also a really smart positional player, especially on defense," Wilkins said. "He knew all the tricks. To me, he's one of the most underrated players in the history of the league."Those who knew him best said that status was almost beside the point to Roundfield, who took up the sport as a high school junior and who, according to his wife, initially went to college on an academic scholarship. Even as an All-Star player making good money in the N.B.A., he worked during off-seasons as a bank teller or at a department store. In his post-N.B.A. years, he used his marketing degree to find steady employment, including his most recent position for an environmental engineering company.
LAS VEGAS — Chris Paul has already seemingly done the impossible by turning the long-languishing Los Angeles Clippers into a force in the Western Conference. Now he's taken on another big task — rebuilding the reeling NBA players' association.Paul was elected president of the players' union Wednesday, replacing Derek Fisher and giving an organization cloaked in turmoil some much-needed star power at the top.The vote by NBA player representatives came six months after the union fired Billy Hunter as executive director, a position that remains vacant and follows about 18 months of in-fighting and drama that occurred during the negotiations for the latest collective bargaining agreement. Hunter countered with a wrongful-termination lawsuit in May, accusing Fisher of conspiring with NBA officials during the 2011 lockout."It's not about me as president or the first vice president, it's about the players as a whole," Paul said in a conference call Wednesday night.One of Paul's greatest gifts on the court is an ability to get everyone involved and make his teammates better. Now he'll try to do the same thing with the union. After the lockout ended and the lawsuits started to take hold, there was a feeling among many players and observers that putting a big name in the big chair would help galvanize the group and get star players interested in participating again.That once was commonplace, with marquee players Bob Cousy, Oscar Robertson, Alex English and Isiah Thomas all serving as union presidents. But Paul, a six-time All-Star who is widely regarded as the best point guard in the league, is the first big star to hold the top spot since Patrick Ewing's run ended in 2001. Role players Michael Curry, Antonio Davis and Fisher, who had been in charge since 2006, followed Ewing."That wasn't a requirement, but I think it gives us a little more oomph, I guess, having somebody like him wanting to step up and take on that role," Charlotte Bobcats forward Anthony Tolliver said in a phone interview. "It means a lot."Paul served as a vice president for the last four years, so he has intimate knowledge of the inner workings of the union, and the trouble that engulfed it recently."It was something I saw as a challenge, something I knew I'd be able to handle," Paul said. "It's an unbelievable opportunity, a lot of responsibility comes with this position but I'm very fortunate to have an outstanding of committee guys. The past couple of days have been outstanding, the dialogue we've had as an executive committee also with the players that have come in town, it was amazing."The decision to appoint a new executive director to replace Hunter will come at a later date."We definitely discussed (hiring an executive director), but there's no rush," Paul said. "For us, it's all about getting our house in order and making sure that everything moves right in that direction."In meetings at the Venetian Hotel, Roger Mason Jr. was elected first vice president. He replaced Jerry Stackhouse, who resigned from the office and is expected to take a position within the union.There are several issues that the league has been waiting to discuss with the union while they searched for new leadership, most notably the possible implementation of testing for HGH. Commissioner David Stern, who is retiring in February and handing the reins over to deputy commissioner Adam Silver, has said multiple times this summer that testing for HGH was a priority."Chris is an All-Star player and person and we look forward to working with him," Silver said in a statement.Tolliver, who has long been one of the most devoted player representatives in the league, and Steve Blake were elected vice presidents, filling the executive committee positions vacated by Paul and Mason."This is not a position that's about me or one person," Paul said. "It's about the collective group and the players and I think from my experience ... it's about growing the game and expanding our brand and continue to get our players involved as we can and make sure our voice is heard. The guys here just understand it's our union, there's no one person that is bigger than the group."Paul said the union needed a "rebuild," and he was looking forward to rolling up his sleeves and getting to work. Tolliver agreed, saying it was time for a "fresh start" after a messy time in the union's history."We want to make sure that nothing remotely close that has gone on in the union in the past 12 months or so will ever happen again," Tolliver said. "It's a huge job. It's a huge responsibility. I'm glad to be a part of that."Paul's ascension could pave the way for more involvement from the biggest names in the game. LeBron James considered running for the job before deciding against it, and Paul is an All-NBA first team player who has been tight with James for years."Since I've been in the NBA the superstars have come to a few meetings here and there, every once in a while, but not very often," Tolliver said. "The fact that (James) even considered doing that lets me know that he's going to be more involved in the future. ... Especially him being the face of our game, we want to have him involved as much as possible. Not only him, we want all the guys that carry our brand to be a part of this."AP Basketball Writer Jon Krawczynski in Minneapolis contributed to this report.
N.B.A. players will elect a new union president Wednesday, the first tangible step in rebuilding an organization racked by dysfunction, infighting and scandal.It has been six months since the players fired Billy Hunter, the longtime executive director, amid charges of nepotism and abuse of union resources — allegations that are also the subject of a federal investigation. Hunter has countered with a wrongful-termination lawsuit that accuses Derek Fisher, the current union president, of conspiring with league officials during the 2011 lockout.Against that backdrop, union leaders have been quietly working to rebuild their association from within, while still dealing with the fallout from Hunter's messy tenure and sagging morale at the union's Harlem offices.It could be another six months before the union names a new executive director. But the transition in leadership will officially begin Wednesday in Las Vegas, where players will elect a successor to Fisher, whose term is expiring.Roger Mason Jr., a 32-year-old guard, is the lone announced candidate for the job, and it appears likely he will run unopposed. Mason, who has served four years as a vice president, said he had the full endorsement of his fellow executive committee members."The task at hand is pretty great," Mason said in a telephone interview. "And I can appreciate how much time and energy needs to go into this type of commitment, just from my involvement. There may be other guys that understand that and that want to run, and that's their right."LeBron James publicly flirted with the possibility of running for president, telling ESPN this month, "I think my voice could be huge in that situation." But James has since decided against it, citing time constraints. No superstar has held the president's title since Patrick Ewing's term ended in 2001. Chris Paul is the only marquee player on the current nine-member board.The search for a new executive director will take a little longer, by design. Union leaders, in concert with an outside consultant, are conducting a top-to-bottom assessment of the association's personnel and practices before beginning a formal search."I don't feel like we should go to start looking for an executive director before we actually know the criteria that we're looking for," Mason said.The union is expected to name a search firm this week, with the goal of selecting a new executive director by the union's next meeting, in February.The lack of a permanent union leader has made it nearly impossible for the league to move forward on certain initiatives, including testing for human growth hormone, which Commissioner David Stern wants in place for the coming season."Right now, they're a little bit hamstrung because they're searching for an executive director," Stern said in July. "It's more difficult to make decisions." But, he added, "We expect to have agreement on H.G.H. whenever the union gathers, because we're in this together."The known candidates for executive director include Steve Mills, a former N.B.A. executive and Madison Square Garden president; Stu Jackson, who recently stepped down as the N.B.A.'s executive vice president for basketball operations; and Fred Whitfield, the president of the Charlotte Bobcats.Those three were identified in a Fox Sports report last month, along with Isiah Thomas, a former Knicks president. Multiple people with ties to the search confirmed that Mills, Jackson and Whitfield were in the mix, but they said that Thomas was not under consideration.The list is certain to grow once the search firm is in place.The search is being scrutinized by top player agents, many of whom were highly critical of Hunter's bargaining strategy during the lockout. The next executive director could be negotiating a new labor deal as soon as 2017, when both sides have the option to reopen the agreement."They have a chance to bring respectability back to the union," said the agent Jeff Schwartz, whose clients include Paul Pierce, Deron Williams, Tyson Chandler and Blake Griffin. "And that's going to take a lot of work, and it's going to take somebody who has the energy to get the players inspired again in what's at stake here."Fisher, who led the drive to oust Hunter, has receded from the spotlight in recent months. Jerry Stackhouse, who was elected first vice president in February, has emerged as the players' most forceful voice and, along with Mason and James Jones, has played a key role in presiding over this transition period."The executive committee has been hard at work," Mason said. "The people in the office have been busting their tails and working for the players. I think when the player reps and the body sees what's been done since the All-Star break, they'll start to be excited about where we're going as a union."
Two seasons ago, Chris Paul joined the Los Angeles Clippers and brought instant credibility to a woebegone franchise. Now he will try to do the same for the debilitated N.B.A. players union.Paul was elected president of the players association Wednesday after making a belated decision to run for office. He defeated Roger Mason Jr., who was elected first vice president at the union's summer meeting in Las Vegas.Paul's candidacy was a surprise, even to many union leaders. But his election indicated a recognition by the players that their most influential voices are needed in the most prominent roles. Paul, 28, is the first superstar to hold the president's title since Patrick Ewing in 2001. He replaced Derek Fisher, whose term expired."Moving forward with our union, it's not about me," Paul said in a conference call. "It's not about the president or the first vice president or any one person. It's about the players as a whole, as a body, and that's what we got out of the past two days in our meetings, is what we can do going forward to grow the game and build the game."The union is trying to regain its footing after nearly two years of controversy and infighting, and a damning audit that charged Billy Hunter, the executive director, with nepotism and mismanagement of resources. Hunter was fired in February.The union is just beginning the search to replace Hunter, with the goal of hiring his successor by February. Representatives from Reilly Partners, a search firm, gave a presentation to union members in Las Vegas. No firm has been retained to lead the search yet."There's no rush," Paul said. "Obviously, we would love to get someone in that seat. But I think for us, we basically want to try to make sure our house is in order, make sure we have everything in the right places, so that that executive director can come right in and hit the ground running."Mason, a four-year veteran of the executive committee, was elected first vice president after Jerry Stackhouse resigned that post after just six months. Stackhouse plans to work for the union in some capacity, an indication that his playing career may be over.
LOS ANGELES — Former Chicago Bulls basketball star Scottie Pippen will not be prosecuted over an altercation with a man at a Malibu restaurant in June, prosecutors said on Tuesday, citing insufficient evidence.Pippen, 47, was questioned by police following a scuffle with the man outside the Nobu eatery in the oceanfront community of Malibu in June.Camran Shafighi told police that Pippen refused to take a photograph with him while the former NBA star was dining in the restaurant with his family, according to a report by the Los Angeles County District Attorney's Office.Shafighi said that when he later approached Pippen in the parking lot, the former athlete spit in his face, punched him in the mouth, knocked him down and kicked him in the face, causing him to lose consciousness, the report from prosecutors said.Shafighi later sued Pippen over the confrontation.Pippen, a seven-time NBA All-Star, told police that Shafighi spit at him first and he spit back, and that he then pushed Shafighi, who fell back and started kicking at him, according to the prosecutors' report. Pippen told police he raised his foot to block the blows from Shafighi.There is "insufficient evidence to prove beyond a reasonable doubt" that Pippen is guilty of committing a crime against Shafighi, the District Attorney's Office report said.Shafighi, who was hospitalized after the scuffle, had a blood alcohol content of 0.18, which was more than twice the legal limit for driving, according to the report.There was also an "absolute lack of physical injuries" that one would expect from the blows Shafighi told investigators that Pippen inflicted on him, and his behavior at the hospital was described by a physician as "feigning non-existent injuries inflicted by a celebrity suspect," the prosecutors report said.Pippen won six National Basketball Association championships with the Chicago Bulls in the 1990s, playing alongside basketball great Michael Jordan. He also played for the Houston Rockets and Portland Trail Blazers before ending his career back in Chicago in the 2003-04 season.He was inducted into the Basketball Hall of Fame in 2010.
PHOENIX — The Phoenix Suns and Michael Beasley have reached an agreement to terminate the contract of the troubled forward.The move on Tuesday will cost the franchise $7 million, a $2 million savings from what Beasley would have been due had he simply been waived. It also represents a significant reduction in what the hit on the team's salary cap would have been.Beasley was arrested a month ago in suburban Scottsdale on charges of felony marijuana possession and possession of drug paraphernalia. It was the latest in a series of incidents involving the drug that have plagued his NBA career after he was selected as the No. 2 overall draft pick out of Kansas State in 2008."The Suns were devoted to Michael Beasley's success in Phoenix," Suns President for Basketball Operations Lon Babby said in a statement released by the team. "However, it is essential that we demand the highest standards of personal and professional conduct as we develop a championship culture."Today's action reflects our commitment to those standards."The Suns took a chance on Beasley despite his history of off-the-court problems.In June 2011, Beasley was ticketed for marijuana possession and speeding in a Minneapolis suburb. He has acknowledged that while he was with the Miami Heat, he twice violated the NBA's drug policy and entered a treatment facility in 2009.But at the news conference announcing his signing of a three-year, $18 million contract with Phoenix, Beasley vowed that his marijuana days were over."I realize 10 minutes of feeling good is not really worth putting my life and my career and my legacy in jeopardy," he said then, "so I'm confident to say that that part of my career, that part of my life, is over and won't be coming back."But early on Aug. 6, his Mercedes was pulled over for a traffic stop and a Scottsdale officer said he smelled marijuana. Police said they found three marijuana cigarettes in the car Beasley was driving.Lance Blanks was Suns general manager when Beasley was signed and enthusiastically supported the acquisition. Blanks was fired at the end of last season and replaced by Ryan McDonough, who hired new coach Jeff Hornacek and has overseen a wholesale change in the roster after the Suns compiled the worst record in the Western Conference and second-worst in franchise history."We have high standards for all of our players," McDonough said. "We expect them to represent the team and the community in a positive manner both on and off the court."On the court, Beasley's one season with the Suns was a disappointing one. He averaged career lows of 10.1 points and 3.8 rebounds in 75 games while shooting a career-worst 40.5 percent from the field.Beasley's agent, Jeff Schwartz, did not respond to email or phone requests for comment.Beasley, 24, has played five seasons in the NBA, two with Miami, two with Minnesota and one with Phoenix. He is averaging 14.1 points per game for his career.The Suns' recent trade of Caron Butler to Milwaukee created $6 million in salary cap room to soften the financial blow to the Suns."The timing and nature of this, and all our transactions," Babby said, " are based on the judgment of our basketball leadership as to how best to achieve our singular goal of rebuilding an elite team."
As a rookie coach with a championship-caliber roster, Jason Kidd already had a lot riding on his maiden season on the Nets' bench. His stake in their success is about to get a little bigger.Kidd is in the process of purchasing a tiny share of the franchise from the rapper Jay Z, according to two people with knowledge of the transaction. The sale was first reported by The New York Post, which pegged the value at $500,000.Does this make Kidd his own boss, immune to dismissal and empowered to give himself a raise? Not exactly. Kidd is purchasing half of Jay Z's share, which itself is quite small — just a fraction of a percent, according to estimates.The dual role, as head coach and minority owner, is rare but has precedent. Pat Riley was given a 10 percent ownership share in the Miami Heat upon being named head coach and team president in 1995. The N.B.A. has no rules against such an arrangement.The league does bar anyone from serving as a player agent while holding any official role with a team. Jay Z moved to divest his share in the Nets after announcing his intention last spring to represent professional athletes, including N.B.A. players, through his newly created Roc Nation Sports agency. Jay Z's first client was Robinson Cano. He has since signed Kevin Durant.Jay Z's ownership stake in the Nets was nominal, but his imprint was profound. He was a guiding force in the creation of their new logo and black-and-white color scheme, and a key figure in the Nets' push to relocate to Brooklyn, where he grew up. He played eight shows to open the $1 billion Barclays Center last fall. His courtside presence, with his wife, Beyoncé, gave the Nets an air of credibility, and a sheen of cool.Kidd's purchase provides a neat bit of symmetry. It was Kidd, then a Nets point guard, who in 2003 suggested to Jay Z that he buy a share of the franchise.
By most accounts, Carmelo Anthony was a better, more dedicated passer last season. Knicks fans saw it. Teammates praised him for it. Yet Anthony's assist average, 2.6 per game, was the lowest of his career. Clearly, there was a piece missing in this equation.The N.B.A. is about to provide that piece, and thousands of others, to all 30 teams — and, perhaps soon after, to all fans.The league on Thursday announced plans to install sophisticated tracking cameras, known as the SportVu system, in every arena for the coming season, creating an unprecedented treasure trove of data about virtually every wrinkle of the game.SportVu, developed by Stats LLC, records data points for all 10 players, the three referees and the ball, every 30th of a second, measuring speed, distance, player separation and ball possession. Every step, every dribble, every pass, every shot, every rebound — really, every movement — will be recorded, coded and categorized.So a head coach will know how many rebounds his center took by force, and how many simply landed in his lap. Teams will know which players take the most contested shots, and which are best at converting them. And if a player is passing frequently, without necessarily generating an assist, that will be clear, too.Coaches can also use the data to assess the effectiveness of offensive sets and defensive game plans."This really allows us to analyze our game in a way that's never been possible before," said Steve Hellmuth, the league's executive vice president of operations and technology.The N.B.A. first experimented with SportVu during the 2009 finals between the Los Angeles Lakers and the Orlando Magic. Six forward thinking teams installed the system for the 2010-11 season: Dallas, Houston, San Antonio, Oklahoma City, Boston and Golden State. By last season, 15 teams (including the Knicks) had adopted the system, which uses six small cameras and Stats' proprietary software.But the data was necessarily limited because not every arena had the technology installed. Under the new multiyear agreement between the N.B.A. and Stats, every second of every game will be recorded and all teams will potentially benefit from the statistical gold mine.Much of that information will remain proprietary. But the league plans to incorporate as much as possible into its statistics engine on NBA.com, and for use on its mobile app.Starting next season, fans might be able to view so-called "hockey assists" (the pass that led to the pass that led to the score), or even "free-throw assists" (the pass that led to a player earning foul shots). Blocked shots could be augmented by "attempted blocks" or "redirected shots." Rebounds could be completely recategorized: open rebounds, contested rebounds, free-throw rebounds, short rebounds, long rebounds.Perhaps even more compelling: Next time Anthony scores 50 points, the N.B.A.'s statistics engine could tell you who was guarding him on each possession.Many of these items are already charted by teams, mostly by hand, but they are generally not shared with reporters and fans."We can make it available to public," Hellmuth said, adding that the goal is "complete transparency." That push, he said, has come from both Commissioner David Stern and Deputy Commissioner Adam Silver, who is succeeding Stern in February.For the teams that already used SportVu, the data has proven quite valuable to medical staffs, giving them the ability to more closely track a player's performance as he returns from an injury."If a player is coming back from an A.C.L. or a foot injury, a lower body leg injury, what you want to track is their accelerations and decelerations throughout the game, basically how much they are cutting?" said Brian Kopp, the vice president of strategy and development for Stats. "Because that shows you how much pressure and load are they putting on their legs."That information can help guide trainers in formulating a player's postgame and off-day regimen."It's a missing piece to that overall puzzle," Kopp said.The N.B.A. is the first major professional sports league in the United States to fully adopt the SportVu system. It will have other implications for the league, far beyond the playbook and the box score. Not everyone might welcome the change.General managers will surely exploit the more sophisticated statistics when negotiating contracts with player agents. Not all assists, points and rebounds are created equal — and teams will soon be able to demonstrate that vividly.Referees are also tracked by SportVu, which means the league will have yet another tool to analyze every call, non-call and missed call as it ranks its officials. Those rankings help determine which referees are chosen for playoff assignments and the finals."It certainly was part of the attraction" in the league's decision to adopt SportVu," Hellmuth said.
SPRINGFIELD, Mass. — Rick Pitino remembers the training meals at the pizza place where his Boston University teams ate more than 30 years ago.Even Hall of Famers have to start somewhere.That obscure beginning provided a foundation for a coaching career that took him to two NBA teams and three other colleges, all reaching the Final Four and two winning NCAA championships."Coaches don't get in the Hall of Fame," Pitino said Sunday at his induction. "Players put them in the Hall of Fame and I've had a great journey along the way."It started for him as a head coach in 1978 just 90 miles east of Springfield Symphony Hall, where the ceremony was held for him and 11 other honorees.He had to "learn the trade from the bottom" at Boston University, Pitino said. There were those "training meals," he said, and the time when champagne was served at Midnight Madness."Nine drunks showed up," he said, "and no one else."He spent five years with the Terriers, then two as an assistant with the New York Knicks before spending the next two as head coach at Providence, leading the Friars to a surprising berth in the Final Four. He kept moving — two years as head coach with the Knicks, eight with Kentucky, four with the Boston Celtics and the past 12 with Louisville.Just five months ago, he led the Cardinals to the championship."At BU, you learn how to build the right way. At Providence, I learned how to dream. I always thought anything is possible after coaching that team," Pitino said during his 20-minute speech, the last of the day. "At Kentucky, I learned all about pressure every single day. It was unbelievable pressure and it was very difficult and that pressure brought out the best in everybody."Two former college coaches were inducted as part of the second straight 12-member class, the largest in the Hall's history — Jerry Tarkanian, 83, who led UNLV to the 1990 NCAA championship, and Guy Lewis, 91, who took Houston to five Final Fours. Tarkanian, who had heart surgery less than two months ago, came on stage with a walker. Lewis was in a wheelchair. Both smiled as they received standing ovations.Also inducted Sunday into the Naismith Memorial Basketball Hall of Fame were Gary Payton, the only NBA player with 20,000 points, 8,000 assists, 5,000 rebounds and 2,000 steals; Bernard King, who averaged 22.5 points in 15 NBA seasons with five teams; North Carolina women's coach Sylvia Hatchell; five-time WNBA All-Star Dawn Staley; former Knicks guard Richie Guerin; former NBA deputy commissioner Russ Granik; and Oscar Schmidt, who played in five Olympics for Brazil.E.B. Henderson, who learned basketball at Harvard in 1904 then introduced it to African-American students in Washington, D.C., and four-time ABA All-Star Roger Brown of the Indiana Pacers were enshrined posthumously.Henderson "laid the foundation" for the progress of African-Americans "from exclusion to domination" of basketball, Nikki Graves Henderson, wife of Henderson's grandson, said in a recorded message.Payton was known for his defensive prowess, aggressiveness and trash-talking."I played hard because I wanted to win every time," he said of his 17-year career, nearly 13 of them with the Seattle SuperSonics. "It was all for my crazy love for the game."For King, playing basketball as a kid involved sometimes clearing snow from a playground court in Brooklyn."I fell in love with basketball the first time I made a basket," he said.Ten days before his 61st birthday, Pitino stood on stage with Hubie Brown, head coach of the Knicks when he was an assistant, and Dick Vitale, the pair he chose to present him for induction.Pitino never came close in the pros to the success he had in college. He had losing records in five of his six NBA seasons.After a loss to Toronto on March 1, 2000, an agitated Pitino urged people to focus on the future, saying, "Larry Bird is not walking through that door, fans. Kevin McHale is not walking through that door, and Robert Parish is not walking through that door. And if you expect them to walk through that door, they're going to be gray and old."On Sunday, while Pitino posed for photos before the ceremony, a blonde-haired Bird showed up."He finally walks through the door, and I said, 'What took you so long to walk through that door?' And he said to me, 'You don't want me now,'" Pitino said, grinning.Bird had his turn on stage as the presenter of Schmidt, a prolific scorer who said he chose not to play in the NBA because that would have barred him from playing for his national team."It's too easy to have Michael Jordan, Kobe Bryant as an idol, a guy (who) flies around and does whatever he wants. It's easy," Schmidt said. "My guy doesn't run, doesn't jump and played the best of everybody else."On Sunday, he was joined by 12 others."There is nothing better than this," Schmidt said.
LOS ANGELES — After seven years of playing basketball in five countries, Michelle Campbell, at 29, finally achieved her dream of reaching the W.N.B.A. Campbell, who was cut from her first W.N.B.A. training camp after graduating from Rutgers in 2006, is a 6-foot-2-inch rookie reserve forward for the Chicago Sky, the Eastern Conference regular-season champions."I've always wanted to play in the States in front of my family," Campbell said before a late-season game against the Los Angeles Sparks.As a Rutgers junior and senior, Campbell helped the Scarlet Knights reach the N.C.A.A. tournament, advancing to the Round of 8 in her junior year. In 2005, she made the all-Big East third team and was named the conference's most improved player.The next year, Campbell went to the Washington Mystics' training camp as a free agent but was released before the season. Then she began a 19-month trek that took her to teams in South Korea, Israel, Latvia and Poland."I was very focused on one thing, and that was getting to the top of my game and getting to the top of Europe," Campbell said. "I felt like I wanted to be higher."Despite her frustration, Campbell refined her skills."Coming out of college, I was raw," said Campbell, who grew up in Princeton, N.J. "When I was overseas, I got more time to develop my game. I worked on my jump shot. I worked on my dribbling. I worked on a lot of things."In 2007, Campbell joined Ceyhan in Turkey, where she averaged double figures in points and rebounds in her first two seasons, and found a home."They take care of each other, and I like that," Campbell said of the Turks. "Anything I needed, I had. I was never scared to walk by myself. I always knew somebody was watching, making sure I was O.K."During her off-seasons, Campbell kept trying to reach the W.N.B.A. but was cut from camps in Phoenix, Detroit and Indiana."My whole family always keeps telling me to keep going, to keep working hard," Campbell said. "They always say: 'You're destined to be great. God has a plan.' "In 2009, entering her third season with Ceyhan, she faced a pivotal decision."Basketball is definitely a grind in Europe if you're not one of the top players," Campbell said. "I was at the point of saying: 'I've got to get this to work. I need this to work now. I want to continue to play, but not if I can make more money in the States.' "Campbell would have retired — "as heartbreaking as it would have been," she said — if she did not have a breakthrough. But in 2009-10, Campbell led the Turkish league in scoring at 21 points per game.In 2010, she took two major steps. One was moving to Galatasaray, a perennial Turkish power. The other was becoming a Turkish citizen.Being a citizen made Campbell eligible to play for Turkey in international competitions. It also gave Galatasaray roster flexibility, because at least two Turks had to play at all times.But there was more. "They said, 'If you want to be Turkish, you have to change your name,' " Campbell said.She hoped to be called something close to her real name, and General Manager Murat Tumer provided a solution."He said, 'My daughter's name is Melisa, so we're going to call you Melisa,' " Campbell recalled.So Campbell became known as Melisa Can whenever she took the court for Galatasaray.Also in 2010, Campbell began playing in the Euroleague, basketball's version of soccer's Champions League, and she attracted the attention of Pokey Chatman, the coach for Spartak Moscow Region at the time."I was having to play against her four to six times a year," said Chatman, now the Sky's coach and general manager. "She has a toughness. She has a blue-collar mentality. I thought it was an element we needed to add to our team."With the Sky, Campbell is averaging 8.2 minutes, 1.7 points and 1.6 rebounds in 28 games. But her value "doesn't show up on the stat sheet," Chatman said.The rookie center Elena Delle Donne said: "She'll see stuff from the sidelines and always pull me aside to try to help me out. Every game, there's something new. She has a lot of knowledge about the game."Campbell described coming off the bench as an "emotional adjustment." But after what she called "five years of just fighting to do something I love to do so much," Campbell found vindication in a W.N.B.A. uniform."That whole time was tough," she said. "Maybe a lot of people never knew I would be here. But I've worked very hard to get here, and I'm very thankful to be here."
SPRINGFIELD, Mass. — Rick Pitino said he remembered the training meals at the pizza place where his Boston University teams ate more than 30 years ago.Even Hall of Famers have to start somewhere.That obscure beginning provided a foundation for a coaching career that took him to two N.B.A. teams and three other colleges, all three reaching the Final Four and two winning N.C.A.A. championships."Coaches don't get in the Hall of Fame," Pitino, 60, said Sunday at his induction. "Players put them in the Hall of Fame, and I've had a great journey along the way."It started for him as a head coach in 1978 just 90 miles east of Springfield Symphony Hall, where the ceremony was held for him and 11 other honorees.He had to "learn the trade from the bottom" at Boston University, Pitino said. There were those training meals, he said, and the time when Champagne was served at Midnight Madness."Nine drunks showed up," he said, "and no one else."He spent five years with the Terriers, then two as an assistant with the Knicks before spending the next two as the coach at Providence, leading the Friars to a surprising berth in the Final Four. He kept moving — two years as coach with the Knicks, eight with Kentucky, four with the Boston Celtics and the past 12 with Louisville.Just five months ago, he led the Cardinals to the championship."At B.U., you learn how to build the right way," Pitino said during his 20-minute speech, the last of the day. "At Providence, I learned how to dream. I always thought anything is possible after coaching that team. At Kentucky, I learned all about pressure every single day. It was unbelievable pressure and it was very difficult, and that pressure brought out the best in everybody."Two former college coaches were inducted as part of the second straight 12-member class, the largest in the Hall's history — Jerry Tarkanian, 83, who led Nevada-Las Vegas to the 1990 N.C.A.A. championship, and Guy Lewis, 91, who took Houston to five Final Fours. Tarkanian, who had heart surgery less than two months ago, came on stage with a walker. Lewis was in a wheelchair. Both smiled as they received standing ovations.Also inducted into the Naismith Memorial Basketball Hall of Fame were Gary Payton, the only N.B.A. player with 20,000 points, 8,000 assists, 5,000 rebounds and 2,000 steals; Bernard King, who averaged 22.5 points in 15 N.B.A. seasons with five teams; the North Carolina women's coach Sylvia Hatchell; Dawn Staley, a five-time W.N.B.A. All-Star; the former Knicks guard Richie Guerin; the former N.B.A. deputy commissioner Russ Granik; and Oscar Schmidt, who played in five Olympics for Brazil.E. B. Henderson, who learned basketball at Harvard in 1904, then introduced it to African-American students in Washington, and Roger Brown, a four-time All-Star in the American Basketball Association, were enshrined posthumously.Payton was known for his defensive prowess, aggressiveness and trash-talking."I played hard because I wanted to win every time," he said of his 17-year career, nearly 13 of them with the Seattle SuperSonics. "It was all for my crazy love for the game."For King, playing basketball as a youngster involved sometimes clearing snow from a playground court in Brooklyn. "I fell in love with basketball the first time I made a basket," he said.
Jason Kidd , who became a Nets legend long before he became their head coach, will have his jersey retired next month, the team announced Monday.The Nets will raise Kidd's No. 5 to the Barclays Center rafters on Oct. 17, before a nationally televised preseason game against the Miami Heat."This honor is richly deserved," General Manager Billy King said in a statement. "Jason is firmly established in the Nets' record books as the greatest player in the team's NBA history, and the retirement of his No. 5 is a fitting conclusion to his legacy as a Nets player."Kidd led the Nets to the finals in 2002 and 2003, by far the franchise's high point since joining the N.B.A. The Nets made the playoffs in each of Kidd's six full seasons with the team. He holds the franchise records for assists (4,620), steals (950), 3-pointers (813) and triple-doubles (61). He is also the Nets' all-time postseason leader in multiple categories, including points, assists, rebounds and steals.Kidd, 40, was named the Nets' head coach in June, shortly after he announced his retirement after 19 seasons as a player. He is also in the process of purchasing a small share of the team from Jay-Z.Kidd's jersey will be the sixth retired by the franchise, joining Julius Erving (32), Drazen Petrovic (3), John Williamson (23), Bill Melchionni (25) and Buck Williams (52)."This is a very humbling honor, and one that I will always cherish," Kidd said in a statement.
NEWARK, N.J. — Katie Smith has always been a gritty player throughout her illustrious basketball career.With the New York Liberty on the brink of elimination from the playoff chase, Smith wasn't about to let the team go down quietly — even with star Cappie Pondexter out. The league's second all-time leading scorer put forth a vintage effort against Phoenix, scoring a season-high 17 points Tuesday night. It just wasn't enough as New York fell 80-76 and dropped out of the postseason race.Smith quietly announced early this summer that she would be retiring at the end of the season. The Liberty honored the 15-year veteran, who was playing her first season with the team, before New York's final home game."I think what we will miss most about Katie is her drive to win and the fact she's a fierce competitor," WNBA President Laurel Richie said.The Liberty put together a video tribute showing highlights of Smith's career from her playing days in high school to her college days at Ohio State. It finished up with some of her best moments from the now-defunct ABL and WNBA.Smith said before the game she wasn't going to cry watching the video. She came close, but held her ground, instead joking afterward to the crowd that the biggest thing she learned watching it was that she "had a lot of different hair styles over the years."The team also presented her with a framed USA basketball jersey and a photo collage of her playing career."She's an all-time professional," New York Liberty coach Bill Laimbeer said. "She's just been that hard-nosed player that takes care of her body. She's played so many years because of that. She's gone from prolific scorer to outstanding defender and team leader. I can't say enough about her."Smith was brought to New York this season by Laimbeer to provide some veteran leadership. He coached her for five seasons with the Detroit Shock, where she won WNBA titles in 2006 and 2008."She's been a pillar of this league like Lisa Leslie," said teammate Delisha Milton-Jones, who will now be the longest tenured player in the league. "The work she put in is unparalleled. She hasn't gotten the credit she deserves for what she's done for this league on and off the court. She's the consummate pro and you couldn't have asked for a better role model."Laimbeer ran the first play for Smith against Phoenix, getting her a jumper from the wing. It got the 39-year-old star going as she had nine points in the first quarter. She also drew the assignment of guarding Diana Taurasi on defense. She held her longtime USA basketball teammate to just 4-of-13 shooting."She will be missed," Taurasi said. "She was my mentor on USA basketball when I first started playing on the national team and has been a winner at every level."Smith isn't sure what she's going to do next season. She's hoping to get into coaching either at the college or WNBA level."I've had some conversations with Bill and we'll see what happens," Smith said.For now Smith says she plans to enjoy the final two games of her professional career when the Liberty hit the road to play Indiana and Washington."There's always time to figure out what's next," Smith said. "I'm a little nervous about the unknown, but I'm sure it will all work out."
After beginning with the arrival of three heralded rookies , the W.N.B.A.'s 17th season ends with the departure of its top two scoring leaders.Tina Thompson and Katie Smith have combined for nearly 14,000 points and close to a thousand W.N.B.A. games, but they have only a few contests left before retiring.Thompson, the W.N.B.A.'s career scoring leader with 7,466 points entering her final regular-season game Saturday night, can look forward to the Western Conference playoffs with the Seattle Storm, who face the Minnesota Lynx in the first round. Smith, who is second in career scoring with 6,439 points, will retire after the Liberty end their season Sunday on the road against the Washington Mystics.The cumulative physical effects of their careers have taken a toll."I feel old," Thompson, 37, said with a laugh. "My knees hurt. My legs hurt. My knees are swollen. I get out of bed and I'm walking on my heels because my Achilles' tendons are tired."Smith, 39, said: "During the off-season, I kind of knew this was probably it for me. It's just so hard to make sure your body is ready to go through that grueling season, to get your mind to that level."A 5-11 guard out of Ohio State, Smith joined the W.N.B.A. in 1999 after spending three years with the Columbus Quest in the rival American Basketball League. She led the Quest to two A.B.L. titles while scoring 1,433 points. Add those to her W.N.B.A. totals and two championships with the Detroit Shock, and Smith retires with more points and championships than any other woman who has played professional basketball in the United States.She acknowledged approaching her decision to retire with some trepidation."I think it's a little scary to speak it into fruition," said Smith, who announced her retirement informally in a Twitter conversation. "Am I really ready? Am I making the right decision? That made me a little nervous."Thompson, a 6-foot-2 forward, was the first player chosen in the first W.N.B.A. draft in 1997, taken by the Houston Comets. She is the last of the original W.N.B.A. players to retire. Thompson was studying at Southern California to enter law school when she received a call from Renee Brown, the league's director of player personnel, offering her a spot in a new league being created by the N.B.A."I didn't believe it at first," Thompson said. "I was kind of shocked. I played the message probably six or seven times to make sure she was saying what she said.""I was excited but, at the same time, very apprehensive," she said. "I wasn't sure if it was something I wanted to do. The initial offer wasn't very good at all. I think it was a couple of thousand dollars above the poverty line in California at that time."But the opportunity to make history was enticing."It's not something that happens often, to be a part of the first wave that sets the foundation for something that could be amazing," Thompson said.She joined Cynthia Cooper-Dyke and Sheryl Swoopes in leading the Comets to four championships in the W.N.B.A.'s first four seasons while transforming the power forward position."I thought we were getting a post player," Cooper-Dyke, now the coach of the women's basketball team at U.S.C., said of Thompson. "What we got was this incredibly gifted and versatile forward who just gave me so many more options when we played the pick-and-roll."She added: "When I passed her the ball and she let that 3-point shot go, I was, like: 'Wow. That's rainbow.' "Scoring from the perimeter made Thompson and the Comets tougher to beat."A lot of post players aren't comfortable guarding somebody that far out," said Smith, who played with Thompson on the Storm last season and on two Olympic teams. "They're not always guarding shooters."Watching Thompson during the W.N.B.A.'s earliest years was a young girl in Chicago, Candace Parker, who became Thompson's teammate with the Los Angeles Sparks for three seasons."I watched her as a child when she first got into the league," said Parker, who incorporated parts of Thompson's style into her own when they played together."We'd have closed sessions where she showed me certain moves — you know, her patented shimmy that she does with her shoulders," Parker said. "I've taken that, made it something that's my own and used that effectively."With retirement beckoning, Thompson anticipates less pain and more time for her 8-year-old son, Dyllan, whom she raises as a single mother and schools at home."I'm literally looking forward to waking up and the only schedule that I have to stick to is Dyllan's," Thompson said.For Smith, retirement means nurturing a desire to coach by serving as a graduate assistant at Ohio State while pursuing a master's degree to become a dietitian."I just want to have some options just in case I'm not very good at coaching," Smith said, laughing. "But I would love to coach professionally or in college."Retirement will also give Smith a chance to reflect on "the sorority that we've had of fellow W.N.B.A. players, the pride that we took in playing in the States," she said."Really, when you look at it, it's a small, small group in the big scheme."Smith and Thompson make up an even smaller one.
Elena Delle Donne has already led Chicago to its first postseason berth in franchise history.Now the 6-foot-5 budding young star will try and help the Eastern Conference's top team keep the run going in the playoffs. Delle Donne, the overwhelming favorite to win rookie of the year, said she and her teammates are looking forward to the challenge"It's going to be a great experience," she said. "We're all very excited about it, we're all going in it for the first time."Chicago will have a tough test in the opening round, facing defending WNBA champion Indiana. The Fever, beset by injuries all season, got back star Katie Douglas last week. She sat out 30 games with a bulging disc in her back.Here's a look at five other intriguing story lines for the WNBA playoffs that begin Thursday:ON A MISSION: Ever since losing to Indiana in the WNBA finals last season, Maya Moore and her Minnesota Lynx teammates have been hungry to get back there. Minnesota took the first step toward winning its second title in three seasons by clinching home court advantage throughout the playoffs. The Lynx are 15-2 at the Target Center this season. "Home court is huge," Moore said. "Our fans are awesome and they really make it hard for teams to come in and beat us." Minnesota will open against Seattle, a team the Lynx swept during the regular season.OVERACHEIVERS: Mike Thibault was brought to Washington with hopes of turning around a struggling franchise. It only took the veteran coach one season to start the rebuilding process as the Mystics won 17 games — more than the previous two years combined. The Mystics, who were 11-57 the previous two seasons combined, will face Atlanta in the opening round in a rematch of the 2010 series. The Dream, an enigma all season, are led by the league's top scorer in Angel McCoughtry (22.0 points) and are always a tough playoff out.CALLING IT A CAREER: Tina Thompson hopes to have one last hurrah as her WNBA career comes to a close. The four-time WNBA champion will be playing in her final playoffs as Seattle faces Minnesota. Thompson, who is the only player left from the inaugural WNBA class, will finish her career as the league's all-time leading scorer (7,488) and second leading rebounder (3,070). She averaged 14.1 points and 5.8 rebounds to help injury-plagued Seattle make a surprising run to the playoffs without injured stars Lauren Jackson and Sue Bird. "I want to go 12 more games," she said, referring to the postseason.SECOND CHANCE : The Phoenix Mercury had high expectations with No. 1 pick Brittney Griner joining a talented group led by Diana Taurasi. But the team struggled under coach Corey Gaines, who was fired in early August. The coaching change turned things around and the Mercury flourished under interim coach Russ Pennell, closing the season with nine wins in their final 13 games. "We're playing defense better. We're stopping teams," Griner said. "We're getting stops. We're running out. That's big with coach Pennell."MISSING PIECE: Candace Parker has pretty much done it all in her basketball career. From NCAA championships, to Olympic gold medals and league MVPs, she has a stellar resume. Yet one thing is missing, a WNBA title. Parker hopes to change that when the Sparks open up the playoffs against Phoenix. The 27-year-old, who won MVP honors of the league's All-Star game this past July, has a strong group around her led by Kristi Toliver and Nneka Ogwumike.AP Freelancers Mike Cook in Minneapolis and Curtis Zupke in Los Angeles contributed to this report.
MINNEAPOLIS — This is always the way it was supposed to be for Maya Moore.She was a star in high school and the most decorated college player to ever hit the court. She was the unanimous No. 1 pick in the WNBA draft, a franchise-changing talent who could draw more than just hard-core fans to the arena to see her play.Moore and the Minnesota Lynx won a title in her first season and reached the finals again in her second season, an incredibly successful start by any measure. For those expecting Moore to take the league by storm and dominate from the start, they had to wait a bit. Three years, to be exact.Now in her third season, Moore has taken over. More comfortable with her teammates, her competition and her status as a veteran in the league, she led the Lynx to the best record in the WNBA for the third straight season."Every year that I'm here I take on more and more as far as expectations, the poise I play with and the trust that my teammates have in me," Moore said. "I think as a culture of our team, we want to be able to have a lot of trust in each other no matter how old you are or how many years you've been playing. But especially this year. I've had my first two years under my belt. The core group being here has given me a comfort that has allowed me to play more like a veteran."She is averaging career highs in points (18.5), rebounds (6.2) and shooting percentage (.509). She was named Western Conference player of the month in August and September and also became the first player in league history to finish first in 3-point percentage (.453) and 3-pointers made (72). To put that in perspective, only two NBA players have ever done that.Moore just missed out on the WNBA's MVP award, finishing second to Los Angeles Sparks forward Candace Parker in one of the closest votes in league history, according to a person familiar with the situation who spoke to The Associated Press on condition of anonymity because no official announcement has been made.Moore's all-around brilliance has the Lynx steamrolling into the playoffs — they open the Western Conference semifinals at home on Friday against Seattle — gunning for their third straight finals appearance. In a season that was supposed to be dominated by the fresh faces like Brittney Griner, Elena Delle Donne and Skylar Diggins, the veteran Lynx once again proved to be the best team in the league.Moore's blossoming has accompanied a career year from point guard Lindsay Whalen, another stellar season from All-Star guard Seimone Augustus and the hard-nosed play of Rebekkah Brunson to make the Lynx the team to beat."Every year we've come in as the No. 1 seed so this is nothing new," Moore said. "We know that every team is going to bring their best against us because all they've been hearing for the whole season, especially this past week, is how good we are. That can be a lot to motivate the teams that we play and it can also be a way for us to take our eyes off of our prize by being comfortable with what we've done."I think our focus has been just making sure that we focus on the fact that nothing has been accomplished for us in the postseason."After beating Atlanta to win the franchise's first championship in 2011, the Lynx were upset by Indiana last season in their bid to repeat. Coach Cheryl Reeve has said that the star-laden team may have lost a bit of its focus during that series."We've been the 1 seed. It's familiar. It's one of those things where I think every year I feel the same," Reeve said. "We want to make sure we're not that team that doesn't understand how hard it's going to be."With Moore finding the magic that made her so dominant at UConn, the challenge of knocking off the Lynx got a whole lot tougher."She just has a really great understanding of what's being asked of her," Reeve said. "She responds quicker to mistakes as far as correcting things. She doesn't make the same mistakes that maybe she made as a younger player, has been far more efficient offensively."Moore spent last offseason playing in China, expanding her brand and becoming a global face for a women's game that appears to be on the rise. WNBA games averaged 231,000 viewers on ESPN2, a 28 percent rise from last season and 20 percent larger audience than MLS games this season.She also changed her diet, cutting out dairy, loading up on fruits and vegetables and eating several smaller meals instead of two big ones.Most important, she's comfortable now. After deferring to her more experienced teammates for the first two seasons, Moore feels like one of them. And that has given her the freedom to take over. Just like she's always done."I put those expectations on myself as far as trying to be someone who comes in and pays like a vet," Moore said. "It's really just about poise and knowing what to expect and being mentally prepared for every practice and every game."
NEWARK — The eager fans waited for Brittney Griner . They waited to marvel at her 6-foot-8-inch frame. They waited to give her a hug. They waited to give her gifts, like a white bow tie with rhinestones. They waited to ask her questions, about her first dunk, about her advice for younger players.Last week the Liberty honored Katie Smith, a two-time W.N.B.A. champion and the No. 2 scorer in league history, in the final home game of her 16-year career. It was clear, though, that most fans went to Prudential Center to see Griner, the rookie center for the Phoenix Mercury, who received the loudest ovation during player introductions.The fans cheered when Griner began the game by beating everyone else down the court for an acrobatic alley-oop layup assisted by her star teammate Diana Taurasi. They oohed when Griner recorded a block in the final minute to secure an 80-76 victory.Griner finished with only 9 points, but she understands that the numbers in the seats are as vital as her numbers in the box score.All year she has said yes to requests for pictures and autographs before and after games. She accepts gifts and answers fans' questions with a smile, sometimes while still in her sweat-soaked jersey more than 20 minutes after a game."You learn to embrace it when you have a lot of expectations that's being put on you all the time," Griner said. "It doesn't really bother me anymore."In her rookie season, Griner has achieved what the W.N.B.A. desperately needed her to do: she has attracted more fans.With the W.N.B.A. playoffs beginning Thursday, the league's shift in branding and promotion, with a focus on Griner and other top rookies, has been a success. Ticket sales during the regular season improved by 8.9 percent. Games on ESPN2 averaged 231,000 viewers, a 28 percent jump from a year ago. Traffic on the league's Web site has increased, too."We couldn't have been more thrilled with how this season is going," Laurel Richie, the W.N.B.A. president, said in a telephone interview. "We've focused a lot of our efforts on storytelling, both about the game and our players."Last year, average attendance was 7,457, a record low for the league. It was the sixth time in seven years that the average was below 8,000. More than half of the league's 12 teams did not report a profit. Television viewership dropped. The Web site 24/7 Wall Street predicted that the W.N.B.A. would not exist after 2013.To renew interest, Richie made drastic changes before the W.N.B.A.'s 17th season. The league received a rebranding, with a new logo, Web site and color scheme. ESPN extended its contract with the W.N.B.A. through the 2022 season and televised its draft in prime time.The league's biggest promotional efforts, and optimism, focused on its top three draft picks: Griner, Elena Delle Donne and Skylar Diggins. Even before they had finished their college careers, the W.N.B.A. was marketing them as "3 to See."Raymond Sauer, a sports economics professor at Clemson, said it was wise for the league to put faith in Griner. Sauer said Griner's ability to dunk, along with her engaging personality and her stance to stop bullying, made her fascinating."One of the reasons we watch sports in general is to see people do incredible things," Sauer said. "A player like that can really make a difference."Griner, 22, has not had a remarkable season statistically, averaging 12.6 points, 6.3 rebounds and a league-leading 3 blocks per game. But behind Griner and Taurasi, who is second in scoring at 20.3 points per game, the Mercury are back in the playoffs one year after finishing 7-27. The Mercury, who will begin a series against the Los Angeles Sparks on Thursday, also led the league in new season-ticket holders and increased their ticket revenue by 35 percent.Griner said she was still adjusting to a more physical style of play than what she faced in college at Baylor."It's rough out there, and that's what I expected," said Griner, who missed seven games with a left knee sprain. "I put some high expectations on myself. I feel like I should just do so much more than what I do."Taurasi, the No. 1 overall pick in 2004, said she did not face the same demands when she was the new face of the league."I understand all the pressure that's on her and all the commitment she has to do that people don't see," Taurasi said. "It's tough as a young kid and still trying to physically make sure you're playing to your potential. I think she's starting to figure it out."Delle Donne, drafted second by the Chicago Sky, has been one of the top players in the league, averaging 18.1 points per game. The leading vote-getter for the All-Star Game, Delle Donne has elevated the Sky to a franchise-best 24-10 record and their first playoff appearance. The Sky's attendance rose 17 percent from last year, the largest increase by any team.Diggins, one of the first athletes to sign with Jay Z's sports agency, had an up-and-down season, averaging 8.5 points and starting 21 games for the Tulsa Shock, who missed the playoffs. But by the All-Star break, the Shock led the W.N.B.A. in merchandise sales, and Griner, Delle Donne and Diggins had the top-selling jerseys."I think 20 years from now we're going to look back and say that was a defining moment in the history of the W.N.B.A.," Richie said of the rookie class.The league has had other success stories this season. The Minnesota Lynx (26-8) have the best record in the league behind Maya Moore, the No. 1 pick in 2011, who has led the team to back-to-back finals. Tina Thompson, the W.N.B.A.'s career scoring leader, is in the playoffs with the Seattle Storm, averaging 14.1 points a game in her final season. Last week, the Shock's Riquna Williams broke the single-game scoring record with 51 points."Nobody expected that," Griner said of Williams's feat. "But that's great for our league, too. It shows that we're some hoopers. I loved it."The W.N.B.A. will face a bigger test next season. Another Griner or Delle Donne will probably not come along in next year's draft. Richie is focusing on how the league can work with ESPN to build on its momentum.The league hopes that Griner and others can continue to lure fans. Cole D'Angelo, a 14-year-old from Leonia, N.J., had never watched the W.N.B.A. before this season, but he began rooting for the Mercury. D'Angelo attended his first game with his parents last week to see Griner against the Liberty.After the game, at a meet-and-greet event, he asked Griner about her biggest accomplishment. Griner, who acknowledged before the season that she is gay, paused before saying it was her chance to be a role model.D'Angelo left Prudential Center more impressed with Griner and the W.N.B.A."What makes this great is that this would never happen at an N.B.A. game," he said. "You would never get to spend this much time with a star player."
Nets point guard Deron Williams sprained his right ankle and bruised a bone while working out in Utah, the team said Wednesday, hardly the kind of news the Nets wanted to announce with the start of training camp on Oct. 1.The 29-year-old Williams, who suffered with ankle problems last season, is now in a walking boot, the team said, but is expected to be ready to participate when training camp begins at Duke University.Or at least the Nets hope he will be. Last season, ankle problems definitely impacted Williams's performance on the court. "I can't dunk, I can't jump," he said at one point.He had a series of cortisone shots to address his ankle issues, as well as plasma therapy, and he did play significantly better in the latter part of the season, when he more closely resembled the point guard considered one of the best in the league. Over all, he averaged 18.9 points and 7.7 assists in 78 games.
ROSEMONT, Ill. — Shavonte Zellous scored 20 points to lead the defending-champion Indiana Fever in an 85-72 victory over the Chicago Sky in the opener of their Eastern Conference semifinal series Friday night.Briann January and Karima Christmas had 16 points each, Erlana Larkins added 12 points and 11 rebounds, and Tamika Catchings scored 11 points for the Fever.Elena Delle Donne scored 20 points to lead Chicago after receiving the league's Rookie of the Year award before the game. Epiphanny Prince had 19 points and Sylvia Fowles, selected as the Defensive Player of the Year, added 16 points and 10 rebounds.Indiana, the only playoff team with a losing record in the regular season, was in control for most of the night against the conference's top seed. Catchings' basket with 5:36 left in the third quarter gave the Fever a 19-point lead, and the Sky got no closer than 12 the rest of the way against a defense that allowed a league-low 70.5 points per game.Game 2 in the best-of-three series is Sunday in Indianapolis.The Fever had the league's lowest shooting percentage at 39.3, but made 51 percent of their shots and had five players score at least 11 points.For Chicago, it was a disappointing start to the franchise's first playoff appearance. In their eighth season, the Sky had a team-record 24 wins and led the East by seven games. However, they lost to Indiana for the fourth time in five meetings this year.The Fever, who lost nine players to injury during the season and four for at least 16 games, were once again without forward Katie Douglas. After appearing in just four regular season games because of a back injury, Douglas did not play after aggravating the injury earlier this week.The Fever took their first double-digit lead with 6:29 left in the first half when Layshia Clarendon hit a 3-pointer from the right corner, giving Indiana a 37-26 lead. The Fever eventually went up by 15 and held a 50-37 advantage at halftime.Indiana shot 56.7 percent from the floor during the first half, including 66.7 percent on 3-pointers.
Deron Williams was not deemed healthy enough to play dodgeball Thursday, but he still expects to be on the court Oct. 1, when the Nets begin training camp.Williams, who sprained his right ankle about two weeks ago, was wearing a walking boot at the dodgeball tournament he hosted in Manhattan for his foundation, Point of Hope, which benefits autism research. He said his ankle was sore and inflamed, but he called the boot a precautionary measure."They have me in it now so I don't have to worry about it when the season starts," Williams said.Williams worked out for a few days after sustaining the injury, but the pain lingered, so he had a magnetic resonance imaging test. Williams, who battled pain in both ankles for much of last season, said the Nets were being extra careful."It's frustrating because I wanted to be hooping with the guys right now," he said.Williams said he expected to have the boot off by next week, after a follow-up examination.Williams and the Nets are looking to jell early after adding several new faces. Several players worked out together this summer in Los Angeles, and most of the team members have already arrived in the New York and New Jersey area to get ready for the season."The best part is probably us sitting in the locker room, talking and getting to know one another," said Paul Pierce, who was traded to the Nets by the Boston Celtics in the off-season. "That's how you build chemistry."Pierce has shown a willingness to engage in spirited interborough banter. He was asked Thursday about Knicks guard J. R. Smith, who called Pierce "a bitter person" after Pierce was quoted as saying the Nets would be the city's pre-eminent team."Who?" Pierce said. "Who we talking about right now? Exactly. Who we talking about? We talking about nothing."
In the sandy brick gymnasium at Abraham Lincoln High School, in Coney Island in Brooklyn, foldout chairs were laid out, and a podium was in place for an announcement by yet another basketball prodigy who had decided to leave home.There were blue and white balloons and streamers hanging from the lofted indoor track. "I Made It" by the rapper Kevin Rudolf blared on the sound system. A neon orange banner sent congratulations to Isaiah Whitehead, considered the top player in New York City.Like Stephon Marbury, Sebastian Telfair and Lance Stephenson, three Lincoln stars before him, Whitehead chose to remove himself from New York City entirely — although Whitehead is not going far away. Quietly, if not timidly, he revealed that he would commit to Seton Hall, in South Orange, N.J."I want to set my own path," Whitehead said.The 12th-best prospect in the country, according to Scout.com, Whitehead had whittled his choices to Indiana, Pittsburgh, Minnesota, Seton Hall and St. John's. A 6-foot-4 shooting guard, Whitehead said he came to the conclusion Wednesday night after an unofficial visit that day to the St. John's campus."I picked Seton Hall to bring the program back to where it used to be," said Whitehead, who led Lincoln to the city championship this spring.It took only seconds before another neon orange banner was unfurled behind him as he spoke, this one spelling out, "Seton Hall." Royal blue Pirates T-shirts were dispersed to Whitehead's teammates, and the cheerleading squad performed a jubilant routine."Up until last night, St. John's was up in his mind," Rambert said. "Everybody was telling him, 'New York City, New York City, New York City.'"But I think sometimes you've got to get a little bit away from home," Rambert added. "He needed to be someplace where he's going to be close to me, but he can't just get up and get on the train and go to the house."For months, Whitehead seemed destined for a place like Syracuse, Louisville, Arizona or U.C.L.A., top-flight programs that had all expressed sincere interest in him. Over the summer, that interest appeared to wane. St. John's met with Whitehead in April, but the Red Storm, already with six scholarship guards on its roster, had begun focusing its recruiting efforts elsewhere.According to a person with knowledge of Whitehead's recruitment, St. John's would not offer Whitehead a guaranteed starting spot. Perhaps just as important, St. John's would not offer Morton a spot on its coaching staff.Morton, a longtime city basketball power broker, did not exactly refute the reports that he would soon be joining Seton Hall's bench, if not this season then next. He reiterated his desire to coach in college."Tristate area is my strength," Morton said, "so help me out."Morton acknowledged his heavy influence in Whitehead's recruitment. He said that Seton Hall had been quietly there all along and that, despite not making the N.C.A.A. tournament since 2006, the Pirates provided a blank slate for Whitehead to flourish.Blue and white streamers fell from the ceiling, covering the audience, including the girls' volleyball team, which was trying to clear the court so it could practice. Then the cheerleaders began to clap and chant, and the noise interrupted Morton's impromptu news conference. He used the diversion to slip away, walking toward the back of the gym, behind the scenes.
SAN FRANCISCO — Former basketball star Shaquille O'Neal has become the newest minority owner of the Sacramento Kings, which California investors bought in May after a tug-of-war with a Seattle group, a team spokeswoman said on Monday.O'Neal now holds a minority stake of the Kings and will be introduced as the newest of the basketball team's owners at a practice facility in California's capital on Tuesday, said Kings spokeswoman Donna Schwartze.She declined to give further details ahead of Tuesday's event, including the size of the stake or what role O'Neal might play with the team.A basketball player turned rapper and sports analyst, O'Neal joins an ownership group led by tech developer and philanthropist Vivek Ranadive, which bought a 65 percent stake in the Kings in a deal valuing the team at $535 million.The group formed after the Kings' previous owners, the wealthy Maloof family, agreed in January to sell the team to a handful of Seattle investors, including hedge fund manager Chris Hansen and Microsoft Chief Executive Steve Ballmer, who planned to relocate the team to their Pacific Northwest city.In May, following months of bidding, the National Basketball Association denied Seattle's proposal and the Maloofs struck a deal with the local investor group to keep the Kings in place.O'Neal, who played for the Los Angeles Lakers and a host of other teams including the Miami Heat, agreed in June to tutor Kings center DeMarcus Cousins and act as an informal adviser to the team.The Entertainment and Sports Programming Network (ESPN) last week named the Kings as the worst franchise in professional sports based on the team's rankings. The 2013-14 NBA season tips off on October 29.In response, the Kings posted a banner on its official website that said, "Hey ESPN… Nice Airball" with the tagline "New Era, New Swagger.""We love ESPN, but think they could have given us the benefit of foresight in their rankings," said Kings President and Chief Operating Officer Chris Granger. "They know what we have going here."USA Today quoted O'Neal as responding by saying the only direction the Kings have to go now is up."Worst is at the bottom, which means you can't get no worser," he said. "There's no such thing as worser, which means we can only get better. And we will get better. Once that new arena comes, once that new downtown is up, once we have a conversation with the players and get everybody to step up, they'll be knocking on the door."
NEW YORK — The 2015 NBA All-Star weekend will be split between two New York arenas, with Madison Square Garden to host the game, two people with knowledge of the plans said Tuesday.Barclays Center in Brooklyn will host the Saturday skills events, the people confirmed to The Associated Press on condition of anonymity because the plans were to be announced at a press conference Wednesday.Commissioner David Stern, Deputy Commissioner Adam Silver and New York Mayor Michael Bloomberg will attend the press conference, along with officials from Madison Square Garden and Barclays Center.The league has been working with the Knicks and Nets for months on the plan to split the events. The New York Post first reported that MSG would host the Sunday night game.The league last split sites for its midseason showcase in 2010, when the Saturday events were in the Dallas Mavericks' arena and the game was held at the Cowboys' stadium.The slam dunk and 3-point contests are the highlights of the Saturday night events.The game last came to Madison Square Garden in 1998 and has gone exclusively to warm-weather cities in recent years. Now it will come back to New York a year after the city hosts the Super Bowl and show off two top arenas.MSG is one of the most famous arenas in sports and has undergone a three-year renovation project. The $1 billion Barclays Center opened a year ago and has quickly landed many top entertainment events.The 2014 All-Star game is set for New Orleans.
In a city where Kevin Johnson, a former N.B.A. star, is the mayor, an even bigger retired star with a crateful of nicknames, Shaquille O'Neal , announced Tuesday that he had bought a piece of the Sacramento Kings . He promptly rechristened the city "Shaqramento."O'Neal is part of a Kings reboot as big as his size 22 feet. The team appeared headed to Seattle, but league owners rejected the move in May. Instead, the Kings were sold by the Maloof family to a group led by Vivek Ranadive, a software magnate.They have hired a new coach and a new general manager. And a futuristic new downtown home for the team is being planned — one that O'Neal cryptically described as an "indoor-outdoor" facility that he vowed would be the world's greatest arena.O'Neal, an analyst on TNT's "Inside the N.B.A.," will apparently be an active partner. He will tutor DeMarcus Cousins, a talented but inconsistent center, to be the team's leader; help build the Kings into a global brand with a near-term focus on India, where Ranadive is from; assist the general manager, Pete D'Alessandro; and rejuvenate a franchise that was once one of the league's best but was recently named by ESPN The Magazine the worst of 122 sports franchises that it had surveyed."My friend Steve Jobs used to say, 'Let's put a dent in the universe,' " Ranadive said at a news conference Tuesday, with O'Neal seated beside him. "And I invited Shaq to help us put a dent in the sports and N.B.A. universe."O'Neal has started playing nice in Sacramento, 11 years after he called the Kings the Queens. Several months before his remarks, his Los Angeles Lakers defeated the Kings in a seven-game playoff series. That reference and other insults have not been forgotten.The Sacramento Bee published a snide editorial on Monday when news broke of O'Neal's investment in the Kings.Headlined "Shaq, Can We Buy You a Tiara?" the editorial mused, "Some may wonder why anyone would want Shaq as a face of the team, given that his face includes a rather large mouth known to open and say almost anything."O'Neal spun his moldy trash talk into praise for the Kings of yore, and their fans, when Arco Arena was so loud that, he said, the Lakers had a difficult time finishing off the Kings. "I was a marketing expert and I wanted to rile the people up," he said.Challenged to apologize, he did, and he played a new role as the Big Conciliator to his new constituency: "I love the people of Sacramento and I'll be here a lot. If you see me, give me a hug. Give me a kiss. I'm sorry. I apologize."O'Neal, the part owner, will continue to work for TNT, along with his fellow analysts Charles Barkley and Kenny Smith.He said that he had the time for both jobs and saw no potential conflicts of interest. But a studio analyst who owns a small part of a team raises the appearance of conflicts if, for example, he does not divulge what he knows about a player because he is an insider."I'm not going to hold nothing back because I'm a part owner," he said in an interview. "I'm not worried about being criticized. I am still going to be critical, but I'm not a basher. I think people respect our work. We've all played at high levels."TNT has permitted such arrangements before. As a part owner of the Lakers, Magic Johnson was a studio analyst for TNT before he moved to ESPN, where he plays a similar role (although he sold his Lakers stake to help buy into the Dodgers). Steve Kerr stayed a TNT game analyst when he became a part owner of the Phoenix Suns. He later left TNT to be the Suns' general manager. He eventually resigned, and rejoined TNT.A TNT spokesman said in a statement that the network expected all its analysts to deliver objective analysis, and added, "Shaq's new role with the Sacramento Kings does not change our expectations."
EAST RUTHERFORD, N.J. — Jason Kidd acknowledged Tuesday that he had purchased a small share of the Nets franchise — a half of Jay Z's share, which was only a fraction of a percent — citing the rise of the team's profile as a reason behind his investment."I think you look at the product of where the brand is going, and I'm a big believer that it's going in the right direction," Kidd said. "So, like any investment, you tend to go with a company that is going in the right direction, and I feel like this is a company that is going in the right direction."But as Kidd, 40, made clear, he still needs to adjust to his role as one of the brand's main stewards.Speaking for about a half-hour at the Nets practice center during his first formal news conference since June, when he was named the team's coach, Kidd cataloged the lessons he has been learning, the potential challenges to come and the expectations he holds for the Nets, who are expected to be championship contenders.It will be no small task, Kidd acknowledged, and the preparation has been rigorous. He attended a two-day coaches clinic this summer and digested advice from Phil Jackson, Pat Riley, Doc Rivers and Frank Vogel, among others. He reviewed every Nets game from last season, from their Nov. 3 opener to their Game 7 loss last spring to the Chicago Bulls.Last season's team, he concluded, did not have a strong identity. It was, to use his word, vanilla."There was no flavor," Kidd said.Kidd said adding the veteran stars Kevin Garnett and Paul Pierce, among other new players, would help change that. Pierce also used a food metaphor during his introductory news conference in July, saying the team had the ingredients to win, but would need "salt and pepper and all the spices."The ingredients will begin to come together Monday, when the team flies to Durham, N.C., to hold five days of preseason practice at Duke.For all the talent that will travel there, questions about health and chemistry will probably persist all season. Kidd has only begun answering them.He joked that his conversations with Garnett about sitting out certain games "wasn't very nice." In a more serious tone, he said Garnett probably deserved a chance to play substantial minutes, at least at first, to develop a rhythm.Monitoring Pierce's minutes would be a delicate challenge, too. But Kidd said he expected his accomplishments as a player over a 19-year N.B.A. career had earned him some credibility with his veteran players."We battled against each other, so respect is there," Kidd said.During a wide-ranging discussion, Kidd said the team would continue to be cautious with Deron Williams, who has been dealing with a sprained ankle. And asked about who, from such a collection of players, might be the best candidate to take a game's final shot, he singled out Joe Johnson, noting he was 9 of 10 with 24 seconds or less left on the clock last season.Such things will remain to be seen. It is clear enough now, though, as Kidd pointed out, that the Nets as a brand are on the rise. As they enter the season, they appear capable of engendering endless intrigue, and Kidd's presence has plenty to do with that. But as he also noted, he has adjustments to make."I'm trying to get onto that coaches side," Kidd said, somewhat jokingly. "The more time I spend with coaches, I'm picking up their lingo, their language."
The N.B.A. is expected to announce Wednesday that New York will host the All-Star Game in 2015.The hosting of the annual event will be shared by the Knicks and the Nets, who will hold events in Manhattan and in Brooklyn.Adam Silver, the league's deputy commissioner, said in February that one of the New York teams would be awarded the game.A person with knowledge of Wednesday's announcement said that the game would take place at Madison Square Garden and that many of the weekend's other events — the dunk contest, the 3-point shooting contest and the skills challenge — would be held at Barclays Center.Since the Nets moved to Brooklyn last year, the rivalry between the two teams has intensified on and off the court. It may have grown even more this summer when the Nets acquired Paul Pierce, a Knicks tormentor throughout his 15-year career with the Boston Celtics. After the acquisition, Pierce spoke of his hatred for the Knicks and predicted that the Nets would be the better New York team. The Knicks' J. R. Smith scoffed at Pierce's remarks soon after.Each team has wanted the All-Star Game, without the other involved, for several years. The $1 billion Barclays Center, which opened a year ago, is the newest arena in the N.B.A. The Garden is set to finish a three-year, $800 million renovation next month. The league ultimately decided that both teams were worthy.Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg is expected to be at the news conference Wednesday alongside Commissioner David Stern and Silver. The Knicks' owner, James L. Dolan, and Bruce C. Ratner, a Nets minority owner and the developer of Barclays Center, will also be there.The All-Star Game will be played in New Orleans next season. The Garden last hosted the game in 1998, when Michael Jordan was named the most valuable player.
On a stage in Manhattan, Dolan sat next to N.B.A. Commissioner David Stern and Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg as the league formally announced that the Knicks and the Nets would host the events of the N.B.A.'s All-Star weekend in 2015.In previous years, Dolan did not want his Knicks to share New York's or the league's spotlight with the Nets, who moved to Brooklyn last year.In his prepared remarks, Dolan used the words "friends" and "Brooklyn" in the same sentence before saying, "We're looking forward to giving our rivalry a rest for a little bit."Dolan then answered a few questions from reporters, which he had not done since March 12, 2007."The rivalry is a good thing for New York; it's enjoyable," he said. "As far as how the teams will go, I'm not going to make any predictions here."He added, "My hope is that both teams have a lot of players in the All-Star Game."Two years ago, the league approached the two teams with the idea of splitting the All-Star events, which has never been done before. Stern emphasized that both teams were willing to compromise during the negotiation process.The All-Star Game, the biggest of the events, will be held at Madison Square Garden. Barclays Center, which opened last year, will host the dunk contest, the 3-point shooting contest and the skills challenge.New York last hosted the All-Star Game in 1998."It was time to get the game back to New York," Adam Silver, the league's deputy commissioner, said. "It was truly a unique circumstance given that both organizations knew we weren't going to come back to New York two years in row."One reason the teams have been willing to work together is that they, along with the city, are set to profit from the events. The league was attracted to the idea of fans' watching the world's best players in two gleaming arenas. The $1 billion Barclays Center is the newest arena in the N.B.A., and the Garden's $800 million renovation is expected to be finished next month."New York City is the basketball capital of the world, and it's the sport's biggest stage," Bloomberg said. "It always has been and always will be that. Our venues are the greatest. This is another slam dunk for New York City."Perhaps the biggest challenge for the league will be deciding how many season-ticket holders from each team will be able to attend the game and the other events. It is expected that the league will select an equal number of season-ticket holders through a lottery.The league also plans to have clinics, autograph sessions and community service events with players in the city's five boroughs.The only major figure missing from the news conference was the Nets' owner, Mikhail D. Prokhorov, who has never been afraid to boast about his team to reporters. After the news conference, Silver said the Nets had expressed a desire to host the All-Star Game, and all of its events, on their own in the coming years.Prokhorov, in a statement released by the league, said, "We are also excited to bring the All-Star Game to Barclays Center in the very near future."If the Nets were awarded the game, Silver said, the Knicks would have to decide if they wanted to partner again with their new rival. Stern said he did not want to give either team leverage in the next round of negotiations for the All-Star Game."That actually helps feed the rivalry and the appearance of the rivalry," Stern said. "And that's quite good for the business of both of them."
In an unexpected move just days before the opening of training camp, the Knicks disclosed Thursday that they were bringing back one of their former executives to serve as team president and general manager.Steve Mills, one of the highest-ranking officials at Madison Square Garden before departing in June 2009, will replace Glen Grunwald, who had spent the past three seasons helping to transform the Knicks into a competitive team. Grunwald will remain with the team as an adviser. He had been the Knicks' general manager and executive vice president.Mills, 53, was the president of Madison Square Garden Sports from 2003 to 2008, a period in which the Knicks were in disarray on and off the court. It was Mills who recommended that Isiah Thomas be hired as the Knicks' president in December 2003.The move came to haunt Mills when another team executive he had hired, Anucha Browne Sanders, sued Thomas and the Garden in January 2006, charging sexual harassment. Browne Sanders and the Knicks settled the case for $11.5 million in 2007.A year after the trial, Mills was replaced as M.S.G. Sports president by Scott O'Neil. Mills had previously ceded authority over the Knicks when the team named Donnie Walsh as team president in April 2008.Mills, once viewed as a possible successor to Billy Hunter as the executive director of the N.B.A. players union, has never been a general manager. That raises questions about whom he will rely on for input when it comes to personnel decisions.Because Mills brought Thomas to the Knicks, there is certain to be speculation that Thomas, who has maintained a relationship with Dolan since leaving the Knicks, will have a major voice in the organization, advising Mills regardless of whether the Knicks give him a title.In August 2010, the Knicks announced that Thomas would return to the team as a part-time consultant while continuing to coach Florida International University. The N.B.A., however, said that such an arrangement would violate its rules.Thomas has since been dismissed by F.I.U., so that conflict no longer exists. A person with ties to Madison Square Garden and with knowledge of the Knicks' situation maintained that the hiring of Mills would not set the stage for Thomas to have an influential role with the team."This is not an Isiah story," said the person, who spoke on condition of anonymity.The decision to replace Grunwald, 55, with Mills may be an effort by the Knicks to position themselves for the pursuit of stars.Dolan may have concluded that Mills, who also worked a number of years for the N.B.A. in addition to his decade with the Knicks, and who got to know a significant number of agents and top players as he vied in recent months for the union job, will be a good person to lead the team's free-agent efforts.Those efforts could include finding a way to shed the final part of Amar'e Stoudemire's contract after this season to create cap maneuverability and possibly even make another run at LeBron James when he becomes eligible for free agency next summer. Mills could also lead an effort to lure another star player to the Knicks after this season, in part to persuade Carmelo Anthony to stay in New York. Anthony can opt out of his contract next summer.It seems possible that the Knicks, feeling the pressure of a much more visible and competitive Nets team nearby in Brooklyn, have concluded that their team needs a more accessible public face and that Mills would do well in that role.Since joining the Knicks in 2006 from the Toronto Raptors and taking over as general manager in June 2011, Grunwald has infrequently engaged with reporters, although he has only been following the Dolan playbook, which has generally restricted media access to team executives, including himself.In his time in charge, Grunwald made some adept moves, taking a chance on Jeremy Lin, a journeyman who became a phenomenon, albeit a short-lived one.He also signed Tyson Chandler, a steady presence in the middle for the last two seasons. One of his most recent moves was to sign the talented, and sometimes combustible, veteran Metta World Peace to a two-year deal.Grunwald will now advise Mills, at least to some extent. But Mills, who played college basketball at Princeton, can also turn to two Knicks front-office executives — John Gabriel and Mark Warkentien — who were previously N.B.A. general managers, Gabriel with Orlando and Warkentien with Denver. In addition, Mills will work with Allan Houston, a former Knicks star and the current assistant general manager.Mills most recently was working as the chief executive of Athletes and Entertainers Wealth Management.In a statement, Dolan said Mills was the "right person to help us reach our ultimate goal of winning an N.B.A. championship."That might eventually happen, although in the immediate future Mills might be happy just keeping the Knicks ahead of the Nets.
DEERFIELD, Ill. — Derrick Rose sat in front of a microphone at Bulls media day dressed in his home white jersey. He took a sip of Gatorade, then flashed the megawatt smile Chicago had been waiting for since the day he collapsed in a heap on the United Center floor with a torn anterior cruciate ligament during a playoff game nearly a year and a half ago."I'm feeling healthy," Rose said to the assembled assortment of reporters and television cameras. "I'm happy to be back."Rose will begin his long-awaited comeback Oct. 5 in a preseason game in Indianapolis against the Pacers, but Friday's media day was as much about clearing the air as it was about his hopes for this season after he sat out 2012-13. It was not really the missed time that left a bitter taste in the mouths of Chicago fans and basketball observers; it was his frustratingly opaque status all the way through the Bulls' second-round playoff loss to the Miami Heat.Neither Rose nor the Bulls officially declared him out for the season, and by the end of the playoffs the situation had evolved into a national debate over his toughness, with Rose even drawing criticism in Chicago, his hometown.On Friday, Rose explained his thought process. He offered no apologies."As a fan, of course I would want my favorite player to be back out there," Rose said. "At the same time, I had to be selfish. With the thought of me going back out there and injuring myself again, I didn't want to put myself in that position."He said he did not want to return during the playoffs when he was not fully healthy, specifically noting that at the time he could not handle a playoff double team. But, he said, he was aware of the swirling criticism."You hear stuff," Rose said. "But there's nothing you can do about it."The Bulls organization reiterated its support for its franchise player. General Manager Gar Forman and Coach Tom Thibodeau said that Rose followed the team's instructions in proceeding cautiously through his recovery."He did exactly what Jerry asked him to do," Thibodeau said, referring to Jerry Reinsdorf, the Bulls' owner. "The criticism was unwarranted. You're talking about a guy who is as loyal as they come to his family, to his teammates, to our organization, to the city."As for what a year off means for Rose's game, the answers will come soon enough in Indianapolis. The Bulls would not discuss specifics about his playing time, but Thibodeau, Rose and the training staff will monitor his progress and make collective decisions. Rose said he expected to play without restrictions.Rose was the league's most valuable player in the 2010-11 season, establishing himself as one of the N.B.A.'s biggest stars. Five months before he was injured, he signed a five-year, $95 million contract extension. His game was built on a rare combination of strength and explosiveness around the rim. Rose promised there would be no change in his style with a reconstructed knee.Instead, after spending the summer working out in Los Angeles, Rose said he believed the opportunity to study and reflect during his time off had made him a better player."I'm way more confident in my craft and my game," he said. "I worked a whole year, trained my body. I'm a more efficient player. That's what I'm trying to prove."The Bulls return with a roster that persevered without him and are a trendy pick to challenge and perhaps unseat the Heat, the three-time defending Eastern Conference champions.Three years ago at media day at Berto Center, Rose asked a crowd of reporters why he was not considered an M.V.P. candidate, and then proceeded to win the award. He did not make any grand proclamations this year, speaking only of his desire to bring a championship to Chicago.Asked whether he had watched a replay of his gruesome injury, Rose said he had — as many as 20 or 30 times. Now he will have fresh game film to dissect."Everything happens for a reason," Rose said. "I'm just glad I'm past it."
Even stifled behind a cold-induced rasp, Kevin Garnett 's personality was irrepressible Monday, as bubbly, dynamic and intriguing as ever.He razzed reporters for their questions during the Nets' media day at Barclays Center and then offered them expressive answers. He sounded confident and vulnerable, open and oblique. He laughed and smiled and was charismatic. He glowered.Jason Kidd, the first-year coach, raised eyebrows earlier this month when he asserted the team did not have an identity last season. Whatever character the group did have, Kidd said, was "just vanilla."Well, here is Garnett to change that."We're here to get another ring," Garnett said. "It's the only reason we came to Brooklyn." And when a reporter piped up to ask a new question, Garnett interjected, "the oooonly reason we came to Brooklyn," inducing raucous laughter inside the room.Garnett, 37, was traded to the Nets this summer, joining a glamorous package from the Boston Celtics that also included Paul Pierce and Jason Terry. His reluctance at first to waive his no-trade clause and to leave New England for New York has been well documented, and he made clear Monday that he was still getting used to living here.It has become clear that Garnett, however he feels about a city, will emerge as an outsize presence from it. And though he may no longer be able to carry a team on his back, he may still provide its heartbeat.The stories about him were flowing from other Nets players.Andray Blatche described Garnett's contribution to the players' informal off-season workouts: "As soon as K. G. got onto the court, things just" — here he snapped his fingers — "went off."Brook Lopez said seeing Garnett in the team weight room last week was "pretty surreal." Joe Johnson said he was realizing that Garnett, for all his intensity, was "more of a class clown type of guy." And Reggie Evans, who assumed a mentoring role last season, said Garnett would be an "even bigger, bigger big brother" to the team's young players.The coaching staff will feel Garnett's big presence, too. Last week, Kidd and Garnett chatted about the possibility that he would not play back-to-back games during the season to preserve his legs. Asked on Monday about that talk, Garnett said, "It didn't go too well."As the laughter subsided, he added, "I'm just being honest."Garnett said he fully understood Kidd's position. But he would not apologize for his stubbornness."I just don't want to be told anything," Garnett said. "I hope that I've earned the right to have an opinion in something that I'm doing. But I think more importantly, seriously, from a chemistry standpoint, I think it's important for me to be out with everybody."That chemistry will begin to take shape Tuesday when the Nets begin their five-day training camp at Duke in Durham, N.C. The players said Monday that the trip would give them valuable time to bond and blend, away from the New York news media.According to a team spokesman, the Nets issued 150 credentials for Monday's event to 60 organizations. It was a marked increase from last season, one attributable to Garnett, Pierce, and Andrei Kirilenko, a high-profile free-agent acquisition.From the various news media came similar questions about the health of an aging team; the stars sharing shots and managing egos; and the team toughness or the lack thereof."If you look at Game 7, we kind of were soft — that's the only way to put it," point guard Deron Williams said, referring to the first-round playoff loss to the Chicago Bulls. "I don't see that being a problem this year."And Garnett, a 15-time All-Star, will have everything to do with changing that. The Nets now possess an archetype — a caricature, even — for the intense, impassioned professional. And being traded, he admitted Monday, has given him a new competitive edge.To a team that did not have an identity, he provides an oversize one.Deron Williams (sprained ankle) will be on the court Tuesday but will take things slow. "I could probably go out and do everything," he said Monday, "but if I tweak my ankle, if I have a setback, then that wouldn't be good." ... Nineteen players are expected to be at training camp. Forwards Gary Forbes and Chris Johnson and guards Jorge Gutierrez and Marko Jaric were signed in the past week. The Nets already had 15 players on guaranteed contracts, though, so the new players are unlikely to make the roster.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — Only after Amar'e Stoudemire climbed onto the dais and took a seat on a folding chair did he begin the painstaking process of figuring out how to position his legs underneath a table that was not designed for especially large human beings. Then again, what was one more challenge?Stoudemire knew he was about to field a series of questions Monday about his knees, his durability and his career, which has been on a slow downward arc in recent seasons, his production eroding with the accumulation of age and injury. But first, he had to deal with this table."Hold on a second," he said. "Let me get these legs straightened out, brother. Jeez, Louise. Tight squeeze up here."At the Knicks' annual preseason media day, Stoudemire did not have a starring role. That was left to Carmelo Anthony and his championship ambitions; to General Manager Steve Mills, and his week-old quest to do everything he can to retain Anthony's services beyond next summer; and even to Metta World Peace, who prefaced his appearance on the platform by wading into a sea of reporters with a team-issued microphone and conducting his own interviews.There was a time, not so long ago, when Stoudemire was the team's primary source of intrigue and promise. On Monday, though, as he acknowledged having what he described as a "minor" operation on his left knee over the summer, all the bold talk was gone. Instead, Stoudemire spoke about his course of rehabilitation, the brittle nature of his profession and his unconditional belief that "miracles can happen every day." The not-so-subtle subtext was that he might need one, now more than ever."The N.B.A. is not an easy job," Stoudemire said. "As you get older, you play this game for 82 games a year, and you play 11 or 12 years, your body tends to break down. That being said, the coaching staff, the medical staff — I think we all understand what it takes to try to prolong a player's career, and that's what they're doing here with my situation."Stoudemire, 30, who signed a five-year, $100 million contract with the Knicks in 2010, has had his career deteriorate because of chronic knee trouble. He has had three operations in the past 12 months, though his health problems predate his time in New York. In 2005, when he was with the Phoenix Suns, he had microfracture surgery on his left knee. The next season, he had arthroscopic surgery on his right knee.Last season, the toll was apparent. Limited to 29 regular-season games, Stoudemire averaged 14.2 points and 5 rebounds."My goal is to stay faithful and to understand that anything can happen," Stoudemire said, adding, "I want to bounce back and become the player that I know I am."Mills said the team would take a cautious approach with Stoudemire, who said he expected to be under a strict minutes limit — something in the range of 20 to 25 minutes a game — once he returned. Of course, it remains unclear when that will be. Stoudemire has yet to resume basketball activities, and the bulk of his training camp will involve trips to the swimming pool and the weight room."The bottom line is to try to get Stat through a full season so he's ready to go for the playoffs," Coach Mike Woodson said, referring to Stoudemire by his nickname. "That's something that's going to have to be managed by myself and the medical staff. And we have to be creative in how we go about it."The Knicks are not a young team, and Stoudemire is not the only player who used the off-season to address nagging injuries. Anthony (shoulder), Tyson Chandler (neck) and J. R. Smith (knee), to name three, are all in various states of repair. As Anthony put it, "I want to say I feel 100 percent, but I haven't felt 100 percent since I was a little kid."As for Stoudemire, the Knicks attempted to insure themselves against another long absence by acquiring Andrea Bargnani from the Toronto Raptors in an off-season trade. It seems clear that the team does not plan to lean on Stoudemire, at least not for a while.A proud player whose body has undermined his skills, Stoudemire sounded like someone who was finally coming to terms with his physical limitations."It's a matter of now just trying to maintain strength and health to have some solid and very productive years," he said.Still, there were moments when Stoudemire summoned some of his old defiance, the younger version of himself who considered himself a superstar on par with Kobe Bryant and LeBron James — and was not shy about saying so. He said he still hoped to reach his "full potential." He offered an important reminder."My career isn't over yet," he said.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — It didn't take long for Steve Mills to address his primary mission in assuming the Knicks ' top executive position last week, courtesy of his former and once again benefactor, James L. Dolan. On N.B.A. media day, Mills explained how the job opportunity appeared suddenly, announced the exercising of an option year for Coach Mike Woodson and then got down to the business of what promises to be a season of breathtaking pandering to Carmelo Anthony ."He clearly is one of those superstar players that don't come around very often, and the things he has done to make this team successful and to represent this city is something that's very important," Mills said. "So while it's premature in the process, we've made it clear that we have every intention of making Carmelo a Knick for a long time to come."Given a chance to declare it a mutual love affair and to say he couldn't wait to put his Carmelo Hancock on a Knicks contract extension, Anthony politely abstained."When the time comes, I'll deal with that," he said. "I'm not going to go through the season thinking about my contract."In other words, the onus is on Knicks management not to leave Anthony, the franchise hub, in the increasingly likely position of being the face of an era that featured him scoring more points than anyone could remember but winning few playoff rounds. (In three playoff seasons in New York, Anthony's Knicks have won one series.)To apparently make it look as if he was doing something, anything, Dolan replaced Glen Grunwald — who carried only the title of general manager — with Mills, a former Madison Square Garden 10-year executive who returned as general manager as well as president.Mills proceeded to announce he had come with the assignment of "rebuilding the basketball organization" — strange for a team that billed itself as a championship contender last season and continued to do so Monday.Mills mentioned things like skill sets and analytic trends — he's a Princeton man — but maybe he can begin by rebuilding the Knicks' relationship with the public. Fans may not care that reporters have worked in a suffocating environment, but most ticket buyers would agree they've been gouged for everything but the air inside the renovated world's most famous arena without enough postseason reward.Now there is a building in Brooklyn and a team inside it to provide stiff competition in the Atlantic Division and for attention in the New York market. No question, the Nets have created an interesting dynamic and quandary for the Knicks as they plot their future beyond this season. Perhaps in Dolan's ever-changing mind, this necessitated the abrupt executive maneuver.Remember how much the Nets wanted Anthony when he was trying to leverage his way out of Denver during the 2010-11 season? They had no chance because they were still in New Jersey and for all Anthony knew, Barclays Center was in some meadow near Kennedy Airport as opposed to its convenient transportation junction at the Atlantic Rail Yards.After a dispiriting second-round defeat to the Indiana Pacers in the playoffs, the Knicks are widely viewed as a team that will struggle to equal or better the 54 regular-season victories that put them second in the Eastern Conference. Having added Kevin Garnett and Paul Pierce, the Nets — if only on paper — would seem to be the division favorite and a stronger overall contender.In a manner of speaking that Anthony and Garnett could better relate to, the Knicks seem to be in the metaphorical role as the Cheerios while the Nets may well be good enough to be Honey Nut.What if the Knicks should slide backward and lose again in the first round, and it becomes apparent that they must do something drastic next summer to retain Anthony? One would think that Madison Square Garden would be an attraction enough to eventually draw a companion star for Anthony, assuming cap room can be cleared by trading Tyson Chandler's or Amar'e Stoudemire's expiring contract in 2015.Not the case, apparently. It takes a well-credentialed or connected recruiter to land the great ones these days, which is why LeBron James wound up in Miami with Pat Riley. Through no fault of his own, Grunwald was treated as if he were under house arrest in Dolan's oppressive environment and had no profile. Dolan may have finally woken up to the need for a frontman with a face familiar to the players.Far from famous, Mills was a Magic Johnson-endorsed candidate for the vacant directorship of the National Basketball Players Association and was recently the chief executive officer for a wealth management company that focused on athletes and celebrities as clients.He said that Dolan would allow him to make his own organizational hires, so expect more front-office change and speculation about Isiah Thomas, who was Mills's 2003 hire for the position he now occupies. It's all become very incestuous at the Garden, reminiscent of the musical chairs George Steinbrenner used to play with Billy Martin, Lou Piniella and Gene Michael, among others.Anthony, an affable scoring machine, may be too enamored of his celebrity life in New York to go elsewhere. But what if the Garden becomes the home of the bland and Anthony decides it won't be fun to stick around to take his share of the blame?With so much already invested in Anthony, the last thing the star-struck Dolan can afford to have him say is, "Cheerio, old chap." General Mills has his marching orders.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — Knicks Coach Mike Woodson ponders how to get his star player, Carmelo Anthony, the ball in space. He works to make sure J. R. Smith stays disciplined — on and off the court. Woodson searches for the correct workload for Amar'e Stoudemire and his aging, tender knees.Woodson rarely thinks about himself. Yet he had to contemplate where he stood within the organization after the owner, James L. Dolan, made a surprising decision last Thursday to replace Woodson's longtime friend Glen Grunwald with Steve Mills as general manager. Woodson and Mills spent much of the last four days discussing the future of the team, how to improve it and how to handle the reshaped roster. On Monday, Mills made his first major decision, picking up the option on Woodson's contract for the 2014-15 season."I'm very excited about Mr. Dolan and Steve Mills giving me an opportunity to come back another year," Woodson said. "I tried to deal with my situation year to year. It's never been about me in terms of what I do. It's strictly about the team and what we're trying to pursue."Last season, Woodson led the Knicks to 54 wins, their best season since they won 57 in the 1996-1997 season, and their first Atlantic Division title since 1994. They also reached the second round of the playoffs for the first time since 2000.Mills, who has never been a general manager before, said the decision to give Woodson an extra year was easy."I was very happy to see what he was able to do with the team," Mills said. "That's something that we're really proud to announce."Mills also said on ESPN radio that he appreciated how Woodson was able to adapt and how he excelled last year when injuries riddled the roster.Woodson realizes he has just as many challenges this season as last.Woodson plans to use preseason games to experiment on whether he will keep Anthony at power forward. Playing Anthony there made the Knicks an offensive juggernaut as they made a league-record 891 3-pointers and Anthony won the scoring title.Woodson will have to find a suitable role for Andrea Bargnani, acquired in the off-season from the Toronto Raptors, and be more cautious with Stoudemire. Woodson also has to keep Smith, Metta World Peace and Kenyon Martin, all with combustible personalities, from disrupting the team's chemistry.In many ways, Woodson has exceeded expectations since Grunwald hired him in 2011 as the team's top assistant coach, a defensive coordinator to Coach Mike D'Antoni's speed offense. He took over as head coach when D'Antoni resigned in March 2012. Under Woodson, the team is 72-34.Woodson said Grunwald helped build the Knicks into contenders."Glen, along with Mr. Dolan and Mike D'Antoni, was very instrumental in me coming here," Woodson said of Grunwald, his former Indiana University teammate who now has an advisory role with the team. "I thank Glen for giving me that opportunity to come back to New York."Smith was the loudest of the Knicks to say Woodson deserved to be the coach beyond this season."Coach Woodson is by far the best coach I've ever had," Smith said, adding: "He's the most trusting coach I've had with my game. I'm excited for him. He's the perfect fit for the job. It's just that we have to get it done."
DURHAM, N.C. — The scene at the Nets ' team dinner late Monday night, hours after they arrived on the campus of Duke University to begin their weeklong training camp, resembled a support group or an intervention.How else to describe two dozen adults, pouring their hearts out, encouraging one another, securing promises to help one another, always?"That's what it looked like," Jason Terry said Tuesday. "We were all in a group. Everybody that's on this team and the coaching staff was all in a circle, and we all just talked. It was great."The meeting opened what the Nets hope will amount to a six-day, get-to-know-you session meant to jump-start a bonding among unfamiliar teammates.The setting made sense for a team that added seven new players and a new coaching staff. General Manager Billy King starred at Duke during the late 1980s and holds close ties to the university. The front office hopes the trip will shelter the players from the news media horde and various distractions they would otherwise have faced at home."Teams always grow together on the road," Brook Lopez said Tuesday after the first practice. "It's your family."The team's growth in camp could be slowed a tad as Deron Williams, who sprained his right ankle this off-season, participated on a limited basis. It was the same for Terry, who had arthroscopic surgery on his left knee in June. Terry estimated he could be back at full speed as early as Thursday. Williams seemed to be on a slightly longer timetable.But the players emphasized that what happened off the court mattered, too. Williams, who has been honest about the professional disquiet he has felt the past few seasons, marveled at the fresh feeling at this camp."The last couple of years, I've lost confidence," said Williams, who was traded to the Nets during the 2010-11 season. "Being on a losing team was tough for me. The first time in my career, I picked up bad habits, got negative at times, and it's hard to get out of that, when bad habits set in. Now, I've got great teammates, guys that'll keep me straight if things go south."It was a message that Terry, 36, Paul Pierce, 35, and Kevin Garnett, 37, relayed to Williams, 29, during the team meeting Monday night. "We just told him, 'Lean on us,' " Terry said. "We've seen all types of situations. We're here to help. I think he understands that."Beyond pledging their allegiance to one another, the Nets players used the meeting to speak about a mission statement, laying out who they want to be and what they want to do this season. Coach Jason Kidd said he and his staff mostly kept quiet during the meeting and listened as the players reiterated that their identity would be built on defense and sacrifice.And that was the focus on the court Tuesday. Mike Krzyzewski addressed the Nets before practice. Once it began, the assistant Lawrence Frank led a two-hour session that focused on defensive drills, while Kidd picked his spots for his opinions and instruction.Much more vocal was Garnett, whom Pierce described as "our defensive captain, our inspirational defensive leader." Garnett's voice, his teammates said, was the dominant sound during the team's dinner and meeting Monday night. It continued Tuesday, when he continually yelled out direction and encouragement during defensive drills.When the practice ended, the players huddled at center court and yelled together: "One, two, three, all in!"Lopez, 25, the team's longest-tenured player, bubbled about the team that has sprouted around him. He called it an honor to play alongside veterans he once idolized, to become their peer."Honestly, I was geeking out a little bit," Lopez said.It was only the first day, and enthusiasm was easy to find. Still, the players acknowledged there was a long road ahead. They would need to keep building trust and continue to preach sacrifice. On a more fundamental level, they would need to learn Kidd's system, which Terry called "gumbo," a mix of ingredients pulled from here and there.Knowing this, the Nets have come here hoping to shorten that process.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — When Beno Udrih made his N.B.A. debut with the San Antonio Spurs in 2004, it quickly became apparent to his teammates that he was a different type of player. It had nothing to do with his passing skills or his dependable jump shot. It had everything to do with how he thought about the game."He'd get flustered and frustrated with things that happened on the floor because he was always trying to think for other players," said Brent Barry, an analyst with NBA TV who played with Udrih for three seasons. "He really saw the game in a way I appreciated. He wanted to make it easier for everyone around him."Udrih, 31, a Slovene, has never needed to be the focal point of an offense, and there is little chance of that happening in his new role as a reserve with the Knicks. At point guard, Udrih considers himself a facilitator and sees vast upside in New York: an opportunity to play meaningful minutes and help the team vie for a championship."I've always had big goals," Udrih said. "All I'm trying to do is play hard and make sure that my teammates are happy. I like everything to be perfect. I like my teammates to be perfect. Sometimes, that has a downside, but I truly believe the little things matter. If the little things add up, it becomes a big thing."Udrih is a journeyman. As a younger player, he was employed by teams in Slovenia, Israel, Russia and Italy. Entering his 10th N.B.A. season, he has filled numerous roles: starter, backup, scorer, counselor. He has been places. He has seen things. The Knicks, who signed him to a one-year deal, will count on his wisdom, especially given the departure of Jason Kidd."He knows how to run a basketball team," said Coach Mike Woodson, who cited Udrih's experience with the Spurs, for whom he won two titles. "He's a nice piece to our team that can do a number of things."After initially describing Udrih as a "third point guard," Woodson corrected himself: "He's one of our point guards." It was an important distinction. On most N.B.A. rosters, the third point guard occupies a break-glass-in-case-of-emergency role in the event the other two guards sustain injuries or are lost en route to the arena.With the Knicks, that concept is not applicable, or at least it was not last season, when all three point guards — Raymond Felton, Pablo Prigioni and Kidd — played heavy minutes. In fact, the Knicks were a highly productive team whenever Woodson went small and played two point guards together.Consider the effective play of lineups that featured Prigioni and Felton. With that tandem, the team outscored opponents by an average of 16.6 points per 48 minutes. Whenever Felton was paired with Kidd, the Knicks outscored opponents by an average of 7.7 points per 48 minutes.Bolstered by solid ball handlers, the Knicks committed a league-low 12 turnovers a game. The strategy also made it easier to shift Carmelo Anthony to power forward, where he was a powerhouse. Woodson said he would use training camp to weigh his new options."I still don't know," he said, adding: "We have, I think, seven or eight exhibition games, so I can experiment a little bit more if I want to go traditional or stay with Melo at the 4. But make no mistake, Melo has been pretty good at the 4."Much as Kidd did last season, Udrih should give the Knicks veteran leadership. It can be risky for teams to sign older players who may not get the minutes they think they deserve, and Udrih said that he still felt confident that he could be a starter in the league.Yet he also has a reputation as a selfless player. He will not, based on his history, grouse about his minutes. He will not be a disruptive presence in the locker room.After all, Udrih said he was already preparing for the next step in his global basketball odyssey: coaching. That might sound familiar. With the Knicks providing the coda to his playing career last season, Kidd made an immediate transition into his new gig as the coach of the Nets."I'm not trying to do any quick steps," said Udrih, who plans to participate next summer in a coaching program designed for current players. "I want to take my time and deserve the job. I don't want anything to be given to me."Udrih rattled through an abridged list of the coaches he has played for in the N.B.A.: Gregg Popovich, Reggie Theus, Scott Skiles, Paul Westphal. Udrih said he had absorbed bits of wisdom from all of them, their X's and O's and motivational tactics.He cited his time in San Antonio as especially important."In games and practices, I wasn't just watching Manu Ginobili and Tony Parker play," Udrih said. "I was also watching what Popovich was doing."Throughout his career, Udrih has made a habit of gauging how teammates respond to various styles of coaching. Some methods, he said, are more effective than others. If nothing else, he has come to realize the value of a solid staff that is willing to challenge the head coach regularly."I'm going to try to have assistant coaches around me who are not yes men," Udrih said. "I want someone who disagrees with me. Not just, 'Yes, yes, yes.' "For now, Udrih seems content with his responsibilities in New York. He had to give up his old number, 19, because it once belonged to Willis Reed and was retired by the Knicks. So he chose No. 18, which has special significance in Jewish culture — something Udrih said he learned when he was playing in Israel."A new beginning," he said, knowing full well that the Knicks will lean on his experience.
DURHAM, N.C. — Jason Kidd logged 50,111 minutes on the court over 19 seasons as a professional basketball player. It is an impressive total, to be sure, but he probably would not have minded if he had clocked a couple of thousand fewer."For some reason, I've been trying to manage my minutes for about eight years," Kidd said, smiling, on Wednesday.As he fashioned a long and decorated N.B.A. career, Kidd learned that playing well sometimes meant not playing at all. Rest could reap its own rewards. Now, as he transitions from a 40-year-old veteran guard for the Knicks to a 40-year-old rookie coach for the Nets, he is trying to impart this wisdom to his new team.The Nets became sudden championship contenders this summer when they traded to acquire Kevin Garnett, 37; Paul Pierce, 35; and Jason Terry, 36, from the Boston Celtics. While the team's talent became unquestionable, its collective age became a question mark.For Kidd, the challenge of juggling the veterans' minutes will feel familiar. He excelled for the Knicks early last season while playing significant minutes, but his performance plummeted as the season progressed. It became clear that Kidd was running low on energy, and as his stellar playing career moved to an inglorious end — one that included an extended postseason shooting debacle — questions simmered about whether he had been overused by Knicks Coach Mike Woodson.Although Kidd did not publicly discuss the issue last season, he acknowledged Wednesday that he "was maybe out there a little bit too long." His experience will color his coaching style."He'll have to micromanage the older guys," Terry said. "But being that he just went through a similar thing in New York, he'll know exactly the approach he wants."Two days into training camp at Duke University, as the Nets tried to bond as a team, discussions about playing time had centered on Garnett. Kidd approached Garnett during the off-season about sitting out certain games on a predetermined basis, but Garnett did not like the idea. He felt he had earned the right to at least wait and see how he felt from game to game.Garnett was asked Tuesday whether he thought Kidd's experiences last season would affect their current discussions."I think Jason forgot last year," Garnett said, popping up from his chair and ending the discussion. As he went into the Nets' locker room, he added, "He got amnesia."On the contrary, Kidd most likely remembers the way his 2012-13 season played out.Through his first 36 games, Kidd looked spry and shot 42.4 percent from the field and 41.8 percent from 3-point range. He exceeded 30 minutes on the floor 20 times during that stretch, though, and it seemed to show. Through his final 40 games, his field-goal percentage dropped to 30.1, and his 3-point percentage fell to 27.0.Kidd did not start a game after March 1, but he still played more than 30 minutes eight times after that date. The fatigue seemed clearest during the playoffs, when he shot 3 for 25 from the field through the Knicks' 12 games and did not make a basket in the final 10 games. After the Knicks were eliminated in Game 6 of the Eastern Conference semifinals, Kidd's last appearance as a player, he made a quick exit from the locker room and did not speak to reporters.On Wednesday, Kidd made clear that he wanted Garnett to accomplish what Kidd could not. It is Garnett, after all, who has been most vocal about the team's championship ambitions.Garnett, entering his 19th season, played 29.7 minutes per game last season. It was his lowest average since the 1995-96 season, when he entered the league as a 19-year-old and averaged 28.7 minutes. Kidd said he understood Garnett's competitiveness because he was a player himself only a few months ago."He respects me, and I respect him," Kidd said of Garnett. "I just sat in that seat. For me, to get him to the finish line is my goal."Kidd's personal narrative from last season will feel fresh as he approaches the current one, and the Nets are hoping he will draw from his positive moments of last season, too. General Manager Billy King on Wednesday morning singled out Kidd's decisive 3-pointer in December that sealed the Knicks' 100-97 win over the Nets at Barclays Center. It was Kidd's sixth 3-pointer that night.King said he consulted Mike Krzyzewski, his coach at Duke during the 1980s, before hiring Kidd as the Nets' coach. Krzyzewski endorsed the move but advised King to let Kidd trust the same instincts that guided him as a player, rather than trying to shape him anew. King agreed."I think his instincts will take over," King said.Kidd's playing days are so recent that when he was asked about them Wednesday, he reverted to using the present tense."As a player, my mentality, I only take it one game at a time," Kidd said. "Sometimes I can't look at the bigger picture because I'm just trying to focus on winning that ballgame that day."Winning remains the focus, but Kidd has no choice but to look at the bigger picture now.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — Tyson Chandler celebrated his 31st birthday Wednesday by retreating to a side basket at the Knicks ' training gym. As his teammates practiced on an adjacent court, Chandler launched dozens of midrange jump shots."I've been working on it all summer," he said.Chandler, the defense-minded center, proclaimed that he was healthy and re-energized after a restful off-season. He regained strength in his neck after a bulging disk dulled his effectiveness late last season. He honed his shooting stroke. He gained much-needed weight.More important, Chandler appears to have repaired his psyche after a dreadful experience in last season's playoffs, in which he was little more than a traffic cone because of injury and illness. The Indiana Pacers' Roy Hibbert overwhelmed Chandler in the Eastern Conference semifinals, and while Chandler said he was not one for excuses — "When you're on the court, you're on the court," he said — he did acknowledge his physical limitations."I was battling a lot of things, honestly," he said.Chandler was as fragile as a Fabergé egg by the time the playoffs rolled around, having missed 16 of the final 20 regular-season games and losing 10 pounds because of an illness.And his neck was so sore, he said, that he struggled to lift his arms over his shoulders. Against the Pacers, he averaged 6.2 points and 6 rebounds as the Knicks fell in six games. He also had trouble handling Hibbert, who averaged 13.3 points and 10.3 rebounds.Chandler, who described the experience as "very frustrating," said he packed an additional 15 to 20 pounds onto his 7-foot-1 frame this summer. (He weighs 253 pounds, he said, after spending most of last season at 240.) The extra weight should help him cope with the demands of another long season, his 13th in the league. After Wednesday's practice, he tugged at his beard. "I've got one gray hair," he said.Coach Mike Woodson has made it clear that he plans to be cautious with his many veterans, an extensive list that includes Chandler, Carmelo Anthony and Metta World Peace. These are players of a certain vintage who do not need to participate in every training camp scrimmage. Others, like Amar'e Stoudemire, are still recovering from injuries and do not even have the choice."We're not going to push these guys," Woodson said. "I have to think about the long haul, I really do. Not that I didn't think about it last season. It was just unfortunate that we had some breakdowns."So there will be preventive measures. In Kenyon Martin's case, that meant spending Wednesday morning aboard a stationary bike. And while Chandler participated in most of the workout, he did opt out of some half-court drills to work on his jump shot.His technique remains a work in progress. He is not Ray Allen. He will not be roaming to the 3-point line anytime soon. Last season, 90.5 percent of his field-goal attempts were within 5 feet of the basket — in other words, layups. Having a dependable 10-foot jumper could add another dimension to his game."If you can knock down that midrange shot, it can exploit a lot of bigs," Chandler said. "Move them away from the basket where they're not comfortable."Chandler's shooting, of course, would be a bonus. Above all, Woodson expects him to defend, rebound, dunk and operate as a stabilizing influence. On a roster packed with — how to put this delicately? — colorful personalities, Chandler is a muted shade of gray. His teammates respect him.For example, Chandler has counseled J. R. Smith, who will miss five games — once he recovers from knee surgery — because of a violation of the league's antidrug policy. On Wednesday, Woodson said Smith needed to "grow up." Smith said he was disappointed in himself."We discussed a lot of things," Chandler said. "I'll keep that private between me and him, but he's in a good place right now. One thing we have to do as teammates is have his back, encourage him. The past is the past. You can't do anything about that. We can only control what happens from here on out."Mike Woodson said he would prefer to have a set lineup rather than make constant adjustments over the course of the season. "Because then you know defensively that everybody's going to know what they need to do each night," he said. "And offensively it becomes a lot easier because everybody knows each other's movements and where they want the ball on the floor." ...Woodson said the team considered bringing the free-agent center Jason Collins to camp but opted to go in a different direction. In April, Collins became the first openly gay male athlete still active in a major American team sport.
DURHAM, N.C. — The N.B.A. on Friday imposed a two-game suspension on Nets Coach Jason Kidd, who pleaded guilty in July to a drunken-driving charge.The punishment was expected, and it matched the league's penalties for similar incidents. The suspension will delay the coaching debut of Kidd, who had a 19-year playing career.The Nets open the season Oct. 30 on the road against the Cleveland Cavaliers and host the Miami Heat on Nov. 1. Kidd will make his debut Nov. 3, when the Nets visit the Orlando Magic."We all knew that it was going to come at some point," Kidd said. "You have to be responsible. The league came down with the suspension, and I accept that."Kidd, 40, rammed his sport utility vehicle into a telephone pole in the Hamptons around 2 a.m. on July 15, 2012. The accident occurred just days after he signed to play for the Knicks.Kidd, who retired after last season, negotiated a plea deal this summer that included community service around New York."There's no distraction," Kidd said. "It's just a part of business, being accountable and being able to move on."Kidd said he had not yet decided who would be his replacement for the two games, but the assistant coach Lawrence Frank seemed the obvious choice. Frank has already established himself as perhaps the most vocal presence on the coaching staff.Billy King, the Nets' general manager, said in a statement, "The decision is consistent with what the league has done in the past, and we look forward to Jason leading our team versus Orlando and the rest of the year."The Nets will finish their six-day training camp on Saturday. After Friday's practice, several players played down the effect of Kidd's suspension."We pretty much knew this was coming," point guard Deron Williams said. "It's pretty mandatory for the N.B.A. to issue a two-game suspension for this type of incident."Williams said the Nets would "be comfortable" with Frank as coach.
INDIANAPOLIS — Minutes before Saturday's preseason game between the Chicago Bulls and the Indiana Pacers, Derrick Rose emerged from the tunnel at Bankers Life Fieldhouse to a rousing cheer. A large contingent of Chicago fans, many seated behind the Bulls' bench, had made the three-hour drive to see Rose's return to the court 526 days after he tore his anterior cruciate ligament in the first round of the 2012 playoffs.Just ahead of tip-off, Bulls General Manager Gar Forman took a seat among them. There was no shortage of people wanting a close look at Rose.Rose, the N.B.A.'s most valuable player in 2010-11, provided glimpses of the player he was before the injury, scoring 13 points in 20 minutes. He also showed the rust, committing four turnovers."I felt great, I felt normal," Rose said. "That's the way I've been playing in practice, just trying to get my timing back. It's coming to me, but it's coming slowly."Rose started the game at point guard, and scored his first basket after he drove the lane and missed the shot but he grabbed the rebound and scored. A good portion of the crowd of 15,273, appearing evenly split between Bulls and Pacers supporters, rose to its feet.Rose played for three stretches — 7 minutes 2 seconds to start the first quarter, 8:31 to finish the second and another 5:13 to begin the third. He finished 5 for 12 from the field, and added two rebounds and three assists in the Bulls' 82-76 win.At Chicago's media day in September, Rose promised he would remain aggressive. He said he would attack the lane and the rim with the same gusto that defined his game before his injury.Rose was true to his word Saturday, displaying his electric quickness on several drives to the basket. On back-to-back plays in the second quarter, he dribbled down the floor, beat the Pacers' defense and scored on layups. In the third quarter, he stole the ball and broke away for a dunk.Rose also responded well to contact. On a first-half possession, he beat his defender off the dribble and skied toward the basket only to be met by Indiana center Roy Hibbert. Rose crashed to the ground, banging his knee and his head, but he bounced right to his feet."You see how he makes the game easier for everybody, and the speed in which he plays," Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau said. "Some rust, but that's to be expected. You could see as each minute went by, he got more and more comfortable."There were also a handful of hiccups. On two consecutive possessions in the second quarter, Rose committed turnovers. The first was a lazy pass at the top of the key that Lance Stephenson intercepted. The next play, Rose threw the ball into the stands looking for a cutting teammate. He nearly committed a third the next time down the court when he lost control of the ball on a drive before recovering."I just got to get my feet under me; on certain plays, slow down," Rose said. "Turnovers were big tonight because I was going too fast."With Bulls fans out in force and the return of Pacers forward Danny Granger, who missed much of last season with a knee injury of his own, there was a buzz at the arena atypical of an October preseason game. Pacers Coach Frank Vogel joked before the game that it was the most important preseason game in league history.In his year and a half away from the court, Rose, a Chicago native, said he had grown up. He studied film, watched games and trained better. He also became a father. For much of his basketball career, Rose's success seemed to come so naturally: high school state championships, a trip to the N.C.A.A. finals in his one year at Memphis and instantly a hometown star with the Bulls.That changed with his devastating injury.After Saturday's game, a crush of reporters surrounded Rose at his locker."I appreciate it," he said of his return. "I feel blessed to back."
DURHAM, N.C. — Mason Plumlee had curved his body and long limbs into a folding chair and was saying how cool it was having star teammates, when his eyelids began to droop and flutter.The sudden sleepiness hit him from nowhere, making him lose his train of thought. He swallowed a yawn, gathered himself and apologized."I've got to get here and lift and work out before everyone else gets on the court or else I won't get my reps," he said. "But I'll be good. I'll be O.K."Plumlee, 23, a 6-foot-10 forward, holds a noteworthy place with the Nets, who stocked up on aging stars like Kevin Garnett, Paul Pierce and Andrei Kirilenko in an off-season overhaul to try to chase a title. Plumlee is the team's only rookie, providing him with a learning opportunity and a challenge. It has been a whirlwind so far — a tiring oneThrough training camp, Plumlee scheduled early wake-up calls to his room so he could beat his teammates to the gym. It was advice passed to him from his brother Miles, 25, who played 14 games as a rookie last season with the Indiana Pacers."In practice, I'm not on the floor half the time," Plumlee said. "But when my number's called, and it will be called, I can't say, 'Well, I didn't practice.' There's no excuse."Plumlee averaged 17.1 points, 10 rebounds and 1.4 blocks and earned second-team all-American honors as a senior at Duke. He was the Nets' first-round selection, the 22nd pick over all. The destination was a surprise. Perky Plumlee, Mason's father, said the family had expected him to be picked much higher. Mason said he had worked out for around 15 teams, but not the Nets.Since then, Plumlee has found the New York City area easy to embrace. He secured an apartment in Jersey City, and last month, his parents drove over from their home in Indiana, made a run to Ikea and stayed up all night assembling furniture in his living room. He laughed at the idea that he was not all that different from other recent Duke graduates."All my friends at, like, Goldman or J. P., they're doing the same thing, getting to work early, leaving late," Plumlee said, referring to Goldman Sachs Group and JPMorgan Chase & Company. "We'll get together on a weekend, and it's like. ..." Plumlee slumps his shoulders, exhales and laughs, wordlessly finishing the thought.Plumlee played for the Nets' summer league team and provided one of the tournament's early highlights when, during a game against the Detroit Pistons, he spun into the lane and made a thunderous two-handed dunk over his defender. It underscored the notion that his athleticism — his ability to run the court and leap — was his best trait.Perky Plumlee said Mason's best trait was his determination. Of his three sons — a third brother, Marshall, 21, plays for Duke — Perky said Mason was the most focused and tenacious. Before he was old enough to play on the local grade school team, he insisted on being the manager. As a little leaguer, he taught himself how to throw different pitches by reading a book. He was an elite swimmer before junior high school, attending 6 a.m. practices. But he also squeezed in time to shoot basketballs before school."This may sound boring," Perky Plumee said, "but Mason was a very obedient kid."The tenacity has come in handy. The Nets held their training camp in Durham to get away from the distractions and news media attention in New York. But Plumlee was perhaps the one player who found no respite.Before the first practice, Nets Coach Jason Kidd told Plumlee to introduce Kidd's counterpart at Duke, Mike Krzyzewski, to his Nets teammates. After the first couple of practices, Plumlee was surrounded by television cameras. Each day thereafter, he did interviews with student reporters and local news media. In between, he made time to see his former teammates, coaches and teachers, as well as his younger brother."If we would have gone anywhere else, I would haven't have been talked to at all," Plumlee said, laughing.Above all else, he has tried to adjust to the N.B.A. He has had to digest the idiosyncrasies of the Nets' system while also being expected, as the rookie, to run errands for his teammates."Like I told him, 'listen first, slow to speak,' " said Jason Terry, a 36-year-old guard.The demands, it seemed, were unending. After practice Friday, Plumlee held a microphone and interviewed General Manager Billy King on camera for the Duke athletic department Web site. ("That was good!" Plumlee said to King afterward.) After that, it was another camera, another lengthy interview.It was midafternoon, and the gym was mostly cleared out when his one last obligation was winding down. His eyeballs by then looked glassy. His gaze was growing distant, and his speech was becoming clipped.When the interview ended, he smiled. He announced he would take a nap.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — Chris Douglas-Roberts was challenging his physical limits when he tried to draw a charge on Tyson Chandler at Monday's practice. Douglas-Roberts lost.After an unsuccessful attempt to slow the swelling in his right thigh by riding a stationary bike, Douglas-Roberts found himself reclining on a courtside trainer's table with an industrial-size ice pack wrapped around his leg.Douglas-Roberts, a 6-foot-7 wing who has played for five teams in three leagues since turning professional five years ago, is facing long odds to find a home with the Knicks as a free-agent invitee to training camp. He cannot afford an injury. He has little margin for error. And as the Knicks churn their way toward the Oct. 28 deadline to trim their roster to 15, a solid case can be made that no one on the team better understands the cruel calculus of retaining gainful employment in the N.B.A."Everything is different now," said Douglas-Roberts, 26, who once starred alongside Derrick Rose at the University of Memphis before the Nets made him the 40th selection in the 2008 draft, which turned out to be the first of several hard lessons. Douglas-Roberts considered himself a first-round pick."When I first came out, I just expected everything to happen," he said. "I expected to be in the N.B.A. I was upset when I got picked late. I didn't know how much of a blessing it was just to be in the N.B.A. So the last couple of years have made me appreciate the little things."For every Carmelo Anthony, there are a dozen players like Douglas-Roberts at training camps: the unsung, the overshadowed, the expendable. There are few open roster spots. The reality is that if an opportunity fails to materialize, that next precious paycheck might well come from B.C. Azovmash of the Ukrainian SuperLeague.Free agents belong to a fraternity, only the members compete against one another. Douglas-Roberts, who worked out for the Knicks before the start of camp, did not join the team until the former St. John's standout Justin Brownlee was cut last week. Coach Mike Woodson tried to cushion Brownlee's departure by saying he was "good enough" to play for the Erie BayHawks, the Knicks' Development League affiliate. In the competitive business of pro basketball, it was meant as a compliment."There's a chance he will be on that team," Woodson said.As for Douglas-Roberts, Woodson said: "He's a young — well, he's not young. He's been around the league, and he's a kid that can score the basketball. We know that. So he's going to be a part of our training camp, and we'll see how he fits in."At this stage, that is all Douglas-Roberts can expect. He averaged a career-best 9.8 points a game with the Nets in 2009-10. When the N.B.A. was at a labor impasse in 2011, he caught on with a team in Italy. He has since struggled to find traction back in the N.B.A.His career was so unsettled that he spent part of last season with the Texas Legends of the D-League. In his debut with the team, he finished with 49 points and 8 assists. In 11 games, he averaged 22.5 points on 49.4 percent shooting, according to the Legends. He said he was channeling a lot of rage."Let's be honest, man: I didn't want to be there," he said. "I just wanted to destroy the competition, you know? I wanted to prove to everybody that I was the best player in the D-League."A subsequent six-game cameo with the Dallas Mavericks ended with his release."And then I didn't get another call," he said. "I had to do some soul searching and kind of find out what's going on."His career arc has been frustrating and mystifying, he said. He referred to the many "obstacles" that had come along. He said he might not have handled himself in the most appropriate ways as a younger player. His was a brand of confidence that bordered on arrogance, and though he has always been an effective scorer, the N.B.A. has demanded that players at his position be multidimensional.In recent weeks, Douglas-Roberts has worked out at a high school near his home in Frisco, Tex. He spent time with his fiancée and their two young children. Wanting more independence, he fired his agent. He changed his phone number to limit distractions. It was a bit of a miracle that the Knicks even knew how to reach him."I've honestly been kind of embarrassed," he said. "I don't really want to resurface until I feel that I'm in the right position."With the Knicks, his quest continues.
ATLANTA — The most joy Angel McCoughtry derived from the 2012 season was not leading the W.N.B.A. in scoring or steering the Atlanta Dream to the playoffs, but simply that it ended.She was suspended for two games and spent a week hidden in her home. She was convicted in the court of social media when her coach was fired after a buildup of tension with her. At a playoff game, she was jittery and scared, symptoms that she attributed to an anxiety attack.But that was last year when she was a restricted free agent, which by all accounts could have been her last with Atlanta. The Dream had been her employer since the deposed coach — Marynell Meadors, also the general manager — selected McCoughtry first over all in the 2009 draft.Instead, McCoughtry is still wearing the Dream's sky blue, still scoring more than anyone else, still scowling at referees and glaring at teammates, though at a reduced level.Part of the change stems from the Dream's season, short-circuited in the first round of the playoffs last year, extending this year to the finals."It's been a lot more fun, a lot less stress," she said Wednesday. "I'm just able to play, not worry about things. There was a lot of drama last year."The Dream, who trail the Minnesota Lynx, 1-0, in the best-of-five finals with Game 2 on Tuesday, had been stuck with the best and worst McCoughtry had to offer: a prodigious, zealous player susceptible, by her own admission, to bouts of immaturity.Jeff Walz, her coach at Louisville, showed McCoughtry video of her being overly irritated during games, especially at the officials."I always took it too far," she said.After Indiana eliminated the Dream in last year's playoffs, Fever Coach Lin Dunn disclosed a damning plank of her strategy."The key thing with Angel is, if we get her frustrated, then she kind of loses her composure, and I think it affects the rest of the team," Dunn said.But the Dream front office knew who it had in McCoughtry, and there was no doubt she would be back."We are not looking for perfect people," Kelly Loeffler, a co-owner of the Dream, said. "We're looking for players and coaches with their heads and hearts in the right place."With Angel, we could see the maturity and the growth. We could see that happening through the ups and downs of last year."One of those downs came after that dismissal of Meadors as the Dream's coach. An accomplished college and professional coach for four decades, Meadors was let go Aug. 27, 2012, her 69th birthday. It was a move that hardly saddened McCoughtry"I felt like I wasn't respected by her," said McCoughtry, who was honored for her 2012 Olympic gold medal before one of Meadors's final games but was benched for the game because of an undisclosed disciplinary measure.McCoughtry denied any role in Meadors's firing, a claim supported by Loeffler, who attributed the dismissal to a natural step in the team's life cycle. Meadors could not be reached for comment.But that did not keep her from receiving some blame in social media. Even the Connecticut women's coach, Geno Auriemma, weighed in, writing on his Twitter page that team owners had "caved in" because of an "inmate in charge."McCoughtry, who had flourished on the United States Olympic team under Auriemma, said she was hurt by that comment. "I've always had a great relationship with him," she said.The day after Meadors's firing, McCoughtry was suspended indefinitely by Fred Williams, a former assistant who took over for Meadors as the coach and general manager. The Dream did not disclose the reason for the suspension.McCoughtry accepted some blame, saying she had lost some of her motivation after returning to the Dream from the Olympics. "I was feeling so high after winning a gold medal, then I hit such a low," she said, adding that she considered taking a break from basketball to pursue a new hobby, writing music.
WASHINGTON — This was the first glimpse, a tantalizing but precursory peek, at what a $183 million team looks like.It is inadvisable to conclude much about a team based on any preseason game, let alone a maiden one. For the record, the Nets beat the Washington Wizards, 111-106, in overtime at Verizon Center. But even Coach Jason Kidd said an hour before the game that its result was trivial.That the contest felt noteworthy at all, then, was almost purely for aesthetic reasons.Months have passed since the Nets underwent their lavish remodeling, one that ensured they would have a former All-Star playing at every position and that trophy hopes would come across as credible. For this, they have a $101 million payroll, by far the league's highest sum and one that will lead to a projected $82 million luxury-tax statement. Still, in recent weeks, every last comment or boast or prediction about the team seemed to have a qualifier — "on paper" — attached or at least implied.On Tuesday, finally, there was the team, pulled off the figurative paper and realized on the court.For fans and observers, some sights may require an adjustment period. Paul Pierce, who had spent all of his 15 seasons with the Boston Celtics, and Kevin Garnett, who had played his previous six seasons alongside Pierce, made their debuts.As the first two players introduced before the game, Pierce and Garnett skipped onto the court and bumped fists. Fifteen seconds into the game, Pierce sank the Nets' first basket, and half a minute later, Garnett grabbed the team's first offensive rebound. These were familiar sights, rendered black and white."I honestly didn't even think about it," Pierce said about wearing a new uniform. "I've been part of the Brooklyn Nets. We've been practicing."Pierce and Garnett were limited to 12 minutes 29 seconds, as were center Brook Lopez and guard Joe Johnson. During that brief time, Lopez, who should remain the offensive focal point on this team, stamped around at will and scored 15 points. Forward Andrei Kirilenko, another new face, was a dynamic presence on the second unit, hopping from one spot to another over 23:31, collecting 11 points, 5 rebounds, 5 assists and 3 steals.The numbers were secondary to the visuals and individual gestures, though. And the unfamiliar sights were not limited to the playing area. Kidd, beginning his first season as the coach, joked before the game that he would not know where to stand on the sideline. By the time he made his way there, he had changed into a gray suit and a tie."It was weird, I'll be honest, seeing him in his little tight suit, drawing up plays," Garnett said about Kidd.Some key absences made the Nets' preliminary showcase feel incomplete. Deron Williams, who sprained his ankle last month and has not been cleared for full contact at practice, watched from the bench. The way he molds his game to his new teammates — and whether he can rediscover his form, which withered some the past two seasons — is a compelling subplot that will need to wait.The reserves Jason Terry and Tornike Shengelia, both recovering from knee surgery, and Gary Forbes, who was sick, were inactive, too. Kidd said before the game that he was not worried about getting up to speed before the regular season, but he conceded that the team's unfamiliarity with one another was an area to address."When you look at the other teams in this league, they've been together," Kidd said. "That's something we're a little bit behind on."But that bonding time will come. The Nets have six more preseason games before their Oct. 30 season opener against the Cleveland Cavaliers.On Tuesday, it was about observing the new teammates competing together for the first time, to see a hypothetical contender actualized on the court.
Virginia Commonwealth Coach Shaka Smart took a cab to Barclays Center for the Atlantic 10 Conference men's basketball media day Tuesday, and before he entered, he snapped a picture of the arena. He sent the photograph as a text message to his six returning players. Immediately his phone began buzzing in response."I don't think you could find an arena in the country that's more thought of as the 'it' arena or the place to be right now," Smart said.A framed photograph of Beyoncé performing at Barclays hung on the wall behind him, near an action shot of Nets point guard Deron Williams. Smart needed only to glance over his shoulder at those still images to absorb the attractiveness of this 13-month-old arena — already a landmark — to players, fans and recruits.That hipness and first-class feeling were what the A-10 had hoped to grab when it signed on to hold its conference tournament in Brooklyn two years ago, not fully knowing whether Barclays would really be all that hip or first-class.The A-10 ditched Atlantic City, and with it, perhaps, that underdog mentality, moving right up to New York, right into the den of the Big East Conference, to set up shop across the East River.It was a curious tactic after years of being based in and around Philadelphia and led by flagship members like Temple, St, Joseph's, Massachusetts and George Washington — all programs that were unmistakably un-New York.That identity has changed. Now the A-10 has embraced the hipster chic style, and all that Brooklyn might bring with it."We were here in the beginning, before they were even open," said Bernadette V. McGlade, the conference commissioner. "We were committed. We wanted to bring our championship here; Barclays wanted to bring a Division I conference championship here. We were able to forge those partnerships several years ago."Phil Martelli, the dean of conference coaches with 19 seasons at St. Joseph's, said the shift is not easy for some longtime fans."Look, I'm a Philadelphian through and through," Martelli said. "I'll be the first person to tell you I don't quite get New York."But, Martelli added, there is significance to affixing the league with Brooklyn, a borough that has skyrocketed as a brand over the past few years, and one that resonates with young players."In their world," he said, "the building is about Jay Z and the pop cultural events that it hosts, not just the basketball."Fordham Coach Tom Pecora said that even though his team played its home games in the same city, he uses the Brooklyn angle as a talking point in recruiting."It comes up in recruiting all the time," Pecora said. "We make sure it does. We want kids to know, this is going to be the venue and we're going to play games here for the duration of your career."Last year, the first A-10 tournament at Barclays was overshadowed by the final traditional Big East tournament at Madison Square Garden, which drew large crowds and prime-time television coverage. In Brooklyn, the A-10 drew a little more than 6,000 fans a game, fewer than the Conference USA and West Coast Conference tournaments.But the Big East, as it was constituted, is no more, and the A-10 would like to believe it placed itself in an ideal spot to fill that void. All afternoon Tuesday, coaches cited the league's depth and bristled at the suggestion it was still a midmajor conference.Naturally, there was talk of comparisons between the A-10 and what is now the Big East, which features familiar names like Georgetown, Villanova and St. John's, as well as the former A-10 members Butler and Xavier."I think it's going to be fascinating to watch and compare their league and our league," Smart said. "I'm not so sure there's a huge difference. I'm not saying we're better, but there's a lot of very good teams in their league, and we have a lot of depth as well."The Big East will continue to host its conference tournament at the Garden for at least the next decade. But the A-10 does not have a similar long-term arrangement with Barclays, so it will have to justify its existence here fairly quickly, something Martelli said would not be easy."The challenge is to be noticed in this city," Martelli said. "How are you going to be a story? You better be at the top of your game to be a story in New York."In many respects, the league is approaching that level. Five teams earned a spot in last year's N.C.A.A. tournament, not including Davidson, which enters in 2014. A record 71 conference games will be televised nationally this season.And the hope is that the relationship with Brooklyn will add to the conference's credibility."We are one of the premier basketball conferences in the country," Pecora said. "We deserve to play in a venue like this."
PROVIDENCE, R.I. — There was intrigue on the court, if not exactly tightrope theatrics.It came from Andrea Bargnani and Metta World Peace, who made their Knicks debuts in the preseason opener Wednesday night against the Boston Celtics. And from Carmelo Anthony, whose tendency to launch jumpers from far-flung locales became apparent only seconds after the tip.Yet hours before the Knicks' 103-102 victory, Coach Mike Woodson decided to raise the curtain on what promises to be one of the early season's more captivating dramas by declaring an open competition between Iman Shumpert and J. R. Smith for the starting spot at shooting guard."I'm going to let them two fight it out and see who gets it," Woodson said after a morning shootaround at Dunkin' Donuts Center.With Smith recovering from knee surgery and facing a five-game suspension for violating the N.B.A.'s antidrug policy once he does return, perhaps by the start of the regular season, the exhibition schedule could set up as an empty stage for Shumpert to prove himself.On Wednesday, clad in fluorescent orange sneakers, Shumpert did his best to capitalize, scoring 18 points on 7-of-7 shooting. He sank three 3-pointers. He dunked in transition. He called for a clear-out against Kris Humphries and drained a high-arcing jumper. He looked borderline angry the entire time."That's how I play; I ain't going to be quiet about it no more," Shumpert said, adding: "I changed coming into the league, trying to be quiet and feel my way around. But I've been around a little bit now. I'm going to do how I do."Shumpert was one of several Knicks who looked surprisingly sharp. Tim Hardaway Jr., a rookie guard, hit the game-winning shot with 8.2 seconds left and finished with 16 points. World Peace scored 13. Tyson Chandler showcased a new midrange game.Even Bargnani, a center who was acquired over the off-season from the Toronto Raptors, collected 12 points and 3 rebounds despite laboring with his jump shot (3 of 8).Shumpert started 45 games last season after returning from knee surgery, but his job is up for grabs, partly because of lingering effects from the injury. Shumpert said he had experienced "some soreness" over the off-season, and he remains a pasta dinner (or two) heftier than his playing weight. He did not sound concerned."I ate pretty good this summer," he said, adding: "I know what I'm capable of. This year, I feel I do need to be a little more aggressive."Known as a defense-minded player in his first two seasons, Shumpert said he wanted to force opponents to produce a "new scouting report" on him. Against the Celtics, that meant fearlessly driving to the basket, even if risks were involved.Such was the case in the second quarter, when Shumpert slipped trying to turn the corner on his defender and came up favoring his left knee. He remained in the game, though, and excelled. After nailing a 25-foot jumper late in the first half, he yelped at his teammates on the bench.As for Smith, Woodson said he had been encouraging him to pursue a new role. Last season, Smith was tremendously effective coming off the bench, so potent as a scorer that he won the Sixth Man of the Year Award. But Woodson sees Smith's situation differently now."I want him to be past that," Woodson said before the game. "Let somebody else be the sixth man if he deserves to win that starting job. I mean, last year was last year. And he's capable, I think, of defending. That's the only question I have: Are you going to start the game with the mind-set of defending, too?"Like Smith, Amar'e Stoudemire, who is recovering from knee surgery, did not make the trip, and Kenyon Martin, who is 35, did not leave the bench. Out of an abundance of caution, Woodson said Martin would not play in either of the next two exhibitions, including Friday's game against Toronto.If nothing else, Woodson seems determined to go with a bigger lineup than he did at times last season, when he turned to a pair of point guards — Raymond Felton and Pablo Prigioni — to play as a tandem. When they were on the floor together, the Knicks outscored opponents by an average of 16.6 points per 48 minutes.The problem is that Woodson has what he described as a "logjam" at shooting guard. He has scorers who need minutes.On Wednesday, with Smith most likely watching the game on television, Shumpert did what he could to edge ahead in a two-man race.
LOS ANGELES — Since making the announcement last spring that he is a gay professional basketball player, Jason Collins has been widely praised, received much support and made many new friends. But with training camp for a new season under way, he has been waiting for a call from an N.B.A. team. Any N.B.A. team.When Collins, 34, a 7-foot center, wrote his coming-out cover story for Sports Illustrated — "my declaration," he said — he proudly spoke of having been called a pro's pro for his team-first, lunch-pail style. Never a star, he has nonetheless had a career spanning 12 years and 6 teams after four years at Stanford, where he played with his twin, Jarron."That's how I still consider myself," he said Wednesday in his first interview since N.B.A. training camps opened last month without his participation. "Sure, I've picked up another title. But I feel that's always who I'm going to be — that person who sets a good example, who represents the sport and is an asset to my team and a role model for other players."The question Collins has to ponder is why he has not been signed as a free agent. Is it because he is at best a marginal player with modest career statistics (3.6 points and 3.8 rebounds a game) nearing the end of his career, one who would cost more than a younger player based on the league's collectively bargained pay scale? Or is there something more sinister at work related to the new role he would play?Collins did not dismiss the latter notion or address it."You don't want to speculate — I don't go there," he said while picking at a bowl of greens in a cafe in the Brentwood section of Los Angeles, near where he lives. But while conceding he would be at the lower end of a team's depth chart at this stage of his career, he admitted being perplexed because, he said, "I feel there are players in the league right now that, quite frankly, I'm better than."As teams firmed up their rosters in late summer, Collins's agent, Arn Tellem, received inquiries from at least three teams in the market for a reserve big man who understood positional defense. One of them, the Detroit Pistons, settled on Josh Harrellson, a third-year player who cost the Pistons more than $500,000 less than the nearly $1.4 million Collins would have earned — the minimum salary for a player with his experience.Several league executives said the number of teams interested in Collins had shrunk because of new penalties for teams exceeding the luxury tax threshold.Brooklyn was thought to be a potential landing site because Collins spent roughly half his career with the Nets when they played in New Jersey, where he was a trusted teammate of Jason Kidd, now the team's coach. But with the Nets' soaring payroll, Collins would have cost the team almost four times his salary in taxes.Collins acknowledged that signing younger players would be more prudent financially, but he asked how experience could be discounted in such a competitive sport."In my mind it shouldn't be about that," he said, referring to minimizing costs. "The N.B.A. is for the best players, not for the most affordable players. There isn't a professional athlete that doesn't want to play 12, 13 years. What I did when I was younger was look up to the guys like Dikembe Mutombo and Alonzo Mourning who played over a decade. What did they do to last that long? A lot of it is keeping your body in shape, keeping your mind sharp, staying hungry. You should always want guys around like that to set that example, in my mind."David Stern, the N.B.A.'s commissioner, and Adam Silver, who will replace Stern in February, would not comment on Collins, other than to say that the league had been in close contact with Tellem and that they were satisfied that teams were making only basketball-related decisions. But one team's general manager, speaking on the condition of anonymity, said that "some teams just might not want to deal with it because of the media implications."The issue of what might be a challenge for an individual team versus what is best for the league's overall image figured to be a thorny one for the N.B.A. from the moment Collins publicly declared his intention to be the first openly gay man playing a major American team sport. (Robbie Rogers of Major League Soccer's Los Angeles Galaxy has since filled the breach.)
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — In September 2009, only months after leaving a high-ranking post at Madison Square Garden, Steve Mills returned to Princeton, his alma mater, to teach a freshman seminar with Harold A. Feiveson, a professor who specializes in nuclear weapons and energy policy.The course itself was more in Mills's realm: "Dilemmas in Intercollegiate and Professional Athletics." The topics included Title IX, stadium financing and performance-enhancing drugs. Feiveson said Mills had taken the class seriously. He prepared notes. He graded papers. The debates were lively."I don't remember him talking about Isiah Thomas or Larry Brown," Feiveson said, "but he never said, 'I can't talk about that.' He didn't show any great restraint."Mills, 54, has held many jobs over the last three decades. He played pro basketball in South America. He worked for the N.B.A. for 16 years, operating as a "complete executive with a particularly good ability to develop relationships," as Commissioner David Stern described it. There was his 10-year corporate stint at the Garden, which was marred by the antics of a dysfunctional franchise, to which both Thomas and Brown contributed. More recently, Mills helped found a wealth management firm for athletes and entertainers.By all accounts a savvy businessman, Mills has a new job, perhaps his most high-pressure position to date. As president and general manager of the Knicks, Mills will need to please a lot of hard-to-please people, including two in particular: James L. Dolan, the team's capricious owner, and Carmelo Anthony, who can opt out of his contract next summer and become a free agent. It will be a high-wire act."It's a unique opportunity," Mills said in an interview this week. "It's about as close to being on the court as you can get, and that's what I love about it."Even as Mills spent his career on the business side of sports — in addition to dabbling in academia and developing behind-the-scenes relationships with agents, executives and players — he said he had always wanted to be more involved with the game itself. Now he has his chance, although any number of people in the N.B.A. are wondering whether he has the preparation to pull it off. After all, he had never been a general manager before."What people don't realize is that Steve has always been a basketball guy," said Craig Robinson, the men's basketball coach at Oregon State and a former teammate of his at Princeton. "There's no question in my mind that he knows the game, knows how to evaluate talent and knows how to network."That latter skill could be one of Mills's most valuable assets, especially as the Knicks seek to retain Anthony beyond this season. In his introductory news conference last week, Mills pre-empted the question-and-answer portion of his appearance by saying that the team had "every intention of making Carmelo a Knick for a long time to come." It could work to Mills's advantage that he is known to have a good relationship with William Wesley, a power broker employed by Creative Artists Agency. Anthony is represented by C.A.A.Mills emphasized his ties to agents. As he put it, "I've gotten to know a lot of people."Mills said he had spent his first week on the job learning all that he could about the Knicks that he did not already know. He attended every team meeting, film session and practice. He stayed with the players at a hotel near the team's training facility. He spent time with Coach Mike Woodson, assessing what Woodson might need to make the Knicks a viable championship contender.Mills has his own ideas, of course. To start, he expressed a desire to incorporate more analytics into the fabric of the team. He said he believes in the power of numbers, citing the influence of Dean Oliver's seminal book on the topic, "Basketball on Paper: Rules and Tools for Performance Analysis."
EAST RUTHERFORD, N.J. — Andrei Kirilenko hid out this off-season in St.-Tropez, France, "away from civilization," he said, as he has for the better part of a decade. But this summer, for the first time since he can remember, he did not touch a basketball.Newly retired from international basketball and the Russian national team, Kirilenko jogged and lifted weights to stay fit but stayed off the court. The time off, he has found since joining the Nets' preseason workouts, refreshed him. Depriving himself of basketball, he said, has given him a surprising new hunger for it."I get on the court, and I want that ball," he said. "I want to move. I want to do something."Kirilenko, 32, had a reputation for action and omnipresence. When asked recently to name a comparable player, Nets Coach Jason Kidd brought up LeBron James. James has an advantage in overall talent, Kidd acknowledged, but he said their skills were similarly broad.Deron Williams, who played five and a half seasons with Kirilenko on the Utah Jazz, concurred."There's not many players in this league — I don't think there's any players in this league — that can fill up a stat sheet the way he does," Williams said.Look at the Nets' first preseason game last Tuesday, Williams said, when Kirilenko came off the bench and put together 11 points, 5 rebounds, 5 assists and 3 steals in the 23 minutes 31 seconds he was on the court. In 11 N.B.A. seasons, Kirilenko has averaged 12.4 points, 5.6 rebounds, 2.8 assists, 1.4 steals and 1.9 blocks a game.Williams added: "He's going to get rebounds, blocks and steals. He's going to shoot a high percentage. He passes like a point guard."Watching Kirilenko in recent weeks, the Nets may still be pinching themselves, wondering how they ever signed him. Kirilenko played 64 games last season for the Minnesota Timberwolves, and then opted out of the final year on his contract, which would have paid him $10 million.Kirilenko sought a multiyear deal, but the opportunities never materialized. In July, the Nets shocked the league — and earned raves and congratulations — when they announced that Kirilenko had joined them on a one-year contract worth $3.18 million, with a player option for the next season. The only loser, at first glance, seemed to be Kirilenko, who was leaving money on the table."If it was 10 years ago, I would never have taken it — never, ever even thought about it," Kirilenko said.But now, he went on, he has come to accept certain realities. He is nearing the end of his athletic peak; as he sees it, he has three years left playing at his optimal level. At the same time, he said he did not think he had ever played on a true title contender.The 2006-7 Jazz, who made it to the Western Conference finals but lost in five games to the San Antonio Spurs, were the best team he played on, he said."That was our ceiling," Kirilenko said. "I don't think we could have beaten San Antonio that year. But this year, I feel like we can go all the way, and we can win the title. And I think I deserve the chance to try."The chance to try made up for the pay cut."I know the money's not perfect," he said. "I'm losing some. It is what it is. I've already made so much money playing basketball. My contract right now is great. I can't complain. It's a lot of money."Maybe so, but the figure was low enough that the N.B.A. investigated to see if there might have be some shady dealing at play. The conspiracy theories, too, Kirilenko has become used to laughing off."I've spent 12 years in the N.B.A., and I've heard so many rumors, so much gossip, I can't worry about it," he said. "I'm doing what I'm doing. If somebody wants to investigate something, do it. If someone wants to feel some way, do it. I can't do anything about it."There are ample reasons Kirilenko is considered such a steal. His statistics are easy to see and appreciate. So are his physical gifts, like the 7-foot-plus wingspan that bisects his 6-foot-9 frame. Less so is his movement off the ball, which he considers one of his best traits. Williams said Kirilenko was the league's best "cutter."Guard Shaun Livingston added: "He's everywhere, constantly moving, but it's not chaotic movement. Some guys move, and you're like, 'Man, slow down.' But he's moving with a purpose."This sense of purpose has brought him to Brooklyn, where he is expected to lead what could be one of the league's strongest second units."I think I'm consistent, and I think that's very rare in the N.B.A.," Kirilenko said. "I'm a guy you can rely on. I'm trying to be that guy in tough moments, on defense, offense. I'm not going to take a bad shot. I'm not going to do some crazy thing. I'm going to be consistent, execute. I think that's important."Championship aspirations have meant the Nets are being compared to the league's top teams, particularly the Miami Heat. Kirilenko said that he relished the chance to guard players like James, Kevin Durant and Kobe Bryant, and that the Nets' depth gave them an advantage over other teams."It's impossible to stop those guys," he said. "But I think we can give them a harder time than anybody else in the league."It will help that Kirilenko has been hounding the ball these last few weeks, hungrier for it than ever.
A blockbuster trade this summer between the Nets and the Boston Celtics ensured that the teams would seem unnaturally entwined this season, that an extracurricular awkwardness would characterize what might otherwise be humdrum contests between them.The date on the calendar to circle has always been Jan. 26, when Paul Pierce, Kevin Garnett and Jason Terry — the three veteran stars who moved on to Brooklyn during the off-season — are scheduled make their first regular-season return to TD Garden in Boston."I don't know if I'm looking forward to it, because I already know I'm probably going to shed a tear or two," Pierce said.Until then, there will be sentimental warm-ups, little dress rehearsals, like the preseason one Tuesday at Barclays Center. All around, familiar faces wore unfamiliar uniforms, as the former Nets Gerald Wallace, Kris Humphries, MarShon Brooks and Keith Bogans returned to Brooklyn wearing green.The most intriguing figure, though, remained Pierce, who played 15 seasons with the Celtics before he was traded."I thought he handled it well, as any professional would," Coach Jason Kidd said about Pierce, after the Nets defeated the Celtics, 82-80. "It was his first time seeing that green on the other side."Pierce stopped by the visitors' locker room before the game to greet his former teammates. Early on, while the Nets were shooting free throws on one end of the court, Pierce strolled to the Celtics' bench and had a quick, convivial conversation with Rajon Rondo, the remaining Boston star. When Pierce blocked Avery Bradley's layup attempt in the second quarter, the two shared a laugh as play resumed in the other direction."I think it's more than settled in," Pierce said about the transition, after scoring 4 points with 10 rebounds and 5 assists over 27 minutes. "It was just weird looking over at the Boston team."Brooks summed up the sentiment among the former Nets when he said: "I didn't take nothing personally. It's a business. If you've got a chance to get K. G. and Paul Pierce, you got to do what you go to do. They're trying to win a championship."This was only the first of several meetings to come. The teams will meet in another preseason game Oct. 23 in Boston, and the Celtics will visit Brooklyn for their first regular-season meeting Dec. 10.The emotion should build over those contests. On Tuesday night, though, Garnett and Terry did not even play. Terry is still recovering from arthroscopic knee surgery. And Garnett was rested after playing the previous night against the Philadelphia 76ers.How much Garnett will play when the Nets have back-to-back games is a subplot expected to persist all season. Garnett has made it clear that he wants to be on the court as much as possible, but he said he is keeping an open mind and a positive attitude."He's one of the rare ones that wants to play and be in every rep," Kidd said about Garnett.Kidd added: "What he said last night is that he does trust me. And that's the starting point."Tuesday night was another starting point, as Pierce and his fellow transferees tiptoed into a multistage reunion process.
Metta World Peace stepped out of a black car on Tuesday afternoon, tilted his head and gazed at Madison Square Garden. He was ready to entertain an audience, although he did not enter the building and did not need a basketball.Instead, what awaited him was a group of 22 screaming fifth graders from a Bronx after-school enrichment program. The children spent Tuesday afternoon with World Peace and Andrea Bargnani, another new Knick, for a tour of Manhattan atop a double-decker bus, an event put on by Garden of Dreams, a Garden charity.World Peace is one of the more quirky and engaging players in the N.B.A. and a New York City native to boot. A lot of adult Knicks fans would not mind rolling around the streets of New York in his company, listening to whatever observations pop into his head. The children were pretty happy, too, especially when he entered the bus bearing gifts.And when the tour got going, it did not take long for one group of boys to ask World Peace if they could call him by his former name, Ron Artest."You can call me anything you want," he said, smiling. "What's my name?""Pokemon," offered up one of the boys.On an N.B.A. court, that might constitute low-level trash-talking. But not on the bus. And World Peace took it in stride."Pokemon used to be hot," he said.And like a player whose jump shot is not working and who has to find another way to score, World Peace had to improvise when it turned out that the bus's microphone was broken. There went the chance for some unscripted jokes.But he did the best he could. At one point, he put a foam Statue of Liberty crown on his head and kept it there."I saw everybody else doing it, so I said why not," he said.Toward the end of the tour, as the bus passed through Times Square, World Peace led the children in a "Let's go Knicks" chant that drew the attention of passers-by."Let's take back the city!" he shouted as the children clapped and yelled. "Let's kick the Nets out of this city! Let's bring a championship to New York!"In the back of the bus, Bargnani, all 7 feet of him, was taking in the sights. A native of Italy, he said he was seeing some Manhattan landmarks for the first time."They knew more than me," he said of the children.Back to World Peace. He said he was surprised by how much some of the kids on the bus knew about him, particularly the boy who asked him about an incident two seasons ago."He asked me if I elbowed James Harden," World Peace said, referring to an altercation that led to a seven-game suspension. "I said, 'Absolutely not; it wasn't me.' He said, 'I thought it was you.'
Grant Gibbs is a senior point guard for Creighton, with neat brown hair and cornflower blue eyes. He was raised in Marion, a small city in eastern Iowa, where his mother was a home economics teacher at the local high school. His father works at the Quaker Oats cereal distribution factory in Cedar Rapids."He's kind of on the forefront of making Cap'n Crunch," Gibbs said.Seated by the window at the Lighthouse at Chelsea Piers, in Manhattan, Gibbs watched the choppy waters of the Hudson River drift past. Several yachts were docked nearby. He was facing west, toward Nebraska, the edge of the frontier for the new Big East Conference, at least for now.Creighton, one of three Midwest teams to have joined the new league, along with Butler and Xavier, informed its players about the move out of the Missouri Valley Conference while on a charter jet to Philadelphia for the second round of the N.C.A.A. tournament. Gibbs said the focus at the time had remained on beating their next opponent, Cincinnati."But once you put the names with the faces and the schools that we'd be competing with, the cities we'd be going to, the arenas, it all kind of came to life," Gibbs said. "It's pretty surreal to be in this situation."Dalí might not have conjured a more surrealistic vision than the layout of Wednesday's Big East basketball media day, which pinned Creighton's table next to Georgetown's, Butler's next to that of St. John's, and Xavier's across from Villanova's, perhaps so they could all introduce each other.Val Ackerman, the conference's commissioner, made a point of not mentioning the blue-blood programs that had departed. (As a refresher, they were Syracuse, Pittsburgh, Louisville and Notre Dame.) Most of them were paragons of conference tournament success at Madison Square Garden. All of them were beholden to their football programs.That, coaches and administrators reiterated over and over on Wednesday, is what made the new Big East distinct, bonding a Creighton with a Georgetown. The conference's 10 programs bleed basketball."It's not like a 'Sesame Street' deal — which one doesn't belong," St. John's Coach Steve Lavin said. "You've got a tree, a bush, some seaweed and then a truck. It just didn't fit. I think now we have a league that's more similar."The league, originally termed the Catholic 7 before the new Midwestern programs jumped in, will undoubtedly miss the defending national champion Cardinals, as well as Connecticut, Rutgers, Cincinnati and South Florida, which are in what is now known as the American Athletic Conference (the revamped and reorganized Big East), which held its media day Wednesday in Memphis.Lavin insisted that the ties here were stronger. He said he strongly supported Ackerman, who said the conference had no plans to expand in the near future. Lavin also said he appreciated the league's effort to revive the basketball-focused intentions of Dave Gavitt, the founder of the original conference."It's a return to our roots, and yet there are some fresh aspects to it," Lavin said. "We're adding schools like Xavier, Butler and Creighton in the Midwest, and yet their profile, history and tradition fits so nicely with the schools located in the Northeast."For Lavin and other coaches in the room, there also seemed to be a sense of relief. Conference realignment had taken its toll on everybody, and a year ago at this time, many of those programs did not know where they might be headed. So they chose to forgo some tradition and familiar road trips to unite, and they handpicked a like-minded leader in Ackerman, the former president of the W.N.B.A. and U.S.A. Basketball."I don't have any negative things to say about football, but I'm a basketball head," Ackerman said. "We're going to make sure this is basketball at its best. We have 22 sports in our league, but I can tell you that basketball will be the centerpiece."Five teams from the current configuration reached the N.C.A.A. tournament last year, and four teams have played in at least one Final Four in the past six seasons. Marquette, a conference co-champion last season, was the preseason pick to win it again this year, with Georgetown second.Creighton, headlined by the senior forward Doug McDermott, a two-time all-American, was picked to finish third, although the team is a bit of a mystery to Northeastern opponents. Playing in the M.V.C. since 1976, and based in Omaha, the Bluejays have not faced any member of their current conference besides Providence, Xavier and DePaul since 1998.By now, however, these coaches know how to get past their fear of the unknown."We brought in three programs, not just three good teams," Georgetown Coach John Thompson III said. "They've withstood the test of time. They're going to be good, they have been good, and that's why we're excited/slash/scared to have all three as part of this group."
The Knicks have yet to start the regular season, but some of the focus is already beginning to drift toward next summer, when Carmelo Anthony is eligible to opt out of the final year of his contract. According to an article posted Wednesday on The New York Observer Web site, Anthony fully intends to do so."I want to be a free agent," Anthony told The Observer in a lengthy profile. "I think everybody in the N.B.A. dreams to be a free agent at least one time in their career." He added, "So yes, I want that experience."It is a story line that could easily balloon into an issue that trails the team like exhaust fumes for months. The Knicks, who traveled to Anthony's hometown, Baltimore, on Wednesday to face the Washington Wizards in a preseason game Thursday night, declined to comment through a spokesman.Anthony, who led the N.B.A. in scoring last season, has two years and about $45 million remaining on his contract, but he can terminate the deal at the conclusion of the 2013-14 season through a player option. If Anthony re-signed with the Knicks, even after testing free agency, he would be eligible for a five-year contract worth $129 million, according to N.B.A. rules. The most he could sign for with another team is $96 million over four years.Anthony has been noncommittal about his future with the Knicks, saying that he plans to wait until after the season to weigh his options."When the time comes, I'll deal with that," Anthony said late last month. "I'm not going to go through the season thinking about my contract."Steve Mills, the Knicks' new general manager, has said he intends to do everything he can to retain Anthony, making clear that it is one of the team's top priorities.
The first-grade students at Public School 80 entered Room 108 single file at 8:10 on a clear and blustery morning on Staten Island, placed their book bags in cubbyholes and waited. It was time for Bashir Mason to check their homework.Sunlight still angled in through the windows, the voices were low and the announcements had not yet been read over the speaker system. "Look," a student said, "look at my new pencil case."Mason smiled. He had been awake since 6, and he never drinks caffeine, but a long day beckoned.He is a student teacher, in the final semester of a master's program in education, but in a couple of hours he would resume his more celebrated role as the men's basketball coach at Wagner College, a five-minute uphill drive away. Practices have been under way for more than two weeks to prepare for a menacing Northeast Conference schedule. The Seahawks expect to compete this season, maybe even win their conference, maybe even clinch a berth in the N.C.A.A. tournament.But first, their coach needed to read to the children. The classroom was decorated with apples made of construction paper. Two dozen students crawled onto a rug with a zoo theme, taking their spots upon designated animals. Mason folded his 6-foot frame into a rocking chair. He spread the pages of the book wide so the children could see the pictures.It takes Mason 15 minutes to make the switch from a student teacher to a Division I coach. That is all the time he is afforded.On one morning in early October, practice began at 10 a.m. At 9:55, Mason had changed from a gray sweater and blue slacks into a long-sleeve black T-shirt and cutoff sweats. He gathered his players in a huddle in the corner of the gym and engaged them in an expletive-laced tirade, displeased by their effort and focus the past few days.It was an abrupt U-turn from the whispering Mr. Mason persona he had assumed in the classroom about a half-hour earlier. But in a sense, it served as a reminder: playtime was over."I needed to recharge their batteries," he said later.At 29, Mason is the youngest Division I men's basketball head coach, and his staff and administrators believe he is the only one actively assuming a dual role as an elementary schoolteacher.It was not what Mason had envisioned. But two years ago he enrolled in a master's program in education on campus, and he plans to finish it in December.When Wagner promoted him from assistant to head coach in March 2012, after Dan Hurley left to coach Rhode Island, Mason had only a few credits remaining. But the last requirement — 220 hours of hands-on classroom experience — has required unusual commitment.Five mornings a week, Mason works with Maria Premus at the Michael J. Petrides School for about two hours, always before basketball practice. On Fridays, Mason teaches, coaches and then attends class on campus for three hours in the afternoon."When you see a guy leading the ship like that," the assistant Mike Babul said, "you tend to follow."Coaches and classrooms, even at the highest athletic level, have never been mutually exclusive. The former Ohio State football coach Jim Tressel used to teach class twice a week on campus, following in the footsteps of Woody Hayes, who lectured on World War II history. For years, the basketball coach Fran Dunphy has co-taught an honors business course at Temple. La Salle Coach John Giannini has a doctorate in kinesiology from Illinois that he earned while working as an assistant there in the 1980s.Even Walt Hameline, Wagner's athletic director and football coach, taught kindergarten for extra money while working as an assistant football coach at SUNY Albany.But that was decades ago. Times have changed, and so have priorities and the demands on coaches, who are paid handsomely to avoid distraction.
LeBron James almost glowed Thursday while describing the battles he had fought against the Boston Celtics. The team was a persistent hurdle when he was rising to superstardom with the Cleveland Cavaliers. And the grappling continued when he took his title ambitions to Miami."You had to kill those guys, man," James said, laughing, as he stood inside the visitors' locker room at Barclays Center. "They wouldn't stop. They got me a few times, and I was able to get them a few times. It was great fun playing against that Celtics team."James's fuzzy memories and compliments belied the fact that he shared a prickly rivalry with the Celtics and their stars Kevin Garnett and Paul Pierce. That there was no love lost between the pair of Celtics and James's co-star Dwyane Wade was barely veiled.When the Nets this summer acquired Garnett and Pierce from the Celtics, they took on not only their skill and spirit, but their enmities, too.Wade was asked whether the aggressive rivalry would transfer to Brooklyn. "Yeah," he said, laughing at his own bluntness. "I don't know if you're looking for a better answer than that: yeah."The Nets and the Heat met Thursday night for the first of two contests this preseason. The Heat will return to Brooklyn on Nov. 1, when the Nets play their home opener.Each game will give the Nets, a team that has been trumpeting its championship hopes, a valuable opportunity to take their own measure.And everyone knows the Nets must be tailored to defeat the Heat, who won the last two titles."These are the champs," Nets Coach Jason Kidd said. "You can find out where you stand."The games could also nurture a budding rivalry. The Nets' players seemed to relish the prospect. The team played three games against the Heat last season and was crushed each time."Whatever they got going on with the Heat, now it's a part of us," Nets guard Joe Johnson said of Garnett and Pierce. "We've got their back 100 percent, man. I'm speaking from the first man down to the last."Players on both teams, for the most part, said the preseason games — and even their first regular-season matchup — would be used for fine-tuning. They would be more concerned about establishing their own games than looking at their opponents.Erik Spoelstra, the Heat coach, said the playoffs sparked and stoked rivalries. For now, he had only kind words about the retooled Nets.He said the team's size at each position was one thing he could already tell would pose a huge challenge."How do you not respect them, really?" Spoelstra said. "They had a terrific summer. It's not easy to be able to accumulate that type of talent and have that many All-Stars on the same team, and you can feel the excitement from the off-season they had."The rivalry will possess many interwoven threads. Jason Terry, who joined the Nets through the trade for Garnett and Pierce, played for the Dallas Mavericks when they knocked James and the Heat from the finals in 2011. Ray Allen has received a cold shoulder from his former Celtics teammates since he signed with the Heat before last season.James stirred things a bit Wednesday, saying he found it interesting that Garnett and Pierce, who were critical of Allen's decision to leave Boston, had now moved on from the Celtics themselves."Tell LeBron to worry about Miami," Garnett said when asked about the comments after the game. "He has nothing to do with Celtic business."More threads are set to emerge, now that the Nets have spent their way into contention."This will be a team that will be able to compete with the Heat, with the Bulls, with the Pacers, with all the good teams in the Eastern Conference," Wade said of the Nets."I'm not singing their praises over here — I don't know — but they'll be very competitive with the personnel they brought in."Jason Kidd's No. 5 Nets jersey was retired during a pregame ceremony. "As a player, you talk about winning a championship, and this ranks right there," Kidd said. Smoke and fireworks punctuated the proceedings, which drew several former Nets players and executives to the arena.
BALTIMORE — The present somehow seemed lost Thursday when Carmelo Anthony returned to his hometown. It was all about the past and an uncertain future.With the Knicks playing the Washington Wizards in a preseason game at Baltimore Arena, Anthony found himself reminiscing about growing up and learning how to "survive" in this hard-edge city. The bleachers were sprinkled with old friends who relished the roles they had played in his development."I talk about him a lot," said Mike Daniel, who coached Anthony for three seasons at Towson Catholic High School. "I don't talk to him as much anymore, but I do talk about him a lot. It's hard to run him down. He's married now, with a son. He's working hard at his craft, and he's making a little money along the way."Yet for all the nostalgia that accompanied Anthony's appearance here, it was becoming painfully obvious that his plans for next summer — to opt out of his contract and become a free agent — had the potential to become a season-long nuisance for the Knicks."If he's going to test it, he's got to test it," Coach Mike Woodson. "That's on him. But at this point, he has to worry about this season and this season only because that's what's staring him in the face as we speak today."Anthony has said that he does not want to talk about free agency this season, but he was talking about it once again after the morning shootaround. The questions seem certain to follow him from city to city, like fumes belching from a rusty muffler, in much the same way that they trailed Dwight Howard last season."This is not something that I want to keep going on," Anthony said, even as he did little to stop it.Anthony, who led the N.B.A. in scoring last season, has two years and about $45 million remaining on his contract, but he can terminate the deal at the conclusion of the 2013-14 season through a player option. On Thursday, he reiterated that he intended to do so."Does that mean I'm not coming back to New York? Not at all," Anthony said. "But it is definitely an opportunity that I'm willing to explore and experience."Anthony did what he could to navigate his way through a maze of public relations pitfalls, expressing his loyalty to the team one minute ("I don't want to go anywhere; I don't plan on going anywhere") before trying to explain the lure of free agency the next. Back and forth he went, at a dizzying tempo. The message got murky."I think, as a player, guys would like to explore that, guys would like to have that situation, just to see what it's about," Anthony said.The Knicks' advantage is that they can offer him the most lucrative contract, according to the terms of the collective bargaining agreement: $129 million over five seasons. The largest offer that another team would be able to produce is $96 million over four years.One question is whether the Knicks should even offer him a maximum contract. Teams have grown more cautious about breaking the bank to assemble huge offers for aging stars. (Amar'e Stoudemire, due to earn $23.4 million next season, provides one such cautionary tale.) Anthony would be 35 years old by the end of a new five-year deal with the Knicks.The twist is that Anthony has not cited money as a factor in his pursuit of free agency. Instead, it seems to have more to do with wanting to be part of a viable championship contender and having never been an unrestricted free agent. He wants to be courted, it seems; he wants to be wanted. Anthony is a six-time All-Star with a pair of Olympic gold medals, but he still relishes being recognized as Great, with a capital 'G.'Joe Connelly, a developmental assistant with the Wizards who coached Anthony as a teenager, said much of that mentality stemmed from Anthony's childhood, when he was an undersize, overlooked player."He wants to be respected as the best," Connelly said.It is worth noting that Anthony could have become a free agent in 2011. Instead, as a member of the Denver Nuggets, he pushed for a midseason trade to the Knicks. He got what he wanted, including a three-year extension worth $65 million. He also referred to the five-year extension he signed with the Nuggets in 2006, when a group of other stars, including LeBron James, signed three-year deals."The guys that did become free agents at that time, they laugh and they joke when they see me right now," Anthony said. "Like, 'Remember that time we told you to take that three-year deal rather than the five-year deal?' So that's just conversations we have in the off-season, just talking."As for the Knicks, they mortgaged much of their long-term viability — four rotation players, three draft picks and some cash — to land Anthony in the first place. If he signs with another team next summer, they would be left with nothing in return.On the other hand, supplying him with an enormous contract would probably put the Knicks flush against the salary cap for several seasons to come, their future tied to a veteran who has yet to prove he can lead a team deep into the postseason.The Knicks have made it clear that they feel it is a risk worth taking. Now, it is up to Anthony to decide, however long it takes.The Knicks defeated the Wizards, 98-89. Carmelo Anthony scored a game-high 22 points on 8-of-17 shooting. Tim Hardaway Jr. added 14 points and 5 rebounds. ... Iman Shumpert sprained his right elbow in the first half, and Pablo Prigioni sprained his left elbow in the second. Neither returned.
Nets' Turn to Be Talk of the Town: After decades of playing second fiddle in New York, the Nets, according to William C. Rhoden, are in position to capture the city's imagination. And the franchise in Manhattan is feeling the pressure.BOSTON — Paul Pierce kept a low profile here Wednesday, but the two pictures he posted to his Instagram account during the day told a story.Around noon, he uploaded a photograph that showed four Boston Red Sox caps arrayed around a shirt bearing the words "Red Sox Nation." The picture and the caption — "Let's go" — were not surprising coming from Pierce, 36, who spent 15 N.B.A. seasons in Boston before a trade three months ago transferred him to Brooklyn alongside Kevin Garnett and Jason Terry.Then, shortly after 6 p.m., he posted another snapshot, this one without a caption, showing a coming Sports Illustrated magazine cover that depicts the Nets' starting five and coach.For the time being — and presumably for the rest of his Nets career — Pierce's loyalties will straddle two cities. He will chase a championship this season from Brooklyn, his new home, while treasuring the one he captured in Boston, the home he adopted for a decade and a half."They've still got that feeling deep down inside this was their home," Terry said about Pierce and Kevin Garnett, who led the Celtics to the 2008 title. "They revived the legendary status of the Boston Celtics when they came here. They carved out their own niche. And I can envision both of their jerseys hanging up in the rafters as Celtics."From the moment he was traded, Pierce said he would prefer to make his return to TD Garden in Boston during the regular season. He admitted that it would be an emotional moment for him, that tears would be shed, and he questioned the benefit of going through it multiple times. Returning for a preseason game would feel like an awkward false start before the main event.That led to an unusual situation on Wednesday. Pierce and Garnett traveled with the Nets for their preseason game against the Celtics and participated in the morning shootaround. But they left the group without doing any interviews and were not at the arena as the Nets lost to the Celtics, 101-97Coach Jason Kidd — who ultimately elected to rest his entire starting group — praised the positive influence of Garnett and Pierce and lauded their professionalism and attitude."The Boston people have been very lucky to have them here," Kidd said. "And now we're very lucky to have them on our side."At the same time, amid their stoicism and competitiveness, the pair's attachment to Boston has given the season an intriguingly humanizing story line. (That the Celtics seem noncompetitive at the moment seems to have prevented their potentially divided loyalties from becoming controversial.)Pierce says that he has acclimated to New York. He has taken tours around Brooklyn. He singled out the Meatpacking District as an early favorite Manhattan neighborhood. This week, Du Jour magazine honored him at a large party at the Palm steakhouse in TriBeCa. And the traffic no longer vexes him."I got out here early, in September, so I could figure out my way around, get to know which right turns and left turns to make, understanding the odds go up and the evens go down, figuring out which tunnels to avoid at what time," Pierce said, laughing. "Now, I know it like the back of my hand."Pierce has settled into his new home, but he was not ready to make his homecoming to Boston. His absence Wednesday, and Garnett's, left some fans a bit disappointed. Walter Carbone, 54, from Boston, arrived at the arena alone, even though his daughter had agreed at first to accompany him. "She's a big Celtics fan, but she blew me off when she heard they weren't coming," he said, laughing.Ashley Hugh, 17, from Derry, N.H., walked to her seat with her uncle and surveyed the court as the Celtics warmed up. It was an unfulfilling exercise.
Illustration by Sam Manchester/The New York Times; Photographs by The New York Times, Getty Images and Associated PressThe Knicks and the Nets coexisted for decades without much rancor. Their annual meetings did not constitute much of a rivalry, partly because of their locations and partly because of too much losing between them.The Nets were marooned in New Jersey as a second-tier franchise, toiling in the big-city shadow cast by Madison Square Garden. Theirs was not the most visible existence, and what they did share with the Knicks was an inability to win consistently.When the Patrick Ewing-led Knicks were decent in the 1990s, the Nets were busy churning their way through five coaches. And when the Nets finally found some traction in the years that followed, highlighted by two consecutive conference titles, the Knicks occupied themselves by falling into complete disrepair. There was little overlap: when one team was good, the other was usually not.But now everything has changed. The players. The expectations. The ticket prices.The Knicks, after winning 54 games last season, consider themselves, at least publicly, a viable championship contender. The Nets, late of the Meadowlands and now entrenched in Brooklyn, overhauled their roster in the off-season, acquiring Paul Pierce, Kevin Garnett and Jason Terry from the Boston Celtics.In one bold stroke, Mikhail D. Prokhorov, the Nets' billionaire owner, pushed the entire enterprise — two teams, one city — to an unprecedented level. Pierce and Garnett, in particular, have never held the Knicks in the highest esteem, and they have talked openly in recent weeks about making the city their own, about winning another title together. As a bonus, Prokhorov hired Jason Kidd as the Nets' coach.The stakes are high, especially with the clock ticking on both teams. Carmelo Anthony plans to opt out of his contract with the Knicks after the season so he can test free agency. The Nets, their roster crammed with aging stars, will cost Prokhorov roughly $183 million this season in player payroll and luxury taxes. It remains to be seen how long he will want to sustain that kind of exorbitant spending.In any case, these are teams built for today, if not tomorrow. Fans might be wise to catch them while they can. — SCOTT CACCIOLAI think the conversation about pursuing excellence will be the same in both of these locker rooms. They both want to win. But from top to bottom, I'd have to say the Nets have the better roster. If the Nets don't go to the N.B.A. finals, I think it will be a disappointment for them because they don't have much of a window.It's different for the Knicks. Carmelo Anthony is still in his prime. They can retool after the season, especially if Carmelo stays and re-signs. The Nets don't have that luxury. It's more of a now-or-never situation for them over the next year or two.The dynamic between the teams has also changed because, honestly, the Nets didn't feel "New York" to me last season. They still felt "Jersey." I think it was hard for people to wrap their heads around the fact that they were actually in Brooklyn.Maybe the 15,000 people who went to the arena to see them play realized what was happening. But everyone else in New York? They couldn't wrap their heads around it. I know I couldn't. It was probably the same sort of situation when the Brooklyn Dodgers left for Los Angeles. It took a while for people in L.A. to really get a feel for the team.But now the Nets are in New York, and people know it. An important part of it is that the players have embraced that they're in Brooklyn, especially a guy like Paul Pierce. They've entrenched themselves in the borough and engaged themselves with the city.The two teams still have different types of fans, though. My teenage son, for example, is probably a Nets fan. I'm a Knicks fan. Growing up in Queens, I loved the Knicks: Walt Frazier, Earl Monroe, Dick Barnett, Bill Bradley, Dave DeBusschere.The older you are, the more likely you are to root for the Knicks. Knicks fans are more wine and cheese. Nets fans are in your face. I think it's a generational thing.KENNY SMITH is an analyst for TNT's N.B.A. broadcasts.Welcome to the 'Melo Experience'
N.C.A.A. officials are planning to enforce rules more tightly this year. They have been instructed not to tolerate physical play in the post, on shooters and on ball handlers.The changes are meant to give offensive players more freedom of movement, which coaches hope will lead to increased scoring."We may take a step back early, but it's going to help the offense in the long run," Connecticut Coach Geno Auriemma said. "All the coaches are for it to help improve the game."It is hard to argue with the numbers. Last season, women's basketball teams combined to shoot 39 percent from the field, resulting in an average of 62.1 points a game, a record low. That is nearly 8 points less than the average in 1981-82, the first season of N.C.A.A. women's basketball.Doug Bruno, the longtime DePaul coach, sent a letter to other coaches over the summer detailing how the game had become too physical. Bruno wrote that "one change" would help solve the problem."Let the athletes be athletes," Bruno said. "People need to learn to play defense by moving their feet and not their hands or bodies. It may be a lot of whistles early on, but in the long run, it's what the game needs."Coaches will have to adjust their defenses or put their players at risk of fouling out."You can expect everyone to play more zone this year," Louisville Coach Jeff Walz said. "You're going to need at least two zones, or you're going to have no players left."Walz's team was highlighted in an N.C.A.A. officiating video that all Division I coaches were required to watch."It's funny because if you look at it, the highest-scoring game in the N.C.A.A. regional semifinals was our 82-81 win over Baylor, and that's the game everyone's talking about," Walz said.Debbie Williamson, the secretary-rules editor for N.C.A.A. women's basketball, has led officiating clinics throughout the country in the last month to reinforce the new plan to the referees. These are the major changes:■ A defender can no longer continually keep a hand or forearm on an opponent.■ A defender cannot use an arm bar to impede an opponent's progress.■ A defender cannot place two hands on an opponent.Consistency was the key word at the clinics: the calls should be made not only in November and December but also during conference play and the N.C.A.A. tournament."It's what the coaches want and what the game needs," Williamson said at a clinic in Philadelphia. "The only thing that can be really bad is if you start blowing whistles early on and stop in the new year. Or you blow them in the Northeast and not the Southeast. It has to be consistent."The N.C.A.A. also adopted a few rules for this season to try to increase the pace of the women's game. One rule requires the offensive team to move the ball past midcourt within 10 seconds. Failure to do so will result in a turnover.Previously, teams could take as much time off the 30-second shot clock as they wanted before crossing midcourt.
A new N.B.A. season is upon us, and competition for the league's most coveted prize figures to be fierce. We refer here not to the Larry O'Brien Championship Trophy, but to the king of potential free agents.With LeBron James having an out in his Miami Heat contract next summer, has your favorite franchise devised a nontampering romancing plan should James decide to take his talents from South Beach?You may have noticed that N.B.A. free agency receives more attention than actual N.B.A. games. That's because the league and its partner sponsors are so heavily invested in creating celebrities and half the country is asleep or just plain tired of indoor sports when championships are won in mid-to-late June.Nobody ever gets bored with watching grown men grovel, however. When James last peddled himself to the most persuasive bidder — Pat Riley, who emptied a cloth bag of championship rings on the bargaining table — his decision rated a capital D and was watched breathlessly in prime time. Mass hysteria followed. James's jerseys were burned on the streets of Cleveland. Nationwide, he was called a traitor, a fraud and even a whore (on the cover of a book whose author happened to also quit Cleveland to go work someplace else).But who could now blame James for wondering about growing old in Miami, especially after already winning two championships for the city and after Rolling Stone predicted it might soon be underwater because of rising seas? That would surely put a crimp in the city's night life and, worse, limit the Heat's ability to attract good role players.While promising not to talk about free agency during the pursuit of a third straight title, a quest that begins Tuesday night at home against Chicago, James recently told ESPN: "I would love to spend the rest of my career in Miami with this great team and great organization as we continue to compete for championships. That's ideal. But we don't know what may happen from now to the end of the season. That's the nature of the business."In other words, the King must be wary of Dwyane Wade's projected health and Miami's ability to stay on top. His mind and eyes are open. So here is an imagined sampling of what he might see and hear as he makes his itinerant rounds. Or perhaps not that imaginary.FRIDAY, AT NETS: For cap reasons, the Nets probably cannot contend for James unless he remains with Miami without extending his contract and opts out in 2015.But all they need to do to establish their viability is flash their combined 2013-14 payroll and luxury tax bill — an estimated $183 million — on the Barclays Center big screen when James and Miami drop by for Brooklyn's home opener. And have Mikhail D. Prokhorov hammer the message home by grabbing the mic to announce that, "I spend more to win championship than my good friend Mr. Putin wastes on silly Olympic figure skating and bobsled."NOV. 16, AT CHARLOTTE: The owner Michael Jordan tells The Charlotte Observer that James is a better player than he ever was and that he certainly could never beat James one on one. Jordan then gets sick to his stomach, but only when no one is watching.NOV. 27, AT CLEVELAND: An arena full of Cavaliers fans takes in the overdue spectacle of the owner Dan Gilbert presenting James with a framed No. 23 jersey he wore in Cleveland — in Miami, No. 23 is retired in honor of Jordan — while raising a replica to the rafters of Quicken Loans Arena. "Traitor?" Gilbert says. "Really? Who ever said that?"DEC. 25, AT L.A. LAKERS: With Kobe Bryant making his season debut, the Buss family calls a news conference to announce that it will team with Harvey Weinstein and that it has signed James to star in a remake of "The King and I." Jack Nicholson will co-star along with Carmelo Anthony. Bryant will direct.DEC. 27, AT SACRAMENTO: The minority Kings owner Shaquille O'Neal picks up James at the airport in a Buick LaCrosse and tells him, "I may have retired from the game, but not from being big.""How can you be big in a cow town like Sacramento?" James says."Son," Shaq says, "wherever I go is Gotham City. And you, too."DEC. 28, AT PORTLAND: The Nike strongman, Phil Knight, offers James a stake in his company if he joins the Blazers. He also promises to build a new manufacturing plant in James's native Akron, Ohio. "We'll call it Jamestown," Knight says.JAN. 9, AT NEW YORK: At Walt Frazier's Wine and Dine on 10th Avenue, Frazier greets James and entourage at the door. Earl Monroe and Bill Bradley show James to a table. The lights dim. Willis Reed limps over to James and says, "I'll be your waiter, King James. May I suggest one of our finest Champagnes, a 1970 vintage. ..."FEB. 18, AT DALLAS: The Cowboys owner Jerry Jones welcomes James to Dallas by offering him the starting tight end position for one game every season — if he'll become a Maverick.MARCH 19, AT BOSTON: In a pregame ceremony, the Celtics reretire No. 23, adding James's name to Frank Ramsey's jersey in the rafters. Bill Russell quietly offers James his sainted No. 6 — James's Miami number — should he join the most successful professional basketball team in history."Young man, you have no idea what it's like to win until you've won as a Celtic," Russell says while pulling back his sports jacket to reveal his .38-caliber Smith & Wesson. "No pressure, though." He slaps James's back and unleashes his world-famous cackle.APRIL 16, MIAMI: Before the Heat's last regular-season home game, a copy of the "The Winner Within" appears in James's locker, with original Riley inscriptions: "Don't let other people tell you what you want" and "From contender to winner. From winner to champion. From champion to Dynasty."But not before another Decision.
MIAMI — In what is considered to be a renaissance era for exceptional point guards, the two-time defending N.B.A. champion Heat — who, in effect, play without one — welcomed the most intriguing of the little-man lot back to the regular-season grind Tuesday night.LeBron James and Dwyane Wade were pleased to see Derrick Rose on the court again with the Chicago Bulls after a full season lost to a harrowing knee injury. Both offered a standard platitude — "good for the league" — for a fellow member of the industry elite.Then James, Wade and friends received their championship rings, watched the Miami franchise's third banner rise to the rafters of American Airlines Arena and proceeded to coast to a 107-95 victory over Rose and the Bulls. The timing of the season-opening occasion could not have been a clearer admonition, a metaphorical pat on Rose's head. Son, we're not the same ring-less team you last played against.The global N.B.A. village is thrilled to have Rose back attacking the seams of opposing defenses. He isn't yet accustomed to the intensity of real games, but his knee looks fully repaired, and we can all agree he was right to hold himself out as the limping Bulls valiantly struggled against Miami last spring in the playoffs."He's gotten better, man — you guys are going to see it," said Bulls forward Carlos Boozer, who provided most of their Game 1 offense with 31 points, while Rose shot 4 for 15, scoring 12. "His point-guard skills have improved a lot. His passing is precise. His leadership is better. He trusts us more."The typically humble Rose agreed, acknowledging that watching from a different perspective, the bench, has made him a more learned floor general. He nodded to the questionable suggestion that this is the best Bulls team he has played on, though he graciously added, "No disrespect to my former teammates."No disrespect to Rose or the stalwart defenders in Coach Tom Thibodeau's core lineup, but the Bulls at first glance did not look very deep (their bench was outscored by Miami's, 30-6, over the first three quarters) or big enough. History also tells us that there have been few N.B.A. championship teams whose most dominant player was a superstar in miniature.At 6-foot-1, Isiah Thomas comes to mind as the backbone of the 1989 and 1990 champion Detroit Pistons. John Stockton, also 6-1, came mighty close with his tag-team partner, Karl Malone, in Utah. But in the modern game, Magic Johnson, Larry Bird, Michael Jordan, Kobe Bryant, James, Wade and a few very large men have been the primary difference makers.Tony Parker was San Antonio's best player as the Spurs came within a stroke of good fortune of beating the Heat in the 2013 finals. But Tim Duncan played close to the level of his prime, when he keyed the Spurs' four titles. Chauncey Billups was the glue to Detroit when the 2004 Pistons took out the Lakers in five games for the title. But he was no transcendent star, in the way Allen Iverson was when his Philadelphia 76ers fell in five games to the Shaq-and-Kobe Lakers in 2001.Rose, Chris Paul, Kyrie Irving and Stephen Curry are part of a group that has been celebrated for elevating — though hardly inventing — the hybrid point-guard game, combining explosive scoring ability with playmaking flair. An earlier generation produced true visionaries in Jason Kidd and Steve Nash, but also the me-first indulgences of Iverson and Stephon Marbury.It is no simple chore to balance blinding quickness and a soft touch with essential team needs. Iverson never did, but that didn't stop James on Monday from calling him "pound for pound probably the greatest player to ever play."Maybe James was just being respectful in advance of the Heat's visit to Philadelphia on Wednesday night, where Iverson's retirement is scheduled to be ceremonially upgraded to official from obvious. Or he merely meant to say that Iverson got more out of a skinny little body than anyone he could recall.Players often have a different take on the game than critics. First and foremost, they respect pure talent. That is why Wade said of Iverson: "One of my favorite players of all time. I took pride in wearing No. 3 because A. I. wore it. He changed the game, in a sense."But the game moves on, its spotlight on the ascendant. Iverson may have gotten the most out of his body, but never did grasp the meaning of figurative growth, via practice. This is where Rose has a chance to become a champion's little big man, according to Thibodeau."Even though he couldn't play last year, he studied," Thibodeau said. "He made the best of his circumstances. He's a stronger player, a smarter player. And now the challenge is for us to put it together as a team."It's an intriguing team, with tough, versatile players like Joakim Noah, Luol Deng and Jimmy Butler. But with a history of injuries to key players, can the Bulls play Thibodeau's relentless style for 82 games and win 16 more against the league's best teams? Can Thibodeau deepen his bench and make use out of a soft player like Mike Dunleavy?Against the Heat and in an upgraded Eastern Conference, we know the Bulls will be gritty, but are they really good enough to help Rose become that rare exception in a sport where bigger men rule?On championship-ring night, the Heat gave us several reasons to doubt it. But in the interests of variety, that would, as they say, be good for the league.
EAST RUTHERFORD, N.J. — The multitude of positive traits the revamped Nets are supposed to possess — savvy and spirit and a high basketball I.Q. — will be undermined if their stars succumb to injury.That is a caveat that can be applied to any team in any sport, but the concern feels outsize around the Nets, who legitimized their trophy ambitions over the summer by acquiring several veteran stars: Kevin Garnett and Paul Pierce and the capable substitutes Andrei Kirilenko and Jason Terry. The players' rapport is expected to continue to develop. The Nets' long-term health, then, seems like the only wild card as the team prepares to open its season Wednesday night against the Cleveland Cavaliers.It was an apt metaphor from Kidd. The Nets are shrewd enough to know that this month's results will be almost meaningless compared with next spring's, and they are self-assured enough to say so. They seem unconcerned, then, that they are starting their title chase a tad hobbled."Really, it's how you finish and how the playoffs go," Deron Williams said. But, he added: "We want to get off to a good start. We want to start this thing off right."Kirilenko, 32, whose two-way skill and versatility make him the team's most crucial bench player, was not expected to play Wednesday as he recovers from back spasms that sidelined him the previous two weeks."It feels O.K.," said Kirilenko, who added that he hoped to play Friday night at home against the Miami Heat. "I just need to build the strength level."Before Kirilenko's injury, the team's preseason harmonization process had already been disrupted. Terry saw limited action while rehabilitating from an off-season knee procedure, and a sprained left ankle kept Williams, who will conduct the offense at point guard, from seeing any game action until last Friday, when the Nets closed their preseason against the Heat.Williams will play on Wednesday, but his playing time is likely to be limited as he continues to rebuild his stamina. Kidd said that would be an unhurried process. (Kidd will not be on the court. He received a two-game suspension from the N.B.A. after pleading guilty to a drunken-driving charge.)Williams said the team's cohesion would stem from the players' brainpower, which they have not been shy about citing. "One of our mottos is, 'Make plays, don't run them,' " Williams said. "People are going to screen. We're going to move. We're going to keep guys occupied on the weak side. It's about making reads and making basketball plays."The Nets hope to be a fluid and freewheeling team this season, and Williams suggested this reliance on intuition would make jelling simpler, regardless of how much time anyone misses through injury."Everybody knows how to play the right way," Williams said. "I think that's what we were missing a little bit last year, is playing the right way, playing as a team and being selfless."Williams's absences during the preseason opened the door for Shaun Livingston to grab valuable playing time. But Livingston missed the Nets' last two preseason workouts, Monday and Tuesday, with a stiff neck. Kidd said he expected Livingston to play on Wednesday, but the Nets still need to see how he feels Wednesday morning. Pierce was back practicing Tuesday after resting a sore toe.The injuries, as a whole, were deemed minor, and the Nets on Tuesday were looking forward to their opener, a chance to play meaningful basketball after weeks of preseason drudgery. Despite efforts to play down the importance of the early season, it will come with considerable intrigue. The Nets have been restructured to make a championship run, and this will be their initial obstacle."It never gets old," Garnett said about the start of a fresh season. "Every year is a new challenge."
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — Metta World Peace went through a series of majors when he was a student at St. John's. He initially wanted to study architecture so he could learn to build community centers, but he was disappointed to discover that too many of his classes clashed with basketball practice.So after dabbling with being an art major and concluding that basketball would still get in the way, he finally found a match: math. The classes fit the demands of his schedule, and he was drawn to the work itself. Each equation was a puzzle. As World Peace put it, "I love solving problems."Now in his 15th N.B.A. season, World Peace approaches his basketball schedule in much the same way. The season, he said, is one big puzzle with a series of smaller challenges. And as the Knicks spent recent weeks gearing up for Wednesday's opener against the Milwaukee Bucks, their first such challenge became glaringly apparent: The team's defense is a grease fire."We're not where I want us to be," Coach Mike Woodson said.In the preseason, according to Synergy Sports, the Knicks ranked among the league's worst teams in a truckload of categories that measure defensive performance. Over all, they allowed .946 points per possession, which ranked 29th out of 30 teams. They were last in defending halfcourt sets (.929), post-ups (1.069) and shots coming off screens (1.25). By comparison, they looked like the 1986 Boston Celtics against isolations, limiting opponents to .984 points per possession, which ranked 26th."We know we've got to pick it up, and that's going to come with communication," Iman Shumpert said. "But we'll get it done."In fairness, Woodson experimented with lineups throughout the preseason, rotating familiar faces (Carmelo Anthony, Tyson Chandler) with more recent additions (Tim Hardaway Jr., Beno Udrih) as he searched for continuity and chemistry. But players who were invited to camp and eventually cut from the roster consumed just 14 percent of the team's total minutes. So the product that was on the court provided some indication of what could be ahead for this team. And it was not pretty.World Peace, who signed with the team in the off-season and has long been known as one of the league's top defenders, said he was not concerned. The Knicks, he said, are "athletic and talented." World Peace will be an immediate defensive upgrade if he can stay healthy. He also has been mentoring Shumpert, an energetic swingman."We've got a chance to be one of the better defensive teams in the league," World Peace said.Still, it is worth noting that the Knicks were not a turbocharged defensive team last season. They allowed 103.5 points per 100 possessions, according to NBA.com, and that figure ranked 16th in the league. If their defense had the consistency of a soggy paper towel for long stretches, they offset some of those problems by scoring at a high clip — at least until the playoffs, when the Indiana Pacers gave them fits.Woodson has a reputation as a defensive guru, but this may be the Knicks' most effective approach once again: to mask their flaws on defense with high-octane offense. Consider the addition of Andrea Bargnani, a 7-footer who was never a particularly stout defender in seven seasons with the Toronto Raptors. Woodson acknowledged that he might need to pair Bargnani with strong wing defenders.In other words, Bargnani is not employed by the Knicks because of his prowess as a rim protector, but in spite of it. And if he wants a good amount of playing time this season, he may need to unearth his shooting stroke. It was lost to him in the preseason, as he shot 38.1 percent. During intrasquad scrimmages leading to Wednesday's game, Bargnani was beginning to see time with the team's second unit.All indications Tuesday were that Bargnani would come off the bench against the Bucks. It is all part of the process for a team seeking adequate defenders, if not basketball burglars."It's going to take a little time," Woodson said, "but that's no excuse."Many of Woodson's defensive tenets are unconventional and require adjustments by players new to the system. For example, Woodson wants his post players to glue themselves to their individual assignments. That means resisting the urge to offer help defense, with the responsibility for stopping dribble penetration falling on the team's guards. Chandler, the team's starting center, said the concept still felt foreign to him, even after two seasons with the Knicks."I fight it every time because it's my natural instinct to go help and make a difference," said Chandler, who was the league's defensive player of the year in the 2011-12 season. "A lot of the things that Woody tries to strategize out there are the complete opposite of what you're taught as a big man. It takes guys a while to catch on."Perhaps that is the hope. Chandler said he was optimistic that Bargnani had the potential to become a good team defender.It might be a low bar, but the Knicks have room to grow. World Peace cautioned against reading too much into the preseason schedule. He likes to divide the season into segments, and the Knicks, he said, are still searching for their identity. At this point, the puzzle is just a bunch of pieces."We will figure it out," he said.
LOS ANGELES — Audacity has never been in short supply at Staples Center, and so it was that before the Lakers tipped off the season Tuesday night with a visit from their neighbors, the Clippers, a coach stood in the hallway outside his locker room waxing about one of his first duties last summer: scouting potential routes for a championship parade.In a twist, it was the Clippers' coach, Doc Rivers.If it was simply a motivational gambit, the parade planning also spoke to how drastically the prospects of Los Angeles's two N.B.A. franchises had changed. The Clippers, laughingstocks not so long ago, are now fancied as no-joke title contenders, while the Lakers, who looked like a star-studded threat to the Miami Heat at this time last year, trotted out a Kobe Bryant-less roster that must have left the glitterati wondering who these guys were.Well, yes, actually. For a night, the Lakers and their B-list cast of castoffs and aging former All-Stars played the type of freewheeling small ball that Coach Mike D'Antoni once made famous in Phoenix, and they used it to beat the hubris out of the Clippers, 116-103."That team heard for the last two months how good you're going to be, how they're not going to be good, how they're not going to have Kobe," Rivers said afterward. "You knew they were going to play like this was the world championship."If it was not quite that, it was more than a garden-variety victory over the Clippers, with whom the Lakers have shared a building and little else.Consider the bearhug that Jim Buss, the Lakers' much-maligned executive vice president for player personnel, bestowed upon D'Antoni, whom he hired last season instead of Phil Jackson."That was awesome, flat-out awesome," Buss said as he plopped down in a chair to wait for D'Antoni in the coaches' office, a place he rarely visits. "It was really a pretty basketball team. The way the roster was pieced together, we started seeing something there in practice, in the preseason, that this is going to be fun, this is going to be good.""It's one game," Buss continued with a laugh. "But this is what I wanted to see — the team effort, and it was beautiful."Another wondrous moment for Buss was the sight of the Clippers' owner, Donald Sterling, at the game. Buss said that Sterling almost never attends games that are Lakers home games, and that he was upset when the Lakers beat the Clippers in the preseason and the summer league."I don't think he liked this," Buss told D'Antoni.An owner who is upset about losing games that do not count might be seen as eccentric.But a Yahoo Sports report Monday hinted at why the Clippers have been viewed as a dysfunctional organization for so many years. The report said that Sterling sent word to Rivers that he was rescinding the three-team deal that sent Eric Bledsoe and Caron Butler to Phoenix, and landed the Clippers J. J. Redick and Jared Dudley.Rivers, who persuaded Sterling to change his mind, said the article was accurate, but brushed it off as not a big deal.It was the presence of Rivers, who was awarded a three-year, $21 million contract to be coach and senior vice president, that ensured the free-agent guard Chris Paul would re-sign. Rivers was viewed as a missing link for a team that has talent but lacked the defensive trust, half-court offense and leadership to carry it deep into the playoffs.They were no longer a step behind San Antonio, Oklahoma City and the other contenders in a stacked Western Conference.Ralph Lawler, who is in his 36th season as the Clippers' play-by-play broadcaster, said that even though the team has had a coach with the gravitas of Larry Brown, it has never had someone who sees the big picture as well as Rivers.Rivers has rearranged the basketball offices, created a kerfuffle by insisting that the Lakers' championship banners and retired jerseys be covered at Clippers home games and researched parade routes near downtown."His fingerprints are everywhere in this organization," Lawler said. "He hasn't missed a single window pane. He'd be a great C.E.O."
CHICAGO — It was an impossible shot, or at least it looked that way to Carmelo Anthony .Derrick Rose was searching for an angle to the basket as the final seconds evaporated Thursday night, and his options were limited. In fact, Rose, the Bulls' do-everything point guard, was left with only one as he took a final hard dribble along the baseline and elevated against Tyson Chandler, the Knicks' 7-foot-1 center.With both arms extended, Chandler constructed a 10-foot wall, so Rose simply flicked the ball toward the rafters, into the haze that lingered from some pregame pyrotechnics. Over Chandler. Over the side of the backboard, from Anthony's vantage point. Over everyone and everything, before it finally fell through the hoop.The shot lifted the Bulls to a dramatic 82-81 victory, Rose's game-winner coming with 5.7 seconds left in a tussle between two teams that have never been particularly fond of each other.Anthony, who labored his way to 22 points and 8-of-24 shooting, had one last opportunity of his own. After creating a bit of space between himself and the Bulls' Luol Deng, Anthony stepped back for a long jumper, but misfired. Chandler's tip-in attempt at the buzzer was also off the mark.Chandler grabbed 19 rebounds, and Raymond Felton added 13 points in the loss. The Bulls outscored the Knicks by 46-24 in the paint."We competed," Coach Mike Woodson said. "It says a lot for our club. Now I just need to do a better job getting us through down the stretch."Rose's theatrics spoiled a late surge by the Knicks (1-1), who scored 12 straight points in the fourth quarter, turning a 10-point deficit into a 2-point lead. Tim Hardaway Jr. and Felton connected on 3-pointers, and Anthony sank a pair of fadeaways, the second pushing the Knicks ahead by 78-76.With the score tied at 80-80, Anthony misfired on a long field-goal attempt. In the scrum for the loose ball, the officials called a foul on the Bulls' Joakim Noah. With 10.8 seconds left, Chandler hit the second of two free-throw attempts to give the Knicks a lead — one that was short-lived, thanks to Rose."He showed a lot of toughness," said Tom Thibodeau, the Bulls' coach. "He had the courage to take and make that last play."Rose's performance was a mixed bag in his first regular-season game at the United Center since he injured his left knee during the 2012 playoffs. Hindered after straining his neck in Tuesday's loss to the Miami Heat, Rose was 7 of 23 from the field and scored 18 points.Thibodeau, whose larynx appeared to be in midseason form, was less than expansive about Rose's health about an hour before the game, acknowledging only that Rose's body was sore and that he had not determined whether Rose would play.Rose missed 10 of his first 12 shots before hitting back-to-back 3-pointers early in the second half to give Chicago a 49-40 lead. He had a knack for big plays that maintained the Bulls' cushion for much of the second half, including a fast-break layup (61-51) and a double-clutch move under the basket (76-66).Armed with red glow sticks, a capacity crowd serenaded Rose with M.V.P. chants before the game. The atmosphere was electric. The Bulls celebrated their home opener with an elaborate show that left some thick haze that hovered inside the arena throughout the first half.As both teams struggled to piece together consistent stretches of offense, all that fog made for some easy metaphors. It was an ugly game, and perhaps neither team looked particularly proficient on offense because the players had trouble locating each other on the court.The Bulls were clear in their intentions: get to the basket as often as possible, by any means necessary. Early on, that meant letting Deng use his length and quickness to maneuver past Iman Shumpert for three straight buckets inside.The Knicks, meanwhile, could not find their rhythm. Each possession was more tortured than the last, and their shooting percentage dipped to 31.6 percent by the end of the first quarter. Even Amar'e Stoudemire's first appearance of the season failed to provide a jolt.Still, the Knicks showed some resolve. As the third quarter turned into the fourth, they kept hanging around, jostling, competing.The fog eventually lifted for them, but not soon enough.Having declared his plan to opt out of his contract next summer and test free agency, Carmelo Anthony tried to clarify his position in an interview shown during TNT's broadcast, saying that he wants to stay in New York. "They pulled all the strings to get me here, and I wanted to be here," he said. "And I want to retire in New York." ... Andrea Bargnani, who was booed Wednesday by fans at Madison Square Garden in the Knicks' season-opening win over the Milwaukee Bucks, started Thursday and scored 9 points on 4-of-7 shooting.
It is moments before tipoff, and Kevin Garnett is a space shuttle , advancing methodically through a complex launch sequence, preparing himself for thunderous flight.His pregame progression — a series of idiosyncratic acts and subtle gestures — has been calibrated and perfected over 18 full N.B.A. seasons and 1,455 total games. And when he steps onto the Barclays Center court Friday for his first regular-season home game as a Nets player, he will go through it all again, in much the same way as he did as a teenage rookie on the Minnesota Timberwolves.The whole procedure feels automatic, almost mechanical. It possibly betrays a tendency toward obsessive behavior. And, according to those around Garnett, it reveals everything about his professional character."Kevin is a creature of habit, and he's done the same thing his entire career, from Day 1," said Sam Mitchell, who was Garnett's teammate on the Timberwolves from 1995 to 2002. "It hasn't changed. I know Kevin. It won't."Mitchell, who played 13 N.B.A. seasons, said every player had a "go switch," a method to become mentally engaged before tipoff. Garnett just happens to have a particularly overt and complicated one.Observing him before a game, one can almost hear a motorized crescendo, an apparatus whirring to life.After the national anthem and the player introductions, after his team's last pregame huddle, Garnett peels off his warm-up clothes and walks over to the basket and faces the padded stanchion. The arena is buzzing around him, but he sets himself to the side, a solitary figure.Eyes down, he leans his forehead into the padding and begins adjusting his uniform, tucking his shirt into his shorts, stretching the elastic waistband, tugging on the drawstring. All the time, he is mumbling under his breath."It's just total focus," said Paul Pierce, who played six seasons with Garnett on the Boston Celtics before the two were traded to the Nets this summer. "He's there getting his mind right to play."Things are simmering at this point, but Garnett is only beginning. Shorts tied, Garnett bangs his forehead against the pad twice, hard, and slaps it. Then he stalks toward the bench — pausing for a moment, always, to bounce on his toes — where he acknowledges his teammates, his coaches and other team staff members. He bumps fists and performs a few personalized handshakes.Once he reaches the scorer's table, he pours talcum powder into his hands and claps them, puffing the stuff into a small, dense cloud.Steve Aschburner, who covered Garnett's entire Timberwolves career for The Star Tribune in Minneapolis, recalled how he and the other reporters would grab towels to cover their computers when Garnett strode past.Aschburner said the routine had remained largely the same since Garnett's first year, except for minor tweaks and embellishments.Jason Terry, the third player the Nets acquired from the Celtics this summer, said: "Each thing might seem little, but they're big for him. It's all about finding that balance, physical and spiritual."Leonard Zaichkowsky, a sports psychologist, said that consistent routines were often the consequence of athletes' trying to recreate the feel of past success, and that they were likely to help them focus."And you can't be critical of Garnett as a player, for sure," he said about the 15-time All-Star and former most valuable player. "He has shown that constancy of effort and performance."Andray Blatche, a Nets reserve, has one item on his must-do list: after the national anthem, he grabs the rim and does a single pull-up. It is a quick, subtle thing, but he said it was his trigger, a way to activate his mind and body. Joe Johnson, the Nets' starting shooting guard, said he eyed the player lined up to defend him and created a quick mental checklist cataloging ways to beat him.Johnson conceded his routine, considered alongside Garnett's, was "a little more chilled out."Garnett's intensity seems constant. Since joining the Nets, he has celebrated scrimmage victories as if they were playoff series clinchers. At a recent Nets practice, he missed a free throw to close the session, forcing the entire team to do push-ups as punishment. He did his set on closed fists.His pregame routine, then, seems tailored to get him to full throttle. Once the particulars are prepared just so, Garnett re-engages with his surroundings. He walks on the court, often greeting his opponents.Then, right before tipoff, he skips toward the baseline and pounds his chest with a clenched fist. At the Nets' first home preseason game last month, his eyes grew wide, and he let out a profane yell — a positive, encouraging one, to be clear — toward the stands."Some players like to be jovial before the game to release pressure," Mitchell said. "Kevin likes to build the pressure."And once the pressure is built, Garnett can achieve liftoff, the same way he has for years.
When the N.B.A.'s Development League stages its annual draft Friday night, the event might be most notable for everything that it is not.Commissioner David Stern will not stand on a dais at Madison Square Garden and distribute fresh-from-the-box baseball caps to the top selections. The participants will not wear fancy suits. None of the cable outlets will broadcast the event, so nobody will be watching. No flashbulbs. No breathless analysis. And certainly no million-dollar contracts.Instead, most of the D-League's top prospects will be at home, stationed by the phone, waiting for calls from their agents. Are they headed to Fort Wayne or Erie? Bakersfield or Reno?"The players want to be in the N.B.A.," said Chris Alpert, the D-League's vice president for basketball operations and player personnel. "And they're willing to do whatever it takes to get there."The first step in that journey is often the D-League draft: 17 teams enduring eight rounds of rapid-fire selections on a web-based teleconference. It is a threadbare exercise amid the all-consuming excess of professional sports. It might not be glamorous, but neither is minor league basketball."Our draft is the one place where even the most hard-core basketball fanatics will only know half the players," said Kirk Lacob, the general manager of the Santa Cruz Warriors, whose staff spent recent weeks researching hundreds of prospects — the discarded, the overlooked, the unsung. "The truth is, we're still finding out about guys we've never heard of."At the same time, the D-League draft serves an essential purpose, both for the players who entertain dreams of one day vying for championships with LeBron James, and for the N.B.A. teams that see real value in developing them. Nearly 25 percent of the players on current N.B.A. rosters have done tours in the D-League, according to Alpert."It's a grind, so you have to be strong," he said.Toure' Murry, a 23-year-old swingman, recalled monitoring last year's D-League draft online after cameos playing overseas. The Austin Toros selected him 15th over all before trading him to the Rio Grande Valley Vipers. After emerging as one of the league's most dependable players, Murry was able to parlay his experience into a role with the Knicks this season."It all depends on how you look at it," Murry said. "I saw it as a learning tool, as a way for me to advance my career. You need to make the most of your situation."The draft-day dynamic for D-League franchises tends to be distinctly grass roots. The Erie BayHawks, the Knicks' D-League affiliate, are planning to celebrate with sponsors and season-ticket holders at a Pennsylvania bar and grill. There will be contests, raffles and (one must assume) libations. The team's basketball operations staff will also be on hand, phoning in its selections from a back room.Such humble accommodations might cloud the fact that the construction of a D-League roster requires a great deal of preparation. It starts with Alpert and his colleagues at the league office, who comb the globe for talent. The D-League winds up signing more than 180 prospects, who go into a pool of draft-eligible players, and that final list is released about 36 hours before the draft.Not included on the list are players already tied to D-League teams — in many cases, these are returning members of the teams or players who were recently waived by a team's parent club in the N.B.A. The Santa Cruz Warriors, for instance, who are the D-League affiliate of the Golden State Warriors, have nine players on their training camp roster heading into Friday's draft.When the D-League formed in 2001, it organized one big tryout for all the teams. After three days of scouting, the draft order was randomly determined and team officials gathered to select players, constructing their rosters from scratch. The next day, the players boarded buses so they could scatter to the league's various training camp sites. The season began two weeks later.
CHICAGO — In the aftermath of Derrick Rose's game-winning shot, Carmelo Anthony could only shake his head at his locker.Anthony knew there was little the Knicks could have done Thursday night to prevent Rose's extraordinary floater with 5.7 seconds left, a shot he seemed to put up almost blindly, his view of the hoop blocked by Tyson Chandler's 7-foot-1 frame. Rose was going by feel, if not by sight.With everything else falling apart, Rose had no choice but to improvise.In a way, he was underscoring — albeit in a highly artistic way — the challenges that almost every team in the league has faced in the season's opening week. Few plans feel especially firm. Few plays go exactly as planned.That is certainly true of the Knicks. Each early-season game, including their 82-81 loss to the Bulls, provides another opportunity for Coach Mike Woodson to evaluate his personnel, weigh his rotations and monitor his blood pressure."We haven't been together that long," Woodson said. "We've experimented a little bit in the exhibition season, but not the big minutes where you can actually sit back and know how you feel about things: Is this going to work, not work?"The Knicks (1-1) are hardly the only team searching for continuity at this early stage. No less a collection of superstars than the Miami Heat came to the same conclusion Wednesday night after being upset by the Philadelphia 76ers, a team that could set records for futility this season.The Bulls, a championship contender, endured stretches in Thursday's game when they were completely baffled by the Knicks' defense.While Rose was transcendent in the final moments, his game-winner overshadowed an otherwise uneven effort: 18 points and 7-of-23 shooting from the field. In his first two games since missing last season with a knee injury, Rose has averaged 15 points while shooting 28.9 percent."We need to get our rhythm back," Chicago forward Carlos Boozer said. "We'll get back in the lab and work on our offense a little bit."In other words, the Knicks have leaguewide company when it comes to the pursuit of chemistry. To start, Woodson said he would prefer to settle on regular rotations. He likes stability, and he likes for players to know their roles. But that luxury does not exist for this team, at least not yet.J. R. Smith will miss three more games, including Sunday's contest against the Minnesota Timberwolves, for violating the league's drug policy. Amar'e Stoudemire and Kenyon Martin, aged and injured, are supplying the team with extremely limited minutes in the frontcourt.Andrea Bargnani finally flashed some potential against the Bulls, scoring 9 points on 4-of-7 shooting in 24 minutes. Still, his defense remains a work in progress — for now and for the indefinite future — and Woodson opted to go with swingman Tim Hardaway Jr. late in the fourth quarter.Woodson said he was pleased with his team's effort. When the Knicks arrived in Chicago at 2 a.m. Thursday after Wednesday's win over the Milwaukee Bucks, Woodson expected that the game would be a challenge.The Knicks had not played their best basketball at United Center in recent seasons, and the game seemed sure to double as an impromptu celebration for the Bulls and their fans, who were eagerly anticipating Rose's first regular-season home game since 2012.The Knicks could have come unglued after Rose connected on consecutive 3-pointers in the early moments of the second half, baskets that helped Chicago build a double-digit lead. Instead, the Knicks clogged the paint and threw defenders at Rose, whose frustration and misses mounted.The fourth quarter featured some of the Knicks' stingiest defense in recent memory, an especially satisfying stretch given their inability, or at least general reluctance, to guard anyone in the preseason.The Bulls shot 2 of 15 from the field in the fourth quarter. Chicago sank its last attempt, though, and it mattered.As Woodson noted after the game, the Knicks were one of the league's better late-game defensive teams last season, and he wants them to have the same approach. Through two games, the anchor has been Chandler, who appears re-energized after an injury-marred postseason. He had 19 rebounds against Chicago."The way he's been playing on the defensive end, we feed off that emotion and feed off his energy," Anthony said. "As a whole, man, we're just all on the same page on the defensive end. We're talking, we're communicating, and everybody's doing their job."That the Knicks were even in position to win, despite shooting 36 percent, was a credit to their defense and perhaps even some early solidarity. For a team hoping to build a foundation, it was a start.
It is too early, perhaps, to assess how the Nets will fare against the Miami Heat as this N.B.A. season progresses. But within a so-called rivalry that has been so one-sided, so punishing, in recent years, it is probably never too early to start the emotional buildup.This was the takeaway at Barclays Center as the Nets, who carried a 13-game losing streak against the Heat into their home opener Friday night, dispatched the reigning champions, 101-100. The win was the Nets' first over the Heat since March 20, 2009, and it improved their record to 1-1."You've got to grow from someplace," said Kevin Garnett, who had 6 points and 7 rebounds. "We're trying to set a new creed here, a new culture, and I guess you start with getting bears and monkeys off your back."Last season, the Nets went 0-3 against the Heat, never putting up a fight. On Friday, they showed all the characteristics they claimed to possess after assembling their savvy veteran squad, a group that showed a new boldness by proclaiming it was gunning for a championship.Before a tense finish, a boisterous tone was set early. The Nets were unhappy about their ball movement Wednesday night, when they lost their opener to the Cleveland Cavaliers, but they looked crisp in jumping to a 27-18 lead after one quarter.Just before the first quarter ended, Jason Terry sank consecutive 3-pointers and showed off his airplane celebration, spreading his arms and running. He cupped his hands around his mouth, joined in the "Brook-lyn" chant and then waved his hands, asking for more volume. It was a brash move, and the crowd loved it."Big up to Brooklyn, straight up," Garnett said. "It's going to be a pleasure playing here."There was substance to the Nets' game, too. They harassed LeBron James (26 points, 7 rebounds, 6 assists). They built their lead to 16 during the third quarter. Then, as the Heat surged down the stretch, the Nets showed a spine.The game's edgy finish made the final whistle more cathartic. James hit a 3-pointer with four seconds left to cut the Nets' lead to 1 point. But Joe Johnson (19 points) swaggered to the free-throw line on the other end and hit both attempts. The Nets fouled Chris Bosh on the ensuing inbound pass, and although he made both free throws, the Nets played keep-away on the subsequent inbound pass as the clock died out.Paul Pierce was a particular menace, scoring 17 of his 19 points in the second half. Just as important, he hounded James to the final buzzer.Garnett said Pierce's nickname was Picasso because "he's like a beautiful painting, man, a beautiful painting I get to watch every night."The Nets, like every other team, entered the season with the Heat squarely in their cross hairs. But there remains an emotional gulf to overcome first, a ragged recent history to wash away. James, dating to his tenure with the Cleveland Cavaliers, carried a personal 17-game winning streak against the Nets.The Nets' personnel changes this season have changed the rivalry's complexion, but it remains to be seen if they will make it more competitive on the court. Whatever the ultimate outcome, the rivalry has already been supplied some new extracurricular tinder.James incited some headlines during the preseason when he lobbed some critical comments toward Pierce and Garnett, who responded that James should mind his own business. On Friday night, when a reporter tried to ask James before the game about the Nets, his response was pointed."I'm not answering any questions about the Nets," he said. "K. G. already told me to worry about my own team."The Nets were as close to full strength as they had been since training camp. The medical staff loosened the reins a bit on Deron Williams, who was limited on Wednesday to 22 minutes — and no fourth-quarter playing time — as he continued his return from a sprained right ankle. He played just over 27 minutes Friday and had 8 points and 8 assists.Andrei Kirilenko, who missed the Nets' last five preseason games and the season opener because of back spasms, returned to the team, galvanizing the Nets on both ends during an abbreviated night.The atmosphere was boisterous throughout. Celebrities and boldface names — David Beckham, Magic Johnson, Allen Iverson and the rapper Fabolous, to name a few — were shown on the video board and received big ovations. But the players got the loudest cheers. With less than five minutes on the clock, Pierce stuffed James, bringing the fans to their feet."It was big because, one, you're playing against the best team in the N.B.A. and, two, we're trying to establish something, some home presence," Pierce said. "It was good that we got a taste of this type of atmosphere this early in the season to try to see where we're at."
Grant Hill celebrated his 41st birthday last month, and on that day he was on the Duke campus, appearing at an event to mark the 50th anniversary of black students attending the university.As it turned out, the Nets were holding training camp on campus that week, so Hill stopped by practice with plans to tape a segment for his new gig. Hill has begun work this fall as an analyst for Turner Sports and NBA TV."Honestly, I had not missed playing," said Hill, who retired this year after an 18-year playing career. "I had not even thought about it."But he stood inside the gym and saw Jason Kidd, with whom he shared the 1995 rookie of the year award, coaching from the sideline. He watched Paul Pierce and Kevin Garnett, with whom he battled so many years as a player, run the floor. The old feelings came back."It was the first time I was like, 'Man, I miss this,' " he said, laughing. "I wanted to be out there with them."Besides the occasional nostalgia, Hill has embraced his new role. He joked that he "prolonged his adolescence a little too long" while playing as many seasons as he did. As a broadcaster, he said he was enjoying learning a new craft and adopting a new routine. He kidded that his new co-workers, like Steve Smith and Chris Webber, were hazing him, making him buy coffee and doughnuts and carry a pink backpack.As he moved toward retirement, Hill heard from a few teams about possible assistant coaching positions. Front-office jobs were discussed, too. But he felt that he needed to step away from the game, to let his mind and body decompress, so he never considered those routes.This summer, then, represented the moment that he and Kidd diverged on their parallel professional paths. Almost two decades after sharing the rookie award, the two announced their separate retirements within days of each other. "We were forever joined at the hip," Hill said.While Hill could not imagine coaching so quickly after retiring, he said he thought Kidd would thrive."I was a little shocked it happened so fast, but I think he's ready," he said about Kidd. "He brings credibility. He's not far removed from the game. To be able to connect, to motivate, to inspire today's modern athlete, he knows what it takes."Kidd does not represent Hill's only link to the Nets. Hill and Billy King, the Nets' general manager, grew up in neighboring towns in Virginia. King, now 47, played at Park View High School in Sterling, Va. Hill starred at nearby South Lakes High School."I was like 10 years old, and Billy was the man in town," Hill said, laughing. Hill made his first official visit to Duke when he was a high school junior, and King and Tommy Amaker, who now coaches Harvard, showed him around the campus.Discussing the trade King orchestrated to bring Pierce and Garnett to the Nets, Hill said: "He pulled this rabbit out of his hat. He's been creative. He's made bold moves. And I think he's assembled an amazing team. It'll be fun to watch."Hill said he believed the Nets and the Indiana Pacers were the two teams from the Eastern Conference best equipped to dethrone the Miami Heat. Traits like physicality, size and length, he said, could trouble the Heat, whose interior game could be a weakness. But, Hill added, "it seems like, as the wind blows, my predictions change."Hill's first major assignment will be hosting "NBA Inside Stuff," which has been off the air since 2005 after a 15-year run. The show returns Saturday on NBA TV, and Hill's first interview subject will be Garnett, a player he never knew well during his playing career but respected from afar."We've had some battles," Hill said about Garnett. "We've had exchanges that probably can't be repeated."Hill said that Garnett would be better this year than last — the Nets' depth should allow him to rest when necessary — and that his intensity and team-first stance could put the Nets over the top."He plays every moment like it's all or nothing," Hill said. "Every guy who's played with him thinks the world of him."
WACO, Tex. — There is one thing Baylor needs the senior guard Odyssey Sims to do less of this season: the lob passes she is so good at.As for everything else, the Lady Bears will need all they can get from Sims because the two-time player of the year Brittney Griner will no longer be under the basket to catch those passes."It's a lot different, just being used to having her down there for three years," said Sims, an all-American last season and Baylor's only returning starter. "But I like how this year we can prove how good our guard play is, and we'll be able to run a lot more. So that's what I'm more excited about than anything this season."Things certainly will be much different for Coach Kim Mulkey and the Lady Bears with the 6-foot-8-inch Griner gone after four seasons. There were plenty of highlight dunks, a record-shattering 748 blocked shots and 3,283 points to put Griner second on the N.C.A.A. women's career list.The Lady Bears made it to the N.C.A.A. Final Four when Griner was a freshman, the only year with her that they did not sweep the Big 12 regular-season and tournament titles, and went to a regional final in 2011 before losing to eventual champion Texas A&M. Baylor won the national title in 2012 while going undefeated in the N.C.A.A.'s first 40-win season, then came up short of another championship with a loss to Louisville in the regional semifinals in March."Odyssey is by far the most experienced player we have," Mulkey said. "She understands what it takes to win championships, she understands the work ethic. She's going to be asked to do more than ever before, both in her play and in the leadership capacity, and I think she's ready for it."Sims averaged 13.7 points and 4.3 assists in her 108 games at Baylor the last three seasons.Griner was not the only senior on last season's team. The Lady Bears also go into this season without the post players Brooklyn Pope and Destiny Williams, and guards Kimetria Hayden and Jordan Madden.The tallest player left is the 6-5 sophomore post player Kristina Higgins, an inch taller than the junior center Sune Agbuke, with nobody else on the roster taller than 6-2. Each averaged only about five minutes a game last season."I really think more so than the games, the experience they got to go against those seniors every day in practice had to make them better," Mulkey said. "Those two young ladies took beatings every day in practice. They weren't afraid to guard Brittney Griner. I think that will do more than anything they could have done on the court last year, and I just think it's going to be fun to watch them when the lights come on now. This is their turn."Baylor's most experienced guard other than Sims is Makenzie Robertson, a senior and the coach's daughter who has played 91 career games without starting.Alexis Prince and Niya Johnson had their first tastes of college ball last season. Prince averaged 14 minutes a game as a freshman despite dealing with injuries in her feet that required surgery during the off-season, and Johnson got into every game.With Griner gone and Sims the only returning starter, the Lady Bears were picked in the preseason vote of the Big 12 coaches to finish second in the league behind Oklahoma this season.Baylor opens the season Nov. 9 at home against Grambling, and will leave Waco for only one of its 11 games before Big 12 play starts in January.Mulkey said the biggest challenges going into her 14th season at Baylor will be finding out who will be consistent scorers other than Sims, and who will help Sims on defense."Obviously, we're going to try to get as much mileage out of her as we can," Mulkey said. "Make sure that we change things and play to our strengths, and our strength's obviously going to be guard play."
ORLANDO, Fla. — Victor Oladipo stripped the ball from Deron Williams at midcourt, and as nine other players watched from the other end, he frolicked the length of the floor, elevated to the rim and finished a 360-degree, two-handed dunk.It was an explosive move, and it roused an ecstatic cheer from a small, sleepy Amway Center crowd. Bouncing alone under the basket, Oladipo, a 21-year-old rookie, pumped his fists and gestured toward the fans, who reciprocated with even more noise. Nets Coach Jason Kidd hopped from his seat to call a timeout, and his players, behind by 21 points just minutes into the fourth quarter, slumped to the bench.The dunk was the low point for the Nets on Sunday, a final blow to break their spirit on a night when they never showed much to begin with. Looking sluggish and unfocused, they fell, 107-86, to the Orlando Magic, an upstart and utterly unaccomplished team."We're definitely better than this team," said Brook Lopez, who scored a game-high 21 points, "but we didn't show it tonight. It didn't look like it. They played well. You've got to give them some credit."It was a swift and bewildering turnaround, given that the Nets had charged to a rousing 101-100 victory over the Miami Heat on Friday night at Barclays Center. No one on the Nets would admit that they underestimated the young Magic team, but it was widely acknowledged that the overall effort was wanting.Perhaps the sleepier atmosphere here sapped their motivation. Perhaps their day off from practice Saturday cracked their rhythm. Whatever the reason, the Nets looked disengaged, showing little purpose on the offensive end and no urgency on defense. They shot just 38.2 percent from the field — 23.5 from 3-point range — and gave up 42 points inside.It was only their third game, but it was a worrisome showing from a team that wants to win a trophy. Those very ambitions, the players said, would bring out the best from their opponents."We're one of those teams that have gotten a lot of press, and teams pay attention to that," Williams said. "We are going to have an 'X' on us, and people are going to get up to play us, no matter who it is."The Nets shot just 16 for 44 from the field in the first half. The rookie Mason Plumlee was the bench player tasked with doing push-ups whenever a teammate hit a 3-pointer — a role held by one reserve every game — but he needed to hit the deck only once, as the Nets went 1 for 8 from long range before the break.For all their problems, the Nets stumbled into halftime trailing by just 41-38. Kidd said his team was lucky to be that close. But his players squandered their good fortune. The Magic bolted to a 14-4 run to start the second half, forcing Kidd to call a timeout.Kidd was upset that the Nets kept settling for outside shots and even more upset that they let their shooting frustrations bleed into their defensive effort."We can't let our offense dictate our defense if we want to be an elite team," he said.If there was a moment when it seemed as if the Nets could resurrect themselves, it came midway through the third quarter when Shaun Livingston (6 points, 7 assists) finished a two-handed dunk from the baseline to cut Orlando's lead to 61-48. Two possessions later, Paul Pierce sent Oladipo the other way on a crossover and slammed a thunderous, one-handed dunk over Jason Maxiell, cutting the deficit to 9 and bringing the Nets' bench players to their feet.But the brightness was short-lived as the Magic stanched the spurt. Oladipo was their engine, putting up 8 straight points after Pierce's dunk, spinning like a top to find free space, giving the Nets' defenders fits. When he threw down his explosive dunk the next quarter, it capped a personal 6-point run. Oladipo and Nikola Vucevic each had a team-high 19 points."I'm competitive, just like they are," Oladipo said about the Nets. "I want to win just as bad as they do. Eventually, I want to be a potential Hall of Famer, just like them."Kidd was making his belated regular-season coaching debut. The N.B.A. suspended him for the first two games of the season after he pleaded guilty this summer to a drunken-driving charge. He said before the game that he did not feel any particular emotion about coaching his first official game. He joked that he was more nervous when he came here in July to coach the Nets' summer league team.Now, though, he said, "it is business as usual."If only it could have been.Instead, the Nets, who looked so potent two nights earlier while downing the defending champions, sleepwalked to an embarrassing loss against a team they saw as inferior.
EAST RUTHERFORD, N.J. — The most parroted word lately among Nets players and coaches has been "process." It is a euphemism, really, that connotes the distinct growing pains the team is going through at the moment, trying to array its vast talent into winning combinations.The pains, to be clear, were expected. Stockpiling All-Stars at great speed is a thrilling exercise. But difficulty can arise once unfamiliar players are tossed on the court and asked to win. Coexistence is always the early challenge. The Nets are feeling that now."They haven't spent enough time together," Coach Jason Kidd said after his team practiced Monday afternoon. "They've got to work through this."It is very early, and the process has remained a bit erratic. The Nets are off to a 1-2 start, sandwiching two road defeats to inferior teams around one stirring victory at home over the defending champion Miami Heat.Kidd's analysis on Monday was spurred by a blowout loss the previous night to the Orlando Magic, who sliced and dashed through a hesitant Nets group. The Nets afterward did not concede outright that they were not trying hard enough Sunday, but there were enough hints that the point was clear."We can't pick and choose who we want to play," Kevin Garnett said Sunday.Compounding the issue, though, has been that every Nets player seems to have strayed from his comfort zone while trying to accommodate others' needs. More telling from Garnett, then, was his admission that he was not able to play full-bore, that he was still feeling out his role within the group, that the process was possibly constraining him on the court."I'm just being a little more passive, trying to be the glue, if you will," he said. "I need to be a little more aggressive at times."It was an honest and noteworthy comment from Garnett, who has always been counted among the game's pre-eminent Type A personalities. But the Nets have many now."Everyone on this team, that starting five, has always been the man on some team," Kidd said. "Now it's, 'What can I lead in, stat-wise, if it's not points or assists or rebounds? Is it steals? Is it contesting shots?' Doing the little things, it's the game within the game that they're learning."The Nets looked tentative on offense Sunday against the Magic. They were satisfied to hang back and take jump shots, which never fell. It was telling that 39 of their 89 field-goal attempts came from medium range. They tried 17 3-pointers but made just 4.On defense, they looked half a step slow against Orlando's quick guards. Defending the high pick-and-roll — who goes where and when — was singled out later as a problem area. The Cleveland Cavaliers had enjoyed similar success against the Nets last week during the teams' season opener."We're all trying to figure one another out," Andray Blatche said. "I feel like, right now, our main problem is we're all just too antsy. We're not being aggressive enough. We're trying to worry too much about making the right play instead of being aggressive and getting to the rim."Blatche said that Garnett seethed Sunday night, from the arena to the airplane. His teammates gave him his space. Later on, he delivered some motivational words to the team.On Monday afternoon, one day before they were to try to bounce back at home against the Utah Jazz, the Nets conducted a spirited practice. The coaching staff emphasized communication and trust on defense. On offense, coaches were imploring the players to be aggressive and get to the rim.As the practice wound down, Garnett looked like the antithesis of passivity. On a half-court, five-on-five drill, before the ball was bounced into play, Garnett locked his hip into Mason Plumlee's back and raised his arms."You can't come this side," he yelled out as the assistant coach Lawrence Frank was setting up the drill. He yelled it out again and again and again, perhaps a dozen times. Garnett was still amped up when the team huddled on the court to close practice."That was hard work today," he said to his teammates, using slightly more colorful language than that. "You feel me?"The Nets players have been honest about needing more time to blend as a group. Suffice it to say that the atmosphere inside the gym Monday was far from panicked. They are three games into a long season. The urgency to win will come — just not yet."We're still figuring it out," Joe Johnson said. "We just have to find that happy medium."Andray Blatche and Brook Lopez sat out practice Monday while nursing sprained ankles. The Nets said both players would probably be ready to play Tuesday night.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — It was not enough for Raymond Felton to live through one of the franchise's worst first quarters in recent memory.No, Felton wanted more. So once he returned home from the Knicks' loss Sunday night to the Minnesota Timberwolves, he turned on his television and watched a replay. It was not an enjoyable experience, but then, neither was Coach Mike Woodson's film session with his players the next morning.By the time Felton took the practice court Monday afternoon, he had already witnessed those 12 minutes of basketball — or, at least, the Knicks' loose approximation of basketball — on three occasions: once in person and twice on tape. Felton, the starting point guard, said the autopsies were important."We definitely needed to see that," he said.They needed to see Iman Shumpert get burned on two long outlet passes in the game's opening minutes. They needed to see the Timberwolves convert six turnovers into 11 points. Felton needed to see himself lose control of the ball as he attempted to slice between two defenders at the top of the key."Got to take care of the ball, man," Felton said. "I was careless with it."The score after the first quarter — Timberwolves 40, Knicks 19 — had become a mantra as the team began to turn its attention to Tuesday night's game against the Charlotte Bobcats. The 21-point deficit was an accumulation of miscues that underscored some of the team's more pressing issues three games into the season: turnovers, missed assignments and poor decisions. The Knicks never recovered in a 109-100 loss."Hopefully, we can clean it up because that's not Knick basketball," Woodson said.Perhaps not, but the Knicks (1-2) are not a cohesive group. Woodson has yet to settle on regular rotations, or even on a starting five. One reason has to do with the absence of J. R. Smith, who has two games remaining in his suspension for violating the league's drug policy. Once Smith returns, presumably when the Knicks play the San Antonio Spurs on Sunday, Woodson said he planned to ease him into the rotation."I don't think I'll burn him where I'm playing him 30-plus minutes a night," Woodson said.Woodson will continue to experiment with a starting lineup that features Andrea Bargnani, whose defense has been questionable at best. When he was on the court against the Timberwolves, the Knicks were outscored by 11 points. Bargnani also spent long stretches defending Kevin Love, who collected 34 points, 15 rebounds and the Western Conference's Player of the Week award."Maybe I'm hardheaded, but I'm going to start it again and just see what it looks like," Woodson said of the larger lineup.Woodson said it was important to note that Minnesota did much of its early damage when Bargnani was on the bench. In fact, the Timberwolves were leading by only 5 points when Tim Hardaway Jr. replaced him with 4 minutes 29 seconds left in the first quarter. Minnesota outscored New York by 22-6 during the rest of the period, averaging 2 points every 24.4 seconds. It was a run that Woodson likened to an "explosion." He added, "That can't happen."For the quarter, the Timberwolves shot 14 of 21 from the field, a handful of their makes coming on wide-open looks. Consider Pablo Prigioni's wayward pass along the perimeter that J. J. Barea intercepted before sending the ball ahead to Love for an uncontested layup and a 37-19 lead.In addition to citing turnovers, Woodson said his players were prone to launching ill-advised shots that left them exposed in transition."When that happens and the ball bounces all funny and you don't have balance coming the other way, it's a track meet coming up your back," he said.The Timberwolves' desire to push the pace from the start should not have come as a great surprise to the Knicks. Last week, in a victory against the Oklahoma City Thunder, the Timberwolves scored 34 points in the first quarter to build a 15-point lead.Still, the Knicks seemed unprepared. The Timberwolves' first basket of the game came exactly five seconds after the Knicks converted a free throw, as Ricky Rubio took the inbounds pass and fired the ball 45 feet to Kevin Martin, who had beaten Shumpert up the court. Martin scored on a layup.The quarter also highlighted Carmelo Anthony's ongoing shooting woes, as he went 1 of 5 from the field. Through three games, Anthony has averaged 21 points while shooting 37.7 percent over all. Part of the challenge, he said, has been acclimating himself to new teammates and wanting to get them involved."Maybe I'm a little passive, trying to do things that seem out of the norm, trying to make people better at the wrong times," Anthony said. "Maybe that's where I'm second-guessing myself: Should I take this? Should I pass this? So I've got to get out of that mentality."For all the Knicks' growing pains, at least one player sounded unconcerned. Asked about the turnovers, Metta World Peace responded as only he could."It's more about moving on to the future and staying in the moment when that time comes," he said. "Just things I've picked up on my journey."Where the Knicks go from here remains to be seen.
The Nets last weekend had an emotional whiplash that stung their pride. They were puffing their chests late Friday night, celebrating a scintillating victory over the defending champion Miami Heat. Forty-eight hours later, they slunk onto their team plane after a blowout loss to the Orlando Magic, an untried team.On the flight home, Kevin Garnett addressed his teammates, letting them know it was unacceptable to pick and choose their opponents, to let their performance waver from one contest to the next. The next morning, according to Garnett, the Nets went through their toughest practice since training camp early last month."I was just letting us know that consistency is the difference between great teams and O.K., or teams that are good," Garnett said about his postgame talk.Their pride felt restored Tuesday against the Utah Jazz. Brook Lopez stamped his feet into the lane and swayed his tree-branch arms, scoring 27 points. Deron Williams dipped and bobbed and swaggered around the floor during his most confident showing since he sprained his right ankle this summer. And the Nets redeemed themselves in style, brushing aside the Jazz, 104-88, before a capacity crowd at Barclays Center."Any teams we feel we're better than, we should go out and beat," Garnett said, "and that's no disrespect to any teams out there."While trying to achieve some chemistry, the Nets had looked lukewarm, losing two games to young and unaccomplished opponents. The players said they were being too passive, perhaps, while trying to accommodate one another. But they looked plenty assertive Tuesday, never trailing and never taking their foot off the gas.Six Nets players finished with double figures in points, and the team shot 51.3 percent from the field.On defense, the Nets set out to be more proactive than they were during their loss Sunday, to dictate play rather than adjust to their opponent. This was apparent from the get-go. They were quick to put bodies onto Jazz players, harassing Utah into eight first-quarter turnovers, from which they produced 8 points.At the other end, Lopez, as he has every game this season, established himself early on, scoring 19 first-half points — muscling repeatedly to the basket, letting out a tortured yell almost every time — as the Nets shot 20 for 34 in the first half. Lopez poured in his 27 points in 25 minutes, adding seven rebounds, two steals and one block."I think my guys just found me in good positions," Lopez said. "They were always looking, and I just tried to catch and finish strong."Most encouraging for the Nets may have been Williams's game. He had 10 points, 8 assists and 2 steals in 25 minutes. But more than the numbers, the aesthetics told the story. He showed that life was returning to his legs, looking as spry as he has since training camp began. His movement was more assured, his passing more effective.Williams's progress in his return from the sprained ankle was best exemplified during the third quarter. With 5 minutes 10 seconds left, Williams spun into an opening, undoing the Jazz defense, and fired a no-look pass to Andray Blatche, who went up for an easy dunk. On the Nets' next possession, Williams sauntered up the floor and put the ball once through his legs before careening into the lane and flipping up a one-handed floater high off the glass."I felt like our offense was running pretty good," Williams said. "We pushed the tempo. We were able to get where we wanted. But I think the defensive end was where we played better."Williams has been described as the engine that will power the reconfigured Nets this season, but he is still getting revved up. After sitting out during the preseason with the ankle injury, Williams was restricted to playing 25.3 minutes a game over the Nets' first three regular-season games. The plan has been to build up his minutes each game, but his services were not required late Tuesday.He went 4 for 6 from the field and was in the middle of everything positive early on. It was encouraging stuff from Williams, who, while working to regain his old form and confidence, was also trying to improve upon a personal 0-4 record against the Jazz, the team that drafted him eight years ago."It's a rebuilding year for them, but I'm definitely happy to beat them," Williams said, smiling.The Jazz, to be fair, did not provide too stern a test. The young group was way off the mark, going 13 for 37 from the field in the first half. Gordon Hayward led them, finishing with 22 points, 5 rebounds and 4 assists. Derrick Favors, who was midway through his rookie season when the Nets traded him to the Jazz to acquire Williams, was quiet against his old team, being held to 6 points and 5 rebounds.The bigger challenges for the Nets seemed internal."Again, it is still early in the process," Coach Jason Kidd said, "but we have some veteran guys that know what it means to lose a game that got out of hand and get off to a good start, and that's what they did tonight."
Anthony Bennett, the N.B.A.'s No. 1 draft pick this year, has already had many firsts in these early weeks of the season: his first home game with the Cleveland Cavaliers, his first blocked shot, his first victory.But there was one first that he needed five games to obtain: his first basket. Entering Wednesday's game against the Milwaukee Bucks, Bennett was shooting 0 for 15 from the field. But he snapped his ignominious slump midway through the second quarter by swishing a 3-pointer — it was his only field goal in five attempts — in a 109-104 loss to the Bucks.Bennett's struggles had placed him in a category few had entered. He was just the fifth rookie in league history since 1985 to begin a career by not scoring a basket through four games. The 2 points he previously scored, on free throws, were the fewest from a top overall pick in his first four games since 1966, according to ESPN Stats & Information."I just feel like there's a lid on the basket," Bennett told reporters last Saturday after the Cavaliers lost to the Indiana Pacers.Only one other top pick in the last eight seasons has missed 15 consecutive shots at any point, in any season, according to the Elias Sports Bureau. That player is Bennett's teammate Kyrie Irving, whose drought spanned two games in February last season.Allen Iverson, who missed 18 straight shots in a game in March 2004, is the last No. 1 pick to miss more than 15 consecutively at one time, according to the N.B.A.Coach Mike Brown has not given Bennett, a 256-pound, 6-foot-8 forward, much playing time this season: He was averaging 12 minutes a game before Wednesday. But the 55 minutes he went without a basket is a troubling sign for a team with playoff hopes."He's probably pressing to a certain degree," Brown told reporters after the team's practice Tuesday. "So it's probably a little of that and a little bit of being on a big stage now in the regular season with it counting."Like countless rookies before him, Bennett has forced shots. He had taken nine shots from 3-point range — missing them all — before he made his first."At the end of the day, and I've seen it with my own eyes, he can score," Brown said. "Once he figures out how hard he has to play offensively in order for it to happen on a possession-by-possession occurrence, he'll be good."Bennett, 20, told reporters Saturday that he had never experienced a drought this long.He has not been burning up the other columns of the box score, either. In the Cavaliers' win over the Minnesota Timberwolves on Monday, Bennett, besides going 0 for 3, recorded only one rebound, one steal and one block in almost 10 minutes.It is understandable if some Cavaliers fans are beginning to feel buyer's remorse. Orlando's Victor Oladipo, this year's No. 2 pick, was averaging 13.8 points, 5.3 rebounds and 4 assists entering Thursday. Philadelphia's Michael Carter-Williams, taken 11th, was last week's Eastern Conference player of the week. Carter-Williams was averaging 20 points and 7.8 assists through four games.Bennett was averaging 0.5 points and 3.3 rebounds in the Cavaliers' first four games. At U.N.L.V., where he played one season, he averaged 16.1 points and shot 53 percent from the field.Before the draft, Bennett was not well known by many fans. When the Cavaliers selected him with the top pick, the crowd inside Barclays Center was stunned. Even Bennett said  he was speechless after the pick.After his college season, Bennett had shoulder surgery, which limited his workouts in the summer. His conditioning needed to improve when he entered the Cavaliers' training camp overweight. He is also playing with asthma and has sleep apnea."My teammates are also telling me to keep my head up," Bennett said. "It'll come, sooner or later."Bennett's season highlight finally came to fruition on Wednesday.
Jim Boeheim is more than ready to start his 38th season at Syracuse. So are his No. 8 Orange.Four exhibition games in August and two more in early November at the end of an extended preseason camp have everybody looking forward to Friday night's season opener in the Carrier Dome against Cornell."I think everybody is anxious to play and start the season," Boeheim said. "We've had pretty good preparation up until this point. I think we'll be ready to go Friday night."With four freshmen and a new backcourt, the Orange have a lot to learn despite the extra practice time, which included a four-game trip to Canada in August. It showed in Tuesday night's 81-46 exhibition win over Ryerson."I think some of the younger players have not adjusted to coming off the bench and being ready to go," said Boeheim, second in Division I with 920 victories. "We had a couple of freshmen in there. They both went to the same side on defense twice and gave up two wide-open 3s. I think some of those things are things that we need to think about."The freshman Tyler Ennis takes over at point guard for Michael Carter-Williams, who left in the spring after his sophomore year and has made an immediate impact in the N.B.A. Trevor Cooney will slide into the other guard slot in place of the four-year starter Brandon Triche, who graduated.Ennis had 7 points, 5 assists and 4 steals against Ryerson. His value is immeasurable."He's important for our team," Boeheim said. "I told him at halftime he has to be a little more aggressive offensively. When I tell him something, he does it. That's a good trait to have. He's a key guy. He's a mature freshman. He's still a freshman. He's going to make mistakes. He understands the position as well as any other freshman."Syracuse leads the series against Cornell, 87-31, and has a 33-game win streak against the Big Red. Cornell's last victory in the series was a 94-82 triumph on Dec. 4, 1968, at Barton Hall in Ithaca."Cornell is a disciplined team, but during the season opener we should be coming out hard and playing well," Ennis said. "Coach wants me to be a vocal leader. I know I am a young guy, but the position calls for me to be a leader on the court."It is safe to say Ennis will be under a microscope from the opening tip. He does not seem the least bit fazed."I see a lot of confidence in his play," said the 6-foot-8 senior forward C. J. Fair, the Orange's leading scorer and rebounder last season. "He is a smart player and rarely makes the wrong decision. I'm having fun playing with him, and I'm eager to see how he grows as a point guard."In their first year in the Atlantic Coast Conference, the Orange return three starters from last year's 30-10 team that made it to the Final Four: Fair, voted preseason A.C.C. player of the year; the 6-9 junior forward Rakeem Christmas; and the 6-9 sophomore center DaJuan Coleman. Add the 6-10 senior Baye Moussa Keita, and Syracuse has a core of big bodies and long arms to guard the lane in Boeheim's 2-3 zone defense.Cornell is coming off a 13-18 season (5-9 Ivy League), and the fourth-year head coach Bill Courtney has had to replace four starters. The returning first-team All-Ivy forward Shonn Miller continues to recover from an injury that sidelined him in the preseason.NORTH CAROLINA SHORT-HANDED North Carolina Coach Roy Williams knows he will not have his leading scorer, P. J. Hairston, and the senior Leslie McDonald for at least the season opener. Williams is still waiting to find out how long the two will be out.The university said Hairston and McDonald would sit out the No. 12 Tar Heels' game against Oakland on Friday night because of N.C.A.A. eligibility concerns, which have lingered over the program since a trouble-filled off-season."It's an ongoing issue, a compliance issue with the university and the N.C.A.A.," the team spokesman Steve Kirschner said. "We're working together on that, but they're not playing. Really that's all we can get into at this point."Authorities cited Hairston in May and June after he drove a rental vehicle linked to a felon, raising the possibility of an improper benefits violation.
CHARLOTTE, N.C. — From the suspension of J. R. Smith, to the loss of Tyson Chandler with a broken right leg, to a disappointing 1-3 start, the Knicks ' dramas have started early this season. So it was fitting that an otherwise nondescript November game would offer yet another odd twist to the year.On Friday, Patrick Ewing's debut as a head coach came against none other than the Knicks. Ewing, the associate head coach of the Bobcats, was forced to replace Steve Clifford, who was hospitalized Thursday with chest pains and had two stents inserted into his arteries.It was hardly a memorable debut. The Knicks, still smarting from a loss to Charlotte at Madison Square Garden on Tuesday, when Chandler went down for four to six weeks, got their revenge with a 101-91 victory at Time Warner Cable Arena.Carmelo Anthony had 28 points and 8 rebounds, and Andrea Bargnani, replacing Chandler at center, added 25 points, 8 rebounds and 5 blocks to help the Knicks snap a three-game losing streak."It was a must-win for us," Anthony said. "This early in the season, talk about must-wins, something obviously is going wrong. We corrected that. We took care of the basketball. We played defense. Our offensive was clicking. We made shots. We held them to 90 points, shooting low 40s from the field. You do that, you'll win a lot of games."They also played hard from the start, something Coach Mike Woodson said they had not done during the losing streak. On Tuesday, Charlotte was able to score 64 first-half points on the way to a 102-97 victory.Bargnani, acquired in the off-season from Toronto, came into the game averaging 8.8 points per game. But with coaches and teammates nudging him to be more aggressive, he was a threat on both ends of the court."I told our coaches this morning, he needs to speak up," Woodson said. "He's got to talk more and act like he's a part of this, and he was pretty good tonight. I think he can do a lot of things to help us. He had five blocks tonight, eight rebounds — I mean, to me that's solid. You can't tease me, 'cause I'm gonna expect that from him every time he steps out on the floor."The Knicks will get Smith back in the lineup on Sunday against San Antonio at the Garden. He missed the first five games of the season while serving a suspension for violating the N.B.A.'s drug policy.How much did it mean to Ewing to coach his first game?"When I played, I was never nervous before the game, but as a coach, the butterflies are flowing," he said before the game. "It's ironic that my first chance to be a head coach is against a team I played 15 years for. I'm looking forward to it, and I'm just going to try to not be as nervous and just go out there and try to have fun."It was not the debut he wanted, but at least he finally had the opportunity. Ewing, a longtime assistant coach with his fourth team, has longed to be a head coach. He was interviewed by the Bobcats in 2012 before the team hired Mike Dunlap and by the Detroit Pistons before that. Ewing was hired as associate head coach by Clifford, who is in his first year."It's a lot different," Ewing said of his head coaching debut. He added, "I was nervous at first, but once the game started I was able to calm down and do my thing."Ewing does not expect to be the head coach for long. He said Clifford could be back as early as Sunday. The Bobcats' owner, Michael Jordan, joked on Friday when he spoke to Ewing that it could be even faster than that."He's called me and told me if I don't win, I'm fired," Ewing said.Clifford is the third professional head coach in the last week who has had a serious health problem.The Denver Broncos' John Fox became ill on a golf course in Charlotte, N.C., and required heart surgery; and the Houston Texans'  Gary Kubiak collapsed at Sunday's game against the Indianapolis Colts with what the team called a ministroke.
There could hardly have been a less opportune time for the Nets , a team still trying to find itself and forge a unified identity, to encounter the Indiana Pacers , a club so obviously comfortable in its own tough skin.Displaying a menacing self-assuredness, the Pacers marched into sold-out Barclays Center on Saturday to dispatch the still-hesitant Nets, 96-91. It was a taut game at times, but gaffes and timid spells materialized far too often for the Nets, who watched their record fall to 2-4 as they took their first loss at home.The victory for the Pacers (7-0) ensured that they would remain the league's lone unbeaten team. They have been on an ascendant path for some time, and the team's performance Saturday exposed the current advantage it enjoys over the Nets, a talented group that maintains a cobbled-together feel."They're a pretty good team right now," said Nets shooting guard Joe Johnson, who missed a potential game-tying 3-pointer with 11.8 seconds left, "and we're still a team that's learning on the fly."The Nets' interpersonal learning process was always going to feel stunted during this game. The Pacers' season-opening streak has been built on suffocating defense. Through their first six games, they were allowing opponents 87.5 points per 100 possessions, easily the league's best figure.The consolation is that the season remains young. The two clubs entered the season expected to be among the few able to challenge the Miami Heat in the Eastern Conference."I don't care what Brooklyn's record is; they're going to be there down the stretch," said Frank Vogel, the Pacers' coach. "They're just beginning to jell. It's a long season, and this was a big-time win."Vogel said the game had a playoff vibe, and things did get tense during the closing minutes. The Nets were leading, 46-44, starting the second half, but they allowed the Pacers to put together a 16-5 run. Then the Nets, getting some hard work from their second unit, scratched and clawed to stay within striking distance.Victory seemed possible when Paul Pierce hit a 3-pointer with 4 minutes 5 seconds left in the fourth quarter that cut the Pacers' lead to 90-85. It was an unlikely shot — it deflected high off the back iron and bounced four times around the inside rim before falling through the net — and it sent a jolt through the crowd. Pierce gazed toward the rafters and pumped his fists.The final seconds were ticking away, and the Nets were trailing, 94-91, when Johnson came off a screen to find an open look from behind the 3-point line. But his shot was just long, pinging off the back of the rim to hasten the game's end."It felt good," said Johnson, who produced a smart and efficient 17-point night. "It just didn't go down."Once complete, though, the result felt fair, given how smoothly the Pacers deployed their various weapons. Paul George glided around to a seemingly effortless 24-point performance, leading all scorers. David West added 18 points, and Roy Hibbert contributed 15 points and 11 rebounds. As the group, the Pacers hustled their way to 20 second-chance points.The Nets, on the other hand, looked untidy. Pierce scored 15 points but shot just 5 for 12 from the field and had five turnovers. Brook Lopez (16 points) found a worthy opponent in Hibbert, a big man who could match his strength and mass, who would not budge when bumped."We're not panicking," said Pierce, who speculated that the Nets' coming trip to the West Coast might help them clear their heads.There were positive flashes for the Nets. Mason Plumlee, a rookie, provided some noticeable energy during his 15:38 on the floor. In the second quarter, he ran himself ragged up and down the court, was scrappy under the basket, and contributed 6 hard-won points and 3 rebounds.Deron Williams, who had a delayed start to the season after spraining his ankle during the summer, looked sharper and more aggressive than he had in previous games, getting a season-high 17 points and 10 assists. But he made some mistakes, too, fouling George on a 3-point attempt and committing a sloppy turnover in quick succession within the last minute and a half.Williams understood that the frequent talk about the learning process might be getting stale. While he emphasized that the Nets still needed some time, he said the players felt an urgency to right the ship."I don't want it to seem like we're content with losing, because we're not," Williams said. "We've got to figure it out soon."Andrei Kirilenko was inactive Saturday. He experienced a recurrence of back spasms, Coach Jason Kidd said. Kirilenko, 32, has never seemed to be at full strength this season; after sitting out the opener, he averaged just 13.3 minutes over the next four games.
Russ Smith had 21 points and 5 assists to lead No. 3 Louisville to a 70-48 victory over visiting College of Charleston on Saturday. Louisville outscored Charleston, 22-3, over the final 6 minutes 41 seconds to pull away in the first game of its national championship defense."Our quality, that 'boom' quality that we had last year, came out again in the second half because we played like starving dogs," Louisville Coach Rick Pitino said.Charleston trailed, 48-45, after the freshman Canyon Barry hit a 17-footer with 6:55 to play. Then Smith, a preseason all-American, asserted himself, hitting two free throws and finding forwards Montrezl Harrell and Wayne Blackshear for easy baskets that gave the Cardinals a 54-45 lead with 5:05 left.Barry, the son of the Hall of Famer Rick Barry, led Charleston with 10 points.Louisville raised its third national championship banner to the rafters before the game.OHIO ST. 89, MORGAN ST. 50 Shannon Scott scored a career-high 16 points and LaQuinton Ross had 14 points and a personal-best 11 rebounds to lead No. 11 Ohio State past visiting Morgan State.WICHITA ST. 93, EMPORIA ST. 50 Cleanthony Early scored 21 points and Ron Baker added 17 to lead No. 16 Wichita State over visiting Emporia State, a N.C.A.A. Division II team. The season opener was the Shockers' first game since their Final Four appearance.GONZAGA 100, BRYANT 76 Sam Dower Jr. had 21 points and 17 rebounds to lead No. 15 Gonzaga over visiting Bryant. Gerard Coleman added 15 points for Gonzaga, and Dyami Starks scored 35 points for Bryant.MANHATTAN 99, LA SALLE 90 George Beamon scored 24 points and Michael Alvarado added 16, including the go-ahead 3-pointer that pushed Manhattan past host La Salle for a double-overtime win.SETON HALL 83, NIAGARA 72  Sterling Gibbs came off the bench to score 23 points, 17 from the foul line, in leading host Seton Hall over Niagara.Antoine Mason led all scorers with 34 points for Niagara.CONNECTICUT 89, HARTFORD 34 Moriah Jefferson scored a career-high 17 points and top-ranked Connecticut began the defense of its eighth national title with an 89-34 rout of its in-state rival Hartford.Jefferson, a sophomore guard, also had five assists, and center Stefanie Dolson had 16 points and 6 rebounds.The Huskies have not lost the first game of a season since falling to Louisiana Tech in 1995. STANFORD 83, B.C. 71 Amber Orrange had 19 points, 10 assists and 9 rebounds, just missing a triple-double for No. 3 Stanford in a season-opening win against host Boston College. Coach Tara VanDerveer got her 895th career victory.Kristen Doherty had 16 points for the Eagles.LOUISVILLE 101, LOYOLA (CHICAGO) 54 Bria Smith scored 16 points and No. 5 Louisville routed visiting Loyola, spoiling the debut of Ramblers Coach Sheryl Swoopes. Taylor Johnson scored 18 points for the Ramblers.NOTRE DAME 99, N.C. WILMINGTON 50 Jewell Loyd and Michaela Mabrey scored 19 points each to lead No. 6 Notre Dame over visiting University of North Carolina Wilmington.BAYLOR 110, GRAMBLING 55 Odyssey Sims had 28 points to lead five Baylor players in double-figure scoring and the 10th-ranked Lady Bears cruised to a season-opening victory over visiting Grambling.
A year removed from the greatest scoring binge in N.C.A.A. history, Taylor is eager to cast aside any lingering doubts — about his health, his skills and even the way he broke the record — and let the nation know that he is no novelty act.Taylor became an instant celebrity last Nov. 20 when he scored 138 points for Division III Grinnell College of Iowa in a 179-104 victory against Faith Baptist Bible College. The effort drew congratulations from LeBron James, Kobe Bryant and Kevin Durant, the nickname Mr. 138 and derision from those who branded him a ball hog.Taylor's chance to build off his record-setting performance was cut short by a broken right wrist 12 games into last season. He is healthy now, and determined to lead the nation in scoring and his team to the N.C.A.A. tournament."I want to show people that it really wasn't a fluke that I scored 138," Taylor said. "That it wasn't just a one-time thing, but that I can put up some big numbers again, and against good opponents."Taylor grew up on an 80-acre farm in Black River Falls in rural Wisconsin, the son of a teacher's aide, Elizabeth Taylor, known as Lulu, and Jack, who operates heavy equipment. Lulu bought a backboard and a hoop at a rummage sale, and Jack's father stuck them on a pole lying around the farm. It was there — and on a rim hung up in the barn when the snow was too deep — that Taylor became a scorer. He used a chair as a dummy defender and spent countless hours working on his offense. He would dribble to the wings, use a spin move to create space for a 3-point shot or beat the chair with a crossover for a jumper. Always, Taylor focused on honing shots he would have to make in real games."Having no brother, I was often by myself, and basketball is a game where all you need is a hoop and a ball," Taylor said. Taylor, who is 5 feet 10 inches, developed into a two-time honorable-mention All-State selection. But most Division I coaches saw a short, skinny youngster from a small town. Taylor thought he could be an impact player in college and Grinnell Coach David N. Arseneault agreed with him.The Division III Pioneers run the nation's quickest offensive plays. They focus on shooting within 12 seconds on every possession and have won multiple team and individual national scoring marks.To Arseneault, Taylor was not an undersize, shoot-first point guard. He was a potential program-defining talent and his top recruiting catch for years."He was a scoring machine," Arseneault said. "His quickness and his ability to create his own shot, those are the things that make guards in the Grinnell system really good."Taylor got some feelers from Division I programs, mostly from Ivy League teams like Columbia that were intrigued in part by his strong academic résumé. But Taylor was so determined to make it as a Division I player that he chose to play at Mercersburg Academy in Pennsylvania. Nine games into his prep school career, Taylor tore the anterior cruciate ligament and the medial collateral ligament in his left knee.He was done for the season, and Division I coaches stopped calling."I think it was the hardest time of my life thus far, just because you put so much hope into it," said Taylor, who added that the experience strengthened his religious faith. "All your hopes are just shattered."Taylor moved on to Wisconsin-LaCrosse once his knee got healthy. But after one mediocre season after a redshirt year, he was finally ready to take a chance on Grinnell's entertaining but unusual system.Arseneault said he was thrilled to finally land the player he was convinced could be the program's seventh national scoring champion.But Taylor was also the new guy, and though he is self-assured, he is also soft-spoken. his teammate and close friend Cody Olson describes him as "quiet by choice."It was Taylor's poise in the face of intense news media scrutiny that revealed his true character to his teammates. Some people said that Taylor had alienated his new teammates by shooting 108 times. But it was actually part of a plan to break Taylor out of a slump, and the whole team had embraced it before the game.Teammates were also moved by how humble Taylor was about what he had done — and how quickly he praised them for his record-setting night."That really brought him out of his shell," his teammate Patrick Maher said. "He's a quiet guy. Super nice, but quiet. That 138 really brought him on to a whole other level as a leader."
On Friday, after United States District Judge Claudia Wilken made her latest ruling in O'Bannon v. the N.C.A.A. , two men involved in the matter spoke with each other by telephone. One was Ed O'Bannon, a former U.C.L.A. basketball star; the other, Sonny Vaccaro, the sneaker marketing executive turned perpetual N.C.A.A. antagonist.Vaccaro felt more optimistic than disappointed about the 24-page ruling. But he also felt torn, about his feelings and the outcome.Wilken had certified the lawsuit as class-action, but with a significant catch. She ruled that current and former Football Bowl Subdivision and Division I men's basketball players can challenge N.C.A.A. restrictions on athlete compensation.Should they win, should they receive even a slice of licensing deals or television revenue, it would change the model for college athletics. It would strike down the long-faulty notion of big-time college sports as an amateur endeavor. Perhaps someone would finally banish the term "student-athlete."But Wilken certified a class for the purposes of injunctive relief only, which would prevent the N.C.A.A. from acting in the same way in the future, but not for damages. Wilken said the plaintiffs had not identified a legitmate method to calculate damages to former players.That left O'Bannon and about 20 current or former athletes, many of whom Vaccaro helped to join the case, without what they desired in the first place: compensation for their likenesses and images after their playing career ended. If their case makes history, they are unlikely to profit from it."This is what I wanted," Vaccaro said O'Bannon told him. "They'll have rights. I never had rights. I didn't think I would ever have rights."Both sides, naturally, claimed victory last week. The N.C.A.A., in a statement, said the ruling validated its argument that the case was wrong on facts and law. Its statement ignored the other half of the ruling, the half the other side celebrated as a win.The organization undoubtedly avoided potential damages to former players that could have escalated into billions of dollars, even as the very real threat to the system that governs college sports remains. Vaccaro held onto that throughout the weekend.He cares deeply about this case, as much as anyone involved. He watched Baylor batter Oklahoma, Stanford upset Oregon and Alabama steamroll Louisiana State.Again, he thought about how much money those games generated and how little of it went to the players. He disagreed with the N.C.A.A. on what Friday's ruling meant.He thought about O'Bannon, who had spied a college basketball video game at a friend's house and thought he saw himself — same U.C.L.A. uniform, same build, same facial features. At first, it flattered him, and then it bothered him, and then he became the face for much more than a likeness lawsuit. He became the face for whether college athletes should be paid, and Friday's ruling, a setback for him personally, is the first step for that to happen."O'Bannon and those guys won in the sense we're going forward," Vaccaro said. "Those damages, whatever they would have been, if we win, going forward, there's no limit to what the numbers are in the future. This is not going to be like the N.F.L. settling the concussion lawsuit, where they don't owe anybody after that."The N.C.A.A. needs to change; even the organization agrees on that, even if it does not want football and men's basketball players to receive additional compensation — cash the N.C.A.A. mostly pockets.So many recent events have built toward change, from botched enforcement investigations to the dozens of athletic directors who met recently to lobby for more of a voice in college sports.The sanctions the N.C.A.A. levied recently against Miami — mainly accepting the university's self-imposed postseason ban of two seasons and lost scholarships — were indicative of an organization with diminished power. The Committee on Infractions basically confirmed what Yahoo Sports wrote two years ago, when it spoke to the booster Nevin Shapiro in jail and published a list of transgressions he detailed, including cash payments to players and parties on yachts. It even found an absence of institutional control.Yet where the N.C.A.A. clobbered Penn State, it gave Miami a slap on the wrist.Weeks before Friday's ruling, the video game manufacturer EA Sports and Collegiate Licensing Company settled with the O'Bannon plaintiffs for about $40 million. That left the N.C.A.A. on an island — its approval rating as low as ever and its president, Mark Emmert, favoring reform but hamstrung by so many universities with so many missions, an ineffective governance structure and a rule book bigger than the Harry Potter series.The O'Bannon case scared athletic departments because of the implications. It should scare them. And it should change how major college sports work.Players deserve more of a voice, additional compensation or not, and they are starting to speak up. As with the "All Players United" slogan written on gear across the country. Or when Grambling football players refused to play a game because of the unacceptable conditions at their facility.Vaccaro watched the events at Grambling with great interest. That neither the university nor the N.C.A.A. penalized or publicly admonished the players spoke volumes, Vaccaro said, about the power those players exhibited."This is where we're headed," he said. "Going forward is where the billions are. I want to live to see that day in court. I want to see that for Ed O'Bannon. The people he and those guys helped won't even know they helped them. But change is coming."
The Nets are beginning their second year as Brooklyn tenants, and their effort to blend in took them to a far corner of the borough Monday.It was early afternoon on Veterans Day when the Nets held an open practice at the United States Army Garrison Fort Hamilton for a few dozen uniformed troops and military personnel. Later, the players served food and drinks during an early Thanksgiving-theme dinner.Earlier this season, the Nets visited Maimonides Medical Center in Borough Park and held a Halloween party at the Brooklyn Museum in Prospect Heights."Brooklyn has embraced us since Day 1," said Joe Johnson, the shooting guard. "This is another great opportunity for me that I can put down in the history books and tell my kids about."The Nets are still transitioning to the area. The team's primary operations are still based in East Rutherford, N.J., and as things were last year, no players are living in Brooklyn. For the most part, they live in northern New Jersey and Lower Manhattan. Before Monday, some players did not know Fort Hamilton existed."I had no clue it was out here," Johnson said. "But it was an honor to be invited."Fort Hamilton sits in the southwest corner of the borough. It opened in 1831 as a part of a larger project initiated after the War of 1812 to enlarge and strengthen coastal defenses. It is named in honor of Alexander Hamilton, the first secretary of the Treasury. From the Civil War through World War II, it served largely as a recruitment and embarkation site.Today, it is one of three military bases in the state and the only active military base in the city. The base provided personnel and support after the Sept. 11 attacks and more recently as a key staging area after Hurricane Sandy. Now, it serves largely as a military recruitment and entrance processing station and hosts tenants like the Army Reserves and National Guard. No training takes place on the base.Within cramped quarters, the Nets had plenty to work on at practice. According to Johnson, the workout was focused on the little details — play calling, decision-making and movement — that have sunk the Nets during critical moments.After spirited five-on-five drills, the players posed for photographs on the court with troops and Fort Hamilton officials.The Nets have sputtered to a 2-4 start, dropping their last two games. Patience was always a key theme entering the season, and the Nets hurried these last few months to integrate several high-profile acquisitions. But losing has been a grating experience.Things will not get easier this week, as the team will embark on a rigorous three-game Western trip over four days, beginning Wednesday in Sacramento. The players tried to put a rosy perspective on the upcoming travel, portraying it as a chance to change the scenery, to get away from some everyday distractions."Going through this little losing streak of two games, sometimes the road can cure some of the problems that you have, and I think we're looking at it like that," Paul Pierce said. "It's a three-game trip, but this is something that could really help us turn things around."Coach Jason Kidd said the team needed to improve its performance on the road, where it has yet to win a game. But some of Monday was spent solidifying the team's presence at home."You couldn't ask for a better day, Veterans Day, here in Brooklyn, our home," Kidd said.Andrei Kirilenko did not practice as he continued to deal with a recurrence of the back spasms that sidelined him during the preseason. ... Tornike SHEngElia and Tyshawn Taylor were recalled from the Development League.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — The Knicks reconvened Monday morning at their practice facility, and none of their planned activities turned out to be much fun."The day after," Carmelo Anthony said, "is always the hardest day."Coach Mike Woodson opened the festivities with a film review of Sunday's 31-point loss to the San Antonio Spurs, during which he pointed out to his players that the Spurs had 17 layups. It should not have come as a great surprise that San Antonio was good at making them."Wasn't nothing pretty about our game yesterday," said Woodson, who has used similar language several times already this season.Next came practice itself, with the audience featuring several dignitaries from the front office: General Manager Steve Mills, along with two deputies, Allan Houston and Mark Warkentien. They had front-row seats when Tim Hardaway Jr. was caught from behind on a fast-break layup by J. R. Smith, whose physical foul sent Hardaway tumbling to the court. It was the type of tough play that was missing from the Knicks' game against the Spurs.Toure Murry appeared to injure his finger on a drive. Raymond Felton lost his dribble. Players chased loose balls and jumped for rebounds. Kenyon Martin came off the court using language unsuitable for print, a fitting conclusion to a tightly contested scrimmage."That was the whole practice," Anthony said. "We needed it."This was what a team with a 2-4 record looked and sounded like: dissatisfied, angry and perhaps even a bit profane. Anthony again referred to the need to "figure this thing out," though he never identified what that thing was, other than a deep desire to avoid getting blown out when the Knicks visit the Atlanta Hawks on Wednesday.It was mentioned that James L. Dolan, the team's owner, had guaranteed a victory when he performed Sunday night with his blues band."He had a concert?" Anthony said. "I guess we got to win."The pressure is building. A team with championship aspirations has become fodder for the back pages. Fans at Madison Square Garden are beginning to boo as often as they cheer. Woodson had a postgame meeting with the owner at Dolan's request, though Woodson declined to divulge the subject matter."That's not your guys' business," Woodson said. "That's me and my owner's business, and we got to get ready for Atlanta. That's the name of the game."Woodson spent most of his 4-minute-17-second session with the news media rattling through the various areas in which the Knicks could stand some improvement. The list seemed to stretch so long that he eventually gave up. He fielded six questions, including two about Dolan."It was one of those games where we didn't do a damn thing right," Woodson said, "and it starts on the defensive end. I don't care if you miss every shot you throw up. But you can give effort defending and rebounding the ball."A major issue for the team, if it was not already apparent, is the absence of center Tyson Chandler, who could miss 20 games after breaking his right leg last week. The Knicks sorely missed his presence as a post defender against the Spurs, who found their path to the basket unimpeded."I know my eyes get big when I don't see a shot blocker in the paint," Anthony said.Andrea Bargnani, who started at center, has blocked five shots in 144 minutes this season. Martin, 35, and Amar'e Stoudemire, 30, can supply only limited minutes, and neither is spry. The Knicks, in other words, no longer have anyone capable of protecting the rim.So the onus will continue to fall on the perimeter defenders, and they were lackluster against the Spurs. Tony Parker was able to drive to the basket at will. It often took only one swing of the ball for Parker and his teammates to find open lanes — E-ZPass, no tolls — which Woodson said was unacceptable."That doesn't have anything to do with somebody being at the rim," he said. "That's just individual defense on the ball."Woodson acknowledged being lulled into a false sense of security after the Knicks played solid defense in Friday's win over the Charlotte Bobcats. In their first game without Chandler, the Knicks did a serviceable job closing off the paint and holding Charlotte to outside jumpers. The Spurs operated at a different level, though.Then again, so did the Knicks — and not in a good way. Woodson said he had a hard time recalling another game when the Knicks were so useless on defense, though he did cite one: their 131-103 loss to the Houston Rockets last November. The Knicks managed to recover from that debacle.Anthony said he was confident that the Knicks would find their footing. Yes, their defense is a mess. No, Chandler is not returning any time soon. But Anthony has been through worse in his career, he said. A slow start does not a season make.As for Woodson, the message was more muted."Is it just one of those games, or is this thing going to linger on?" he asked no one in particular. "I'm trying to put the fire out."
CHICAGO — Next March will mark the 35th anniversary of the 1979 N.C.A.A. title game between Larry Bird's Indiana State Sycamores and Magic Johnson's Michigan State Spartans. The game remains one of the few instances when the undisputed top two players in college basketball competed against each other, and it is the highest-rated televised college basketball game ever.On Tuesday night, basketball fans caught a glimpse of perhaps the next great individual basketball rivalry that could extend not only into the N.B.A., but in the annals of history alongside Bird and Magic, when two superstar freshmen, Duke's Jabari Parker and Kansas's Andrew Wiggins, faced each other in the State Farm Champions Classic.Wiggins's fifth-ranked Jayhawks defeated the fourth-ranked Blue Devils, 94-83, but both players showed the skill that has their fan bases thinking they could make runs deep into the spring. Parker outscored Wiggins by 27 points to 22, including converting on a spectacular one-handed alley-oop early in the second half that even brought the crowd's large contingent of anti-Duke fans to their feet. But Wiggins scored key baskets down the stretch as Kansas pulled away in the final two minutes.Duke and Kansas, two teams steeped in tradition and built on coaching mastery and seasoned, versatile lineups, are again expected to contend for this year's championship. But both programs are in the unfamiliar position of being led by 18-year-olds, who are also perhaps among the most hyped freshmen ever. And neither team is assured of having its star freshman for more than a year.Even Johnson seemed excited about their potential effect this season and beyond."The hype definitely goes along with their game because they both can play," Johnson said. "We haven't seen this type of class come out in a long time with this many guys. Normally, you might have a LeBron, you might have one."With Kansas up, 83-81, with 1 minute 33 seconds remaining, Wiggins hit a fadeaway jump shot to increase the lead to 4. Then, 11 seconds later, after a steal by Perry Ellis, Wiggins converted a two handed-dunk off the fast break. Wiggins, who was fouled on the play, missed his free throw, but he grabbed the offensive rebound to wind the clock down further."The hype, it was big," Wiggins said. "I just tried to block it out.In Lawrence, Wiggins was compared to Wilt Chamberlain before he ever played a game at Allen Fieldhouse. Not to be outdone, Parker arrived in Durham, N.C., having been proclaimed on the cover of Sports Illustrated as "the best high school basketball player since LeBron James," after his junior season.Both players are the sons of former N.B.A. players. Sonny Parker logged six seasons in the league for the Golden State Warriors, averaging 9.9 points a game, and Mitchell Wiggins, who also played parts of six seasons for Chicago, Houston and Philadelphia, averaged 10 points. The razor-thin difference between their father's career scoring averages has so far also applied to the separation of their talent levels by outside evaluators.Jabari Parker's skills proved themselves at an earlier age as he was ranked as a top-10 prospect in his age group while in fifth grade. Three years later, his high school selection announcement made headlines. He was named the Gatorade National Player of the Year as a junior, joining Greg Oden, Brandon Knight and James as the only players to do so. Even Chicago's mayor, Rahm Emanuel, referred to Parker as a role model. But last year, the Canadian-born Wiggins surpassed Parker in rankings as the consensus top prep player in the nation and effectively usurped Parker's title as "the next LeBron James."The first round of their nascent rivalry gave Parker the opportunity to prove himself in front of a hometown crowd. A star at Chicago's Simeon Career Academy, Parker was a four-time state champion and the first freshman to start for the varsity, a feat not even accomplished by Chicago Bulls guard Derrick Rose or the 1980s prep star Ben Wilson, who was shot and killed during his senior year of high school.Not even the rare No. 1 versus. No. 2 regular season matchup could overshadow the anticipation for the Parker-Wiggins showdown as Duke and Kansas headlined a doubleheader. In the opening game, the top-ranked Kentucky Wildcats, a team also anchored by freshmen — including six 2013 McDonald's all-Americans — fell to Michigan State, 78-74.Kentucky's Julius Randle made his own claim for the title of nation's top freshman, scoring 23 points in the second half en route to a total of 27 points. The Wildcats continually looked for him inside as they erased a 44-32 halftime deficit to tie the game at 66-66 with 4 minutes 48 seconds remaining in the second half.But for every Kentucky run, Michigan State answered with fast-break points, usually by way of a layup by Keith Appling (22 points) or Gary Harris (20). "We put a bigger emphasis on it this summer," Harris said. "This is what we worked for, to run in games like this."Michigan State Coach Tom Izzo said he was impressed by the play of Randle, who also had 13 rebounds."What I loved about him, he gritted his teeth, was ornery and nasty and wanted to put them on his shoulders," Izzo said. "For a freshman, that speaks volumes."You could hear him talking, you could see it in his face, you could see it in his body language. Tough kid, love him."Johnson, despite rooting for the Spartans, also seemed impressed by Randle. Shaking his head, he pondered the possibility of seeing Randle, Wiggins and Parker at the next level. "I think if they all come out to the N.B.A., it's going to be awesome," Johnson said.
SACRAMENTO — For weeks, the Nets seemed willing to tie their poor play to their newness as a group. The process of adjusting to a new system, to new teammates, justified their string of surprising losses, and few could challenge them on that point.But there was a tense quiet inside the visitors' locker room Wednesday night at Sleep Train Arena as the Nets themselves began to disavow those worn-out excuses. Their 107-86 loss to the Sacramento Kings, they admitted, was deeply disappointing and inexcusable. It sank their record to 2-5 and stretched their losing streak to three games. This course, they said, was untenable."Talking is over with," said Jason Terry, a veteran guard. "It's too much talking. We've done enough talking, and now it's time for some action."The Nets embarked on this three-game road trip to the West Coast hoping that a change of scenery would wake them from their early-season stupor. Instead, it brought more confusion and disarray. The Nets shot 37.8 percent — the starting five went 20 for 56 from the field — and their 15 turnovers led to 20 Kings points.The Nets gave up 17 second-chance points to the Kings, who entered Wednesday with a 1-5 record, having looked ineffectual while dropping two consecutive games over the weekend. Michael Malone, the Sacramento coach, said over the weekend that he was embarrassed by the team's poor play. But the Nets were the ones who seemed embarrassed Wednesday, feeling urgency to seek redemption Friday night when they play the Phoenix Suns."We can't keep saying it's going to happen the next game," said Deron Williams, who scored 13 points and handed out seven assists. "It's got to happen soon."The Nets seemed scatterbrained from the start, often settling for contested jump shots. Their ball movement looked inhibited and pointless. Paul Pierce and Kevin Garnett came out attacking, taking a majority of the early shots. But they struggled from the field. Pierce shot 4 for 12 and finished with 12 points. Garnett went 2 for 9 with 6 points and played just 15 minutes.The team's defense, meanwhile, looked as sound as a colander, as the Kings slipped repeatedly to the rim. As the Nets were cut apart, the assistant coach Lawrence Frank screamed himself hoarse from the sideline, slumping back to his seat as possessions ended with Kings baskets. By the fourth quarter, Nets coaches were glued to their seat cushions, wearing faraway stares.Marcus Thornton came off the Kings' bench to lead all scorers with 24 points. Greivis Vasquez, their point guard, had 17 points and 12 assists."It's not acceptable," Coach Jason Kidd said. "We hang our hats on the defensive end. Clearly, in our losses, we let go of the rope on the defensive end, and whenever you do that, it's not going to work in this league, no matter who you play."The Nets pointed at nebulous, personality-based traits for their problems — like effort, intensity and pride — not a lack of familiarity.Brook Lopez, who had 16 points and 9 rebounds, was asked whether the Nets were still seeking chemistry in their combinations. He declined to take the bait: "I mean, I guess you could cop out and say that was something, but I really think it was energy here."Terry, too, brushed aside a suggestion that the players were unfamiliar with one another. "We're going to use that excuse for now," he said, wryly.Really, he said, the Nets need to let their basketball instinct and their natural competitiveness take over. Even five strangers thrown together for an informal game have to buckle down and show some pride, he said. This team was no different."If we were playing five-on-five pickup at the park, and you were getting your butt whooped, three or four runs now," Terry said, using slightly more colorful language, "when are you going to pick it up and get a game, get a win, stay on the court?"The Nets had preached patience through the last month, but their loss Wednesday brought the most forceful evidence yet that it was wearing thin even inside their own locker room.Deron Williams stumbled to the ground after being tripped up with Andray Blatche. He came up limping, favoring his left ankle. He made two quick baskets shortly afterward, though, and said after the game that he was O.K. ... Andrei Kirilenko did not travel with the Nets and will not play this week as he continues to rehabilitate a sore back. ... Kevin Garnett played his 1,330th career game, giving him sole possession of 10th place on the N.B.A. career list.
PHILADELPHIA — No one, least of all Jeremy Lin , would be so presumptuous to call it a last laugh. But it is fair to say that Lin has earned, at the expense of his former team and its impetuous owner, a well-timed chortle.Ever the spiritual man, Lin, reflecting on what now appears to be a prosperous relocation from New York to Houston, said, "I do believe God has the perfect plan." As it turns out, the fast-track building strategy hatched a couple of years ago by Daryl Morey, the Rockets' general manager, was not so bad, either.Two nights after scoring 31 points off the bench, Lin started and rang up 34 points and 12 assists, but he and the Rockets, without James Harden, wilted late and dropped a 123-117 overtime decision to the 76ers on Wednesday night at Wells Fargo Center. Next stop: Madison Square Garden on Thursday night for an appointment with the Knicks.With Lin as Houston's premier offensive threat Wednesday, the Rockets looked like what they were supposed to be when the Knicks let him go as a free agent in the summer of 2012. Lin said that when he signed with Houston, he did not expect that Harden and Dwight Howard would be his teammates.But Morey traded for Harden and lured the Kobe Bryant-averse Howard as a free agent, quickly giving Lin a better developmental environment than he would have had as the leading man — or, for that matter, as a Carmelo Anthony running mate with the soap opera that is the Knicks.After the Knicks owner James L. Dolan refused to match Morey's upgraded offer sheet, remember how Lin's detractors in New York ridiculed him for consigning himself to be the counterfeit marquee player on a dreadful team?"They've done a great job on this team of surrounding us with really good players," he said. "It's definitely an adjustment, but I'm just so thankful every day I get to play. Two years ago I was just trying to make it; 15th man didn't matter to me just as long as I was on the team. I always try to take a step back from the journey and see the bigger picture."That was what Dolan and the Knicks claimed they were doing when they let a young asset and one of the most marketable players in team history wander off without getting so much as a draft pick in return.Many critics, one of whom was named Carmelo, chanted the organization's mantra that agreeing to a $25 million deal with a luxury-tax-burdensome $14.9 million balloon payment in its third and final year would have been Linsanity. But raise your hand if you think the Knicks could use an aggressive guard who is averaging 18.1 points on 54.2 percent shooting (51 percent on 3-pointers after making 9 of 15 against the 76ers) and 4.9 assists per game.Averaging 34.3 minutes a game, Lin has a shooting percentage that is a shade better than Howard's, and most of Howard's points are scored with his hands fastened to the rim."When he plays with confidence, he's amazing," said Howard, who spent part of the summer working out with Lin in Colorado.It is too early in the season to make too much of statistics or standings, and no one is about to anoint the 5-4 Rockets as N.B.A. champions. Their defense — Lin's included — tends to be on the generous side. But they have youth, talent and upside, like Lin."I think he's playing better right now for us than at any point last year," Coach Kevin McHale said. "He's attacking; he's confident. He put a big summer of work in. His shot is better. He is better."Without Harden to lean on, Lin appeared to tire down the stretch and committed eight turnovers over all. "Normally, I relish the fourth quarter," he said later. His statistical line was reminiscent of the Garden-variety Linsanity. But his turnovers were mostly errors of commission, the results of trying to do too much.He is, of course, only 25 and learning his trade."This might sound crazy, but I still think it's early for me in my development phase, or whatever you want to call it," he said.How did the Knicks make the shortsighted call on a player who had already succeeded way beyond what pro basketball sleuths could imagine for Lin at Harvard — and one who seemed like a good bet to continue working at his craft?"I thought if any team knew what it had, it was going to be New York," Morey said. "At the time, we had nobody on our roster with All-Star potential. We thought: 'O.K., he's not an All-Star, but he played like one for 30 games. So take a chance.' "Had Dolan reasoned that Lin, as an Asian-American sensation, was probably worth $2 in commercial appeal for every $1 he was paid, Lin would still be trying to figure out how to play with Anthony.Harden, like Anthony, is known to monopolize the ball. Hence McHale's recent experimenting with Lin as a second-unit scorer playing first-unit minutes, until Harden sat with a minor foot injury Wednesday night."Me and James still play a lot together, but they still want me to be aggressive, the primary ball handler off the bench," Lin said. "There's still chemistry problems — not like problems, just things we're trying to get better. No personality issues."Thanks to certain Garden personalities, one of the great New York basketball yarns took a wrong turn and wound up in Texas. Long-suffering and implausibly loyal Knicks fans were stiffed again after what felt like a rare homegrown happening at the Garden.Understand that this has worked out better for Lin, who does not think his second return to New York should be a big deal in the context of who will be with him. Calling Harden and Howard "the faces of the franchise," he added, "I'm hoping I'll be a subplot."
In the hours between Wednesday's victory over the Atlanta Hawks and Thursday's game against the Houston Rockets, the Knicks ' J. R. Smith somehow found the time to take on another opponent: Brandon Jennings of the Detroit Pistons .In an escalating series of tweets, Smith appeared to threaten Jennings for picking on his younger brother, Chris, a guard with the Knicks. Speaking before Thursday's game, J. R. Smith acknowledged he was upset, but he said the situation had gotten blown out of proportion."There's a way to threaten somebody, and that's not the way to publicly threaten someone," said Smith, who missed the first five games of the season for violating the league's drug policy. "I know Brandon. Brandon's not that type of person, and I'm not that type of person. We had a pretty good relationship before this."The N.B.A. was looking into the matter, and Coach Mike Woodson, who does not have a Twitter account and said he was not into the "social media game," said he planned to address Smith's Twitter habits with him."My whole thing with that is, if you're going to tweet, tweet something positive," Woodson said.This is not the first time that Smith has run afoul of social media etiquette. Last season, the league fined him $25,000 for posting an inappropriate photo of a woman on his Twitter account. On Thursday, Smith acknowledged his topsy-turvy relationship with social media. He said he might deactivate his account."I'm always in trouble on Twitter," he said. "I don't know what it is. Trying to shake it."Chris Smith's employment has been a lingering subplot for the Knicks this season. The Knicks not only retained Smith after several lackluster appearances in the preseason, but they also gave him a guaranteed contract. Woodson has acknowledged that Chris Smith's ties to his brother enhanced his chances of making the team.Other players around the league apparently have taken notice. J. R. Smith's feud with Jennings started Wednesday when Jennings took to Twitter and wrote, "Wait wait wait, JR Smith's brother is in the NBA but @PoohJeter & @BBROWNLAU isn't. Call me hater but not Rollin!!!"The two players Jennings referred to, Eugene Jeter and Bobby Brown, no longer play in the N.B.A. Jennings deleted the tweet, but not soon enough.J. R. Smith logged onto Twitter shortly after the Knicks' victory over the Hawks and, without mentioning Jennings by name, seemed to blast him, writing that he had "no respect" for young players who "pop at the mouth." Smith posted another message in which he wrote he might send some of his "street homies" to Detroit, presumably to confront Jennings. Smith punctuated the post with the hashtag "#DeadSerious." The post was later deleted."I was definitely frustrated, because you get tired of people trying to pick on your little brother," Smith said Thursday. "I'm going to step up for him, good, bad or ugly. It's not just Brandon. It's anybody who says anything about him."Twitter has been a risky place for N.B.A. players this week. The Los Angeles Clippers' Matt Barnes was fined $25,000 by the league Thursday for going on a profane Twitter rant of his own after he was ejected from Wednesday's win over the Oklahoma City Thunder.As for Smith, he said he had always been friendly with Jennings — the two have worked out together in California — and said he was open to patching things up."I don't have his number or anything," Smith said, "so if somebody wants to get that to me, I'll take it."
PHOENIX — The Nets worked themselves to full throttle on Friday night, just a couple of hours after the player meant to be their engine this season was stalled on the court.It was a thrilling scene as Joe Johnson ranged the length of the court, slipped through traffic and finished a layup at the buzzer to give the Nets a 100-98 overtime win against the Phoenix Suns. The Nets players rushed onto the court to celebrate as the crowd at US Airways Center lingered in stunned silence. The rousing moment came at a key time for the Nets, who had stumbled to a 2-5 record through their previous seven games and desperately needed a lift.And yet, the end result always had a chance to be relegated to the back burner once guard Deron Williams crumpled to the floor grabbing his left ankle mere minutes into the game. Williams, the team's 29-year-old point guard, was just appearing to work himself back into shape lately after a sprained right ankle had sidelined him through the preseason, and it seemed he could finally get to work orchestrating the reconstructed team. To sprain his other ankle Friday, then, seemed a particularly cruel twist."It's frustrating," Williams said after the game, noting that this sprain did not feel as bad as his previous one. "That's the only way to describe it. I'm sick of being injured, sick of being hurt. I just want to be healthy so I can help my team."The Nets will be without him for an indeterminate amount of time, and they will have to soldier on, as they did Friday night, when they picked up their first road win of the season. Shaun Livingston, the backup point guard, scored 18 points in 37 minutes and helped engineer a 20-0 Nets run that spanned the second and third quarters. Despite that, the teams were still trading leads deep into a wild fourth.P. J. Tucker's 3-pointer with 39 seconds remaining gave the Suns a 92-90 edge, before Johnson sank a nine-foot floater 10 seconds later to even it up again. In a strange moment, Tucker hacked Paul Pierce (14 points) as he tried to advance the ball passed midcourt with about two seconds left, but the referees did not call a foul, and the game went to overtime.The teams were tied again with 6.8 seconds left in overtime when Channing Frye missed a deep jump shot. The ball careened to Johnson, who corralled the rebound, stalked coolly down the right sideline, and lofted in a contested layup as the buzzer went off, sending his teammates sprinting across the floor to celebrate."I couldn't even celebrate, I was so tired," said Johnson, who overcame a 6-for-19-shooting night from the field. "Those guys are trying to celebrate, and I'm ready. I'm like, 'Let's go into the locker room and shower, and let's get out of here.' We've got a tough game tomorrow."The Nets will play the Los Angeles Clippers on Saturday night, and Livingston will most likely be inserted into the starting lineup in place of Williams.Four and a half minutes into Friday's game, Williams skipped through traffic and flipped up a 9-foot runner, and as he descended into the paint, he appeared to turn his left ankle on Suns center Miles Plumlee's foot. Immediately, he curled into a fetal position on the floor, grabbing at his sneaker. Once he was finally helped upright, he was helped off the court while hopping on one foot.An X-ray exam inside the arena was negative.Williams' ankles have become his bane. He required multiple cortisone shots last season while battling pain in both ankles. He then sprained his right ankle over the summer and was sidelined until the preseason finale. Williams appeared to tweak his left ankle Wednesday night during a loss to the Sacramento Kings, but he continued to play that game and afterward insisted he was fine. But he was grabbing that ankle Friday, injecting more doubt and difficulty into the Nets' rough early season."He's young, and we'll see how he feels tomorrow," Coach Jason Kidd said. "But, again, it's not one guy that wins or loses a game, it's a team effort, and tonight was a perfect example of that."Kidd said a scare surged through him when he watched Brook Lopez and Kevin Garnett end up on the floor after colliding during the waning seconds of regulation. Both were limping once they got to their feet, but both remained in the game to contribute to the win. Lopez scored 4 of the Nets' 8 points in overtime and finished with 27 over all. Garnett battled to tip the ball to Johnson on the final play."The tough times that we've been through, this would have been an easy one to let go," said Kidd, who spent most of the second half on his feet, shouting from the sidelines. "It just shows the character of our guys, how they fought."
Roy Hibbert had 24 points and 8 blocks, both season highs, leading the unbeaten Indiana Pacers past the visiting Milwaukee Bucks , 104-77, on Friday night.The Pacers became the first team since the 2002-3 Dallas Mavericks to open a season at 9-0. Indiana has beaten all four of its Central Division opponents and will have an opportunity to maintain its unblemished record Saturday night at Chicago.Hibbert had plenty of help. Paul George scored 10 of his 22 points in the third quarter, and Lance Stephenson finished with 11 points.The short-handed Bucks (2-6) spent most of the game playing catch-up. With four injured players sitting out, O. J. Mayo led the Bucks with 20 points. Khris Middleton and Gary Neal each had 11 — nowhere near enough to avoid a fourth straight loss.BULLS 96, RAPTORS 80 Luol Deng had 19 points and Joakim Noah scored 18 as Chicago overcame the absence of Derrick Rose to beat Toronto for its first road win of the season.Deng and Noah also had nine rebounds apiece as Chicago earned its third consecutive win.Carlos Boozer and Jimmy Butler each had 14 points for Chicago, which avoided its first 0-4 road start in five seasons. The Bulls had lost at Philadelphia, Miami and Indiana before winning in Toronto. DeMar DeRozan matched his career high with 37 points, and Rudy Gay had 20 points and 9 rebounds.TRAIL BLAZERS 109, CELTICS 96 LaMarcus Aldridge scored 27 points and added 12 rebounds to lead Portland to its first victory in Boston since 2004.Mo Williams scored 18 with eight assists for Portland, which earned its fifth consecutive victory. Jared Sullinger, who missed the last game with a bruised knee, had 26 points and 8 rebounds off the bench for Boston. It was Aldridge's fourth straight game with a double-double.HAWKS 113, 76ERS 103 Jeff Teague had a career-high 33 points and 10 assists, and Al Horford added 20 points as Atlanta beat visiting Philadelphia.DeMarre Carroll finished with a career-high 21 points for Atlanta. Evan Turner scored 27 points, Tony Wroten had 22 points, and Spencer Hawes finished with 14 points and 12 rebounds for the 76ers.BOBCATS 86, CAVALIERS 80 Michael Kidd-Gilchrist scored 16 points as Charlotte used a strong fourth quarter to defeat host Cleveland.The Bobcats outscored the Cavaliers, 29-22, in the final period to win for only the second time in 16 games at Quicken Loans Arena. Kidd-Gilchrist had 8 points in the fourth. Charlotte had five players in double figures. Kyrie Irving had 18 points and 10 assists for Cleveland, which lost for the first time in four games at home.HEAT 110, MAVERICKS 104 LeBron James scored 39 points, and Dwyane Wade had 17 points, 8 assists and a career-best 8 steals as Miami held off Dallas at home.James made 14 of 18 shots for the Heat (6-3), while Chris Bosh scored 14 points. Norris Cole and Rashard Lewis each added 11 for Miami. Dirk Nowitzki scored 28 points for Dallas (5-4), while Vince Carter added 21 and Monta Ellis had 20 for the Mavericks.NUGGETS 117, T'WOLVES 113 Wilson Chandler scored 19 points, including a 3-pointer and three free throws late in the game, as Denver held off Minnesota at home.SPURS 91, JAZZ 82 Tony Parker scored 14 of his 22 points in the fourth quarter as San Antonio rallied to beat  host Utah and extend its winning streak to seven games.
In a quest to prevent his body from crumbling into a cartoonish pile of parts, Carmelo Anthony has turned to a between-games conditioning routine that runs the gamut from conventional to space age. There are ice packs and massages, cryogenic chambers and NormaTec compression sleeves."You got to do all the extra stuff," Anthony said.Now more than ever, that appears to be the case. With the Knicks struggling to unearth early-season cohesion, Coach Mike Woodson has leaned on Anthony to provide minutes atop minutes. Through Thursday, Anthony was leading the N.B.A. in playing time, averaging 40.8 minutes per game.This is not an ideal situation. After Anthony supplied 44 minutes in Thursday's loss to the Houston Rockets, Woodson acknowledged that Anthony's workload was a "concern." The Knicks (3-5) have dropped four straight games at Madison Square Garden."We're trying to win, especially at home," said Woodson, whose players will have another opportunity Saturday when they host the Atlanta Hawks.It might be too early to call Woodson's reliance on Anthony an act of desperation, but the approach seems fraught with risk. Anthony, 29, has accumulated 26,182 minutes of playing time over 11 seasons, a total that puts him 37th among active players. With a game predicated on shedding defenders in isolations, Anthony has also absorbed his share of contact. He spent much of the off-season recovering from labrum and rotator cuff tears in his left shoulder."My summer was pretty much occupied when it came to rehabbing the shoulder," he said. "You had to almost put double the amount of time into it because I had a torn shoulder in two different places. So you had to fix that, and you have to fix the stuff that's around it. Just a lot of work."Anthony was laboring with his outside shooting before Thursday's game, but he regained his familiar rhythm against the Rockets. He scored 45 points on 17-of-30 shooting and grabbed 10 rebounds. He also had a potentially game-tying 3-pointer waved off by the officials in the game's closing seconds."He got his pop back," Raymond Felton said. "His jump shot, his movement to the basket — he looks good. He's starting to get into a groove."Anthony has had to put in the work to find it. He has been running 2.6 miles per game, according to player-tracking data provided by the league. It might not sound extreme, except that basketball is not a straight-line sport. It entails starts and stops, sprints and cuts. His mileage ties him for sixth in the league."I mean, I don't want to play 45 minutes every night," Anthony said. "But at this rate, if that's what I got to do to help this team, then I'm all for it."The Knicks did not practice Friday, so Anthony took what he described as a mental break by appearing on behalf of his foundation at the Madison Square Boys and Girls Club in the Bronx. He helped distribute food to families in need. "This is my recovery day," he said.Woodson has been left with little choice but to give Anthony ample minutes because the Knicks have almost no depth. Tyson Chandler, the starting center, could miss another month after fracturing a bone in his right leg. Kenyon Martin and Amar'e Stoudemire are subject to strict playing-time restrictions.Anthony has typically averaged between 34 and 38 minutes per game over the course of his career, and he has never logged more than 2,995 minutes in a single season, which he did as a 19-year-old rookie with the Denver Nuggets. On his current pace, he would top 3,341 minutes.It would be an extraordinary feat, yet it would rank only 91st on the N.B.A.'s career list. The stars of the past often played 42, 43 and 44 minutes. Dan Issel, a former player and coach, said that teams used to have shorter benches and that the postseason was not nearly as grueling."Coaches today are more aware of keeping players fresh and making sure they have guys ready to play in April if you make the playoffs," he said in a telephone interview.As a member of the A.B.A.'s Kentucky Colonels in the 1971-72 season, Issel averaged 43 minutes per game and did not even lead his team in that category. That distinction belonged to Artis Gilmore, who averaged 43.6 minutes. The mentality was different back then, Issel said."I'm going to sound like an old man now, but I never lifted a weight in my life and never stretched other than to lean over to tie my shoes," he said.Asked if he had a preferred postgame recovery method, Issel said, "Budweiser."The N.B.A. fined J. R. Smith $25,000 for directing hostile and inappropriate language toward the Detroit Pistons' Brandon Jennings via his Twitter account, the league said Friday. Smith appeared to threaten Jennings for picking on Smith's younger brother, Chris, a guard with the Knicks. ... Carmelo Anthony said he had spoken with Iman Shumpert, who was the subject of trade talk this week. "It can get to you," Anthony said. "You can take it two ways. You can take it that people really want you, or people don't appreciate you." He added, "People are going to talk, but he can't think about any of that."
J. J. Mann hit the go-ahead 3-pointer with 13.1 seconds left to help Belmont upset No. 12 North Carolina, 83-80, on Sunday in Chapel Hill, N.C.Mann finished with a career-best 28 points. His last basket gave the Bruins an 81-80 lead. The Tar Heels had rallied from 11 points behind in the second half to lead by 8 with about four minutes left.After Mann's basket, U.N.C.'s J. P. Tokoto missed a shot for the lead from near the top of the key. Drew Windler grabbed the loose rebound and threw it ahead to Caleb Chowbay, who scored on a breakaway layup with 0.2 seconds left to seal a stunning win."There aren't great victories unless you beat great programs," Belmont Coach Rick Byrd said.North Carolina again played without P. J. Hairston and Leslie McDonald because of N.C.A.A. eligibility concerns.IOWA STATE 77, MICHIGAN 70 Melvin Ejim scored 22 points and host Iowa State beat No. 7 Michigan, spoiling the season debut of Mitch McGary for the Wolverines. McGary, a preseason first-team all-American who missed two games with a lower back injury, finished with 9 points and 6 rebounds.KENTUCKY 87, R. MORRIS 49 Aaron Harrison scored 19 of his 28 points in the first half and No. 1 Kentucky started all freshmen for the first time in defeating visiting Robert Morris.GONZAGA 82, OAKLAND 67 Kevin Pangos scored 21 points to give No. 15 Gonzaga a win over visiting Oakland. Travis Bader scored 22 for Oakland.UCONN 77, BOSTON U. 60 DeAndre Daniels scored 24 points to lead No. 19 Connecticut to a victory over visiting Boston University. The Terriers have not won a game against a ranked team since 1959.INDIANA ST. 83, NOTRE DAME 70 Justin Gant scored 17 points, Manny Arop had 13 and Indiana State beat No. 21 Notre Dame, which had been 48-0 in November under Coach Mike Brey.N. MEXICO 109, CH. SOUTH. 93 Cameron Bairstow scored a career-high 29 points to lead No. 22 New Mexico to a win over visiting Charleston Southern.BAYLOR 87, LA.-LAFAYETTE 68 Kenny Chery scored 20 points and had four assists, helping lead No. 23 Baylor to a victory over visiting Louisiana-Lafayette.CONNECTICUT 71, PENN STATE 52 Bria Hartley tied a career high with 29 points and Saniya Chong had 16 to help No. 1 Connecticut beat No. 13 Penn State, snapping the Lady Lions' 22-game home-court winning streak.STANFORD 66, U.C. DAVIS 48 Chiney Ogwumike had 28 points and 15 rebounds in helping No. 3 Stanford beat visiting U.C. Davis for the eighth straight time.TENN. 87, GEORGIA TECH 76 Bashaara Graves matched a career high with 23 points and added a career-high 18 rebounds as No. 4 Tennessee remained undefeated with a victory over visiting Georgia Tech.LOUISVILLE 97, OKLAHOMA 92 Tia Gibbs scored 23 points and No. 5 Louisville beat host Oklahoma in overtime to win the preseason Women's National Invitation Tournament title.KENTUCKY 96, CENT. MICH. 74 DeNesha Stallworth scored 21 points to help No. 7 Kentucky pull away for a victory over visiting Central Michigan. Crystal Bradford scored a game-high 23 points for Central Michigan.CALIFORNIA 67, GEORGETOWN 52 Rashanda Gray scored 15 points and No. 10 California snapped a two-game losing streak with a victory over host Georgetown.
It did not take long on Saturday night for fans and commentators at Madison Square Garden to realize something was amiss between the Knicks and the Atlanta Hawks. Their uniforms looked alike. Too alike.The Knicks have worn their new orange alternate jerseys four times already this season, but in each previous outing, the other team arrived wearing a contrasting shade. Not the Hawks. The result was a jumble of blood red versus burnt orange that became an exercise in facial recognition, looking twice, squinting, guessing: Which ones are the Hawks?According to the N.B.A. rule book, the home team is mandated to wear light-colored jerseys, and the visitors dark jerseys, unless otherwise approved. This would explain Atlanta's uniform choice."Neither team was at fault," Tim Frank, the N.B.A.'s vice president for basketball communications, said. "The Knicks orange has been designated as a light alternate home uniform. Going forward, we'll ensure that the opponent wears a more distinguishing color uniform when the Knicks wear orange."The color scheme drew mostly critical notice from fans via Twitter and the MSG Network broadcaster Mike Breen, who said he thought even the players might have been having a difficult time telling one another apart. The first half especially was filled with sloppy play and errant passes.Carmelo Anthony dismissed a question that the uniforms had any effect on the game, which the Knicks lost, 110-90.He referred to the suggestion as "nitpicking."The Knicks have already worn the orange jerseys four times this year (all losses) and plan to wear them at least six more times.The N.B.A. has had other games in which teams have worn single-color uniforms — with separate shades for each team. But ESPN's Paul Lukas, the founder of Uni Watch, which tracks and analyzes aesthetics in sports, wrote in an email that Saturday's game "definitely had less uniform contrast than any N.B.A. game in recent memory."It is not the first time this fall that on-field attire by teams made headlines. On Sept. 8, the Arkansas State football team was assessed two penalties — one at the start of each half — for wearing dark gray uniforms at home against Auburn, which wore navy blue.Arkansas State Coach Bryan Harsin told reporters after the game that wearing the uniforms was his decision.Auburn Coach Gus Malzahn said of the penalties, "You don't hear about that very much."In September, two baseball games featured opposing teams wearing dark uniforms: the Los Angeles Angels and the Texas Rangers, each in red; and the Tampa Bay Rays and the Minnesota Twins, each in blue.Basketball, with its close confines and fast pace, is a different form of sport, and uniform colors would perhaps play a bigger role in helping fans, broadcasters and even players keep pace.On Feb. 18, 2004, Wisconsin and Illinois met at Assembly Hall in Champaign, Ill., both wearing dark jerseys in a memorable matchup of bright orange versus bright red.Wisconsin committed 17 turnovers. But the uniforms were probably toughest on those fans straining to discern one team from the other.
Up and down the Nets ' fortunes have bobbed through the early part of this season. Good vibes have remained ephemeral. Success has been fleeting.The Nets' 108-98 defeat Monday to the Portland Trail Blazers, in this way, felt like a microcosm of their first 10 games. They shot out of the gates, exceeding their previous season-high point totals for a quarter and for a half, elating a sellout crowd at Barclays Center. Before the night was done, though, boos could be heard filtering from the rapidly shrinking audience, as the Nets (3-7) slunk to their fifth loss in six games.After the buzzer, it was a quiet arena and an even quieter Nets locker room. Coach Jason Kidd tried to take sole responsibility for the loss, and since a majority of the players left without answering questions from reporters, no one could rebut his sentiment, as unlikely as it seemed."It's just bad coaching," Kidd said. "I take the blame for this."Deron Williams and Brook Lopez were both missing from the lineup while nursing sprained ankles. Andrei Kirilenko, the highest-paid reserve, has not played since Nov. 8 because of a back injury. Asked before the game if there was a timetable for their return, Kidd said, "No."Kidd said he should have found a way to keep his team's early momentum going. Looking confident and dynamic through the first two quarters — including a 40-point effort in the first quarter — the Nets took a 7-point lead into the half. But they deflated during the third, shooting just 3 for 18 from the field. The Blazers shot 11 for 20 and outscored the Nets, 27-15, in the third.The red-hot Blazers were always going to present a challenge to the floundering Nets. LaMarcus Aldridge scored a game-high 27 points, and Wesley Matthews added 24 while going 5 for 8 from 3-point range. Damian Lillard, Portland's talented young point guard, added 19 points and 9 assists."It's the ebbs and flows of the game," said Shaun Livingston, a lone bright spot for the Nets after scoring 23 points. "We came out hot. I think we had a good rhythm, good momentum. But you can go cold at any time of the game."Third quarters have been a reliable harbinger for how the Nets have performed. Entering Monday, they were undefeated when outscoring their opponents during the third quarter and winless when being outscored. It proved true again.The Blazers opened the fourth on a 12-4 run, quieting the crowd and forcing the Nets to take a timeout. Minutes later, scattered boos — some of the first around Barclays Center this season — could be heard as the Nets slumped into another timeout, trailing by 12. During the next timeout, fans simply got up from their seats and left."They never lost confidence," Blazers Coach Terry Stotts said of his players. "They never stopped competing."The Nets seemed to do just that. They shot 14 for 19 in their 40-point first quarter. It was their highest quarter total this year and the club's highest first quarter since 2008.Kevin Garnett was a rather unlikely offensive catalyst early. He made five straight midrange jump shots within the opening three minutes to score the Nets' first 10 points. After he made a 10-footer, maintaining his perfect shooting start, he went to the bench hearing loud, appreciative applause.Before Monday, the most points Garnett had scored in a game this season had been 8. And through his first eight games, he was shooting 30 percent from the field while averaging 8.8 attempts per game. But he cooled off considerably before the game's end and finished with 16 points, shooting 8 for 19.The Nets led by 63-56 at halftime after registering their biggest output for a half this season. But the Blazers erased the deficit quickly. It has not quite mattered whom the Nets have played. The ongoing gelling process within the team — as well as persistent injury problems — has produced a wildly variant performance level from one day to the next.Paul Pierce and Garnett, who had minor injuries, were cleared to play right before tipoff. Pierce scored just 11 points, shooting 2 for 12. Joe Johnson and Reggie Evans rounded out the starting group, and the two combined to shoot 5 for 16.The Nets' locker room remained closed for several extra minutes after the game. Jason Terry — who was one of just three players, along with Livingston and the rookie Mason Plumee, to speak to reporters — said there was no organized meeting."It was just guys reflecting, realizing we let another opportunity slip," Terry said. "But we'll figure this thing out."But he said there was no timetable for that, either.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — Raymond Felton was a spectator for most of Monday's practice. He sat on a training table next to Tyson Chandler, whose fractured right leg was no longer encased in a protective boot. This counted as progress for the Knicks , whose training facility has doubled as a sanitarium this season.Felton, the starting point guard, took the day off from contact drills as he continued to recover from a strained left hamstring. The injury has hindered him since the preseason. His shooting touch has been jagged. His defense has been worse, with opposing guards treating him like a bright orange traffic cone."There are certain shots that I'm used to taking and making that just aren't falling," Felton said. "And there are certain lateral movements that I can't make on defense. It's just not there. And it's frustrating. I'm fighting through it."Felton, who is averaging 11.1 points a game and shooting 37.6 percent from the field, has also been dealing with what he described as a pinched nerve in his hip, which sends a "sharp pain" shooting down his legs, he said. He has taken medication in an attempt to ease some of the symptoms."Nobody's known about that, because I don't like making excuses," he said. "But hopefully, the treatment kicks in, and we'll see how it goes."With trade talk swirling and the pressure to win mounting, the Knicks (3-6) might be leaving town at an opportune time. Five of their next six games will be on the road, starting Tuesday night against the Detroit Pistons. The Knicks have been dreadful at Madison Square Garden, where they have lost five straight.On Monday, Coach Mike Woodson again questioned his team's effort. He can excuse missed shots, he said. He cannot justify an absence of focus."Not good enough," he said. "I'm not here to teach effort, and I think our players understand that."For Felton, 29, the opening weeks of the season have been a slog. He injured his hamstring in a preseason game against the Washington Wizards on Oct. 17, and then had the muscle tighten in the regular-season opener against the Milwaukee Bucks on Oct. 30.His play has suffered. His points per possession, a measure of offensive efficiency, are .746 over all and an anemic .672 in half-court sets, which ranks in the league's 17th percentile, according to Synergy Sports. He is shooting 22.7 percent in fourth quarters, an indication of fatigue.Felton has never been mistaken for the second coming of Bill Bradley. For his career, Felton is a 41.3 percent shooter. His conditioning has occasionally been cause for concern, particularly when he played for the Portland Trail Blazers in 2011-12.Still, Felton has seldom been quite so ineffective as a scorer — or as a defender. Opposing guards are scoring 25.3 points per 48 minutes against him, according to 82games.com. Last Thursday, he was outplayed by the Houston Rockets' Jeremy Lin, who collected 21 points, 5 rebounds and 3 assists in a 109-106 win. Felton finished with 8 points and 7 assists in 41 minutes. The game underscored the Knicks' decision to let the 25-year-old Lin leave as a free agent two summers ago.Felton has acknowledged that he has not played well. But unless Woodson gives more minutes to Pablo Prigioni or Beno Udrih, Felton will continue to play — and play a lot.Woodson voiced his support for Felton last week when he was asked if there was an ideal type of point guard to bring out the best in Carmelo Anthony. "Raymond Felton," Woodson said.Ivorie Manning, a Las Vegas-based shooting coach who has worked with Felton, said he called Felton last week to see if he wanted to meet. Manning said he could sense that Felton was playing under stress."He just said, 'I'm not making any excuses, but my hamstring is killing me,' " Manning said in a telephone interview. "I can tell. With me being here in town, and us not going to the gym last night, that tells me what kind of state he's in. I know how much he likes to work, but he just wants to rest at this point. Ray is not one to rest."A large part of Felton's game, Manning said, is predicated on his ability to get into the lane. Once there, Felton has two options. If he draws defenders, he can pass the ball to an open teammate under the basket. Or, if he has the space, he can come to a jump stop and launch a short floater.In recent weeks, though, both options have been limited, Manning said. With Chandler sidelined, Felton has been operating without a reliable post presence if he penetrates and the defense collapses. And because his plant leg is injured, Felton is missing his usual explosion when he does shoot. He has converted only half his attempts within five feet of the basket."The last thing you want to do when you have a hamstring injury is come to a quick stop and shoot," Manning said.As a result, Felton has settled for more outside jumpers, with 34 of his 109 field-goal attempts coming from 3-point range.This has not been an especially sound strategy for Felton, who has made seven of them, or 20.6 percent."The lift is not there," Felton said. "But no excuses. I've got to figure it out."Metta World Peace, who did not practice Monday because of a sore left knee, will not make the trip. He was also mourning the death of a family member, Mike Woodson said. ... Center Jeremy Tyler could join the Erie BayHawks, the Knicks' Development League affiliate, by Wednesday, according to Ivorie Manning, who has been working with him.
CHICAGO — Several hours before his Indiana Pacers met the Chicago Bulls Saturday night at United Center, General Manager Kevin Pritchard lounged in a courtside folding chair during the afternoon shootaround.His team was off to a 9-0 start, and he watched with a smile, recounting how the Indiana roster was assembled. He was sure, though, to offer a caveat. "It's early," he said. "We know it's early."He added: "This is the biggest test of our season. We'll learn more about our team after tonight."Sure enough, the Bulls laid a smack-down on the Pacers, 110-94, emphatically ending the Pacers' undefeated run.But even with Saturday's loss, Indiana still shares the league's best record — with San Antonio — heading into Wednesday's meeting with the Knicks. The Pacers' visit to Madison Square Garden is their first since they emphatically dispatched the Knicks from the playoffs a season ago in the Eastern Conference semifinals.Early returns indicate the team that then pushed the Miami Heat to seven games in the Eastern Conference finals is every bit as formidable this season — perhaps more so. The Knicks? Well, that's another matter.Before the loss to Chicago, Indiana's defense was allowing 83.7 points per game. For perspective, only the 1998-99 Atlanta Hawks allowed fewer than 84 points over an entire season in the shot clock era. And even after Saturday's loss, the Pacers were still allowing just 86.3 points a game, best in the league.The Pacers' defensive success is built in part on perimeter players with length, like Paul George (6 feet 8 inches) and Lance Stephenson (6-5). The 7-footer Roy Hibbert guards the lane. Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau, a noted defensive guru whose own team was allowing 90 points per game (third in the N.B.A.) going into Monday's games, spoke effusively about Indiana's effort, ball pressure and continuity before Saturday's confrontation."Each year they've gotten better, and they've made a strong commitment to defense," Thibodeau said. "They challenge shots, cover for each other. If there's a mistake that's made, Hibbert's always waiting."Indiana had one of the league's best defenses last season — something the Knicks can attest to — and in the off-season the team's president of basketball operations, Larry Bird; its senior consultant, Donnie Walsh; and Pritchard set about buttressing the offense. Pritchard said Bird targeted Luis Scola of the Phoenix Suns and the free agents C. J. Watson, who played for the Nets last season, and Chris Copeland, who was an intriguing part of the Knicks..The Pacers landed all three. Scola was acquired in a trade, and the Pacers signed Watson and Copeland."We were so close last year, we felt like a couple more players really to help us score the ball is what we needed," Pritchard said. "Every player we brought on added to our offensive efficiencies."George has raised his game, too, putting himself in early consideration for the league's Most Valuable Player award with averages of 23.3 points and 7 rebounds. Thibodeau called him a superstar."The second half of last year, we showed a great deal of offensive execution," Coach Frank Vogel said. "It seems we've not just picked up where we left off in that regard, but with the bench changes we made, we've taken another step."The Pacers' emergence as one of the league's most formidable teams has come rather quickly. They had five consecutive losing seasons, from 2006-7 to 2010-11, although the last of them, when they had a meager 37-45 record, got them into the Eastern Conference playoffs, where they lost in the first round. In 2011-12, the Pacers were 42-24 and lost in the conference semifinals. Last season, they were 49-32 and again took a step forward in the postseason, losing in the conference finals.All of this coincided with key players arriving through the draft, free agency or trades. Hibbert became a Pacer in the summer of 2008, acquired in a trade with Toronto a month after the Raptors took him with the 17th pick in the first round.
EAST RUTHERFORD, N.J. — Three weeks ago, after the Nets secured a galvanizing victory at home over the Miami Heat, Kevin Garnett bestowed upon his longtime teammate Paul Pierce the nickname Picasso, reasoning that every night on the court, Pierce seemed to produce affecting artistry — "a beautiful painting," Garnett said.For the last 15 N.B.A. seasons, Pierce has felt more like a connoisseur's choice, wielding gifts that are not always obvious at first. Doc Rivers, who coached him for nine seasons, joked last week that his former player appears to run at a 1-mile-per-hour pace.Pierce's game, rather, has always demanded some contemplation. Season after season, he has used subtle gestures, skewed motion and arrhythmic footwork to form an impressive body of work, one that has grown and developed from one year to the next. This is what the Nets, his new team, are hoping will occur this season. It has not quite happened yet.Through the Nets' first four games, Pierce shot 55.6 percent from the field and averaged 15.8 points and nine shots. Over his last five games, his shooting percentage fell to 32.1, and he averaged 11.2 points and 10.6 attempts. While the Nets have dropped to a 3-7 record, Pierce has partly personified their collective problems."I'm still trying to get a rhythm within the offense, still trying to figure out where shots are going to come, night in and night out," Pierce said Tuesday. "I think that's the biggest question, not only for me, but for all of us. That's why there's been a lot of inconsistency for a lot of us, just understanding what we're trying to accomplish, night in and night out."Pierce, 36, is trying to evolve his game into a new stage. Last season, he shouldered a huge amount of responsibility on the Boston Celtics, especially once Rajon Rondo tore his right anterior cruciate ligament. The offense often moved through him, and his all-around averages were strong. He averaged 18.6 points, 6.3 rebounds and 4.8 assists playing 33.4 minutes a game, though his 43.6 shooting percentage was his lowest since the 2003-4 season.It has been a different story this season. The Nets possess perhaps the most scoring talent Pierce has been around in his career. His responsibilities have been minimized, and he said that trying to find his niche and exact role each night had caused him some problems."Some nights, I'll be a spot-up shooter; some nights, the ball is going to go to me," Pierce said a day after shooting 2 for 12 from the field during the Nets' 108-98 loss at home to Portland. "So I just got to get a better feel for the chemistry for the offense. Eventually, I'll get comfortable where I'll get into a nice little groove."Pierce said finding that groove had been slowed while the Nets struggled to get healthy. From night to night, he said, the Nets have more "unpredictability about who's playing than probably anybody in the league."And Pierce has not been immune from health concerns. He was briefly hampered during the preseason when he jammed a big toe. And he missed the Nets' game Saturday while battling soreness around his groin. The Nets have mostly skirted around injury discussions, but Coach Jason Kidd said before Saturday's game that Pierce had felt discomfort a few days before that.Asked Tuesday about Pierce's inconsistency, Kidd said he was still finding his rhythm and mentioned the groin injury. But, Kidd added, "He's just a competitor, so he would never use that as an excuse."Garnett, who probably knows Pierce better than anyone on the team, declined to speculate too deeply on how Pierce's adjustment was going. But the little he did discuss at once touched on the biggest upside and chief concern about Pierce this season."Obviously, he's being a vocal leader; he's coming in being an example," Garnett said. "We're older, so we're dealing with knickknacks, like anyone else in this league."Pierce seemed spent after carrying the Celtics last season, and he shot just 36.8 percent during the playoffs. The assumption has been that the Nets, if they are smart about preserving his legs during the early going, will not produce the same pattern this season. The underlying concern, though, is that Pierce's niggling injuries may represent a larger, downward arc and that his legs may not return.Any judgments on Pierce, who will be a free agent after this season, or anyone else remain premature. Pierce fought tooth and nail against the Heat during the Nets' home opener, scoring 19 points and rejecting a LeBron James shot down the stretch. It was a diverse and skilled performance that drew Garnett's rave review. It showed the artistry the Nets hope will emerge in time.Deron Williams (ankle) went through a full practice Tuesday and declared himself ready to play on Wednesday at Charlotte. Brook Lopez (ankle) did not practice, and Jason Kidd said he would be a game-time decision. Andrei Kirilenko (back) will join the team on the trip, but he said it would probably be three or four more days until he could return to full-speed play.
SOUTH ORANGE, N.J. — For months, Tom Maayan had been the focal point of an international tug of war, pitting the Israeli military against a major American university, while clouding what looked to be a bright basketball career. But when Maayan, a sophomore at Seton Hall , returned to the bustling campus here Aug. 16, after five months of army service in Upper Galilee, the northern Israeli province where he was raised, it was with a sense of relief.He thought all that diplomatic jockeying was behind him. He believed that the army had granted him a temporary exemption, the kind bestowed on only a handful of exceptional athletes each year. He started at point guard in Seton Hall's first game of the season, on Nov. 2.But a winding and exhaustive ordeal was recently shaken off course again. According to an army spokesman, Maayan's exemption was for only 120 days, and he was never officially permitted to leave Israel. The military expects him to return by Jan. 2.The news was delivered to Maayan on Monday by his uncle David Fuchs, who flew to the United States to see what could be Maayan's final collegiate basketball games."It's a shock," Maayan said, standing alone outside the locker room after Seton Hall's 82-66 victory against Monmouth on Monday night."Tommy has been and will always be a beloved member of the Seton Hall community," Coach Kevin Willard said. "We will certainly miss him, and while we understand and respect his responsibility to serve his country, we are disappointed with the timing."For Fuchs, who lives in Israel and served as Maayan's legal guardian until he turned 18, the last 11 months have been replete with ceaseless negotiating, hand-wringing and pleading in the hopes of making Israel recognize Maayan, 20, as an ascendant basketball talent.That recognition might have allowed him to remain at Seton Hall, the only program that offered him a scholarship after a devastating knee injury in high school and one that expected to be competitive in the Big East conference with him.But, for a second time, Maayan's future is in limbo, held up by bureaucratic wrangling and an exemption in dispute. The army, according to Lt. Col. Peter Lerner, a spokesman, took issue with Maayan's decision to attend college in the United States before serving his required duty at age 18, accusing him of attempting to flee.Fuchs believes there to be government skepticism over the validity of Maayan's unusual back story: a Jewish player recruited by Seton Hall, given a scholarship and earning significant minutes for a top-tier program."I told my family I feel like Forrest Gump, when he ran and nobody knew, 'Why are you running, Forrest?' " Fuchs said. "I'm running into an ocean. Nobody understands me."The first time Fuchs explained to Maayan that he had to return to Israel was in March, hours after the end of his freshman season. Fuchs flew to New York to watch Seton Hall play in Madison Square Garden in the Big East tournament. At dinner at an Italian restaurant on March 13, shortly after the Pirates were knocked out by Syracuse, Fuchs informed Maayan he could not postpone enlistment any longer.Maayan hurriedly packed his belongings for the flight to Tel Aviv. In a tearful goodbye inside his coach's office, Maayan believed that he had bid his surrogate basketball family adieu."I didn't think I would come back," Maayan said in an interview this month. "I thought once I go home, it would be over for my college career."Maayan understood the rules of conscription and his responsibility to Israel, where he has lived (besides a brief stay in Canada) since age 3. He said he had no thoughts of abandoning his duty.But emotionally and internally, Maayan had been a wreck since he first began receiving letters from the army to his dorm room in December. How could he just leave his teammates and coaches? How could he abandon his new home?Once Willard heard about the complication, he assigned Steve Sauers, then the program's director of basketball operations, to oversee the paperwork and phone relaying. Over the months, Sauers's folder for Maayan swelled. He learned quickly that bargaining with the army would not be simple."We knew, until we got him back, we had a long way to go," said Sauers, now an assistant at the University of California, Riverside.
WEST ORANGE, N.J. — When Heather LaCasse heard of a proposed coed professional basketball league, she passed the information to her boyfriend, Jean Marcellus, and suggested he try out. As an inducement, she promised to keep him company on the drive from the Bronx to New Jersey.But on the morning of the tryout, Marcellus, who is 6-foot-6 and played some college and overseas pro ball, talked LaCasse, who is about a foot shorter and played in high school, into packing gym gear, too."When we got here, he gave me the pen and I said, 'I don't think I'm going to do it because I haven't done organized ball in a long time,' " LaCasse, 30, said. "And then he and everybody at the sign-up table said, 'Just do it.' "Making a snap decision at the sound of a well-known slogan, she did.Mshangwe Crawford, who played football in college, hit the court mainly to provide support for his girlfriend, Amanda Hill, a former high school standout who was intrigued by a paying league that paired men with women."I play with her four nights a week, and I don't know anyone who loves the game more than Amanda," Crawford said.Women assisting men. Men helping women. Before a ball was dribbled Saturday in the West Orange High School gymnasium, John Howard's belief in the societal benefits — and potential commercial appeal — for what he is calling the Mixed Gender Basketball Association was heightened.A few women, most notably Ann Meyers and Nancy Lieberman, have played with men in a professional setting. Many top women's college teams routinely use men as practice players. This year, the Dallas Mavericks' owner, Mark Cuban, suggested that Brittney Griner, the No. 1 pick in the 2013 W.N.B.A. draft, audition for his team. The offer was panned by critics who frowned on imposing male standards on women with leagues and challenges of their own."Whether he was serious about it, I don't know, but Griner's going into the N.B.A. and playing in an otherwise gender-segregated model is not what I'm talking about," Howard said. "My model is not antagonistic or just competitive. It's collaborative."After playing basketball for the University of Cincinnati and the Harlem Globetrotters in the 1960s, Howard had a long career in education as a district superintendent, high school principal and college professor. While working for the Michigan Department of Education in the late 1970s, he helped start a gender equity project and became fascinated with the subject. He was not convinced that segregated paths in the realm of sports worked best for the greater good.Howard, who retired last year, has been designing game and business plans since January for a league he hopes can begin play in 2014 or 2015, with exhibition games at select sites commencing late next month.He has created a red-and-blue logo (of a ponytailed woman outleaping a man for the ball), a website and a company based in Florida, M.G.B.A. Inc., with national staff directors. He said he was building a network in several areas around the country with the intention of selecting teams to play a series of exhibitions to roll out the concept regionally."When I show people the plan or the website, the first thing that comes out of their mouth is, 'Are you serious?' " Howard said. "I tell them, 'Yeah, I'm serious.' And they say, 'Well, tell me more about it.' They want to see how it works."In his blueprint, the composition of the teams would change from quarter to quarter: three men and two women, and vice versa. There would be a 4-point shot line for women, allowing Howard to use what he called scramble time — giving a team that is trailing at the end of a game or possibly each quarter the right to play up to five women to increase the chance for a 4-point play.Coaches, he said, would have to process many more game situations than in men's or women's basketball, even on basic screen-and-rolls, given the possible consequences of an unfavorable man-on-woman matchup. Women, conversely, would bring more discipline and a greater commitment to fundamentals, Howard said.
On March 13, 2012, The New York Times published a story by Howard Beck that noted it had been exactly five years since James Dolan , the Knicks ' owner, had consented to any sort of interview with the reporters who covered his often inept team.That was 20 months ago. Almost nothing was heard from Dolan since that article appeared — until now. On Friday, The New York Post published a fairly lengthy interview in which Dolan talked, among other things, about his blues band, the status of Coach Mike Woodson, his relationship with Isiah Thomas and his decision to replace Glen Grunwald as general manager on the eve of the Knicks' training camp this past September.He was not, however, asked to address any number of other topics. That latter category would include his decision to let Jeremy Lin depart the Knicks rather than match his free-agent deal with the Houston Rockets, the danger that Carmelo Anthony will not only opt out of his current contract at the end of this season but leave the Knicks altogether, and the Knicks' increasingly entwined relationship with Creative Artists Agency, which represents Anthony, J. R. Smith, Woodson and several front-office executives and apparently has Dolan's ear on any number of matters.Still, as someone who has presided over the Knicks and the Rangers for some time now without all that much to show for his efforts, and who is widely viewed as stubborn and meddlesome and prone to making the wrong decision, it was noteworthy that Dolan consented to answer at least some questions, all of which were posed by the Post columnist Mike Vaccaro.Of Woodson, who is in his second full season as the Knicks' coach and has already begun to hear chants for his dismissal, Dolan spoke supportively, saying he had "a lot of confidence" in him."One thing I can say about Mike is he has the respect of all the players," Dolan said of a coach who is trying to straighten out a Knicks team that is off to a stumbling 3-8 start. "They all respect him. And he treats them fairly and relatively equally and that's part of where the respect emanates from."Asked if he was more patient than the average owner, Dolan responded that he was more patient "than Mikhail," referring to Mikhail Prokhorov, the owner of the Brooklyn Nets, and added that "it does not pay to be impatient, because you destabilize your team." Of course, Dolan's many critics would argue that the continual change in Knicks coaches and front-office executives is hardly the work of a patient owner, but Dolan wasn't asked about that issue.He was asked why he had made his latest change — replacing Grunwald with Steve Mills — and responded that Grunwald had a "great eye for talent" but "just wasn't the guy" to be in charge in a new, technology-driven world of basketball analysis.As for Thomas, whose immensely unsuccessful five years as the president of basketball operations still hangs over the Knicks, Dolan said: "I can tell you he's a friend of mine. We speak, but not as often as we used to because he's really involved in other things now.""Do I think he deserves another shot?" Dolan asked rhetorically. "Yeah, it just can't be here," adding that "I couldn't do that to him and I couldn't do that to the organization."Questioned about his relationship with the news media — although that might be too strong a word — he said, "I barely read the paper" and was dismissive of stories written about his two teams."Whether it's positive or whether it's negative, it's rarely insightful to me," he added. "My job is to know more than the writers."At one point, Vaccaro asked Dolan if he thought he was good owner, and Dolan responded, "Yeah, I do.""I think I watch out for my fans," he said. "I try to give them a good product. I care for the teams. I'm emotionally involved and intellectually involved. I think an owner needs to be present. When an owner is not present, that's when things tend to go awry."Interestingly, Dolan himself is out of town right now, traveling with his band, J. D. and the Straight Shot, as they open for the Eagles in a Florida tour that went from Tampa on Wednesday to Miami on Friday and then Orlando on Saturday.In the interview with The Post, Dolan, who is a lead singer for the band, said: "Music is a big piece of who I am," adding, "I don't own music. I create music."In Miami, Dolan and his band were performing in American Airlines Arena, home of LeBron James and the champion Miami Heat. In The Post interview, Dolan said he thought the Knicks could "definitely" win the championship this season, which would end the Heat's two-year run, although many others would probably not agree.They are more likely to see the Knicks as an opening act in the postseason for some other team — the Heat, the Indiana Pacers, the Chicago Bulls — that has a much better chance at making a run to the N.B.A. finals. But all of that is months away, and before that, who knows, Dolan might even consent to another interview or two. Or maybe not.
MINNEAPOLIS — Nights like Friday are when leadership matters in the N.B.A. Four injured players were out for the beleaguered Nets , including their leading scorer Brook Lopez. The situation demanded that the veterans with the championship rings, Kevin Garnett and Paul Pierce, assert themselves. Especially Garnett, facing the Minnesota Timberwolves , the franchise where he spent his first 12 seasons."I played in this building for countless years," Garnett said at the morning shootaround at the Target Center. "I hope that I at least make a couple of shots in this place."Instead, as usual, neither Garnett nor Pierce did enough. Minnesota posted such a lopsided victory over the Nets, a 111-81 decision, that neither Garnett (8 points) nor Pierce (6) played in the fourth quarter. Garnett's third-quarter altercation with the rugged Timberwolves forward Kevin Love resulted in a technical and flagrant foul 1, and the Wolves scored the next 16 points.The fourth straight loss and seventh in eight road games by the Nets left Coach Jason Kidd hinting at lineup changes, and a melancholy Garnett suggesting the front office might get involved."We created this monster," Garnett said. "We've got to deal with it. We'll have the business of basketball come into play, I'm sure. Management is probably going to do what they got to do. That's out of our hands. We control our own destiny, who we are as individual and players. Look at yourself and try to fix this thing."Love had 11 rebounds in the first quarter and a double-double by halftime before finishing with 17 points and 16 rebounds. The Nets committed 20 turnovers, managed only seven assists and allowed 17 offensive rebounds.The 37-year-old Garnett began the day facing questions about whether this might be his last game at the Target Center, questions he refused to answer. Garnett made his first shot, acknowledged a video tribute coming out of a timeout later in the first quarter, then made little impact. He took only six shots, making four, and grabbed eight rebounds in losing to Minnesota for the first time in eight games since the Timberwolves traded him to Boston in 2007.Pierce was worse, shooting 2 for 11 from the floor and missing all four 3-point attempts. The Nets sank only 3 of their first 17 shots, fell behind by 22 points in the second quarter and never cut the lead below double-digits the rest of the night."I'm just struggling right now, just simple and plain," Pierce said. "I'm getting great looks. I've got to be able to knock them down. I've got to be able to step up with these guys out, and I've got to play better basketball."Garnett's attempt to spark the Nets with defense backfired when he and Love jostled under the Timberwolves basket with 9 minutes 28 seconds left in the third quarter. The Nets trailed by 59-43 when Love, annoyed with Garnett's hand-checking, swatted Garnett's arm away. Garnett responded with an elbow, and the two jawed at each other."Two guys fouling, fighting, frustration, whatever you want to call it," Garnett said. "He goes hard. I go hard. A moment. End of that."Kevin Martin hit the technical foul shot, and Love made both his shots on the flagrant call to make the score 62-43. Corey Brewer and Martin followed with 3-point jumpers before Rubio grabbed a Pierce 3-point miss and fed Brewer for a fast-break dunk, prompting Kidd to call a timeout. Rubio added a 3-pointer and driving layup for a 78-45 advantage. Andray Blatche's tip-in ended a Nets scoring drought of 3:53.Without Lopez (sprained left ankle), point guard Deron Williams (sprained left ankle), forward Andrei Kirilenko (back spasms) and guard Jason Terry (bruised left knee), Kidd stressed defense at the shootaround, noting the fast-starting Wolves averaged 32.2 points in the first quarter on 51.9 percent shooting.Instead, the Nets struggled on both ends while falling behind by 30-14 after one quarter. The Wolves reached 30 when guard J. J. Barea, a teammate of Kidd's for more than three seasons in Dallas, lost the ball on a drive and saved it blindly back to Love, who banked in a shot at the horn.Afterward, Kidd said the players who finished the game — Mason Plumlee, Alan Anderson, Tyshawn Taylor, Tornike Shengelia and Mirza Teletovic — played so well that they might see more minutes."The time for anyone is wide open right now, so we'll see," Kidd said.At this point, nothing would surprise Garnett."We're better than this, and we know it," he said. "I don't know what it is. Broken record. We keep playing the same song. We're playing the instruments, so it's on us."
Top-ranked Michigan State looked shaky Saturday but withstood a hot start and a late charge by Oklahoma to dispel any upset fantasies with an 87-76 victory in the championship game of the Coaches vs. Cancer Classic at Barclays Center.The Spartans hardly resembled the seasoned unit that calmly outfinessed Kentucky three weeks ago in Chicago. They leaned more toward the team that had narrowly edged Columbia at home.That is what could be most alarming for Michigan State Coach Tom Izzo, trying to ensure his talented team does not fall into an early pattern of regression against opponents it should easily handle.Oklahoma (4-1) does not quite fit that category, either, as the Sooners showed enough mettle and scoring ability to assert themselves as potential contenders in the Big 12. Trailing by as many as 18 points in the second half, they fought back to within 4 and stayed within single digits for the majority of the waning minutes.But Michigan State (6-0) was ultimately too athletic, too physical and too good for Oklahoma, despite some shaky second-half moments.The Spartans won despite a glaringly quiet night from their preseason all-American center, Adreian Payne, which might be the most lasting impression from a late-night matchup in a half-filled arena that seemed to be waiting for something to happen.An upset? A fight? An acrobatic alley-oop or a behind-the-back assist?The fans had to settle instead for a lot of turnovers and fouls by both teams, and some nifty dribbling by Spartans point guard Keith Appling, who scored 17 of his team-high 24 points in the second half, including a clutch layup and foul with 2 minutes 26 seconds remaining to give Michigan State a 7-point lead.The Spartans' leading scorer, Payne, did not make a basket until 17:54 in the second half, deferring to the sophomore guard Gary Harris and the junior Branden Dawson to carry the offensive load, with a sprinkling of contributions from just about everybody wearing a white uniform with green trim.There were depth and versatility, but also some uncharacteristic carelessness with the ball against Oklahoma's full-court press. Michigan State committed 14 turnovers and missed 13 free throws.The Spartans had entered the game with a 2.3 assist-to-turnover ratio. They pride themselves on organization and patience offensively, with a deep holster of weapons.But their forte is defense, and early on that was not looking too impressive.The Sooners hit their first six attempts from the field to jump ahead, 13-8, in the opening minutes. Oklahoma forward Cameron Clark had 16 points in the first 10 minutes, hitting his first seven shots, including two 3-pointers. Michigan State began 4 for 14 from the field and fell into an 11-point hole.But the Spartans picked up the tempo and finally managed to get some stops on the hot-handed Sooners, who had come into the game averaging 87 points. A 21-7 run by the Spartans put them ahead for the first time with 6:30 left in the half.After trailing by 22-11, Michigan State suddenly found itself ahead by 14, a 34-9 swing in a hummingbird's heartbeat. After starting the game 9 of 11 from the field, Oklahoma missed 12 of its next 16, along with two free throws.The Sooners dropped behind by 18 early in the second half but slowly began to creep back, as Michigan State put itself in early foul trouble and committed six turnovers in the first eight minutes. With 12 minutes remaining, Michigan State's lead was trimmed to 4.Five straight points by Appling gave Michigan State some more separation. The Spartans were already in the double bonus with nine minutes remaining, prolonging the final minutes and giving Oklahoma opportunities at the free-throw line. The teams combined to shoot 66 free throws in what began a foul fest toward the end.But Harris (21 points) and Dawson (18 points and 10 rebounds) did enough to keep Michigan State's undefeated season in order for now.SETON HALL 68, VIRGINIA TECH 67 In the consolation game, Seton Hall fell behind by double figures early in the first half before mounting a comeback against Virginia Tech. A 3-pointer by Fuquan Edwin with 27 seconds remaining gave the Pirates (4-2) a 62-61 lead. Hokies forward Jarell Eddie missed a runner with 13 seconds left, and then a costly Virginia Tech turnover helped Seton Hall's cause in the waning moments.
WASHINGTON — Coach Mike Woodson spoke with Carmelo Anthony for a few minutes after Friday's practice. There was no great significance to the meeting, according to Woodson, who always looks for opportunities to chat with his players. But with Anthony, who has endured more downs than ups this season, Woodson said he felt it was important "just to see where his head was."One of the messages Woodson said he hoped to convey was that it was still early. This has become a mantra of sorts for the Knicks, this notion that they can erase their sluggish, injury-marred start with an unexpected surge.And while Woodson clearly wanted to get things moving in the right direction Saturday night against the Washington Wizards, the Knicks have discovered that quiet conversations do only so much good. Quiet conversations cannot protect the rim. They cannot knock down 3-pointers. And they cannot defend John Wall, a point guard who was at his high-octane best as the Wizards dealt the Knicks a 98-89 loss at Verizon Center."We can't keep losing these games," Amar'e Stoudemire said.The Knicks (3-9) are in a tailspin, having lost five straight, and their coming schedule is not forgiving. Saturday's game was the start of a four-game trip, which will continue Monday when they head west to face the Portland Trail Blazers and their own fleet-footed point guard, Damian Lillard."Flat," Woodson said, offering a one-word synopsis. "We've got to get back to the basics and try to figure out how to put four quarters together."The Knicks struggled to contain Wall, who collected 31 points and 7 assists. He showcased his considerable skills as the Wizards (5-8) asserted themselves early in the second half. After Anthony missed a jump shot, Wall took the ball and rocketed up the court, flying past his teammates and any potential defenders. The Knicks' J. R. Smith was left to grab Wall by the arm and essentially tackle him. Wall made both free throws.The Knicks, meantime, became stagnant on offense after a solid first half. Their ball movement slowed. Their spacing collapsed. The Wizards capitalized on every miscue, outscoring them by 27-17 in the third quarter.When the Knicks inexplicably triple-teamed Bradley Beal on a fast break, Jan Vesely leaked away for an open layup. And when Smith misfired on a pair of free throws, everyone in attendance received a coupon for a free chicken sandwich as part of a fan promotion. It was that kind of night for the Knicks."I'm just trying to stay positive throughout this very tough time right now," said Anthony, who finished with 23 points and 12 rebounds despite being double-teamed whenever he touched the ball. "The game plan was just to get the ball out of my hands and make someone else do it. And they were successful."The Wizards were looking to recover from a loss Friday night to the Toronto Raptors, during which Wall had done everything he could to keep his team involved, scoring a season-high 37 points. Against the Knicks, he faced a smorgasbord of defenders. Beno Udrih, coming off his finest effort of the season in Wednesday's hard-fought loss to the Indiana Pacers, started on him. Smith and Iman Shumpert also took turns. For all three, it was a thankless task."I like everything about him," Woodson said of Wall.Midway through the first quarter, after Andrea Bargnani missed inside, Wall corralled the rebound and pushed the ball up the floor, twisting his way through traffic and all the way to the rim for a layup. The entire sequence took five seconds.It was a dire situation for the Knicks, who have not been known for their top-notch defense this season. Wall made it look softer than usual."He was playing the right way," Wizards Coach Randy Wittman said.The Knicks were missing Raymond Felton, their starting point guard, who sat out his second straight game with what the team described as a sore back. Woodson said it was unclear when Felton would return. "I'm sure when he's ready, he'll let us know," Woodson said.Without Felton — and without Tyson Chandler, sidelined for the indefinite future with a fractured right leg — Woodson once again looked to unearth production from somewhere, anywhere. Anthony has shouldered much of the offensive load this season, and Woodson would prefer for him to have help.On Saturday, Woodson turned to Stoudemire, who has been battling a tight playing-time restriction after off-season knee surgery. For the first time, Woodson extended Stoudemire's minutes to 21 from 15, and Stoudemire took advantage. He sank all five of his shots in the first half, including an emphatic dunk over the Wizards' Garrett Temple, who looked stunned that Stoudemire's surgically repaired knees were still capable of that much pop."He was fantastic," said Woodson, who described Stoudemire as the team's "only bright spot."The Knicks' continuity disappeared after halftime, though. Wall found open teammates. Stoudemire languished in the post. The crowd delighted in food giveaways. And the Knicks, in what has become a familiar scene, were left to talk things over some more.
Louisville's 21st straight win was not what Rick Pitino had hoped it would be.Chris Jones scored 15 points and Montrezl Harrell added 14 points and 12 rebounds to lead the No. 3 Cardinals to a 71-57 victory over Fairfield on Saturday in the Hall of Fame Tip-Off Tournament in Uncasville, Conn.But the Cardinals committed 26 fouls and turned the ball over 14 times against the Stags."Tonight we were just flat in every phase of the game," Pitino said. "We were flat offensively with only nine assists. Our two point guards turned it over eight times, which they haven't been doing. We didn't do the little things necessary to exploit the weaknesses of Fairfield. We were late to the glass a lot. A lot of things were disturbing, but we'll go ahead."Maurice Barrow paced Fairfield with 14 points, and Marcus Gilbert chipped in with 11.Louisville, which has three national titles, will be looking for its 27th title in a regular-season tournament when it faces North Carolina in Sunday's championship game.N. CAROLINA 82, RICHMOND 72 Marcus Paige scored a career-high 26 points and Brice Johnson had a career-high 24 to help No. 24 North Carolina bounce back from its first loss of the season with a win over Richmond in the Hall of Fame Tip-Off Tournament.Cedrick Lindsay scored 29 points for Richmond. MEMPHIS 98, NICHOLLS STATE 59 Austin Nichols scored 20 points to lead five Memphis players in double figures as the No. 11 Tigers defeated visiting Nicholls State.Nichols, a freshman forward, connected on 9 of 15 shots to help Memphis rebound from a 101-80 loss to No. 7 Oklahoma State on Tuesday. Jeremy Smith had 16 points, the only Colonel to reach double figures.WIS. 76, ORAL ROBERTS 67 Frank Kaminsky scored 21 points to lead five Wisconsin players in double figures, helping the No. 12 Badgers hold off Oral Roberts.CREIGHTON 82, TULSA 72 Doug McDermott scored 21 of his 33 points in the second half, Austin Chatman had a career-high 19, and No. 23 Creighton defeated visiting Tulsa.McDermott recorded his 16th career 30-point game. He also became the first Creighton player since Cyril Baptiste in 1969-70 to open a season with four straight 20-point games. Rashad Smith had 21 points for Tulsa.STONY BROOK 67, FLA. ATL. 61 Jamel Warney scored 23 points and grabbed 19 rebounds, and Stony Brook held off Florida Atlantic in Detroit.HOFSTRA 81, HARTFORD 78 Dion Nesmith scored a career-high 27 points, and Hofstra hit enough free throws down the stretch to hold off Hartford in the Hall of Fame Tip-Off Tournament.S. HEART 85, FORDHAM 73 Louis Montes and Tevin Falzon each scored 16 points as Sacred Heart won for the first time this season, defeating host Fordham. Jon Severe scored 23 for Fordham.UCONN 100, MONMOUTH 46 Connecticut Coach Geno Auriemma challenged his perimeter players to make shots. The Huskies responded early and often.Breanna Stewart scored 24 points to lead five players in double figures as top-ranked UConn cruised to a win over visiting Monmouth in the second day of the Hall of Fame Challenge on Saturday.Stewart added 8 rebounds, 6 assists, 4 steals and 2 blocks. It was the third straight game in which she had scored at least 20 points and fourth time she had eclipsed that total. She is averaging 20 points in seven games.The Huskies scored the first 12 points and raced out to a 20-5 lead, making 8 of their first 10 shots, including four 3-pointers."I think we really started strong," Stewart said. "We really wanted to make that our priority, come out and take care of business the first five minutes."The Huskies shot 62 percent in the first half and led by 64-24 at the break. It was the most points in a half by UConn this season, surpassing the previous mark of 62 in the first half against Oregon on Nov. 20. Helena Kurt had 9 points for Monmouth.NOTRE DAME 76, PENN 54 Kayla McBride scored 15 points and Taya Reimer added 14 to lead a balanced offense in No. 5 Notre Dame's win over host Pennsylvania.The game was believed to be the first time a top-five women's team played at the Palestra since Connecticut faced St. Joseph's a decade ago. It was also the Irish's first game at the arena in 32 years. Katy Allen and Sydney Stipanovich each scored 11 for Penn.The contest was Notre Dame's first road game of the season, although it served as a homecoming for Notre Dame Coach Muffet McGraw, who starred a few miles away at St. Joseph's in the late 1970s.STANFORD 63, TEXAS 54 Chiney Ogwumike shook off a poor first half to score 18 points, rallying No. 6 Stanford to a win over Texas in Austin.MARYLAND 90, TOWSON 53 Alyssa Thomas had 15 points and 12 rebounds, and Shatori Walker-Kimbrough and Laurin Mincy added 14 points as No. 8 Maryland defeated host Towson.BAYLOR 92, U.T.S.A. 62 Odyssey Sims scored 28 points, Nina Davis had 14 points and 7 rebounds, and No. 9 Baylor beat Texas-San Antonio.The Lady Bears extended the nation's longest home winning streak to 63.
EL SEGUNDO, Calif. — As Lakers guard Steve Nash speaks in such a clinical manner about nerve root irritation, proper alignment, asymptomatic discomfort and musculature default patterns, listening to him requires a quick reminder that he is a basketball player and not a Pilates instructor.But the truth is, as Nash prepares to turn 40 in February, it is the stretching, pulling and activating of the most ancillary muscles, almost like daily physical therapy, that will determine how he finishes his career."I realize I have about 18 months left of basketball," said Nash, a two-time N.B.A. most valuable player whose contract runs through next season. "I want as much out of this as I can possibly get. I don't know if that's going to be one game or the vast majority of what's left, but I have a long life without basketball, so I don't want to give in too soon."Nash spoke Friday at the Lakers' headquarters, where he was having physical therapy but not working out with his teammates. He has not practiced or played since Nov. 10, when his notoriously balky back seized up. He will not travel with the Lakers when they make a brief East Coast swing that includes a trip to Brooklyn on Wednesday, but the best case calls for his being able to practice when the team returns to Los Angeles next weekend.That is what passes for long-term plans.The Lakers, who are also waiting to see what they will have in Kobe Bryant, 35, when he returns from a ruptured Achilles' tendon, are not the only team that has to make allowances for age.It is a familiar story in New York, where the Knicks ran Jason Kidd into retirement last season, and have Amar'e Stoudemire's immovable contract as a reminder of how quickly a cornerstone can turn into a millstone. This season, the Knicks have been forced to count on point guard Pablo Prigioni, 36, while trying not to wear out the well-worn Tyson Chandler and Metta World Peace, who did not make it through the first month unscathed.And in Brooklyn, the Nets are finding that Kevin Garnett and Paul Pierce may provide veteran leadership and a championship DNA, but so far little else.Pierce and Garnett, like Nash, have had to come to terms with being fragile complements playing fewer minutes. Bryant has said he will walk away from the game when he can no longer be a dominant player."It's difficult," Nash said. "You never are really prepared. Put it this way: If the want and desire to compete is still there, it's difficult to take a step back and realize I can't do that right now, and how can I get back there, if at all? That's a totally different perspective to take when you're still completely committed to playing."I don't give in, but I definitely look in with a little realism and try as hard as possible not to be in complete denial, and that there are things going on and that I am different. I have to try to get as close to my best physically, but I also realize that there's a really small window of error to get there. I think I can get there sometimes. But how can I get there, and sustain that with any sort of consistency?"In the summer of 2012, Nash requested a trade to Los Angeles instead of New York, where he spends much of his summer, or Toronto, where he could return to his native Canada. He saw it as his best opportunity to win a title as well as the closest place to his children in Phoenix.But as much as last season was a disaster for Dwight Howard, who became the face of the Lakers' dysfunction, it was a huge disappointment for Nash. He broke his left leg when he bumped into Portland guard Damian Lillard in the second game of the season. He missed a career-high 32 games, and he missed the final two games in the playoffs as the Lakers were swept by San Antonio. Nash, who was limited by a sore ankle and neck during training camp, said that last season's injury had thrown off his body's alignment.Nash is still a clever passer and manipulates defenses well. But he is increasingly a defensive liability, and his standing as one of the league's most accurate shooters is in question. He has shot 26 percent in six games this season."It's hard to look in the mirror and see you're aging," said Lakers Coach Mike D'Antoni, whose Nash-led offense in Phoenix largely influenced the rest of the league. "Everybody ages. He's just going through a different phase. I would just love for him to be at the level that he was, but we'll just take him well."Nash acknowledged some frustration about his health but dismissed speculation that he was considering retirement. His passion for the game has not waned. It is not clear how good he will be and how much longer he will play. But he has an idea."I feel like if the N.B.A. were kind enough to play once a week," Nash said with a smile, "I'd probably be pretty good."
MINNEAPOLIS — The upper class of college basketball will again be well represented at the Maui Invitational in Hawaii, where many of the game's stars have gathered for decades to show off their early-season stuff.When Syracuse takes the court Monday afternoon, Coach Jim Boeheim will be on the sideline trying to beat an opponent with a familiar name.Except this guy is actually a newcomer to the scene, Richard Pitino, who will go to the tropical showcase with Minnesota and not Providence, Kentucky or Louisville like his father, the Hall of Fame coach Rick Pitino.The younger Pitino, 31, has absorbed as much of his father's coaching wisdom, style and wit as possible over the years growing up with and later working for him. But Richard Pitino has his own major-conference program to run, and the son looks, sounds and coaches a lot like his father."I definitely don't try to get away from it; I embrace it," Richard Pitino said. "People always say, 'How can you live up to your dad?' I'm not trying to do that. The guy has won two national titles. He's been to seven Final Fours. Won over 600 games."After serving as an assistant at Louisville and Florida — under another protégé of his hard-driving father's, Billy Donovan — Richard Pitino became a head coach last season for the first time. He led Florida International to its first winning season in 13 years. Then Minnesota needed a replacement for Tubby Smith, and while his father was leading Louisville to the national title, Richard Pitino was the pick for the Gophers."He obviously knows what he's doing," the junior guard Andre Hollins said. "He's learned from the best."Minnesota is the only Division I program in the state, with some significant success in the 1950s, '70s and '90s. But the Gophers play in what could be the strongest league in the country, the Big Ten, with a charming but dated arena that does not impress teenagers much, and no separate practice facility. Recruiting there is not easy. The state's top two high school seniors recently committed to Stanford and Duke.The son does not run from the father when he is trying to sell prospects on the full-court press and fast-breaking, shoot-often offense he has taken to Minnesota."Tell them to watch the national championship game, because the team that won the national title plays that style," Pitino said. "I believe in the style of play, and it's been proven to win and we're going to hang our hat on it."He is straightforward; an East Coast upbringing does not disappear just because Pitino is now in the Upper Midwest."That's kind of what I've grown up around, working for my dad, working for Billy Donovan," Pitino said. "There wasn't really a lot of mind games. Very, very honest. Very upfront with them. That's the only way, in my opinion, they're going to learn. So I'm not going to tell them what they want to hear. I'm going to tell them what I believe and what they need to work on. I think they like that better."So far, so good. The Gophers will take a 5-0 record into their measuring-stick game against ninth-ranked Syracuse in Maui."He's been real honest with us," the senior forward Austin Hollins said. "He doesn't sugarcoat anything. He tells us the way we need to hear it, and that helps us in the end."That blunt talk does not always mean negative. Smith was frequently critical, especially during losing streaks, and the players have clearly responded to the fresh wave of optimism and encouragement the new coach has brought."Our biggest strength is positivity," the senior guard Maverick Ahanmisi said. "With that, that's going to bring us confidence. I think it's the mentality that the coaching staff really brought in. They've been good to us. We love them to death. We work hard for them. They work hard for us. So it's good team chemistry."Oto Osenieks, a junior forward, has looked like a different player. Buried on the bench last season, he shot less than 30 percent from the floor, including a woeful 2 of 26 from 3-point range. Last week, Osenieks scored 13 points against Coastal Carolina and 14 against Wofford, setting his career high each night."I feel more free," Osenieks said, adding: "Coach Smith, they're both really great coaches. But I can relate more to Coach Pitino because, I guess, he's younger."There's an inherent advantage Pitino has in building that camaraderie. He is less than 10 years older than his upperclassmen. Music, movies, whatever. There is a lot more language in common between this staff and these players than before."He's a real cool guy," Ahanmisi said, smiling. "I wouldn't mind hanging out with him."This, then, is where the son strays from the father."I'm one of the youngest head coaches out there; I think I can use that to my advantage," Pitino said. "I don't think I need to run from it."He added: "Everybody compares me to my dad. It's very simple. He's 61 years old. I'm 31 years old. I don't want to act 61. I want to act 21."
No. 3 Louisville came into Sunday's game with No. 24 North Carolina riding high on a 21-game winning streak.Coach Rick Pitino says he hopes the defending national champions leave with a bit of humility after a 93-84 loss to the Tar Heels in the final of the Hall of Fame Tip-Off tournament in Uncasville, Conn."I think this loss is really good for us tonight," he said. "I think that last year we were one of the most humble teams. To win 16 in a row, you have to have great humility, not get stuck on yourselves. And this type of defense, it was a lack of humility."It was also a lot of Marcus Paige, the Tar Heels' guard, who scored 32 points, putting up a career high for the second straight day in the tournament.DUKE 91, VERMONT 90 Rodney Hood's free throw with five seconds left helped No. 6 Duke dodge visiting Vermont's upset bid and gave the Blue Devils a victory.."They were terrific," Duke Coach Mike Krzyzewski said, "and we were awful."CHARLOTTE 63, MICHIGAN 61 Terrence Williams put back Willie Clayton's miss with 0.4 of a second left, and Charlotte stunned No. 14 Michigan in the championship game of the Puerto Rico Tip-Off in San Juan.GEORGETOWN 84, V.C.U. 80 D'Vauntes Smith-Rivera had 26 points and Georgetown defeated No. 10 Virginia Commonwealth in the fifth-place game of the Puerto Rico Tip-Off in San Juan.OREGON 100, SAN FRANCISCO 82 Elgin Cook scored 18 points to lead No. 17 Oregon to a victory over visiting San Francisco.Kruize Pinkins led the Dons with 20 points and 11 rebounds.NEW MEXICO 79, DAVIDSON 58 Alex Kirk had 16 points and 14 rebounds, and No. 19 New Mexico bounced back from its first loss of the season with a victory over Davidson to take third place at the Charleston Classic in South Carolina.STONY BROOK 104, DETROIT 102 Jameel Warney scored 32 points, pulled in 21 rebounds and hit the go-ahead layup as Stony Brook outlasted Detroit in triple overtime in Detroit.UCONN 88, ST. BONAVENTURE 39 Kiah Stokes scored a career-high 19 points and Stefanie Dolson added 16 points and 15 rebounds to lead top-ranked Connecticut to a win over St. Bonaventure in the final day of the Hall of Fame Classic in Hartford.Gabrielle Richmond led St. Bonaventure with 9 points. U.C.L.A. 82, OKLAHOMA 76 Atonye Nyingifa had career highs of 28 points and 16 rebounds, and host U.C.L.A. upset No. 10 Oklahoma.DUKE 78, MARQUETTE 61 Elizabeth Williams scored 23 points and Alexis Jones added 19 as No. 2 Duke remained undefeated with a nonconference victory over host Marquette.Katie Young had 21 points for the Golden Eagles.TENNESSEE 84, OAKLAND 50 Bashaara Graves had 15 points and 11 rebounds as No. 3 Tennessee rolled to a win over the winless Golden Grizzlies in Nashville. LOUISVILLE 69, FLORIDA STATE 59 Asia Taylor had 6 points in overtime along with an assist that helped No. 4 Louisville defeat visiting Florida State.KENTUCKY 84, MIDD. TENN. 72 Bria Goss scored 16 points and Kastine Evans added 15 as No. 7 Kentucky beat host Middle Tennessee.
Asked early Sunday afternoon to characterize the tone in the Nets ' organization, Billy King was succinct. "It's frustration," he said.King, the team's general manager, rattled off the recent games and noted some positive signs. None he mentioned, though, seemed particularly rousing: a win over the Phoenix Suns, an energetic loss to the Los Angeles Clippers, a decent fourth quarter against the Charlotte Bobcats.Offsetting those have been endless disappointments, and King said the team's lackadaisical loss to the Minnesota Timberwolves on Friday "was probably the most disappointing game of the whole season."By Sunday night, he could have amended that statement. The Nets slouched to a 109-97 defeat to the Detroit Pistons, dropping another ragged game against another unexceptional opponent. It was their fifth straight loss and their eighth in nine games. It sent them plummeting to a 3-10 record.The disquiet around the team translated to plain quiet at Barclays Center. Even the boos sounded halfhearted. "It's very frustrating and very, very embarrassing," said Andray Blatche, a sentiment expressed around the locker room Sunday. "We've got to play with more pride."Jason Kidd, the team's rookie coach, seemed to send a message to his players as the Nets entered the fourth quarter trailing, 78-66. The five players he sent out — Tornike Shengelia, Tyshawn Taylor, Mason Plumlee, Mirza Teletovic and Alan Anderson — were reserves who, with the exception of Anderson, had seen limited time this year."They deserved to play," Kidd said. "I should have let them play the whole game, or the whole quarter. They're playing, you know, for one another."He added, "Those guys are playing hard, and they're helping one another on the offense end and the defensive end."This was not what King and the front office envisioned when they engineered the Nets' glamorous summertime overhaul — one that gave them the league's highest payroll.Kevin Garnett and Paul Pierce, the club's marquee acquisitions, did not re-enter the game until 4 minutes 2 seconds were left. Pierce scored 19 points but shot 5 for 13 from the field. Garnett went 2 for 9 and grabbed nine rebounds. Joe Johnson was the Nets' sole bright spot, scoring a season-high 34 points while going 8 for 10 from behind the 3-point line.The Nets carried a 51-44 lead into halftime but watched it evaporate during a sloppy third quarter. The Pistons, who improved to 5-8, stomped to the basket at will. They outscored the Nets in the paint, 56-22, and outrebounded them, 44-35. The Nets made 18 turnovers, which the Pistons turned into 29 points.The problems were nothing new for the Nets, who have looked disjointed and disengaged all season.The word "championship" was thrown around with abandon during training camp and the preseason. It has hardly been uttered since, and when Kidd mentioned it during his pregame news conference, it sounded odd.Amid myriad issues, the spotlight has inevitably turned toward Kidd. It seems reasonable to wonder, as some observers have, whether this urgent assignment — to produce a championship with an aging and unfamiliar team — could be too lofty for a former player with no coaching experience.Last season, the Nets fired Avery Johnson as coach after 28 mediocre games. On Sunday, King noted the difficulties facing Kidd, stressed patience and mentioned the progress he has observed."He's going through the growing pains of being a head coach, though I think he's being more assertive and understanding more what he's got to do," King said. "But also, it's tough with your two best players out. It's sort of a Catch-22."Those two players, Brook Lopez and Deron Williams, remained sidelined with sprained left ankles. Andrei Kirilenko was out while rehabilitating a strained back muscle, and Jason Terry missed his second straight game with a bruised left knee.Health was always going to be a concern when the Nets assembled their veteran team. King noted that the injuries to Lopez and Williams were unexpected — they turned their ankles during games — but acknowledged the ones to Kirilenko and Terry could be related to age.The Nets' injury list grew after Sunday's game, as Shaun Livingston was examined after banging his head in the fourth quarter. The team said it would not update his condition until Monday.Even the Nets seemed tired of finding excuses for their poor play."No disrespect to Brook or Deron — they're impact players, obviously, and we need them — but they're out right now," Garnett said after the game. "We've somehow got to bind together and hold this fort down — everybody."Until they figure it out, the frustration and disquiet will build.
ERIE, Pa. — On the first shot of his professional basketball career, Chris Smith, the younger brother of J. R. Smith, took a handoff, squared up, dribbled left with a defender on his hip, elevated and fired. The ball clanged off the side of the rim. Beyond the hoop, two inflatable playhouses shook with children bouncing inside.Smith jogged back downcourt, fouled a 3-point shooter and was benched. He did not play the rest of the quarter. Although he finished the game strong, he was not the best player on the court.But he was the only one with a guaranteed N.B.A. contract.That distinction is sure to follow him, now that the Knicks have sent him here to play for the Erie BayHawks, their Development League team, now that he is surrounded by players who want what he has, who are desperate for a chance. It will follow him until he proves himself capable of playing in the N.B.A.Many Knicks fans are not so sure. Their thinking is that Smith was a role player at Louisville, played poorly in the N.B.A. summer league and is on the Knicks' 15-man roster only because of his older brother. With Tyson Chandler out, some fans would rather have an extra big man, like Jeremy Tyler, who is with the BayHawks and recovering from an injury, than a 6-foot-2 combo guard.So Smith arrived last Monday with something to prove, and he was still adjusting to his teammates and the nuances of the offense Thursday, as practice started and Coach Gene Cross walked five BayHawks through a play while everyone else gathered at the baseline. Smith stood off to the side, fidgeting and checking his fingernails.When the group split off to work at either basket, Smith sat courtside and rubbed his face. Tyler, who had joined the team that morning, rotated in at the other end. After 15 minutes or so, Smith got into the drill and clanked his first shot.Then, running up the lane, he turned, squared his shoulders and, again, clank. He set a screen, broke to the short corner, caught and fired. Again, clank.Out of high school, Smith had been considered a fringe player in the Big East. He committed to Seton Hall but was ruled academically ineligible, and he instead played about a season and a half at Manhattan College, where he was the team's second-leading scorer, averaging 13.4 points, as a sophomore.His dream was to play with his brother. To make the N.B.A., he needed a bigger stage. He transferred to Louisville, walked on there, sat out a year and then played two seasons under Coach Rick Pitino. For one year he was on scholarship, and for the other two his older brother helped pay his tuition, as he averaged 9.7 points and started on the 2012 Final Four team.Cross has known Smith well for more than a year. The Knicks signed Smith after he went unpicked in the 2012 N.B.A. draft. Cross helped out at the Knicks' training camp that year, when Smith left early to have knee surgery. Smith spent the next nine months rehabilitating, some of it at the Knicks' facility.He started playing again in late June and, weeks later, shot 22 percent in five games for the Knicks' summer league team. Cross helped coach that team and was there for training camp, after which Smith, 26, was kept on the Knicks' roster.After practice, asked if Smith had the potential to play in the N.B.A., Cross paused and said: "I think he has the potential to work, to continue to grow and make himself a good ballplayer. And whatever situation he finds himself in, I think he can be successful. But you never know which situation any player will find himself in."Behind him, Tyler was taking extra jumpers.Tyler was the last player off the court. He said his right foot, which was operated on in September, felt fine. Cross expected him to play by early December. In the meantime, Tyler said, he was working on moving his feet in the post, playing hard without fouling, being more vocal and mastering defensive schemes.Smith had been in a sour mood that day, having been asked about Brandon Jennings, the Detroit Pistons guard who questioned his ability over Twitter. Smith said he was a good person, that he had "nothing to prove to anybody," that God was on his side and that was all that mattered. He said there was nothing specific he needed to work on; he just needed to play.
CHICAGO — The somber news was delivered in a terse statement from the Chicago Bulls on Monday afternoon. "Earlier this morning, Chicago Bulls guard Derrick Rose underwent successful surgery to repair his previously torn medial meniscus in his right knee," it read."Rose," it added, "is out for the remainder of the season."And so, after missing all of the 2012-13 season while he recovered from a torn anterior cruciate ligament in his left knee, Rose now finds his 2013-14 season over after playing in just 10 games.The blow — to Rose, to his team and to a city in which he is without question the most popular current athlete — is a devastating one and leaves the future of one of the N.B.A.'s youngest superstars in doubt.Rose's two knee injuries came 19 months apart, with both occurring on noncontact plays. In April 2012, Rose's left knee buckled after he drove and planted during the first game of the first round of the playoffs. This time, his right knee gave out as he cut to the basket without the ball in a game in Portland on Friday night.Rose, 25, is now a former most valuable player who has undergone two serious knee operations in an N.B.A. career in which he has played all of 289 games, with 29 more in the postseason. As a result, the Bulls find themselves in a considerable state of uncertainty as they look ahead toward the rest of this season and beyond.Without Rose, Chicago, at least for now, remains a tough-minded playoff contender in a relatively weak Eastern Conference. Last season, the Bulls put on a scrappy, determined performance as they knocked out the Nets in the first round of the playoffs and harassed Miami in the second round, even though Rose was unavailable to play and other players were sick or injured. At this point, the Bulls might have to try the same thing again next spring, with essentially the same group of players. But without Rose, it is hard to see them doing any better than last season."It's devastating," the TNT analyst Steve Kerr said Monday in assessing the impact of Rose's injury on the Bulls. "Everything really was lined up for them this year, and I think most people felt like they could make a great push. Big picture, it throws everything out the window. They may have to totally reshuffle the deck."Indeed, Chicago's nucleus could very well have played its last game together. The All-Star forward Luol Deng will be a free agent next summer. The team could wipe out Carlos Boozer's hefty contract under the amnesty clause.The financial future of the team is heavily invested in Rose, too. The Bulls paid him more than $16 million last year and owe him about $17.6 million this season, less reimbursement from an insurance policy. And there are still three years and more than $60 million remaining on Rose's contract after that.This season was supposed to be Rose's redemption tour. He spoke repeatedly about not just returning to the lineup, but becoming an even more dominant player. He said he was stronger and a better shooter.Still, he started the regular season somewhat slowly, his timing not quite right, the rust not quite gone. Slowly, his quickness began to re-emerge. And then came Friday night.Barring a setback, he should have little trouble returning to form; the difficulty, though, is knowing what that form will be. With so much time missed, with another injury always possible, questions about his confidence on the court may follow him for years."One A.C.L. or one meniscus injury is one thing," Kerr said. "But some guys spend a lot of their careers fighting injuries. When you go three years where he's always getting hurt, you can't help but start to wonder if he's an injury-prone guy."Kerr, though, was not all doom and gloom."On the bright side, he's very young still," Kerr said. "If your glass is half full, he's going to come back at 26 with the meniscus healed and the A.C.L. at full strength."But that's little solace to shellshocked Bulls fans. Rose graduated from Simeon Career Academy on Chicago's South Side in 2007. During pregame introductions at United Center, he is introduced not from his college, Memphis, but from Chicago.That is where Rose will now spend much of this season, doing the long grind of rehabilitation work for the second year in a row.
LOS ANGELES — The Knicks escaped to California on Tuesday, though they were unable to leave their problems behind. A six-game losing streak trailed them to U.C.L.A., where they reviewed film (again) and practiced (again) and tried to unearth solutions (again) ahead of Wednesday's game against the Clippers.For Iman Shumpert, in particular, the season has been an absolute slog, and he may have bottomed out during Monday's 102-91 loss to the Portland Trail Blazers. He logged 0 points, 0 assists and 0 rebounds in 23 minutes, and Coach Mike Woodson sounded more disheartened than upset: "He was just out there." Scenery, in other words.Shumpert, a third-year swingman, is averaging 7.4 points, 4.2 rebounds and 2.5 assists per game, and his lack of production has mirrored the struggles of his team. On Tuesday, Woodson met privately with Shumpert and encouraged him to play with more energy. Shumpert described the conversation as positive."I don't take offense when my head coach comes down on me," Shumpert said. "That's what he's supposed to do. He's supposed to ask for the most out of me and every player on this team. And that's what he's going to continue to do."Not so long ago, Shumpert, 23, was widely considered to have the most upside of any player on the team. It had a lot to do with his performance against the Indiana Pacers in last season's Eastern Conference semifinals. In Game 6, he scored 16 of his 19 points in the third quarter and dragged his teammates along in his wake. Though the Knicks' season ended with a loss, Shumpert's strong effort seemed to portend even brighter moments for him.That has not been the case this time around, at least not yet. His season has been a soap opera. He had an arthroscopic procedure on his left knee over the summer (the same knee he tore as a rookie) and was slowed by a calf strain in training camp. Then came trade talks, with the Knicks shopping Shumpert for frontcourt help.Shumpert still gets asked about his future with the Knicks nearly every day, and while he has said that he tries to block out the distractions — "I'm not old enough to read the newspaper yet," he said — there is little doubt that the topic has worn on him."I just want to play, man," he said. "I just want to win. I know I can't predict the future. I can't say what anybody's going to do, with all the trade rumors that are going on. There's nothing I can do about it. All I can do is play hard."While all this has been playing out, Shumpert's relationship with Woodson has emerged as a public spectacle. It began in training camp, when Woodson declared an open competition between Shumpert and J. R. Smith for a starting role, even though Shumpert excelled as a starter last season and Smith was the league's reigning sixth man of the year.Because of injuries (and Smith's poor play), the competition never panned out. Shumpert has started all 13 games this season.Still, Woodson has been critical of Shumpert's play, and occasional spats on the bench have only fueled speculation of a rift between them. On Tuesday, Woodson was asked about the perception that he was not especially fond of Shumpert. Woodson used a profanity in offering a sharp rebuttal."If I didn't think much of the young man," the coach added, "he wouldn't be playing."As for his meeting with Shumpert, Woodson said: "Is he going to get the message? I think so. I think he's smart and sharp enough to understand where I'm coming from, and we'll just kind of leave it at that. The bottom line is, he's got a job to do just like I do, and I expect him to play at a high level."After the loss to Portland, Shumpert and Amar'e Stoudemire voiced their frustration over what they perceived as a lack of ball movement. Stoudemire declined to offer an explanation for why he felt that was happening, and instead left it to members of the news media to come to their own conclusions."You guys are the professionals at this, man," he said. "My job is to play the game. You guys have to analyze the game. You guys know how it works."Shumpert, on the other hand, was less cryptic and perhaps more optimistic."I feel like the ball is just sticking, and that just comes from frustration, guys just wanting to win, guys wanting to do more on the offensive end," he said.The former N.B.A. player Jon Barry, now an ESPN analyst, said the absence of center Tyson Chandler was looming large. Chandler, who remains sidelined with a fractured right leg, was not only the team's anchor on defense; he also set screens and created space on offense, a necessity for a player like Shumpert, who does not excel at creating his own shots. And Carmelo Anthony, for all his virtues as a scorer, is not known as a top-notch facilitator."When they ran screen and rolls, Tyson was the guy who dove to the rim," Barry said. "Defenders had to respect that, and the guy who would need to help on him might be Iman's guy. Without Tyson, there's no screen-and-roll game anymore. None. It's just not there, and it totally changes the dynamic."Against Portland, Shumpert became just the sixth player since the start of the 2010-11 season to play at least 23 minutes and finish a game without a single point, rebound or assist. After watching tape of the game, Shumpert said he saw room for improvement."I just think I'm thinking too much," he said.
ORLANDO, Fla. — "Hello everybody!" James L. Dolan shouted into the microphone in front of about 100 people who had arrived early at the Amway Center for an Eagles concert.Most of the crowd had never heard of the opening band, J D & The Straight Shot, so Dolan introduced the group. "We're a band from New York City," he said.That much was true. But what Dolan did not mention was that, in addition to being the band's rumble-voiced lead singer, he is the president and chief executive of Cablevision, and the owner of the Knicks.As Dolan's band performed here on Saturday, a night after performing at the American Airlines Arena in Miami, his basketball team, the second-most expensive in the league, was in the midst of another dispiriting loss. The Knicks are a shambling, desultory group these days, stumbling through an opening month that has been worse than even pessimistic fans feared.But as the Knicks fell to the Wizards in Washington and their fans burned, Dolan and his band fiddled through covers of '70s songs like "Let It Roll" and "White Bird.""This is someone wealthy who is having a good time," Randy Sturdevant, a retired electrical contractor, said to his wife during the show. "This is some rich guy's hobby."The band plays a mixture of blues and rock. In 2011, The New York Times' pop music critic, Jon Pareles, described Dolan as a "karaoke-grade singer." Dolan's son, Aidan, plays guitar in the band. But the other band members are seasoned musicians who have played with Bob Dylan, Aretha Franklin and Bon Jovi, among others.Dolan's moonlighting gigs are hardly a secret in the basketball world, although the fact he was playing in N.B.A. arenas this past weekend, and not some small New York club, would probably catch any number of people by surprise, including a lot of people who root for the Knicks. One of those fans, apparently, has hijacked the Wikipedia page for Dolan's band, renaming songs with titles like "Can't Make the Knicks Win," "Wasting Knicks Fans Time," "Reunion with Isiah in Hell" and "Try Selling the Knicks."Dolan has, in fact, recorded a song called "Fix the Knicks," which appeared on the band's 2011 album. It begins with the line: "Everywhere I go, I hear everybody say, What you gonna do to make that team play?"J D & The Straight Shot did not play "Fix the Knicks" on Saturday — perhaps because it would be hard to know where to start.A team that played harmoniously for much of last season in going 54-28 is completely out of sync this time around. The extra pass is not being made, the defense is too often lax. Home-court advantage has been abandoned, with the Knicks having lost their last six games at Madison Square Garden.And the individual headaches are many. Amar'e Stoudemire is owed $45 million through this season and next, but has turned into something of an afterthought because of his damaged knees.Iman Shumpert, a young player who was seen to have a big upside because he can both defend and score, has instead turned into an underperforming mystery and the subject of trade rumors. In Monday's loss to Portland, he failed to register a point, rebound or assist in 23 minutes of action.Tyson Chandler, a rock in the middle for the Knicks, is out indefinitely with a leg injury. Carmelo Anthony, the team's one bona-fide star, will opt out of his contract at the end of the season and could sign elsewhere.All of this has resulted in a disorienting 3-10 record going into Wednesday's game in Los Angeles against the Clippers. The notion that the Knicks might be able to contend for a championship this season already seems far-fetched.In Dolan's long run as the man in charge of the Knicks, the team has never won a title, and has often been inept. But if he has proved hapless at turning the Knicks into a consistently competitive team, he has shown some success in promoting J D & the Straight Shot. He has also appeared willing to flex his corporate muscle to boost the band.One of the band's songs, "Can't Make Tears," has been used in the show "Hell on Wheels," which airs on AMC — a channel controlled by Cablevision. Joe Gayton, one of the show's creators, said Dolan is a huge fan of the show and let it be known he wanted one of his songs featured on it. Gayton and the producers complied. "Can't Make Tears" was also made into a music video, using various scenes from "Hell on Wheels."The band has also opened for Willie Nelson and at other venues for the Eagles. Indeed, the Eagles played a three-night stand at the Garden earlier this month, although J D & The Straight Shot did not perform at those shows.And on Saturday night, Dolan announced from the stage that one of the band's songs would be featured in an upcoming Meryl Streep movie, "August: Osage County."Asked whether Dolan was using his corporate position to promote his band, and whether it was disconcerting for him to be on the road performing while his team was struggling, Barry Watkins, the Garden's executive vice president of communications, responded that The Times was pursuing a "line of unfair questioning.""Everyone has time off of their jobs and spends free time in ways they choose," he said. "We see no reason to comment further."Meanwhile, those in attendance Saturday night, whether they realized who Dolan was or not, seemed to more or less enjoy his band's performance."It was excellent music, and he seems to have a great personality," said Sturdevant, the retired contractor. "Even though you might be able to buy your way onto that stage, the Eagles would still only allow someone good to open for them."As the set wound down, Dolan even told the audience — which by then had grown to several thousand — that they could receive a free CD in return for their email address."We want to thank the Eagles for letting us open up for them," Dolan said. "They're truly gracious and we're truly grateful."
LOS ANGELES — J. R. Smith flew across the lane, the back of his untucked jersey flapping behind him. He was determined to do something Wednesday night to salvage the Knicks' fourth-quarter hopes, and it came in the form of a flat-footed lob that the Clippers' DeAndre Jordan batted away as soon as it left Smith's hand.The sequence was typical of the Knicks' 93-80 loss at Staples Center, where many fine basketball games have been staged in recent years. This was not one of them. The Clippers, without the services of Chris Paul for much of the second half, gave the Knicks ample chances to feel good about themselves again. They squandered them all.It was the seventh straight loss for the Knicks (3-11), who are missing shots and grasping for solutions."The easiest thing for us to do is just to crumble right now," Carmelo Anthony said. "We are in a dark space, and we got to get out of this."In his postgame session with the news media, Anthony used the phrase "I don't know" seven times. Typical was his response when asked about what had gone wrong in the second half: "I don't know. I don't know. I really don't know, to be honest with you."All this might sound familiar, since the Knicks have used similar language throughout the meat grinder that has been the month of November. After Monday's loss to the Portland Trail Blazers, for example, Amar'e Stoudemire said his frustration was at an "all-time high." It was unclear how he felt after Wednesday's game. He left the locker room without taking questions, as did Kenyon Martin, who simply shook his head as he headed out the door. "It won't be pleasant," he said.Anthony indicated that the team had aired out some feelings immediately after the game, though he declined to get into specifics."We talked," he said. "Everybody talked. The players had a meeting, the coaches. Everybody had a meeting after the game. It wasn't really a meeting. It was just, we had to talk. We're trying to figure it out together."At some point, all the talk wears thin. A major problem, Coach Mike Woodson said, is that his players cannot make shots with any semblance of consistency. The Clippers (11-5) offered them open looks, especially along the perimeter, and the Knicks went 3 of 20 from 3-point range.That was especially true in the fourth quarter, when the Knicks managed 12 points on 6-of-19 shooting. They shot 38.6 percent over all.Anthony finished with 27 points and 9 rebounds as he once again cracked the 40-minute barrier. Andrea Bargnani had one of his finer efforts of the season, collecting 20 points and 10 rebounds while helping to limit the Clippers' Blake Griffin to 15 points.It was a bleak night for everyone else, however, and the Knicks' bench was particularly ineffective. After Raymond Felton cut the Clippers' lead to 59-58 in the third quarter with a 3-pointer, Stoudemire replaced Martin. The Clippers promptly went on a 12-3 run that Griffin capped with a dunk.In Stoudemire's 20 minutes of playing time, the Clippers outscored the Knicks by 29 points. Hampered by his balky knees, Stoudemire finished with 4 points and 4 rebounds. "It's not always going to go Amar'e's way," Woodson said.It has been an unforgiving schedule for the Knicks, who arrived in Los Angeles after facing two of the league's best point guards: the Washington Wizards' John Wall and the Blazers' Damian Lillard. Felton did not play in either game because a hip injury, and Wall (31 points, 7 assists) and Lillard (23 points, 6 assists) enjoyed almost unfettered access to the basket.The Knicks have not made a habit of defending point guards, and Paul loomed as the biggest threat yet. But when he disappeared to the locker room late in the third quarter with a strained right hamstring, it looked like a break for the Knicks. Instead, the Clippers outscored them by 3 points the rest of the way.One of the great aggravations for Woodson is that the Knicks have shown glimpses of what they were last season — and what they could be again. Perhaps. Such was the case in the first half, as crisp cuts and sharp passes helped the Knicks build a 21-13 lead.The Knicks, though, are not prone to making things easy on themselves. Their entire season has been a chore, and the Clippers, with their fast-break offense and Cirque du Soleil dunks, embarked on a 30-10 run. The lane was an open freeway, and the Clippers did most of their damage with Paul on the bench. The Knicks entered the game with the league's second-worst defensive rating, according to Basketball-Reference.com, and their soft spots were exposed.But then, with the Knicks on the brink of being blown out, the unexpected: they worked themselves back into contention with 13 unanswered points that turned a 40-29 deficit into a 42-40 lead. Anthony and Bargnani combined for 9 points during the stretch.Any chemistry and continuity evaporated over the course of the second half, and the Knicks were left with familiar issues to address: ball movement and spacing, shooting and defense. Pick a problem, any problem. The Knicks are at a loss.
The tumbling Nets lost again, but this time, at least, the defeat came through bizarrely entertaining means.The Nets fell behind by 27 points during a disastrous first half, and fans at Barclays Center were soon chatting away, losing interest, as if watching some unknown opening act at a concert. Gradually, the Nets awakened, catalyzed by Mirza Teletovic, a scarcely used reserve forward, who scored a career-high 17 points to put them on the verge of an unthinkable win.And then came a shadowy incident involving a dark liquid.After all this, the Brooklyn crowd was pulsating, primed for a cathartic burst. Instead, the Nets slumped to a 99-94 loss against the Los Angeles Lakers, watching their record spiral further, to 4-11."The Lakers came out, and they hit us right off the bat," Coach Jason Kidd said. "But the guys kept fighting."Teletovic scored 14 points in the fourth quarter, and Alan Anderson dunked with 9.8 seconds remaining to cut the Lakers' lead to 95-94.But it appeared that the Nets would require some type of supernatural intervention to prevail — and Kidd seemed to take it upon himself to provide it in sketchy, if admirably clever, means. With 8.3 seconds left on the clock, Jodie Meeks sank his first of two free throws, pushing the Lakers' lead to 96-94.As Meeks was preparing to shoot his second free throw, Tyshawn Taylor and Kidd collided clumsily near the Nets' bench, and a drink tumbled from Kidd's hands and onto the floor. The game was paused for several seconds while the liquid was wiped up, and during that time the assistant coach John Welch sketched out a final play for the Nets, who had no timeouts left.It seemed too fortuitous to be true — and perhaps it was. Television replays appeared to show Kidd mouthing the phrase "Hit me," before averting his eyes and running into Taylor. After the game, Kidd blamed the commotion around the bench as he scrambled to try to substitute players into the game."Sweaty palms," Kidd said. "I was never good with the ball."Taylor, too, denied there was any gamesmanship — though he did acknowledge the possible helpful ramifications."It might ice a free-throw shooter and be a timeout when you don't have one," Taylor said. "But that wasn't the thought process."Taylor laughed and added: "He was just in my way. 'Coach, get out of my way, bro!' "After Meeks made his second free throw, Paul Pierce came off a screen with 2.2 seconds left and had an open look at a potential game-tying 3-pointer. But it missed, foiling Kidd's apparent gambit.The Nets were in that position thanks to Teletovic, who exceeded 20 minutes on the floor for just the second time this season and added five rebounds, two assists, a steal and a block to his career-high point total."I can really do much more things than just shoot 3-pointers," said Teletovic, who sank four of them. "This is what we need, and this is what I try to bring every night, as much as I can."The Nets outscored the Lakers, 28-23, during the third quarter, which augured well for the home team. Entering Wednesday, the Nets had won all four games in which they had outscored their opponents during the third quarter and lost all 10 times they were outscored. But the trend did not hold up Wednesday.The Lakers extended their winning streak against the Nets to 11 games. The understaffed Lakers — playing without Kobe Bryant and Steve Nash — have survived this season on 3-point shooting, and it was an ominous sign for the lifeless Nets when the Lakers opened the game hitting their first three attempts from beyond the arc.The Lakers' dominance bled seamlessly into the second quarter. They went up as much as 27 points — though the Nets did engineer a 15-0 run that helped them cut the deficit to 14 points entering halftime.The Nets' immediate future remains murky. They are playing short-handed, missing four key players, and there has been little indication about when they might return."They're day to day," Kidd said before the game, using words he has repeated almost indiscriminately this season. "These are injuries that, they can come back anytime. So we just take it day by day, and we'll see how they feel tomorrow."Brook Lopez missed his seventh consecutive game and Deron Williams his fourth; both players are battling sprained left ankles. The Nets were also without the backups Jason Terry, who missed his fourth straight game with a sore left knee, and Andrei Kirilenko, who skipped his ninth consecutive game with a sore back.Without them, the Nets pulled out all the stops, some shadier than others, and got a stirring game from a rarely used reserve, but still fell short on a wild night.
LOS ANGELES — As J. J. Redick moved from spot to spot along the perimeter, he had a number in mind: 106. It never changes. He caps every pregame shootaround with a routine that requires him to make 106 shots at a series of locations, most of them from beyond the 3-point arc, and he was at it again as he prepared on Wednesday morning for the Clippers ' game against the Knicks later that night.There was a hypnotic rhythm to the whole enterprise: catch, release, swish.Redick, a 6-foot-4 guard long known as one of the N.B.A.'s most adept long-range marksmen, drilled 29 of 30 3-pointers in one stretch at the Clippers' training gym. He finished 106 of 113 over all, which was good for 93.8 percent. The workout met his exacting standards."Whenever you do a shooting drill, you want to shoot 80 percent," Redick said. "That's always the goal. I never really count shots, though. I only count makes."As the Knicks tumbled to their seventh straight loss, Redick again played his part for the Clippers in their 93-80 victory at Staples Center. He had another solid performance in a season full of them, finishing with 15 points as he went 3 of 7 from 3-point range. He stretched the defense and helped the Clippers build a lead.In the process, Redick threw into sharp relief the Knicks' season-long frustrations with their own shooting. They were 3 of 20 from 3-point range against the Clippers, which was worse than usual — but not by much. Heading into Friday's game against the Denver Nuggets, the Knicks are 25th in the league in 3-point proficiency, at 32 percent."We had good looks," Coach Mike Woodson said. "We're just not making shots."One must presume that the Knicks (3-11) practice their shooting. It is not particularly windy inside these arenas. Their sneakers are not made of cement. So Woodson has been at a loss to explain their troubles, which have been even more glaring given their success last season, when they set N.B.A. records for 3-point attempts and makes.With similar personnel this season (they lost Jason Kidd and Steve Novak, but added Andrea Bargnani), the Knicks are sinking 3.1 fewer 3-pointers per game. Their lack of production has come at a cost. They rank 27th in scoring, averaging 92.2 points, and Woodson has repeatedly mentioned 3-point shooting as the primary culprit.No player has labored more than J. R. Smith, who had knee surgery over the summer and was suspended for the first five games of the season for violating the league's drug policy. He has not found his form, with an average of 11.2 points and with 32.2 percent shooting, including 30.4 percent from 3-point range."We're not running," he grumbled, blaming his poor shooting on the team's lack of transition offense.The Clippers, on the other hand, are off to an 11-5 start under Coach Doc Rivers, who left the Boston Celtics for Los Angeles over the summer. Redick was one of his first recruiting targets. Rivers knew he needed a shooter who could use screens and force post defenders to help out on the perimeter."It creates an offense in itself," said Rivers, who convinced Redick to agree to a sign-and-trade after he spent the latter half of last season with the Milwaukee Bucks.The value of dependable 3-point shooting cannot be overstated. With the Clippers, Redick is playing much the same role that Ray Allen did when he was in Boston. Allen left for the Miami Heat before the start of last season, and the Celtics struggled without him."I didn't realize how important Ray was to us until he was gone," Rivers said.At the same time, Redick has worked to become a more complete player. When he joined the Orlando Magic as a first-round pick out of Duke in 2006, he was known as a spot-up shooter. Stan Van Gundy, who became the team's coach the following season, preached the virtues of pick-and-roll sets."So I said, 'All right, I got to get better in pick-and-rolls,' " Redick said.Jacque Vaughn, who replaced Van Gundy in Orlando, emphasized cutting without the basketball. So Redick focused on his movement.He continued to accumulate skills, adapting to every situation along the way. His scoring has increased every season since 2008. He has also gained strength and improved his defense. He is no longer one-dimensional."He has that reputation as a shooter," the Clippers' Jared Dudley said, "but he's a tough kid. He doesn't get pushed around."With the Clippers, Redick's basketball journey has come full circle. He is back to largely operating as a spot-up shooter, and he spends time honing his craft. On Sunday nights, he likes to swing by the training facility to put up shots by himself. During one recent session, he made 39 consecutive 3-pointers."It takes a lot of hard work," Redick said. "There's nothing easy about it."Unlike the Knicks, he just makes it look that way.
Jason Kidd 's drink-spilling tactic late Wednesday night was considered both devious and ingenious. By Thursday, it had also proved costly.The N.B.A. hit Kidd with a $50,000 fine for "intentionally spilling a drink on the floor" when there were 8.3 seconds remaining in the Nets' loss to the Los Angeles Lakers at Barclays Center.With his team trailing and lacking an official timeout, Kidd bumped into one of his players while holding a beverage. The liquid — which he later revealed was a Coca-Cola — spilled onto the court, granting the Nets a few precious moments to draw up one final play while the mess was mopped up.Paul Pierce found himself open with 2.2 seconds left to try for a game-tying 3-pointer, but he missed, ensuring the Nets would fall to 4-11.The extent of the trickery was revealed on television replays, which showed Kidd appearing to mouth the words "Hit me" to Tyshawn Taylor, a reserve point guard, before the two collided near the Nets' bench.Kidd and Taylor denied after the game that there was any deceitful intent. "Sweaty palms," Kidd said after the game. "I was never good with the ball."Kidd, who retired earlier this year from a decorated 19-year playing career, has come under scrutiny during his first season as a coach. The Nets, while battling injuries, have performed beneath expectations.Kidd was often praised for his quick mind on the court, and his soda strategy was a new, and rather expensive, example of it.
DENVER — The fans at the Pepsi Center booed Carmelo Anthony during pregame introductions. They booed him when he brought the ball up the court. They booed nearly every move he made on Friday night, with the notable exception of his missed shots. The crowd loved those.Anthony's final miss came at the buzzer, a 14-foot fadeaway along the right baseline that fell several inches short of the basket. It was one final indignity for Anthony as the Nuggets escaped with a 97-95 win over the Knicks, who continue to dig their way to new depths.The Knicks (3-12) absorbed their eighth straight loss, their four-game trip ending with more of the same: more poor shooting, more defensive lapses, more disappointment. They played with improved effort, a four-letter word around the locker room over the past several weeks. But even that was not enough."I didn't get it done," said Anthony, who finished with 27 points on 8-of-22 shooting against his former team. "I think we did everything coming down the stretch to win the basketball game. I didn't pull it through for us, and that's on me."The Knicks were desperate to break out of their funk by any means necessary. They looked for fast-break opportunities. Iman Shumpert played with improved energy. Coach Mike Woodson even ditched his necktie."We have to keep grinding," he said. "We have to stay the course."The Knicks had opportunities. Denver shot just 5 of 15 from the field in the third quarter but still led by 8 heading into the fourth.Tim Hardaway Jr. came off the bench to give the Knicks a late lift, sinking a pair of 3-pointers. The Knicks later scrambled for a loose ball that found its way to Andrea Bargnani (22 points), who was fouled and sank both free throws, trimming the Nuggets' lead to 85-83.And while it looked like the Knicks were once again on the brink of collapse when the Nuggets' Randy Foye drilled a 3-pointer to build a 9-point lead, they refused to go away. Raymond Felton connected on a 3-pointer, and Shumpert got loose for a layup that cut the lead to 96-95 with 19.7 seconds left.After Ty Lawson converted 1 of 2 free throws for the Nuggets, Anthony took a pass in the post and tried to find separation against Foye, who pressured Anthony into taking a tough shot. It was no good. The buzzer sounded. The crowd went bananas."I did what I wanted to do, at a spot I wanted to get to," said Anthony, who refused to say whether he felt he had been fouled. "I don't know."Lawson led the Nuggets (9-6) with 22 points, and Foye added 17.Nobody at the arena was going to let Anthony forget the circumstances of his departure from the Nuggets, specifically the trade he demanded in February 2011. Friday's game was only his second trip back to Denver since he joined the Knicks, and he anticipated that the atmosphere would be slightly less vitriolic than it was when he returned the first time."I think for the most part things have calmed down a little," he said.When Anthony played here last March, the game was an unmitigated disaster for the Knicks. Anthony was laboring with a right knee injury but opted to play anyway. It turned out to be a mistake. He scored 9 points in 22 minutes as the Knicks got blown out. Fans capped the festivities by chanting, "Who needs Melo?"Anthony made an early exit, had his knee drained and missed the team's next three games."I should have just sat out that game, but I was being a little naïve," Anthony said before Friday's game. "I wanted to come back and play here, that first time, that experience."As far as experiences go, Anthony has not relished his latest one. He reiterated that the Knicks lack chemistry. He cited an absence of leadership, the type that Jason Kidd (now spilling drinks in Brooklyn), Rasheed Wallace (now an assistant with the Detroit Pistons) and Kurt Thomas (now 41 years old) provided last season.The Knicks' offense has been a wheezing jalopy, their fast-break opportunities few and far between. It has become a major hindrance, with the team leaning on Anthony to produce in slow-motion isolations. Against the Nuggets, they appeared determined to push the pace for a change.While the Knicks' intentions were good, the strategy sometimes left them vulnerable in transition. The Nuggets' J. J. Hickson had back-to-back dunks in the first quarter — the first after Lawson drove by Felton as if he were a lamppost and slipped a pass to Hickson, the second after Foye misfired on a jumper and Hickson jammed the put-back. Nobody had bothered to box him out.Andre Miller capped the first quarter for the Nuggets by launching a 27-footer at the buzzer that caromed high off the back of the rim before falling through the basket. It was an improbable shot, and the Knicks were already down by 10 points — a trend this season."We're playing in spurts," Woodson said, "and we got to get it to where we're not playing catch-up basketball."The Knicks were 1 of 11 from 3-point range in the first half, en route to a 51-45 deficit. It could have been worse, but the Knicks were at least managing to take care of the ball (two turnovers) and Bargnani was doing his part on offense.The Knicks' recent mantra has been that one game — one win — has the potential to change everything. They had their chances against the Nuggets. The wait continues.Tyson Chandler, sidelined since Nov. 5 with a broken right leg, has yet to resume basketball activities, and Coach Mike Woodson said Chandler was at least a couple of weeks from returning. The Knicks are 2-9 without him. Chandler said he had not had any setbacks in his rehabilitation. "Still looking on schedule," he said, "but I don't know what that schedule is."
It was billed as a matchup between Duke 's Jabari Parker and Arizona's Aaron Gordon, top prospects on top teams meeting in a sort of preamble to a rivalry between budding talents.Where Parker and Gordon might eventually meet again — very likely in the N.B.A. — hardly clouded the story line Friday in prime time at Madison Square Garden.Ultimately, though, experience guided the No. 4 Wildcats to a 72-66 win, with Arizona helped but not carried by the performance of Gordon, who scored 8 of his 10 points in the final 12 minutes.Parker (19 points) came up just shy of becoming the first freshman in the last 10 years to score at least 20 points in his first eight games. But he, too, never grabbed the starring role that was forecast for him."They are a veteran team, except for Gordon," Duke Coach Mike Krzyzewski said. "That's why they are ahead."Arizona (7-0) used a 20-5 second-half run to outlast the No. 6 Blue Devils, who shot 35.7 percent from the field after halftime. Duke (6-2) was also 4 of 14 from the 3-point line and had a hard time against the Wildcats' long and physical front line, which outscored Duke in the paint with 15 second-chance points.PENN STATE 89, ST. JOHN'S 82 Tim Frazier scored 6 of his game-high 29 points in overtime to lead Penn State over St. John's in the second game of the Barclays Center Classic. The Nittany Lions will play Mississippi in the championship game Saturday afternoon. D'Angelo Harrison scored 20 points to lead St. John's, which will meet Georgia Tech in the consolation game. (AP)MICH. ST. 98, MT. ST. MARY'S 65 Keith Appling came off the bench to score 17 points as top-ranked Michigan State (7-0) beat visiting Mount St. Mary's. (AP)OKLAHOMA STATE 69, BUTLER 67 Marcus Smart scored 17 points as No. 5 Oklahoma State (7-0) survived a scare against Butler in an Old Spice Classic semifinal in Lake Buena Vista, Fla. (AP)OHIO STATE 99, N. FLORIDA 64 LaQuinton Ross broke out of a frigid shooting spell by scoring 17 points, and No. 7 Ohio State (6-0) rode a 19-point first-half run to a victory over North Florida in Columbus. (AP)LOUISVILLE 69, S. MISSISSIPPI 38 Chris Jones came off the bench to score 18 points, and No. 9 Louisville bounced back from its first loss to roll past Southern Mississippi at home. (AP)OREGON 85, PACIFIC 62 Mike Moser scored 19 points as the No. 14 Ducks won at home. Oregon scored 20 straight points after halftime to break open a close game. Pacific led, 36-29, after the break but then went nearly seven minutes without scoring. (AP)FLORIDA 67, FLORIDA STATE 66 Dorian Finney-Smith made a free throw with 1.3 seconds left, lifting No. 15 Florida to a victory in Gainesville. (AP)MEMPHIS 76, L.S.U. 69 Austin Nichols scored 19 points, Chris Crawford had 17, and No. 21 Memphis beat Louisiana State in a semifinal at the Old Spice Classic. Joe Jackson added 16 points for Memphis (4-1), which will play Oklahoma State in Sunday's championship game. (AP)MICHIGAN 87, COPPIN STATE 45 Playing without its leading scorer, Nik Stauskas, No. 22 Michigan found plenty of offensive firepower to rout Coppin State in Ann Arbor. The freshman Zak Irvin matched his career high of 10 points by halftime, and finished with 24 points. (AP)DUKE 97, CENTRAL MICHIGAN 64 Tricia Liston scored 15 of her 20 points in the first half and added 11 rebounds to lead No. 2 Duke to a win at the Paradise Jam in St. Thomas, Virgin Islands. (AP)
NEW YORK — Willie Cauley-Stein had 15 points, eight rebounds and a career-high nine blocks to lead No. 3 Kentucky to a 79-65 victory over Providence on Sunday night at Barclays Center.James Young scored 18 points and Aaron Harrison added 15 for the Wildcats (7-1), who shot 64.3 percent from the field (27 of 42) and led by as many as 17 points in the second half.Bryce Cotton had 23 points for the Friars (7-2), who finished 10 of 19 (52.6 percent) from 3-point range. They came into the game shooting just 29.4 percent from beyond the arc and were averaging only five 3s per game.Kentucky, which had the majority of the crowd of 8,086 cheering for it, also had an exceptional game from 3-point range. The Wildcats were 6 of 8 from beyond the arc, decidedly better than the 28.9 percent they were shooting from there entering the game.
LAKE BUENA VISTA, Fla. — Shaq Goodwin had 17 points, Joe Jackson hit four key late free throws and No. 21 Memphis beat No. 5 Oklahoma State 73-68 Sunday night in the championship game of the Old Spice Classic.In the first meeting this season between the Top 25 teams on Nov. 19, Oklahoma State won handily over Memphis, getting 39 points from Smart in a 101-80 victory.Smart turned the ball over with Oklahoma State trailing by one with 11 seconds left, and fouled Jackson, who made two free throws to make it 71-68.Oklahoma State's bid to tie it ended when Smart had another turnover in the final seconds and Jackson connected on two more free throws as Memphis took a 73-68 lead.Chris Crawford scored on a layup and later added a free throw to put Memphis up 69-64 with 2½ minutes left. Smart, who missed 9 of his first 11 shots, had consecutive baskets that pulled the Cowboys within 69-68 with 2 minutes to play.Michael Dixon Jr. hit a jumper and 3-pointer as Memphis went ahead 56-52 with 8 minutes remaining.Memphis scored the first seven points in the second half, including a 3-point play by Goodwin, to cut its deficit to 42-39.After Memphis' Geron Johnson was given a technical foul, Phil Forte made two free throws and added a 3-pointer to make it 47-39.Forte had nine of 19 points as Oklahoma overcame a six-point deficit to take a 42-32 lead at halftime. Smart had two of his five points during the opening 20 minutes on a layup and Brian Williams had a rebound basket during the final minute to give the Cowboys a 10-point advantage.Oklahoma State saw comfortable leads disappear in both of its two previous games at the tourney. The Cowboys let a 23-point halftime lead dwindle to four with 3 minutes to play before beating Purdue 97-87 Thursday, and then escaped with a 69-67 victory over Butler one day later after taking a 44-30 halftime advantage.Goodwin scored 11 first-half points, including a jumper that put Memphis up 21-15 10 minutes into the game.
Perry Ellis scored 15 of his 19 points in the second half, and No. 2 Kansas survived a stiff challenge from Texas-El Paso in a 67-63 victory Saturday night in the third-place game of the Battle 4 Atlantis on Paradise Island, Bahamas.Wayne Selden Jr. had 14 points for the Jayhawks (6-1), who never trailed and won even though the freshman Andrew Wiggins was held to 6 points, nearly 10 below his season average.McKenzie Moore scored 15 points for UTEP (4-4), making three free throws with 6.8 seconds remaining that trimmed the Miners' gap to 3.It was the second straight night that Kansas had a big early lead — 11-2 against Villanova and 15-2 against UTEP — that evaporated as the game turned into a struggle.The finish was frantic, with the Miners scoring 13 points in just over a minute, but Kansas held on.If UTEP, which held Kansas to 39 percent shooting from the field, had been better from the free-throw line, the result might have been different: The Miners missed 10 of their 24 attempts in the game.In the opening minutes, Coach Tim Floyd and the Miners ran something akin to North Carolina's old four-corners offense, running an average of 30.1 seconds off the 35-second shot clock on their first nine possessions. The logic was simple: The fewer possessions Kansas had, the fewer chances it would have to score.The strategy only sort of worked. After five and a half minutes, Kansas had 2 points. UTEP had 0.In the seventh-place game, with Southern California trailing by 5 points midway through the first half, Coach Andy Enfield, seeing that a play was falling apart, shouted and signaled for a timeout.His pleas were somehow not acknowledged by either his players or the referees, however, and the Trojans (5-3) scored on the play to start a 31-11 run that helped them beat Xavier (5-3), 84-78."It felt kind of like practice," Pe'Shon Howard, who scored 23 points for the Trojans, said of the big run.OREGON 91, NORTH DAKOTA 76 Oregon's Joseph Young scored 23 points, and the No. 14 Ducks beat North Dakota (2-3) on their home floor in the Global Sports Hardwood Challenge, improving their record to 6-0 and extending their best start since the 2006-7 season.Young, a junior transfer who was Houston's leading scorer last season, has scored in double figures in all of Oregon's games this season.ST. JOHN'S 69, GEORGIA TECH 58 St. John's was trailing by 19-4 just over 12 minutes into its game against Georgia Tech. But just as they did against Penn State on Friday, the Red Storm rallied to draw even, and this time, they pulled away for a victory in the third-place game of the Barclays Center Classic.D'Angelo Harrison scored 21 points for St. John's (5-2), which used a 24-2 run in the second half to take control and offset its 89-82 overtime loss to the Nittany Lions.Harrison was 12 of 13 from the free-throw line, where St. John's enjoyed a big advantage: The Red Storm attempted 35 free throws, making 27, compared with 14 for the Yellow Jackets, who made 12.Robert Carter Jr. and Trae Golden each had 9 points for Georgia Tech (5-3), which took a 46-36 lead with 13 minutes 4 seconds to play on a layup by Daniel Miller.That was the team's last field goal for 11:39, though, as St. John's went on the big run. Before the drought ended, on an offensive rebound by Miller with 1:25 to play, Georgia Tech missed 13 shots from the field, committed eight turnovers and went 4 for 4 from the free-throw line.In the tournament's title game, Marshall Henderson and Jarvis Summers each scored 19 points, combining for 11 of Mississippi's last 12 points, as the Rebels beat Penn State, 79-76.Henderson gave the Rebels (6-0) the lead for good on a drive with 5:36 to play that made the score 69-68.Newbill had 23 points to lead Penn State (6-2), which had a five-game winning streak snapped.In the tournament's final game, played at Monmouth, Deon Jones scored 27 points, and the Hawks (3-4) ran away from North Carolina A&T (2-5) in the second half.
MEMPHIS — While the Nets have tried to correct their early-season tailspin, they have hesitated to use injuries too often as an excuse. In professional sports, it can be considered unbecoming to do so.But the importance to the Nets of center Brook Lopez, who missed seven games this month with a sprained left ankle, was plain to see Saturday as they notched a 97-88 victory against the Memphis Grizzlies at FedEx Forum.In his second game back, Lopez muscled to the basket repeatedly down the stretch, taking control to ensure they would not fall to a third straight defeat. He finished the game with 20 points and 9 rebounds and, more important, gave the Nets, who improved to a still unsightly 5-12, some indication that better days could be ahead."We've got somebody we can go to at the end of the game to close the game for us, and that's key," forward Andray Blatche said of Lopez. "That's been one of our downfalls."The Nets were fortunate to encounter a depleted Memphis team, which was without forward Zach Randolph, who was ruled out just before the game because of an ingrown toenail, and center Marc Gasol, who sprained his left medial collateral ligament just over a week ago.Regardless, the Nets were encouraged by how they responded to late adversity.The Nets held a 13-point lead as the third quarter wound down. But Quincy Pondexter scored 5 points to close the quarter and then the Grizzlies' next 9 points during the fourth, going on a personal 14-2 run against the Nets to cut the deficit to a point.But the Nets, for once, did not break. Mirza Teletovic hit the next two shots — a 5-foot leaner and a straightaway 3-pointer — to restore the Nets' lead to 6. Then Kevin Garnett blocked Kosta Koufos's hook-shot attempt, punching the air twice and screaming as he ran down the court.About two and a half minutes later, Lopez made two baskets from close range, and the Nets' lead was back to 10.The Grizzlies called a timeout, and the Nets could take a satisfied breath, their first in a while. Lopez scored 12 points in the fourth quarter and afterward earned raves from his teammates."Brook's huge, man," said Garnett, who had one of his best all-around games as a Nets player. "I've been on his bandwagon since I got here, since I witnessed it firsthand."The Nets came to Memphis having lost 8 of 10 games and were desperate for a turnaround.Coach Jason Kidd gave Tyshawn Taylor, a second-year point guard, his first career start one night after he recorded career high totals for minutes played (36:15), points (16) and assists (12) during the Nets' blowout loss to the Houston Rockets.Going to the bench was Shaun Livingston, who had handled the starting point guard duties during Deron Williams's injury-filled start to the season. Livingston had played admirably but seemed to fade recently."It's not fair for Shaun that we've asked him to do a lot," Kidd said. "We've leaned on Shaun, so we're trying to get him some rest, so he can be fresh."The Nets were desperate to avoid another sluggish first quarter, a shortcoming that doomed them their previous two games. Kidd benched four of his starters for the entire second half on Friday, which sent a message to his players about what he thought of their effort.Joe Johnson was the first to tackle the task, scoring 16 points in the opening quarter to give the Nets an early lead. He finished with 26 points to lead the Nets, and added six assists and five rebounds."Some of us, man, we have to look in the mirror," Johnson said. "As the coaching staff said, they don't think we're giving it our all or we're not playing hard. Everybody has to check themselves."The second quarter belonged to Blatche, a reserve forward whose dynamism and improvisation are alternately praised and lamented — usually depending on the end result. It was positive from the start on Saturday, as he recorded 12 points, 7 rebounds, an assist, a block and a steal before halftime. Blatche finished with 21 points, putting his imprint on the game before Lopez made it his own.Paul Pierce did not play Saturday because of a bruised right hand.
DENVER — The mood lifted in the Knicks ' locker room after Friday night's game here. Raymond Felton said that they had "turned this thing around." Carmelo Anthony said he could sense "the trust in one another out there." J. R. Smith seemed relieved that the Knicks were "getting over the hump."But the Knicks did not win. They lost to the Nuggets, 97-95, in crushing fashion, as Anthony's attempt at a buzzer-beating, game-tying jumper was an air ball. In other words, the result was merely more of the same for this ragtag crew at the Pepsi Center.But when things go bad — and they have gone bad for the Knicks — the standard by which a team judges itself becomes skewed, warped, myopic. Once upon a time (four weeks ago), the Knicks had championship aspirations, or at least that was the company line.The season has not gone as planned, and the struggles have become so all-consuming that the players have been reduced to taking solace in the quality of their losses. There are now good losses and bad losses, and in fairness to them, they have been left with little else by which to assess their progress."When you go out and play like we did tonight, we competed, so there's no reason for us to hang our heads," Anthony said after Friday's game, which concluded an empty four-game trip. "We lost, and that's a bitter feeling, but we want to get better, and I think tonight we took a step forward."Winning is but a threadbare memory for the Knicks (3-12), who have lost eight straight games, their longest stretch of futility since 2010, when they were shedding salaries in a failed bid to lure LeBron James to Madison Square Garden. The team's rotation included such luminaries as Sergio Rodriguez and Eddie House.The difference this season is that the Knicks are actually trying to win games. Their bloated payroll is the second highest in the league. Only the Nets are spending more, and their season has been just as much of a mudslide. One of these teams has to win next Thursday's game in Brooklyn, but only because it is in the rules.During the Knicks' four-game trip, the Knicks shot 42 percent from the field, including 30.2 percent from 3-point range, and scored 88.8 points per game. It was a microcosm of a season in which they have shot 41.9 percent from the field (which ranked 27th in the league before Saturday's games), including 31.7 percent from 3-point range (26th), while scoring 92.4 points per game (25th). Their defense has not been especially stout, either.When the Knicks left New York last weekend, their hope was that it would provide them an opportunity to unearth some chemistry — a nebulous concept in sports, but one that the Knicks have cited often. Anthony said the team had great chemistry last season, when they won the Atlantic Division title.For various reasons, the Knicks' collective psychology is now as fragile as a Fabergé egg. Anthony's impending free agency has cast a shadow over the team. Iman Shumpert's confidence has been shaken by trade talks. Smith is shooting 32.8 percent after off-season knee surgery. And there is a leadership void, with the departures of Jason Kidd, Rasheed Wallace and Kurt Thomas looming larger than anyone could have anticipated.It was a bad sign when Anthony felt the team needed a players-only meeting after the fourth game of the season. It was an act of early desperation, and the Knicks continued to free-fall, their effort bottoming out when they found themselves trailing by 22 points in the first half of Monday's loss to the Portland Trail Blazers.Above all, the team has clearly missed Tyson Chandler's stabilizing influence. Doc Rivers, the coach of the Los Angeles Clippers, said it was apparent just how much the Knicks were struggling without Chandler, who fractured a bone in his right leg nearly four weeks ago."Not only the way he plays, but his voice on the floor," said Rivers, who compared Chandler's role to the one that Kevin Garnett had with the Boston Celtics. "When Kevin didn't play, that one guy who held everybody accountable was gone."Chandler traveled with the team, though he said it was a helpless feeling. During games, he retreated to the trainer's room to continue with his rehabilitation. He refused to offer a timeline on his return. He has yet to resume basketball activities."It's obviously painful for me to watch," Chandler said. "When times get tough, you have to lean on one another."There are reasons for the Knicks to be cautiously optimistic. Chandler will return at some point, and their schedule has been unforgiving without him. During their recent trip, they faced three of the N.B.A.'s better point guards in quick succession: the Washington Wizards' John Wall, the Blazers' Damian Lillard and the Clippers' Chris Paul, each of whom eviscerated the Knicks' perimeter defenders. (Paul was hampered by a hamstring injury, but the Clippers still won by 13 points.)And, of course, there is the woeful Atlantic Division — perhaps the Knicks' greatest ally. They left Denver just three games out of first place, with more than four months of basketball to play.If the Knicks can find their way back to being mediocre, it might be enough to repeat.
EAST LANSING, Mich. — Amanda Hyde scored 23 points and led five IPFW players in double digits in an 81-76 upset win over No. 21 Michigan State on Sunday.The Mastodons (4-4) controlled the game with 53.7 percent shooting from the floor, including 13 of 23 from beyond the arc. Joining Hyde in double digits was Haley Seibert and Rachel Mauk, with 14 points apiece, Ariana Simmons, who added 12 points, and Mur Hagerman with 10.Michigan State (5-2) hit just 30 of its 73 shots from the floor (41.1 percent), and 7 of 20 from 3-point range, marking its first home court loss of the season. Trailing by as many as 10 points in the second half, the Spartans narrowed the gap to 79-76 on a Kiana Johnson layup with 5 seconds remaining but the rally stalled.
LEXINGTON, Ky. — Louisville was left wondering again how a 14-point lead slipped away against rival Kentucky.After building that big edge in the first half against the No. 7 Wildcats (8-0), Louisville squandered missing its first nine shots in the second and the No. 4 Cardinals were beaten 69-64 on Sunday.Kentucky took advantage and grabbed its first lead on a 3-pointer from Bernisha Pinkett with 10:54 remaining. The Wildcats never trailed again.If history means anything, Louisville (7-1) should be able to move on from this disappointing loss. After all, the Cardinals rallied from last year's one-point home defeat to the Wildcats and reached their second NCAA championship game before losing to Connecticut.But there was no doubt the Cardinals wanted this victory."This game isn't going to define our season," said guard Shoni Schimmel, whose 17 points led the Cardinals. "We knew that coming in."Of course, we wanted to win this game, and prepared hard to win this game, but we just came up short."Schimmel finished with a game-high 17 points and added seven rebounds and four assists. Sara Hammond had 12 points and seven rebounds, but fouled out with 1:55 to go.As poorly as Louisville was playing, the Cardinals tied the game three times but couldn't seize control. The numbers told the story of their collapse.The Cardinals shot 28 percent (10 of 36) in the second half after a 12-for-24 start. Kentucky also battled back on the boards, recovering from a 23-13 first-half deficit to outrebound Louisville 26-21 in the second half.The Cardinals also struggled with Kentucky's pressure, finishing with 24 turnovers that were converted into 25 points."I thought we did a great job of rebounding in the first half, controlled the boards, controlled the tempo of the game and played it exactly how we wanted to play it," Louisville coach Jeff Walz said. "I was really proud of them. Then, we just came out in the second half and missed a lot of point-blank shots we normally don't miss and started to give up offensive rebounds because we were getting frustrated.Louisville led by 14 points in last year's loss. Kentucky started slowly in that game before Janee Thompson's 3-pointer with 8.4 seconds left gave the Wildcats a 48-47 win.DeNesha Stallworth led this year's comeback with 15 points in the second half, when she grabbed six of her eight rebounds. Jennifer O'Neill added 12, including a critical jumper with 40.8 seconds left, and Thompson had 13."Coming into this game we knew how dominant of a player she was," Hammond said of Stallworth. "We just needed to keep circling her and be physical with her."I think we did that in the first half, but in the second half she did a good job of working hard. Her team did a good job of getting her the ball and getting her in open spots, allowing her to get easy baskets."O'Neill's effort led the Wildcats' reserves, who outscored Louisville's 28-11. Kentucky got six points each from Bernisha Pinkett and freshman guard Makayla Epps on 3-pointers. Azia Bishop added four points and seven rebounds."Are we going to learn from it? Yeah," Walz said. "There's no question about it. We had our opportunities and we have got to take advantage of them."The Cardinals have lost 16 straight games to Kentucky at Memorial Coliseum.
WACO, Texas — Back on the mainland after a week in Hawaii, Baylor coach Scott Drew got exactly what he hoped for from his No. 18 Bears.Playing for the only time between their first loss and another game against a top 10 team, Brady Heslip and Rico Gathers each had 17 points to lead six Baylor players scoring in double figures and Cory Jefferson had a double-double in a 104-59 win over Hardin-Simmons on Sunday."It was the first game back and it's good to get this one out of the way," Drew said. "That first game back you're never 100 percent. We were gasping for some air at the beginning of the game. It takes a couple of days. ... One of the toughest things coming back from Hawaii, it takes a couple of days, and playing a game gets it out of your system quicker."Baylor played three games in three days earlier in the week at the Maui Invitational, leaving Hawaii with its first loss after a 74-67 loss to No. 8 Syracuse in the tournament's championship game Wednesday night. This was its only game between then and playing No. 3 Kentucky in the Dallas Cowboys' stadium Friday night."I've recovered from the trip, but I've just been a little tired, just trying to adjust back from the time difference," said Jefferson, admitting he's anxious to play Kentucky. "It's a big game on our schedule. We've been waiting on it all year. But we've been doing pretty well as a team, not to overlook all of the games that were before this game coming up. Now, the main focus is on the big game."Jefferson had 16 points and 10 rebounds for his fourth double-double this season, and Heslip had five 3-pointers. Gathers also had nine rebounds."I'm not even going to lie to you, I'm still tired. I was tired the whole game," Gathers said. "It's a big adjustment from a four-hour difference. It's hard to get adjusted. But overall, I think we did a good job tonight of going out there and competing."Taurean Prince had 13 points for Baylor, while Isaiah Austin had 12 and Gary Franklin 10.Cameron Barnes had 15 points to lead Hardin Simmons (0-4), including one of the Cowboys' two 3-pointers in the first 75 seconds of the game for an early lead. They then missed 15 in a row from beyond the arc until Eric Taylor made another with 14:46 left in the game, when the Cowboys still trailed 65-34."I think that Scott (Drew) has assembled a team now that is just one echelon away from being one of our premier teams in the country. He's already consistent with their tournament play in the Big 12. In Maui, you saw with Syracuse, they're just right there," Hardin-Simmons coach Craig Carse said. "Naturally, as an NCAA Division III non-scholarship team, we don't have the length, the height, the vertical, the talent. They have a wonderful team."After the early 3s by Barnes and Jim Walter for a 6-3 lead, Hardin-Simmons had its last lead with 16:22 left in the first half when Taylor made a jumper to make it 8-6.Jefferson then had a tying jumper before Ish Wainright made a layup that put Baylor ahead to stay. That was part of a 15-2 run in a span of just more than 3 minutes. During the run, Heslip had two 3s, including one with 13 minutes left that made it 21-10.Baylor shot 61 percent (20 of 33) from the field while building a 52-27 halftime lead. Jefferson had nine points and seven rebounds by that point.The Bears then opened the second half with a 9-0 lead that included back-to-back 3s by Heslip. They built as much as a 47-point lead.The Bears, who won their eighth straight home game, are 18-1 against instate competition since the start of the 2011-12 season.John Barnes added 12 points for Hardin-Simmons, which played for the second day in a row. The Cowboys lost 80-57 to Texas-Dallas on Saturday.Derrick Jefferson, Hardin-Simmons' leading scorer and rebounder through the first three games, had seven points and three rebounds. Those were well below his averages of 18.3 points and 9.3 rebounds.Baylor has won 11 straight games against Hardin-Simmons, winning the last six by an average margin of more than 51 points.
Anthony Bennett's rookie season for the Cleveland Cavaliers has been so ugly that he is being called a bust after a dozen games.Bennett was a surprise No. 1 overall pick in 2013, drafted ahead of a player considered to have far more potential, Nerlens Noel, and two Indiana players who were considerably more accomplished, Victor Oladipo and Cody Zeller, among others. In Bennett's first 10 N.B.A. games, he shot 5 for 37 from the field and averaged 1.3 points and 2.5 rebounds a game.The good news is that it will be nearly impossible for him to remain so ineffective. On Nov. 23, in a loss to San Antonio, Bennett had what would qualify, for him, as a breakout game. He shot 4 for 5 from the field (raising his field-goal percentage to .214 from .135) and finished with 9 points and 5 rebounds.Bennett's case, after so many other teenagers were able to step right into a man's game, is a stark reminder that the N.B.A. occasionally presents a difficult learning curve.With that in mind, it is often best to largely ignore a player's rookie season, as he becomes accustomed to the speed of the league, and start paying attention in his second year. A look at the players from the 2012 draft shows that some have stagnated, some have proved unworthy and some have become stars. So far, five players from the class seem to have distanced themselves from the pack in terms of production and potential.ANTHONY DAVIS, C, N. ORLEANS After a solid rookie campaign limited to 64 games because of injuries, the unibrowed Davis appears to have justified his status as the top overall choice. His improvements this season are a result of not only an increase in minutes, but also a drastic increase in efficiency. Davis has raised his points, rebounds and blocks per 36 minutes and has become a deadly free-throw shooter, and his player efficiency rating has reached a remarkable 28.5 from a solid 21.7. At 3.9 blocks a game, he is on the verge of being the first player to average 4 a game since Dikembe Mutombo in 1995-6.DAMIAN LILLARD, G, PORTLAND Lillard leads the draft class in nearly every category, so to say he has not improved much from his rookie season is hardly an insult; he had little need to change anything. The No. 6 pick, Lillard has raised his scoring average slightly, and his assists per game have dipped slightly, but his advanced shooting statistics remain remarkably the same. He and Davis are easily the draft's two best players, with Davis getting the edge mainly based on his potential for improvement.ANDRE DRUMMOND, C, DETROIT True N.B.A. centers are such a rarity that to have two in the same draft class is special. Drummond looks as if he was a steal as the No. 9 pick for the Pistons. Although his 36-minute averages are roughly the same as they were last season, he has maintained that production while increasing his workload to 33.1 minutes a game from 20.7. His 11 double-doubles are fourth in the league behind Kevin Love, Chris Paul and Blake Griffin.BRADLEY BEAL, G, WASHINGTON Beal, drafted No. 3 in 2012, has not played much better this season, he has simply played more. Still not particularly efficient, he is averaging 20.6 points a game but is doing so with the benefit of an N.B.A.-leading 40.2 minutes a game. It is easy to see Beal's potential, however, because he is shooting 43.9 percent from 3-point range on more than six attempts a game.JARED SULLINGER, F, BOSTON Injury concerns caused Sullinger's draft value to plummet to No. 21, but he is looking like one of 2012's biggest bargains. His per-36 minute averages of 18.9 points and 10.6 rebounds indicate potential stardom if his body holds up to the rigors of the game. If only things had worked out so well for Fab Melo, whom the Celtics selected one pick after Sullinger. After shuttling between Boston and the N.B.A.'s development league during his rookie season, Melo was traded over the off-season and has since been waived by both Memphis and Dallas.The rest of the draft class includes players who still have the potential for greatness (Jonas Valanciunas, Harrison Barnes), players who seem like busts (Michael Kidd-Gilchrist, Thomas Robinson, Royce White) and players who have not shown enough to know for sure.By this time next season, we should know which category applies to Bennett.
LEXINGTON, Ky. — DeNesha Stallworth scored 15 second-half points and Jennifer O'Neill hit a critical jumper with 40.8 seconds left, rallying No. 7 Kentucky from a 14-point deficit to beat No. 4 Louisville 69-64 on Sunday.Kentucky (8-0) also erased a big lead last year in a 48-47 win in Louisville. This time, the Wildcats were down 36-27 at halftime but went up 51-45 with 9:42 left behind Stallworth, O'Neill and Bernisha Pinkett, who sank two 3-pointers in the run.Louisville (7-1) bounced back to tie the game three times and trailed just 64-62 with 2:14 to go. Stallworth made a free throw, then O'Neill's jumper from the top of the key sealed the Wildcats' third straight win over the Cardinals in the 50th meeting between the schools.Kentucky won its 16th straight over Louisville at Memorial Coliseum and 43rd consecutive nonconference home game.Stallworth's 16 points led the Wildcats, who were 8 of 17 on 3-pointers. Janee Thompson added 13.In the second half, Kentucky forced 10 of its 24 turnovers while holding the Cardinals to 28 percent shooting and out-rebounding Louisville 26-21.Stallworth had eight rebounds, while Azia Bishop had seven.Shoni Schimmel scored 17 points and Sara Hammond 12 for Louisville, which struggled with foul trouble in the second half.Hammond fouled out soon after bringing the Cardinals within a basket late in the game.Louisville came in with Top 25 wins over LSU and Oklahoma en route to the preseason WNIT title, while Kentucky steamrolled its nonconference schedule in preparation for its first ranked opponent of the season.Thompson decided last year's game with a 3-pointer in the final seconds for the one-point win.Louisville missed its first nine shots of the second half as Kentucky closed within 42-40 at the 13:55 mark.
CHICAGO — Jrue Holiday made a three-point play with 2.6 seconds remaining in the third overtime Monday night, giving the New Orleans Pelicans a 131-128 victory over the Chicago Bulls.Holiday had 19 points and 12 assists for the Pelicans. He made an 18-footer with 3.9 seconds remaining in regulation to tie the score at 103 and force overtime.Ryan Anderson had a career-high 36 points on 12-of-20 shooting, including 7 for 11 on 3-pointers. Eric Gordon added 23 points for New Orleans (9-8).Luol Deng led the Bulls with 37 points and also had eight rebounds and seven assists. Reserve Taj Gibson had 26 points and 14 rebounds, Mike Dunleavy added 23 points and Joakim Noah had a double-double with 19 points and 10 rebounds.It was the Bulls' first game at home following a 1-5 road trip while the circus took over the United Center for two weeks. The Bulls (7-9) lost for the first time at home after winning five in a row.In the extra session, the teams traded one-point leads for nearly three minutes before Deng's drive gave the Bulls a 109-106 advantage with 2:08 left. The Bulls then got consecutive defensive stops and had two chances to stretch the lead, but couldn't convert. Gordon then hit a 3-pointer with 10.2 seconds to go tie the score at 109 to force a second OT.In double overtime, it was the Bulls who made a comeback. Trailing 118-113, they took advantage of New Orleans' mistakes and tied the score at 122 on Deng's drive with 4.7 seconds to go.The Bulls jumped on top in the third session, but the Pelicans rallied and took a 127-126 edge on Anderson's 3-pointer with 1:08 to go. Noah tied it 128.NOTES: For the second straight season, Pelicans center Anthony Davis — the No. 1 pick in the 2012 draft — missed the team's only visit to his hometown. The 6-foot-10 big man broke his left hand Sunday in New York and is out in definitely. Last year, Davis was held out with a mild concussion. "One of the first things he said to me when I got back in the locker room was, 'Two years in a row,'" Pelicans coach Monty Williams said. "Took me a minute to realize what he was talking about. He just really wanted to play here. I feel bad for him." . Derrick Rose, who had surgery a week ago to repair a torn meniscus in his right knee, didn't attend the Bulls' first home game since the injury. "I've been talking to him," Bulls coach Tom Thibodeau said. "He's doing fine.". Thibodeau and Williams were added to USA Basketball coach Mike Krzyzewski's staff last and spent a lot of time together. "I learned a lot just being with him every day for a week, just talking basketball, family," Williams said of Thibodeau. "Just listening to the way he goes about his business for me was beneficial."
SALT LAKE CITY — Marvin Williams scored five points in the final two minutes, Gordon Hayward broke out of a shooting slump to score 29 points and the Utah Jazz earned their first back-to-back wins of the season with a 109-103 victory over the Houston Rockets on Monday night.With Utah clinging to a 101-98 lead, Williams stole James Harden's pass and raced down for a dunk with 2 minutes left. Williams then hit a 3-pointer from the top of the key with 59 seconds to go to boost the lead to 108-100.Rookie Trey Burke posted career highs of 21 points and six assists for Utah, which shot 54 percent and made 10 of 17 from beyond the arc.Harden had 15 of his season-best 37 points in the fourth quarter to keep the Rockets close, but they couldn't get enough defensive stops.Dwight Howard had 15 points and Francisco Garcia and Omri Casspi had 13 apiece as Houston lost for only the second time in its last 10 games. The Rockets have averaged 111 points on 51 percent shooting during the stretch.Harden weaved through a trio of Jazz players and scored a crafty layup to tie the game at 86 with 8:07 to play. Alec Burks answered with a 3-pointer and the Jazz led the rest of the way.Burke started the season on the injured list with a broken finger but has found his rhythm in the past few games. His hot play has coincided with Utah's best stretch of the season as the Jazz have won three of four after dropping 14 of their first 15 games.The Jazz put the ball in the rookie's hands and let him make plays down the stretch. In the fourth quarter, Burke had seven points and six assists and marked a career-best in points for second straight game. But it was Williams, the lone veteran on the court, who made the biggest difference in the final minutes.Hayward made 12 of 18 shots to regain his shooting confidence. His early hot streak sparked the Jazz to lead by as many as 14 points in the first half. Over the previous nine games, Hayward made just 36 of 123 attempts for 29 percent.Harden took his turn in the scoring spotlight and the Rockets caught the Jazz in the second quarter but trailed 53-50 at halftime.The Jazz shot 59 percent from 3-point range, while Houston hit 32 percent (9 of 28) from beyond the arc.The two teams played here exactly one month ago when Chandler Parsons scored 24 points and the Rockets outscored the Jazz 64-37 in the second half to win 104-93. Parsons sat out this game with a sore back and the Rockets had only Harden and Aaron Brooks, who had 13 points, as playmakers in the fourth quarter.Dwight Howard had 15 points and Francisco Garcia and Omri Casspi each chipped in 13 points as Houston lost for only the second time in the last 10 games. The Rockets have averaged 111 points on 51 percent shooting during the 10 games.After missing 3½ games with a foot injury, Harden scored 31 at San Antonio and looked to be his old creative self against the Jazz. He had eight assists and made all 10 of his free-throw attempts.Since Burke recovered sufficiently to play starter minutes, the Jazz have reached 100 points in three games for the first time all season. Before this run, Utah only had one contest in which they topped the century mark.NOTES: Jeremy Lin missed his third game with a sprained and bruised right knee. . Houston was outscored 36-23 in the first quarter. . The Rockets had 54 points in the paint.
STORRS, Conn. — Shabazz Napier is the top player on No. 12 Connecticut and is one of the most clutch players in the nation. The point guard, who led the undefeated Huskies to another win Monday night with a buzzer-beating jumper, has higher comparisons in mind."Growing up I wanted to be Superman. Everyone wants to be a hero," he said, surrounded by media after a lovefest with the UConn fans in Gampel Pavilion. "I just felt I was fortunate enough to be in the right spot at the right time."That would have been the free throw line, where he gathered a loose ball after teammate DeAndre Daniels tipped back Napier's miss of an off balance shot and buried a jumper at the buzzer to give the Huskies a 65-64 victory over No. 15 Florida."It went in slow motion," said Napier, who scored 26 points and made a four-point play with 33 seconds to go. "Point nine. Point eight. I just tried to shoot the ball as quick as I can but still shoot it regular. As soon as I let it go I felt it was going in."Napier, limping a bit on a left ankle he hurt while making the four-point play, escaped a trap around 30 feet from the basket, recovered the ball and got off a wild shot that missed but was tipped blindly back by Daniels."I was just trying to get a tip-in in case he missed," Daniels said. "I guess I glanced it a little bit but what an amazing player Shabazz is. He hit a great shot. He willed his team to win that game. He never gave up. The heart that kid has. Everybody on the team follows his lead."Florida coach Billy Donovan was happy with how his team defended the last possession. It was some loose ball rebounds in the play that led to Napier's four-point play that disappointed him."We made the decision we would trap him and we got him to take a very difficult off-balance shot," Donavan said. "The guy who won the game for them was DeAndre Daniels, who made an unbelievable tip out when he was off balance which kept the ball alive. We had guys on Napier who ran to the rim to defensive rebound which left a space for Napier. I have a lot of respect for Napier at the end of games. I think he's a big shot-making guy. His shot was luck because it was tipped to him."Napier's left-handed jumper went through as the horn sounded and set off a deafening cheer from the sellout crowd of 10,167 at Gampel Pavilion. He was 9 of 15 from the field, making 5 of 8 from 3-point range."Shabazz was phenomenal," Connecticut coach Kevin Ollie said. "When we needed the big shot he hit it. When we needed the big play he made it. ... He is one of the big-time players to wear the jersey and walk on the floor at Gampel Pavilion."The Huskies (8-0) and Florida (6-2), which had a five-game winning streak snapped, battled down the stretch, exchanging the lead six times in the final 6 minutes.Daniels had 14 points for Connecticut, which was outrebounded 34-26, but was able to make up a size difference with its strong guard play on the perimeter. This was Connecticut's first game this season against a ranked opponent. Florida's previous loss was in its only game against a ranked team, Wisconsin.Casey Prather had 19 points and seven rebounds for the Gators, while Patric Young had 17 points and seven rebounds. Scottie Wilbekin, playing in his third game of the season after being suspended for the first four, had 15 points but he injured an ankle with 3:01 to play, was taken to the locker room and never returned."I was concerned coming down the stretch with Scottie being out," said Donovan, who said he knew it was a sprained ankle but to what he degree he wasn't sure. "I didn't think we could guard Napier at least for that 3 minutes. So we decided to play 1-3-1 zone and try to use our length. ... We went man on the last possession."After Wilbekin left Young took over, scoring the Gators' next seven points, two baskets on his hook shot and another on an offensive rebound.That made it 62-59 Florida with 1:18 to play.Connecticut missed two 3-point attempts but got the rebound on both. Napier took a 25-foot jumper that swished and he was fouled by Dorian Finney-Smith. The joy of the crowd was tempered as Napier stayed on the court for about a minute, holding his left ankle.Ollie called a timeout so Napier could stay in the game and take the free throw. He made it to give the Huskies a 63-62 lead with 33 seconds left."I was more disappointed in the possession before the final play," Donovan said. "I watched the film and there was no foul. But we missed two opportunities to rebound the ball. I was disappointed in that.'"Michael Frazier II, with Connecticut paying a lot of attention to Young inside, drove to the basket and scored with 17 seconds left to give the Gators a 64-63 lead.The ball was in Napier's hands for the final shot and he finally did score after Daniels tipped the ball back to him.Florida outscored the Huskies 32-14 in the paint as Connecticut struggled to defend Young, who was 6 of 10 from the field.Florida committed 16 turnovers, two more than the Huskies in a game that was physical on all 94 feet of the court.The programs' only other meeting was in the 1994 Sweet 16, when the Gators won 69-60 in overtime on the way to the Final Four.
COLUMBIA, S.C. — Tiffany Mitchell scored 19 points to lead red-hot No. 12 South Carolina to a 79-27 win over North Carolina Central on Monday, giving coach Dawn Staley her 100th win early in her sixth season.The Gamecocks (8-0) shot 58.5 percent. Mitchell was 7-9, backup Alaina Coates was 7 of 8 for 15 points and Aleighsa Welch was 6-6 for 13 points.Raquel Davis had 14 points for the Bulldogs (4-3). NC Central shot just 16 percent (8-50), including 1-14 from 3-point range.Staley is only the seventh head coach in South Carolina's 40 years of playing women's basketball and the fourth to win at least 100 games.South Carolina made short work of the Bulldogs, shooting 69.2 percent while rolling to a 46-15 halftime lead. The Gamecocks scored the first five points and then went on a 15-0 run for a 26-4 lead at the 8:18 mark.
Breaking down this week's Associated Press college basketball poll:JUMPING IN: Villanova's wins over Kansas and Iowa on the way to the Battle 4 Atlantis championship were a boost to the Wildcats, moving from unranked to No. 14 in the AP poll.That's an impressive jump into the poll, but it's far from the best.In November 1989, Kansas went from unranked to No. 4 after beating No. 2 LSU, No. 1 UNLV and No. 25 St. John's in the NIT Season Tip-Off, which was known then as the Preseason NIT.The second-best improvement was by Connecticut in November 2010 when the Huskies went from unranked to No. 7 after beating No. 2 Michigan State and No. 8 Kentucky on the way to winning the Maui Invitational.NEWCOMERS: Villanova wasn't the only newcomer to this week's poll.San Diego State used its wins over Creighton and Marquette en route to the championship run of the Wooden Legacy to arrive at No. 24. The Aztecs were ranked in 12 of the first 13 weeks last season.It's been a longer time for Dayton, appearing at No. 25 following its third-place finish at the Maui Invitational. The Flyers beat then-No. 11 Gonzaga in the opening round, lost to then-No. 18 Baylor in the semifinals when a last-second shot didn't fall and beat California for third place. The Flyers' last appearance in the Top 25 was the first two weeks of 2009-10.Villanova and San Diego State are the only teams this season with two wins over ranked teams.SO LONG: Three teams dropped out of the poll this week, with North Carolina's fall from No. 16 the biggest exit.The Tar Heels were 12th in the preseason poll and the first poll of the regular season. Their home loss to Belmont dropped them to No. 24. North Carolina turned that drop around the next week when the upset of then-No. 3 Louisville moved it to No. 16.That wasn't enough of a cushion to keep the Tar Heels from falling out after the 63-59 loss to UAB on Sunday.The others to fall from the ranks of the ranked this week were Big East members who both lost two games. Creighton fell from 20th after losses to San Diego State and George Washington in the Wooden Legacy. Marquette dropped from No. 25 after losing at Arizona State and to San Diego State in the Wooden Legacy.LEAGUE LOOK: There were no changes at the top of the conference race in the Top 25 with the Big Ten still having five teams, followed by the Big 12 with four.The Pac-12 and American Athletic Conference both stayed with three ranked teams. The Atlantic Coast Conference dropped to two teams with the loss of North Carolina and it is tied with the Southeastern Conference and the Atlantic 10, which added Dayton to Massachusetts this week.The Big East had both its teams from last week — Creighton and Marquette — fall out but Villanova moved in to keep it in the standings tied with the Missouri Valley (Wichita State), Mountain West (San Diego State) and West Coast (Gonzaga) conferences.DOUBLE-RANKED GAMES: After a week with several matchups between ranked teams because of the holiday tournaments, there are just three double-ranked games this week.No. 15 Florida visits No. 12 Connecticut on Monday night and No. 22 Michigan heads to No. 10 Duke the next day in the ACC-Big Ten Challenge.On Friday, things will be big Texas-style when No. 3 Kentucky faces No. 20 Baylor at AT&T Stadium near Dallas, the site of this season's Final Four.RISE AND FALL: Memphis and Syracuse used wins in holiday tournaments to make the week's biggest moves in the Top 25.The Tigers won the Old Spice Classic, beating then-No. 5 Oklahoma State 73-68 in the championship game to move from 21st to No. 16. It was an impressive win, considering Memphis lost 101-80 at Oklahoma State two weeks earlier.Syracuse beat Minnesota, California and then-No. 18 Baylor to win the Maui Invitational. The Orange moved from No. 8 to fourth with the three wins.Gonzaga, which lost Dayton in the opening round at the Maui Invitational before beating Chaminade and Arkansas in the consolation bracket, had the week's biggest fall from 11th to No. 19.
AMES, Iowa — Dustin Hogue set career highs with 22 points and 16 rebounds, and 17th-ranked Iowa State pounded Auburn 99-70 on Monday night for its sixth straight win.Melvin Ejim added 14 points and 10 rebounds for the Cyclones (6-0), who are the Big 12's last unbeaten team.Iowa State used a 27-5 run midway through the first half to build a 15-point lead. It jumped ahead by as much as 60-33 early in the second half in cruising to its fourth win by at least 29 points.Chris Denson had 27 points for Auburn (4-2), which shot 35.5 percent and got beat on the boards 47-36.Hogue, a 6-foot-6 junior from Yonkers, N.Y., averaged 12.9 points and 5.4 rebounds last season at junior college power Indian Hills Community College in Iowa. He was averaging 10 points and a team-high 8.6 boards for the Cyclones, but he quickly moved past those numbers against the Tigers.Hogue had 11 points and 10 rebounds in the first 11½ minutes, keying that huge Cyclones run that put them ahead 32-17 with 5:57 left in the first half.Hogue hit 6 of 7 shots in the first 20 minutes in leading Iowa State to a 47-28 lead.Auburn had won four of its first five games, a stretch that included a 19-point loss to Northwestern State.But this was the first time the Tigers played a high-major opponent — and they soon realized they were taking on a different level.Iowa State, which entered play averaging a shade over 10 3-pointers a game, missed their first eight as Auburn took an early seven-point lead. But once freshman Matt Thomas got the Cyclones going with a 3, they rolled right past the Tigers as if Auburn was a low-major program in town for a payday.Monte Morris banked in a 3 to make it 30-17, and Auburn put up little resistance from there.Thomas finished with 14 points and Morris had 12 points and nine assists.It doesn't get any easier for the Tigers, who had just seven assists on 22 field goals. They face Illinois, Clemson and Boston College before Christmas.The Cyclones next get Northern Iowa on a neutral floor in nearby Des Moines on Saturday. They then host No. 23 Iowa on Dec. 13 in what'll surely be the most hyped game between the instate rivals in recent memory.
The Denver Nuggets raised more than a few eyebrows this summer.Coming off a team-record 57 victories, and another first-round playoff exit, the Nuggets let executive of the year Masai Ujiri leave for a big contract with the Toronto Raptors and also parted ways with coach of the year George Karl.It was the kind of wholesale change usually associated with the league's bottom feeders. And with four losses in their first five games, there were some nervous Denver fans.New coach Brian Shaw has made some adjustments, going back to the more up-and-down style that fit the star-less roster so well last season. Now the Nuggets (10-6) have won six straight games and nine of their last 11."All the guys are starting to understand their role on the team," Shaw said. "I have encouraged guys to shoot when they're open, to run the floor, try to take the first available shot."The Nuggets have overcome the loss of JaVale McGee and Danilo Galinari with a bench that is producing at an impressive clip. With Nate Robinson, who was brought in by new general manager Tim Connelly, leading the way, the Nuggets reserves outscored Minnesota's 47-10 on Wednesday and bludgeoned Toronto's 72-16 on Sunday."We have a tag-team mentality which is, first team wear them down and second team wear them out," Robinson said. "For us, early in the year a lot of guys on the team, a lot of guys on the bench, weren't making shots and now we are in our rhythm."Denver has a good chance to keep the good times rolling this week with games against Brooklyn, Cleveland, Boston and Philadelphia.Here are five things to watch for this week:—HEAVYWEIGHT MATCHUP: The Indiana Pacers (16-1) take the league's best record into Portland to face the Trail Blazers (14-3) on Monday in perhaps the best game of the week. Both are playing the second night of back-to-backs, so there are no excuses.—WALL'S ASSISTS: Now that score-first point guard John Wall is getting his teammates involved, the Washington Wizards are starting to win. Wall is averaging 9.2 assists per game over the last nine and the Wizards (8-9) are creeping back to .500. "When we're healthy, we can compete with anybody," he said.—PAINFUL START: Last week was a disastrous one from an injury standpoint. Bulls star Derrick Rose was ruled out for the season with a torn meniscus. New Orleans forward Anthony Davis, off to a good start, broke his left hand on Sunday and Clippers shooter J.J. Redick is out six to eight weeks with a broken right hand and torn ligament in his right elbow, joining a growing list of injured stars. But ...—KOBE WATCH: Is this the week Kobe Bryant returns from his torn Achilles? The Lakers have the first four days of this week off. Coach Mike D'Antoni said the Lakers will see how he feels after three practices. If all goes well, he could be in uniform at Sacramento on Friday night.—VIVA MEXICO: On Wednesday, Mexico City will host a regular season game for the first time since 1997. The San Antonio Spurs will play Timberwolves, who are designated the home team. The Spurs have a league-high 10 international players while the Wolves are second in the league with seven.STAT LINE OF THE WEEK: Kevin Durant, Oklahoma City vs. Minnesota: 32 points, 12 assists, 10 rebounds, four blocks, four steals. Durant has always been an offensive force. But he's been working on his defensive game, and that was evident in Sunday night's 113-102 victory.
NEW YORK — Bryce Cotton has been through this before. He had to find a way to get his shot off against the length of Kentucky, and the Providence guard was successful yet again."I've been this short all my life. I'm kind of used to it," the 6-foot-1 Cotton said Sunday night after scoring 23 points in the Friars' 79-65 loss to the third-ranked Wildcats at Barclays Center. "I've always been the shortest one on the floor so it's something I'm used to."Cotton wasn't the only Providence player to have trouble getting shots off as Kentucky finished with 11 blocked shots, nine by 7-foot Willie Cauley-Stein.Friars coach Ed Cooley didn't want to hear that Cotton, who was 7 of 21 from the field, including 7 of 9 from 3-point range, and had five assists, struggled getting his shot."I thought he received every look he wanted to get. Bryce received every shot he wanted to get. I didn't see the length bothering him," Cooley said. "It was more that he had to play 40 minutes."There was another reason Cotton never came out of the game.Providence was without sophomore guard Kris Dunn who missed his second straight game with a right shoulder injury. No timetable has been set for his return. The Friars, whose only loss this season was to Maryland in the championship game of the Paradise Jam, are also missing freshmen Brandon Austin and Rodney Bullock, who were suspended indefinitely before the season started for "not upholding their responsibilities as student-athletes.""Not having Kris Dunn really hurt us. Not having our freshmen and the depth they would give us at those positions really hurt us," Cooley said. "But I'm going to coach the guys on my bus. ... Dunn is in a lot of pain. I don't expect him back any time soon and that's a big blow. I will hold those freshmen responsible for their actions and we will hold them to that until they understand that."Cauley-Stein, who plays with all those high-profile Kentucky freshmen, flirted with a triple-double."He's playing harder. He's playing longer," Kentucky coach John Calipari said of Cauley-Stein after he scored 15 points on 7-of-8 shooting, grabbed eight rebounds and blocked a career-high nine shots in 36 minutes. "He's never played this many minutes and he's never played this hard."James Young scored 18 points and Aaron Harrison added 15 for the Wildcats (7-1), who shot 64.3 percent from the field (27 of 42) and led by as many as 17 points in the second half.Cauley-Stein had seven blocks in the Wildcats' last game against Eastern Michigan and he now has 31 for the season."The last couple games it's been pretty good," Cauley-Stein said. "I think I'm just more aware. Before I was hesitant on going after the ball. Now I'm going. Coach said, 'Don't worry about it, just go block every ball.'"The Friars (7-2) finished 10 of 19 (52.6 percent) from 3-point range. They came into the game shooting just 29.4 percent from beyond the arc and were averaging only five 3s per game."We were trying to play inside out," Cooley said. "I thought our guys got frustrated trying to shoot over their length. Their depth at the rim is what makes them. When those guys mature they can be really, really scary."Kentucky, which had the majority of the crowd of 8,086 cheering for it, also had an exceptional game from 3-point range. The Wildcats were 6 of 8 from beyond the arc, decidedly better than the 28.9 percent they were shooting from there entering the game.But Calipari said the 3s were a factor in another way."We didn't shoot as many 3s so we could throw it in against their zone. That's what we've been working on and why we shot such a high percentage."Julius Randle, the highest profile of the eight-man freshman class at Kentucky, scored 12 points on 4-of-10 shooting and grabbed eight rebounds. He had a double-double in each of his seven games this season tying Jim Andrews in 1971-72 for the most by a Kentucky player at the start of a season. That streak is over."I still think Julius is getting roughed up a little bit," Calipari said of the 6-9, 250-pound Randle, "but he's so physical they just say he's not getting fouled."Harrison was 7 of 9 from the field and Young was 5 of 7 including going 3 of 4 from 3-point range for the Wildcats, whose only loss was as the No. 1 team in the nation to Michigan State, which moved up one spot to the top with the win."We are really communicating. We're just communicating with each other," Young said of the difference in the team from the loss to now. "That's what's going to happen in the long run."Calipari said he has had to get back to basics with this young team including doing junior high drills such as lane slides and wall sits."We're doing eighth grade stuff. So what? It's where we are," he said. "I went way too fast early."This game started a December that will have the Wildcats face No. 18 Baylor, No. 16 North Carolina and No. 9 Louisville in addition to Boise State and Belmont."We're doing it with all freshmen. I haven't done this before," he said.This was the second meeting between the schools and the first was played across the East River. Kentucky beat Providence 79-78 in the 1976 NIT at Madison Square Garden.
LOS ANGELES — Portland's enormous fourth-quarter lead dwindled to a single point before the Trail Blazers finally figured out how hold off the Los Angeles Lakers' patchwork lineup.Wesley Matthews thinks the harrowing experience will be good for the Blazers as they try to cement their spot among the NBA's elite.LaMarcus Aldridge had 27 points and nine rebounds, and Portland blew most of a 20-point lead before holding on to beat the Lakers 114-108 Sunday night.Damian Lillard had 26 points and nine assists, and Matthews scored 17 points for the Blazers, whose 11-game winning streak ended four days earlier in Phoenix. The Blazers tied their franchise record with 13 victories in November, and they opened December with an unlikely nail-biter, surviving despite blowing big leads in each half."We shouldn't have had to do that," Matthews said. "There's still a learning curve for us, but it's a good sign if your lesson is you have to learn how to play with a lead. It's better than having to fight back."The Lakers would agree, even though their rally got Staples Center rocking. Xavier Henry scored a career-high 27 points and Jodie Meeks added 20 for Los Angeles, which had won five of six to climb above .500 despite injury woes.Portland led 94-74 entering the fourth, but promptly failed to score for nearly six minutes as the Lakers mounted a 24-5 run with a lineup featuring no point guard and energetic backup center Robert Sacre, who had career highs of 12 points and seven rebounds."We have guys down right now, but we can't do anything about that," said Henry, who surpassed his previous career high set earlier this season. "The guys we do have can still give any team a run for its money."Portland returned from its holiday break with its first road victory over the Lakers in seven tries since April 11, 2010, but only after a little drama. The Blazers blew a 17-point lead in the first half, but thought they had taken control with a 41-point third quarter — their biggest period of the season.Los Angeles cut Portland's lead to 99-98 on Shawne Williams' tip-in with 3:44 to play, but Lillard hit a 3-pointer with 2:54 left, and Matthews added another with 1:20 to play. Los Angeles kept it close, but the Blazers hit five of their six free throws in the final 23 seconds."We need to stay consistent," Lillard said. "When things are going well, we tend to ease up instead of tightening up and putting teams away. Once teams get fired up and get back in the game, our intensity rises again. We have to find a way to keep it at that high level."The Lakers were left with only nine or 10 healthy players — and one point guard — when Jordan Farmar limped to the locker room in the first quarter, straining his left hamstring shortly after checking in to the game. Kobe Bryant and Steve Nash still haven't returned to uniform, and center Chris Kaman — who recently recovered from a back injury — dressed but didn't play.Pau Gasol, who missed Saturday's practice to deal with nagging injury issues, missed nine of his 10 shots in the first half before finishing with six points on 3-of-15 shooting. He plans to have an MRI on his sore ankle Monday.But the Lakers' league-leading bench had another big game led by Henry, Sacre and Nick Young, who scored 17 points."That's what this team is all about — you never know who's going to come out and produce," Sacre said. "That's the whole essence of this team. We're all about one another, and we want each other to succeed."The Lakers hoped to play aggressively with the next four days off to rest, but instead got off to a horrific start. Portland took an 11-0 lead in the first four minutes as Los Angeles missed its first eight shots, stretching the margin to 21-4 before many fans had settled in their seats.Lakers coach Mike D'Antoni yanked four of his starters, and they gradually got back in it with a tying 19-6 run capped by Meeks' 3-pointer midway through the second quarter.Lillard scored 11 points in the third quarter as Portland made 17 of its 24 shots while taking command. Los Angeles then scored 10 straight points to open the fourth, and the Blazers didn't get a field goal until 5:31 remained.NOTES: Lillard converted a four-point play early in the second quarter, and Henry also did it midway through the fourth quarter. ... D'Antoni said Nash will be at practice on Tuesday after a trip to Vancouver for further rehab on his nerve root irritation. There's no timetable for the return of the two-time MVP point guard — or Bryant, who also will be in practice this week. D'Antoni declined to speculate whether Bryant could make his season debut when the Lakers visit Sacramento on Friday. ... Williams and Johnson both fouled out in the fourth quarter for Los Angeles.
Through the first month of the season, Kentucky Coach John Calipari evaluated his team and saw a fledgling lineup of high school all-Americans not close to reaching their potential. They were often sluggish moving the ball upcourt and saw less-heralded teams outplay them during the first half of games.On Sunday, the young Wildcats took their first steps toward fulfilling the expectations of a preseason No. 1 ranked team, defeating Providence, 79-65, at Barclays Center.On Friday, Calipari told reporters that No. 3 Kentucky (7-1) had the most upside of any team in the country. But the Wildcats had struggled with the likes of Cleveland State and Eastern Michigan in recent games, and Calipari said, "The reality of it is, we are what we are, a bunch of freshmen trying — I'm trying to figure them out, they're trying to figure each other out."The message resonated with the Wildcats, as they played their most complete game of the season against the Friars (6-2). Leading the way was Willie Cauley-Stein, a 7-foot sophomore center who was reinserted into the starting lineup after playing as a reserve the last four games. He finished with 9 blocked shots."When they mature, they can be really, really scary," Providence Coach Ed Cooley said of Kentucky.Whenever the Friars made a run, as when they tied the game at 35-35 with 2 minutes 21 seconds remaining in the first half, Cauley-Stein was there to swing the momentum back to the Wildcats. His alley-oop dunk on the ensuing possession gave Kentucky the lead, and they entered halftime ahead, 39-35.The Wildcats' play in the first half was notably more up-tempo than in recent games. In Kentucky's last two matchups, it trailed Cleveland State at halftime, 31-27, and led Eastern Michigan, 35-32. In its only loss this season, Kentucky trailed Michigan State, 44-32, at the half.With the brothers Andrew and Aaron Harrison pushing the pace Sunday, Kentucky shot 61.5 percent from the field. But for every early Kentucky run, the Friars had an answer, led by the senior guard Bryce Cotton, who had 13 first-half points. The Friars also shot 6 of 8 from 3-point range in the first 20 minutes.Cotton, who finished with 23 points, opened the second-half scoring with a 3-pointer to trim Kentucky's lead to 39-38. But the Wildcats went on an 8-0 run, spurred by two blocks by Cauley-Stein on Kadeem Batts. The second one started a fast break that Cauley-Stein capped with a two-handed dunk.Calipari kept his frontcourt fresh early, rotating Cauley-Stein, the freshman Julius Randle and the sophomore Alex Poythress. The Wildcats played a fluid inside-out game, getting easy buckets in the post from Cauley-Stein and Randle, and open looks from outside when the Kentucky big men were double-teamed.In the second half, Kentucky's defense took over. With Cauley-Stein patrolling the lane, Providence shot 8 for 28 from the field in the half. Sunday's game was Kentucky's first in a challenging series of nonconference tests this month. Kentucky will play three ranked teams — No. 18 Baylor, No. 16 North Carolina and No. 9 Louisville — and the 2013 N.C.A.A. tournament teams Boise State and Belmont.The Wildcats moved to 2-0 in games at Barclays Center, where a majority of the crowd was draped in Kentucky blue and the atmosphere resembled Rupp Arena's.Providence shot 31.1 percent from the field, while Kentucky converted 64.3 percent of its shots. The freshman James Young led the Wildcats with 18 points, and Aaron Harrison and Cauley-Stein each added 15.
As the Knicks were fighting to avoid their longest losing streak since 2006, fans might have been justified for keeping an eye on the action happening across the river at Barclays Center on Sunday night.No, the crosstown rival Nets were not playing. The No. 3 Kentucky Wildcats were in town, along with their coach, John Calipari, whose name continues to simmer in the discussion of potential candidates to replace Mike Woodson if the Knicks continue faltering.Calipari, 54, who coached the Nets from 1996 to '99, is no stranger to the speculation about a possible return to the N.B.A., much the same way Nick Saban, the football coach at Alabama, is often rumored to be flirting with the N.F.L.Both have sustained their status at the top of their professions. Calipari, 130-27 with Kentucky after Sunday's 79-65 win against Providence, won the national title in 2012, and recruits like few others."I don't listen to any of it and I don't think my team does," Calipari said after Sunday's game, referring to the speculation that he may move on. "Every year I've ever coached, I've been — if there was a college job open I was going there, a pro job, a high school job, I was taking every job and I just don't buy into it. The greatest thing for me, it took me 20 years to get a job like Kentucky."At the college level, Calipari has proved to have a deft touch at nurturing N.B.A. talent, recruiting and coaching future professional stars like Derrick Rose, Tyreke Evans, John Wall, DeMarcus Cousins and Anthony Davis.Calipari is also a client of Creative Artists Agency, the talent management firm that represents several key figures on the Knicks, including Carmelo Anthony, J. R. Smith, the assistant general manager Allan Houston and Woodson. Calipari has had a close relationship with William Wesley, known as Worldwide Wes, a well-known basketball power broker and consultant for C.A.A. who is believed to have ties to the Knicks' front office."My focus is here, and I don't get into all that, rumors and innuendo," Calipari told reporters in Lexington, Ky., last month. "And it won't be the last one that's out there. I just don't deal with it."Bill Raftery, the longtime college basketball analyst who was set to call Sunday's game for Fox Sports, said in a telephone interview last week that he thought Calipari would at some point be interested in jumping back to the pros. But he did not see it coming now."Why would he leave?" Raftery said. "He's so comfortable in how to get players, and he knows kids are going to rally to go there and want to go there. I just think not that he's on cruise control, but he's getting the pick of the litter."With those blue-chip prospects coming in, Raftery added, Calipari's Wildcats would always seem to have a shot at winning a national title, but there may be a point when that will not thrill him as much as it used to."I don't know if that's now, though," Raftery said.In June 2011, Calipari signed an eight-year contract extension worth $43.3 million, which includes a $1 million buyout if he leaves the program before March 31, 2014, and $500,000 if he leaves before 2015 — not enough, it would seem, to significantly deter a professional franchise from pursuing him.At Madison Square Garden, Woodson had his hands full in a futile attempt to keep his fraying Knicks from losing their ninth consecutive game. Before Sunday's 103-99 loss to New Orleans, Woodson blamed himself for the team's inability to establish an on-court identity."That's still on me," Woodson said, "to correct that and get that headed in the right direction."
IOWA CITY, Iowa — Aaron White scored 20 points, Devyn Marble and Jarrod Uthoff added 17 each and No. 23 Iowa held off Notre Dame 98-93 on Tuesday night.Marble had 13 straight points in the second half for the Hawkeyes (8-1), who bounced back from an overtime loss to No. 14 Villanova with just their third win in 13 Big Ten/ACC Challenge games.Uthoff made two free throws and threw down an open dunk in the final 37 seconds to help seal the win for Iowa, which scored over 90 points for the third time this season.Garrick Sherman had a career-high 29 points and Eric Atkins added 23 for Notre Dame (5-2), which lost despite shooting 51.5 percent from the field.Iowa was even better from the field, shooting 56.9 percent.Still, the Hawkeyes couldn't put away the Fighting Irish until the finals seconds.White answered an 3-pointer by Atkins by drawing contact with Sherman and converting from the free throw line to put the Hawkeyes ahead 90-83 with 1:50 left.But Uthoff blew an easy layup and didn't get a loose ball that Atkins put home to pull Notre Dame within 91-88.Uthoff soon made up for those mistakes, but the Fighting Irish were still alive until White's free throw with 0.8 seconds left.Jerian Grant had 13 points and 10 assists for Notre Dame.The Hawkeyes had no answer for Sherman in the first half. He had 18 points, repeatedly beating Iowa's interior defense for easy baskets.The way the Hawkeyes were scoring, it didn't matter all that much.Iowa shot 19 of 33 from the field — including an 18-foot turnaround jumper from Uthoff to beat the shot clock — and took a 52-43 halftime lead.But the Hawkeyes were playing their fourth game in six days, and it showed at the start of the second half. Sherman helped Notre Dame quickly tie it at 55-all, reaching his career high in points with 16:53 left.Marble kept Iowa ahead with those 13 straight points, but the Fighting Irish closed within 76-75 on Grant's dunk with 6:46 left.Hosting the Fighting Irish made for a special night for Iowa coach Fran McCaffery, whose owes much of his coaching career and personal life to Notre Dame.McCaffery spent 11 seasons as an assistant with the Fighting Irish under Digger Phelps and John MacLeod, and he met his wife Margaret in South Bend. She scored 1,312 points for the Irish before serving as an assistant coach for Muffet McGraw.The Hawkeyes made McCaffery a winner in his first game against the Irish while at Iowa — though Notre Dame proved to be a tougher challenge than many thought it would be.
PHILADELPHIA — Michael Carter-Williams had 27 points, 12 rebounds and 10 assists for his first career triple-double, and Thaddeus Young added 25 points and 12 rebounds to lead the Philadelphia 76ers past the Orlando Magic 126-125 in double-overtime on Tuesday night.Carter-Williams got his 10th assist on a dish to Young late in the second OT to put the Sixers up 125-120.Evan Turner had 24 points for Philadelphia, which snapped a four-game losing streak. James Anderson added 19 points and Spencer Hawes 17.Arron Afflalo scored a career-high 43 points for the Magic and Glen Davis had a career-high 33. Victor Oladipo had 26 points, 10 rebounds and 10 assists to join Carter-Williams as rookies with a triple-double.Turner was whistled for his fifth foul with 12.1 seconds left in the first OT on Afflalo's 3-point attempt. Afflalo made all three free throws, tying the score at 118. The Magic fell behind early in the second overtime and the Sixers held on from the free-throw line.The Magic, coming off a 98-80 loss at Washington on Monday night, played without Nik Vucevic (14.7 ppg, 10.9 rpg) because of a sprained left ankle and point guard Jameer Nelson (sprained left foot).Davis stunned the Sixers with his first 3-pointer of the season, nailing it from the top of the key to tie the score at 104-all with 18 seconds left in the fourth quarter.Afflalo sparked a rally earlier in the quarter, capping a 9-0 run with a jumper that gave the Magic a 98-96 lead with 2:45 left. After the Sixers grabbed a four-point lead, Afflalo buried his fourth 3 to make it a one-point game. Young scored for the Sixers, then Davis connected in the clutch.The Sixers stil had a huge edge beyond the arc, making 11 of 29. The Magic missed 20 of 26.Carter-Williams' first 3 of the game in the third made it 83-72, getting a rise out of the roughly 10,000 fans who turned out for this one.Carter-Williams was named Eastern Conference rookie of the month before the game, the first Sixers rookie to win the award since Allen Iverson in April 1997. Carter-Williams, the 11th overall pick of the draft, had already scored 20-plus points five times this season and helped the Sixers beat Miami, Washington and Chicago to open the season.The Sixers (7-12) have cooled considerably since their surprising start, but first-year coach Brett Brown has them playing hard and playing smart. As the NBA season tipped off, the over-under out of Las Vegas for total wins for the 76ers this year was 16.5, the lowest of any team in the league.They should top that — and Carter-Williams is a big reason why the Sixers are somehow in the playoff mix.Of course, an Atlantic Division littered with bad basketball and underachievers also has the Sixers in the hunt. None of the five teams in the division have a winning record.The Magic's record would have them chasing first in the Atlantic instead of dumping them in last in the Southeast Division, well behind Miami.Afflalo was 14 of 27 from the field, made five of Orlando's six 3s, and was 10 of 11 from the free-throw line. Orlando's starters scored all but nine points.NOTES: Orlando played the second game of a six-game road trip. ... Young had averaged 21.7 points and 8.3 rebounds over the last three games since returning from a three-game absence for personal reasons. ... Davis was 6 for 40 in his career on 3s and hadn't made one since the 2011-12 season.
WACO, Texas — Odyssey Sims scored 29 points and had 13 assists to become the Baylor career leader in that category as the No. 9 Lady Bears beat San Jose State 113-73 on Tuesday night.It was the first game in 10 days for the Lady Bears (7-0), who extended their nation's-best home winning streak to 64 games.Nina Davis had 15 points in 17 minutes while Makenzie Robertson scored 13 points, Khadijiah Cave had 12 and Chardonae Fuqua 10 for Baylor. Niya Johnson had 14 assists. Sims had five steals and five rebounds with one turnover in her 27 minutes.Short-handed San Jose State (4-4), with only eight players in uniform, ran out to a 23-18 lead on Rebecca Woodberry's third 3-pointer with 13:40 left in the first half.The Lady Bears then scored 14 straight points in less than 3 minutes. They led 32-23 after consecutive 3-pointers by Makenzie Robertson, both on passes from Sims. The Spartans missed their only two shots and had three turnovers in that shorter span, which was part of a 31-7 run by Baylor.Woodberry finished with 19 points, while Classye James had 17 and Ta'rea Cunnigan 16.Needing only two assists to overtake Angela Tisdale's school record of 493, Sims had that in less than 3 minutes. She had 10 assists by halftime, and had 17 points as the Lady Bears led 63-38.Robertson had 11 points with three 3s and Sune Agbuke already had 10 of her 12 rebounds by then.Sims, who entered the game as the Big 12 scoring leader and No. 3 nationally with 27.3 points per game, has 505 career assists.The Lady Bears have rolled past their first seven opponents by an average margin of 44.7 points, the best in the country, and scored at least 110 points three times. The most points they ever scored the previous four seasons with 6-foot-8 Brittney Griner, the two-time AP player of the year, was 109 — and that was in their only 100-point game during their 40-0 national championship two seasons ago.Baylor has its biggest test next before getting into Big 12 play in January. The Lady Bears play No. 5 Kentucky (8-0) on Friday night at the Dallas Cowboys' stadium in quite a doubleheader.Right after the Baylor and Kentucky women finish their game at the site of the men's NCAA Final Four next April, the men's teams from those two schools play. Both the No. 3 Kentucky men and No. 20 Baylor are 7-1 this season.The Lady Bears played for the first time since Nov. 23, when they won their third game in three days to win the Athletes in Action Classic on campus. Their other remaining non-conference games before the Big 12 opener Jan. 2 at Kansas State are against Houston Baptist, Mississippi and McNeese State — all at home.Woodberry scored on a layup off the opening tip and then made three 3-pointers, the last from well beyond the line on the right wing not far from Baylor coach Kim Mulkey standing on the sideline.The Spartans shot 64 percent (7 of 11) on 3-pointers before halftime, but were only 25 percent inside the arc (5 of 20).
SYRACUSE, N.Y. — Trevor Cooney scored 21 points, Tyler Ennis added 17 points and eight assists, and No. 4 Syracuse beat Indiana 69-52 in the Big Ten/ACC Challenge on Tuesday night.Syracuse (8-0) has won 46 straight nonconference games at home, and there was no love lost in this rematch from last season's East Regional semifinal won handily by the Orange.Indiana was called for two flagrant fouls Tuesday, the second coming in the second half as the game was slipping away. Syracuse used a 25-4 surge to break open a tie game.The youthful Hoosiers (6-2) had only lost, 59-58, to No. 12 Connecticut at Madison Square Garden in the championship game of the 2K Sports Classic Benefiting Wounded Warrior Project.After Indiana's Noah Vonleh tied it at 33-all early in the second half, Syracuse went on a 12-0 run to begin to take command and incite the crowd in the Carrier Dome to a deafening roar.Dajuan Coleman started the run with a putback and Cooney followed with a steal and 3-pointer, then went 3 of 3 from line after being fouled on another 3-point attempt. C.J. Fair's driving layup with 13:18 gave the Orange a 45-33 lead. Ennis had three steals during the spurt and the Orange forced the Hoosiers into a shot-clock violation as they could muster nothing offensively.Syracuse registered seven blocked shots, 10 steals and matched the nation's top team on the glass with 29 rebounds and just a 12-11 deficit on the offensive glass.Indiana shot 15 of 41 (36.6 percent) and was 6 of 13 in the second half in getting outscored 36-23.Fair finished with 15 points but had to sit 5 minutes in the second half after picking up his fourth foul.Vonleh had 17 points for the Hoosiers and Yogi Ferrell added 12, only three in the second half — a 3-pointer with 1:59 remaining.The first-ever meeting between Indiana and Syracuse was for the 1987 national championship, and Indiana won 74-73 on a baseline jumper by Keith Smart with 4 seconds left. Syracuse coach Jim Boeheim said he never got over that loss until he won the 2003 national championship with Carmelo Anthony, and he's been perfect against Indiana since, winning five straight.The last time the teams met was in March in the NCAA tournament, and like most of the nonconference teams on the Syracuse schedule the Hoosiers weren't used to seeing Boeheim's trademark 2-3 zone, and it showed right from the outset. The team that finished third in the country last season in scoring at 79.5 points per game while shooting 48.6 percent had no answer for the zone and lost 61-50 as Syracuse limited the top-seeded Hoosiers to their lowest output of the season while forcing 19 turnovers and blocking 10 shots.The lineups have changed for both teams, but that zone is still OK.Indiana led the nation averaging 50.3 rebounds a game and in rebound margin at plus-18.Indiana was fifth in field goal percentage defense (35.1) and the Orange shot 51.1 percent (24 of 47).Indiana, which trailed 10-0 to start the game, went on a 15-5 run over a span of about 3 minutes late in the opening half to take its first lead, going 5 for 5 from the free throw line. A three-point play by Will Sheehey and two 3s from the top of the key by Ferrell, the second as the shot clock was about to expire, gave Indiana a 27-26 lead with 3:28 left.Cooney's third 3 of the half gave Syracuse a 33-29 halftime lead.
BATON ROUGE, La. — Raigyne Moncrief scored 22 points on Tuesday and shot 72.7 percent from the floor to lead No. 13 LSU in an 83-66 victory over Indiana State.Moncrief grabbed nine rebounds and finished with six assists and five steals. She was named the SEC Freshman of the Week on Monday after averaging 20 points in the last two games, with 11 steals. Jeanne Kenney ended the matchup with a career-high 11 rebounds.The Lady Tigers (7-1) shot 12.5 percent from behind the arc (1 of 8) but outscored Indiana State 54-24 in the paint. With 9:37 left to play in the first half, 16 of LSU's 20 points had come from layups.Indiana State outscored the Lady Tigers in the second half (41-38), but could not erase the 20-point deficit that had built up before the break. Anna Munn led the Sycamores (3-2) with a game-high 24 points.
PORTLAND, Ore. — After Portland had withstood a late barrage from the Indiana Pacers and Paul George, the Trail Blazers gathered at midcourt and raised their hands together.It might be early in the season, but this was a statement win for the Blazers.LaMarcus Aldridge had 28 points and 10 rebounds and Portland downed Indiana 106-102 Monday night, snapping the Pacers' seven-game winning streak. Damian Lillard added 26."It was a tough one, and we knew it was going to be a tough one going in," Lillard said. "They're a good team, they only had one loss. But we're a good team too, and we wanted to prove that."Paul George had a career-high 43 points for Pacers (16-2), who own the NBA's best record.The Blazers pulled in front early in the fourth quarter, but the Pacers kept it close and George hit consecutive 3-pointers that narrowed it to 98-96 with 1:37 left. Lillard answered with a 3-pointer and Nicolas Batum made a pair of free throws for the Blazers before George hit another 3-pointer that got Indiana within 103-99 with 21 seconds to go.Lillard hit free throws and George made yet another 3 with 10 seconds left to make it 105-102, but the Pacers couldn't get closer. Portland (15-3) is off to its best start since the 1998-99 season."I really wanted to get this win," said George, one of just four Indiana players to score 43 or more points in a game since 2000. "I was trying to will us into the game."Both teams were playing the second of a back-to-back. The Blazers beat the short-handed Los Angeles Lakers 114-108, snapping a seven-game losing streak to the Lakers at the Staples Center.The Pacers (16-2) were coming off a 105-100 victory over the Los Angeles Clippers on Sunday to open a five-game road trip."They're a great offensive team and they made big shots all game long," Indiana coach Frank Vogel said of Portland. "Hopefully that's what it's going to take to beat this team — making impossible shot after impossible shot."Earlier Monday, the NBA named Vogel the Eastern Conference coach of the month for November. Portland's Terry Stotts was named coach of the month for the Western Conference.The Pacers went 15-1 in November and opened the season with a nine-game winning streak for the best start in franchise history. The Blazers went 13-3 under Stotts to start the season, including an 11-game winning streak.While Stotts acknowledged it was a big win, he stopped short of the whole "statement" thing."We played the most complete game from beginning to end: Execution, effort, mental focus. All of those things," he said. "But I don't believe you play statement games in December.George had a 14-foot jumper that gave the Pacers an early 20-11 lead, but the Blazers hung close through the first half. Mo Williams, who helped Portland keep up with seven points, had three fouls and was sent to the bench.The Blazers finished out the first half with a 9-3 run to get within 46-45 at the break.Aldridge's dunk pulled Portland within 59-54 midway through the third quarter, but George answered with an 18-foot jumper on the other end for Indiana. Orlando Johnson's 3-pointer extended the lead to 64-56 and it looked as if the Pacers were pulling away.But Aldridge hit a flat 20-foot jumper and made a free throw and Joel Freeland dunked to even it at 70. Lillard hit a 3-pointer and the Blazers took a 75-72 lead, their first of the game. Portland went up 86-78 on Wesley Matthews' 3-pointer to make it 86-78.Matthews was asked afterward what the win meant: "That we're a pretty damn good team," he replied.It was Aldridge's 14th game this season with 20 or more points. The two-time All-Star has eight double-doubles this season."They're good," Aldridge said. "I just had one of those nights."NOTES: It was Portland guard Lillard's 100th career game. He is third NBA player ever to start his first 100 games. ... Among those at the game was Portland native Galen Rupp, who won the silver in the 10,000 meters at the London Olympics. ... Former Blazers coach Nate McMillan is an assistant to Vogel in Indiana. ... It was just the second time Indiana had given up 100 points this season. ... The Blazers are 8-0 this season against Eastern Conference teams. ... Indiana's David West reached his 11,000th career point in the second quarter. West, a 10-year veteran, finished with 12 points, eight rebounds and five assists. ... George Hill matched his career high with 11 assists. ... Pacers starter Lance Stephenson fouled out with just under 5 minutes left.
LARAMIE, Wyo. — Jasmine Sborov made two free throws with 5 seconds left to clinch No. 11 Colorado's 63-59 win at Wyoming on Wednesday night.Brittany Wilson, who had a game-high 19 points, put Colorado (7-0) up 59-57 with 55 seconds left. After a miss by Wyoming (4-2) Lexy Kresl had two free throws at 17 seconds.However, Sborov fouled Fallon Lewis, who made two free throws with 11 remaining. Sborov made up for it with her clutch free throws and despite a 1-10 night from the field.Arielle Roberson had 13 points and 12 rebounds for Colorado.The Buffs trailed 27-21 at the half but used an 11-0 run for a 32-20 lead. Colorado built an 11-point lead before Wyoming charged back to tie the game at 57 on a Chelan Landry jumper with 57 seconds left.
EAST LANSING, Mich. — North Carolina flashed its potential again, earning another impressive victory after a second shaky setback.J.P. Tokoto had 12 points and a career-high 10 rebounds to help the Tar Heels beat No. 1 Michigan State 79-65 Wednesday night.North Carolina (5-2) has been talented enough to knock off the top-ranked Spartans and then-No. 3 Louisville this season, but the Tar Heels have also lost to Belmont and UAB."I truly believe after the Louisville win, our mentality after that was, 'Birmingham is just going to be an automatic win. Just because we're North Carolina,'" Tokoto said. "We can't have that mentality — and kind of learned that Sunday night."We came here, were ready to play, intensity level was up, and we got results."The Spartans (7-1) lost to an unranked nonconference team at home for the first time in more than a decade. They looked nothing like the team that beat then-No. 1 Kentucky a few weeks ago or the program that has had so much success over nearly two decades under coach Tom Izzo."One of the more disappointing performances of my career here," Izzo said. "From the jump ball, they kind of took it to us."The Tar Heels took control from the start, never trailed and used a 12-1 run to take a 65-52 lead with 6:02 left."Michigan State did not want it that much more than we did," North Carolina coach Roy Williams said.North Carolina outrebounded the Spartans by 11, leading to 19 second-chance points. The Tar Heels turned 14 of Michigan State's turnovers into 19 points and held the Spartans to 36 percent shooting."We're as happy as we can possibly be — 179 degrees away from where we were after the UAB game," Williams said.Kennedy Meeks scored 15 points for North Carolina and Brice Johnson had 14 off the bench. Marcus Paige and Nate Britt added 13 apiece."You can't tell in college basketball what's going to happen," Williams said. "At one point, we had three freshmen, a sophomore and a junior on the court."Gary Harris had 17 points and Keith Appling scored 13, but both Michigan State guards missed 10 of 15 shots. Adreian Payne had 16 points and eight rebounds for the Spartans, whose last loss at home against an unranked nonconference team was Toledo on Dec. 30, 2002.The Tar Heels beat a No. 1 team for the first time since March 4, 2006, at Duke, and they have a nation-high 13 wins over top-ranked teams. They've won seven straight against the Spartans, including in the 2009 NCAA final.Tokoto has taken advantage of an expanded role while P.J. Hairston and Leslie McDonald sit out because of NCAA eligibility concerns.The 6-foot-5 Tokoto, who is from Wisconsin, made some friends and family members in the stands at the Breslin Center happy while green-and-white clad fans didn't have much to get excited about.Tokoto blocked a shot early in the second half, got to a loose ball and threw it to Appling — while the Michigan State player was standing out of bounds — and made three straight shots later in the half to help the Tar Heels pull away."J.P. was really active," Williams said. "He did a lot of things. He's so athletic."Michigan State pulled into a 32-all tie at halftime after an awful start, struggling to take care of the ball or make shots.The Tar Heels scored the first six points of the game and led 16-4 while holding the Spartans to 1-of-7 shooting with four turnovers.On the bench, North Carolina freshman Isaiah Hicks implored his teammates to keep playing and avoid looking at the scoreboard. The Tar Heels seemed to do that, building a 20-6 cushion midway through the first half as Michigan State missed nine of 11 shots and turned the ball over six times.The Spartans got a scare later in the half when Appling landed hard on his right hip after defending a shot. He hobbled off the court, but was able to return to action before halftime.Michigan State outscored the Tar Heels 13-2 over the last several minutes of the first half.The Spartans, though, couldn't do enough to get ahead in the second half and they will likely fall in next week's poll after being No. 1 for a school-record three weeks this season."They came off a loss and they looked hungrier," Izzo said. "We came off all the hype and we looked not as hungry."
VILLANOVA, Pa. — Villanova returned from the Bahamas with three wins, a trophy and a national ranking.The Wildcats could have used an extended stay on the island.Darrun Hilliard scored 19 points and No. 14 Villanova overcame a 7:29 scoreless stretch to open the second half in beating Penn 77-54 on Wednesday night.The Wildcats shot only 26 percent after halftime and needed 3-point sprees to open and close the game to put away pesky Penn."I don't think the Bahamas really gave us a big head," Hilliard said, "but you can't look past anybody."James Bell scored 14 points, JayVaughn Pinkston added 13 and Villanova (8-0) won its first game as a ranked team in almost two years.The Wildcats catapulted from unranked to 14th this week, the first time they cracked the Top 25 since they were No. 19 in the Feb. 28, 2011, poll. Within a span of about 24 hours, Villanova defeated No. 2 Kansas and No. 23 Iowa to win the Battle 4 Atlantis last weekend.With a weaker team on the schedule, Villanova beat the Quakers for the 11th straight time.As the perfect start and high-profile wins thrust the Wildcats into the national spotlight, their return home was greeted as if they advanced to the Sweet Sixteen. They had fun reminders Wednesday night from their weekend in the Bahamas, including a highlight video of every clutch shot that won them the championship, and then a trophy presentation at halftime."I like being ranked, I really do," coach Jay Wright said. "It's great for the fans, great for Philadelphia basketball. Nothing bad about it."The Wildcats dominated so much in the first half that it hardly mattered they didn't score their first point of the second until the 12:31 mark. Even with the drought that saw them miss 15 of their first 16 from the floor, Penn couldn't cut the gap under double digits.Penn finally made it a nine-point game with 10 minutes left. Hilliard scored Villanova's first field goal with 9:54 to go, then made one of two free throws off a turnover to make it 53-41. The Wildcats missed 14 of their first 15 shots in the second half, yet still led by nine.Kris Jenkins hit Villanova's ninth 3-pointer to give the offense a needed boost. That stretched the lead to 15, and the Wildcats closed it out for their fifth home win."We've got some older guys that, when they want to turn it on, can turn it on," Wright said. "I think that's what happened. That's not a good plan for success."Miles Jackson-Cartwright led Penn (2-5) with 17 points and Darien Nelson-Henry had 12."I thought our guys played with energy and effort," Penn coach Jerome Allen said. "Whether they always played smart or not, it's a different story. But at least I thought they competed. But it's my responsibility to get these guys to, not just compete, but expect to win."Villanova struggled shooting in its final two tournament games on Paradise Island, including a 39 percent effort against the Jayhawks. Ryan Arcidiacono bailed out the Wildcats in that one with a winning 3-pointer, but he missed his first eight 3-point attempts against the Quakers.Penn got a 20-minute crash course in just what made the Wildcats so successful on the island.Hilliard and Bell, the tournament MVP, opened the game with 3s and Josh Hart nailed one for a 17-6 lead. Dylan Ennis made a steal at halfcourt, then was pummeled by Penn's Julian Harrell on the drive to the basket. Ennis made one of two free throws, then sank another 3-pointer on the possession for a 24-8 lead.Jenkins joined in the 3-point fun, helping Villanova get off to a 7-of-15 start from outside the arc and a 29-9 lead.The Wildcats had nine assists on their first nine baskets and kept the Ivy League Quakers from generating any offense.Then Jackson-Cartwright turned his 3-point game into a pop-a-shot contest. The 6-foot-3 guard nailed four 3s in a matter of minutes to slice the gap to 35-24."I was just trying to get a look," Jackson-Cartwright said. "I wasn't finishing at the rim. I left some points out there. I got an open look, so I was just going to let it fly."The Wildcats held off Jackson-Cartwright's surge and used a huge advantage at the free throw line (14 of 17 to 1 of 3) to lead 46-28 at the break.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — Start spreading the news. One of New York's bumbling basketball teams is about to win!The Brooklyn Nets, who have been terrible, host the Knicks, who are even worse, on Thursday night. A national TV audience can witness just how bad things are in the Big Apple.Or, they can just take it from the people involved."We are the laughingstock of the league right now," said Knicks forward Carmelo Anthony.That's not exactly what TNT was hoping for when the schedule came out.What was supposed to be a matchup that highlighted a growing rivalry between neighboring teams with high expectations has turned into the kind of game that will have fans scrambling for their remote controls in search of a holiday special to watch.The Nets are 5-13, 13th in the 15-team Eastern Conference but a full game ahead of the Knicks (3-13), who have lost nine in a row. Only the Milwaukee Bucks had a worse record entering play Wednesday."You've got two teams that expectations were high coming into the season and we've both have had our struggles," Knicks coach Mike Woodson said. "But again, if they're looking at it like we're looking at it, nobody's running away with the division and I still think our team can win the division."Yeah, well when rebuilding Boston is currently leading the Atlantic with just an 8-12 record, that isn't exactly saying much.It wasn't supposed to be this way. The Knicks won the Atlantic last season with 54 victories, the Nets weren't far behind at 49, and both thought they could be even better this time.The Nets were considered the favorites after acquiring Kevin Garnett and Paul Pierce from Boston and assembling a deep roster with the league's highest payroll — a team that would cost more than $180 million once luxury taxes were factored in. The Knicks have the league's second-highest payroll, but both teams have been wrecked by early season injuries.Pierce is out with a broken bone in his hand and Deron Williams has been sidelined by a sprained left ankle, an injury that forced Brook Lopez to miss seven games. The Knicks lost Tyson Chandler to a broken leg in their fourth game, taking away their most valuable defensive player.So as much as they want to beat each other, both teams realize one game isn't going to undo more than a month's worth of poor performances."I think at this point we're trying to figure out who we are and fix this," Garnett said after a 111-87 loss to Denver on Tuesday. "We're at home and getting beat by 30, 40 points. That's not what we want, that's not even close to what we were predicted or where we want to be."Things were much better for both teams when Kidd was playing last season for the Knicks. New York misses his leadership on the court and in the locker room, and it's been a rocky transition to the Nets' bench, where Kidd has been fined $50,000 for intentionally spilling a drink on the court to delay a game. He already shook up his staff, reassigning top assistant Lawrence Frank to a role where he won't be at practices or games.Woodson said he feels for Kidd, but he's got his own problems. With the Knicks on their longest skid in eight years, the questions about his job security come more frequently."I've had the opportunity to come in here and coach a team and turn a team around, and right now we've had our ups and downs, this early season, but am I going to throw in the towel? Absolutely not," Woodson said. "I'm still the coach of this team, we've got a big game tomorrow night, which I think we can win, so we've just got to stay focused and stay the course."Neither Anthony nor Woodson would disagree with Kidd's assessment of the current state of NBA basketball in New York. It should provide plenty of fodder for Charles Barkley, who likes to needle New Yorkers even in the best of times, and who will call the game with Marv Albert and Steve Kerr.Anthony wasn't aware the game was on TNT and wasn't concerned much with what will be said Thursday."We are the laughingstock of the league right now. It's nothing to hide. We are," he said. "So that's why it is a big game for us."Do I like being laughed at? Hell no, I don't like that feeling. But about it being TNT, about them guys mocking us, they've got to do their job. We want to win, that's the only thing that I'm focusing on."
CHARLOTTESVILLE, Va. — Josh Gasser scored 11 points and No. 8 Wisconsin won a defensive struggle against Virginia 48-38 Wednesday night in the ACC/Big Ten Challenge, giving coach Bo Ryan his 300th victory with the Badgers.The Badgers (9-0) extended their best start since opening 11-0 in 1993-94. They limited Virginia to 23 percent shooting (11 for 47), including a stretch of nearly 22 minutes spanning halftime in which the Cavaliers managed just three field goals. The Badgers won going away despite shooting only 29 percent (15 for 52).London Perrantes led Virginia (7-2) with eight points. The Cavaliers tried to make a run by speeding up the slow pace midway through the second half, but came up well short.Joe Harris, Virginia's leading scorer, finished 1 for 10 from the field with two points. Fellow starter Malcolm Brogdon was 1 for 7 and Anthony Gill went 1 for 3.Harris was called for a charge after a steal with Virginia trailing 43-36, and after Gasser made a free throw for Wisconsin, the Cavaliers missed three shots from within 3 feet on their next trip.Wisconsin used a 10-5 run over the last 7 minutes of the first half to lead 25-20 at the break.The Badgers also scored the first five points of the second half as Virginia's string of missed shots stretched to 13. After Dario Atkins hit a free throw for the Cavaliers 4:23 into the second half, a putback by Frank Kaminsky and a drive by Traevon Jackson pushed Wisconsin's lead to 34-21, and Virginia took a timeout.The Cavaliers scored seven straight points, energizing the crowd as they closed to 37-30 on Akil Mitchell's free throw with 8:08 to play, but Ben Brust scored on a drive and Gasser's 3-pointer made it 42-30.The Cavaliers got to 44-38 with 1:40 left, but never scored again.The Badgers shot 8 of 25 (32 percent) and Virginia went 8 of 27 (29.6 percent) in the half.Harris, who was averaging 12.4 points per game, went 1 for 6 from the field. Gill (10.4 points per game), the Cavaliers' No. 3 scorer, played just 9 minutes for defensive reasons.The game was a rematch from last year in the ACC/Big Ten Challenge, when Virginia won 60-54 in Madison. This time, while Virginia's nationally ranked defense kept Wisconsin well off its 76.8-point average, the Badgers' defense and Virginia's inability to convert on offense made it ugly.
SYRACUSE — Jim Boeheim sounded happy. Almost. He praised his defense. He praised his team's conditioning. Mostly, he praised his guards.As Syracuse ascended into the top five in recent weeks, winning the Maui Invitational and turning its latest game, with Indiana on Tuesday, into another lopsided victory, a backcourt among the most surprising in the nation has propelled the Orange.That included Trevor Cooney, the once-erratic sophomore shooting guard from Delaware, and Tyler Ennis, the freshman point guard from Ontario. In Syracuse's 69-52 win at the Carrier Dome, Cooney scored 21 points and nabbed 4 steals; Ennis collected 17 points, 8 assists, 7 rebounds and 4 steals.The guards stood maybe 10 feet away from each other in the locker room, lobbing compliments back and forth. The highest praise, though, came from Boeheim."I don't think you could ask for them to play at a higher level than what they've played," he said.The Orange (8-0) spent the first part of this season working on combinations and rotations, on replacing Michael Carter-Williams, Brandon Triche and James Southerland. As expected, Boeheim stamped and C. J. Fair, the Atlantic Coast Conference preseason player of the year, scored. But it was Cooney's marksmanship and Ennis's offensive command that defined an undefeated November for the Orange.Cooney started December the same way he ended November: set up behind the 3-point line, ready to catch and shoot.Against Indiana (6-2), Cooney launched 3-pointers from the right wing and left wing and left corner and so many spots in between. He staked Syracuse to an early lead and bolstered its halftime advantage and even survived a nasty collision with the base of the basket midway through the second half.Cooney said much of his improved accuracy this season resulted from the two years of work that proceeded it. In his redshirt freshman season, he often ran the steps of the Carrier Dome before practice, and he lifted weights on game days and hoisted jumpers until his arms burned. Gerry McNamara, an Orange assistant who ranks among Syracuse's deadliest career marksmen, offered tips.Boeheim smirked Tuesday when asked if Cooney had any sort of shooting revelation. "He's always shot the ball well," Boeheim said. "It's just hard to shoot from the bench."Indiana lost four of five starters and two top-four N.B.A. draft picks from last season's team, which lost to Syracuse in the N.C.A.A. tournament.For that reason, the teams' latest meeting held less suspense than usual, at least until Cooney plowed ahead on a fast break and drew contact that sent him flying into the basket with a thud usually reserved for football Saturday afternoons here. Boeheim folded his arms and glared at the nearest referee. Cooney stayed down for a beat, and then climbed to his feet and waved off Boeheim.Minutes later, Cooney flushed a dunk that opened a 58-37 advantage. The fans, a few of whom stretched out in the darker, less-populated half of the Carrier Dome, chanted his name.Indiana would not soon forget it.Its coach, Tom Crean, said Syracuse could be considered an early-season championship contender. He also noted, fairly, his own team's inexperience.Where Syracuse knocked off Minnesota, California and Baylor in succession to seize the Maui championship, it struggled to pull away from a young Indiana team in the first half. This, naturally, drew the (relative) ire of Boeheim, who reached perhaps a 2 on the Boeheim annoyance scale when the Orange committed three fouls on one possession.That led to foul trouble across the board for Syracuse's post players, and as Boeheim mixed and matched his lineup combinations, the Hoosiers rallied from a 10-0 deficit to take a 27-26 lead. Cooney quelled that run and started the Orange's romp in the second half."I wouldn't read any into this game," he said.DUKE 79, MICHIGAN 69 Quinn Cook had 24 points and 9 assists to lead No. 10 Duke at home.The freshman Jabari Parker added 15 points for the Blue Devils (7-2). (AP)ARIZONA 79, TEXAS TECH 58 Aaron Gordon scored 19 points, and Nick Johnson and Brandon Ashley added 18 each to lead No. 2 Arizona at home.The Wildcats (8-0) scored the first 10 points of the game. (AP)IOWA 98, NOTRE DAME 93 Aaron White scored 20 points, Devyn Marble and Jarrod Uthoff added 17 apiece and No. 23 Iowa won at home. (AP)UMASS 69, E. MICHIGAN 57 Raphiel Putney scored 15 points for Massachusetts, including two high-flying dunks in the final minutes, and the visiting No. 21 Minutemen won their first game as a ranked team since 1998.LOUISVILLE 91, MISSOURI ST. 49 Shoni Schimmel scored 14 points, Bria Smith added 12 and No. 7 Louisville (8-1) cruised to a win at home.The Cardinals' senior guard Antonita Slaughter collapsed and was taken off the court on a stretcher in the first half. (AP)
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — Carmelo Anthony acknowledged that the Knicks were concerned about Coach Mike Woodson's job security. A television reporter asked Kenyon Martin if he hated the Nets. Iman Shumpert bolted for the security of the locker room. Metta World Peace said he got into a fight over pasta.In other words, it was Tuesday.Nothing is normal for the Knicks, especially this season, so it was pretty much business as usual for the team two days ahead of Thursday's showdown with the Nets. The end of practice meant more questions about Woodson's being on the hot seat. More questions about Anthony's leadership abilities. More questions about their nine-game losing streak. And more questions about public and private spats between teammates, their collective patience wearing thin."I mean, that's basketball," Woodson said. "If you've ever played any kind of sports, that happens. Sometimes, it's healthy, I think."One such flare-up played out during the third quarter of Sunday's loss to the New Orleans Pelicans, when Shumpert and Anthony bickered over a defensive miscommunication. Shumpert, whom the team has tried to trade in recent weeks, did not play in the fourth quarter."That had nothing to do with anything," Woodson said. "Everybody points the finger and tries to reach for certain things, and I'm not going to allow that to happen."He can try, of course, but nothing exists in a vacuum — not in this city, and not when it comes to this team. The Knicks' struggles drew a full fleet of news cameras to the team's training facility, and World Peace seemed unimpressed with the disheveled, microphone-toting mass of humanity that assembled before him."You guys look horrible," he said.It was an atypical moment for World Peace, who was otherwise brimming with optimism. He said everyone on the team was trying hard to win games — "pushing, pushing, pushing," he said — and cited some intense practices. He said the team's goal was still to win a championship, which might have been the boldest thing anyone in the league had said all season. Or any season, for that matter. World Peace was undeterred."It's like when you're home and your son is doing bad in math class, and your goal for him does not change, right?" he said. "You still want him to be a really good kid, right? And good at math. 'Go do it, son!' That's how we are here: 'Do it, Knicks! Do it!' "As for a squabble with Martin before Sunday's game first reported by ESPN New York, World Peace said they merely had a disagreement about pasta."He had elbow pasta, and I had shell pasta," he said, "and I told him how my shell pasta was better than his elbow pasta, and he was pretty upset about that."He appeared to be joking, but it is impossible to know for sure with World Peace. He dismissed talk of locker-room friction by saying, "There's no various nothing."The Knicks are facing serious challenges, though — familiar challenges that have lingered for days and weeks. Their pick-and-roll defense, in particular, is a chemical spill. Their late-game decisions are lacking. Their confidence has evaporated."We're not in a great state, to just be frank about that," said Anthony, who added that he understood why people were asking about Woodson's status. "Welcome to New York. It happens. I mean, anytime you're in a situation like this, people try to figure out what's next. Right now, it's him. Yesterday, it might have been me."Martin said he had a hard time comprehending the team's 3-13 record. There is too much talent on the roster, he said, for the team to be so terrible. He said a potential turnaround was all about the players "caring." He threw in some profanity for good measure, in case anyone doubted his sincerity."So that's the frustration," Martin said. "When you don't expect to win, it's easy to go out and be like, 'Oh, well.' We expect to win."Martin rejected the suggestion that Woodson's job was in jeopardy, saying it was up to the players to perform. Martin said he conveyed that message to Woodson in a meeting several weeks ago. And although the season has since soured, Martin's attitude has not changed."He's put us in the best situations, with the best scouting reports," Martin said. "We're just not getting it done on the court, so it's on us."A couple of weeks ago, Woodson talked about needing to "put the fire out." On Tuesday, he said he had to "stop the bleeding." The Knicks' season has become a sliding scale of calamities (open wounds are worse than fires, apparently), and few seem to envy Woodson.At the very least, he has the sympathy of George Karl, who was fired as the coach of the Denver Nuggets at the end of last season. In an interview that was posted online last week by the Denver-based sportswriter Dave Krieger, Karl addressed the Knicks' situation."I mean, I watch the Knicks play and I wouldn't want to be in that hell for a million dollars," Karl said.Woodson, meantime, has stuck to his usual themes: of valuing every game, of doing his best to tune out the static, of striving for improvement."No, it's not panic time," he said. "We just got to figure out how to win a game."
Less than two hours before the Nets tipped off against the Denver Nuggets on Tuesday, Coach Jason Kidd announced a change to his staff. Lawrence Frank, Kidd's top lieutenant and the Nets' only assistant with head-coaching experience, was being reassigned away from game and practice duties.Most staff changes in the N.B.A. — unless they involve the head coach — hardly elicit more than a shrug from fans and the news media, but 17 games into this season, Frank's effective demotion represented a seismic shake-up for the struggling Nets. It raised more questions about Kidd's untested grip on the franchise in his first season, and it abruptly voided the perception that Kidd wanted Frank to show him the ropes, as he had said often in courting Frank to team with him in Brooklyn.Instead, the mentored has apparently spurned the mentor, casting him aside while the Nets and Kidd try to figure out what kind of team they can be together. When asked if he could have handled coaching without Frank's supervision at the outset, Kidd responded, somewhat defiantly, "I've been doing it from Day 1."He added, "Understanding what it means to be a coach and having guys ready — that's what I've been doing since summer league."That has yet to translate into on-court success, as the Nets fell to 5-13 with a 111-87 loss to the Nuggets at Barclays Center. The Nuggets (11-6) have won seven straight under Coach Brian Shaw, who had been one of the top candidates for General Manager Billy King in his off-season search for a coach.Instead, King went with Kidd, days after Kidd announced his retirement from a 19-year N.B.A. career. Less than a month after that, Kidd brought in Frank, who had been fired after two seasons as head coach of the Detroit Pistons.On the surface, it appeared to be a snug fit. Kidd played under Frank in New Jersey, starting when Frank was an assistant from 2001 to 2004. Frank became the head coach in 2004, and Kidd remained with the Nets until 2008. In parts of seven seasons leading the Nets, Frank won 225 games, more than any coach in franchise history.Their relationship was supposedly tight, and Kidd did not hide the fact that he wanted to bring Frank onto his staff. The Nets signed him for six years at more than $1 million per year. It was a homecoming story line and a marriage that seemed immeasurably beneficial to Kidd.But within time, there were also rumblings of discontent and signs of friction, such as Frank's especially vocal role in practices early on, which seemed to diminish over time, and Kidd's decision not to name Frank the interim coach while serving a two-game suspension at the start of the season.Kidd would not elaborate on why the change was made, citing only different philosophies. He said Frank would be assigned to file daily reports, but would not attend games or practices."This is my decision and what I had to do," Kidd said. "It's about basketball. That's it."Frank left the team in early October for undisclosed personal reasons. He left the Pistons for six games in March because his wife was seriously ill, and conceivably that could have factored into Tuesday's decision.But the timing of the Nets' move, after a rocky month, left them appearing only more unsettled. On Monday, they announced that Paul Pierce, one of their prized off-season acquisitions, could miss a month with a hand injury. Deron Williams, the point guard, remains sidelined with an ankle injury.Kidd now has the responsibility of shepherding a staff with no head-coaching experience, and already his sideline transgressions have put him in hot water. Last week, he was fined $50,000 by the league for spilling a cup of soda on the court to stall at the end of a game when his team had no timeouts.Kidd said there would be no other changes to the staff, meaning no one would be hired to replace Frank on the bench. Frank's specialty was coaching the defense — with John Welch addressing the offense — and Kidd said the staff now would just "be coaches."In other words, for better or worse, they are on their own.On Tuesday, the Nets trailed by only 4 points, 60-56, with 8 minutes 35 seconds left in the third. But they could not stay with the athletically superior Nuggets, who outrebounded the Nets by 56-37, pushed the tempo and shot 50.6 percent from the floor. Before the quarter was over, the Nets trailed by 20 and the fans began to boo.It was a foreboding sign that on the night the Nets demoted their defensive-minded assistant, they nearly surrendered a season high in points.Forward Kevin Garnett said the shake-up was no excuse for the team's dismal performance."There's a lot of moving parts around here," Garnett said. "We're just all trying to adjust to it."Kidd spent most of the fourth quarter seated on the bench, next to Welch, but no longer next to Frank."We've got to find some answers," Kidd said, "why we're kind of going our separate ways instead of staying as a team."
IOWA CITY, Iowa — Melissa Dixon scored seven of her game-high 27 points in the final 1:22 as No. 25 Iowa came back to defeat 22nd-ranked and previously unbeaten Syracuse 97-91 in the Big Ten/ACC challenge Thursday night.Dixon hit all 27 points — on 7 of 11 3-pointers — after halftime as Iowa (9-1) clawed back from a 47-37 gap.Bethany Doolittle scored a career-high 25 for the Hawkeyes, Samantha Logic added 14 and Kali Peschel 10 with eight rebounds.The Hawkeyes hadn't led since 12:06 of the first half when a Dixon 3 brought them to 71-69, and then Peschel grabbed a defensive rebound and scored for a 72-71 lead.Syracuse (8-1) was led by 25 points on 10-for-13 shooting from Brittney Sykes, who also hauled down 10 boards. Sykes scored 10 of her points in the final 7:14 as she and Iowa's Dixon and Logic traded baskets and the lead.
DURHAM, N.C. — Alexis Jones scored to lead No. 2 Duke in a 99-78 victory over No. 16 Purdue on Thursday night in a Big Ten/ACC Challenge game.Chelsea Gray added 16 points for Duke (9-0). Haley Peters, who had sat out four games with a knee injury, and Elizabeth Williams had 14 points each, Tricia Liston scored 13 and Richa Jackson 11.Duke coach Joanne P. McCallie moved one win away from reaching 500 for her career, improving to 499-183. The Blue Devils visit No. 17 Oklahoma on Sunday.K.K. Houser scored 20 points to lead Purdue (5-2). April Wilson had 14 and Whitney Bays 11.Duke, which leads the series 6-3, is 6-1 overall in Big Ten/ACC Challenge games while Purdue is 1-6.The Blue Devils trailed 44-41 at halftime, their first deficit at the break this season, before running away from the Boilermakers in the second half.
EAST LANSING, Mich. — Michigan State got manhandled and outhustled by North Carolina.And, the Spartans' school-record, three-week run as the No. 1 team in The Associated Press college basketball poll ended with a thud.The Tar Heels had five scorers in double figures and more players going after loose balls and rebounds in a 79-65 win over Michigan State on its home court Wednesday night."We looked like a softer team," Spartans coach Tom Izzo said. "That solely falls on me, nobody else."Despite playing in a highly anticipated game in front of fired-up fans, Michigan State (7-1) looked listless early and couldn't recover.The Tar Heels scored the first six points of the game and led 16-4 while holding the Spartans to 1-for-7 shooting with four turnovers."They came out and hit us in the mouth first," Michigan State guard Gary Harris said. "We never even got the lead. They came in with a lot of energy and got the win."The Spartans started the season ranked No. 2 and moved to the top spot by beating then-No. 1 Kentucky, becoming just the third top-ranked team in program history. They had one lackluster win over Columbia after beating the Wildcats, then were relatively impressive in the previous five games.Behind the scenes, though, Izzo was worried that his team wouldn't fare well against North Carolina. Harris has been slowed by an ankle injury, Adreian Payne is playing with a foot ailment and Matt Costello might have mononucleosis."We played how we practiced," Izzo said.The Tar Heels, meanwhile, were forced to watch more film from their loss to UAB — which followed a win over then-No. 3 Louisville — the night before they played at Michigan State because coach Roy Williams still had some teaching points he wanted to make."I told them at that point, the UAB game was over," Williams said.North Carolina (5-2) made the most of its opportunity to flash its potential, dominating a team that hadn't lost at home to an unranked, nonconference opponent for more than a decade."They came off a loss and they looked hungrier," Izzo said. "We came off all the hype and we looked not as hungry."Kennedy Meeks scored 15 points, Brice Johnson had 14 off the bench, Marcus Paige and Nate Britt added 13 apiece while J.P. Tokoto had 12 points and a career-high 10 rebounds for the Tar Heels."I truly believe after the Louisville win, our mentality after that was, 'Birmingham is just going to be an automatic win. Just because we're North Carolina,'" Tokoto said. "We can't have that mentality — and kind of learned that Sunday night."We came here, were ready to play, intensity level was up, and we got results."And, the Spartans weren't ready and didn't respond later in the game when it was clear they had to play with more energy and passion to compete."One of the more disappointing performances of my career here," Izzo said. "From the jump ball, they kind of took it to us."The Tar Heels took control from the start, never trailed and used a 12-1 run to take a 65-52 lead with 6:02 left."Michigan State did not want it that much more than we did," North Carolina coach Roy Williams said.North Carolina outrebounded the Spartans by 11, leading to 19 second-chance points. The Tar Heels turned 14 of Michigan State's turnovers into 19 points and held the Spartans to 36 percent shooting."We're as happy as we can possibly be — 179 degrees away from where we were after the UAB game," Williams said."You can't tell in college basketball what's going to happen," Williams said. "At one point, we had three freshmen, a sophomore and a junior on the court."Harris had 17 points and Keith Appling scored 13, but both Michigan State guards missed 10 of 15 shots. Payne had 16 points and eight rebounds for the Spartans, whose last loss at home against an unranked nonconference team was Toledo on Dec. 30, 2002.The Tar Heels beat a No. 1 team for the first time since March 4, 2006, at Duke, and they have a nation-high 13 wins over top-ranked teams. They've won seven straight against the Spartans, including in the 2009 NCAA final."Honestly, I think this is going to be good for us," Michigan State center Matt Costello said. "We came in with high expectations of doing well. And we've got the guys to do it."
J. P. Tokoto had 12 points and a career-high 10 rebounds to help North Carolina (5-2) upset No. 1 Michigan State , 79-65, on Wednesday night. Michigan State (7-1) fell to an unranked nonconference team at home for the first time in more than a decade.WISCONSIN 48, VIRGINIA 38 Josh Gasser scored 11 points as No. 8 Wisconsin won a defensive struggle over host Virginia in the Atlantic Coast Conference/Big Ten Challenge, giving Coach Bo Ryan his 300th victory with the Badgers (9-0). London Perrantes led Virginia (7-2) with 8 points.OHIO STATE 76, MARYLAND 60 LaQuinton Ross scored 17 of his 20 points in the first half, hitting his first four 3-pointers, to lead No. 5 Ohio State (7-0) to a victory at home over Maryland in the A.C.C./Big Ten Challenge. Dez Wells had 19 points for Maryland (5-3).VILLANOVA 77, PENN 54 Darrun Hilliard scored 19 points and James Bell had 14 to lead No. 14 Villanova (8-0) over visiting Penn. Miles Jackson-Cartwright led Penn (2-5) with 17 points.LOUISVILLE 90, MISSOURI-K.C. 62 Montrezl Harrell scored 14 points to lead five Louisville players in double figures as the seventh-ranked Cardinals (7-1) routed visiting Missouri-Kansas City. Nelson Kirksey and Martez Harrison had 14 points each for U.M.K.C. (1-6).DAYTON 56, DELAWARE STATE 46 Matt Kavanaugh scored 11 points as No. 25 Dayton (7-1) overcame a sluggish first half, poor free-throw shooting and a late slump to defeat visiting Delaware State (2-6).NORTH CAROLINA 75, NEBRASKA 62 Xylina McDaniel made 11 of 15 shots and scored a game-high 25 points to lead No. 18 North Carolina (7-2) in a victory at home over No. 15 Nebraska. Jordan Hooper led the Cornhuskers (6-2) with 18 points.MARYLAND 67, OHIO STATE 55 Alyssa Thomas had 25 points and 12 rebounds as No. 8 Maryland (8-1) beat visiting Ohio State in the A.C.C./Big Ten Challenge. Ameryst Alston scored 18 for the Buckeyes (6-4).NOTRE DAME 77, PENN STATE 67 Natalie Achonwa had 21 points and 10 rebounds to lead visiting No. 4 Notre Dame (7-0) over No. 10 Penn State (5-2).IN OTHER GAMES Aaryn Ellenberg scored 25 points, and four teammates scored in double figures as No. 17 Oklahoma (6-2) defeated visiting Western Illinois (4-5), 97-80. ... Hallie Christofferson had 22 points and hit 8 of 10 free throws as No. 20 Iowa State (8-0) cruised by visiting Northern Iowa (2-7), 83-55. ... Jasmine Sborov made two free throws with five seconds left to clinch a 63-59 win for No. 11 Colorado (7-0) at Wyoming (4-2).
EAST RUTHERFORD, N.J. — A day after Coach Jason Kidd demoted Lawrence Frank, his top assistant on the bench, to a much-reduced role filing daily reports, he had the Nets watch film of Tuesday's humbling 111-87 loss to the Denver Nuggets.Kidd showed his team how it had not communicated enough against the Nuggets, had not grabbed critical rebounds and had not done whatever else was necessary to stop Denver from scoring — all the responsibilities Frank used to have in coordinating the Nets' defense.He told the players there would be no practice Wednesday, the day before their first game this season against the Knicks, whose record, at 3-13, is even worse."I've always thought film was somewhere you can learn," Kidd said."That's a form of practice. You don't always have to be on the court to learn."This has been a rough season for Kidd, his first at any level as a coach, and he was again asked to explain his reasons for removing Frank from his coaching staff. Kidd insisted it had not been a difficult decision to make, even though he is just 18 games into his coaching career and Frank was supposed to be the person to lean on for insight."He's working," Kidd said of Frank. "He's giving his reports. Do I miss him? No. He's doing his job, what I've asked him to do."Kidd was asked what exactly Frank, who was not at Tuesday's game, would be doing."Whatever you would like to write," Kidd told one reporter. When asked for specifics, Kidd said, "A report about the game."So it went at Nets practice. Meanwhile, at Knicks practice in Greenburgh, N.Y., Carmelo Anthony used the word "laughingstock" to describe how his team was viewed around the league."It's nothing to hide — we are," he said. "Do I like being laughed at? Hell no. I don't like that feeling."
STILLWATER, Okla. — Le'Bryan Nash had 16 points to lead five Oklahoma State players in double figures as the ninth-ranked Cowboys made easy work of South Carolina in a 79-52 win on Friday night.Marcus Smart added 13 points for the Cowboys (8-1), who bounced back from their first loss of the season last week. Markel Brown added 11 points, and Brian Williams and Michael Cobbins finished with 10 points each.Oklahoma State, which held the Gamecocks to a season low in points, led by as many as 26 points in the first half, putting the game out of reach with an early 25-2 run.Jaylen Shaw led South Carolina (2-3) with 13 points, while Tyrone Johnson finished with 12.Oklahoma State lost 73-68 to No. 16 Memphis last week in the championship game of the Old Spice Classic. That game was the fourth within a week in Florida for the Cowboys, who played against the Tigers with Smart — who had 12 points — battling virus-like symptoms.Smart was back to his usual self on Friday, scoring 11 points in the first half as Oklahoma State built a 26-point lead and put the game well out of reach. The sophomore added five assists, four rebounds and two steals in a game in which the Cowboys gave him plenty of help.Nash was 5 of 7 from the field, while Cobbins was 5 of 6. Oklahoma State scored 33 points off 24 turnovers by the Gamecocks.South Carolina hadn't played a game in nearly two weeks, with its last outing an 84-72 victory over Florida International on Nov. 24.Whether it was the time off, or simply the swarming Cowboys' defense, the Gamecocks struggled mightily to score in the first half. South Carolina trailed 39-15 at halftime, shooting just 20 percent (4 of 20) and committing 13 turnovers that led to 21 points by Oklahoma State.The Gamecocks finished 16 of 45 (35.6 percent) from the field despite hitting 6 of 11 3-point attempts.Led by Smart, the Cowboys had no such problems — using a 25-2 run to put the game out of reach in the opening minutes.Williams' free throw made it 27-5, capping a run during which the Gamecocks went nearly 5 minutes without scoring.Smart finished the first-half scoring in style, driving the baseline for a left-handed dunk, but he was hardly the only one to get in on the fun for the Cowboys.Nash had a one-handed dunk after a spin move on the baseline, and Cobbins brought the Gallagher-Iba Arena crowd to its feet with a two-handed follow dunk — the first of two the junior had in the game.
SPOKANE, Wash. — Keani Albanez scored 17 points and Haiden Palmer had 16 as No. 24 Gonzaga routed Portland State 96-47 on Friday night in a dominating performance.Gonzaga (6-1) scored the game's first 19 points and was up 40-8 with less than six minutes left in the first half. The Bulldogs led 53-13 at the break.Gonzaga held Portland State's leading scorer, Kate Lanz, to just 2 points. The Vikings (2-4) shot just 32.8 percent from the field, committed 26 turnovers and were outrebounded 56-33.Jazmine Redmon scored 13 points, Lindsay Sherbert had 11 and Sonja Greinacher added 10 as Gonzaga had five players score in double figures.It was the Bulldogs' fourth straight win after losing to then-No. 11 Oklahoma on Nov. 14.
LAWRENCE, Kan. — Kansas coach Bill Self freely admits he is to blame for the nearly monthlong trek that his young, impressionable bunch of Jayhawks is trying to weather early in the season.After all, he is the one who signed off on the schedule.It seemed like a good idea back when he was piecing it together. The Jayhawks would start by hitting the Bahamas for a tournament during the Thanksgiving weekend, and then play tough road games against Colorado and Florida before facing New Mexico in Kansas City, Mo.Now, after a sluggish three games at the Battle 4 Atlantis, the No. 6 Jayhawks are trying to catch their breath with a trip to the high altitude of Boulder, Colo., up next."I don't know who did our scheduling. I don't really understand," Self said facetiously. "It's probably not the wisest thing to have done. But you know what? We'll come together. The Atlantis trip didn't serve its purpose for coming together, so hopefully we'll do a much better job in Boulder."Saturday's matchup isn't going to be easy for the Jayhawks, either, like so many were when the Buffaloes were still members of the Big 12. Colorado is off to an 8-1 start on the season."We're familiar with them, and I'm sure they are with us," said Self, whose team routed Colorado at Allen Fieldhouse last year. "But they've got a nice team. They've won eight in a row. They should be confident. They've won away from home, and it'll be a tough game, very tough. But fun."After that comes a date with the No. 15 Gators (6-1) as part of the Big 12-SEC Challenge, and then the Jayhawks' now-annual game at the Sprint Center against the Lobos (6-1)Throw the current road trip on top of beating then-No. 4 Duke in Chicago in their second game of the season, and it's hard to imagine the Jayhawks (6-1) having a more difficult opening schedule. The lost in the Bahamas to Villanova."You know, this is one thing about my guys that I need to be careful of," Self said. "Guys, it's a marathon, and you're going to have games where you don't play your best. The key is to win the games where you don't play your best, and we didn't do that one time against a top 20 team on a neutral floor. And with young kids it's going to happen."Self is hopeful that all the road games will help prepare one of the youngest teams that he's ever had at Kansas for the rigors of Big 12 play.Already, star freshman Andrew Wiggins has gone through plenty of growing pains, and fellow first-year players Wayne Selden, Joel Embiid and Connor Frankamp are also learning on the fly."We don't consistently play with the sense of urgency that teams here in the past have played, would probably be the best way to put it," Self said. "A lot of that is our veterans need to do a better job of educating our younger guys on exactly what level you have to play at all the time."The UTEP game was a great example," Self said of the third-place game in Atlantis. "We didn't play great against UTEP, but they scored 18 points the last 1:49 off of guys just not concentrating."That's not going to work when the Jayhawks dive into the Big 12, which features three other ranked teams in No. 9 Oklahoma State, No. 17 Iowa State and No. 20 Baylor. By the time Kansas returns to Allen Fieldhouse to play Georgetown on Dec. 21, it will have been nearly a month since it played its last game in the friendly confines.The Jayhawks will have traveled more than 3,000 miles on their brutal road trip."You've got to win at home. I mean, it's a home game. That's what you're supposed to do," Self said this week, "but going and beating somebody else in their building, where the deck is supposedly stacked against you from a crowd standpoint, I think is what would spur me on. That's what we need to make sure spurs our players on."
ATLANTA — Kyle Korver hopes to be able to sleep better now that his chase for the NBA record for consecutive games with a 3-pointer is over.Korver made a 3 for a 90th straight game, Al Horford scored 22 points, and the Atlanta Hawks beat the Cleveland Cavaliers 108-89 Friday night.Korver's 3 with 5:29 remaining in the first quarter broke a tie with Dana Barros (1994-96)."It feels good, I'm glad it's done" Korver said after scoring 10 points and making 2 of 3 from beyond the arc. "My naps the last couple (game days) haven't been very solid. I'm the product of good team basketball, of setting screens and (getting) good passes and floor spacing and all of that."There's a lot of thanks to go around ... players who aren't here, coaches who aren't here this year and this group in here. I just said, 'Thank you.'"Korver has made 47 percent of his 3-point shots (235 of 502) during the streak.Hawks coach Mike Budenholzer said he didn't think the team went out of its way to get the 11-year veteran from Creighton the ball in position to break the record, but admitted that his players might say otherwise.Korver missed his first try just 1:03 into the game as fans rose from their seats as he rose to shoot. Everybody in Philips Arena stood up again just an instant before the record-setter swished to give Atlanta an 18-10 lead."DeMarre (Carroll) passed up a wide-open shot to try to get him the ball, and I gave up a transition try," said Atlanta point guard Jeff Teague, who scored 13 points. "I wish I made the pass."That honor went to forward Paul Millsap, who scored 16 points and tied his season high with 14 rebounds to help offset a season-high 30 points off the bench by Cleveland's Dion Waiters.Millsap, who was also a teammate of Korver's with the Jazz, was more proud of his assist to Korver than anything else."I'm in the history book now," he said with a smile. "I'm in awe to see something like that. Teams focus on keeping him off the 3-point line, and for him to do that for so long is an amazing accomplishment."Atlanta (11-10) won with balance as seven Hawks scored in double figures and the home team had little trouble with the Cavs (6-13), who fell to 1-10 on the road.Jarrett Jack added 13 points off the bench for Cleveland, but all Cavs other than him, Waiters and Bynum (20 points, season-high 13 rebounds) combined to shoot 12 for 50.Cleveland starters Kyrie Irving and Alonzo Gee went scoreless. Irving, who entered the game averaging 20.8 points per game, shot 0 for 9.Atlanta raced to a 37-20 lead in the first quarter while Korver made two of Atlanta's five 3s in the period. Millsap connected from 50 feet as the buzzer sounded.Atlanta did not make a 3 in the second quarter, yet built a 63-43 halftime lead as Millsap had 14 points and seven rebounds in the first two periods.Cleveland went on a 12-0 run in the third quarter, pulling to 77-60 on Bynum's putback.Waiters and rookie guard Matthew Dellavedova hit 3-pointers on consecutive possessions to pull the Cavs to 84-72 early in the fourth before Atlanta steadily pulled away.Waiters shot 13 for 20 shots, but lamented the Cavs' slow start and lethargic showing."We've got to come out with a sense of urgency," he said. "It's frustrating to have to keep talking about the same thing over and over."Superman's not coming in the locker room to help us. It's just us. We're all we've got so at the end of the day we've got to come out and play, play the right way, too."Cleveland entered the night having won back-to-back games for the first time this season, but was never really in this game. The Cavs trailed 77-48 in the third quarter."We've got to come out, we've got to compete for 48 minutes," Cleveland coach Mike Brown said. "We've got to find a grittiness ... I'm not worried about Kyrie's shot. He's going to make enough shots."NOTES: Hawks reserve post man Gustavo Ayon suffered a left ankle sprain and a left leg contusion in the final minute of the game. His status for Tuesday's game against the Thunder was not announced.
EL SEGUNDO, Calif. — The Lakers expect to have Kobe Bryant back in their lineup when they face the Toronto Raptors on Sunday.The team posted a dramatic video on its Facebook page Friday indicating Bryant will be back for the game.Bryant hasn't played this season while recovering a torn Achilles tendon. He had surgery in April.Los Angeles signed the fourth-leading scoring in NBA history to a two-year contract extension last week. Bryant's new deal is reportedly worth $48.5 million and takes him into his 20th season with the Lakers.
CHICAGO — The way everything was crumbling, the Chicago Bulls sure needed a reprieve. Knocking off the defending champions was a nice one.Carlos Boozer scored 27 points, and the Bulls pounded LeBron James and the Miami Heat 107-87 on Thursday night.Luol Deng had 20 points, Taj Gibson chipped in with 19, and Joakim Noah added 17 points and 15 rebounds as the Bulls had no trouble taking out the Southeast Division leaders.Chicago took control early on and hung on down the stretch after watching a 25-point lead in the third quarter dwindle to 12 late in the game.It was an impressive showing by a team that had dropped six of seven and is once again trying to get by without the injured Derrick Rose."Our team needed it," Noah said. "We went through a lot the past couple of weeks. It's really hard to play without Derrick. I want to win with Derrick Rose."The Bulls shot 50 percent and were 10 for 19 on 3-pointers — four by Deng and three by Kirk Hinrich, who scored 13. They also outrebounded Miami 49-27.James scored 21 points for Miami, but the Heat shot a season low for the second straight game, converting 41.6 percent from the field after hitting 43.9 percent in Tuesday's loss to Detroit."We can't just brush this loss aside," coach Erik Spoelstra said. "We have to really own it, to understand what happened. They just got whatever they wanted, right in the paint, at the rim and if they missed those, then they're just beating us up at the glass."It didn't help that Dwyane Wade stayed back at the hotel with an illness after sitting out the previous game because of knee soreness.Chris Andersen missed this one for personal reasons, but the Heat will get no sympathy from Chicago.After all, the Bulls lost Rose to a torn meniscus in his right knee in a game at Portland on Nov. 22, and although the former MVP left the door slightly open for a playoff return earlier in the day, the team has ruled him out for the rest of the season."We really got snake-bitten," Gibson said. "When that happened to Derrick, that was really like, 'Wow.' We're a family in here. When that stuff kind of happens, it was just ... tough. We were on the road, odds were against us."And as if that six-game trip wasn't difficult enough, there was a triple-overtime loss to New Orleans on Monday in their first game back at the United Center.The Bulls did just fine on Thursday, although things got a little tight down the stretch.Miami cut it to 93-81 on Norris Cole's runner with 5:38 remaining. But Gibson answered with a jumper and blocked a layup by Udonis Haslem.Deng made a 3 with just under four minutes left to make it 98-81, and Chicago hung on from there.Before that, the only tension came early in the third quarter when Hinrich took a shot to the neck from Cole away from the ball. The result was an angry exchange, a flagrant foul one for Cole and a technical for Hinrich.The Bulls' guard hit both free throws after James missed a foul shot, making it 67-45.Boozer led a scorching start by Chicago, scoring 19 points as the Bulls built a 58-44 halftime lead.But in the end, it was the Bulls' rebounding and defense that had the Heat shaking their heads."We've never been a great rebounding team but we've been able to overcome that," James said. "Teams have done a much better job of rebounding against us. It could be an effort thing, it could be a lot of things but we just got to go out and just go get them."I'm going to do a better job of that, get more rebounds. But it's a group thing for a team. We don't have a Kevin Love or Joakim Noah or Dwight Howard, those types of guys who can get you 15-plus, we have to do it as a collective group."NOTES: There was a moment of silence before the game to honor Nelson Mandela, who died Thursday at the age of 95. ... This was the Bulls' most lopsided win over the Heat since a 126-96 blowout at Miami on Jan. 16, 2008. ... Andersen expected to rejoin Miami on Friday in Minnesota. The Heat play the Timberwolves on Saturday.
Back when the Knicks were winning year after year — they made the playoffs for 14 straight seasons, like clockwork — it was easy to be a fan.The public address announcer would introduce the team, and Madison Square Garden would tremble with cheers. "Paaat-rick Ewing!" "John Staaarks!" "Charles Oakleeey!" You could feel the floor and the seats rumbling.In those days, you could count on the Knicks. Not for championships, because the last time they won one was in 1973. But you counted on them for other things that made them fun to watch: great basketball, close games, fierce rivalries. They were often the tenacious, blue-collar underdogs who didn't back down, even in the face of Michael Jordan's superhuman jukes and dunks, and Reggie Miller's annoyingly unstoppable 3-pointers.Once, the exciting Knicks of old made me jump to my feet so forcefully that I ripped stitches out of my surgically repaired knee. In 1994, when the telecast of Game 5 of the finals between the Knicks and the Rockets was interrupted by O. J. Simpson's Ford Bronco chase, I sat on the couch frozen and in tears.That's how much emotion the Knicks once inspired in me, and in the city. It was heart-rending for them to come so close to championships and never win one, but the fans at least got their money's worth.Now look at the Knicks. They have made the playoffs in 4 of the past 12 years. Last year, they won 54 games and reached the second round of the playoffs, kindling hopes that they could be great again, only to be among the N.B.A.'s bottom-feeders this season. Their inconsistency makes it so hard to love them.At Barclays Center on Thursday night, in a game formerly earmarked as one of the hottest tickets of the season, the Knicks beat the Nets, 113-83, to break a nine-game losing streak. The victory boosted their record to 4-13. The Nets, also considered a playoff team at the start of the season, fell to 5-14. So much for New York being a basketball town.The matchup could have been a thriller between two equally lousy teams — hey, even watching 8-year-olds play basketball can be entertaining if the game is tight — but it wasn't even close to being that. The Knicks had a 25-point lead after three quarters, enough to douse any electricity in the air.Sure, Nets fans have it bad. Even though their team has the league's highest payroll — the Knicks are No. 2 — and even after the off-season additions of Kevin Garnett and Paul Pierce, the Nets are still trying to find their way. Coach Jason Kidd said the team wasn't having fun.After Thursday's game, Garnett didn't have to tell us that. He bowed his head and let out a huge sigh that echoed through the room as he talked to reporters.The Knicks held their heads high. Coach Mike Woodson said it was "like old times again." Carmelo Anthony said the team played with more confidence than usual and showed just how good it could be. A day after calling the team "a laughingstock," he managed a smile.One victory against a weak team doesn't fix the Knicks' problems, though. They are still a hapless team that is somehow weaker than the sum of its very talented parts.Before the game, Charles Barkley, an analyst for TNT, gave me a quick tutorial on why the Knicks couldn't match the success they had achieved in the late 1980s, the '90s and the early 2000s.This is not Anthony's team or any other player's team, Barkley said. He told me these Knicks were not leaders, not the way Ewing was in the days he commanded the team to excellence. And they're not stick-with-it guys like Starks, Oakley or Anthony Mason, Ewing's teammates who epitomized the grittiness of New Yorkers.Then Barkley smirked and said: "You want to know what these guys are like? Ha, let me put it this way: Dr. Phil would have his hands full."Should we feel sorry, then, for the poor, dysfunctional Knicks, who have yet to win two consecutive games this season? Or should they feel sorry for us?If the Knicks need a psychologist, as Barkley suggested, their fans do, too. During that 14-year playoff run in which the Knicks were perennial also-rans, free therapy sessions should have come with every season ticket, or at least every one of Charles Smith's missed layups.Now fans have to wonder which Knicks will show up. On Thursday, the Knicks drew us in again. They shot brilliantly — 57.1 percent from the field and 59.3 percent from the 3-point line. While it wasn't a great accomplishment, given that it happened against the lowly Nets, it still showed resilience and gumption.The fans in the stands cheered the loudest, though, when Knicks center Andrea Bargnani tangled with Garnett in the fourth quarter. The two players ended up on the floor after trying to position themselves for a rebound. Pushing ensued. Benches cleared. Fans throughout the arena rose to their feet, seemingly ready to take part in a brawl after an evening of lackluster competition. Bargnani and Garnett received technical fouls.Not long afterward, Bargnani ended his night acting like a tough-guy Knicks player of the past. Thrown out of the game after talking trash to Garnett, he headed off the court with an icy look and the swagger of a Western gunslinger. The crowd roared.He showed that the Knicks could still be feisty. And whether they win or lose, that's exactly what will keep some fans coming back.
Carmelo Anthony found himself in an unfamiliar position in the first half: sitting on the bench, a towel draped across his lap.It had been a trying season for the Knicks, their struggles rising in a crescendo before they arrived in Brooklyn to face the Nets at Barclays Center. Anthony, for all the Knicks' problems, had been shouldering much of the load: scoring, rebounding, challenging, exhorting. It had done little good.On Thursday, though, everything changed — for one night, at least. Anthony attempted the fewest shots he had all season, determined to act more as facilitator than aggressor.He passed the ball (6 assists). He crashed the boards (10 rebounds). He defended (a little). The result was even more time on the bench in the fourth quarter, a luxury for Anthony as his teammates put the final touches on a resounding 113-83 victory over the woebegone Nets."Those guys just allowed me to lead them by doing their part," Anthony said after rattling through half the roster.Anthony played his most controlled game of the season, collecting 19 points on 8-of-12 shooting as many of the team's lesser lights emerged from the muck of a nine-game losing streak. Six players cracked double figures in scoring. The Knicks shot 59.3 percent from 3-point range.Some of the team's best basketball did not even feature Anthony. Coach Mike Woodson rested him for nearly four and a half minutes to start the second quarter, and the Knicks performed well with crisp ball movement, unselfish play and production from unexpected sources. During one sequence, Tim Hardaway Jr. was able to penetrate before finding Kenyon Martin along the sideline. Martin then sent a bounce pass to Amar'e Stoudemire for a dunk."Everybody was committed," Woodson said. "Everybody that played gave me something when they were on the floor."The Knicks had three days to gear up for the game after Sunday's loss to the New Orleans Pelicans, which also meant three days for the news media to sell all its potential consequences. Part of that involved yet another round of questions for Anthony about his future. He reiterated that his focus was on the present, that he was not even thinking about free agency next summer. He had enough to worry about, even as he acknowledged that the team was a "laughingstock.""Anytime you losing, guys are going to laugh at you," he said after Thursday's game. "When you're doing good, they pat you on the back. That's just society. That's just life."Against the Nets, Anthony assisted on two of the Knicks' first four field goals. The Knicks had a 21-10 lead before Anthony even launched his first shot, a 3-pointer that he drilled after Raymond Felton found him on a skip pass. But that was the exception. Anthony seemed pleased to see his teammates assert themselves.He entered the game leading the league in minutes, with Woodson asking much of him, perhaps too much. Anthony's style — lots of isolations, lots of turnaround jumpers — is predicated on contact, and it takes a toll. As Doc Rivers, the coach of the Los Angeles Clippers, said last week, Anthony is unusual in that respect."Carmelo is so physically strong that it takes a lot out of you," Rivers said. "Some guys score on you, and you're still pretty fresh. Some guys beat you up and score on you, and Carmelo's in that category — him and LeBron James. They do both at the same time, and that's hard."Hard on defenders, but hard on Anthony, too. He has spent 11 seasons absorbing the blows of 250-pound basketball players. The Nets threw Joe Johnson at him. Then, Alan Anderson. Then, Mirza Teletovic.Woodson has said that he would like to monitor Anthony's playing time, that he is aware of the dangers of keeping him on the court. But injuries to other players and the mounting pressure on Woodson to win a game (or two) had left him with little choice."You always worry about that," Woodson said before the game, "but if there comes a time when Melo comes to me and says, 'Hey, I need to back off the minutes,' then I'll back off."Woodson was asked if it was fair to expect Anthony to request a breather. "This is my third year with Melo," he said, "so I kind of got a nice feel for who he is as a player in terms of how I play him minute-wise."On Thursday, Anthony handled everything that came his way, especially in the third quarter. He was there for a put-back when Andrea Bargnani misfired on a jumper. Later, after Anthony pump-faked on a 3-pointer, he passed the ball to Bargnani, who fed Iman Shumpert for one of his five 3-pointers.Anthony eventually migrated back to the bench. He played just 31 minutes. It was another victory for the Knicks on a night when everything broke their way.
The Knicks have spent weeks in disarray, searching far and wide to solve a season-long malaise. They should have known that relief was right under their noses, across the river in Brooklyn.The reeling Knicks, losers of nine consecutive games, embarrassed the even-worse Nets, 113-83, on Thursday night at Barclays Center and delayed, temporarily, discussions about when they might hit rock bottom.But there may be little question now that the Nets are approaching those depths. The defeat was their sixth straight at home, another inglorious blowout. Though the boos were loud, they might have been louder if not for the many Knicks fans among the sellout crowd.The Nets fell to 5-14, and it is clear that they do not have a concept of how to win a basketball game. It is a situation that seems increasingly untenable, and questions about whether personnel changes are needed will become louder if humiliating losses continue.Their problems were particularly pronounced on Thursday, given that the Knicks (4-13) were matching, if not exceeding, their crosstown rivals' futility. The Nets were so bad, though, that the night's opponent most likely did not matter."Regardless if we're getting beat by teams that are better than us, I'm sure they're not 25 or 30 points better than us in our own building," said Joe Johnson, the Nets' shooting guard.The Nets expressed conflicting sentiments after the game, sometimes in the same breath. On one hand, there were no excuses; the players on the court are good enough to win each night. On the other hand, there were too many injuries to manage, too many new things to learn."We feel we have enough talent to win, but we're coming up short," Coach Jason Kidd said.But Kidd, for the most part, seemed unnaturally unperturbed. He was asked, for instance, whether it was embarrassing to be blown out at home on a somewhat consistent basis.Kidd said: "As you become a veteran in this league, you win by 1, you lose by 30, it's a win or a loss. We've got to get back to understanding what we've got to get better at. Health is one of those issues. So hopefully we get healthier soon."Not everyone shared his serenity. Johnson shared his opinion that the Nets "don't have any chemistry" and that they "don't really have an identity" on the offensive end. He said they had become satisfied tossing the ball to center Brook Lopez and then watching him become engulfed by opponents."It's getting embarrassing at this point," Johnson said.Still, the game, in a way, was more entertaining than most would have imagined, though it could never live up to its original billing. Months ago, the N.B.A. schedule augured for this night a heavyweight bout, a titillating interborough battle between two teams that were openly expressing championship expectations.After decades of tepid interstate conflict, the teams split their four games last season, conjuring multiple exciting finishes. Over recent weeks, though, the meeting devolved into a national joke. Kidd earlier this week noted that "both teams stink."And not only the New York area would be subjected to the ugliness; the game was scheduled to be broadcast on national television. Here were two wealthy organizations, with two of the league's highest payrolls, bringing to the game a combined 8-26 record.But the Knicks, for a night, were transformed into a cohesive and high-flying outfit. They blustered around the Barclays Center floor, moving the ball, soaking up cheers. They shot 44 for 77 from the floor and a scintillating 16 for 27 from 3-point range. Six Knicks scored in double figures. Carmelo Anthony had a team-high 19 points and added 10 rebounds and 6 assists."We understood that it was a big game for us," Amar'e Stoudemire said. "It was a must-win situation at this point."And devoid of competitiveness, the game still managed to get chippy. With 9 minutes 12 seconds remaining, Kevin Garnett and Andrea Bargnani got tangled up while fighting for a rebound. The two were soon staring each other down as their teammates swarmed around them.Tim Hardaway Jr., a Knicks rookie, gestured to the fans seated near the Knicks' bench, and they roared. One minute later, Bargnani hit a 3-pointer in Garnett's face, talked trash all the way down the court, and was promptly ejected from the game. He left hearing applause all the way into the tunnel.Garnett was the target of jeers and obscene chants throughout the game. Knicks fans most likely recalled the spat last Jan. 7 between Garnett and Anthony — one that began on the court and continued after the game, when Anthony went looking for Garnett outside the Boston locker room and then near the Celtics team bus.It was an undesirable scene for the Nets, a team still trying to gain a foothold in the city. Kidd suggested that it was too early to make a judgment on his team — four key players remain out. "I think you get evaluated by being whole," he said. "It starts there. Once that occurs, then you're evaluated. And that's as simple as it gets."The only thing simple Thursday was the Nets' ineptitude.
CHICAGO — Derrick Rose, the Chicago Bulls' point guard, hobbled on crutches into a room in the basement of the United Center on Thursday morning to meet the news media for the first time since he had surgery last week to repair a meniscus tear in his right knee. He wore a red hooded sweatshirt with his trademark logo, a design with the letter "D" inside a rose.Ten minutes into his news conference, Rose, 25, was asked what he might say to people who think the Bulls ought to reconsider his role as the centerpiece of the franchise, given his injury history. He missed all of last season recovering with a torn anterior cruciate ligament in his left knee and played in just 39 games during the shortened 2011-12 season. The Bulls ruled him out for this season when they announced his operation.Rose paused, pondering the question. He scratched his chin thoughtfully. Then he said: "You can be a fool if you want to. I know I'm going to be all right."While fans in Chicago and plenty of others around the N.B.A. fret about Rose's future, the former most valuable player remained defiant in the wake of his latest setback, assuring everyone that he would be back — again."I could get hurt 10 more times," Rose said. "I'm never going to stop."Rose spoke for more than 20 minutes about his faith in God, in himself and in his body to heal. He said he knew in the locker room immediately after the injury — which occurred as he cut to the basket without the ball in a game at Portland — that it was serious. He said that he had hoped it was not another injury to his anterior cruciate ligament and that he was relieved when tests revealed the meniscus tear.The injury is considered less severe than the one to the A.C.L. Rose said he has put weight on the leg, something he did not do for several months after his last operation. He has also begun his rehabilitation, which includes swimming and yoga."This is the nature of the N.B.A.," Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau said. "Most players, at some point in their career, they're going to deal with injury. That he made it through the A.C.L., I think that gives him a frame of reference to deal with this one."Rose said he chose not to be bogged down by negative thoughts and self-pity. Instead, he promised he would be the same explosive player he was before tearing his A.C.L., although his aggressive style of play has been cited as a possible cause for the injuries."I could care less what people say about me, criticize my game, or whatever," he said. "I have a unique way of playing basketball and I can't change that."Contrary to the team's statement after the injury, Rose also left the door open for a return should the Bulls advance to the playoffs. "If I'm healthy and the situation is right, I'm going to be back," he said.What precisely those circumstances might be are unclear, but the Bulls, despite recent struggles, remain in playoff contention in the notoriously bad Eastern Conference. The Bulls were 6-4 when Rose went down. They wound up losing to Portland after his exit, and have gone 1-4 since, including the worst loss in franchise history, a 121-82 defeat to the Los Angeles Clippers on Nov. 24.At 7-9, the Bulls were in seventh place in the Eastern Conference heading into Thursday night's game against the visiting Miami Heat. It would have been a matchup of heavyweights if Rose were healthy.Three seasons ago, the Bulls fell to the Heat in the Eastern Conference finals. It looked like the beginning of a worthy rivalry."I think about it," Rose said of the disappointing thought that he and the Bulls' other current core players might never get another shot at Miami in the postseason. "But at the same time, I have to deal with the reality. I have an injury and I'm rebuilding my other leg all over again."
NORMAL, Ill. — Daishon Knight had 20 points and six rebounds as Illinois State beat No. 25 Dayton 81-75 on Saturday night.Bobby Hunter scored 16 points and Zach Lofton added 13 for the Redbirds (5-4).Vee Sanford had 14 points and Jordan Sibert added 13 to lead the Flyers (7-2).Illinois State jumped to a 6-0 lead and held a 39-32 advantage at the half. The Redbirds led by as many as 10 points in the first half, thanks to a tough defense that kept Dayton from getting good looks at the basket.Both teams shot about 50 percent from the field, with the Redbirds hitting on 26 of 52 shots and the Flyers going 28 of 57.The game was won at the free-throw line, with Illinois hitting 21 of 31 free throws to Dayton's 12 of 20.
DES MOINES, Iowa — Melsahn Basabe had a season-high 15 points and No. 23 Iowa cruised past Drake 83-66 on a neutral floor Saturday night.Devyn Marble and freshman Peter Jok each scored 14 for Hawkeyes (9-1), who won their fourth straight over the intrastate-rival Bulldogs.Iowa closed the first half on a 10-0 run and never looked back, stretching its lead to 23 points with 5:18 left.Chris Caird led the Bulldogs (6-2) with 21 points. Their winning streak was snapped at four games.Iowa improved to 57-10 against Drake, which shot just 31 percent in the second half.Jok played two years at Des Moines Roosevelt High — about 4 miles from where the Hawkeyes played on Saturday night — before transferring to nearby West Des Moines Valley.Jok made his homecoming perhaps the best game of his young career. He had seven straight points to help keep the Bulldogs from extending an early lead and added a pair of baskets as Iowa took control midway through the second half.Jok finished with a career-high seven rebounds and fell just a point shy of his personal best of 15 against Abilene Christian earlier this year.Jarrod Uthoff had 13 points and nine rebounds for the Hawkeyes.Drake raced out to a surprising 6-1 start that included a three-day, three-game sweep of the recent Fresno State Classic.The Bulldogs opened with a blistering display of shooting against the Hawkeyes.Drake was 62 percent from the floor in the first 15 minutes and hit eight 3-pointers en route to a 40-39 lead. But the Hawkeyes found some traction with their transition game, and four different Iowa players hit layups for a 49-40 lead at the break.The shots that fell so easily didn't do so in the second half for Drake, which lost by double digits for the first time this season.Richard Carter had 18 points for the Bulldogs, who were outscored 42-12 in the paint.The Hawkeyes host Farleigh Dickinson on Monday night before playing at 17th-ranked Iowa State — which beat Northern Iowa 91-82 in OT on the same floor earlier Saturday — in one of the most highly anticipated matchups in the long history of the rivalry.
COLLEGE STATION, Texas — Courtney Williams scored 13 points as No. 23 Texas A&M outlasted Washington 74-68 Saturday night.Texas A&M (6-2) used an 11-2 first-half run on their way to a 36-28 lead at the break. The Aggies jumped on Washington (2-3) to start the second half, ripping off an 11-0 run to take a 47-28 lead.Washington responded with an 18-2 run of its own, cutting the lead to 49-46 on a Jazmine Davis jumper. After a brief Aggies run, Chantel Osahor completed a three-point play and hit a 3 to again cut the lead to three.Williams drained 3-pointers on back-to-back possessions to push the lead back to 61-52 with eight minutes to play. The Huskies would pull within four but the Aggies always had an answer.Davis finished with 21 points while Talia Walton added 15 for Washington. Both players took 21 shots.
WICHITA, Kan. — Cleanthony Early scored 16 points, Chadrick Lufile had 14 and No. 11 Wichita State rallied from yet another halftime deficit to beat Oral Roberts 71-58 Saturday night.Darius Carter scored 10 of his 12 points in the second half, and Tekele Cotton added 11 points for Wichita State (9-0).Shawn Glover had 22 points on 9-of-22 shooting for Oral Roberts (5-4). Korey Billbury had 12 points and D.J. Jackson had 10 for the Eagles.For the sixth time in seven games, Wichita State ended the first half with a deficit or tied. And like most of the previous games, the Shockers emerged like a new team after halftime.After going 6 of 27 from the floor in the first half, the Shockers made nine of their first 12 shots after halftime.Early had two 3-pointers to key a 14-2 run to start the second half and take a 36-32 lead. Wichita State then used a 15-3 run to make it 51-37 on the second of two straight baskets by Carter midway through the period.Oral Roberts was never in contention after that. A layup by Cotton with 4:46 remaining put Wichita State ahead 64-46.After shooting 48 percent in the first half, the Eagles were 8 of 26 (31 percent) in the second half. The Shockers outrebounded the Eagles 26-13 over the final 20 minutes.Oral Roberts established its game plan early to start the game: Go to Glover.The 6-foot-7 senior entered the game averaging 20.4 points and quickly hit two baseline jumpers to help Oral Roberts to a 7-2 lead.Wichita State got back in it and eventually led 18-15 after Baker's two free throws with 7:13 remaining in the half.But Oral Roberts went on a 9-0 run, including a turnaround, baseline jumper from Glover that gave the Eagles a 24-18 lead with 4:45 on the clock.Glover scored six more points after that, including two free throws with less than a second on the clock that advanced the lead to eight. Glover finished the half with 14 points on 6-of-12 shooting.
CHICAGO — Brandon Jennings scored 33 points and the Detroit Pistons beat the short-handed Chicago Bulls 92-75 on Saturday night for their fourth consecutive victory.Andre Drummond (14 rebounds), Greg Monroe (12) and Josh Smith (10) helped Detroit to a 51-44 rebounding edge as the Pistons (10-10) stretched their road winning streak to four games dating to Nov. 24.It was Detroit's first victory in Chicago since Feb. 24, 2006. The Pistons had lost 14 in a row at the United Center.The Bulls (8-10) shot 33 percent from the floor while playing without leading scorer Luol Deng, who was sidelined by tightness in his left calf. He is averaging 26.2 points over his last six games.Taj Gibson led Chicago with 21 points and 10 rebounds. Mike Dunleavy Jr. scored 16 and Carlos Boozer finished with 13 points.The Pistons outscored the Bulls 24-9 in the third quarter to break away from a first-half tie.Jennings made 12 of 22 shots from the floor, including a 5-for-8 performance from 3-point range. The Pistons shot 12 for 19 from beyond the arc overall.Kyle Singler scored 12 points for Detroit, and Josh Harrellson had 10.Deng is day to day. Already without star point guard Derrick Rose, the Bulls were missing their two best scorers, and it showed.After 11 points in the first quarter, Boozer didn't score again until the final two minutes.Gibson was especially active on the offensive glass. He battled for two offensive boards and a putback on one possession three minutes into the second quarter.Detroit went 6 for 8 from 3-point range in the first half to make up for an inability to finish inside. The Pistons failed to convert a bunch of opportunities under the rim but the game was tied at 47 at halftime.Chicago has lost seven of its last nine games, but was coming off a 20-point win over Miami on Thursday.NOTES: Both Gibson and Joakim Noah were whistled for technical fouls. ... Bulls coach Tom Thibodeau said Deng has been dealing with the injury since the teams met in Detroit on Nov. 27. ... Pistons guard Rodney Stuckey left in the second quarter with a sore left knee and did not return. He finished with two points in 10 minutes.
SYRACUSE, N.Y. — C.J. Fair scored 19 points, Trevor Cooney had 17 and No. 4 Syracuse hit Binghamton with a long-range barrage in a 93-65 victory on Saturday night.Syracuse (9-0), which beat Indiana 69-52 on Tuesday night, upped its nonconference home winning streak to 48 games in the Carrier Dome and figures to move up to No. 2 next week after top-ranked Michigan State and No. 3 Kentucky lost this week.With a starting lineup of one sophomore and four freshmen, Binghamton (2-7) figured to struggle against the bigger, more athletic Orange, and the Bearcats did after a solid start.Jerami Grant had 14 points for Syracuse, Dajuan Coleman had 13 points and 10 rebounds, and freshman Ron Patterson added a season-high 10 points, hitting two of the Orange's 13 3-pointers, two off the school record.Freshman point guard Tyler Ennis had his first off-game of the season, picking up four fouls and finishing with three points and three assists in 19 minutes.Sophomore Jordan Reed, who leads Binghamton in nearly every statistical category, led the Bearcats with a season-high 26 points and seven rebounds. Marlon Beck II had 14 points and Nick Madray 11.Syracuse was torched three times from long range in the first 4 minutes. Beck started the surge with a 3 from the right wing and Madray followed with two more, the second giving the Bearcats an 11-3 lead as Ennis picked up two quick fouls and went to the bench.The Bearcats had snapped a four-game losing streak with a 74-70 victory at Mount St. Mary's on Wednesday night, thanks to 68 percent shooting, but they nearly blew a 19-point lead by committing 23 turnovers against a pressing defense.The Orange used the same strategy to rally and it worked like a charm. Syracuse reeled off 18 straight points, the first 10 coming in 76 seconds thanks in part to three steals. Michael Gbinije started the surge with a 3, Cooney added two more, and Grant finished it with a resounding two-handed slam dunk to give the Orange an 21-11 lead at 12:46.Binghamton notched just four baskets in the final 10:51 of the first half as the Orange steadily pulled away. Syracuse hit nine 3-pointers, nabbed eight steals, scored 22 points off Binghamton's 11 turnovers, and out-rebounded the Bearcats 24-15, 12-5 on the offensive glass, to take a 54-30 halftime lead.Syracuse finished 13 of 36 from long range, forced 18 turnovers and notched 12 steals. Binghamton finished 6 of 22 from beyond the arc after its hot start.Three of Syracuse's freshmen — Patterson, B.J. Johnson, and Tyler Roberson — hadn't played in five games, since the Orange's 69-50 win over Colgate on Nov. 16. That changed after Ennis picked up his second foul less than 4 minutes into the game.Patterson played 15 minutes, one more than Johnson and Roberson, who had six points. Johnson was 0 for 5, all on 3-pointers.Syracuse led by 33 midway through the second half after 3-pointers by Patterson and Gbinije and a putback by Coleman. The Orange's biggest lead was 37 in the closing minutes.
ARLINGTON, Texas — Baylor's Kim Mulkey wasn't sure where to begin.Kentucky's Matthew Mitchell figures the crowd waiting to watch the men's teams from both schools was at least entertained.Both coaches agreed on one thing: Their four-overtime classic that ended as the highest-scoring game in Division I women's history grabbed some headlines for their sport."Hopefully people see that we have a high level of skill and a high level of athleticism," Mitchell said after his fifth-ranked Wildcats beat No. 9 Baylor 133-130 on Friday night. "If you weren't coaching in it, and watching it, it was a real entertaining game tonight."Mulkey is sure the fans agree. She's just not sure how good the new hand-check rule is for her game when Odyssey Sims was one of seven Baylor players to foul out after she scored a career-high 47 points."Personally I can't stand it," Mulkey said after the teams combined for 80 fouls — 47 by her team — and 112 free throws. "Anybody that lets you shoot that many free throws, that's not basketball."Jennifer O'Neill scored a career-high 43 points, including the go-ahead basket in the fourth overtime, as the Wildcats (9-0) won consecutive games against top 10 opponents for the first time.The previous high for a Division I women's game was 252 points in SMU's 127-125 win over TCU, also in four overtimes, on Jan. 25, 1997."I don't feel anything right now," said O'Neill, who set a school scoring record. "I thought it was more overtimes to be honest."The Bears (7-1) rallied from 12 down in the last 10 minutes of regulation and had several chances to win even after Sims fouled out with the Lady Bears down by two with 1:23 left in the first overtime."I had a lot of faith in my team," said Sims, who topped her previous high of 37 points against Oklahoma her freshman year. "We did all we could right to the end."It almost was the second Division I women's game to go five overtimes. A series of missed free throws gave each team a chance to extend the game throughout the extra periods, including the last one.O'Neill's layup with 1:42 left in the fourth OT finally put Kentucky ahead for good. She missed the second of two free throws with a two-point lead with 6 seconds left but teammate Bria Goss grabbed the rebound.After Goss gave Baylor one more chance by missing the second of her two free throws, a desperation 3-pointer by Baylor's Alexis Prince, who was playing for the first time this season, rimmed out at the buzzer.The end of the more than 3-hour game drew a standing ovation for both teams from a crowd that grew in size and noise while awaiting the men's game that followed between No. 3 Kentucky and No. 20 Baylor at the 80,000-seat home of the Dallas Cowboys and the site of the men's Final Four this season.Sims fouled out on a charging call against O'Neill, who hit one of two free throws after a technical following the call to put Kentucky up 101-99."I don't think that they have a meter that could measure my happiness when (Sims) got out of the game," said Kentucky coach Matthew Mitchell, whose team got a congratulatory visit in the locker room from men's coach John Calipari before he took the floor with his team. "We just couldn't stop her."The Wildcats were coming off a 69-64 victory over No. 7 Louisville, which ousted Brittney Griner and then-No. 1 Baylor in the regional semifinals of the NCAA tournament last season.Baylor won the only other meeting between the teams, 85-51 last season in Waco, 100 miles south of the Cowboys' home field. It was just the third loss against 81 wins for the Lady Bears since the 2011 NCAA tournament.Mackenzie Robertson, Mulkey's daughter, matched her career high with 23 points but missed an open layup that could have won it in the final seconds of regulation."Our kids never missed a beat," Mulkey said. "They never panicked. They just played."Janee Thompson scored 20 points for Kentucky, and DeNesha Stallworth had 16 points and nine rebounds.O'Neill, who more than doubled her previous career high of 21 against Marist last December, missed a free throw to open the door for Imani Wright's tying 3-pointer in the final seconds of the first overtime.Sune Agbuke did the same late in second OT for Baylor moments after blocking a layup attempt by O'Neill. Down two, Kentucky sent the game to a third overtime on a layup by Kastine Evans with 3 seconds left.Thompson tied the third overtime with two free throws with 22 seconds left after the Wildcats missed three layups while down two points in the final minute.
PHILADELPHIA — James Bell had 25 points and 14 rebounds and JayVaughn Pinkston scored 27 points, keeping No. 14 Villanova unbeaten with a 98-68 win over Saint Joseph's on Saturday night.Darrun Hilliard scored 14 points to help the Wildcats (9-0) win their second game this week since joining The AP Top 25. Pinkston and Hilliard pounded the Hawks from inside and out, and the Wildcats dominated the second half to thump their city rival.Langston Galloway led the Hawks (4-4) with 18 points and DeAndre Bembry had 17.The Hawks hung around early with some quick 3-pointers before falling into a shooting funk, finishing at 37 percent overall.The Wildcats kept rolling this week since wins over nationally-ranked Kansas and Iowa secured their Battle 4 Atlantis championship.Long billed as Philadelphia's "Holy War," the city rivalry game was played on Saint Joseph's campus for only the second time in a series history that stretches to the 1920s. The cozy 4,200-seat fieldhouse was rocking from warm-ups and scalpers were doing brisk business outside for the Big 5 matchup.Villanova is only about 7 miles away from Saint Joseph's and plenty of Wildcats fans found their way inside Hagan Arena.They had plenty to cheer after the opening minutes.Bembry, a freshman forward, is widely considered one of coach Phil Martelli's top recruits in years. With an Oscar Gamble afro that adds a couple of more inches to his 6-foot-6 frame, he had Hawk Hill rocking with a pair of 3s that gave Saint Joseph's a small, early lead.Galloway buried a 3 for a 28-23 lead, and pounded his chest toward an appreciative crowd, pumping up the Hawks for a potential upset.The good times ended in a hurry. The Hawks simply had no answer for a Villanova offense that used a series of backdoor cuts and putbacks to methodically take the lead. Plus, the Wildcats were smart and safe with the ball, committing only one turnover in the half and five for the game.Villanova missed 11 of 14 3-point attempts in the half — but hit one huge momentum builder in the final minutes. Kris Jenkins connected after Villanova grabbed two offensive rebounds on the same series, and the Wildcats took a 39-35 lead into halftime.Hilliard and Pinkston hits 3s during an 8-0 run to open the second half, 15-2 spanning the first, to build some breathing room. Bell hit two straight 3-pointers and Pinkston followed with a three-point play for a 59-40 lead and put this one away.Saint Joseph's failed to make a 3 in the second half after it made four in the first.Bell made 5 of 10 3s and Pinkston was tough in the paint for a 10-for-15 shooting night, and Villanova hit a season-high scoring total.The rivalry is heated, not necessarily nasty; note the fan signs: Saint Joseph's had one that read, "The Pope is a Jesuit," and Villanova countered with "Jesus Loves Us More."
BERKELEY, Calif. — Reshanda Gray scored 23 points, including the go-ahead basket in overtime, and grabbed 11 rebounds as No. 21 California held off Pacific 68-66 Saturday afternoon.It was Gray's two free throws with 23 seconds left in regulation that allowed Cal (6-2) to tie the game. She also grabbed a rebound with five seconds to go when the Tigers missed a chance to win.Pacific (4-3) took an early lead in overtime on two Kendall Kenyon free throws but Cal countered with two from Afure Jemerigbe before Gray's tie-breaking jumper as both teams struggled down the stretch.Kenyon had a career high 29 points for the Tigers and grabbed 16 rebounds. Madison Parrish added 11 points and eight assists and KiKi Moore had 10 points, nine rebounds and seven assists.Eight of Gray's rebounds were on the offensive end. Brittany Boyd added 16 points, nine rebounds, five assists and five steals.
PORTLAND, Ore. — The Trail Blazers had the perfect recipe for a record shooting night — nice ball movement, open shooters, a good rhythm, and one of the NBA's worst teams as an opponent."We were feeling it," Wesley Matthews said after Portland set franchise and league 3-point records in a 130-98 win over the struggling Utah Jazz on Friday.Matthews scored 24 points and LaMarcus Aldridge added 20 points and 15 rebounds for the surging Blazers, who have won four straight and 15 of 16. Portland made 17 of 23 shots from 3-point range for 73.9 percent, an NBA record for a team with at least 20 attempts, according to basketball-reference.com. Portland also surpassed its previous franchise mark of 16 3-pointers.Damian Lillard added 21 points and Nicolas Batum had 13 for the Blazers.Alec Burks had 16 points to lead the Jazz, who trailed by as many as 42. They have lost 10 of 11 games on the road this season."It wasn't a lack of effort," Hayward said. "It just started to snowball on us."With the best record in the Western Conference, the Blazers (17-3) have been one of the NBA's most surprising teams. After winning only 33 games last season, Portland has more than half that total.And after beating Indiana and Oklahoma City in their last two games, the Blazers have even received some national notoriety, including being the subject of a New York Times feature story Thursday.Aldridge has scored 20 points or more in all but four games this season. He was serenaded with chants of "MVP! MVP!" after putting up 38 points and 13 rebounds in Portland's 111-104 win over the Thunder on Wednesday.Portland's sharp jump shooting has required opponents to respect the outside shooters and not spend so much time containing Aldridge inside, which has led to his increasing dominance."Last year I was getting doubled a lot. There's a lot more 1-on-1 play now," he said.While the Blazers are leading the West, Utah (4-17) is in the basement. The Jazz entered with the least potent offense in the conference at 91.2 points per game. Utah shot just 41 percent Friday but it was defense that left coach Tyrone Corbin shaking his head. The Jazz were outscored 39-22 in the first quarter and 40-13 in the third."If you give up 40 points in a quarter and 30 points in a quarter, it's like you're not even on the floor," Corbin said.Utah point guard Trey Burke struggled to contain Lillard early and scored seven points in 16 minutes. Burke, a rookie from Michigan, has given the Jazz a lift since moving into the starting lineup over the past seven games, and Utah is 3-4 during that stretch.There was talk of a "trap game" in the Portland locker room before the game, and the Blazers were wary of a letdown. It was clear from the beginning that wouldn't happen.The Blazers led by as many as 17 in the first quarter and, other than a lag when the Jazz cut the lead to 48-40 in the second, controlled the whole game.Lillard scored all his points in the first half and the Blazers led 67-56 at the break. They scored the first 10 points of the third and extended their lead to 89-59 by the middle of the quarter. Portland led 107-69 entering the final period."I think we came out and took care of business," Dorell Wright said. "They made their run in the second quarter, and I think we responded well in the second half as far as coming out and getting stops and making our shots."NOTES: Batum wrote "R.I.P. Madiba" on his sneaker as a tribute to Nelson Mandela, the South African leader who died Thursday at 95. ... The teams play again Monday in Salt Lake City. ... Jazz F Marvin Williams (heel) did not make the trip and was replaced by Enes Kanter in the starting lineup. ... Portland's previous season high for points was 118 in overtime against Toronto on Nov. 17.
TUCSON, Ariz. — T.J. McConnell had 13 points, six assists and seven rebounds, making critical plays down the stretch, and No. 2 Arizona escaped with a 63-58 victory over UNLV on Saturday.Brandon Ashley also had 13 points, and Nick Johnson and Kaleb Tarczewski added 12 apiece for the Wildcats. However, Johnson shot just 4 for 15.Bryce DeJean-Jones scored 16 points, Khem Birch had 12 and Roscoe Smith 10 for the Rebels (3-4) in their first road game of the season.The Wildcats (9-0) have a shot at moving to the top of the rankings after No. 1 Michigan State lost to North Carolina.But they were challenged all day by UNLV in a game that had 18 lead changes and neither team led by more than six.McConnell, a transfer point guard from Duquesne, sank a 15-footer with 3:10 to play to put Arizona up for good, 58-57. After Dejean-Jones missed a 3-pointer, McConnell's pretty bounce pass to Rondae Hollis-Jefferson for a dunk made it 60-57 with 2:20 to play.UNLV managed one field goal in the final six minutes, Birch's rebound basket that gave the Rebels their last lead at 57-56 with 3:30 to play.Birch made one of two free throws with 1:52 to go to cut Arizona's lead to 60-58, but McConnell found Ashley for a basket with 27 seconds to go to make it 62-58. McConnell made one of two free throws with 15.3 seconds to go to wrap up the scoring.There were 30 turnovers in the game, 16 by UNLV and 14 by Arizona.The Rebels shot 64 percent in the first half (16 for 25) to Arizona's 52 percent (17 of 33) and led 42-39 at the break.The scoring dropped drastically in the second half, with Arizona outscoring UNLV 24-16. The Rebels shot 28 percent (7 for 25) in the second half while Arizona was at 32 percent (11 of 34).There were 19 turnovers in the first 20 minutes, 10 by UNLV and nine by the Wildcats. Every one of the seven Arizona players who played in the first half had at least one turnover.The Wildcats led 37-31 on T.J. McConnell's reverse layup on a pass from Hollis-Jefferson with 3:35 to play. Arizona was up 39-35 on Hollis-Jefferson's spin move inside with just under two minutes to go, but Roscoe Smith sank a 17-footer, Kevin Olekaibe hit a 3 and Kendall Smith scored on a reverse layup to give UNLV its three-point halftime cushion.Arizona scored the first six points of the second half to go up 45-42, but the Rebels scored the next six to lead 48-45 on Dejean-Jones' 16-footer with 15:36 to play.A 5-0 spurt regained the lead for Arizona, Aaron Gordon's emphatic dunk on a pass from Ashley made it 52-49 with 12:05 to go. Again, the Rebels responded, scoring the next six and the back-and-forth battle persisted.The capacity crowd at McKale Center was decked out in white for the team's annual "white out" promotion. Arizona had lost its previous two white outs, and this one was shaky.
COLUMBUS, Ohio — LaQuinton Ross scored four of his career-high 23 points in a 10-0 second-half run, leading No. 5 Ohio State past Central Connecticut State 74-56 on Saturday night.Lenzelle Smith Jr. added 17 points and Amir Williams had 11 for the Buckeyes (8-0), who finally pulled away midway through the second half.Faronte Drakeford led the Blue Devils (2-6) with 12 points and Matt Mobley added 10. The Blue Devils created problems for Ohio State with their zone defense and pass-and-cut offense that often resulted in layups.A crowd of 13,640 was as reserved as the Buckeyes most of the game. Maybe it was the lack of students, a mid-level opponent, the frosty weather outside or Ohio State's impending Big Ten football championship game on Saturday night, but there were long stretches when the crowd was relatively quiet.The Buckeyes won the only previous meeting between the teams in the first round of the 2007 NCAA tournament. The top-ranked Buckeyes, behind Greg Oden's 19 points and 10 rebounds, beat the Blue Devils 78-57. Ohio State would advance to the national championship game where it lost to defending champion Florida.Ahead 38-29 at the break, the Buckeyes had difficulty finishing off the pesky Blue Devils.The lead hovered around 10 points until Ohio State broke free from a 49-41 lead with a quick run. It started with a steal by Amedeo Della Valle which led to Smith's slam dunk. After a CCSU miss, Sam Thompson hit a baseline jumper and, following a Blue Devils turnover, Craft fought through the traffic in the lane for a spinning layup that made it 55-41 — matching Ohio State's biggest lead to that point.Soon after, the Buckeyes forced a shot-clock violation and Ross muscled inside for a bucket. He then stole the ball near midcourt and drove coast to coast for another layup and an 18-point lead.The Blue Devils never seriously threatened again.The first half likely won't show up in the Buckeyes' season highlight film.They broke out to a 13-2 lead in the opening 4 minutes but never really shifted into overdrive.For the third game in a row, Ross came out hot. He hit a perimeter shot and then closed the early spurt with a three-point play after driving the heart of the lane for a layup and the foul.Ohio State still led 22-8 when the Blue Devils ran off six points in a row — all on layups or by passing down low to teammates making cuts.CCSU put together a 15-6 run to get as close as 28-23 on Khale Cumberlander's backdoor bucket off a nice pass by a driving Matt Hunter.The Buckeyes responded by scoring the next eight points, built around a four-point play. Shannon Scott was fouled and hit the first free throw before Ross reached high to pull away the rebound from a Blue Devil, then scored and was fouled.But CCSU scored six of the final eight points of the half, including Kyle Vinales' layup in the final second that cut it to 38-29 at the break.It wasn't the first time the Blue Devils had an impressive showing in a Big Ten arena.They played at then-No. 1 Indiana a year ago, losing 100-69 on Dec. 8, 2012, in a game in which Hunter scored 40 points to set an Assembly Hall record for an opposing player.He came into the Ohio State game averaging 9.3 points a game, finishing with nine.The Buckeyes are 9-0 against teams from the Northeast Conference. Their next game is against another NEC member, Bryant, on Wednesday at Value City Arena.
IOWA CITY, Iowa — Melissa Dixon scored 24 points, Bethany Doolittle 17 and No. 25 Iowa sank a record 17 3-pointers in a 95-47 defeat of Idaho State Saturday afternoon.Iowa, on a six-game win streak, move to 10-1, its best start in three seasons (12-1, 2010-11).Dixon and Doolittle set the tone from the start, when Dixon missed a 3-pointer on the first shot of the game and Doolittle rebounded and hit a jumper. Theairra Taylor added 16 points. Doolittle 10 had rebounds, Dixon hit 6 of 11 3-pointers.The Bengals (2-5, 0-5 on the road) led 6-5 on a 3-pointer from Lindsey Reed but Iowa took the lead right back and marched away on a 10-1 run and never trailed again.Reed finished with 9 points on 3-for-10 3-point shooting for Idaho State and Rebecca Schrimpsher had a team-high 11. The Bengals hit just 14 of 65 shots.
SPRINGFIELD, Mass. — UMass point guard Chaz Williams is at least 13 inches shorter than Eric Mika, yet that didn't stop him from going nose-to-uniform number with the BYU forward."Once guys started pushing and shoving, I just told them to keep it together," Williams said after supplementing his career highs for points and assists by stepping into the middle of a minor skirmish and leading No. 21 UMass to a 105-96 victory over Brigham Young. "I think it carried over. The energy got us fired up."Williams scored 32 points and added 15 assists, and Sampson Carter scored 20 points Saturday to lead the Minutemen to their eighth straight victory. Raphiael Putney added 15 points for UMass (8-0) in the third annual Hall of Fame Holiday Showcase, played down the street from the basketball shrine in the town where James Naismith invented the sport.Williams was 9 for 14 from the floor, including 5 for 7 from 3-point range, and he hit all nine of his foul shots as the Minutemen topped 100 points in regulation for the first time in five years."Chaz Williams just kind of lulls you to sleep; throws it around a few times and then just attacks and gets wherever he wants," said Tyler Haws, who scored 25 points for BYU (7-3). "He was kind of doing it all for them."On Saturday, that included having his teammates' backs after Putney and Haws got tangled up in the lane. Williams stepped in and briefly mixed it up with Mika; Haws, Mike and Williams were all whistled for technical fouls."I expect that from him," Carter said. "His energy is so contagious, so just to see him like that gets me fired up."Matt Carlino had 23 points and six assists, and Mika had 18 points and eight rebounds for BYU, which had won two in a row. All three of the Cougars' losses were against teams ranked in The Associated Press Top 25."I think we're close, but we've got a lot of work to do," BYU coach Dave Rose said. "Chaz Williams was really good. Everything we had for him, he had a pretty good answer for us."The Minutemen (8-0) are off to their longest winning streak since 1998 and their best start since winning their first 26 games in 1995-96 en route to a since-vacated appearance in the Final Four. Among the UMass victories are two against Atlantic Coast Conference schools and one each against the Southeastern Conference, Big Ten, Mountain West and West Coast Conferences.Coach Derek Kellogg said his players have managed to keep the success in perspective."I haven't heard much talk about being ranked. It's more like 'What's next?'" Kellogg said. "Were fortunate to be 8-0 we've gotten some good teams at the right time."UMass led by as many as 13 points in the first half before the Cougars cut it to 52-49 two minutes into the second. It was still a three-point game when the Minutemen went on a 10-2 run, getting all 10 points in the paint — six of them from Maxie Esho.UMass extended the lead to 15 points on Williams' 3-pointer with 7 minutes to play and made it a 17-point game, 90-73, on another 3-pointer from Williams with 5:26 left. The Cougars cut the deficit to 10 points and trailed 96-86 with 1:46 left and began fouling, but they never got closer than nine.BYU took an 8-3 lead before the Minutemen scored 11 straight points, including Putney's back-to-back 3-pointers. It was 44-39 when UMass scored eight points in a row, using the fast break to take a 52-41 lead into the half.
COLUMBIA, Mo. — Jabari Brown scored 22 points and Jordan Clarkson added 21 to help Missouri upset No. 18 UCLA 80-71 on Saturday.Two free throws by Johnathan Williams III gave Missouri (9-0) a 62-60 lead it wouldn't relinquish with 9:30 remaining. The team trailed for most of the first half and into the second before Earnest Ross made a 3-pointer with 14:46 left.The win extended Missouri's NCAA-best, home-court winning streak to 24 games and the Tigers' run of 79 consecutive wins against non-conference opponents at Mizzou Arena. The victory was the first in that stretch against a nationally ranked team.Jordan Adams scored 22 points and had 10 rebounds for UCLA (8-1), which dropped its first road game this season. Kyle Anderson and Zach LaVine each added 13 pointsThe Tigers remain the only unbeaten team in the Southeastern Conference and are off to their best start since the 2006-07 season. UCLA entered the game averaging a Pac-12 leading 90.6 points.Missouri trailed 43-35 at halftime after committing 12 turnovers and shooting 41.7 percent from the field, but used back-to-back fastbreak dunks by Ross and Brown to pull within 49-45 with 16:44 left.After UCLA's Tony Parker converted a free throw, Ross then hit consecutive 3-pointers to give the Tigers their first lead since 11:20 left in the first half.Brown's 3-pointer five minutes later widened Missouri's lead to 67-62, and UCLA couldn't get any closer the rest of the way.Ross finished with 20 points and Williams grabbed 15 rebounds as Missouri shot 38.5 percent from behind the arc after starting 1 of 7.The Bruins shot 50 percent from the field and forced 12 Missouri turnovers in the first half, but shot 8-of-31 in the second half.The Bruins' 71 points were a season-low, one point fewer than they scored in the opener against Drexel.The teams traded baskets for the first 10 minutes before a 3-pointer by Bryce Alford sparked a 14-0 run that gave the Bruins a 30-17 lead with 6:47 left before the break. Missouri answered with the next 11 points, but UCLA then countered with the following eight for a 38-28 lead. LaVine finished the run with a thunderous windmill dunk.Both schools played in the Las Vegas Invitational last week and were selected co-champions after defeating Nevada and Northwestern in Nevada. UCLA and Missouri agreed to not play each other ahead of Saturday's matchup.The game ended a home-and-home series after UCLA defeated the Tigers 97-94 in overtime at Pauley Pavilion last Dec. 28.
ANN ARBOR, Mich. — Nik Stauskas scored 17 of his 25 points in the first half, and No. 22 Michigan overwhelmed Houston Baptist 107-53 on Saturday, reaching its highest point total in over 15 years.The Wolverines (6-3) bounced back from a loss at Duke with a nearly flawless offensive show in the first half. Michigan led 60-34 at halftime after shooting 68 percent from the field — 10 of 16 from 3-point range — and committing only one turnover.The Wolverines ended up tying a school record for 3-pointers with 16.Glenn Robinson III scored 17 points for Michigan, which picked Houston Baptist's zone apart and punished the Huskies (3-6) in transition.Michigan had not scored this many points since a 112-64 win over Indiana on Feb. 22, 1998.Rob Lewis and Ricmonds Vilde scored 10 points each for Houston Baptist.About the only anxious moment for Michigan came with 16:44 left in the game, when star big man Mitch McGary took a hard fall near the basket and appeared to hurt his right leg. But he was able to get up and made a point of running hard to the bench when a replacement entered the game. When he got back to the sideline, McGary began waving his arms and the crowd responded.He was back in the game less than two minutes later.At times, the 6-foot-10 McGary looked ready to take over as Michigan's point guard. After pulling down a defensive rebound, he dribbled from one end of the court to the other before driving to the basket for a three-point play with 9:04 to go.Moments later, he pulled off a similar effort, but this time McGary found Stauskas in the corner for a 3-pointer and an 89-43 lead.It's been an uneven start to the season for the Wolverines, who lost guards Trey Burke and Tim Hardaway Jr. to the NBA. In Tuesday's 79-69 loss to Duke, Stauskas was held to four points and attempted only two shots from the field.Against Houston Baptist, Michigan had no trouble finding open shots. McGary led the Michigan fast break a couple times early in the game, making a nice pass to Stauskas for a dunk on one transition opportunity.The Huskies shot terrifically early, but it was no use with Michigan scoring seemingly at will. At one point, Houston Baptist was 9 of 12 from the field and 3 of 4 from 3-point range — but still trailed by 10. Stauskas and Robinson made back-to-back 3-pointers to make it 29-19, and another 3 by Stauskas made it 43-23.Robinson, who has had a quiet season so far, dunked just before the buzzer to stretch Michigan's lead to 26 at halftime. It was a remarkable margin considering Houston Baptist was shooting 67 percent from the field and had gone 4 of 6 from 3-point range.
SOUTH BEND, Ind. — Madison Cable scored a career-high 21 points and Jewell Loyd added 15 Saturday as the Fighting Irish dominated inside Saturday to beat UCLA 90-48 to extend their home winning streak to 16 straight.Kayla McBride and Natalie Achonwa each added 12 points as Notre Dame (8-0) beat UCLA (3-5) for the fourth time in the past five games, but the Bruins still hold a 9-6 advantage in the series. Atonye Nyingifa led UCLA with 19 points and Thea Lemberger added 17 as the Bruins shot just 28 percent.UCLA stayed close for the first five minutes, opening an 8-6 lead when Nyingifa hit a baseline jumper. But a 3-pointer by Loyd that bounced off the rim three times before falling in sparked a 14-2 run that included three fastbreak layups.Cable hit back-to-back 3pointers late in the second half to give the Irish an 83-43 lead.
MILWAUKEE — Mercifully, the N.B.A. schedule makers banished the Nets from New York two nights after the embarrassment of Thursday's shellacking at the hands of the Knicks on national television. The Nets traveled to the relative obscurity of Milwaukee on Saturday — away from the pressing local news media, heckling fans and the intensifying criticism of Coach Jason Kidd less than a third of the way into his first season on the job.Inside a nearly half-empty BMO Harris Bradley Center, the Bucks provided plenty of Midwestern hospitality, as the Nets (6-14) grabbed a sorely needed win, 90-82, in a battle of the two teams with the worst records in the Eastern Conference. The lowly Nets won behind 32 points from a dominant Brook Lopez and pulled away from the lowly Bucks with a second-half spurt."A win is a win at this point for us," Johnson said. "Any win is a good win."It was a sluggish game from the start, every bit an underwhelming affair befitting beleaguered combatants. Neither team was sharp, nor did they execute particularly well. But the Nets found a rhythm late in the third quarter — a quarter that has given them fits this season.Leading by 62-59 late in the third, the Nets went on a 10-1 run that effectively put the game out of reach. Lopez drained a long jump shot, the defense forced a turnover and Johnson hit a free throw to close the scoring for the quarter. Mirza Teletovic hit a 3-pointer to open the fourth, Reggie Evans made a layup and Andray Blatche hit two free throws. Suddenly, the Nets were ahead, 72-60.The 7-foot Lopez was a force from the opening tip. He made his first six shots and had 20 points at halftime, nailing an array of jump shots and layups. Playing without Caron Butler and Zaza Pachulia, Milwaukee was powerless to stop Lopez as he backed his way to the basket at will. He shot 11 for 13 from the field and 10 for 11 from the free-throw line."I got good looks from my guards and I just tried to take my time in the post and really read what they were doing," Lopez said.Kidd said the deliberate offense was a key to the game plan."We're going to slow it down, we're going to try and get the ball inside," he said. "We're not a team that's going to zoom up and down the court and score 110 points every night."The Nets entered the game last in the league in defensive efficiency, allowing 108.8 points per 100 possessions, but they proved sturdy against the Bucks. On Thursday, the Knicks shot 16 for 27 from 3-point range and scored 113 points; the Bucks shot only 7 for 20 from long distance."We talked on defense," Anderson said. "Whether it was the right talk or the wrong talk, we talked."He added: "Sometimes I think we get out of sync and we start depending on Joe or Brook. Today, we moved the ball. We played together on defense and offense."Again, the Nets were without several key contributors: Deron Williams, Jason Terry, Paul Pierce and Andrei Kirilenko. But against this opponent, it did not matter. Kidd shook up his lineup, starting Shaun Livingston at point guard instead of Tyshawn Taylor. Neither, though, provided much of a spark, a sign of how badly the Nets miss Williams, who plans to return Tuesday night when the Nets host the Boston Celtics.Still, the Bucks (4-16) turned out to be the perfect tonic for the Nets' flagging confidence during a nightmarish and injury-plagued first six weeks of the season. The Bucks entered the game as the only team looking up at the Nets in the Eastern Conference standings, and won a grueling overtime game Friday night in Washington. On Saturday, the Bucks built a 40-39 lead at halftime, but they faded in the second half.Before the game, Kidd struck an optimistic tone about what has been a trying stretch for him. "This is a veteran club," he said. "We understand that we haven't played our best basketball. When you look at our division, we're two games out. So there are some positive things to look at."Now the Nets return home, where disgruntled fans await. But with the win and the return of their star point guard, perhaps better days lie ahead."We got to get a much-needed win at home," Kidd said. "We haven't won there in a very long time."Jason Terry, out since Nov. 20 with left knee soreness, will be re-evaluated Monday. ... Paul Pierce, recovering from a non-displaced fracture in his right hand, traveled with the team and worked out Saturday afternoon.
Askia Booker made a 25-footer at the buzzer Saturday to lift host Colorado to a 75-72 victory over No. 6 Kansas, its first win over the Jayhawks since 2003.Colorado (9-1) squandered a 6-point lead with 1 minute 44 seconds left, and Kansas tied the game with a basket by Perry Ellis with four seconds left.After a timeout, Colorado forward Xavier Johnson got the ball to Booker, who dribbled a few paces past halfcourt and launched a shot that hit nothing but net. Colorado fans rushed the court and swarmed Booker, a junior who had 15 points.Andrew Wiggins had 22 points for the Jayhawks (6-2), who have lost two of their last three.ARIZONA 63, U.N.L.V. 58 T. J. McConnell had 13 points, 6 assists and 7 rebounds, and No. 2 Arizona escaped with a victory over visiting Nevada-Las Vegas. Bryce DeJean-Jones scored 16 points for the Rebels (3-4).SYRACUSE 93, BINGHAMTON 65 Trevor Cooney and C. J. Fair each scored 17 points to lead No. 4 Syracuse (9-0) to a victory at home over Binghamton (2-7).WISCONSIN 70, MARQUETTE 64 Sam Dekker had 20 points and 10 rebounds as No. 8 Wisconsin withstood a late rally to beat visiting Marquette.The Badgers (10-0) are off to their best start in 20 years. Jamil Wilson had 22 points for Marquette (5-4).LOUISVILLE 113, LOUISIANA-LAFAYETTE 74 Montrezl Harrell scored 20 points, and No. 7 Louisville shot 61 percent from the field to win at home. Chris Jones added 19 points for the Cardinals (8-1). Shawn Long led the Ragin' Cajuns (6-3) with 25.VILLANOVA 98, ST. JOSEPH'S 68 James Bell had 25 points and 14 rebounds, and JayVaughn Pinkston scored 27 points to lead No. 14 Villanova (9-0). Ramon Galloway led host St. Joseph's (4-4) with 18 points.MEMPHIS 96, NORTHWESTERN STATE 76 Shaq Goodwin scored a career-high 21 points, Memphis shot 54 percent from the field, and the No. 16 Tigers won at home.Joe Jackson had 18 points and 5 assists, and Michael Dixon Jr. shot 6 of 9 from the field and added 14 points for Memphis (6-1). Jalan West had 15 points for Northwestern State (3-4),UMASS 105, BRIGHAM YOUNG 96 Chaz Williams had 32 points and 15 assists to lead No. 21 Massachusetts in Springfield, Mass.The Minutemen (8-0) have their longest winning streak since 1998. Tyler Haws scored 25 points for Brigham Young (7-3).IOWA STATE 91, NORTHERN IOWA 82 Melvin Eim scored 22 points, and No. 17 Iowa State rallied from 18 points behind to beat visiting Northern Iowa (3-5) in overtime.The Cyclones (7-0) are off to their best start in 10 years.MISSOURI 80, U.C.L.A. 71 Jabari Brown scored 22 points, Jordan Clarkson added 21 and host Missouri (9-1) sent No. 18 U.C.L.A. to its first loss of the season. Jordan Adams had 22 for the Bruins (8-1).MICHIGAN 107, HOUSTON BAPTIST 53 Nik Stauskas scored 17 of his 25 points in the first half, and No. 22 Michigan (6-3) overwhelmed visiting Houston Baptist (3-6), reaching its highest point total in more than 15 years.OHIO ST. 74, CENTRAL CONNECTICUT ST. 56 LaQuinton Ross scored 4 of his career-high 23 points in a 10-0 second-half run to lead No. 5 Ohio State (8-0) to a victory at home.WICHITA STATE 71, ORAL ROBERTS 58 Cleanthony Early had 16 points and No. 11 Wichita State (9-0) rallied from a halftime deficit to beat visiting Oral Roberts (5-4).GEORGETOWN 61, COLGATE 55 Georgetown (6-2) held visiting Colgate (4-3) scoreless for the first nine minutes and got 12 points each from the senior Nate Lubick and the juniors Josh Smith and Markel Starks.ST. JOHN'S 104, FORDHAM 58 St. John's (6-2) did not miss a shot for nearly 13 minutes in the first half, making 17 field goals in a row in the Holiday Festival at Madison Square Garden. Mandell Thomas had 15 points for the Rams (4-3).LA SALLE 65, STONY BROOK 57 Jerrell Wright was 8 of 11 from the field and matched his career high with 21 points, helping La Salle (5-4) beat Stony Brook (6-4) at the Garden.WOMENNOTRE DAME 90, U.C.L.A. 48 Madison Cable hit four straight 3-pointers and finished with a career-high 21 points to lift No. 4 Notre Dame (8-0) at home.LOUISVILLE 99, WRIGHT STATE 40 Shoni Schimmel scored 17 points and No. 7 Louisville cruised at home. The Cardinals (9-1) played without the starting guard Antonita Slaughter, who has a blood clot in her lung.COLORADO 79, ILLINOIS 56 Arielle Roberson scored 17 points and Jen Reese added 16 to lead No. 11 Colorado (8-0) at home.
Jason Kidd would have been wise to pay closer attention to the cliché "Those who can, do; those who can't, teach."A phenomenally talented point guard, Kidd, with leadership and uncanny court vision, elevated the overall skill of every team he played on from high school to the N.B.A., taking also-rans and making them contenders. His most impressive turnaround came when he joined the hapless New Jersey Nets in 2001, transforming the team into Eastern Conference champions.In his new role as coach of the Brooklyn Nets, though, Kidd's Midas touch has thus far eluded him. He has seemed lost while presiding over a 5-14 start for a team that expected big things with its All-Star-laden roster.The season got off to a bad start when Kidd was suspended for the first two games after his guilty plea to a drunken-driving charge that was leveled against him last year. But last week, the wheels started to come off. Kidd reassigned Lawrence Frank, his former coach and one of his top assistants, because of a personality conflict, and Thursday he watched as the team was blown out at home by the struggling Knicks.As the Knicks stormed to a 30-point victory in a Brooklyn arena packed with fans of the opposing team, one Nets fan sat in Section 15 wearing a replica Brooklyn jersey emblazoned with Kidd's No. 5. He had customized it with the help of masking tape and a marker to read "Re-Assign Coach Kidd."The notion that Kidd, whose retired jersey is in the Barclays Center rafters, could be on the hot seat so soon may seem far-fetched. But Kidd could find himself pushed out by a demanding owner who has committed to winning now: The team is paying a record luxury tax penalty because of its veteran-heavy payroll, and the roster was built partly by trading the team's first-round draft picks in the next five drafts.It is not hard to imagine that if Kidd were fired midway through his first season. such a catastrophic failure would result in his deciding that coaching simply is not for him. There is precedent for such an occurrence, with 15 previous N.B.A. coaches being fired during their first seasons, and subsequently never coaching again.The quickest hook came for Carl Bennett, the coach of the 1948-49 Fort Wayne Pistons, who made it through six games. His record was 0-6 and the team's Hall of Fame owner, Fred Zollner, thought Bennett might be a better fit in the front office. The instinct proved correct. A year later Bennett was an integral part of the merger of pro leagues that created the N.B.A. Later, Bennett was one of the driving forces to break the game's color line.The two most recent coaches to be fired after less than one season, without coaching again, were the Hall of Fame college coach Jerry Tarkanian, who proved to be a bad fit for the 1992-93 Spurs, and Randy Ayers, who was fired 52 games into the 2003-4 season by the Philadelphia 76ers with a record of 21-31. The general manager who fired Ayers was Billy King, who now runs the Nets.Perhaps the best comparison to Kidd, however, in terms of a player being asked to coach the team for which he once starred, is George Mikan, who coached the Minneapolis Lakers in 1957-58. Whereas Kidd was brought in a season after retiring to coach a team that had recently moved, Mikan, a Hall of Fame center, went back to his former team two seasons after retirement in hope of preventing relocation. With the team desperate to build revenue, the Lakers could not be patient with Mikan and he was fired after 39 games with a record of 9-30. Three years later, the team moved to Los Angeles."Things happen in sports," Mikan told reporters at the time of his firing. "When a team is not winning, someone must suffer."It is impossible to tell how much wiggle room Kidd may have as the Nets look to justify the team's immense payroll. But should he end up being shown the door, he could benefit from the perspective Hank Soar showed years after being fired by the Providence Steam Rollers just 19 games into the 1947-48 season."We had a 2-17 record when I was fired in midseason," Soar recalled. "But my successor was 4-25, so I think the problem might have been the players and not the coaching."
Robert Silverman imagines that it would be fun to be a fan of, say, the San Antonio Spurs. The Spurs win a lot of games. They even win championships.Silverman has a hard time fathoming that much success. Could he even handle it? But he also wonders how often he would be willing to write about Tony Parker's brilliance before it became monotonous. Or whether the team's "day-to-day competence," as he puts it, would become boring.There is something about the Knicks' continual struggles, on the other hand, that invites more introspection."Sometimes it's pure poetry and beauty, and sometimes it's downright repugnant," Silverman said.Not merely content to watch the Knicks play (and obsess over their failings in angst-ridden conversations with friends), Silverman is part of a network of die-hard fans who have taken their interest in the team to another level. Specifically, to the Internet, where the Knicks blogosphere has become a congested place.Silverman, 41, the development director for a nonprofit film company, moonlights by writing about the team almost daily for KnickerBlogger. He is not alone. Dozens of knowledgeable fans populate several sites dedicated to the team, where the posts range from the esoteric to the comedic."When I first got into it, I was like, Oh, cool, all these guys are writing about the Knicks for a living," said Scott Davis, 22, who is a co-editor of another popular site, Buckets Over Broadway. "Then I realized they all had day jobs."These individuals are not, for the most part, credentialed members of the news media, but that does not make them any less informed. They consume game videos. They study analytics. They offer breathless takes on the topics of the day. And they commiserate with one another. Until the Knicks' back-to-back wins against the Nets and Orlando, there was no shortage of commiseration."It can be pretty brutal with this team," said Jonah Kaner, a college student who founded The Knicks Wall.Seth Rosenthal, who runs the well-trafficked Posting and Toasting site, is the rare writer who has parlayed his skill, passion and expertise into gainful employment. SB Nation acquired his blog when he was a high school senior, and he now works for the company full time. He edits and writes, and moderates the site's message board."Managing a community of a thousand people becomes much more difficult when the team is losing," said Rosenthal, 24, whose game-day routine includes jotting 5,000 words of notes that he will eventually trim into a 1,500-word recap. "It's probably not the most efficient system."Rosenthal, who lives in Brooklyn, considers himself an unabashed fan. "Oh, 100 percent," he said. So in recent weeks, as the team embarked on a nine-game losing streak, he derived little pleasure from the Knicks' troubles. The headline on one of his game summaries was revealing: "Wizards 98, Knicks 89: Whatever."The team's online community has become something of a fraternity. Rosenthal and Silverman, along with several other writers, including Jim Cavan and Mike Kurylo, even collaborated on a book chronicling the 2011-12 season, "We'll Always Have Linsanity: Strange Takes on the Strangest Season in Knicks History."Silverman, who also lives in Brooklyn, said his fandom had begun when he was growing up on the Upper West Side. He would take the No. 2 train to Madison Square Garden with his father, who would buy tickets from scalpers. Friendly ushers would advise them which season-ticket holders were absent that day, so father and son could sneak down from the blue seats and root for the Bernard King-led Knicks from the lower bowl. The team, at the time, was not a disaster."Things started off pretty well," said Silverman, who left unsaid what has happened in recent seasons.Today, Silverman exercises his creative freedom. When Stephon Marbury decided to do a live, hours-long webcast in 2009, during which he cried and ate globs of Vaseline, Silverman was inspired to write a critical review. He went so far as to compare Marbury to the 20th-century German performance artist Joseph Beuys.It was one of Silverman's first basketball-related pieces, and he kept going. He explained why the Knicks were wrong to pursue LeBron James in free agency, which turned out to be an unpopular stance. When J. R. Smith took to Instagram to post a photograph of an armored vehicle that was the property of one of his pals, Silverman opined on the growing militarization of society. He summarized one recent loss by describing, in exhaustive detail, the act of vomiting.Last weekend, Silverman may have outdone himself with a 4,700-word review in the style of Samuel Beckett of the Knicks' last-second loss to the Denver Nuggets."I think we're running out of ways to recap these games," he said.Silverman, who has also written for online publications like Vice and The Classical, said his basketball work had yet to prove particularly lucrative. ("Enough for the occasional bowl of ramen," he said.) A playwright, he is also working on an adaptation of David Foster Wallace's novel "The Pale King." Silverman sees basketball as theater."What I enjoy most as a writer is trying to portray basketball — and particularly the Knicks — in a manner that shows how it is reflective of the larger world," Silverman said,The world, at least based on that criterion, can be a cruel place. Consider Jamie O'Grady, a lawyer who also acts as the managing editor of The Knicks Wall. O'Grady recalled his 18th birthday, which he said doubled as a sort of indoctrination into adulthood, or at least adulthood as a Knicks fan. There is a difference.It was June 22, 1994, and O'Grady made his maiden trip to a bar to celebrate — and to watch the Knicks face the Houston Rockets in Game 7 of the N.B.A. finals. John Starks shot 2 for 18, and the Knicks lost. "Being a fan of this team is tough," said O'Grady, who also contributed to the Lin book.With a new job and a young family, O'Grady said he was having a harder time finding the time to write. He is an active presence on Twitter, though, and has made friends with several of the other bloggers. As for the Knicks, O'Grady seemed to have reached a point of quiet resignation."You have to blow this whole thing up and start over," he said last week, summarizing the season in 11 tidy words when others have required thousands.Silverman's next project promises to be another prodigious one: a deep dive on the effects of rooting for a miserable team for a really long time. He has been doing research for years.
LINCOLN, Neb. — Jordan Hooper scored a game-high 33 points and grabbed 14 rebounds as No. 15 Nebraska toppled Utah State 95-75 on Sunday.Hooper shot 11 of 16 from the floor (68.8 percent), made 11 from the free throw line, and clocked her first career game without a 3-point shot attempt. Emily Cady finished with 16 points, 10 rebounds and seven assists for the Cornhuskers (7-2).Both teams made eight 3-pointers, and made a comparable number of baskets — Nebraska made 28 while the Aggies finished with 30. The difference in the contest came at the free throw line, where the Cornhuskers poured in 31 points while Utah State (5-3) scored just seven.The Aggies attempted 25 more shots from the floor than Nebraska and Makenlee Williams led the team with 21 points.Nebraska won six straight before losing two contests in a row, to Washington State and No. 18 UNC.
AMES, Iowa — Hallie Christofferson was 11 of 16 from the field and a perfect 10-for-10 shooting free throws in scoring 33 points and leading No. 20 Iowa State to a 79-52 win over Cal State Fullerton on Sunday afternoon.Christofferson added eight rebounds to her game totals while Nicole Blaskowsky poured in 16 points and Seanna Johnson grabbed 12 rebounds in the Cyclone effort.No. 20 Iowa State (8-0) never trailed CS Fullerton (1-7), but only led by two (27-25) at intermission after the Titans fell behind by as much as seven in the half.Iowa State entered the second half more determined and stretched the lead to a buzzer-ending 27 points, scoring 52 second half points and improving their shooting performance to 51 percent for the game.Hailey King scored 13 and Alex Thomas 10 had 10 points for the Titans.Iowa State will host No. 25 neighbor Iowa next Sunday.
COLUMBUS, Ohio — Sonja Greinacher scored 18 points and pulled down 14 rebounds as No. 24 Gonzaga held off Ohio State 59-58 on Sunday.Gonzaga trailed by one point with 32 seconds to play. Shaniqua Nilles gave the Bulldogs the lead with 21 ticks left, but Ohio State took it back after Ameryst Alston's basket. Down by one with 7 seconds left, Gonzaga's Nilles converted again, this time for the game-winner.Haiden Palmer added 13 for Gonzaga (6-1). The Bulldogs made 7 of 26 shots from behind the arc and Ohio State made four of its six from 3-point range.Alston paced Ohio State (6-4) with 18 points and Martina Ellerbe added 11. The Buckeyes trailed 32-20 at halftime.Gonzaga led 45-35 with 11:26 left in the second half, but a Raven Ferguson 3-pointer made it a two point game with 6:25 left.
SALT LAKE CITY — LaMarcus Aldridge scored 24 points and Damian Lillard added 17 to propel the Portland Trail Blazers to a 105-94 victory over the Utah Jazz on Monday night.Robin Lopez chipped in 15 points and 11 rebounds, and Wesley Matthews added 16 points for the Blazers, who bounced back with their second win over Utah this season after losing to Dallas on Saturday to snap a four-game winning streak.Reserve Alec Burks had 20 points for the Jazz, who dropped their fourth game in a row. Enes Kanter added 19 points and Gordon Hayward chipped in 17 for Utah, which trailed the entire second half after nine ties and nine lead changes in the first half.Portland played clean basketball to build a second-half cushion and hold off a late Jazz rally. The Blazers had 23 assists and shot 47.1 percent (40 of 85) from the floor, while committing just 11 turnovers.Portland broke open a close game by making six straight baskets to open the third quarter. Aldridge drained a jumper to start the run and Matthews capped the spurt with a 3-pointer, giving Portland a 64-51 lead at the 8:29 mark.Kanter made a pair of baskets to shave the lead to 64-57. It only set the stage for another Blazers run. This time, Portland rattled off four unanswered baskets — capped by Lopez's layup — to extend its lead to 72-57 with 4:13 remaining in the third quarter.The Blazers shot a blistering 61.1 percent (11 of 18) from the field in the third quarter.Utah made another run at the Blazers midway through the fourth quarter. Back-to-back jumpers from Hayward cut Portland's lead to single digits. Then, Trey Burke made a pair of free throws to bring the Jazz within 89-82 with 5:45 remaining.Utah cut the lead to seven several more times and pulled within 97-92 on a pair of free throws from Hayward with 1:28 left. But Nicolas Batum and Lillard drained 3-pointers on back-to-back possessions to put the game out of reach in the final minute.Burke and Kanter put on a two-man show for the Jazz in the first quarter. The duo combined for 13 of Utah's first 15 points to help the Jazz keep pace with the Blazers.Portland created a small cushion late in the first half. Trailing by one after another layup by Kanter, the Blazers scored six straight points and took a 40-35 lead on a pair of free throws from Aldridge. They extended the lead to 49-41 after Lopez dunked and Aldridge scored an uncontested layup on back-to-back possessions.
IOWA CITY, Iowa — Gabe Olaseni tied a career high with 14 points and had 10 rebounds as No. 23 Iowa blew past Fairleigh Dickinson 92-59 on Monday night for its 10th win.Melsahn Basabe had 12 points and 11 rebounds for the Hawkeyes (10-1), who broke the game open with an early 19-0 run and led by at least 20 points for the entire second half.Iowa outrebounded the Knights 54-32, including 30-13 in the first half, and cracked the 90-point plateau for the fourth time this season.Mathias Seilund led Fairleigh Dickinson (3-9) with 19 points. The Knights were 21 of 65 from the field (32.3 percent).FDU defeated fellow New Jersey schools Rutgers and Seton Hall in consecutive road games this season. But the Knights have also lost to the likes of Metro State and Norfolk State — and top-ranked Arizona beat them 100-50 last month.It didn't take long for Iowa to let FDU know it was in for a long night.The Knights scored the first six points, but once the Hawkeyes got rolling they had no answer. Iowa reeled off 19 straight points — and scored on 11 straight possessions at one point in the first half — to take a comfortable double-digit lead.Jarrod Uthoff had 10 points and 10 rebounds for Iowa, which later went on a 13-2 run for a 40-18 lead. The Hawkeyes committed just eight turnovers.About the only thing that didn't go smoothly for the Hawkeyes was that star Devyn Marble took 22 minutes to get his first basket — on Devyn Marble bobblehead night.Now Iowa can focus on one of its biggest non-conference game in years.Iowa will play its first true road game of the season Friday night at No. 17 Iowa State — the first ranked meeting between the instate rivals in 26 years.
TUCSON, Ariz. — Some coaches shy away from a No. 1 ranking early in the season, worried about the impact it will have on their players' psyche.Count Arizona's Sean Miller as one who embraces it.Arizona moved up to No. 1 in The Associated Press' college basketball poll for the first time since 2003 on Monday, an honor Miller views as not only recognition for what the Wildcats have done this season, but validation for the direction the program has taken in his five years in the desert."There's tremendous satisfaction, no question," Miller said. "Embracing the fact that we're No. 1 is something I'm doing, our staff is doing and really our team is doing. It's an honor a lot of teams would love to have. It's something where no matter what happens the rest of the season, at some point we were ranked No. 1 in the country."Coming off a hard-fought home win over UNLV, Arizona (9-0) received 63 first-place votes from the 65-member national media panel to earn the No. 1 spot in a season for the sixth time. The Wildcats are the Pac-12's first No. 1 team since UCLA in January 2006.Syracuse, which received the other first-place votes, and Ohio State moved up two places to second and third, while Wisconsin jumped four spots to fourth. Michigan State, which had been No. 1 for three weeks, dropped to fifth after losing 79-65 at home to North Carolina.Louisville was No. 6, followed by Oklahoma State, Duke, Connecticut and Villanova.North Carolina moved back into the poll at No. 18 after a one-week absence. Colorado and Missouri are in the Top 25 for the first time this season. UCLA, Michigan and Dayton fell out of the rankings.Arizona was sixth in the preseason Top 25 after Miller added another stellar recruiting class to a team that reached the Sweet 16 of last year's NCAA Tournament.Long, athletic and versatile, the Wildcats already have an impressive list of victories, including Texas Tech, San Diego State on the road and Duke in the championship game of the NIT Season Tip-off at Madison Square Garden."It's no secret that this year our goal is to be playing in Dallas (at the Final Four). This just starts it off," Arizona junior guard Nick Johnson said. "We've done some good things to start our season and we just need to keep it going."Arizona's rise to No. 1 is a culmination of what Miller has done to return a storied program back to glory.When Miller became the head coach in 2009, he took over a program that was in disarray after the retirement of coach Lute Olson two years earlier.A master recruiter when he was the head coach at Xavier, Miller set the foundation for the Wildcats' turnaround by landing a string of top-notch classes to restock the program.Arizona took a small step in his first season, winning 16 games, and hit the accelerator in 2010-11, winning 30 games while reaching the NCAA Tournament regional final.The Wildcats couldn't follow up the success the next season, playing in the NIT after losing forward Derrick Williams to the NBA draft, but bounced back with last year's deep run and 27-win season.Expectations this season were nearly through the McKale Center roof with the additions of point guard T.J. McConnell and stellar freshmen Aaron Gordon and Rondae Hollis-Jefferson to a strong core of returning players.The Wildcats have lived up to the hype so far, earning a spot atop the poll."I know it doesn't win anything, no one has to remind our team or myself of that early in the season, in December, but I do think it's quite an honor to be No. 1," said Miller, coach of a No. 1 team for the first time. "It says a lot about the respect this year's team has earned and I think it's a great compliment to our program."
EL SEGUNDO, Calif. — Kobe Bryant had the ball in his hands and the crowd on its feet for the final possession of the first half in his comeback game.He deked and drove — and his shot was swatted away by Toronto's DeMar DeRozan.After nearly eight months away, Bryant was grateful to be in position to take such a shot for the Los Angeles Lakers, even if it was rudely handed back to him. With his 18th NBA season finally underway, Bryant is confident he'll get past his opening-week jitters and shakiness while his teammates figure out how they fit around him."It's the uncertainty of knowing how it's going to take," Bryant said after a light workout Monday at the Lakers' training complex. "In between timeouts, in between quarters, halftime, how is it going to feel? Is it going to stiffen? There's always that uncertainty."It just takes time, and Bryant will go back to work Tuesday night against Phoenix in his second game back from a torn Achilles tendon. Although he couldn't immediately step into his customary role as the Lakers' dominant player, coach Mike D'Antoni realizes the Lakers' fortunes are tied to the five-time NBA champion guard, particularly in a transitional season for the long-dominant team."We know, and everybody knows, he's got to be the closer," D'Antoni said. "And as soon as we can get him there, the more times he's in that position, he'll get closer to doing it."Bryant had nine points on 2-for-9 shooting with eight rebounds and eight turnovers over 28 minutes in his season debut Sunday night, unable to spark a comeback in the Lakers' 106-94 loss to the trade-depleted Raptors.Bryant ripped himself after the loss, saying he had no rhythm with his teammates and awarding himself a letter grade of "F." After watching film until 2 a.m. following the game, Bryant corrected that grade to a "D.""It wasn't as bad as I thought it was," Bryant said. "The turnovers and things like that, a lot of it was just missed timing. We made some pretty good reads, got my guys some pretty good looks. In terms of the floor game, it wasn't as bad as I thought it was."The Lakers reacted to Bryant's return with a mix of excitement and discombobulation, particularly from the newcomers who had never suited up with the fourth-leading scorer in NBA history. Nick Young and Xavier Henry both called it a dream come true, but both scorers also acknowledged deferring to Bryant all night.D'Antoni repeatedly said the Lakers were "disrupted" by Bryant's return, and while the coach meant it pragmatically, the negative connotation will linger until the Lakers adapt."There are high expectations," D'Antoni said. "There will be. Rightfully so, and he's going to live up to them, but it's just going to take a little bit of time to adjust to it."D'Antoni had created an interesting balance in the Lakers' lineup in Bryant's absence, getting scoring from multiple spots on a surprisingly deep roster. That balance inevitably will change with the return of Bryant and his ball-dominating style of play, but Bryant hopes it will be an improvement for a team that was only 10-9 in his absence."Chemistry will be fine," Bryant said. "It's not like they haven't been watching me play for 17 years. It's not rocket science. It's not like we were gangbusters before. Guys know how to play with me. It'll be fine. We had plenty of opportunities last night and just couldn't capitalize on them."Bryant compared the work ahead to the steady process of chopping down a tree. While he's thrilled to be back in competition, he's not looking forward to the cycle of stretching, ice baths and nonstop travel necessary to thrive in the NBA.The Lakers are headed for a rough stretch later this week, playing four road games in five nights starting Friday in Oklahoma City. Bryant isn't sure how he'll fare under such heavy demands, but he's not interested in half measures"Once you kind of jump into it, you've just got to go for it," Bryant said. "Just take care of your body, get proper rest ... and see what we can do."
LOS ANGELES — The messianic trailer previewing one of the most anticipated events of the year in Hollywoodland ended with the words "The Legend Continues December 8." Before Ron Burgundy's return to the big screen in "Anchorman 2," the larger-than-celluloid star of the Lakers , Kobe Bryant , reappeared on the N.B.A. stage for his first game since sustaining a torn Achilles' tendon.Bryant, 35, proclaimed his comeback on Facebook, linking to a two-minute video produced by the Lakers that features his No. 24 jersey being battered by wind, rain and snow and tearing in half and then reappearing in one piece, bathed in blinding sunlight.Partly cloudy best describes Bryant's season debut Sunday night, witnessed by a rapturous sellout crowd at Staples Center that included the Dodgers' Yasiel Puig and an Elvis impersonator. His first shot attempt was an air ball, and he committed three first-half turnovers. With Bryant on the floor, the Lakers quickly fell into an 11-point deficit against the six-win Toronto Raptors.The air stopped circulating in the building at the end of the second quarter when Bryant slipped while trying to launch a last-second shot. "I scared myself," said Bryant, who rose gingerly and left the court limping slightly on his surgically repaired left ankle.He was back on the court for the start of the third and finished with 9 points, 8 turnovers and 4 assists in a 106-94 loss.After the game, Bryant repeatedly used the word "weird" to describe his night. "I think the last time I took eight months off I was still in the womb," he said.Asked how long it took him to feel normal on the floor, Bryant said: "I don't feel normal at all. I couldn't wait to start watching film and criticize every little thing. That the challenging part."Coach Mike D'Antoni suggested that the high number of turnovers was a consequence, in most instances, of trying to make the extra pass. "Him being away eight months, you knew that was going to happen," D'Antoni said. "There's no way he can come out after eight months off and be in midseason form."He added: "He is human, I think. You've got to understand, it's going to take a while."That Bryant was not all the way back was made abundantly clear in the game's seventh minute when he had a path to the basket and one defender he chose not to try to soar over. Instead, he pulled up and passed out to Steve Blake, who got the ball inside to Wesley Johnson for the dunk that cut the Lakers' deficit to 9.There are superstars, like Ronaldo and Madonna, whose fame makes their surnames superfluous, and then there is Bryant, whose celebrity in star-studded Southern California is such that on 710 A.M., the Lakers' official station, the local hosts refer to Bryant simply by the pronoun, HIM, as in HIM is back!Nine years have passed since Burgundy first entertained movie fans. For Laker fans, it only seems that long since Bryant's last game. He was sidelined April 12, late in a victory against the Golden State Warriors. Bryant's injury was so serious he took to Facebook that night, posting a 300-word missive in which he described his frustration as "unbearable" and wondered if his Hall of Fame career was done."Now I'm supposed to come back from this and be the same player or better at 35?" Bryant wrote then. "How in the world am I supposed to do that?"With his famous iron will and work ethic is how. As LeBron James tweeted at the time of Bryant's injury, "If there's anybody and I mean anybody who can come back from that injury it would be him."Or, ahem, HIM. While Bryant was sidelined, the team jelled around Spain's mild-mannered giant, Pau Gasol, the journeyman Nick Young and the judicious shooter Jodie Meeks. Using a fast-paced, equal opportunity offense, with nine players averaging at least 8 points, the Lakers cobbled together a 10-9 record entering Sunday.The team's success moving forward, with Bryant, the fourth-highest scorer in league history, hinges on how well the newcomers are able to adjust to him and vice versa. D'Antoni said it would be a work in progress, integrating Bryant into the mix."The other guys can't sit around and watch him play," D'Antoni said before the game. "They're going to have to keep their egos intact. They're going to have to be aggressive. They're going to have to carry the load for a while."He likened Bryant's return to a boulder that is dropped in a lake. "There's going to be some serious ripples," D'Antoni said.Bryant displaced Meeks, the team's third-leading scorer, from the starting lineup. "I figured it was coming," said Meeks, who suggested Bryant's alpha-dog role might also have to change, at least early on in his comeback."He's a great player, but at the same time he hasn't played in a while," Meeks said. "We need him but he also needs us to help him get through his rustiness."Bryant had three assists before he collected his first point, on the second foul shot he attempted. He logged 28 minutes. Including the night he was injured, he had played at least 40 minutes in seven consecutive games as he placed the Lakers on his back last season and tried to carry them to the playoffs. D'Antoni said Bryant could expect to log roughly half that many minutes until he gets his playing legs back.Bryant started at shooting guard but shifted to the point as the situation dictated, a concession to the fact that the Lakers are down to one healthy point guard, Blake, while Steve Nash recovers from nerve damage in his back and Jordan Farmar nurses a strained hamstring."He's not going to be above the rim for a while, which is fine," D'Antoni said. "There's some great players who played below the rim and he'll have to do that for a little bit. He'll control the game and his presence will be significant."Eight months after Bryant mused on Facebook, "Maybe this is how my book ends, maybe Father Time has defeated me," it is significant that he is suiting up at all.Before the game, the Staples Center Jumbotron filled with Bryant's face. Superimposed over his image were the words that formed the latest ad campaign of his sponsor, Nike: "Kobe Bryant doesn't have anything left to prove. But he will anyway."
Every week, The New York Times chooses one essential game to watch, highlighting hot teams, winning and losing streaks, and statistical intrigue in the N.B.A.Most of the chatter around the N.B.A. in the last week has concerned the lowly Eastern Conference. Going into Sunday's games, the East had only three teams with records over .500.Two of those teams are the Miami Heat and the Indiana Pacers, who are perhaps the best in the league. Being the dominant teams in a losers' conference adds to their budding rivalry. Expect a playoff atmosphere in their first matchup of the season, at Bankers Life Fieldhouse on Tuesday.Miami is two games behind Indiana in the standings, but few fans consider it the inferior squad. In Game 7 of last year's Eastern Conference finals, the Heat trounced the Pacers, 99-76, the largest margin of the series.Indiana has improved since that game. Paul George has developed significantly this season and is playing at superstar caliber. Still, George and the other Pacers stars played well enough throughout last year's series; what really hurt the Pacers were lack of depth and turnover problems.The depth issue seems to have been resolved. Though Danny Granger is still trying to return from a leg injury that has sidelined him this season, three Pacers backups represent a significant improvement from last year. Luis Scola, acquired from the Suns, has given the bench an infusion of toughness and scoring, and the backup point guards C. J. Watson and Donald Sloan have played well.Perhaps the Pacers' most important off-season move was re-signing the veteran forward David West. West and Roy Hibbert caused all kinds of trouble for Miami last season, forming a potent high-low combination and preventing the Heat from getting into the lane easily.But the Pacers are having trouble shaking their ball-control problem, something that should have been high among their priorities after they averaged 17.5 turnovers in their losses to the Heat in the conference finals, including 21 in Game 7. Those stats followed a season in which the Pacers averaged 14.5 turnovers a game. Despite their improvements in so many other categories this season, the Pacers are turning the ball over even more frequently, at an average of 15.8 times a game. They will be especially vulnerable against the Heat, who force more turnovers than any other team in the league.The Pacers strength in the lane should challenge the Heat, who have been struggling to defend inside. In recent losses to Chicago and Detroit, the Heat allowed a combined 104 points in the paint. If the Pacers' offense, which thrives on the extra pass to the post, can overcome its tendency for turnovers, it will be able to exploit Miami's weakness inside.Miami's roster is largely unchanged from last year. While the Heat offense and Pacer defense will make for compelling basketball on one end of the court, the difference on Tuesday night could be the other side, where the Pacers may have a slim advantage.
LEXINGTON, Ky. — James Young scored 17 of his 21 points in the first half and No. 11 Kentucky used solid defense to hand Boise State its first loss, 70-55 on Tuesday night.Outrebounded by 15 in losing to No. 14 Baylor last Friday, the Wildcats (8-2) bounced back by dominating the Broncos (8-1) 43-27 on the glass. Kentucky held the nation's No. 2 offense 37 points below its average, limiting Boise State to 8-of-35 shooting in the second half and 22 of 69 overall (32 percent).Kentucky 7-footer Willie Cauley-Stein had a lot to do with that, matching his career high with nine blocks.Julius Randle had 17 points and 11 rebounds for the Wildcats, while guards Aaron and Andrew Harrison each scored 13 points and combined for seven rebounds.Anthony Drmic scored 18 points and Derrick Marks had 14 as the Broncos made just five 3-pointers after averaging 8.2 per game coming in.Miffed at being beaten on the glass for the first time this season and wilting in the final 13 minutes against Baylor, the Wildcats got back on track by displaying more aggression and energy, just what they needed with another test looming on Saturday at No. 18 North Carolina.Kentucky certainly needed to be locked in better mentally against the Broncos and particularly without freshman forward Marcus Lee, who was sidelined by a stomach illness. Cauley-Stein was up to the challenge from the start, blocking five shots in the first half while debuting a new blonde hairdo.His inside presence was certainly needed considering all the offensive threats the Broncos of the Mountain West Conference posed. Boise State returned its entire starting lineup from last year's NCAA tournament squad and entered with four of them averaging in double figures.And with leading scorer Drmic back in the lineup after missing the previous game with an undisclosed illness, the Broncos did everything they could to follow up last week's 28-point rout of Carroll College.The Broncos' junior guard/forward seemed like his old self by challenging Kentucky inside and out in scoring 13 first-half points. He provided the energy that helped them take a 14-13 lead and stay within reach of Kentucky.The Wildcats answered with improved intensity that helped them control the boards and the inside of the uptempo game. Young's 4-of-9 shooting from beyond the arc en route to 17 points in the first half provided a necessary boost offensively as Kentucky made 17 of 31 from the field (55 percent).More critical was Kentucky's defense highlighted by Randle's eight rebounds and Cauley-Stein's shot blocking as the Wildcats held the Broncos to 41 percent shooting in building a 41-31 halftime lead.Kentucky eventually widened it to 19 points with 8 1/2 minutes remaining as Boise State missed 19 of 23 shots, some of which were altered by Cauley-Stein and Randle. The Wildcats ended up outscoring the Broncos 44-24 in the paint, offsetting 19 turnovers.
MORGANTOWN, W.Va. — Przemek Karnowski scored a season-high 19 points, Kevin Pangos added 18 and No. 20 Gonzaga came from 10 points down to beat West Virginia 80-76 on Tuesday night.Gary Bell Jr. added 15 points and Sam Dower scored 11 for Gonzaga (9-1), which won its fifth straight since a Nov. 25 loss to Dayton in the Maui Invitational.Pangos had 11 points in the final 6 minutes as Gonzaga rallied from down 53-43, its only double-digit deficit this season.The Bulldogs held West Virginia (6-4) to one field goal over a 7-minute stretch late in the game.Eron Harris led the Mountaineers with 23 points while Juwan Staten added 17 and Terry Henderson 15.Playing on an opponent's court for the first time this season, Gonzaga matched its season low for points. The Bulldogs entered the game with the nation's best field goal percentage at 54.9 but were held to 44.3 percent (27 of 61).West Virginia led 64-56 after a 3-pointer by Terry Henderson with 8:23 left, but the Mountaineers fell flat and failed to seize on an opportunity to pad their resume and get its first win over a marquee opponent.West Virginia also lost in the past two weeks to No. 4 Wisconsin and Missouri.Pangos hit a 3-pointer with 4:09 left to give Gonzaga the lead for good, 68-66. It was the Bulldogs' first lead of the second half.Pangos made two more wide-open 3-pointers over the next 2 minutes and Bell made two free throws with 1:52 left to give Gonzaga its largest lead, 76-68.After Pangos was called for a charge into Harris, Staten hit a basket with 51 seconds left to pull West Virginia within 76-74. But the Mountaineers didn't score another field goal the rest of the game.In a loss last week at Missouri, West Virginia got off to a slow start and didn't find a rhythm until late in the game. The Mountaineers didn't let that happen against a Gonzaga team that had beaten West Virginia handily in their only two meetings in each of the past two seasons.There were 13 lead changes in the first half. Harris scored 18 points in the half, including two 3-pointers that put West Virginia ahead 37-33 with 1:43 left .Staten made two free throws and a driving layup to extend West Virginia's four-point halftime lead to 51-41 with 16:07 remaining.Henderson hit two 3-pointers and a free throw to put West Virginia ahead 54-46 with 8:23 remaining.
NEW YORK — For Paul Pierce and Kevin Garnett, seeing Deron Williams back far outweighed seeing the Celtics again.Williams scored a season-high 25 points in his return to the lineup, Brook Lopez added 24, and the Brooklyn Nets beat Boston 104-96 Tuesday night in the first matchup for Pierce and Garnett against their former team."D-Will set the tone for how we were going to play tonight," Garnett said.Garnett had 11 points, just his third time in double figures this season, and grabbed nine rebounds. Pierce finished with four points and seven rebounds in his first appearance off the bench in six years after making a quick recovery from a broken right hand.But the key was Williams, who had missed nine straight games and 11 overall with a sprained left ankle, and hadn't been sharp in the games in which he did appear."He's the head of the snake," Pierce said. "I mean he's one of the most important pieces of what we're trying to do here, what we're trying to build and trying to win a championship."The Nets won consecutive games for the first time this season, a stunning stat for a team that considered itself a championship contender after acquiring Pierce and Garnett in a blockbuster that was agreed to on draft night.Both veterans had struggled, with the 12.4 points per game and .368 shooting by Pierce easily the lowest of his career before he was hurt on Nov. 29. The Nets had lost six straight at home, their longest skid since moving to Brooklyn."We're starting to get whole and it's definitely good to have everybody back," Williams said. "Even though Paul didn't start, I thought he came in and gave us a big boost off the bench. It seemed like our energy level was a lot better. More intensity on both ends of the floor."Avery Bradley scored 22 points and Jeff Green had 19 for the Celtics, who have been competitive after trading away two of their most important players from their 2008 NBA championship team. Boston had a three-game winning streak snapped and its Atlantic Division-leading record fell to 10-13."The players that they had come back tonight, I still feel like they were a very good team. But obviously having two of their leaders as in Deron Williams and Paul, you know that definitely helps them out a lot," Bradley said.The Celtics had started with 14-0 and 12-0 leads in their last two games, the latter eventually ballooning to a 45-point bulge in a 114-73 victory over the New York Knicks on Sunday that was the NBA's most lopsided game this season.Brooklyn got off to the strong start in this one, pulled away again after Boston tied it, and put it away when Williams, who came in averaging just 9.3 points, scored eight in the final period."They played great tonight. Played really hard, really together. They took us out of what we wanted to do," Celtics coach Brad Stevens said. "Like I said, we weren't playing the New Jersey Nets that played without D-Will for those 10 games. That is their team and they're a good basketball team."Pierce was expected to miss two to four weeks, but sat out only four games before returning to practice Monday. He received a nice ovation when he checked in with a protective glove covering his hand midway through the first quarter, no doubt aided by the many Boston fans that were noticeable all around Barclays Center.He said he's still getting used to the glove, joking he might take it out to the movies, and might have to get used to a new role. Coach Jason Kidd said he would consider whether Pierce would remain with the second unit.Garnett gave a pat on the head and a little hug before the opening tip to Boston's starters, who go on to face former coach Doc Rivers and the Clippers on Wednesday.The Nets led 31-20 after one, their largest lead after the opening quarter this season, and 56-47 at the half.Boston quickly tied it at 60, but the Nets responded with 10 straight points, going ahead 70-60 on Williams' jumper, and the lead reached 85-68 on Pierce's free throw with 1:14 left.NOTES: It was the first time Garnett played against the Celtics since March 4, 2007, for Minnesota. ... Boxer Paulie Malignaggi was presented with the championship of Brooklyn belt by Barclays Center CEO Brett Yormark in the second quarter after beating fellow Brooklyn product Zab Judah in a welterweight bout here Saturday.
OKLAHOMA CITY — A college basketball player who won $20,000 by hitting a half-court shot during an Oklahoma City Thunder game can keep the money for use as a scholarship, the National Association of Intercollegiate Athletics announced Tuesday.Cameron Rodriguez nailed the promotional shot Nov. 18 during the Thunder's home game against the Denver Nuggets. The jubilation was short-lived after the NAIA informed Rodriguez that if he kept the money, he would lose his amateur status at Southwestern College in Winfield, Kan.The college appealed, and the NAIA said Tuesday that Rodriguez could use the half-court winnings as scholarship money."We're pleased with the decision from the membership and specifically the (national eligibility committee) that allows Cameron to keep his winnings to use toward his education," said Jim Carr, NAIA president and CEO.The NAIA said the decision to use the prize as scholarship money was a joint recommendation by Rodriguez and the Southwestern College athletic department, which was supported by the Kansas Collegiate Athletic Conference.Rodriguez, a sophomore, must maintain his amateur status throughout the remainder of his eligibility. He's said that he would have forfeited the money before giving up his college eligibility.Eight lucky fans have hit the half-court shot, sponsored by a local bank, in 231 home games since the promotion started, according to the Thunder.
INDIANAPOLIS — Miami will have its three best players on the court Tuesday night at Indiana.About 90 minutes before tip-off between the Eastern Conference's two best teams, coach Erik Spoelstra said Wade would play.The 6-foot-4 guard went through a 20-minute workout before a final decision was made, but Wade said there was never any doubt in his mind that he would play."I missed the last game because it was a back-to-back and we had two days off, so I was playing the whole time," he said.There were some questions about Wade's availability after he missed the team's morning shootaround at Bankers Life Fieldhouse, and Spoelstra added to the intrigue by playing it coy.Following the workout, Spoelstra said he expected everyone to play for the two-time defending NBA champs but that he wouldn't put it in ink until 45 minutes before tip-off. By pregame warm-ups, Spoelstra had his answer."He was able to get a good workout in and he will go," Spoelstra said during his regular pregame availability.Wade has missed six games this season, including three of the past four, primarily to keep his troublesome knees healthy.The Heat (15-6) will be missing one potentially key player, forward Michael Beasley who will miss another game because of a left hamstring injury. Spoelstra said Beasley was "getting close" but would not play.Meanwhile, the Pacers (18-3) were dealing with their own injury update.After their morning shootaround, forward Danny Granger told reporters he was hopeful he could make his season debut Friday night against Charlotte.Granger has missed all 21 games because of a strained left calf as his teammates grabbed the top spot in the Eastern Conference and entered Tuesday's game with the league's best record.Granger's comments came shortly after coach Frank Vogel said there was no timetable for Granger's return.When asked about the discrepancy during his pregame availability, Vogel downplayed it."He wants to play, he wants to play," Vogel said. "It's news that he said it to the media, but I know he wants to play."
"This doesn't look like the kind of place you'd expect a professional basketball player to live in, does it?" he asked.It did not. White's house is huge, far from the city and the road, in a spot so out of the way it feels like the backwoods of nowhere. Also, it is almost freakishly clean. But not much about White — unemployed after a brief juncture as the self-appointed, very public face of mental health issues in the N.B.A. — is what you might expect.In 2012, White was the N.B.A.'s No. 16 draft pick, a star forward just off a great season with Iowa State and destined for even greater things. But he arrived at his new team, the Houston Rockets, with a medical diagnosis all but unheard-of in professional sports — generalized anxiety disorder — and he wore it almost as a badge of honor.Charming, good-looking, articulate and fluent on the topic in a series of high-profile interviews, White made a formidable advocate for a problem he said was underdiagnosed and underdiscussed. He wanted, he said, for the N.B.A. to establish a leaguewide mental health protocol.But his personal demands seemed to shift as he went along, and he noisily refused to sign his contract until the Rockets agreed to a series of conditions that included addressing one of his symptoms — fear of flying — by letting him travel by special bus to games, when possible. After some turbulent weeks, White and the Rockets appeared to reach an understanding, or at least an accommodation.So it seemed a shame when the team sent him first to their N.B.A. Development League team, the Rio Grande Valley Vipers, and then — amid some unpleasant back-and-forth during which White announced he was returning to Houston on the advice of his doctor — traded him to the Philadelphia 76ers. It seemed an additional shame when the 76ers waived him from their roster this fall before he had played a single nonexhibition game, leaving him to sit out the final days of his $1.7 million contract, which runs out at the end of the year.Neither the Rockets nor the 76ers would discuss what happened in their short histories with White, and in a long conversation here recently, White seemed either unsure of, or unwilling to describe details of his dealings with the teams. He did say that while the endless negotiations around mental health concerns were almost certainly a factor in Houston's decision to let him go, that was not necessarily the case in Philadelphia."They just told me they didn't want to keep me at this point in time, and that's pretty much the gist of it," he said of the 76ers. "There was a lot being said in meetings, and all of it was contradictory — 'You're supertalented; you can play; you can be an excellent player in the league, but we don't want to keep you at this time.' "White is extremely relaxed in conversation and comes across as cheerful, open, friendly, smart. Remarkably, he also does not seem to be angry."I didn't see it coming; that wasn't what I would have thought was going to happen," he said of the 76ers' announcement. "But you've got to be able to get outside of yourself and say, 'It's not shocking.' It takes a lot for me to be surprised."Be that as it may, meeting Royce was itself surprising, and not just because he briefly excused himself in order to, he said, "finish wiping down that table" — a reference to what appeared to be an already-clean table he had been wiping before he answered the door. (Obsessive behavior is another symptom of his anxiety). He reappeared offering coffee he had bought earlier from Dunkin' Donuts; he stuck to water himself, saying that caffeine makes him jittery.It is impossible to talk to White, of course, without talking about anxiety. He first started having panic attacks — sweaty palms, shallow breathing, heart palpitations, queasiness and lightheadedness — as a high school star in Minnesota.His frank discussions earlier this year about his struggles put the story front and center, but somewhat curiously, White now says he feels that "the anxiety story got blown out of proportion."He explained: "The media shaped it like I'm this anxious kid and I need all this special help, but it wasn't about that. It was about creating a policy for people who have mental health disorders."Among other things, he said, he never refused to fly, but rather, he insisted that the teams let him travel by bus when possible (he made several trips by plane while with the 76ers). Nor, he said, does he typically feel anxious while he is playing, only beforehand and at odd moments he cannot always predict.He is not cured, he said, but rather "very aware of my triggers."The biggest of these is his obsessive-compulsive tendency, which strikes when he feels things are spinning out of control."Being disorganized makes me really anxious," he said.
New York's Full-Court Bust: The Knicks and Nets have shown that they cannot produce a championship caliber professional basketball team, and William C. Rhoden says it's time the fans stay home.They have been glaring in their absence, two standout players who have sat and watched, and grimaced, as their respective teams, the Nets and the Knicks , have combined to outdo each other in displays of bad basketball.On Monday, that began to change. Deron Williams, the highly talented but often-injured point guard for the Nets, said at the team's practice that he was ready to return to the lineup Tuesday night at Barclays Center against the Boston Celtics. At Knicks practice, Tyson Chandler, who has been out for a month since breaking a bone in his right leg, participated in noncontact drills and said he hoped to return to action before Jan. 1.Williams has missed 11 games this season since spraining his left ankle Nov. 15 in Phoenix. He sat out the next two games, and then hurt the ankle again Nov. 20 in his first game back.The Nets, who went 3-8 without Williams and have a 6-14 record over all, need immediate help. But Williams could require some time to find his groove."I have to come back and kind of use these games to get back into a rhythm," Williams told reporters.Paul Pierce returned to practice Monday, too, and indicated there was a good chance he could return to the court Tuesday night. It was a surprising development, given that Pierce was told Dec. 2 that he had a broken finger in his shooting hand. The team at the time predicted he would be out two to four weeks."There's still some pain in there, but it's something I can live with," Pierce said.Chandler told reporters he was "very encouraged" by his latest developments."It's a step closer to being on the court," he said. " I didn't lose as much conditioning as I thought I would have."The challenge, he added, would be finding enough practice time to regain his timing.Chandler's injury was a nondisplaced fracture of his right fibula, and the team originally pegged his rehabilitation at four to six weeks, though that timetable was probably ambitious. The team has struggled in his absence, losing 11 of 15 games.The Knicks, who are 5-14, will face Cleveland on the road Tuesday, with the hope of rebounding from Sunday's humiliating 41-point loss to the Boston Celtics.BOBCATS 115, WARRIORS 111 Kemba Walker scored 27 of his 31 points in the second half, and host Charlotte ruined Stephen Curry's homecoming with a wire-to-wire victory over Golden State. Curry overcame a slow start to finish with a season-high 43 points. (AP)TRAIL BLAZERS 105, JAZZ 94 LaMarcus Aldridge scored 24 points and Damian Lillard added 17 to propel Portland to a victory at Utah. (AP)IN OTHER GAMES Blake Griffin scored 26 points, Chris Paul added 25 points and 13 assists, and the short-handed Los Angeles Clippers beat the 76ers, 94-83, in Philadelphia. ... Wilson Chandler scored 17 points, Nate Robinson added 16, and Kenneth Faried had a key block and transition dunk with 33 seconds left to lift the visiting Denver Nuggets over the Washington Wizards, 75-74. ... Zach Randolph had 19 points and 12 rebounds, and Jon Leuer added 16 points and 12 boards to lead the short-handed Grizzlies to a 94-85 win over the Orlando Magic in Memphis. (AP)
BROOKINGS, S.D. — Megan Waytashek and Steph Paluch scored 18 points apiece as South Dakota State defeated No. 12 Penn State 83-79 despite squandering a 20-point halftime lead Wednesday night.The Jackrabbits (7-4) had a 23-point lead when Paluch opened the second half with a 3 and were up 21 with 14:39 left when a Dara Tayler three-point play started a 10-0 for Penn State. The lead was still in double figures at the 5-minute mark before the Nittany Lions stormed back.Ariel Edwards, who scored 5 straight points to pull Penn State within 78-77 with 1:19, finished with 24 points, 7 rebounds, 5 blocks, 4 steals and 3 assists. Maggie Lucas added 20 and Taylor had a career-high 19.Mariah Clarin had 13 points for SDSU and helped the Jackrabbits, now 3-13 vs. ranked teams, out-rebound Penn St. 53-42. This was the highest-ranked team SDSU has beaten.
BOSTON — Doc Rivers picked up another win in Boston.The coach who led the Celtics to the 2008 NBA title returned for the first time with the Los Angeles Clippers on Wednesday night and beat Boston 96-88. Jamal Crawford scored 21 points, hitting a pair of 3-pointers 23 seconds apart to help the Clippers pull away in the final 3 minutes."It was just a really nice day," said Rivers, choking back tears in his postgame news conference. "This is, it's just such a classy place here. ... They cheer for their teams and they love their athletes. The best decision I ever made was 10 years ago, when I decided to come."Chris Paul had 22 points, nine assists and seven rebounds, and Blake Griffin scored 18 points for the Clippers, who won for the seventh time in 10 games. Reunion week resumes for Rivers on Thursday, when he faces former Celtics Paul Pierce and Kevin Garnett — now with the Brooklyn Nets."It was a really special win," Crawford said. "You could see his emotions. I don't know what he was going through inside."Jeff Green scored 29 points against his former coach, who was traded to Los Angeles last summer for a first-round draft pick. Jordan Crawford had 20 points and nine assists, and Brandon Bass had 17 points and 12 rebounds for the Celtics, who lost their second in a row."It wasn't emotional," said Green, one of just a handful of Celtics remaining from last year's team. "We were just trying to win a game, plain and simple."The Celtics lost to Brooklyn on Tuesday night, facing two of the stars who brought an unprecedented 17th championship to Boston. One night later, Rivers returned to the TD Garden, where the banner for the 2008 title hangs from the rafters.Rivers got a standing ovation when he walked onto the court for warm-ups, another healthy cheer when he was introduced and a bigger one after a video on the scoreboard ended with, "Thank you, Doc!""I'm an emotional guy," Rivers said beforehand. "I just hope I can coach tonight."Rivers did just fine, getting 34 points from his bench to just four for Boston's. The Celtics led by as many as nine points in the first half, but the Clippers erased it in a back-and-forth third quarter in which the lead changed hands five times.Los Angeles led 73-71 midway through the fourth quarter when Darren Collison scored six straight points. The Clippers had an 85-83 lead with under 3 minutes left when Crawford made back-to-back 3 pointers. Boston cut it to five on Jordan Crawford's 3-pointer, but never got closer.The Celtics opened a nine-point lead late in the half, but took a 45-39 lead into the break. The teams traded leads in the third quarter, which ended with the Clippers ahead 66-64.NOTES: DeAndre Jordan caused a jump ball in the first half when he tried a slam dunk but got it caught between the rim and the backboard. ... The Clippers continue reunion week Thursday night when Rivers faces his former Celtics players Garnett and Pierce in Brooklyn. ... Clippers F Antawn Jamison scored his 20,000th point. He is one of 20 players in NBA history to have 20,000 points along with 8,000 rebounds and 1,000 assists. ... The Celtics got their first points from the bench with 2 minutes left in the third quarter on a Gerald Wallace layup. ... Boston F Kris Humphries sat out with a bruised right knee.
MADISON, Wis. — Ben Brust scored 18 points and Frank Kaminsky added 16 as No. 4 Wisconsin remained undefeated with a 78-52 victory over in-state rival Milwaukee on Wednesday night.Sam Dekker and Traevon Jackson scored 12 points each for Wisconsin (11-0).The Badgers are 11-0 for the first time since 1993-94.The Badgers took control in the first half after shaking off some early shooting troubles. Brust kept the Badgers afloat during their struggles, hitting his first six shots, including four from behind the 3-point line.Up 22-13 more than midway through the first half, the rest of the team found its stroke. Wisconsin reeled off a 23-7 run that featured five 3-pointers by five Badgers to blow the game open.Averaging nine turnovers per game, Wisconsin had three straight after missing a shot on its first possession. Outside of Brust, the Badgers were 3 of 11 to start from the field.The Badgers finished the half 9 of 13 from beyond the arc but connected on just one of 13 3-point attempts in the second half.But Milwaukee couldn't get out of the hole it dug in the first half, when the Panthers turned the ball over 11 times and the Badgers turned them into 18 points.Tiby came in as the Panthers' leading scorer, and though he scored in double figures, the Badgers played him physically all game. Kaminsky blocked Tiby's first shot and the Milwaukee forward was 3 for 10 for the game and had six turnovers.Milwaukee cut the Badgers' lead to 16 points once in the second half, but that was snuffed out by a quick 10-0 Wisconsin run.
COLUMBUS, Ohio — Lenzelle Smith Jr. scored 19 points and No. 3 Ohio State pulled away early to beat Bryant 86-48 on Wednesday night.Amir Williams added 12 points and nine rebounds for the Buckeyes (9-0).It was an early round game in the Blackrock Gotham Classic which will conclude on Dec. 21 with the Buckeyes meeting Notre Dame at Madison Square Garden.Dyami Starks had 16 points for Bryant (6-5), which was playing its second game in three nights. The Bulldogs lost at Notre Dame, 70-59.The Bulldogs hung around with the Buckeyes for a while, but then went scoreless over the last 5:25 of the first half and watched the Buckeyes close on an 8-0 run to take a 43-23 lead.Ohio State then scored the first five points of the second half before Garvin's layup ended a drought of 6:40.Smith hit 6 of 9 shots from the field including half of his four 3-point attempts. He had eight rebounds and three assists.Starks came in averaging 22.1 points a game, eighth-best in Division I. He had scored at least 20 in five games and 30 in three others.He was held to 5-of-15 shooting from the field.The Buckeyes led 8-7 early and then scored 14 of the next 18 points to take command.A driving layup by Garvin cut the lead to 28-20 with 8 minutes left but Williams dunked off an assist from Marc Loving, Scott hit a baseline layup and Smith followed a blocked layup with a three-point play to push the lead to 15 points.The Buckeyes shot 54 percent in the opening half, hitting 15 of 28 shots with 22 points coming in the paint.For the game, they shot 52 percent on 32 of 61. They hit 8 of 20 3-pointers (40 percent).Bryant shot 28 percent from the field (16 of 58). It was 6 of 24 from behind the arc.The Bulldogs dropped to 0-5 all-time against Big Ten opponents. Talk about a tough schedule: They played preseason No. 1 Indiana in the opener a year ago — in their first official game in Division I. They lost that game 97-54.Smith had 12 points for the Buckeyes, which had eight other players score.The Buckeyes came in averaging 75.6 points a game while giving up 54.5. They were playing a member of the Northeast Conference for the second straight game, having beaten Central Connecticut State 76-54 on Saturday.LaQuinton Ross finished with nine points for the Buckeyes.He was selected as the Big Ten player of the week after scoring 20 points against Maryland and a career-high 23 against CCSU, hitting 16 of 26 shots from the field and 4 of 8 on 3-pointers in those two games.He had been on a tear lately, scoring 60 points in his last three games after scoring 31 in the first five games.But like most of Ohio State's starters, he sat out long stretches of the second half because the game was out of hand.
LOS ANGELES — Kobe Bryant is swiftly regaining his confidence and timing. His conditioning improves daily, and he's already leading the Los Angeles Lakers in scoring again.Yet thanks to Goran Dragic and the exciting Phoenix Suns, Kobe still doesn't have a victory.Dragic scored 12 of his 31 points in the fourth quarter and the Suns beat the Lakers 114-108 Tuesday night, dropping Bryant to 0-2 in his comeback.Bryant scored 20 points while playing 29 mostly sharp minutes in his second game back from nearly eight months out with a torn Achilles tendon. He led a fourth-quarter rally by the Lakers, but they only got within four points with 3 minutes left before Phoenix held on.Bryant gave his performance a "B'' grade, but realizes he's got more work to do — both on his game and his chemistry with the rest of the Lakers. Bryant had just three turnovers against Phoenix after committing eight in his season debut two days ago against Toronto, but contributed just two rebounds and three assists while the Suns comfortably held on."It's a process," Bryant said. "You just continue to figure out what you can and can't do. Every game, you try to step up and do a little bit more and just go from there."The Suns handled the Lakers with teamwork, shredding Los Angeles' lousy defense during a 35-point fourth quarter to earn their first three-game winning streak of the season.Marcus Morris scored 22 points and Eric Bledsoe had 18 points and nine assists for the surprising Suns, who never trailed after the opening minutes. Phoenix held off the Lakers with superb fourth-quarter play from both Morris brothers, who scored nine points apiece down the stretch. Markieff Morris finished with 15 points."We kept pushing the ball and didn't slow it down too much," Marcus Morris said of the fourth quarter. "We came out with a lot of energy and kind of got them on their toes. They were playing small, so we had a great opportunity to attack the boards. And that's what we did."Pau Gasol scored 19 points while Jodie Meeks, Nick Young and Jordan Hill added 13 apiece for the Lakers, who have lost three of four to fall back below .500. Los Angeles' NBA-best bench contributed 43 points while using just four reserves, but Phoenix dominated the boards, outrebounding the Lakers 43-33.Phoenix hadn't beaten the Lakers at Staples Center since November 2010."I think we have a group of guys who play hard all the time, and they're not selfish," Phoenix coach Jeff Hornacek said. "They genuinely like each other to do well. If guys take bad shots, we'll take them out of the game. But for the most part, they run our offense. We've got two great point guards in Goran — who had a great game — and Eric."Dragic hit two 3-pointers and didn't miss any of his 11 free throws, finishing one point shy of his career high in his latest outstanding performance against the Lakers. Phoenix's small, active lineup led by Dragic and Bledsoe was too much for the slower Lakers in the final minutes."It's there. We've just got to execute a little better," Bryant said. "The willingness and competitiveness is there. We just have to make sure we come out in the right areas and execute it."The game was another bump in a long road for Bryant, who had nine points in a rocky season debut on Sunday night. But Kobe felt fresher than expected after his first game since April, and coach Mike D'Antoni is still limiting Bryant's minutes to keep him healthy for the team's stretch of four road games in five nights starting later this week.Bryant started off his night against Phoenix with his first dunk of the season off a two-footed leap in the first quarter. Bryant still emphasized playmaking over shooting, but played a more polished floor game in the first half with 10 points, just one turnover and two assists, including the pass for Gasol's buzzer-beating jumper.NOTES: Shawne Williams got a technical foul in the final seconds of the first half for putting a forearm into Dragic, who crashed to the ground. ... D'Antoni changed his lineup, putting Meeks and Williams in the starting five and bumping C Robert Sacre to the bench. ... Phoenix C Alex Len didn't play with a sore left ankle.
When the Nets brought together all the luxurious parts that now constitute their wildly expensive roster, point guard Deron Williams was presented as the engine that would propel the machine.Was it any wonder that once he succumbed to a string of ankle injuries, going on to miss more than half of the first 20 games, the Nets would tumble to a 4-16 start?The correlation may not be exact. The Nets have shown myriad problems over the last month. But Williams on Tuesday night made a clear statement as to how his mere presence can positively shape the Nets' fortunes. Suiting up for the first time since Nov. 20, Williams scored 25 points and helped orchestrate the Nets' 104-96 victory over the Boston Celtics at Barclays Center."He's the head of the snake," said forward Paul Pierce, who also came back from injury Tuesday. "He's one of the most important pieces of what we're trying to do here. We're trying to build and trying to win a championship."Williams, 29, had sat out the Nets' previous nine games while nursing a sprained left ankle. The same injury forced him to miss two games before his latest extended absence, and before that, a sprained right ankle kept him out of most of the team's preseason preparations.Williams practiced only once before Tuesday, and even he was unsure how he would play after so much time off. But the results were overwhelmingly positive. After averaging just 9 points, 6 assists and 24.1 minutes through his first nine games, Williams notched a season-high point total and added seven assists and three rebounds in 37 minutes."When you're just helpless and your team's struggling and you can't pick them up and you can't do anything about it, it's definitely tough," Williams said of his long absence.Kevin Garnett praised Williams for how he battled the defensive pressure form Avery Bradley, who scored 22 points for the Celtics."You have to have savvy, strong-minded point guards that understand flow, understand rhythm," Garnett said, "and I thought from the jump he did a great job taking the game, understanding it and controlling it the whole game."Most important, Williams seemed to be at his best during the third quarter — the Nets' bane this season — and ensured the team would not experience another late collapse.The Nets had a 9-point lead at halftime, but the Celtics hit their first five shots and went on a 13-4 run to tie the game, 60-60. But lively play from Williams spurred the Nets' resistance. First, he went on a wavy drive to the basket and scored off the glass to restore the lead. On the Nets' next possession, he dribbled and flipped the ball to Garnett, who sank an 18-footer. Williams had 9 points and 4 assists in the quarter, and when it was over, the Nets were leading big again, 85-72."It was something I couldn't do when I first came back at the start of the season," Williams said about his aggressive, driving performance. "That's how I want to play. That's how I play."If Williams's strong performance was a pleasant surprise, so was the fact that Pierce was on the court at all. Pierce had missed the previous five games after fracturing a bone in his shooting hand Nov. 29. The Nets initially thought the injury would require a layoff of two to four weeks. But once it was determined last week that Pierce could not injure the hand further — and that playing would be a matter of pain tolerance — his timetable was drastically accelerated.It was Pierce's 1,118th game as a professional, though he started a game on the bench for just the fourth time in his career. Coach Jason Kidd hinted afterward that Pierce could continue to be used as a reserve, and Pierce said that he would do whatever the team needed.Wearing a black brace that left his fingers exposed, Pierce took three shots and missed them all."As I spent more time with it, get to know it, take it out to the movies, I don't know, have dinner with it," Pierce began to say about the glove in a soliloquy that drew more laughs as it became more absurd, "we can get to know each other, become comfortable with each other and then we can have a long run together."The win, it was clear, had instilled a light mood in the locker room. Everything worked. Brook Lopez exploited his size advantage, taking gargantuan steps time after time to score 24 points on 10-for-13 shooting. The Nets' defense continued to absorb new principles installed after the demotion last week of the assistant coach Lawrence Frank.But the biggest boon was Williams."We weren't playing those Brooklyn Nets that were playing those games without Deron Williams," said Brad Stevens, the Celtics' coach. "That was their team, and that is a good team."
CLEVELAND — The Knicks lost any sense of stability long ago. Cracks formed when Tyson Chandler broke his right leg during the team's fourth game of the season, and the season has been a patchwork quilt ever since — a ragged, ripping-at-the-seams patchwork quilt.So on Tuesday night, hard by the frigid banks of Lake Erie, Coach Mike Woodson once again dusted off his roster and assembled a new starting five, his eighth of the season. The lineup that took the court against the Cleveland Cavaliers was born of equal parts necessity (too many injuries) and desperation (too many losses).But while Woodson was able to change his personnel, he could not change the result. The game merely felt like more of the same as the Knicks fell again, their 109-94 loss at Quicken Loans Arena featuring the usual assortment of problems: poor defense, poor shooting, poor decisions."I don't want to keep using 'embarrassment,' " Carmelo Anthony said, explaining that he had already used the word too often this season. "But right now, the losing is just becoming unacceptable. Hopefully, everybody feels like that. I can't be the only one that's feeling like that."In any case, the Knicks are operating on a limited spectrum these days — a scale of sadness that ranges from embarrassing to unacceptable — and they are at a loss for solutions. They talk about improving their effort. They talk about playing tougher defense. They talk about making shots. Then, they struggle to do any of it.Their inaction is casting an even harsher spotlight on Woodson, though Anthony said the coach was not to blame. "We got to help him figure it out," he said.Anthony scored 29 points but had little help. Andrea Bargnani and J. R. Smith combined to shoot 10 of 31 from the field. Making matters worse, Raymond Felton reinjured his left hamstring and played only 20 minutes. He said he doubted he would be able to play Wednesday against the Chicago Bulls.Kyrie Irving was dominant for the Cavaliers (8-13), collecting 37 points and 11 assists. He shot 14 of 23 from the field, and his teammates followed his lead. Cleveland shot 56.8 percent over all. Irving drained two of his four 3-point attempts in the fourth quarter."It's like kicking a man when he's down," Smith said.After the Knicks erased an 18-point deficit in the first half, the game quickly got away from them in the third quarter. Irving scored 7 points during an 11-2 run that extended the Cavaliers' lead to 64-54.The Knicks kept compounding their mistakes. Later in the quarter, Smith streaked up the court like a champagne cork, got into the lane, turned and fired a pass straight into Irving's hands. The Cavaliers' Tristan Thompson followed with a jump shot, and Cleveland's lead continued to swell."We got to understand our principles," Amar'e Stoudemire said. "Coach Woodson gives us the game plan, and a lot of times, we deviate from that plan."With the Knicks trailing by 18 early in the fourth, Iman Shumpert tossed up a 3-pointer that barely grazed the front of the rim. It was that kind of night.It was the Knicks' fourth game in six days, an adventure-filled stretch that featured blowout victories over the Nets and the Orlando Magic, as well as Sunday's 41-point loss to the Boston Celtics. So Tuesday's game — a mid-December contest against a middling opponent, in northern Ohio — set up as an unlikely pressure cooker for them.Kenyon Martin sat out his second straight game with what the team described as a sore left ankle. It was more than apparent that the Knicks had missed his toughness against the Celtics, and Woodson gave Metta World Peace his first start of the season to help shore things up. At least that was the hope. World Peace finished with 2 points and 2 rebounds in 19 minutes.Woodson made another change, instructing Shumpert to defend Irving, one of the quicker players in the league. It was a stiff challenge for Shumpert, who was caught on a screen on the game's opening possession and could only watch as Irving sailed past him for a layup. The Knicks offered zero help defense.It was a microcosm of another horrid first quarter for the Knicks, as the Cavaliers scored 14 straight points. Irving was at his kinetic best."He causes havoc on anybody," Woodson said.As poorly as they had played, though, the Knicks were somehow able to climb back into contention. Pablo Prigioni provided a spark off the bench, feeding Stoudemire for a layup and drilling a 3-pointer. Smith and Felton made a pair of fine defensive plays (not a misprint).The Cavaliers led by 3 at halftime, and the game felt competitive. The feeling did not last long.Anthony said he would continue to be upbeat with his teammates, no matter the circumstances."I don't know how to fake the funk," he said. "I'm a real straightforward person. So yes, I am remaining positive.""Losing hurts," he said, adding, "But I will remain positive."That alone might be the Knicks' most impressive achievement to date.
NASHVILLE, Tenn. — Tiaria Griffin scored 20 points on Thursday night and No. 16 Georgia returned from an 11-day layoff with no signs of rust in an easy victory over Belmont 81-55.Georgia (9-0) opened the game with an 18-0 run, led 45-23 at half and never trailed in the contest.Griffin was 7 of 11 from the field as the Lady Bulldogs shot 58.2 percent and made 8 of 18 3-pointers. Khaalidah Miller added 15 points, Merritt Hempe scored 13 and Krista Donald 10 for Georgia.Georgia went to 3-0 all-time against Belmont with the win.Belmont (3-7) made 18 of 19 free throws but missed its first nine shots from the field to remain scoreless until Katie Carroll connected with a 3-pointer 6:22 into the game.Lauren Thompson led Belmont with 10 points and was the only Bruin to reach double figures.
AMES, Iowa — Brynn Williamson scored a career-high 21 points and 17th-ranked Iowa State beat No. 21 Iowa 83-70 Thursday night for its best start in 12 years.Jadda Buckley had 19 points and Hallie Christofferson scored 18 with 14 rebounds for the Cyclones, who are 9-0 for the first time since starting 12-0 in 2001-02.Iowa State also improved to 9-0 at home against the Hawkeyes under coach Bill Fennelly.Iowa (10-2) came in with the Big Ten's top offense. But the Hawkeyes had just 20 free-throw tries compared to 49 for Iowa State.Samantha Logic scored 18 for Iowa, which had its six-game winning streak snapped.The Cyclones took control with a 13-0 run late in the first half. They later extended a 13-point lead to 52-32 with 15:16 left.
Dec 12 (The Sports Xchange) - The Los Angeles Lakers announced that point guard Steve Blake will miss at least six weeks with a torn ulnar collateral ligament in his right elbow. The injury was diagnosed after an MRI by team physician Steve Lombardo and Dr. Neal S. ElAttrache of the Kerlan-Jobe Orthopaedic Clinic in Los Angeles.Blake was hurt in the second half of a 116-111 loss to the Washington Wizards on November 26.New York Knicks point guard Raymond Felton will be out two to three weeks with a strained left hamstring, the team announced Thursday.Multiple media outlets reported the Knicks are now talking with the Toronto Raptors about getting Kyle Lowry, who became available when the Raptors picked up Greivis Vasquez in the Rudy Gay trade. For now, Pablo Prigioni is expected to start in place of Felton.LeBron James of the Miami Heat and Paul George of the Indiana Pacers top the Eastern Conference, and Kevin Durant of the Oklahoma City Thunder and Kobe Bryant of the Los Angeles Lakers lead the Western Conference after the first returns of the NBA All-Star balloting.James, the reigning NBA MVP and finals MVP, is the overall leader with 609,336 votes and Durant is second with 607,407 votes.James, George (489,335) and the New York Knicks' Carmelo Anthony (424,211) pace the Eastern Conference's frontcourt players.The Cleveland Cavaliers recalled guard/forward Carrick Felix, guard/forward Sergey Karasev and center Henry Sims from the Canton Charge, the team announced Thursday.All three appeared in Wednesday night's 94-91 overtime win over Tulsa in Canton. Felix finished with five points, five rebounds and three assists in 19 minutes, Karasev added 16 points and three rebounds in 30 minutes and Sims had 12 points and nine rebounds in 24 minutes.
OAKLAND, Calif. — Stephen Curry erased a forgettable first half for the Golden State Warriors with a fourth quarter to remember.Curry made a pull-up jumper with 3 seconds remaining to cap a sensational finishing stretch, rallying the Warriors from 18 points down to beat the Dallas Mavericks 95-93 on Wednesday night."He's a great player and an all-time great shooter," Warriors coach Mark Jackson said. "I've seen Steph Curry every single day take that shot hundreds and hundreds of times, thousands of times, so when the curtains open up you expect it to go in."Curry scored 16 of his 33 points in the final period. He finished with 10 assists, four rebounds and another big shot in a young career already full of them.With the clock winding down, Curry dribbled on the perimeter, came off a screen and faked a shot to send Shawn Marion jumping past him. Curry then hit the 19-footer to give Golden State, which trailed by 18 points late in the second quarter, the lead for good."I kind of lulled him to sleep with the pump fake and thankfully it went in," said Curry, who couldn't recall making a game-winning shot since high school."We blew everybody out at Davidson, so we didn't need game-winners," he joked about his college career.Harrison Barnes scored 17 points, David Lee added 15 points and 11 rebounds, and Andrew Bogut grabbed a season-high 18 rebounds to help the Warriors overcome 18 turnovers and a sloppy start.Monta Ellis and Dirk Nowitzki each scored 21 points, and Jose Calderon had 18 for the Mavericks, who had no timeouts left and were forced to heave a desperation shot at the buzzer. Dallas finished 2-2 on its road trip because it couldn't corral Curry when it mattered most."When they made shots and the crowd got into it, this is kind of a hostile environment," said Ellis, a former Warriors fan favorite who was traded to Milwaukee for Bogut two seasons ago.Curry made consecutive 3-pointers to tie the game at 82 midway through the fourth quarter. Nowitzki scored the next four points before Curry's pull-up jumper.Ellis answered with a pair of key scores late, including a layup through traffic that gave the Mavericks a 92-86 lead. Curry came back with a four-point play, getting fouled by Calderon as he made a 3 and then hitting the free throw.After another defensive stop, reserve Draymond Green made a 3-pointer with 49.9 seconds to play that put the Warriors up 93-92 — their first lead since the opening quarter.Ellis made one of two free throws to tie the game. After Curry and Ellis each missed shots, Curry came off a screen and juked Marion to make the biggest play of the night."I thought we played Curry decently," Nowitzki said. "Marion was on him. Probably been our best perimeter defender for a long time and that's a matchup we like. Curry just got him up in the air. It's a tough play. Stepped under him and made a tough shot."The Warriors played seven of their previous eight on the road, going 4-4 during that stretch. They opened a string of seven of the next nine at home, returning to Oracle Arena short-handed.Andre Iguodala missed his 10th straight game with what the team has called a strained left hamstring. And backup center Jermaine O'Neal sat out with a right wrist injury.Dallas started the game determined to end its road trip on a winning note.Calderon, Ellis and Nowitzki directed Dallas to big leads throughout the first half. Nowitzki capped the spurt by making a pair of high-arching 3s to put the Mavericks ahead 52-34 late in the second quarter.Curry pumped some life into the announced sellout crowd of 19,596 when he made a 3-pointer that twice bounced on the rim and the backboard before it dropped. The shot sliced Dallas' lead to six, and the Mavericks closed the third quarter ahead just 72-66 despite controlling most of the game."We have to stop. We can't continue to get behind like that and continue to try and come back and win," Green said. "But once again, our crowd helped us get back into the game."NOTES: O'Neal is deciding whether to have surgery, which will likely end his season, or wait to see if his wrist heals enough for him to play. ... Mavericks coach Rick Carlisle said G Devin Harris, who is recovering from a foot injury, had some swelling in his left big toe after practicing during the road trip. Harris had hoped to return in mid-December but likely won't play until after Christmas. ... WBA super middleweight champion Andre Ward was in attendance.
The sight of Deron Williams zooming around the court Tuesday night sent a jolt through the Nets .After spending several weeks sidelined by injury, he took the conductor's baton and restored melody to the team's discordant ensemble, showing off his innate understanding of the tempos and rhythms that win basketball games. He careened into traffic, deflating the Celtics' defense and creating space for his teammates to exploit in a 104-96 victory.It was only one harmonious night, but it provided a hint of the heights the underachieving Nets may yet reach this season. It was a reminder, too, of the heights Williams himself had reached in seasons past."He's one of the elite players in this league, and to have him back, and the way that he played, was huge for us," Coach Jason Kidd said of Williams, who had 25 points and 7 assists in his first game since Nov. 20. "It's good to have that guy back."While Kidd seems determined to reinsert Williams in conversations about the league's best players, the reality is that over the last two years, Williams has fallen out of them.Williams, who made three straight All-Star teams from 2010 to 2012, knows his status has waned over the last year, during which he has been plagued by injuries. He battled ankle pain for most of last year before playing well through the season's second half. He hoped to build on that progress this season, but he has succumbed to three separate ankle sprains since the summer.Nevertheless, Williams remains insistent that he will regain his stature."I'm sure people jumped off the bandwagon, which is great," Williams said Wednesday. "But I know what I'm capable of doing when I'm healthy. Unfortunately I haven't been healthy the last couple of years, which has been frustrating. Hopefully — knock on wood — I can stay healthy and see what I can do."Williams looked more mobile and explosive on Tuesday than he has all season, even in the games before the back-to-back left ankle sprains that caused his long absence. It may seem counterintuitive, but the latest injuries probably improved his overall condition.Although he was healthy and able to play when the season began, Williams was still getting his right ankle back to full strength after spraining it during a workout over the summer. The time he spent rehabilitating his left ankle, then, afforded him valuable time to rest his right one."I didn't really have that blow-by speed," Williams said of the nine games he played before Tuesday's. "I'm still getting it. It's still coming."Williams said that his ankle was still a bit sore but that he did not believe he could get himself back to 100 percent without playing games.The Los Angeles Clippers — and Chris Paul — will provide another stern test, on Thursday at Barclays Center."We've had a lot of battles over the years," Williams said of Paul. "He's a good friend of mine and a great competitor as well, and I enjoy going up against him."Williams's teammates, meanwhile, seemed ecstatic to have him back. Without him, the Nets' offense had devolved into a string of isolation plays for Joe Johnson or Brook Lopez. The Nets were slow and predictable.Williams said he made a conscious effort Tuesday to push the ball whenever possible to generate easy baskets that would complement the more deliberate work of Johnson and Lopez."The way he was pushing the ball last night and getting into the teeth of the defense, man, it caused a lot of problems," Johnson said. "Like I've said since Day 1, he's the head of the snake. When he's rolling, we're rolling."Paul Pierce was used as a substitute on Tuesday night, when he made his return from a broken hand. The game was the 1,118th of his career but only his fourth coming off the bench. Although using Pierce in a reserve role may seem to make sense on some level for a deep team like the Nets, Jason Kidd said he had not yet decided how he would use Pierce on Thursday and in the future. Kidd said the decision for Tuesday's game was mostly based on a desire to give Pierce a chance to get used to the protective brace he had over his hand. "He's coming off an injury," Kidd said. "We're not saying this is permanent. We're going to take it day by day."
BOSTON — Doc Rivers spent nine years in Boston, a stretch that lasted longer than his playing career in Atlanta and any other stint in his life since his childhood on the South Side of Chicago. He presided over a team that lost a franchise-record 18 consecutive games in 2007 and a team that won an N.B.A. championship a year later.TD Garden, the building where Rivers cemented his status as one of the N.B.A.'s most respected coaches, is not some kind of charnel house in his memory. Too many good things happened there: the title; the appearance in the 2010 N.B.A. finals; the opportunity to coach Kevin Garnett, Ray Allen and Paul Pierce, each a likely Hall of Famer.Still, Rivers, making his first visit to his former home arena as the Los Angeles Clippers' coach Wednesday night, called the experience surreal. And that was before his current team outlasted his former one, 96-88.Rivers joined the Clippers over the summer in a move that cost the team a first-round draft pick in 2015. It also enabled the Celtics to hire one of the most celebrated young coaches in basketball, Brad Stevens, 37."I never thought I'd be anywhere else anytime soon, and now here I am in this building, on the other side," Rivers said before Wednesday's game. "It's surreal in some ways."He knew this night was coming: The schedule was released in August. His former players knew it, too, and they greeted him warmly."There are always relationships across the benches," Stevens said. "I think guys are used to that."What Rivers did not know — and could not have known — was how the fans would react. He got his answer early.The crowd gave him a standing ovation when he first walked onto the floor. Another standing ovation came during a moving video tribute at the end of the first quarter, which ended with the message "Thank You Doc." The video included the song "Home" by the country musician Dierks Bentley, and players and coaches from both sides applauded.Rivers said that he was "basically useless" for the first 18 minutes of the game because of the ovations and that he thought he needed the halftime break more than his players."You could see it in his face, and you could hear it in his voice," Clippers point guard Chris Paul said. "He wanted it, and we wanted to win it for him."Rivers was still emotional after the game, his voice trembling."It's such a classy place here," he said. "But it didn't surprise me. That's the way they are here. It's an amazing fan base."People don't get Boston," he added. "You have to be a part of it. It's a special, different place. The best decision I ever made was 10 years ago when I decided to come here."In the end, the fans applauded the coach who helped the Celtics earn a 17th championship banner, not the one who vowed to stay through a rebuilding process and signed a long-term contract but seemed to jump ship."I didn't like the way it played out," Rivers said before the game of the on-again, off-again talks between the Celtics and the Clippers over the summer. "When you have the nine years I had and have it talked about like that, I didn't want that."He shrugged and added, "I don't know if there was another way."Rivers's situation was just one of many fluid ones over the summer for the Celtics. Pierce's future in Boston was unclear. Garnett was hinting at retirement. Rajon Rondo was hurt."The whole rebuilding would have been very difficult for me to go through again," Rivers said.The Celtics and the Clippers first tried to package Garnett with Rivers, but the N.B.A. said it would not approve any such deal. When Rivers finally left Boston, the N.B.A. insisted on a clause that the two teams not make any deals for a year.Now, the Clippers (15-8) are in first in the Pacific Division, and Rivers has a three-year, $21 million deal, along with basketball duties he did not have in Boston.He added that although he liked to have the final say in personnel matters, his situation with Boston General Manager Danny Ainge was "a model relationship as far as I'm concerned."
New York's Full-Court Bust: The Knicks and Nets have shown that they cannot produce a championship caliber professional basketball team, and William C. Rhoden says it's time the fans stay home.It is no great revelation to say that many coaches in professional sports come upon their jobs primarily because their predecessors were blamed for someone else's failures or foibles.In large part, Mike Woodson slid into Mike D'Antoni's seat on the Knicks' bench because of Carmelo Anthony's aversion to an offense that ran through the hands of the point guard, namely Jeremy Lin.Jason Kidd's role change from the Knicks to the Nets, Superman to Clark Kent, happened because Deron Williams soured on Avery Johnson around this time last season and P. J. Carlesimo, who replaced Johnson, committed the unpardonable sin of not having a marquee presence.These men in suits do not have to be career historians to understand that being conferred a coach is not like landing the top job at the Vatican.What goes around invariably comes around. So it was impossible to miss the contextual twist of the vision-challenged Knicks — one night after being demolished by point guard Kyrie Irving in Cleveland — blowing a 23-point lead before escaping with an 83-78 victory over the remains of the injury-torn Chicago Bulls."We got comfortable with the lead and started throwing the ball all over the gym," said Woodson, not the best endorsement for a color-by-numbers offense that was missing Raymond Felton, his starting point guard.Kidd, for a change, didn't have that problem Tuesday night in Brooklyn. Williams was back in the lineup for a hard-earned victory over Boston, allowing Kidd to come out of his trancelike state and crack a postgame smile."We're not going to use any excuses — we haven't won enough games," he said before the Nets won their seventh game against 14 defeats. But of course he had been rationalizing his team's woeful start to the N.B.A. season — with justification, to a degree — by pointing to the absence of his engine, Williams, among others.Barring player mutiny, Kidd isn't going anywhere, if only because the Nets invested so heavily in him, curiously putting a coach on training wheels in charge of a team constructed to win now, or never. It also helps that the owner, Mikhail D. Prokhorov, is not around much to evaluate Kidd on a game-by-game basis, unlike his good friend James L. Dolan at Madison Square Garden.How hot Woodson's seat was on Wednesday night was unknown — Dolan was not courtside — but had the Knicks lost to a team without three starters, Woodson might not have made it to Friday night's game at Boston.There is a case to be made that Woodson deserves a stretch of games with the injured center and defensive hub Tyson Chandler back in the lineup. He did win 54 games last season on top of finishing strong in the spring of 2012 after relieving D'Antoni.Before the Knicks improved to 6-15, he recalled with pride those achievements, publicly defending himself for the first time and adding, "That's what I'm about."To vigorously defend Woodson, one must also conclude that the former general manager Glen Grunwald deserved to be ousted before that 54-win team he constructed had dropped a game this season. To a group that was dominated on the boards in the playoffs by Indiana, he added a jump-shooting 7-footer, Andrea Bargnani. He rewarded J. R. Smith for blowing up the franchise's best season in a decade with a three-year contract (and signed his brother, Chris, to boot).But there is always the question of what is done to meet Dolan's industry affiliations (read: Creative Artists Agency) along with his more idiosyncratic expectations. To that extent, Woodson has caught a break. If Kidd and the Nets had gotten off to a soaring start, Woodson, in all likelihood, would already be gone.With both teams losing so often, it's been difficult to gauge which has the better chance of salvaging the season. Last week it seemed wise to bet on the Knicks after they stamped the Nets at Barclays Center. But after watching Williams add purpose to the Nets' offense Tuesday night, we might conclude that, when healthy, they are built to play, as Kidd said, "inside-out," a style more conducive to postseason success.A better test will come Thursday night when Doc Rivers's Los Angeles Clippers come to Brooklyn. When Kidd was hired, Rivers was cited as an example of a born-ready coach who did not have to apprentice as an assistant. It was an incomplete analysis: Rivers transitioned as a broadcaster, allowing him to see the game from a different perspective and, better yet, separate himself from the more self-indulged player state of mind.Kidd's falling-out with his handpicked assistant Lawrence Frank was a classic example of how he still favors confrontation over resolution. A man more prepared to lead might have sat down for a heart-to-heart with Frank and spared the franchise the embarrassment, his team the turbulence and Prokhorov a few million dollars in an anticipated settlement.Not that Prokhorov is counting. And while Kidd's inexperience could well cost the Nets a key playoff game, the man is a proven survivor of behavioral trespasses both professional and criminal. The odds are with him in getting every opportunity in Brooklyn to succeed.The Knicks' coming schedule is not terribly imposing, and Chandler is likely to return soon, but Woodson's best chance in New York probably died in Indianapolis last spring. His offense has been constructed to launch long and low-percentage jump shots. His best player, Anthony, makes impassioned calls for unity just weeks after announcing he will explore free agency next summer. His owner, Dolan, unlike Prokhorov, looms over his franchise."I don't know what this team is about," Woodson said, in effect pleading for more time, a full deck, to help him find out.He's a likable enough guy, and there is, naturally, a temptation to feel sorry for him — until you remember how and why he got the job in the first place. In such an environment, history tends to repeat itself, and pity is best spent on the coach in advance.
AMES, Iowa — The noise was deafening even before Iowa's Mike Gesell missed a potential tying free throw with 13 seconds left.At least that's how it must have felt to the shell-shocked Hawkeyes.Georges Niang scored 24 points, including the go-ahead basket with 18.8 seconds left, and 17th-ranked Iowa State rallied past No. 23 Iowa 85-82 on Friday night.Niang's reverse layup gave Iowa State an 83-82 lead. Gesell then missed two free throws as the frenzied fans rose to their feet — and aired out their lungs — in hopes of rattling one of the Cyclones' biggest rivals.Dustin Hogue then buried two foul shots and Zach McCabe, who entered play shooting 48.5 percent on 3-pointers, missed a wide-open 3 for Iowa (10-2)."You could feel the vibrations in the building again. Just an unbelievable atmosphere," Iowa State coach Fred Hoiberg said.Hogue had 12 points and 16 rebounds for the Cyclones (8-0), who prevailed in the first meeting between the Cyclones and Hawkeyes as ranked teams in 26 years.Aaron White had 25 points and a career-high 17 rebounds for the Hawkeyes, who led by as much as 10 late in the first half and outrebounded the Cyclones 49-35.Iowa and Iowa State spent the final 10 minutes trading baskets in one of the most entertaining games in a rivalry that stretches back over a century.The final minute belonged to the resilient Cyclones.The Hawkeyes had the ball up 82-79 with less than a minute left. But White turned it over in an uncharacteristic mistake during what was arguably his best game for Iowa.Melvin Ejim hit two free throws and Devyn Marble missed one, giving Niang his chance to drive beneath the basket for a tough scoop shot that proved to be the difference.Ejim had 22 points and seven rebounds and Naz Long had 13 points for Iowa State."That's the toughest part about it. We executed the whole game. We did a lot of things that we came into the game saying we had to do if we want to win this game, like rebounding," Gesell said. "Just little plays down the stretch that killed us."This was Iowa's first true road game — in one of the most hostile environments it'll play in all season.It didn't faze the Hawkeyes in the first half.Iowa jumped out to an early lead, helping quiet the raucous crowd. The Hawkeyes showed their impressive depth with multiple baskets from five different players, and White's 13 points helped them build a 45-38 lead.The Cyclones might have been out of the game by halftime if not for Niang's 16 first-half points.Iowa State was able to pull even at 62 with just over 10 minutes left — and Hogue's 3-point play made it 65-62 Cyclones."I felt like we were stuck in the mud the whole game. We couldn't really get to our type of game of getting up and down and getting things going and making 3s," Niang said. "I just think we did a good job being persistent in attacking them and it paid off."Marble had 19 points and six assists for the Hawkeyes. But he and Gesell missed crucial free throws they would typically expect to make.Iowa was just 50 percent from the line in the second half."Those are the guys I would have picked. I know they feel terrible right now. I feel for them," Iowa coach Fran McCaffery said. "But if I could have who I want I would pick those two guys."Though Iowa and Iowa State have been at each other's throats for decades, many of those games were irrelevant nationally.It's been a long time since the Hawkeyes and Cyclones were this good this early.The last time Iowa and Iowa State met as ranked opponents was in 1987 in perhaps the most illustrious of the 66 previous meetings between the heated instate rivals.That game, which was also in Ames, will long remembered as the one when Cyclones star Lafester Rhodes scored 54 points to lead Iowa State past Iowa 102-100 in overtime.This one also wound up being quite memorable for the Cyclones."I honestly have no idea how we won that game. I look at the box score and they crushed us on the glass and they beat us in transition," Hoiberg said. "I give the credit to this game to our fans. No way in heck we win this game without them."
DENVER — Gordon Hayward scored a season-high 30 points to go with a career-high 13 rebounds, Derrick Favors had 19 points and the Utah Jazz rallied after blowing a big third-quarter lead to beat the Denver Nuggets 103-93 Friday night.Wilson Chandler and Jordan Hamilton had 17 apiece for the Nuggets.The Nuggets struggled from the foul line, going 14 for 24, while the Jazz hit their first 13 free throws in going 19 of 20 from the line.Denver fell to 6-3 on its home court after losing just three times at Pepsi Center all of last year.The Nuggets trailed by 16 early in the third, but finished the quarter on a 26-8 run to go ahead by two. The lead grew to four before Utah responded.Hayward and Richard Jefferson had three-point plays and Favors' putback gave the Jazz a 94-89 lead.Denver cut it to 96-93 on two free throws by Andre Miller, but a layup and free throw gave Utah a 99-93 lead and the Jazz closed it out from there.Utah's nine-point halftime lead grew to 16 but Denver rallied. Hamilton hit a 3-pointer and a fadeaway jumper to give the Nuggets a 70-69 lead with 2:43 left in the third. It was their first lead since 4-3.Hamilton hit a breakaway layup and a free throw at the end of the period to give Denver a 75-73 lead heading into the fourth.The Jazz used strong shooting to take the early lead. Utah hit its first four 3-pointers and made six of seven in the first period. The Jazz cooled off in the second quarter, but used a strong finish to the half to lead 53-44 at the break.Hayward had 14 points at intermission and Marvin Williams 11.Chandler had 13 points at the break for the Nuggets, who struggled from 3-point range (3 for 11) and from the free-throw line (5 for 11) in the first half.NOTES: Nuggets guard Ty Lawson went scoreless in his return from a two-game absence due to a strained left hamstring. ... There was a moment of silence before the national anthem for Arapahoe High School staff, students and families affected by the shooting at the suburban Denver school on Friday afternoon. ... Friday marked the 30th anniversary of the highest-scoring game in NBA history. Detroit beat the Nuggets 186-184 in three overtimes in Denver. ... The Jazz have the best 3-point shooting percentage (45.4) in the league during December.
OKLAHOMA CITY — Kevin Durant scored 31 points, Russell Westbrook added 19 points, 12 assists and eight rebounds and the Oklahoma City Thunder rolled to a 122-97 win over the Los Angeles Lakers on Friday night.Serge Ibaka added 19 points and 10 rebounds for his 11th double-double of the season and Reggie Jackson also scored 19 for Oklahoma City, which has won five straight and 13 of its past 14 games.The Thunder are unbeaten in 11 home games this season and have won four straight at home over the Lakers.Los Angeles has lost all three games since the return of Kobe Bryant from a torn Achilles tendon. Bryant had 13 assists — just two shy of his career high — but showed little of his trademark offensive ability, finishing with four points on 2-of-6 shooting.He played 23 minutes and sat out the fourth quarter with the game out of hand.Nick Young led the Lakers with 17 points. Xavier Henry, playing in his hometown, scored 15 points for Los Angeles while Pau Gasol had 14 points and seven rebounds.Oklahoma City made quick work of the Lakers, setting season highs with 38 points in the first quarter and 66 points in the first half. Oklahoma City's lead was mostly in double digits from the three-minute mark of the first quarter on.The Lakers played without three injured point guards — Steve Nash, Jordan Farmar and Steve Blake — forcing Bryant into the position even as he works his way back from his injury. Los Angeles committed 19 turnovers, including seven by Bryant.Los Angeles jumped to a quick 13-7 lead and briefly looked as if it might stay with the Thunder, but Durant exited a timeout with a dunk and a 16-foot jumper to ignite an 18-3 run that put Oklahoma City in control.A 10-0 run by the Lakers early in the second quarter pulled them within 44-38, but Oklahoma City answered with a 12-0 spurt and the lead remained in double digits the rest of the way. The Thunder led 66-51 at halftime.On the Lakers' first two possessions, Bryant was tied up by Oklahoma City rookie Andre Roberson, then had the ball stolen by Westbrook. Bryant didn't take a shot until making a steal that led to a breakaway with 3:50 left in the first quarter, but he eschewed dunking the ball, instead laying it off the backboard.Bryant went 2 of 2 from the field in the first half and was a bit more aggressive after halftime, but missed all four of his shots. It was his second single-digit scoring outing since returning from his injury on Sunday.Westbrook's double-double was his fifth of the season. Durant finished 10 of 13 from the field and added eight rebounds, five assists and four steals for Oklahoma City, while Ibaka went 8 of 13. Oklahoma City, which entered the game second in the NBA in rebounding, posted a 59-41 advantage over Los Angeles.NOTES: After missing three games with back spasms, Lakers C Chris Kaman suited up Friday and entered the game at the start of the fourth quarter. He finished with nine points. ... Thunder G Thabo Sefolosha missed his third straight game with a sprained right knee. The team said he remains day to day. ... Young received a technical foul from official David Guthrie early in the second quarter after complaining following a 3-pointer by Oklahoma City's Jeremy Lamb. ... Oklahoma City recorded its 99th straight regular-season sellout at Chesapeake Energy Arena. ... Jackson has hit at least one 3-pointer in 10 straight games for Oklahoma City. ... Lakers C Robert Sacre grabbed a career-high eight rebounds.
Deron Williams wove through the Los Angeles Clippers and dizzied them with his dribbles. His cuts and feints elicited whoops and delighted gasps from the Barclays Center crowd.In his second game back from a sprained ankle, Williams looked sharper and more confident Thursday night than he had in months and led the Nets to a 102-93 win. The Nets improved to 8-14 and stretched their season-best winning streak to three games."You can see the energy has picked up, the pace has picked up," Williams said, "and I think I have a little bit to do with that, but I can't take all the credit. We're playing well right now as a team. We're moving the ball. We're helping each other out. We're talking. We're having fun."The fun was momentarily spoiled, though, when Brook Lopez tumbled to the ground during the third quarter. He had to leave the game, and the Nets said he had a sprained left ankle. He was forced to miss seven games last month with the same diagnosis. Lopez accompanied the team to Detroit after the game, but it was not clear if he would play against the Pistons on Friday."Last time I twisted it, it felt much more severe," Lopez said.Losing Lopez would be a big blow. Before and after Thursday's game, Coach Jason Kidd singled out the Nets' health as the biggest key to the team's recent success and the factor most necessary to sustain it. Andrei Kirilenko and Jason Terry — two injured reserves — both appear far from ready to play.The Nets had to dwell on the good things from Thursday's game, then, like the continued resurgence of Williams, who improved his personal career record against Chris Paul, the Clippers' star point guard, to 15-5. Several years ago, the two were often labeled the best players at their position, but the link faded as Williams struggled to stay healthy the last two seasons.It was an entertaining sight, then, as the two took turns directing traffic, zooming across the crowded floor and unspooling pinpoint passes. Williams finished with 15 points, 5 rebounds and 4 assists, imbuing the Nets' offense with drive and purpose. Paul had 20 points, 2 rebounds and 2 assists."He's a guy who kind of sets the table — you saw that throughout the game tonight," Kidd said of Williams. "You had some of the top points guards out there on the floor on both sides."Williams's supporting cast made the difference. Andray Blatche put together a complete performance, scoring 21 points and grabbing nine rebounds off the bench. Joe Johnson scored 21 points and went 4 for 7 from 3-point range. Lopez, before he was hurt, had 16 points and 7 rebounds. Blake Griffin struggled for the Clippers, scoring 12 points on 2-for-8 shooting and collecting 11 rebounds.Paul Pierce, who is wearing a protective glove to shield a fractured bone in his shooting hand, played his second consecutive game as a substitute, with Alan Anderson slotted into the starting five. The game was just the fifth of Pierce's career in which he came off the bench. Kidd said before the game that he did not know how long the arrangement would last but that he liked the leadership Pierce brought to the reserve group.With Pierce assuming the ball-handling duties in the second quarter Thursday, the second unit began to erase the Clippers' 25-20 first-quarter lead. Pierce, who finished with 10 points, 7 rebounds and 5 assists, spurred the Nets with his passing and drained a transition 3-pointer with 8 minutes 17 seconds left in the first half that tied the game at 31-31. An 8-footer from Blatche less than a minute later gave the Nets their first lead."I'm playing my part in this," Pierce said. "That's what it is. I'm trying to lead the second team. We've developed some chemistry with that unit."Williams took over from there, scoring 12 of the Nets' final 16 points in the first half. Just before the intermission, he sent Paul the other way on a crossover, right to left, and finished a floater at the hoop. The Nets' 36-point second quarter gave them a 56-44 advantage at halftime.If the duel between Williams and Paul provided one subplot to the game, and Lopez's injury a second, the reunion of Clippers Coach Doc Rivers with Pierce and Kevin Garnett provided another still. The three spent several years together with the Boston Celtics and won a title in 2008. On Thursday, Garnett interrupted his meticulous pregame routine to run over to the visitors' bench and give Rivers a hug.Rivers was emotional Wednesday during his first game back at Boston's TD Garden, but he said seeing his longtime players in Brooklyn was just plain fun. Pierce went over to Rivers at one point and joked that he knew all his plays, and Rivers, Pierce and Garnett shared a laugh after the final buzzer sounded."They will be in the playoffs, and they will be very difficult by the end of the year," Rivers said of the Nets.As Williams and Lopez showed Thursday, getting healthy and staying healthy may be the key to that.
HEMPSTEAD, N.Y. — Joe Mihalich tells a story: When he was hired as the basketball coach at Hofstra in April, Jeff Hathaway, the athletic director, asked him if he would like to meet the team."He brought me in a room," Mihalich said, "and there were four guys."Mihalich slaps his leg and smiles, as if delivering some well-rehearsed punch line. But no laughter, no rim shot, no joke. This happened.In the room staring back at him were Moussa Kone, Jordan Allen, Darren Payen and Stephen Nwaukoni — the last remnants of a program gouged by defections, dismissals and one of the worst records in its 77-year history. Mihalich, hired from Niagara to clean it all up, went on."That was the good news and the bad news," he said. "The bad news is there were only four guys. But they are really, really good guys."He stresses this point because, over the past 12 months, Hofstra basketball has had a bit of an image problem. In November 2012, four players were arrested on charges of burglarizing campus dormitories and were thrown off the team. Two other players were arrested later — one on drug charges and the other for a traffic violation — and the third-year coach Mo Cassara was fired in March, after winning only seven games."It was four guys that were willing to accept change," Mihalich said, wrapping up his reclamation tale. "And eight guys that were new to all of this. We're doing this together."Mihalich, admittedly, is something of a minimalist, so this was just fine with him. Three of the eight newcomers have to sit out because of N.C.A.A. transfer rules. The point guard has a knee injury. The leading scorer, Zeke Upshaw, averaged 1.6 points for his career before this season.But this is a reality that Hathaway made sure Mihalich knew he was signing up for in April — that the Pride (2-6) would probably not win many games this season. That attendance would be low. That the N.C.A.A. would probably punish Hofstra for its low Academic Progress Rate because five players left the team last season without completing their studies. That the bond with a disillusioned campus would need to be quickly repaired."Last year came as a shock to all of us," Stuart Rabinowitz, Hofstra's president, said. "It was such a shock and such a disappointment that we really need to make sure it never happens again."Winning back the campus's affection, Rabinowitz said, will take time, particularly among the students, many of whom are paying soaring tuition costs. These were students, Rabinowitz said, who felt betrayed by the actions of a few athletes on scholarship."I think there were a lot of students who were just sort of disgusted with last year," Rabinowitz said. "I think there has to be some trust built up there."Cassara, now an analyst for ESPN3, would not argue with that. He, too, was affected by the swift downfall of the program, which won 21 games in 2010, his first season, but failed to keep budding players like Chaz Williams (who transferred to UMass) and Halil Kanacevic (St. Joseph's). The pressure to win remained, however, and Cassara admittedly took "calculated risks" in recruiting.In the fall of 2012, there were four highly regarded newcomers: the freshmen Jimmy Hall, Kentrell Washington and Dallas Anglin, and a transfer from Hawaii, Shaquille Stokes. The Pride began the season 3-2."That Monday morning, everybody's excited," Cassara said in a telephone interview. "They get arrested, and all of a sudden, Why did we take those kids?"Cassara was not excusing the actions of those four players (whose felony charges were eventually reduced to misdemeanors), but rather was pointing out how quickly perception changed. After the arrests, in a news conference, Cassara described himself as "heartbroken." He pledged to turn the program around. But after more losses, and more off-court trouble, the downward spiral could not be reversed.
SALT LAKE CITY — Now that Tim Duncan is playing well again, the last thing he wants to do is sit.Duncan told teammate Tony Parker he was "very convincing" when lobbying San Antonio coach Gregg Popovich to keep him in the lineup, even if it was the Spurs' fourth game in five nights and they were facing the team with the worst record in the Western Conference.Popovich usually rests his 37-year-old forward during stretches like this, but Duncan rewarded the club with another double-double. He had 22 points and 12 rebounds to lead the Spurs to their fourth straight victory Saturday night, 100-84 over the Utah Jazz.Sparked by his 23-point, 21-rebound performance against Atlanta on Dec. 2, Duncan has returned to vintage form after a slow start to the season. He is averaging 17 points and 13 rebounds over his last six games."The first 20 games, it's not really that hard to do much better," Duncan said. "I'm still not shooting the ball well, but I'm trying to play hard and find ways to contribute."Kawhi Leonard added 13 points to help the Spurs (19-4) coast comfortably past the Jazz (6-20) after a big first-half run."We were never worried about Timmy. I've been saying (it) since the beginning of the season," said Parker, who had 15 points. "He's the last guy we ever need to worry about. But now he's getting aggressive and he's getting his shot back."From the beginning, the Jazz pressured Parker and dared Duncan to shoot open elbow jumpers. Duncan missed his first three outside shots."He executed well, the shots just didn't go down. But he kept playing like he always does, so it was great," Popovich said.Trey Burke had 20 points and Gordon Hayward scored 18 for the Jazz, who shot 39 percent from the field.The Jazz were coming off consecutive road wins, including a 103-93 victory Friday night in Denver. They had reached 100 points in three of the last four games but were no match for San Antonio's smothering defense."We didn't play with the pep we have had the last few games because of the back-to-back. But I thought the effort was there, just didn't have the same spark," coach Tyrone Corbin said.On the other end, the Spurs set a series of picks to allow penetration and then passes for open 3-pointers. If that failed, they went to their famously fundamental post player on the block. In just 28 minutes, Duncan showed much of his repertoire with bank shots, fallaways, hooks and tip-ins."In the post, he's aggressive and making strong moves," said Parker, who was creative in getting Duncan the ball where he could gain confidence.San Antonio played its fourth consecutive game without the defensive influence of starting center Tiago Splitter, who has a strained calf. The Spurs, per 100 possessions, score 14 more points than they give up when Splitter is on the floor. But they hardly missed him against the Jazz in the first of a four-game road trip for the Spurs, who are 10-2 away from home."They are a veteran club. They know what to do, when to do it and how to do it. They showed us," Corbin said.On Nov. 15 in Utah, the Spurs needed a fourth-quarter rally to wipe away a seven-point deficit and win 91-82. Parker scored 14 of his 22 points in the fourth quarter of that one.After a dreadful start when Burke was out with a broken finger, the Jazz recovered enough to split their last 10 games. The rookie point guard was hot early and gave Parker a taste of his own medicine on a series of floaters and step-back jumpers in the first half.More than 6 minutes into the game, the Spurs had only six points. But over the remainder of the first half, they used an especially efficient offense to build a 55-40 lead at the break. The reserves, led by Marco Belinelli and Patty Mills, sparked a 21-6 run to help San Antonio gain control."Our job is to come off the bench and bring that extra gear to turn it up a bit, intensity-wise. It starts on defense and if we can capitalize, it translates to good offense," Mills said.Belinelli and Manu Ginobili each had 11 points off the San Antonio bench, which contributed 47 points. The Spurs outrebounded the Jazz 55-42 and outscored Utah 50-36 in the paint."They hit the glass really hard and they have a lot of big bodies, so we knew that was going to be a big part of us winning this game. But we had good focus from everybody and when the balls were there to be had, we just went and got them," Duncan said.Richard Jefferson made a 3-pointer to draw the Jazz within double digits for the only time in the second half at 61-52, but Duncan scored twice around a 3-pointer by Leonard and the Spurs were back in control."It was a very good win against a young team that is starting to play better. We respect them and did a good job of playing horn to horn," Duncan said.NOTES: Utah C Rudy Gobert and G Ian Clark were assigned to the club's D-League affiliate in Bakersfield. Both earned playing time earlier this season when the Jazz were dealing with multiple injuries. ... Belinelli made all three of his 3-point attempts to improve his NBA-leading mark to 56.5 percent. ... Jeremy Evans matched his career high with 11 rebounds for Utah. . Oddly, the Jazz had a season-high 11 blocks to one for the Spurs.
DALLAS — Brandan Wright led Dallas with 19 points in his season debut, Jose Calderon scored 18 and the Mavericks shrugged off the absence of Dirk Nowitzki and coach Rick Carlisle to beat the Milwaukee Bucks 106-93 Saturday night.Nowitzki and Carlisle missed the game with an undisclosed illness. Carlisle has been fighting an upper respiratory problem since before a four-game road trip that started last week.Wright, who missed the first 23 games with a shoulder injury, scored seven straight points in a 19-5 run that put Dallas in control, 43-26, early in the second quarter.John Henson led the Bucks with 18 points and 12 rebounds.O.J. Mayo, who played despite the recent death of his grandmother, had four points on 1-of-6 shooting in his first game in Dallas since signing with the Bucks as a free agent last summer.Nowitzki and Carlisle missed the shootaround earlier Saturday and weren't at American Airlines Center for the game. The Mavericks don't play again until Wednesday, so they should have plenty of time to recover.Even without their star and their coach, the Mavericks were never in much trouble with assistant Monte Mathis in charge. The only starter who played in the fourth quarter was Nowitzki's replacement in the lineup, Jae Crowder.Dallas didn't even need much from leading scorer Monta Ellis, who had seven points and five assists.The biggest decision for Mathis was whether to bring back any other starters after the Bucks went on a 13-0 run in the fourth quarter and eventually got within 13 in the final 2 minutes.Mathis did reinsert DeJuan Blair after Wright had returned, and the Mavericks kept the lead in double digits.Shawn Marion had 13 points and 12 rebounds for the Mavericks. Vince Carter had 15 points and a game-high nine assists.Brandon Knight scored 16 for Milwaukee, only four after the first quarter.Wright grabbed two quick rebounds after coming in midway through the first quarter and finished the first half with 11 points and five rebounds in 10 minutes.The highlight for Wright was a putback dunk for a 79-51 lead in the third. Just 3 minutes later, Blair gave the Mavericks their biggest lead at 90-56 on a jumper. Blair had 11 points and nine rebounds.Samuel Dalembert, signed in the offseason to be the starting center for the Mavericks, was the only Dallas player who didn't get off the bench.For Dalembert, it was something of a replay of his one season with Milwaukee, when he went through a long midseason stretch without playing and got into just one of the last 11 games.Milwaukee's Gary Neal had two points in his first game in Texas since going to the NBA Finals with San Antonio last season. He left late in the second quarter with plantar fasciitis and didn't return.NOTES: Bucks G Carlos Delfino had surgery on his right foot performed by Dr. Donato Villani in Argentina. There is no timetable for the 31-year-old's return. ... Carlisle missed a game for the first time since the franchise's only championship season of 2010-11. He missed a Dec. 27 victory at Oklahoma City a day after having arthroscopic knee surgery. Assistant Dwane Casey, now the head coach in Toronto, filled in then.
COLUMBUS, Ohio — It wasn't like North Dakota State could sneak up on No. 3 Ohio State.After watching film of the Bison pull off a huge upset at Notre Dame on Wednesday night, there was no way the Buckeyes were going to be on anything but high alert.LaQuinton Ross and Lenzelle Smith Jr. each scored 18 points and the Buckeyes never trailed in rolling over NDSU 79-62 Saturday night."I said it after the game on Wednesday, so much for tip-toeing into Ohio State," NDSU coach Saul Phillips said. "We kind of clomped in here with big old (size) 16s on and they clocked us pretty good."The Buckeyes (9-0) continued their hot shooting. They made 53 percent from the field, pushing them over 50 percent for the fifth game in a row.Freshman Mark Loving had a career-high 12 points, and Sam Thompson also had 12. Aaron Craft added six points and seven assists — setting a school record for career assists with 581 for the Buckeyes.Asked if the Buckeyes got a good look at what the Bison had done to the Fighting Irish, Craft said they'd watched the video like they were film critics."Absolutely," he said. "Probably the best thing for us was that they beat Notre Dame and that really got our attention. Not that we try to really overlook anyone, but we got to sit down and see them play at their best. And we wanted to come out and play our best."The game was part of the BlackRock Gotham Classic.Taylor Braun led the Bison (7-4) with 21 points, while Marshall Bjorklund had 12 and Lawrence Alexander 10. NDSU shot 42 percent from the field and was outrebounded 36-26.The Bison were coming off a 73-69 victory at Notre Dame, the program's first win against an ACC team. That win came against a Fighting Irish squad that was 124-10 at home over the last six-plus seasons."They had some really big guys that can get up and that altered some shots inside," Braun said. "I don't think we expected them to shoot as well as they did from the 3-point line. That was a real difference in the game."The Buckeyes were 6 for 11 behind the arc in the first half and finished 10 of 20. The threat of hitting outside shots opened up things underneath.Down by as many as 19 points against the Buckeyes, the Bison went on a 7-2 run to pull within 14 midway through the second half.But Craft, who also had four steals and four rebounds, came up with a loose ball and fed Thompson, who was thrown to the floor by Bjorklund.Thompson hit both free throws after the flagrant foul, and then on the resulting possession, Craft lobbed an alley-oop to Thompson for a dunk that brought the crowd to its feet.Loving then hit back-to-back 3s and the lead was back up to 65-43 with 8½ minutes left."I was up all night a couple of nights ago trying to find a weakness," Phillips said. "And then I realized they really don't have a lot (of them)."The Bison were playing a ranked Division I opponent for only the seventh time. They've lost the last five since beating No. 13 Wisconsin and No. 9 Marquette in 2006.Ohio State built a 41-28 lead at the break. Ross overcame a sluggish start with 13 points while Smith had 10.The Buckeyes closed the first half with a 7-0 burst.Ross got a pass from Craft and buried a 3. After a Bison miss, Thompson hit a foul shot. Off another miss, Craft drove the lane and then twisted to fire a pass from underneath the basket to Thompson in the left corner. He put up a 3 that caught only net with 1.7 seconds left.That final pass tied Craft with Jamar Butler for the career record at Ohio State with 579 assists.Then on the Buckeyes' first possession of the second half, Craft found Ross all alone under the basket for the record-breaker and a 43-28 lead."Ever since I've been here I've had the easy job," the senior point guard said. "I've played with a lot of great players, a lot of great shooters, who have done the hard part. I just have to find those guys and put them in a great opportunity to score. I'll have a lot of time to think about (this) when I get older. By the time I'm a grandfather, it'll probably be about 800 assists in my career."Ohio State can't move up in the coaches poll on Phillips' ballot."You know, in the coaches' poll they only had one first-place vote. Guess who that first-place vote was," he said. "And that didn't change my mind tonight."
ANN ARBOR, Mich. — Nick Johnson made six free throws over the final 25 seconds, and No. 1 Arizona held on for a 72-70 victory over Michigan on Saturday after rallying from an 11-point deficit in the second half.The Wolverines (6-4) led by one when Johnson drew a foul on a drive with 24.6 seconds left. He made both free throws, and Michigan's Nik Stauskas missed at the other end. After a tie-up, the possession arrow gave the Wildcats (11-0) the ball with 9.5 seconds remaining.Johnson pushed the lead to three with two more free throws, and Arizona fouled Spike Albrecht at the other end. Albrecht made only one of two free throws, and after two more free throws by Johnson made it 71-67, Albrecht made a 3-pointer with 2 seconds left. Arizona's Gabe York added a free throw to end the scoring.Brandon Ashley scored 18 points for Arizona, which finally wore down Michigan inside in the final minutes. The Wildcats finished with 17 offensive rebounds, and although they only outscored the Wolverines 34-28 in the paint, that was enough.Glenn Robinson III had 20 points for Michigan, but he did most of his damage in the first half. Caris LeVert contributed 15 points for the Wolverines, but this game was decided by Arizona's late free throws and the one miss by Stauskas when Michigan had a chance to go back ahead.Michigan led 37-28 at halftime, and Mitch McGary pushed the lead to double digits with a dunk for the first points of the second half. But Arizona went on an 11-2 run to pull within two.Michigan led 58-50, but the Wildcats again had an answer. Aaron Gordon and Ashley made consecutive baskets, and a dunk by Ashley cut the lead to two.Johnson, Gordon and Kaleb Tarczewski had 14 points each for Arizona. Tarczewski went down with what looked like a right leg injury around the midpoint of the second half, but he was able to return.It's been a quiet start to the season for Robinson, who showed enough potential in 2012-13 that he considered a jump to the NBA after his freshman year. Against Arizona, he showed why he's a definite candidate to play at the next level.Robinson made all seven of his shots from the field in the first half, including a contested 3-pointer in the final seconds that gave Michigan the nine-point halftime lead.Opponents were shooting only 27 percent from 3-point range against Arizona coming into the game, but the Wolverines were 6 of 11 in the first half. They finished 8 of 17.The Wildcats rallied late when they finally started converting around the basket. A three-point play with 2:32 to play by Rondae Hollis-Jefferson gave Arizona its first lead of the second half at 63-62.The lead changed hands four more times after that — for good when Johnson made it 67-66 with the first of his six late free throws.
KANSAS CITY, Mo. — Perry Ellis scored 21 points, Joel Embiid added a career-high 18 and No. 13 Kansas pulled away in the second half to beat New Mexico 80-63 on Saturday night and end a frustrating two-game skid.Andrew Wiggins, who dealt with foul trouble much of the night, added 11 points for the Jayhawks (7-3), who led 39-38 at halftime but used two big runs over the final 20 minutes to blow it open.It was the Jayhawks' ninth straight win at the Sprint Center, including their run to last year's Big 12 tournament title. After dropping games at Colorado and Florida, the win also kept Kansas from losing three straight non-conference games for the first time since the 1982-83 season.Cameron Bairstow and Kendall Williams had 24 points apiece, but that was about it for the Lobos (7-2). Alex Kirk, who came into the game averaging 18.6 points, was held to just five on 2-for-8 shooting before fouling out with 2:53 remaining.New Mexico was just 2 of 14 from beyond the arc.The Jayhawks struggled with foul trouble in the paint in the first half, depriving coach Bill Self of Ellis, Embiid and Jamari Traylor for long periods of time. That allowed the 6-foot-9 Bairstow to go to work inside, scoring on an array of putbacks and spin moves.The senior from Brisbane, Australia, had 16 points and four rebounds at the break.When it wasn't Bairstow carrying the Lobos, it was Williams taking over. The speedy guard slashed through the Jayhawks' man-to-man defense to score 12 first-half points, forcing Self — who seems to abhor zone defenses — to employ one in an attempt to stop the easy inside buckets.The Lobos' Arthur Edwards scored their second basket by anybody other than Bairstow and Williams just before the buzzer to get New Mexico within one at the break.Kansas seized control with a 16-4 run to start the second half.Embiid had nine points and Ellis the other seven during the spurt, but it was really fueled by the Jayhawks' defense. They slowed down Bairstow and kept Williams from getting into the lane, and that created better opportunities on the offensive end.The Lobos eventually began chipping away at their 55-42 deficit, most of the surge coming from the foul line. By the time Williams converted a four-point play, New Mexico had managed to scrap and claw to 63-58 with 8:03 left, and briefly silence a crowd heavily in favor of Kansas.But whenever the going got tough, the Jayhawks turned to Ellis and Embiid.The 7-footer from Cameron answered Williams with a pair of foul shots, Ellis added a free throw moments later, and Embiid threw down a dunk as the crowd roared. Ellis added a dunk of his own moments later, forcing New Mexico coach Craig Neal to burn a timeout.It didn't do a whole lot of good.Williams missed after the timeout and Embiid scored again at the other end, pushing the Jayhawks' lead to 74-59 with 4½ minutes remaining. Kansas merely coasted from there, wrapping up the victory in the first meeting between the two schools since the 1964-65 season.
ANN ARBOR, Mich. — Jewell Loyd scored 20 points, Natalie Achonwa had 18 points and nine rebounds and No. 4 Notre Dame cruised to an 86-64 victory over Michigan on Saturday night.Michaela Mabrey added 14 points for the Fighting Irish (9-0), who led 47-23 at halftime. The Irish shot 59 percent from the floor and forced 19 turnovers, including 13 in the decisive first half.Reserve guard Shannon Smith scored 23 points for Michigan (7-4), which had won six of seven. Cyesha Goree had 15 points and seven rebounds, and Siera Thompson finished with 10 points.THIS IS A BREAKING NEWS UPDATE. Check back soon for further information. AP's earlier story is below.This was the type of game Loyd Jewell was looking for after an extended break for No. 4 Notre Dame.Jewell scored 20 points, Natalie Achonwa had 18 points and nine rebounds and the Fighting Irish cruised to an 86-64 victory over Michigan on Saturday night."I wanted to come out here and be aggressive," Jewell said. "I haven't been shooting the ball well at all recently, so it was good for me to come out here and get a good feel."Jewell was 10 for 14 from the field and also had four rebounds and three assists in a team-high 34 minutes. Michaela Mabrey added 14 points in the Irish's first game since a 90-48 victory over UCLA on Dec. 7.Notre Dame (9-0) put this one away early, carrying a 47-23 lead into the break. The Irish shot 59 percent from the floor and forced 19 turnovers, including 13 in the decisive first half."We really got the transition game going," coach Muffet McGraw said. "I was happy with the offense and the defense, really. I thought we played really well."Reserve guard Shannon Smith scored 23 points for Michigan (7-4), which had won six of seven. Cyesha Goree had 15 points and seven rebounds, and Siera Thompson finished with 10 points."For us, one of the takeaways is we played well in the second half," Michigan coach Kim Barnes Arico said. "So I was very encouraged by that. We talked a lot about it at halftime, fighting back and all those things we did a lot better job in the second half. I think we were surprised in the first half, but we responded and I was happy about that."Notre Dame grabbed control by scoring 23 of the final 32 points in the first half. The Irish made 22 of their first 32 shots, compared to an 8-for-25 start for the Wolverines before the break.Smith, who has been nursing a back injury, was 7 for 12 from the field and 8 for 9 at the free-throw line."We let Smith get loose a little bit more than I wanted to and tried to trap her off the ball screen but were ineffective," McGraw said. "I thought she scored more 1-on-1s. But I think we did a lot of good things."Notre Dame had 48 points in the paint on 24-of-34 shooting.
COLLEGE PARK, Md. — Alyssa Thomas shook off early foul trouble to finish with 18 points and 10 rebounds, helping No. 8 Maryland rout Delaware State 93-44 Saturday night for its eighth straight victory.Thomas was on the bench after picking up a pair of early fouls when Maryland (10-1) finished the first half on a 21-6 run, extending a 24-16 lead. Seven different Terrapins scored during the burst, led by five points from Tierney Pfirman.Raven Bankston led Delaware State (3-5) with 22 points. The Hornets shot only 24 percent (15 for 62) from the field.The Terrapins scored 22 points off 18 Hornet turnovers and outrebounded the visitors 64-33.Maryland's edge in size, speed and depth was no match for the Hornets' patient offensive attack early on. The Terrapins led 45-22 at halftime, ending the opening 20 minutes on a 21-6 run and holding Delaware State without a field goal after Bankston's left-side bank shot with 6:00 left in the first half.The Terrapins played most of the first half without leading scorer Thomas, who picked up her second personal foul three minutes into the game while fighting for a loose ball on the Delaware State baseline and sat on the bench for the remainder of the half.But Delaware State couldn't capitalize on her absence as Maryland flexed its muscle on defense and scored in waves.
Anyone picking out paint for a house knows that a good trim color may not work in bulk. But the Knicks, looking for something fresh to market, took the color orange, generally relegated to their jerseys' fringes, and made an entire alternate uniform out of it.The idea seemed doomed from the start, if for no other reason than the challenge it presented to the singsongy rhymes of Walt Frazier, the legendary point guard-turned-TV commentator. Orange famously rhymes with nothing, and that is just what the Knicks' jersey has produced, unless you want to include all the jeers and wisecracks that have piled up. The Knicks have lost all six games they have played this season while dressed like Creamsicles.With players now beginning to joke that the jerseys are cursed — despite Friday's 90-86 loss to Boston, the team is a much-better 6-10 while wearing white or blue — the Knicks appear to be waving a white flag of sorts, at least for Saturday's game against Atlanta.When the two teams met a month ago at Madison Square Garden, also on a Saturday, the Knicks wore orange, the Hawks wore red, and the result was ugly to watch (and that does not even take into account that the Knicks lost by 20). On television, it was difficult to tell the two teams apart; on the court, it was not much easier.In the aftermath, the N.B.A. said that would not happen again. Indeed, the Knicks will wear white Saturday night, a team spokesman said, and the Hawks will be back in red. It will be the first time this season that the Knicks will not wear orange for a Saturday or Sunday home game, and just as well: The last time they wore orange was last Sunday, when Boston trounced them by 41 points at the Garden.The real question is when the Knicks will have the courage to wear orange again. After all, many of the teams they play do not wear red, which takes away that excuse. Then again, having already worn orange six times, the Knicks, under league guidelines for alternate uniforms, do not ever have to wear them again. (The Knicks have continued to sell their orange jerseys online in various configurations costing $49.95 to $299.95.)Of course, the Knicks are hardly the first team to have a uniform associated with bad luck. The Dallas Cowboys generally avoid wearing the team's blue jerseys, mostly because of losses long ago. Similarly, Notre Dame's green jerseys are considered by some to be unlucky.One ancestor of the Knicks' orange jersey is the all-burgundy uniform the Philadelphia Phillies debuted in 1979. Like the Knicks, the Phillies took an accent color from the team's uniforms and splashed it all over themselves. Unlike the Knicks, the Phillies showed no patience with the color change, ditching it after one game. Many cited a blown lead against the Montreal Expos, but having Mike Schmidt appear to be wearing red pajamas was probably a factor as well.Orange has a chance at redemption in the Garden on Sunday when Syracuse plays St. John's. The Orange should win, even if the orange Knicks always lose.
BOSTON — No one in either locker room expected anything close to the Boston Celtics ' 41-point drubbing of the Knicks five days earlier at Madison Square Garden. But it would have been equally hard to envision what transpired Friday night at TD Garden.The Knicks fell to the Celtics, 90-86, which does not constitute a news bulletin these days: They have lost 16 of their 22 games. But a Knicks team that has been in a state of distraction and dysfunction, fueled by trade rumors, injuries and chemistry issues, left Boston for Atlanta with even more concerns.If Sunday's loss was embarrassing, then Friday's was equal parts disconcerting and downright confusing, with the Knicks squandering an 11-point lead in the last 10 minutes 32 seconds."It's tough," Carmelo Anthony said. "I'd be lying to you if I said it wasn't."He added: "What are we going to do? Stop playing? Stop fighting? Stop believing? We can't do that."Anthony was dominant in the first half (20 points), an effective decoy in the third quarter and an ineffective scorer (3 points on 1-of-8 shooting) in the fourth quarter. He finished with 26 points.The Knicks also did not get the production they expect from J. R. Smith, who attempted one shot in more than 26 minutes of play. Shooting and scoring are the focus of his game, not setting up his teammates, which he seemed to try to do Friday."We have enough scorers," said Smith, who had three assists, a notch above the 2.1 a game he was averaging entering Friday. "We need people who can put those guys in a position to excel at what they do. I take it upon myself to make my teammates better."Smith finished with 2 points, making two free throws. He said that he had no intention of purposely limiting his shot selection and that the shots were not there, save for the one he attempted — and missed — in the fourth quarter."We need more playmakers, more than just scorers," Smith said. "My job is to give my teammates the easiest buckets we can. We're not getting those. So I've taken it upon myself to sacrifice my shots to get other guys going. It might not be the right way. It might be the right way. I don't know."Coach Mike Woodson, whose job security has been in question, was asked if Smith could be effective shooting once in 26 minutes. His response was simple: "No. Not at all."Anthony concurred, saying: "We want him shooting the basketball. I don't want to look up and see that he took one shot."Anthony added: "We need guys to be aggressive and do what they do well. J. R. can score the basketball well and shoot the basketball well."Smith's lack of shooting was one story line. A second, more familiar one was an injury, this one an abdominal muscle strain for Kenyon Martin. He played only three minutes in the fourth quarter."When it rains, it pours," Martin said.Despite all the distractions, the Knicks rallied from a 17-point deficit in the second quarter and, led by Anthony, cut their halftime deficit to 6 points. They then outscored the Celtics, 25-14, in the third quarter and opened the fourth with 6 straight points to take a 79-68 lead with 10:32 remaining.The Knicks scored only 7 points the rest of the way, however, and the Celtics used runs of 10-0 and 7-0 to retake the lead on their way to the victory. Boston got some help from an unexpected source: The rookie center Vitor Faverani had 5 points in the two runs, including a key layup that put the Celtics ahead by 88-84 with 67 seconds to play."This is a game we should have won," said Knicks forward Amar'e Stoudemire, who had a season-high 18 points but was expected to sit out Saturday's game in Atlanta to rest his knees."We're a veteran team," he added. "We should know how to get stops down the stretch, get baskets. Once we figure that out, we'll get over the hump."With trade rumors swirling around the Knicks, a few of the players mentioned in possible deals — one involves Kyle Lowry and Toronto — weighed in before the game. Metta World Peace said: "Whatever team I'm on is never rebuilding. When you get Metta World, you're officially a championship mentality. Like here. World Peace brings a championship mentality. That's what I do." World Peace added that he did not feel distracted, saying: "What am I dealing with? Getting paid to play basketball?" He said he had been looking for an "adventure" when he signed with the Knicks, the other two options being a Chinese team and the Arena Football League. Raymond Felton said he was not following the rumors, adding: "I don't deal with it. That's why we have general managers."
CHAPEL HILL, N.C. — Short-handed again in a tight — and often ugly — contest, Marcus Paige and North Carolina proved they're tough enough to fight their way to another marquee nonconference victory.As for Kentucky, coach John Calipari is still waiting for his Wildcats to grow up.Paige scored 21 of his 23 points in the second half and James Michael McAdoo had 20 points, helping the 18th-ranked Tar Heels beat the 11th-ranked Wildcats 82-77 on Saturday.It wasn't always pretty for the Tar Heels (7-2), from 19 missed free throws to seeing the Wildcats swat seven of their shots. Yet they managed to add another big name to their early wins against then-No. 1 Michigan State and then-No. 3 Louisville — all coming while top scorer P.J. Hairston and Leslie McDonald sit out due to NCAA eligibility concerns."I think especially after getting the two big games earlier in the year, we had more confidence and belief we could get this one done," Paige said. "But at the same time, it's not a game everyone in the room would pick us to win. We had to come out with the mentality that we've got to play hard and be the aggressor and let the chips fall from there."Yes, the Tar Heels have confounded Hall of Fame coach Roy Williams by also losing at home to Belmont and following the Louisville win with a loss at UAB. But one thing is certain: This bunch shows up in its biggest games.J.P. Tokoto added 15 points for the Tar Heels, who shot 57 percent after halftime and scored 20 points off turnovers to finally wrestle control of a foul-filled game away from the Wildcats (8-3)."I feel like with our team this year, mentally we're there and have built up that mentality that we're going to keep fighting, go to the next play and not worry about the last play," Tokoto said.When it comes to the Wildcats, Calipari wants to see more from a team built around the nation's No. 1 recruiting class.The Wildcats dominated the boards, scored 19 second-chance points and hit 29 of 43 free throws in a game with 56 personal fouls. But with star rookie Julius Randle struggling, Kentucky shot 41 percent and committed 17 turnovers while trailing for most of the second half in its first true road game this year.Its two losses had come on neutral courts to ranked opponents, Michigan State in the Champions Classic last month and Baylor in last week's SEC/Big 12 Challenge."What we are right now is we're not a good basketball team," Calipari said. "And we're not a good team because our emotion is all based on our individual play instead of our team play. ... Our stuff is all based on 'Did I miss a free throw, did I get beat on the dribble, did I miss a shot, did I turn it over?'"We've got to get through this. But we had chances to let go of the rope, and we didn't. We are what we are right now. We've got a long way to go."UNC's 82 points and 48 percent shooting were the most by a Kentucky opponent all season. The Tar Heels also shot 45 free throws, with an aggressive McAdoo getting to the line 19 times while also leading the defensive effort on Randle."They came right after us," Calipari said. "Where we looked like, 'OK, we're ready to get away from them,' they came right back. ... They just kept fighting. I thought McAdoo just absolutely killed us."Freshman Aaron Harrison scored 20 for Kentucky, but Randle finished with 11 points on 3-for-9 shooting while battling foul trouble. He also had five rebounds.Paige managed just two points in the opening half, coming on free throws when referee Roger Ayers whistled Calipari for a technical foul with 1.9 seconds left. But Paige provided the steadying hand North Carolina desperately needed after halftime.He knocked down a contested 3 over Randle to give UNC a 60-54 lead with 8:17 left, and then came up with an even bigger shot when he lofted a floater over shot blocker Willie Cauley-Stein with the shot clock winding down for a 70-65 lead with 1:41 to go.Paige added an alley-oop pass in transition to Brice Johnson for a dunk, and then closed his afternoon by knocking down two free throws with 6 seconds left to make it a two-possession game.
SYRACUSE — In the final few minutes of a practice this week, Trevor Cooney received a pass on the wing, dribbled once to create a sliver of space and let fly an effortless jump shot from beyond the 3-point arc. He was fading left, his body leaning toward the sideline, as the ball leapt from his fingertips, a perfect gooseneck follow-through guiding it toward the hoop.After it swished, Cooney, Syracuse's next great shooter, cast a glance in the direction of Gerry McNamara, one of the greatest shooters in team history, and a fleeting moment of eye contact denoted McNamara's approval from the sideline. It was as if McNamara, now an assistant coach, were watching a mirror image of himself."They're both hard-nosed, tough guys that can shoot," Syracuse Coach Jim Boeheim said. "There are some similarities there, I think."A turbulent freshman season for Cooney has given way to torrid shooting and a starting spot in Boeheim's backcourt in 2013-14. Through nine games — all Syracuse victories — Cooney ranks second on the team in scoring at 15.3 points a game, a product of his skill from 3-point range, which is strengthening the comparisons to McNamara, who holds the team records for 3-pointers made and attempted: 400 of 1,131, a 35.4 percent success rate.Cooney has connected on 31 of his 64 attempts from beyond the arc this season (48.4 percent) as Syracuse has vaulted to a No. 2 ranking, bringing to light one of the more unusual coach-player relationships in college basketball.On Sunday, Cooney will take the court at Madison Square Garden — the building his mentor, McNamara, once electrified — with a newfound confidence and starring role for Syracuse's first matchup against St. John's since the Orange left the Big East for the Atlantic Coast Conference.Before McNamara won a national title, before he dribbled deftly behind his back in 2006 to set up a running 3-pointer against Cincinnati that started one of the most memorable runs in Big East tournament history, he was a boy from Scranton, Pa., who loved silly comedies and Notre Dame football and winning basketball games.All three resonated with Cooney, a sharpshooter from Delaware who loved the Fighting Irish and adored the movies "Superbad" and "Pineapple Express." When Cooney came to Syracuse, he and McNamara forged a relationship rooted in basketball but buoyed by similar interests. What began as coaching evolved into friendship as McNamara reminded Cooney of his older brother Matt.The breadth of their relationship was crucial when Cooney struggled for most of last season. McNamara would push his protégé on the court, then offer a soothing influence off it."Really, really similar people, similar families. Irish," McNamara said with a laugh. "I was drawn to him and his personality immediately because, quite frankly, he reminded me of me."Predictably, there are shooting contests, and they take place almost daily inside the Carmelo K. Anthony Basketball Center on campus. It is a spectacle for those in attendance.McNamara, whose sculptured frame matches his college physique from six years ago, runs Cooney through grueling shooting drills employing "every possible angle and scenario you can imagine," McNamara said. The first one to make five shots wins that spot on the court, and the goal is to claim the most spots. Sometimes, only swishes count."If you hit nothing but net, it counts as one," Cooney said. "Normally he'll just crush me, but lately I've been winning a couple. I try and play as long as we can, and hopefully he gets tired."The staunchly competitive McNamara concedes that Cooney is in better shape, but that is an advantage Cooney has over most of his opponents this season as well. After "playing around" with his weight the last two seasons, Cooney said, he has found his ideal spot at 193 pounds — strong enough to drive the lane yet quick enough to run off screens.To get there, he underwent a rigorous three-month training regimen over the summer to optimize his conditioning. Motivation for the 6 a.m. turf and track workouts was equal parts past and present. Missing the last shot against Michigan in the Final Four in April crossed his mind as frequently as the desire to emulate the work ethic of players like Ray Allen, Reggie Miller and Richard Hamilton — some of the N.B.A.'s best shooters."He works as hard as anybody," Boeheim said. "Or harder."That much was evident at practice. Cooney popped free on the right wing and buried another 3-pointer as he faded, once again, to the left. This time, McNamara did not bother with a reassuring look. A swish always counts.
OKLAHOMA CITY — Liz Donohoe scored 18 points and pulled down eight rebounds as the No. 14 Oklahoma State women topped South Florida 75-56 in the All-College Classic at Chesapeake Energy Arena Saturday.Donohoe scored five points in an early 9-0 run which gave OSU a 16-7 lead with 13:55 left in the first half and the Bulls would never get closer than six again. Oklahoma State, which has now started each of the last four seasons 8-0, twice led by as many as 23 points in the second half.USF (5-4) hit 8 of 30 (26.7 percent) field goals, 2 of 12 (16.7 percent) 3-point shots and 3 of 7 (42.9 percent) free throws in the first half as the Cowgirls took a 38-21 advantage into the break.Tiffany Bias scored 16 points and dished out seven assists. She moved into 11th on Oklahoma State's all-time scoring list at 1,255.
STANFORD, Calif. — When Tara VanDerveer's mother showed up for a surprise visit, the Hall of Fame coach knew something might be happening at Stanford in her honor.Just more than two weeks later, VanDerveer finally got her special moment in front of the appreciative fans at Maples Pavilion.Chiney Ogwumike had 19 points and seven rebounds and No. 6 Stanford celebrated VanDerveer's 900th victory back at home, beating 23rd-ranked Gonzaga 73-45 on Saturday.Ogwumike shot 8 for 16 and in the first game at Maples Pavilion since VanDerveer won her 900th game against Florida Gulf Coast on Nov. 27 in Puerto Vallarta, Mexico. VanDerveer became the fifth Division I coach to join the 900 club, and was honored after the game for her accomplishment in an on-court ceremony."It's cool to be a part of something so special," Ogwumike said. "She makes us better players. She's wise beyond her years."A cheering crowd on its feet after the final buzzer, VanDerveer's players pulled on Cardinal red 900 T-shirts, while Stanford President John Hennessy and athletic director Bernard Muir presented the coach with a framed No. 900 white Stanford jersey."It's a little hard for me to wrap my head around 900," VanDerveer said over the public address system. "This is the only way I could get a Stanford jersey, as a coach. ... Let's get some more!"Even after a lopsided loss, Gonzaga's coaches and players stayed on the court long enough to offer their applause.Coach Kelly Graves considered it an important moment for his young women."It's great that she was honored in front of all the fans here, the faithful," Graves said. "I wanted our team to sit out there and watch it and appreciate who she is and what she's done for our game. You think about 900 wins, that's 30 a year for 30 years, for crying out loud. We've won 30 one time. It's incredible what she's done."VanDerveer was cheered when a 900 image featuring her photo appeared on the main scoreboard during an early timeout, while fans waved 900 posters throughout the arena. VanDerveer's mother, Rita, cheered her accomplishment, too. The top VanDerveer phrases also were read by players on the video board, along with a postgame video tribute."My mother pulled a fast on me and showed up," VanDerveer said. "I didn't think much about it. We were down in Mexico, I had kind of moved on — 900's a lot of games. I'm kind of thinking back, 'How'd this happen?'"This was a solid warmup for the Cardinal (8-1) as they returned for the first time following a 16-day break for final exams, a week before they host No. 3 Tennessee. Stanford first plays Monday at home against New Mexico.Sunny Greinacher scored 18 points to lead the West Coast Conference favorite Zags (8-2), who had their six-game winning streak snapped while losing a sixth straight in as many tries against perennial Pac-12 power Stanford. Gonzaga was coming off impressive wins against Big Ten opponents Ohio State and Wisconsin.Kailee Johnson hit a pair of 3-pointers and added 11 points for Stanford in its seventh straight win since a 76-57 defeat at No. 1 Connecticut on Nov. 11. Amber Orrange had 10 points and three assists.Gonzaga stayed close early and pulled to 6-6 before Stanford responded with a 15-3 spurt — including 12 unanswered points — and built a 21-8 lead at the 11:22 mark of the first half.The Bulldogs hadn't lost since dropping their only other matchup against a ranked opponent this season, 82-78 at No. 11 Oklahoma on Nov. 14.Stanford shot 48.1 percent in the opening 20 minutes on the way to a 33-19 halftime lead and it was never close the rest of the way. The Zags missed all nine of their first-half 3-point tries and 14 overall to shoot 34 percent.Stanford junior forward Taylor Greenfield made her season debut after missing the first eight games with a foot issue and she underwent treatment for the injury. Her minutes will be limited initially.A "Welcome Back" video tribute was held for former Stanford star Nicole Powell, now a Zags assistant coach, before pregame introductions. She received a warm standing ovation and waved to the crowd.Over the past week, VanDerveer showed her versatility. She helped Erica McCall prepare for a psychology final.The coach is eager to see her rotation come together now that the team is intact."This is the healthiest we've been," VanDerveer said. "We're a month away from knowing what our 8-9 player rotation is. We will never be what I call deli basketball, where people are going in and going out."
WICHITA, Kan. — Midway through the second half Saturday, Tennessee was following dunks with dunks and holding No. 12 Wichita State without a field goal for nearly 6 minutes."I thought we were in good shape," Volunteers coach Cuonzo Martin said.Then Wichita State's Tekele Cotton took over.Cotton scored all 19 of his points in the second half, pushing Wichita State to a 70-61 victory.Darius Carter had 11 points and 14 rebounds while Cleanthony Early added 13 points for the Shockers (10-0), who are off to the best start in school history.Jordan McRae scored 26 points for Tennessee (6-3), which shots 16 of 47 (34 percent) over the game's final 35 minutes."There were plays around the rim, postups and rebounds where we had chances," Martin said. "We just didn't capitalize."Then I thought Cotton was the key for them."Never was that more the case than in the game's most significant sequence.Midway through the second half, Tennessee had grabbed momentum with a 10-2 run that featured three dunks while holding the Shockers without a field goal for almost 6 minutes.Jarnell Stokes' slam with 10:22 to play tied it 41-41, and his dunk 37 seconds later led to a three-point opportunity. He made the free throw for a 44-41 lead."I thought we were in good shape," Martin said.That is when Cotton took over.He made two free throws. Then he blocked two Tennessee shots on the same possession, leading to a transition opportunity he finished with a runner while being fouled.The crowd of 14,356 in the downtown Intrust Bank Arena went crazy, and Wichita State would not trail again after Cotton's free throw made it 46-44 with 9:09 remaining.While the always understated Cotton tried to downplay what happened — "I was just doing everything I could to stop him from scoring," he said — Marshall and Martin called it the game's turning point."It was a big-time block, and then he gets the and-1," Martin said. "The game turned from there.""It was an incredible block," Marshall said.No one had a better view than Shockers point guard Fred VanVleet."They were such amazing plays," he said. "It definitely changed the entire game."Just 31 seconds later, Cotton drew another foul. He missed the second free throw, which Carter rebounded and put back in for a 49-44 lead."I just fed off Tekele's energy at that time," Carter said. "I wanted to chase every ball today, so I was just going after it."Carter's rebounding was the key. Tennessee entered the game outrebounding opponents by more than 10 a game but Wichita State won the rebounding battle 36-31."We worked on rebounding diligently for days," Marshall said. "There's probably bruises and scratches on our guys still from working on checking out."A 3-pointer by Cotton started a 7-0 run that pushed Wichita State's lead to 58-49 with 4:47 remaining.A 3 by Early beat the shot-clock buzzer and made it 63-51 with 2:43 to play.While Baker did play through the pain of his injured left ankle, he was limited to eight points in 32 minutes."When it happened, there was no way I thought he was going to play today," Carter said. "Seeing him go out there, we wanted to win for him."The anticipated grinding pace of the game was nowhere to be found at the beginning. Wichita State and Tennessee combined to make 13 of their first 20 field goal attempts, including all five 3-pointers. Wichita State led 17-16 at that point behind eight points from VanVleet.But the rest of the half was quite the opposite as the teams combined to go 7 of 29 over the final 12 minutes, 1 of 13 from behind the 3-point line.Neither team led by more than three points in the half's final 12 minutes and the Volunteers led 26-25 at halftime.
AMHERST, Mass. — Northern Illinois coach Mark Montgomery had a message for counterpart Derek Kellogg after No. 22 Massachusetts beat the Huskies 80-54 on Saturday."I told Derek at the end of the game that they're going to make a serious run in the (NCAA) tournament, barring injuries," Montgomery said."Just so many options. When your 3 and 4 men can shoot like theirs, with (Raphiael) Putney and (Sampson) Carter, it's matchup problems — and that opens up for (Cady) Lalanne. Good team. They can score with the best of them. I like their pieces."Montgomery didn't even mention star guard Chaz Williams, who was coming off career highs of 32 points and 15 assists in the Dec. 7 win over Brigham Young, and had 12 points and seven assists — and didn't score a field goal until the final minute of the first half.Lalanne led five players in double figures with 16 points as the Minutemen (9-0) continued the program's best start since the 1995-96 team opened 26-0.UMass trailed only by 2-0, running off 11 straight points — nine on 3-pointers by Putney — to take control. They had their sloppy moments and weren't as sharp as Kellogg would have liked at times, but they got the job done and allowed a season-low 54 points."It's all positive. I think we could have played a little better in spurts," Kellogg said. "We got careless with the basketball more than anything, and our defense came and went . but all in all our guys won the game, took care of business and we're going to move on to the next game (at Ohio University on Wednesday)."Putney added 13 points and Maxie Esho had 12 points and seven rebounds in the easy win. Freshman Clyde Santee, who had played just 3-plus minutes coming in, scored the first 13 points of his college career — all in a span of 5:34."I was really happy for Clyde, that he made some shots and played well in a short amount of time and got us our fifth guy in double digits tonight," Kellogg said of Santee, who was 5 of 6 from the field, including 2 of 3 from 3-point range, and had two rebounds — the second and third of his college career.Said Montgomery: "I don't know who No. 5 is but he had quite the day."Sampson added eight points and seven rebounds for the Minutemen.The Minutemen led by 12 points at halftime and were never in jeopardy despite some lackluster play. The lead grew to 27 points as Kellogg cleared his bench early."That's something that Coach appreciates all the time, giving (the young guys) opportunities," Lalanne said. "Getting a big lead and getting them in in the second half, that's something we look forward to doing.""We just couldn't get over the hump," Montgomery said. "They sped us up."Montgomery said his young team was dealing with some physical issues, including starting 3-man Aaric Armstead being out with a groin pull. He was happy with the way his players "weathered the storm" early and hung in.The Minutemen gave up the first two points of the game but then scored 11 straight — including the three 3s in four attempts by Putney.The lead quickly grew to 14 as Northern Illinois had just five points in the first 8 minutes of the game. But the Huskies came to life and cut the lead to nine with 4:18 left in the half. The Minutemen built their lead back up to 14.After a four-point play by Daveon Balls with 1:15 left in the half, Williams hit his only basket of the half, with 50.3 seconds left, and UMass led by 12 at halftime.It took UMass 6:28 of the second half to get its first field goal, but the Minutemen were just 0 for 2 from the field before Trey Davis hit a 3-pointer and they had already been to the free throw line 10 times.A fancy passing play that ended in an alley-oop pass for a dunk by Esho put UMass up by 17, but Esho was hit with a technical foul for slapping the backboard.The game was the second of four the Minutemen have to play each season as part of the agreement that brought the UMass football team into the Mid-American Conference. UMass is in the Atlantic 10 in basketball.
WICHITA, Kan. — Tekele Cotton scored all 19 of his points in the second half and No. 12 Wichita State beat Tennessee 70-61 on Saturday as the Shockers got off to the best start in school history.Darius Carter had 11 points and 14 rebounds and Cleanthony Early added 13 points for the Shockers (10-0).Jordan McRae scored 26 points for Tennessee (6-3), which shot 16 of 47 (34 percent) over the final 35 minutes.Trailing at halftime for the fifth time this season, Wichita State methodically worked its way to a 39-34 lead — the largest of the game for either team to that point — on Cotton's tip-in with 15:06 remaining.But Wichita State would not make another field goal for 5:57.A 10-2 run by the Volunteers contained three dunks and Jarnell Stokes' slam with 10:22 to play tied it 41-41.Just 37 seconds later, Stokes dunked again while being fouled. He made the free throw for a 44-41 lead.That is when Cotton took over.He made two free throws. Then blocked two Tennessee shots, leading to a transition opportunity he finished with a runner while being fouled.The crowd — attendance was 14,356 in the downtown Intrust Bank Arena — went crazy, and Wichita State would not trail again.Four minutes later, a 3-pointer by Cotton started a 7-0 run that gave Wichita State a 58-49 lead with 4:47 remaining.A 3 by Early beat the shot-clock buzzer and made it 63-51 with 2:43 to play, allowing Wichita State to milk the shot clock the rest of the way.The anticipated grinding pace of the game was nowhere to be found at the beginning. Wichita State and Tennessee combined to make 13 of their first 20 field goal attempts, including all five 3-pointers. Wichita State led 17-16 at that point behind eight points from Fred VanVleet.But the rest of the half was quite the opposite as the teams combined to go 7 of 29 over the final 12 minutes, 1 of 13 from behind the 3-point line.Neither team led by more than three points in the half's final 12 minutes and the Volunteers led 26-25 at halftime.
OKLAHOMA CITY — Marcus Smart will likely have more opportunities to play on an NBA court.But the All-America guard — and potential lottery pick — decided not to force any shots and get his teammates more involved Saturday at Chesapeake Energy Arena, home of the Oklahoma City Thunder.The Big 12 Conference's leading scorer took a backseat as Le'Bryan Nash scored 22 points and No. 7 Oklahoma State overcame a sluggish start to pull away for a 70-55 victory over Louisiana Tech.Nash admitted that it was his day to lead the Cowboys (9-1), who hadn't played a game in more than a week. And with so many scoring options to defend, there was little Louisiana Tech (8-3) could do after cutting Oklahoma State's lead to 49-42 with 8:44 remaining."I wish I could have finished more shots," Nash said. "I probably would have had a career high or something."With Louisiana Tech determined to slow down Smart, Nash grabbed a game-high 10 rebounds and scored 15 of Oklahoma State's 31 points in the first half. Nash made six of his first 11 shots to pick up the slack for Smart, who finished with 13 points.Smart was only 1-of-4 shooting in the first half, and he said he made a conscious effort to be more of an all-around player who created shots for his teammates. He added five rebounds, five assists and four steals.Markel Brown had 13 points and Kamari Murphy added 10 for the Cowboys."I'm just trying to focus on making sure that I don't force a lot of things because I do have a talented group of guys around me that I really don't need to force things," Smart said. "They can create also, so I just kind of let them get in the flow of their game."Chris Anderson scored 14 points and Alex Hamilton added 12 points for Louisiana Tech, which held Oklahoma State scoreless over the first 4 minutes of the game. But the Bulldogs couldn't maintain the energy down the stretch.The Cowboys used their athleticism and multiple scoring options to turn a close game into a lopsided victory in the All-College Classic."I thought we'd be more competitive to be honest, but I just think that we struggled so much from an offensive standpoint," Louisiana Tech coach Mike White said. "(We) had a lot of droughts offensively, couldn't really get into a rhythm."Louisiana Tech trailed by only seven points with less than 9 minutes remaining, but Smart helped build Oklahoma State's lead back to double digits. He put back a missed shot, then found Murphy for a dunk to put the Cowboys ahead 55-42 with 6:25 remaining.Oklahoma State hadn't played since a 79-52 rout of South Carolina on Dec. 6.The Cowboys struggled early to regain their rhythm and didn't score their first point until Brown hit a free throw with 15:41 remaining in the first half.Oklahoma State missed all five of its 3-point attempts and made only 7 of 13 free throws in the first half, allowing Louisiana Tech to hang around into the second half."(We) didn't get off to a good start," Oklahoma State coach Travis Ford said. "We can contribute it to taking eight days off, finals week, different things, but we just didn't make good decisions offensively early in the game."Louisiana Tech, on the other hand, looked fresh playing its second game in four days and facing its highest ranked opponent since the two teams met in 1991.The Bulldogs relied on their defense to take a 3-0 lead in the opening minutes and hold the Cowboys to just 38.7 percent shooting in the first half.But Nash and Smart created some fast-break opportunities, and Oklahoma State used a 10-2 run midway through the first half to take a lead it never relinquished.The Cowboys expanded their lead to 22 points and pulled away for their second consecutive win following their only loss of the season, a 73-68 defeat to No. 16 Memphis.
CHAPEL HILL, N.C. — Xylina McDaniel scored 15 points to lead a balanced attack that had five players score in double figures for No. 15 North Carolina in a 100-49 romp past Charleston Southern on Saturday.Three players have 14 points for the Tar Heels (8-2), Stephanie Mavunga, who had 11 rebounds, Alisha Gray and N'Dea Bryant, a career-high for the sophomore reserve. Diamond DeShields added 10 to go with a career-high seven assists.Erin Bratcher had 14 points and DJ Fowler 12 for the Buccaneers (3-4), who were held to 27 percent shooting and committed 31 turnovers.North Carolina shot a blistering 58 percent despite coming off a 10-day break for finals, and in the second half cranked up the defense to match. Charleston Southern trailed 49-30 at the break but was out-scored 51-19 in the second half. UNC had 25 steals, 16 from players off the bench, and blocked 11 shots.
Nick Johnson made six free throws in the final 25 seconds and No. 1 Arizona rallied from an 11-point second-half deficit to defeat host Michigan, 72-70, on Saturday.Brandon Ashley scored 18 points for Arizona (11-0), which wore down Michigan (6-4) in the final minutes. The Wildcats finished with 17 offensive rebounds and outscored the Wolverines, 34-28, in the lane.Glenn Robinson III had 20 points for Michigan, making all seven of his shots from the field in the first half. Michigan led 37-28 at halftime, and Mitch McGary pushed the lead to double digits with a dunk for the first points of the second half.Johnson, Aaron Gordon and Kaleb Tarczewski had 14 points each for Arizona.NORTH CAROLINA 82, KENTUCKY 77 Marcus Paige scored 21 of his 23 points in the second half and James Michael McAdoo had 20 points, helping No. 18 North Carolina beat No. 11 Kentucky.North Carolina (7-2) shot 57 percent after halftime and scored 20 points off turnovers to wrest control from the visiting Wildcats (8-3). Aaron Harrison scored 20 for Kentucky.OHIO ST. 79, N. DAKOTA ST. 62 LaQuinton Ross and Lenzelle Smith Jr. each scored 18 points to lead No. 3 Ohio State (9-0) at home.WISCONSIN 86, E. KENTUCKY 61 Ben Brust scored 20 points to lead four Wisconsin players in double figures as the No. 4 Badgers won at home.The freshman reserve Nigel Hayes scored a career-high 17 points for Wisconsin (12-0), which is off to its best start since 1915-16. Sam Dekker added 16 points and Frank Kaminsky, playing with a right foot injury, added 13. Glenn Cosey scored 21 points to lead Eastern Kentucky (7-4).MICHIGAN ST. 67, OAKLAND 63 Keith Appling scored 18 of his 21 points in the second half and Adreian Payne had 20 points and 10 rebounds to lead visiting No. 5 Michigan State.Branden Dawson added 16 points and 13 rebounds for the Spartans (8-1). Duke Mondy, the nation's leader in steals, had seven more to go with 24 points for Oakland (2-9).LOUISVILLE 79, W. KENTUCKY 63 Russ Smith had 14 points and 10 assists and host No. 6 Louisville shot 69 percent from the field in the second half.With the starting point guard Chris Jones sidelined with a sprained right wrist, the Cardinals (9-1) got a number of backcourt contributions to beat Western Kentucky (5-4) for the fifth straight time. The freshman Terry Rozier grabbed a team-high 10 rebounds starting in Jones's place.OKLAHOMA ST. 70, LOUISIANA TECH 55 Le'Bryan Nash had 22 points and 10 rebounds and No. 7 Oklahoma State overcame a sluggish start to pull away to a victory at home.The all-American guard Marcus Smart scored 3 points in the first half but finished with 13 for the Cowboys (9-1). He added five rebounds and five assists. Markel Brown also had 13 points for Oklahoma State. Chris Anderson scored 14 points for Louisiana Tech (8-3).WICHITA ST. 70, TENNESSEE 61 Tekele Cotton scored all 19 of his points in the second half to lift No. 12 Wichita State to a victory at home.Darius Carter had 11 points and 14 rebounds, and Cleanthony Early added 13 points. Wichita State (10-0) is off to the best start in team history. Jordan McRae scored 26 points for Tennessee (6-3).KANSAS 80, NEW MEXICO 63 Perry Ellis scored 21 points, Joel Embiid added 18 and host No. 13 Kansas (7-3) pulled away in the second half.Cameron Bairstow and Kendall Williams had 24 points apiece for the Lobos (7-2).UMASS 80, N. ILLINOIS 54 Cady Lalanne scored 16 points and host No. 22 Massachusetts continued its best start since 1995-96.Raphiael Putney had 13 points, including three 3-pointers in an early 11-0 run for the Minutemen (9-0). Darrell Bowie led Northern Illinois (3-5) with 10 points. PRINCETON 81, PENN STATE 79 Will Barrett scored 24 points to lead visiting Princeton (8-1) to an overtime win over Penn State (8-4).NOTRE DAME 79, INDIANA 72 Jerian Grant had 23 points and 9 assists to lead Notre Dame (8-3) past Indiana (8-3) in Indianapolis.ST. PETER'S 83, SETON HALL 80 Desi Washington had a career-high 34 points, including a 3-pointer with 3.3 seconds left in overtime, to help St. Peter's (3-6) defeat host Seton Hall (7-4).TENNESSEE 103, TROY 64 Isabelle Harrison, Cierra Burdick and Nia Moore had double-doubles as No. 3 Tennessee used its height advantage to remain unbeaten. Host Tennessee (9-0) outrebounded Troy 74-29.NOTRE DAME 86, MICHIGAN 64 Loyd Jewell scored 20 points, Natalie Achonwa had 18 points and 9 rebounds and No. 4 Notre Dame (9-0) won at Michigan (7-4).STANFORD 73, GONZAGA 45 Chiney Ogwumike had 19 points and 7 rebounds as No. 6 Stanford (8-1) dominated No. 23 Gonzaga at home. Sunny Greinacher had 18 for Gonzaga (8-2), which was coming off impressive wins against Ohio State and Wisconsin.
CLEVELAND — Kyrie Irving, a budding superstar with the Cavaliers , cannot become an unrestricted free agent until 2016. That is the earliest he can choose to leave the team. That is not any time soon, and most fans here seem to understand the rules of his employment."He's trapped with us that long," said Mike Polk, a comedian based in Cleveland.Yet Irving's situation has not prevented a segment of the population from voicing concern. It is never too early to worry in Cleveland, where the psychic wounds are deep. The city has not celebrated a major sports championship since 1964, and one of its greatest basketball stars, LeBron James, decamped for South Florida three years ago.Even as he plays for the Miami Heat, James continues to cast his considerable shadow over Cleveland — and on Irving, in particular, who has become the target of some LeBron-inspired civic angst. Such was the case on Dec. 7, during the Cavaliers' game against the Los Angeles Clippers, when a young fan wandered onto the court wearing a T-shirt that read, "Kyrie Don't Leave."Cavaliers Coach Mike Brown said, "There are pressures that he has to deal with that none of us have to deal with."The state of play is unusual in Cleveland, where Irving, 21, has emerged as one of the N.B.A.'s most dynamic point guards. With James eligible for free agency again next summer, the city's most optimistic residents wonder whether Irving can help woo him to return. It would be a one-two punch to rival any in the league.Optimism, though, tends to be a foreign feeling here, too much disappointment and too much frustration. Although this month's T-shirt incident was isolated — "Most people in this city have perspective," Polk said — some are fearing the worst. It makes no sense, given Irving's contract. But it also makes total sense."It's like you had a hot wife who left you for another guy," Jason Herron, a season-ticket holder, said. "Now you have a new hot girlfriend, and you're worried that she's going to leave you, too. It's almost embarrassing. He can't even go anywhere for two years."Herron, a sales manager at a car dealership, gained a measure of fame (or infamy, depending on one's point of view) for his central role in an unusual episode in the city's history. On July 8, 2010, Herron watched James's televised "Decision" with friends at a local bar. Herron was hopeful that James would choose to stay in Cleveland, but he also packed lighter fluid. "Just in case," he said.Shortly after James declared that he would sign with Miami, Herron went outside and started a bonfire. He used a James jersey as kindling. A local television news crew's video was soon widespread online, and it became yet another symbol of Cleveland's fraught relationship with professional sports.Since his departure, James has won two championships with the Heat. The Cavaliers have reverted to familiar form as one of the league's punching bags, finishing last in the Central Division in each of the last three seasons.If fans have any reason to feel encouraged about the future, it comes in the form of Irving, a 6-foot-3 ball-handling wizard whom the team selected with the top overall pick in the 2011 draft. Irving, who grew up in West Orange, N.J., before attending Duke for one injury-marred season, appeared in his first All-Star Game last season. He entered Saturday's game against Miami averaging 21 points, 6 assists and 3.2 rebounds.The season has been an adventure. There were reports of a players-only meeting that became confrontational. Irving struggled with his shooting stroke. And the team's progress under Brown, back for his second stint with the Cavaliers after Byron Scott was fired in April, has been halting. Irving was asked recently if he could identify the toughest part of adapting to Brown's system."I don't even know where to start," he said. "So many things you can pinpoint. But as a team, we're just moving forward with one another, and that's all you can do."It was not the sort of statement that inspires great confidence, but the team has been playing better lately. The Cavaliers arrived in Miami after winning five of their last six games, and Irving collected 37 points in Tuesday's victory over the Knicks."He was making them all over the place," Knicks Coach Mike Woodson said.If James is intrigued by the idea of teaming up with Irving, he has kept it to himself. At the same time, Irving has given no indication that he wants to leave Cleveland — perhaps because he has no choice in the matter, at least for a while.Then there is the money. The Cavaliers can offer Irving a five-year contract extension next summer. If Irving wanted to keep his options open, he could sign a one-year qualifying offer with the Cavaliers for the 2015-16 season, then become an unrestricted free agent. But players of Irving's stature almost never do that. Under the rules of the collective bargaining agreement, the Cavaliers can supply him with the most lucrative contract.When James was weighing his future in 2010, Polk, the comedian, produced a video called "We Are LeBron," set to the tune of "We Are the World," with notable Clevelanders including the city clerk and a well-known furniture pitchman begging James to stay. They even offered to rename streets after him. It did not work.Polk appears to be taking a more measured approach with Irving, who is not going anywhere any time soon. Then again, Polk would not be surprised if Irving eventually left."That's just the way things work," he said. "There's no sense in getting all worked up about it."
For five weeks, just about everything fell apart for the Nets , including their coaching staff's dynamic and most players' health. Now everything appears to be falling into place.They put together a three-game winning streak (which ended Friday at Detroit) and streamlined their coaching staff and their defenses. Lawrence Frank is no longer directing the defense, and for the first time this season, the Nets held their opponents to less than 100 points in three straight games.Most important, Deron Williams, who returned after missing nine games with a sprained ankle, is delivering the commanding point-guard play the team desperately needs."What the Nets need the most is a penetrator who can get in the middle and make plays," Celtics Coach Brad Stevens said Tuesday before his team lost, 104-96, at Barclays Center.Referring to Williams, he added: "They have one of the best in the league just sitting there. And now he's playing. They've got a lot of really good players, and those players are going to be enhanced by Deron Williams being on the court."Williams scored 25 points against Boston's vaunted perimeter defense Tuesday. He then fought to a draw with Chris Paul, widely considered the best point guard in the N.B.A., in Thursday's 102-93 victory over the Los Angeles Clippers.The Nets' roster is full of players smart enough to make the right read and skilled enough to finish open plays, but players like Joe Johnson and Kevin Garnett are most effective when someone creates opportunities for them. With his bounce and burst, Williams does just that, instilling confidence in his teammates.Describing Williams's role, Brook Lopez said, "The energy he gives us out there, the composure, the leadership, and other teams have to respect him."As so often happens on the basketball court, chemistry and confidence on one end lead to effectiveness on the other. With the Nets scoring better recently than they have all season, opponents are inbounding the ball after Nets baskets rather than rebounding and running. This gives the Nets' ambling big men time to retreat on defense.The first half of Thursday's game against the Clippers showed the progress the Nets had made on defense. Early on, Paul and Blake Griffin combined to rip open the middle of the Nets' pick-and-roll coverage. Griffin was able to receive the ball in space, with a head of steam to the rim.But in the second quarter, the Nets started swarming the middle and putting bodies on Griffin before he could hit his launch point.Under Coach Jason Kidd's direction, the Nets forced Paul into the role of a scorer rather than a distributor. Paul scored 20 points, but he had only two assists, by far his lowest single-game total of the season.After the Clippers' hot start, "Jason switched up some of the schemes," Garnett said.Surprisingly, Lopez, not Garnett, was the key to the Nets' second-quarter surge. Lopez let himself be drawn into one-on-one confrontations with Paul, and used his size to force Paul away from the rim and into tough jump shots.When the Clippers went with a smaller second-half lineup to draw Lopez away from the rim, he burned them with post-ups on the other end.Garnett seemed optimistic that the Nets could continue to improve their defense if they could stay healthy and get time on the court together."Our biggest problem was communication," Garnett said. "Jason has us just talking, just communicating. And whatever the schemes are, whatever the coverage is, we're trusting it."Lopez echoed Garnett, noting that the scheme would not always be perfect, but that trust and communication could help them scramble successfully.He added, "It may not always be perfect, it may not always be correct, but the communication helps fix that."Another recent development is the migration of Paul Pierce to the Nets' bench. Facing second units, Pierce deals with lesser defenders and also has the run of the offense, often acting as the de facto point guard. What Williams does for the first unit, Pierce does for the reserves. He keeps the offense churning. It is no surprise that Pierce looks comfortable as the star of the bench because he has played a leading role since he entered the league.Pierce's replacement in the starting lineup, Alan Anderson, has animated the first five with his defensive versatility and open-court ability. He may be only an average athlete for an N.B.A. wing, but that is a big improvement for the Nets, who have created the fewest fast-break opportunities in the league.For all that went well for the Nets in the past week, Friday's 103-99 loss at Detroit reminded them of their precarious situation. With Lopez on the bench after spraining his left ankle against the Clippers, the Pistons' Andre Drummond ravaged the Nets' frontcourt for points and rebounds. Despite all of the Nets' off-season additions, it is possible that no adjustment can mitigate the loss of Lopez or Williams.Kidd's words after Thursday's game might be a theme for the Nets' season: "The trust factor on the defensive end has now led to better ball moving on the offensive end and guys getting shots. But the biggest thing is our health."
Howie Garfinkel has been to thousands of college basketball games, but he has not seen a week filled with the kind of marquee matchups that begin Sunday at Madison Square Garden.In the space of seven days, six of the nation's best men's teams will be in action, a list topped by Syracuse, which is 9-0 and ranked No. 2 by The Associated Press. The lineup also includes Ohio State (9-0, No. 3), Duke (7-2, No. 8), Memphis (7-1, No. 16), Florida (7-2, No. 19) and U.C.L.A. (8-1)."It's an unheard-of collection of powerful teams and first-rate coaches," said Garfinkel, 84, a longtime New York basketball scout. "I've been going to the Garden for more than 70 years and I cannot recall a week of nontournament college basketball that comes anywhere close to what is happening here."Indeed, fans of the college game will be hard-pressed to find a better lineup than the one that leads off Sunday at noon Eastern with St. John's hosting Syracuse, a former Big East rival that plays in the Atlantic Coast Conference."The Garden seems to be making a conscious effort to bring in more college basketball, and I'm thrilled about that because it's my favorite place to play," Syracuse Coach Jim Boeheim said."We're just happy to be playing St. John's, a team we want on our schedule every season despite the fact that we now play in two different conferences. Both teams have lots of loyal fans in New York, which makes for a great rivalry."On Tuesday, the Garden will stage the Jimmy V Classic, a doubleheader that begins with Pittsburgh playing Cincinnati at 7 p.m., followed by Florida against Memphis."For college basketball fans, this is as good a week as you're going to get," said Florida Coach Billy Donovan, who grew up in Rockville Centre, N.Y., rooting for the Knicks. "I'm a local guy, but I can tell you that every college player in the country wants to play at the Garden, including my guys, who are excited and ready to play."On Thursday, Duke will play U.C.L.A. in the Carquest Auto Parts Classic at 7:30 p.m."We always enjoy the atmosphere in the building that is made possible by passionate basketball fans and a strong Duke contingent in the area," said Duke Coach Mike Krzyzewski, whose team lost to Arizona, the current No. 1 team, last month at the Garden in the final of the National Invitation Tournament Season Tip-Off.Next Saturday, four teams will compete in the Gotham Classic, a one-day doubleheader that begins with the featured attraction, Notre Dame versus Ohio State, at 7:30 p.m., followed by Delaware against Bryant.One or more of the teams competing during the week might soon return to the Garden, the East Regional site for this season's N.C.A.A. men's tournament. The Garden has not hosted N.C.A.A. tournament games since 1961.
NORMAN, Okla. — Nicole Kornet scored a career-high 26 points, topping her previous best of 19, as No. 20 Oklahoma cruised past Maryland Eastern Shore 105-46 Sunday.After a week off, Oklahoma built an early 36-10 lead before going on a 14-0 run, with scoring from five different Sooners and eventually led 54-15 at halftime.Kaylon Williams had 14 points for Oklahoma (7-3) and Gioya Carter added 11 points, nine coming from the free throw line. Nicole Griffin controlled the paint with nine points, ten rebounds and four blocked shots, helping the Sooners finish with a 59-37 rebounding advantage.The Oklahoma defense held Maryland-Eastern Shore (3-6) to 21.7 percent shooting, forced 21 turnovers and had seven blocks.Alexis Udoji scored 13 points for UMES. Jessica Long, averaging 16.8 points coming in, was held to just six points on 2-of-8 shooting. Shawnee Sweeney made just one of her 12 shots from behind the arc.
WACO, Texas — Odyssey Sims had 25 points and seven assists, Nina Davis added 16 points and No. 9 Baylor beat Houston Baptist 100-57 on Sunday.The Lady Bears (8-1) extended their home-court winning streak to a national-best 65 games. They were playing for the first time in nine days, since a 133-130, four-overtime loss to No. 5 Kentucky at the Dallas Cowboys' stadium on Dec. 6.Baylor put the game out of reach with a 22-4 run — capped by consecutive layups by Sune Agbuke — that made it 28-9.It was the third game in a row that Baylor scored at least 100 points, and the fifth time this season — setting a school record already for the most 100-point games in NCAA competition. The Lady Bears had four 100-point games in 2009-10, the freshman season for Brittney Griner. They had 11 such games in AIWA competition in 1977-78.Agbuke finished with 12 points and 14 rebounds. Davis shot 7 for 7, Khadijiah Cave had 12 points.Houston Baptist (3-5) had turnovers on six of its first 10 possessions, and finished with 20.Tayler Jefferson had 13 points for the Huskies, who played for the first time in 12 days. Shanice Steenholdt had 12 points and 11 rebounds.Baylor led 51-25 at halftime after a half-ending 14-4 run and two scores in the final 11 seconds. Davis had a layup with 11 seconds left, then Sims had a steal and drove for a layup with 1.7 seconds left.Jefferson hit a 3-pointer to start the second half for Houston, but Baylor then scored 10 straight points.
LEXINGTON, Ky. — Janee Thompson and Samarie Walker each scored 12 points to lead fifth-ranked Kentucky to a 73-56 victory over East Tennessee State on Sunday.The Wildcats tied a school record with their 11th consecutive victory to open the season.East Tennessee State (2-6) forced four lead changes and three ties in the first eight minutes, but the Wildcats used a 14-2 run to go up 31-18 with 8:15 remaining in the first half.Kentucky led 49-29 at the half, but the Buccaneers pulled within 54-44 with 13:28 left. But East Tennessee State couldn't get within single digits.Maria Bond led East Tennessee State with 14 points, and Chandler Christopher had 11.
ATHENS, Ga. — Merritt Hempe scored a career-high 18 points, 14 in the first half, as No. 16 Georgia whooped Kennesaw State 91-32 on Sunday.Georgia only made two field goals in the first 4:30 of the second half, but then went on a 25-0 run and took a commanding 74-20 lead. Tiaria Griffin made three 3-pointers during the stretch that saw six different players score.Shacobla Barbee and Griffin had 13 apiece for Georgia (10-0) while Khaalidah Miller and Halle Washington added 12 each.Georgia led 45-11 at halftime after holding Kennesaw State to 18.2 percent shooting (4 of 22) and forcing 16 turnovers.Kennesaw State (1-8) did not score until the 13:58 mark of the first half and trailed 7-2. Kristina Wells and Bria Young led the Owls with 12 points each.The win gave Georgia its eighth-best start in the program's history and its 20th all-time 10-game winning streak.
NEW YORK — Bradley Beal's driving layup with 6 seconds remaining lifted the Wizards to a 102-101 win over the New York Knicks on Monday night that snapped Washington's 10-game losing streak at Madison Square Garden.The Knicks didn't use one of their three remaining timeouts after Beal's basket. Carmelo Anthony took the inbounds pass, dribbled the up court and attempted a 3-pointer that bounced off the rim as time expired.Beal led the Wizards with 21 points, including their final seven as Washington erased a six-point fourth-quarter deficit.Martell Webster added 30 points and John Wall 20 points for the Wizards.Anthony finished with 32 for the Knicks.The Knicks led 100-97 after Andrea Bargnani hit two free throws with 1:07 left. But, Beal hit a 3-pointer to tie the game with 45 seconds to go.Beno Udrih put the Knicks back in front by making one of two free throws with 24 seconds left.Then after a Wizards' timeout, Beal ran down the clock before driving past Udrih and hitting the winning shot.The Wizards led 53-42 at halftime and increased their lead to 59-44 on Trevor Ariza's short jumper with 9:12 left in the third quarter.The Knicks then went on a 12-0 run, highlighted by consecutive 3-pointers by J.R. Smith and capped by an Anthony's layup.The Knicks went ahead 66-64 on Anthony's jumper with 3:06 left in the third quarter and increased it to 77-71 on another jumper by Anthony jumper with 33 seconds left before settling for a 77-75 lead after three quarters.Smith finished with 18 points, Bargnani had 13 and Udrih 12.NOTES: The last Washington win at MSG was on Dec. 6, 2006. Knicks are 12-3 in their last 15 games against the Wizards. ... The two head coaches, Randy Wittman and Mike Woodson, were teammates at Indiana University in 1979-80. ... Pablo Prigioni was taken out of the game with 9:49 left in the third quarter with a hairline fracture of his right toe. He was replaced by Udrih.
TALLAHASSEE, Fla. — Ivey Slaughter scored a career-high 19 points and pulled down 11 rebounds to lead No. 24 Florida State women past North Florida 61-42 Monday night.FSU (9-1) held North Florida without a field goal for more than five minutes to start the game and jumped out to an 11-0 lead.The Seminoles forced 14 North Florida turnovers in the first half while limiting the Ospreys to 27.3 percent shooting from the field and took a 28-17 lead into the break.Morgan Jones converted a three-point play and hit a 3-point shot during a 13-1 run early in the second half as FSU extended its lead to 21 with 13:05 to play. North Florida (2-7) wouldn't get closer than 16 the rest of the way.Natasha Howard scored 18 points on 7-of-8 shooting from the field.Bailey Florin and Amber Robinson scored 10 points apiece to pace the Ospreys.
DURHAM, N.C. — Freshman Jabari Parker scored 21 points to help No. 8 Duke beat Gardner-Webb 85-66 on Monday night.Andre Dawkins added a season-high 18 points for the Blue Devils (8-2), who were playing their first game in nearly two weeks. Duke's offense came out strong and shot 50 percent with nine 3-pointers, maintaining a double-digit lead for most of the game even though they didn't do a lot to slow the Runnin' Bulldogs' own hot shooting.Duke led by 14 points at halftime and by 23 in the second half on the way to earning its 108th straight home nonconference victory.Jerome Hill scored a career-high 22 points to go with nine rebounds to lead Gardner-Webb (6-6), which shot nearly 63 percent in the opening half before cooling off and finishing at 54 percent for the game.Duke hadn't played since beating Michigan 79-69 here on Dec. 3 in the Big Ten/ACC Challenge, ending a stretch of four games in 10 days that included a loss to top-ranked Arizona in the NIT Season Tip-Off championship and a one-point home win over Vermont just before Thanksgiving.The Blue Devils didn't have a lot of drama Monday night, with the Runnin' Bulldogs never getting closer than 12 points early in the second half. Still, they never put together a knockout run, either, coasting with a comfortable lead for the final 15 minutes.Parker finished 7 of 12 from the field with six rebounds in 26 minutes.Dawkins, a fifth-year senior guard who sat out last season while he dealt with his sister's death during his freshman year, finished 6 of 10 from the field, including 4-for-8 shooting from 3-point range.Quinn Cook added 16 points and nine assists for Duke, while Rodney Hood scored 15 points.The Blue Devils' legs looked fresh Monday, at least when it came to their first-half shooting.With Dawkins knocking down his first four shots, Duke started the game 17 of 23 from the field (74 percent) to build a double-digit lead. That included a 7-0 burst in a span of a minute, with Tyler Thornton knocking down a 3 off an inbounds pass and Parker following with a jumper in the lane and a dunk on an alley-oop feed from Cook to make it 46-25 with 5½ minutes left in the first half.The only problem for Duke? Gardner-Webb didn't miss much, either.The Runnin' Bulldogs scored the last eight points before halftime, with Hill knocking down a shot over Amile Jefferson then scoring in the lane for a three-point play that cut Duke's lead to 53-39.The Runnin' Bulldogs got as close as 56-44 on Hill's layup with 17:07 left, but Hood answered with a three-point play to turn away what amounted to Gardner-Webb's closest push.
MYRTLE BEACH, S.C. — Allisha Gray and Diamond DeShields scored 20 apiece, as No. 14 North Carolina hit the century mark for the second straight game, in a 124-41 victory over New Orleans on Monday night.Coming off a 51-point win against Charleston Southern on Saturday, North Carolina (9-2) set a school record by scoring 124 points. The previous record was 121, set in 1985. It was North Carolina's first back-to-back 100-point games since the 2009-10 season.The Tar Heels scored their 17th point before Dannisha Jackson got New Orleans on the board at the 14:17 mark. North Carolina led 30-2 at the 11:27 mark and pushed it to 72-18 at halftime.New Orleans (0-9) also gave up 100-plus points earlier this season in a 111-38 loss to Mississippi State on Nov. 17.Octavia Wilson led New Orleans with 21 points, as the Privateers made just 27.8 percent of its shots.
Damian Lillard's spinning fadeaway with one-tenth of a second left in overtime gave the visiting Portland Trail Blazers a 111-109 victory over the Detroit Pistons on Sunday night.Lillard was guarded well by Rodney Stuckey as he tried to drive to the basket, but he was able to hit a tough fadeaway from about 8 feet for the win. Detroit couldn't get off a shot before the buzzer.LaMarcus Aldridge scored 27 points for Portland, which rallied from a 13-point deficit in the fourth quarter. Lillard finished with 23 points.Josh Smith scored 31 points, his most since signing with the Pistons as a free agent in the off-season.SUNS 106, WARRIORS 102 Eric Bledsoe scored 7 of his 24 points in the fourth quarter, and Phoenix won its fifth straight game, holding off Stephen Curry and visiting Golden State.Bledsoe added eight rebounds and eight assists, Goran Dragic scored 21 points and Channing Frye added 20 for the Suns.Curry scored 30 points, including 20 in the second half for the Warriors.NUGGETS 102, PELICANS 93 J. J. Hickson had 19 points and 11 rebounds, and host Denver overcame a slow start to beat New Orleans.Wilson Chandler added 19 to help the Nuggets bounce back from a rare home loss Friday. They're now 7-3 at Pepsi Center this season after going a franchise-best 38-3 in 2012-13.Ryan Anderson scored 26 and Austin Rivers chipped in a season-high 17 for the Pelicans.THUNDER 101, MAGIC 98 Kevin Durant had 28 points, 9 rebounds and 5 assists, and Oklahoma City won its 12th straight home game to open the season, holding off Orlando.Russell Westbrook added 20 points, 12 rebounds and 6 assists for the Thunder, who have won six straight over all and 14 of their past 15.KINGS 106, ROCKETS 91 Rudy Gay scored 26 points in his first home game since coming over in a trade from Toronto, leading host Sacramento past Houston.Gay added five rebounds and four assists. He shot 10 for 20 in a dazzling home debut for the Kings, who had lost eight of their past 10 games.T'WOLVES 101, GRIZZLIES 93 Kevin Love had 30 points and 9 rebounds, Minnesota hit a season-high 12 3-pointers and the visiting Timberwolves earned a victory over Memphis.Love was 11 of 21 from the field, including 4 of 8 from outside the arc.
Darrun Hilliard scored 21 points and Josh Hart added 13, lifting the No. 10 Villanova Wildcats past La Salle, 73-52, on Sunday.The Wildcats are 10-0 for the first time since the 2005-6 season, and are three victories shy of matching the program's best start, 13-0 in 1937-38."It's good to be 10-0, I guess," Hilliard said. "But we've got a whole lot of work to do."The Wildcats have now thumped their Philadelphia rivals Penn, St. Joseph's and La Salle by at least 20 points in each game.Villanova is in the Top 10 not because of victories against the intracity lightweights, but because of wins over the top-25 teams Kansas and Iowa. But the Wildcats face a major obstacle in a Dec. 28 game at No. 2 Syracuse.Jerrell Wright scored 18 of his 20 points in the first half for La Salle (5-5).MISSOURI 66, WESTERN MICHIGAN 60 Jabari Brown scored 15 points, and Jordan Clarkson and Earnest Ross each added 12 to help No. 24 Missouri defeat visiting Western Michigan.Missouri (10-0) looked rusty at times after an eight-day break for final exams and clung to a 47-45 lead with 10 minutes 46 seconds remaining. The Tigers pulled away with a 9-0 run.Missouri stretched its N.C.A.A.-best home-court winning streak to 25 games and has won 80 straight games against nonconference opponents at Mizzou Arena dating to the 2005-6 opener.STONY BROOK 67, NEW HAMPSHIRE 48 Carson Puriefoy scored a game-high 15 points, and Dave Coley added 14 to lead Stony Brook over host New Hampshire in their American East Conference opener.The Seawolves (7-4) dominated inside, with a 41-23 rebounding advantage and 18 second-chance points.New Hampshire (2-7) trailed by just 6 points at halftime.QUINNIPIAC 80, VERMONT 67 Ike Azotam scored 18 points and pulled down 13 rebounds, and visiting Quinnipiac beat Vermont.Vermont (3-7) trailed, 23-19, but fell behind by 41-26 at halftime.HOFSTRA 72, CENTRAL CONN. 67 Zeke Upshaw scored 22 points and Stephen Nwaukoni added 12 with 12 rebounds as host Hofstra (3-6) edged Central Connecticut State (3-7).HOWARD 64, DELAWARE STATE 62 James Miller made a layup with 16 seconds left in overtime to give Howard a 64-62 overtime win over Delaware State in the Big Apple Classic at Barclays Center.Prince Okoroh led Howard (3-11), scoring 21 points and grabbing 16 rebounds. Delaware State (2-8) missed potential game-winning shots near the end of regulation and overtime.KENTUCKY 73, E. TENNESSEE ST. 56 Janee Thompson and Samarie Walker each scored 12 points to lead fifth-ranked Kentucky over visiting East Tennessee State.The Wildcats tied a team record with their 11th consecutive victory to open the season.BAYLOR 100, HOUSTON BAPTIST 57 Odyssey Sims had 25 points and 9 assists, and Nina Davis added 16 points to help No. 9 Baylor rout visiting Houston Baptist.The Lady Bears (8-1) extended their home-court winning streak to a national-best 65 games.Tayler Jefferson had 13 points for the Huskies (3-5).PENN STATE 66, TEXAS A&M 58 Maggie Lucas scored 26 points in host Penn State's victory over No. 24 Texas A&M.
For 15 minutes of the second half against Syracuse on Sunday, St. John's looked as if it might upset the No. 2 Orange at Madison Square Garden, scramble the national rankings and light up the New York college basketball scene once again.The last five minutes cooled those fantasies, a swift relapse to what has lately been the norm. Syracuse beat St. John's, 68-63, its ninth straight win in meetings between the two teams. The Orange (10-0) hit shots down the stretch; St. John's (6-3) did not. They took care of the ball; St. John's flubbed its late opportunities.But the potential and promise of this St. John's team were unmistakable, in this city where the Knicks and the Nets have thus far only disappointed. In a quiet moment outside his team's locker room Sunday, Coach Steve Lavin managed to look beyond his disappointment with the close loss."The signs of progress are there," Lavin said. "I've coached long enough to see where this team stacks up with other teams I've had, and the upside."Lavin has been building this team practically since the minute he arrived in Queens in 2010, leading his first veteran-laden roster to the N.C.A.A. tournament and then needing to rebuild nearly from scratch. Since then, he is 25-19 (he missed a majority of the 2011-12 season after having cancer surgery) and well aware that the expectations for this group, constructed off three sterling recruiting classes, are higher than before.Lavin preaches to his players that they should exist in the present, but he acknowledged that the ability the players had shown — in flashes and short-lived stretches — was enticing."That's why I wanted to win today, and why when we came back, I wasn't surprised," Lavin said. "We have a team that can compete with the elite programs in the country."The struggle, Lavin said, is putting all that playmaking ability together in a continuous stream. The second half of Sunday's game certainly had the look of that. After a lethargic first 20 minutes, in which the Red Storm shot 34.5 percent and fell behind by 12, they re-emerged with enthusiasm and took it right at the Orange.D'Angelo Harrison scored the first 7 points, hitting the team's first 3-pointer in 10 attempts, and the Red Storm's on-ball pressure and rim protection intensified. St. John's went on a 21-9 run to pull even at 53-53 with 9 minutes 16 seconds remaining."We really struggled offensively for a long time," Syracuse Coach Jim Boeheim said. "We couldn't get anything, and eventually, they're going to get something. They were getting to the basket."At halftime, Lavin said he had challenged his team's aggressiveness."Our guys looked tentative," Lavin said. "They looked on their heels, and that's not a good place to be."Perhaps they had put too much pressure on themselves. Last week, Harrison, a junior guard, declared the matchup the "biggest game of our careers."It was the first game between the longtime rivals since Syracuse left the Big East Conference and joined the Atlantic Coast Conference in July. St. John's intensified its marketing efforts, emphasizing that it was "New York's team," a phrase Syracuse had used in the past to stake its own claim.On the court, though, it largely boiled down to the play of two freshman point guards: Syracuse's Tyler Ennis and Rysheed Jordan of St. John's, who took turns establishing themselves. Ennis scored 15 points in the first half, setting the tempo and taking it to the Red Storm's interior defense with abandon.But Jordan scored 9 of his 13 points in the second, and Boeheim said he had taken the ball inside Syracuse's zone better than he had against any other team they had faced this season."He gets to the basket really well," Boeheim said.St. John's had a 60-58 lead with 5:48 left, but it missed several opportunities around the basket. Syracuse retook the lead on a layup by Ennis with four minutes to go. The Red Storm could not recover."I thought we played as poorly as we have all year in the first half and as well as we have all year in the second half," Lavin said. "And the last four minutes is where Syracuse separated."A turnover by Orlando Sanchez and missed free throws by JaKarr Sampson continued to stymie the comeback effort by St. John's. The Syracuse senior forward C. J. Fair hit consecutive jump shots to finish with 21 points.St. John's trudged off murmuring that moral victories did not exist.What St. John's is most likely to take from the loss, however, is that it is not far away from winning."We didn't go quietly into the night," Lavin said. "We brought the fight. That's what I'm most proud of."
STILLWATER, Okla. — Seventh-ranked Oklahoma State required patience Tuesday night — on both ends of the floor.The Big 12 Conference's second-leading offense, averaging 88.4 points per game, faced off with a Delaware State squad that employed the deliberate, shot-clock-eating offense of veteran head coach Greg Jackson. The time-consuming tactics worked for a half, but the athletic Cowboys bolted out of the gate in the second half, forcing their guests to play at a much quicker pace.A 30-16 halftime advantage ballooned to 48-18 four minutes into the second half thanks mainly to full-court defensive pressure. After playing at Jackson's pace for 20 minutes, OSU head coach Travis Ford decided it was time to play at his pace the rest of the way.The 75 points in a 75-43 victory were 13 points below his squad's season average, but Ford knew what to expect from Tuesday's opponent."We played hard in the first half, but we didn't play with the energy or push the ball the way we wanted," said Ford, whose team returns to the court against Colorado in the MGM Grand Showcase in Las Vegas on Saturday. "We didn't make anything happen; we played within the slow-down style of basketball. I told the guys at halftime that we were better than how we were playing.""(Delaware State) wanted to slow it down a lot, and we actually got to put some pressure on them and we pushed the ball," said Cowboys senior guard Markel Brown. "I think that is when we are at our best, when we're pushing the ball, moving down the court and taking fluid shots that we like to take."The Hornets (2-9) ate much of the shot clock during a first half that saw them shoot 24 percent (6 of 25) and go scoreless for an eight-minute stretch. Yet, a long-range 3-point basket by Casey Walker in the final minute kept Delaware State within 12 points. Since giving up 32 first-half points to Memphis on Dec. 1, the Cowboys have held their last three opponents under 20 points in the opening 20 minutes: South Carolina (15), Louisiana Tech (18), and Delaware State on Tuesday."Coming into this game, we knew that (Delaware State) was going to be running a lot of false motion and run the clock down," Brown said. "We just sat down and talked about it all week in practice, about playing disciplined defense and not letting them get the shots that they want, even lulling us to sleep or anything."The game was played at OSU's pace in the second half."I thought we did an excellent job in the first half," said Jackson, in his 14th season at Delaware State. "We played with discipline and we played hard. Then talent took over; the difference in that ball game is simple talent. We controlled the tempo in the first half and held (OSU) to 30 points, but they played at their pace the rest of the way. You can only play with emotion for so long."Kendall Gray led the Hornets with 12 points and 11 rebounds. The Cowboys out-rebounded Delaware State 39-34.Marcus Smart, the Big 12's leading scorer, did not score in the first half. However, the athletic sophomore guard sparked the early second-half run, recording two of his three steals — OSU had 10 overall - and following them up with a 3-pointer and dunk. Brown, who tied for high-point honors with Le'Bryan Nash with 14 points, drained a long-range 3-pointer to put OSU up 54-30 and end any hopes of a Hornets comeback. The lead was 34 points with 13:52 remaining.Despite another lopsided win, Oklahoma State continued to struggle from 3-point range. The Cowboys entered Tuesday 10 of 47 (21 percent) over their last three starts. They were was 6 of 23 Tuesday, with Phil Forte hitting 1 of 10."I don't think anything about (his struggles)," Ford said. "I want him to shoot it. You don't worry about makes or misses with a guy of his shooting ability. We know if they go in, it really helps your team, but we've got other things to worry about."
EAST LANSING, Mich. — Adreian Payne scored 15 of his 19 points in the first half and fifth-ranked Michigan State rolled to a 78-48 victory over North Florida on Tuesday night.Branden Dawson added 12 points and Denzel Valentine scored 11 for the Spartans, who were ranked No. 1 in the country before a loss to North Carolina on Dec. 4. Michigan State (9-1) narrowly avoided an upset against Oakland last weekend before routing an overmatched North Florida team.Jalen Nesbitt scored 11 points for the Ospreys (5-7), who have also lost big to Ohio State and Indiana this season.Michigan State led 50-19 at halftime after shooting 71 percent and holding North Florida (5-7) to 7 of 32 from the field.Guard Gary Harris, Michigan State's leading scorer, did not play because of an ankle injury.This was Michigan State's first home game since the disheartening loss to North Carolina. It was played in front of a subdued crowd, although there was an understandable roar with 7:46 left in the first half when some members of the school's Big Ten champion football team were introduced.By then, the basketball Spartans had this game under control. Michigan State beat Oakland by only four points, but Tuesday's game was one-sided from the start.Off the opening tip, Keith Appling tossed an alley-oop pass to Dawson for an immediate 2-0 lead. Appling did not attempt a shot from the field in the first half, but the Michigan State point guard didn't need to with Payne and Dawson both looking sharp.The Spartans began the game on a 21-4 run and led 40-14 after a jumper by the 6-foot-10 Payne. Dawson added another alley-oop dunk early in the second half to make it 54-21.North Florida lost 99-64 to Ohio State and 89-68 to Indiana. This final score was similar to those two. The Ospreys ended up shooting 4 of 25 from 3-point range after going 1 of 14 in the first half.Russell Byrd added 10 points for Michigan State, which didn't have a single player reach 30 minutes. The Spartans led by as many as 37.Spartans coach Tom Izzo took over the microphone with 2:01 to play so he could announce that official Ed Hightower was working his final game at Michigan State. The crowd responded with a standing ovation.
INDIANAPOLIS — Detroit threw a surprise road block in Indiana's path to the Eastern Conference's top seed.Now the Pacers face another daunting task — winning at Miami to avoid their first losing streak of the season.Josh Smith scored 30 points, Brandon Jennings added 18 and Greg Monroe finished with 13 points and 12 rebounds to help the Pistons stun Indiana 101-96 Monday night and hand the Pacers their first home defeat this season."We're going to have a target on our back all year," Pacers guard George Hill said. "We've had some success so far, so we're taking everyone's best shot and today we didn't come to play."It was evident right from the start that this was not the same Indiana team that set a franchise record by starting 9-0 overall and another by opening the season 11-0 at home.Some wondered before the game whether the Pacers (20-4) might get caught looking past the Pistons (12-14), who have won two of their last six, and ahead to Wednesday night's marquee rematch with Miami. Indiana defeated the two-time defending champs 99-94 in Indy last week and heads to South Beach for the first time since losing Game 7 of the conference finals in June.Coach Frank Vogel downplayed the notion Indiana was distracted, saying before and after the game that his team was not "looking ahead at all."On the court, though, the Pacers did not play their game.The Pistons were tougher inside, tougher on defense and tougher at fending off challenges. And the Eastern Conference's top team looked like anything but as Detroit played almost flawlessly and beat Indiana at its own game by dominating the middle."It's impressive the way we came in and competed with the way the Pacers have been playing," Pistons coach Maurice Cheeks said. "We have a good basketball team."The Pistons held a 55-40 rebounding advantage and a lopsided 20-9 edge on offensive rebounds, something Paul George contended threw the Pacers off.Detroit also outscored Indiana 44-38 in the paint and 22-14 on second-chance points while shooting 43.2 percent from the field, the same as Indiana.For a Pacers team that prides itself on defense and rebounding, it wasn't even close to their best as they tuned up for Miami.Indiana never tied the score in the second half and never took the lead on its home floor, falling to the second-best record in the league, percentage points behind Portland (21-4).The Pistons knew that to end their six-game losing streak in this series and their nine-game losing streak at Bankers Life Fieldhouse they had to execute the game plan flawlessly. They did.Meanwhile, Miami faced its own unexpected challenge Monday night when struggling Utah played better than advertised in the first half. Unlike the Pacers, though, Miami seized control over the final two quarters and pulled away for a 117-94 win.Whatever the explanation, Indiana wasn't the same.Paul George was 4 of 14 from the field, finishing with 17 points, nine rebounds and four turnovers. Roy Hibbert had six points and four rebounds. Even the energetic Lance Stephenson couldn't get his flustered teammates righted. Stephenson scored a career best 23 points and Luis Scola added a season high 18.When asked if he was looking forward to the rematch, George said: "I am. The good thing about the NBA is the quick turnarounds."And there is plenty to work on after Monday's stunner.Detroit used a 10-3 first quarter run to take a 23-14 lead and never trailed thereafter.Even in the second half, when the Pacers typically dominate, the Pistons refused fold.Detroit scored the last eight points of the first half to take a 57-49 lead. Then Smith scored Detroit's first eight points in the second half, and the surging Pistons took advantage of Indiana's growing frustration by extending the lead to 72-61 on Brandon Jennings' layup with 5:20 left in the third quarter. Jennings finished with 18 points and eight assists.Indiana rallied again, getting within 79-73 after three, but the Pistons answered with a 7-2 spurt that made it 89-79 with 7:01 to go. Scola's layup with 4:55 remaining ended an 8-0 run that got the Pacers as close as 89-87, but the Pistons ran off five straight points.Stephenson gave it one final push, hitting a 3 with 1:17 to go to cut Detroit's lead to 96-94, but the Pistons closed it out at the free-throw line."We had a lot of confidence coming in here tonight. We played Portland (Sunday) night in a game we should have won," Jennings said. "Tonight we knew were playing the best team in the Eastern Conference and we were able to give them their first home loss."NOTES: Indiana is the NBA's only team that has not been in a game decided by fewer than five points. ... Guard Chauncey Billups was inactive for the Pistons. ... Vogel said swingman Danny Granger is on track to return to the lineup Friday night against Houston. He has not played this season because of a strained left calf. ... Indiana fell to 10-3 when trailing at halftime.
LOS ANGELES — The Clippers told themselves they couldn't make any excuses. Didn't matter how physically tired or mentally drained they were from a seven-game trip.They had to find a way to win, just like San Antonio — a team Doc Rivers calls "the gold standard"— typically does.And the Clippers did, notching their largest margin of victory ever against the Spurs.Blake Griffin scored 27 points, hitting 11 of 15 free throws, in the 115-92 win Monday night, 48 hours after returning to Los Angeles."The best part about this game was we knew what we had to do," Griffin said. "We executed our game plan. Even when they made runs nobody got down. That positive attitude is big."Chris Paul added 23 points, eight rebounds and seven assists, and Jamal Crawford had 17 points in his second straight start for the Clippers, who repelled several threats in the third quarter to maintain their lead."Another good win for us coming off the road trip," said Paul, who won't be dwelling on it. "We got to get past it."Tim Duncan had 17 points and 11 rebounds for the Spurs, whose four-game winning streak ended. Tony Parker limped off the court with a right shin contusion with 5:09 left in the third. He finished with eight points and six assists in 26 minutes, and didn't speak with reporters afterward.Spurs coach Gregg Popovich said Parker was in pain and having trouble walking on it, so he had to be taken out of the game."He has the ball in his hands for a long time, especially when it counts the most," Manu Ginobili said about Parker. "So we couldn't adjust to it and it was hard, especially against a team that is aggressive."DeAndre Jordan added 11 rebounds and Griffin had nine to help the Clippers control the boards, 43-36. Jared Dudley had 14 points, including four 3-pointers.Los Angeles went 4-3 on its road trip, closing it out Saturday with a 113-97 victory over the Washington Wizards. The Clippers didn't practice Sunday before facing off against the Spurs, whose 19-5 record is third-best in the NBA."It tells you they're in it mentally," Rivers said of his team. "Very proud of them. I think they wanted to win very bad."San Antonio made one last run to open the fourth, getting consecutive 3-pointers from Patty Mills and Danny Green that drew the Spurs to 86-82.The Clippers dominated the rest of the way, stretching their lead to 106-86 during a 20-4 run that ended with three 3-pointers in a row: one by Willie Green and two by Dudley.Crawford put one last dagger in the Spurs as he dribbled down the final seconds before casually popping a deep 3 for the final basket."We turned the ball over way too much (22 times) and went through bad stretches. We just can't put games together like that and expect to win," Duncan said. "But it's early in the season and we're going to learn every one of these losses and continue to grow as a team. Hopefully at the end of the year, we're a better ballclub because of it."The Clippers stretched their lead to 59-51 early in the third before the Spurs cut it to 59-58 after scoring eight straight points.Crawford, Griffin and Paul took over the rest of the third, combining to score the Clippers' last 20 points and stretch their lead to 78-70 going into the fourth. Crawford launched the 20-12 run by hitting back-to-back 3-pointers.The Spurs got within three points on a layup by Ginobili before Griffin scored six of the Clippers' next eight points to extend their lead."It's my job to keep feeding him," Paul said of Griffin. "I love it when he demands the ball. We're going to keep playing through him every night."The Clippers trailed 28-21 after the opening quarter before unleashing a 19-0 run early in the second. Green bookended the spurt with 3-pointers, and in between five different Clippers scored to give them a 40-31 lead. Griffin scored their final eight points to send them into halftime leading 55-49.NOTES: Crawford started for the second straight game and just the second time in 102 games with the team. ... Clippers F Stephen Jackson faced his old team for the first time since the Spurs released him last April. He was signed by the Clippers last week and had six points. ... Popovich and some of the players, including Parker, didn't arrive until about an hour before game time. "The sunset was great over Santa Monica, so we stayed a little longer," Popovich cracked.
Josh Smith had 30 points, Greg Monroe finished with 13 points and 12 rebounds, and visiting Detroit handed Indiana its first home loss, 101-96, on Monday night.The Pistons won for the second time in six games, ending a six-game skid in the series and a nine-game losing streak on the Pacers' home court.Lance Stephenson had a season high 23 points, and Luis Scola scored 13 of his season-best 18 in the fourth quarter for Indiana (20-4), which was 11-0 at home coming into the game. Oklahoma City is the only N.B.A. team unbeaten at home.Detroit held a 55-40 rebounding edge and outscored the Pacers in the lane.Indiana tied the score four times and got as close as 96-94 late in the fourth.MAGIC 83, BULLS 82 Arron Afflalo scored 23 points and visiting Orlando got double-doubles from Glen Davis and Nikola Vucevic in a victory over slumping Chicago.Davis had 14 points and 11 rebounds despite playing with a sore left shoulder, powering the Magic to a 54-45 edge on the glass in just their second win in the past 10 games. Vucevic finished with 10 points and 11 boards.The Bulls had a chance to win despite shooting 34.6 percent from the field during another terrible offensive performance. Trailing, 81-79, with 6.8 seconds left, Joakim Noah made a terrific bounce pass to a streaking Luol Deng, but he missed the easy layup.CELTICS 101, T'WOLVES 97 Jared Sullinger had 24 points and 11 rebounds, hitting a tiebreaking 3-pointer with 2 minutes 22 seconds left, and host Boston beat Minnesota.Avery Bradley scored 19 points, and the first-round draft pick Kelly Olynyk had 9 points in 14 minutes in his second game back after missing 10 with a sprained right ankle. The Celtics won for the fifth time in seven games to hold onto first place in the Atlantic Division despite a 12-14 record that would be 12th best in the Western Conference.HEAT 117, JAZZ 94 LeBron James finished with 30 points, 9 rebounds and 9 assists despite sitting some of the second half after twisting his left ankle, Dwyane Wade added 27 points and host Miami beat Utah.It was the Heat's 17th straight victory over a Western Conference opponent, the second-longest regular-season streak by an Eastern Conference team in N.B.A. history. Boston won 20 straight over the West during a nine-month stretch in 1973.HAWKS 114, LAKERS 100 Kyle Korver sank three 3-pointers in Atlanta's dominant third quarter, Al Horford scored 19 points and the host Hawks beat cold-shooting Kobe Bryant and Los Angeles.Paul Millsap had 18 points and Jeff Teague had 17 with 10 assists for the Hawks. Horford grabbed 11 rebounds.Bryant made only 4 of 14 shots for 8 points.KEEPING BUCKS IN MILWAUKEE The Milwaukee Bucks' owner, Herb Kohl, is considering adding to the team's ownership group in hopes of building a new arena that he said called "imperative" for the team's future in the city.Kohl said that he had hired a firm to help in the search for new partners and that, if any are added, they will be committed to keeping the team in Milwaukee.That means a new arena to replace the 25-year-old BMO Harris Bradley Center.AROUND THE LEAGUE The Memphis Grizzlies signed forward James Johnson of the N.B.A. Development League's Rio Grande Valley Vipers. ... The Bulls waived the veteran guard Mike James. He appeared in seven games, averaging 0.3 points and 5.4 minutes.
There were 28 seconds remaining in the third quarter Monday night when Joe Johnson found himself with the ball in front of the visitors' bench at Barclays Center. James Anderson of the Philadelphia 76ers had smothered him into the corner, behind the 3-point line, but Johnson rose and flung up a shot anyway.And why not try? Johnson had made seven 3-pointers and scored 26 points in the quarter already. It seemed perfectly reasonable that he should see if he might get more.The ball slipped through the Net, and Johnson, bumped by Anderson, tumbled to the court. By the time he was back on his feet, completing a 4-point play, the arena had erupted into a singsong "Brook-lyn" chant. The Nets players could only clap and laugh. They were at triple-digit points before the fourth quarter, well on their way to a 130-94 win over the 76ers."I got a little separation, got a good look and I let it go," Johnson said with a laugh as he talked about his final 3-pointer. "My teammates kept telling me, 'Man, when you catch it, just shoot it,' and that's what I was doing."Johnson, who finished with 37 points, put up staggering numbers in the third quarter. His 29 points were just short of the record of 33 for one quarter shared by George Gervin and Carmelo Anthony. He shot 10 for 13 over those 12 minutes and an exhilarating 8 for 10 from 3-point range, tying the N.B.A. record for 3-pointers in a quarter set by Michael Redd in February 2002."It feels like you catch the ball with the seams every time, and every time it comes out of your hands, it's going in," Johnson said. "You can't really explain it."Johnson added seven rebounds and five assists in 30 minutes of playing time. His 10 3-pointers over all fell short of the N.B.A. record of 12, shared by Kobe Bryant and Donyell Marshall, but the Nets did set a franchise record with a combined 21 3-pointers."I've been in that situation," Andray Blatche, who had 20 points, said about Johnson's performance, to much laughter. "I know how that feels."The Nets clearly enjoyed their leisurely night against the reeling 76ers. Philadelphia had given up 139 points — a league high this season — in a loss Saturday to the Portland Trail Blazers. And Monday's loss extended their losing streak to seven games and dropped them to a league-worst 1-11 on the road.The 76ers stuck to their fast-paced, up-and-down style, but despite all the running, they went nowhere. They clearly missed their dynamic rookie guard Michael Carter-Williams — who has not played since Dec. 3 because of a skin infection around his right knee — while shooting 37 for 90 from the field.The Nets offense was more sophisticatedly paced, thanks to Deron Williams, who finished with 13 points and a season-high 13 assists. He said he just tried to feed Johnson, who mostly operated within the Nets' offense until his last few circus shots."He went nuts," Williams said about Johnson.It hardly seemed to matter that center Brook Lopez was unavailable for the second consecutive game. Lopez sprained his left ankle last Thursday and then sat out the Nets' defeat Friday night against the Detroit Pistons. He previously missed seven games after spraining the same ankle on Nov. 15.Before the team's shootaround Monday morning, Lopez said he was "pretty sure" he would play against the 76ers. But Coach Jason Kidd said before the game that the coaches and training staff were not satisfied with Lopez's movement during the workout, and it was deemed a risk to have him play.Kevin Garnett shifted into Lopez's spot at center and Mirza Teletovic was inserted into the lineup at power forward. It was Teletovic's first career start, and he finished with 11 points and 5 rebounds.The night, though, belonged to Johnson, whose output was all the more impressive considering he has been fighting illness and is on various medications — "a little bit of this, a little bit of that" — the last few days and sat out practice Sunday."I'm starting to feel a little better," Johnson said. "This win definitely helps it."Andrei Kirilenko, who last played on Nov. 8, revealed he has had three separate setbacks since experiencing back spasms in the preseason. While noting plans were fluid, Kirilenko sounded confident he would practice sometime before Christmas, and be back playing before the team's three-city trip beginning Dec. 28. "I definitely should be ready for the trip," he said Monday night, "and I definitely should be ready for one of the home games before Christmastime." The Nets play the Chicago Bulls on Dec. 25 and the Milwaukee Bucks on Dec 27.
HARTFORD, Conn. — Chasson Randle scored 22 points and Stanford handed No. 10 UConn its first loss of the season, 53-51 on Wednesday night.Josh Huestis added 13 points and Dwight Powell had 10 points and 15 rebounds for Stanford (8-2), which overcame a 10-point halftime deficit in earning their first signature win of the season.DeAndre Daniels had 15 points for UConn (9-1), which was 6 of 10 from behind the arc in the first half and 0 for 12 in the second.Randle's jump shot with 3½ minutes left gave the Cardinal a 52-49 lead. The Huskies pulled within a point when Daniels tipped in a missed 3-point attempt by Niels Giffey.But Shabazz Napier missed three shots in the final 40 seconds with a chance to put the Huskies ahead. He gave up an opportunity on UConn's final possession, passing the ball to Omar Calhoun, whose 3-pointer from the right wing bounced off the rim.Stanford came in 0-4 against UConn and had not beaten a Top 25 team away from Palo Alto since the 2008 NCAA tournament.The Cardinal's previous seven wins came over teams that were a combined 32-41.Napier, who finished with 12 points and eight assists, missed two 3-pointers on a key possession with the Huskies trailing 52-51. Stanford got the ball back with 28 seconds left after a scrum underneath the basket.Napier fouled Huestis on the inbounds play and he hit one of two foul shots.Napier, who beat Florida with a jumper at the buzzer earlier this month, missed another shot with 8 seconds left, forcing UConn to foul again.He got the ball back on a rebound after Huestis missed another free throw attempt. He dribbled down the court, but instead of trying a shot, he passed to Calhoun.UConn led by 10 points at halftime and pushed the lead to 43-30, before consecutive 3-pointers by Anthony Brown and Randle. That started a 14-0 run by the Cardinal, who used a stifling zone defense to hold the Huskies without a field goal for more than 6 minutes. A driving basket and free throw by Randle gave Stanford its first lead of the second half at 44-43.Napier's jumper from the lane put UConn back on top 45-44 with just over 10 minutes left and the teams went back and forth.The Huskies closed the half on a 14-3 run that ended when Napier stole the ball from Randle and found Lasan Kromah ahead of the field for an easy layup just before buzzer.UConn came in shooting better than 46 percent from beyond the arc, with five players having made 10 or more 3-pointers.Connecticut was coming off its annual hiatus for final exams. The Huskies had not played in 12 days, since a 95-68 win over Maine, a game in which UConn hit 14 3-pointers.Stanford ended a 13-day break last Saturday with a 27-point win over UC Davis.UConn plays at Washington, another Pac-12 team, on Saturday. The Huskies had dominated that conference, coming into Wednesday they were 17-2 and had won 13 straight since falling to UCLA in the 1995 NCAA West Regional championship.Stanford's two losses came early in the season at home to BYU and to Pittsburgh in the Legends Classic on Nov. 26 in Brooklyn. The Cardinal return to the Barclays Center to face Michigan on Saturday.
MINNEAPOLIS — Kevin Love made an emphatic case for the title of the NBA's best power forward.Love had 29 points, 15 rebounds and nine assists to outshine LaMarcus Aldridge in the Minnesota Timberwolves' 120-109 victory over the Portland Trail Blazers on Wednesday night.Nikola Pekovic had 30 points and nine rebounds and Kevin Martin scored 22 for the Timberwolves, who led by 32 in the second quarter and held off a charge in the second half from the Blazers.Damian Lillard had 36 points, six assists and six rebounds and Aldridge had 15 points and 14 boards for the weary Trail Blazers, who lost for the first time in six games. It was just their fifth loss of the season in 27 games and came at the end of a four-game road trip.The Timberwolves outscored Portland 72-34 in the paint and shot 49.5 percent from the field.Aldridge, one of the early leaders in the MVP race thanks to Portland's remarkable start, made just 7 of 22 shots.The Blazers have been the most surprising team of this young season, and they stormed into Target Center fresh off two straight heart-pounding victories on last-second shots by Lillard that gave them the best record in the NBA. But playing their fourth road game in five nights, their legs were heavy, their shots where shaky and the Wolves pounced.The pregame conversation featured a debate on the best power forward in the league, with each coach predictably stumping for their guy.Love owned the first 24 minutes. He had a double-double before the game was 13 minutes old and went into halftime with 17 points, 11 boards and eight assists. The Wolves rode a staggering 42-12 run through the second quarter to take a 62-30 lead five minutes before the break.But these are the Blazers, who shoot 3s without conscience and play with a swagger generated by their cold-blooded point guard. Lillard scored 17 points in the third, and his step-back 3 brought Portland to 86-75 with 2:04 to play in the quarter.Martin, who missed Monday night's game in Boston with a sore left knee, responded with a 3 and J.J. Barea hit two big 3s in the closing seconds of the quarter to push the lead back to 22.Lillard hit two 3s and Nicolas Batum, who scored 20 points, scored on a putback and a 3-pointer to cut the deficit to five with 46 seconds to play, but the Wolves closed it out at the free-throw line.NOTES: The Wolves announced that F Chase Budinger has been cleared for full-contact practice. Budinger has yet to play this year after having surgery to remove part of the meniscus in his left knee. ... It was the third career 30-point game for Pekovic. ... Lillard went 7 for 14 from 3, while the rest of the team went 7 for 26.
Southern Illinois coach Barry Hinson said he regretted singling out one of his players in a postgame diatribe that went viral.And that's about it.Hinson said at a news conference in Carbondale, Ill., on Wednesday that he apologized to starting point guard Marcus Fillyaw for calling him "absolutely awful" in a 73-65 loss at Murray State on Tuesday night.Hinson, however, said he wouldn't take back calling his players "uncoachable," ''a bunch of mama's boys" and comparing the disciplining of his young team to housebreaking a puppy."If that ruffles your feathers, or ruffles somebody else's feathers, then you know what, you're going to have to deal with it," Hinson said. "And here's the other thing, I'm going to have to deal with it."Fillyaw said he wasn't surprised with the way Hinson voiced his displeasure."Everything he said was true," Fillyaw said. "Right now our team is playing soft. That's a big part of our identity right now ... It wasn't so much him calling me out personally. I was just as upset with my performance. His statement about me was accurate."Fillyaw paused and added, "It was embarrassing that the whole world knows now."Athletic director Mario Moccia said he took no disciplinary action against Hinson."He's very passionate. That's why we hired him," Moccia said. "I just reinforced that we never want to specifically criticize a player. There's a way to answer the media's question about a specific player's performance without being overly critical where people think you're being too tough on the kid."Long known for being blunt, Hinson initially was calm Tuesday when he met with reporters minutes after the Salukis (2-8) lost their fourth straight game. He became more wound up the longer he discussed a performance in which his team shot 42 percent, committed 18 turnovers and was outrebounded 40-29."They won't let me coach them," Hinson said. "Any time I coach somebody they put their head down. We're soft. We've been enabled for whatever reason. I got a bunch of mama's boys right now. And we just won't buck up and bow our necks, and we've got to get through that."Hinson added, "I'm tired of coaching a guy and having him roll his eyes, or put his head down or feel sorry for himself. I'm tired of that. This is big time. ... We've got men and women serving our country. They don't get to take days off. We're going to college and getting it paid for."Several media outlets reported that senior center Davante Drinkard later tweeted, "I can't believe the little man had the nerve to call us mama's boys. Smh. I guess this is where Our team learns to point the finger."The tweet was later removed. As of Wednesday afternoon, Drinkard's Twitter account was allowing access only to confirmed followers.Hinson said he wasn't upset about Drinkard's tweet. "That's why we live in this country. It's freedom of speech," Hinson said. "He apologized for calling me 'little man.' I'm 5-foot-8. I am a little man. It's OK."Jay Bilas, a standout at Duke and now an ESPN broadcaster, and Creighton coach Greg McDermott both said Hinson only wants the best for — and from — his players."On one hand, we want our coaches and subjects to be candid with us and tell us the truth, and then when they do we want to criticize them for that, too," Bilas said. "I have no problem with coaches that want to perhaps motivate their teams through the media at times. I didn't think any of it was over the top. We'll see if it works."McDermott has known Hinson since the early 2000s, when he was coach at Northern Iowa and Hinson was at Missouri State."Barry is a great coach and better person," McDermott wrote in a text message. "He wears his passion on his sleeve, which was evident in the interview. If his players listen to him, they will be better because of it."Fillyaw was scoreless with three fouls, two turnovers and one assist in 14 minutes against Murray State."Marcus was absolutely awful," Hinson said. "That's about as PG-rated as I can say it. He was awful. Our guards were awful. Our three starting guards had one assist and seven turnovers. They must think it's a tax credit. It's unbelievable how our starting guards played."Hinson added, "We made three turnovers tonight where we just came down and threw them the ball. I swear I thought one time that one of our players said, 'Merry Christmas.'"Hinson also blasted his big men, who combined to go 2 for 11."My wife can score more than two buckets on 11 shots, because I know my wife will at least shot-fake one time," Hinson said, his voice rising. "But those guys aren't listening. They're uncoachable right now."Hinson suggested that he will make a point of having his players do push-ups or run on a treadmill if they don't do as they're told."To me, when you've got a young team, it's a lot like house training a puppy dog," Hinson said, rolling up a piece of paper and swatting the table in front of him. "You know what, when the dog does something wrong, 'Bad dog.' Well, I'm not going to hit 'em. I'm not going to swat 'em. But, 'Bad dog, get on the treadmill.' That's probably what we need to do."The 52-year-old Hinson is in his second season at Southern Illinois. He went 14-17 after inheriting a program hamstrung by academic problems and personnel issues. He had spent the previous four seasons in an administrative position with the Kansas basketball program. He's 221-165 in 13 seasons as a head coach at SIU, Oral Roberts and Missouri State.
CHAPEL HILL, N.C. — Demarcus Holland scored on a stickback of his own free throw with 4.1 seconds left to help Texas hold on and beat No. 14 North Carolina 86-83 on Wednesday night.Holland finished with 15 points for the Longhorns (10-1), who survived a missed 3-pointer from UNC's Marcus Paige on the final play to earn their sixth straight win.Isaiah Taylor scored 16 points to lead Texas, while Javan Felix added 12 — including two key baskets in the final 2 minutes to answer a tying spurt from the Tar Heels (7-3).Texas shot 38 percent after halftime and 40 percent for the game, but dominated the boards and scored 21 second-chance points to beat the Tar Heels for the sixth time in seven meetings.Paige scored 23 points to lead UNC, which got senior Leslie McDonald back for the first time after missing the first nine games due to NCAA eligibility issues.But in the end, the Tar Heels struggled to overcome a flat start as well as 23 missed free throws in what has become a recurring theme this season.North Carolina, which had beaten highly ranked Michigan State, Kentucky and reigning national champion Louisville in the past month despite playing without McDonald and leading scorer P.J. Hairston due to those NCAA issues, trailed by as many as 13 points and spent much of the game fighting uphill.UNC tied the game at 77 on Kennedy Meeks' three-point play with 2:14 left, but Felix knocked down a tough shot in the lane over Paige with 1:59 left. Two possessions later, he buried a 3-pointer over Paige to push the lead to 82-77 with 1:06 left.The Tar Heels clawed within 84-80 on two free throws from Paige with 25.2 seconds left, then Paige followed with a 3 with 12.1 seconds to go to close the deficit to one. UNC put Holland on the line with 7.2 seconds left and he missed both, but he snatched the rebound in the lane and put up a shot that bounced around the rim before dropping through the net.Paige got a good look on the final possession from in front of the UNC bench, but the shot rimmed out as the horn expired.Texas and coach Rick Barnes suffered through a miserable 16-18 season last year, ending with a first-round loss in the CBI. But the Longhorns entered this one with five players averaging in double figures and had held seven of 10 opponents to under 40 percent shooting.The Longhorns did more of the same against UNC, with four players reaching double figures while they held the Tar Heels to 39 percent shooting.Most impressively, Texas took a 51-42 rebounding advantage, pulling down 20 offensive rebounds.For UNC, McDonald scored 15 points with four 3-pointers after the NCAA announced hours before tipoff that the senior was cleared to return to competition after missing the first nine games.The NCAA said McDonald must repay $1,783 to a charity of his choice for receiving improper benefits from "numerous individuals" during this spring and summer. That included the use of luxury cars, payment of parking tickets, a cellphone and lodging.After the game, UNC issued a statement from athletic director Bubba Cunningham saying the school was still working with the NCAA on Hairston's status and expected to have the matter resolved by the end of the week.
BRIDGEPORT, Conn. — Aaryn Ellenberg scored 23 points and No. 20 Oklahoma beat Fairfield 79-51 on Wednesday night.The start of the game was delayed 45 minutes as Oklahoma was stuck in traffic coming up from New York City. It took the Sooners three hours to get to the game from their Times Square hotel 60 miles away.The long bus ride slowed them at the start as Fairfield hung around for the first half. The game was tied at 15 before Ellenberg and Oklahoma got going. The senior guard hit two 3-pointers during a 15-4 run that gave the Sooners a 30-19 lead with 3:25 left in the half. They led 35-25 at the break.Fairfield was able to get within 37-30 early in the second half before Oklahoma (8-3) put the game away with an 11-2 run. Ellenberg started the spurt with lay-in off an inbounds pass and Nicole Griffin capped it with a layup.After starting the game missing their first six 3-point attempts, Oklahoma got hot from the field, making 10 of its final 16 attempts from behind the arc. The Sooners will finish off their two-game East Coast swing with a game at Marist on Saturday after spending a few days enjoying New York City.The loss dropped Fairfield to 1-29 against ranked opponents with the lone win coming against Marist five seasons ago. Still Stags coach Joe Frager didn't hesitate to schedule the game when approached by Oklahoma for the game. The timing wasn't great for the Stags as they are in the middle of exams. But with a chance to play a Top 25 team, Frager got permission from the school for the game.He tried to get more students to come to the game partaking in the annual midnight breakfast during exams."Every time I was serving some eggs and bacon they were getting an Oklahoma ticket on top of it," Frager said.While there weren't too many Fairfield students in the crowd, the game did attract UConn players Kaleena Mosqueda-Lewis and Bria Hartley. The pair, fresh off Tuesday night's win at No. 2 Duke, played with Ellenberg on the World University Games team this past summer that won gold in Russia.
ATHENS, Ohio — Maxie Esho had 16 points and 10 rebounds, Chaz Williams had 11 points and 11 assists and No. 22 Massachusetts remained undefeated with an 83-71 victory over Ohio on Wednesday night.Sampson Carter added 14 points, including eight straight in the second half, for the Minutemen (10-0), who shot 60.4 percent from the field (32 of 53) and led by as many as 19 points.Maurice Ndour scored 16 points for Ohio (7-3), which made just five of 24 attempts from 3-point range (20.8 percent).Nick Kellogg added 12 points for the Bobcats, who were playing their first home game against a ranked opponent since 1997.Carter made all three of his 3-point attempts as the Minutemen went 9 of 14 from beyond the arc (64.3 percent).Derrick Gordon scored 13 points and Raphiael Putney added 11 for UMass, which led by as many as 13 points in the first half and was up 45-34 at halftime. Putney had all of his points before halftime and Williams had 10 in the opening 20 minutes.The Minutemen shot 65 percent from the field in the first half while the Bobcats shot 42 percent including going just 1 of 11 from beyond the arc.Ohio, which finished with a 38-37 rebound advantage, cut its deficit to 53-47 with 16 minutes remaining, but UMass scored nine consecutive points — six by Esho — to pull away.
WACO, Texas — Odyssey Sims is still able to lead No. 9 Baylor when she is having a tough shooting night. Her shots seem to go in when they are needed the most.Sims had 39 points, including a wild shot that went in before scoring the Lady Bears' last seven points, in an 87-80 victory over Mississippi on Wednesday night that stretched their national-best home winning streak to 66 games.Baylor (9-1), which trailed by 10 early in the game, got even at 72 when Sims made a three-point play with 5½ minutes to go, hitting the free throw after an impressive basket. After grabbing her own rebound, Sims was leaning and falling along the edge of the lane when she flipped the ball up toward the hoop — and it went through."It wasn't desperately," Sims said, with a bit of a smile. "The girl was a little bit bigger than me, I was trying to go around her. Just kind of how the ball went up and came down. I went along with it. I'm not going to say I knew it was going to go in."Sims, who entered the game as the nation's leading scorer at 29.4 points a game, made only 11 of 32 shots. Ole Miss (8-5) was within a point with 2:17 left before Sims scored the last seven points for Baylor, including a floater and four free throws in the final 36 seconds."What can you say about her? I'll go on record saying she's the best player in the country, and I've played against a lot of them over the last four, five years," said Ole Miss coach Matt Insell, in his first year with the Rebels after five seasons as a Kentucky assistant. "I thought she was the best player in the country last year, and she's the best player in the country this year, too."Nina Davis had 18 points and 15 rebounds for the Lady Bears. Sune Agbuke also had 15 rebounds, and Niya Johnson scored 10 points.Ole Miss, which had its seven-game winning streak snapped, jumped out to a 10-point lead in the first half. The Rebels had five players score in double figures.Tia Faleru had 22 points and 10 rebounds for the Rebels before fouling out. Valencia McFarland had 17 points, 12 assists and nine rebounds. Danielle McCray and Diara Moore both had 13 points and Gracie Frizzell had 12 on four 3-pointers.McCray gave Ole Miss its last lead at 74-72 after scoring on a pass from McFarland with just over 4 minutes left.Davis scored while being fouled with 3:44 left, that being the fifth foul on Faleru. After the media timeout, Davis made the tiebreaking free throw.Makenzie Robertson then made a 3-pointer in front of her teammates on the bench to make it 78-74."I told our players it's going to take 40 minutes to win," Insell said. "We played about 38 minutes. We've got to go back and figure out how to play those next two."Moore then made a layup for Ole Miss, and after the Lady Bears missed on three shots before Agbuke made two free throws, Moore had a three-point play to get to 80-79, but the Rebels never went ahead again.The Lady Bears were playing an SEC team for the second in three games. Before a long break for final exams, they lost 133-130 in a four-overtime game against Kentucky at the Dallas Cowboys' stadium where the NCAA men's Final Four will be played in April.Ole Miss used a 17-4 run midway through the first half and was up 29-19 when McFarland made a free throw with 8:38 left.Baylor closed the half with an 11-4 run, including consecutive layups by Johnson, and closed to 41-40 at the half after Agbuke's three-point play in the final minute."There's going to be a lot of games like that this year," Baylor coach Kim Mulkey said. "I wouldn't say it was a pretty game, but two teams that wanted to win. When we got down 10, we hung in there, and had a little resiliency and made a few plays."
COLUMBUS, Ohio — LaQuinton Ross scored 19 points, including eight in a decisive 15-0 run, to lead No. 3 Ohio State past Delaware 76-64 on Wednesday night.Lenzelle Smith Jr. added 14 points, Aaron Craft had 12, Amir Williams had 11 points and 12 rebounds and Amedeo Della Valle added 10 points for the Buckeyes (11-0), who have won every game by double figures.Devon Saddler, still rounding into shape after a seven-game disciplinary suspension, had 17 points and Jarvis Threatt added 14 for the Blue Hens (5-6), who have lost three straight. It was their second of three games in six days, all in the BlackRock Gotham Classic.Both teams will be playing in the same five-team "tournament" at Madison Square Garden on Saturday, with the Blue Hens meeting Bryant and Ohio State squaring off against Notre Dame.Ross hit 8 of 13 shots from the field including both of his 3-point attempts.It was a surprisingly cold shooting night for the Buckeyes, who had made at least 52 percent of their field goal attempts in each of the last five games to match the longest such streak since 1991-92. They were 24 of 59 from the field (41 percent).Up by 11 points at halftime and riding a 12-0 run, the Buckeyes added to their lead when Ross hit a 3 to open the second half.The Blue Hens got as close as eight points twice, although the lead was never really in doubt.They were still hanging around at 50-40 when Ross flipped in a half-hook off an offensive rebound and Della Valle hit a 3-pointer from the left corner. Moments later, Della Valle swished another 3 from the right elbow to make it 60-44 with 10:28 remaining.Delaware cut it to 63-54 on Davon Usher's layup with 6 minutes left before Williams hit a free throw, Smith made two free throws and Ross bumped his way into the lane for a basket to make it 68-54 with just over 3 minutes remaining.Consecutive layups by Saddler cut the lead to 68-60 with 1:48 left, but Smith hit a jumper and two free throws to put the game out of reach.The first half was a struggle for the Buckeyes.Not until they went on a 12-0 run over the final 3:30 did they take command. Ross led the assault with a 3-pointer that lit the match on the run and later added a finger-roll layup in transition after a steal by Craft.Craft added the last two points of the half after Delaware coach Monte' Ross was whistled for a technical with 4.2 seconds left for a 37-26 lead.Ross had 11 at halftime, Williams nine and Craft eight.But the Buckeyes made just 39 percent of their shots from the field (13 of 33), including 2 of 7 3-pointers (29 percent). The Blue Hens mixed defenses against Ohio State, occasionally matching up and at other times playing zone.Delaware, which came in with three players averaging at least 15 points a game, didn't have anyone over six points in the opening 20 minutes.The Blue Hens fell to 0-8 against Big Ten teams and 0-17 against Top 10 teams and 0-29 against ranked opponents. The only time the Blue Hens played a higher-ranked team was No. 2 Duke last season.Ohio State won its first 11 games twice before under coach Thad Matta: in 2005-06, when it started 11-0, and 2010-11, when it won its first 24 games.
DURHAM, N.C. — Geno Auriemma and his Connecticut Huskies always seem to thrive on the big stage.Tuesday night was no different as the No. 1 team in the country turned its latest showdown into another rout, beating second-ranked Duke 83-61."I think these are the reasons we come to Connecticut, to play in the big games," said Breanna Stewart, who led the Huskies with 24 points and 11 rebounds. "We have a huge target on our back and teams will always give us their best run. That's what you want as a competitor."The victory over Duke was the Huskies' fourth over a ranked team this season. They've beaten Stanford, Maryland and Penn State with relative ease, with each game decided way before the final buzzer. UConn has always excelled in 1-2 matchups, winning 15 of the 18 games they've played in.What's scary for the rest of the women's basketball landscape is that the first three wins came with the Huskies (11-0) not at full strength. Kaleena Mosqueda-Lewis injured her elbow in the victory over Stanford and missed the next eight games. She showed no rust against Duke, hitting a career-high seven 3-pointers. Whenever Duke seemed to make any sort of run, the junior forward would hit a key 3 to end the challenge."I don't think we would have won the game the way we won it without her," Auriemma said. "She showed why she is a special player."This was the seventh straight victory for the Huskies in the series with Duke. The previous six were decided by an average of nearly 30 points. Auriemma thought this one might be a little different. It wasn't."I think I would be less than honest if I said I thought we could come in here and win by 20," said Auriemma, who earned his 850th career win. "Simply because we haven't played in (12 days). We weren't sure what we were going to get from (Mosqueda-Lewis and Morgan Tuck). And I thought Duke being at home and they've got a bunch of upperclassmen ... it would be a little bit different."Chelsea Gray had 13 points and Haley Peters finished with 11 for Duke (10-1), which had its 24-game winning streak at Cameron snapped — a run that dated to UConn's last visit in 2011."We didn't do what we needed to do defensively," coach Joanne P. McCallie said. "We didn't rebound the way we need to rebound. And we showed little patience on offense at critical times."The Huskies, the only visitors to beat Duke on its home floor since 2008, now have done it three times since anybody else has found a way to do it once.They also spoiled the Blue Devils' undefeated start with a rout for the third time in four seasons."I know people like to make a big deal about it because it's No. 1 and No. 2 and all of that," McCallie said. "I think the bigger deal is the Final Four. That's the biggest deal and trying to pursue a national championship at that level and this helps us in our journey to get better and figure things out."Stewart did much of the early damage in her first appearance in front of the Cameron Crazies — or at least what was left of them, with the Duke students on winter break.The Blue Devils, who spent the second half trying to claw their way back into the game, pulled to 65-52 on Elizabeth Williams' layup with just under 8 minutes left.After a timeout, UConn worked the ball around the perimeter to Mosqueda-Lewis, who swished her fifth 3 to restore the Huskies' 16-point lead and help them pull away for their 17th straight win."That's something that coach has been telling me since last year — that I need to shoot every shot like it's the last shot, and shoot every shot like it's an important shot," Mosqueda-Lewis said.The Blue Devils were denied their first win over a No. 1 team since 2007. Duke can't afford to dwell on the loss with a tough week ahead. The Blue Devils host a good Albany squad before visiting No. 5 Kentucky on Sunday at Rupp Arena.
NEW YORK — Casey Prather did what seniors are supposed to do — lead their team in a tough spot.Prather scored 22 points, including Florida's last eight of the game, and the 16th-ranked Gators beat No. 15 Memphis 77-75 in the Jimmy V Classic at Madison Square Garden on Tuesday night."I was just trying to be smart on offense and be aggressive," he said. "The ball just happened to find me. It could have been any of my teammates."Prather made two free throws with 27 seconds left to give Florida (8-2) a 77-73 lead. Shaq Goodwin made two free throws with 19 seconds left to bring Memphis (7-2) to 77-75.Florida's Scottie Wilbekin missed the front end of a 1-and-1 with 17 seconds left giving the Tigers a chance for the tie or win.After calling a timeout with 10.8 seconds to go, Memphis' Joe Jackson drove to the basket but his shot was partially blocked and the clock ran out when the ball was hit by Dorian Finney-Smith toward midcourt.It was quite a different ending on an end-game situation for the Gators from their game against Connecticut when a miss was back-tapped and Shabazz Napier of the Huskies hit a jumper at the buzzer for a 65-64 win."The UConn game ended on a fluky play when the ball got tipped," Gators coach Billy Donovan. "We punched it out to not give them another opportunity."Finney-Smith added 14 points for the Gators and Wilbekin and Michael Frazier II both had 11.Jackson had 17 points for Memphis, which had a six-game winning streak snapped, while Geron Johnson had 13 and Chris Crawford and David Pellom both had 12.Jackson said the final play was designed to give him some options."I was going to make something happen," he said. "I was going to find someone, shoot or get fouled. Unfortunately it just didn't go in tonight. I knew I was going to get by him but the paint clogged up quick. They're long and quick."Both teams had good shooting games despite solid defense from both teams.Florida shot 51.9 percent from the field (28 of 54), including 7 of 16 from 3-point range, while Memphis shot 47.4 percent (27 of 57) and was 6 of 18 from beyond the arc.Florida was able to give itself some breathing room in the second half with an 11-3 run that gave the Gators a 69-61 lead with 5:55 to go. Freshman Kasey Hill had five of the points.The Tigers got back in a hurry with a drive by Jackson and a 3 by Crawford that made it 69-66 with 4:08 to play.The Gators' two losses were to No. 4 Wisconsin and No. 10 Connecticut, both on the road. They beat No. 18 Kansas 67-61 last Tuesday at home, a game in which they forced 24 turnovers."These games have helped us get better," Donovan said. "I think every game is an opportunity to learn and grow and get better. It's still very early in the season."The Tigers split two games with No. 7 Oklahoma State, losing 101-80 at Stillwater and winning 73-68 in the Old Spice Classic championship game."This was a high level game. It felt like a Sweet 16 game," Memphis coach Josh Pastner said. "All you can ask for is to have the ball in your hand to tie or win the game and that's what we had and it didn't go our way but give Florida credit. We'll grow from this and get better."It was the second time the schools met with Florida winning 84-83 on Dec. 18, 1976, at St. Petersburg, Fla.
In a tight, highly entertaining matchup in the Jimmy V Classic at Madison Square Garden on Tuesday night, No. 16 Florida held off No. 15 Memphis, 77-75, for its second consecutive win over a ranked opponent.Florida jumped ahead by 12, but Memphis (7-2) came back to make it a close game by halftime. The Gators (8-2) had a hard time holding on to possession, allowing several steals and turnovers to keep giving Memphis opportunities.The Tigers trailed by 5 with 1 minute 9 seconds left, but missed free throws by Dorian Finney-Smith and Scottie Wilbekin left the door open. With Memphis trailing, 77-75, with 10.8 seconds left in the last possession, Joe Jackson's layup attempt missed before time expired.Both teams featured seasoned lineups, deep with rangy and athletic talent. Florida is often noted for its defensive ability, but Memphis looked equally impenetrable in spurts.In the first game of the doubleheader, Titus Rubles tipped in the game-winner with 4.2 seconds left to lift Cincinnati (8-2) past previously unbeaten Pittsburgh, 44-43. The teams combined to 5 of 26 from 3-point range. LOUISVILLE 90, MISSOURI ST. 60 Montrezl Harrell had 17 points and 8 rebounds as No. 6 Louisville won easily at home. The Cardinals (10-1) combined dominant rebounding with offensive accuracy during a 15-0 first-half run. (AP)WICHITA STATE 72, ALABAMA 67 Cleanthony Early scored 26 points and Fred VanVleet made two free throws with 11 seconds left to lift No. 11 Wichita State (11-0) over host Alabama. (AP)MICHIGAN ST. 78, N. FLORIDA 48 Adreian Payne scored 15 of his 19 points in the first half and fifth-ranked Michigan State (9-1) rolled to a victory at home. Branden Dawson added 12 points and Denzel Valentine scored 11 for the Spartans (9-1). Michigan State narrowly avoided an upset against Oakland last weekend.Jalen Nesbitt scored 11 points for North Florida (5-7). Michigan State led 50-19 at halftime after shooting 71 percent. (AP)OKLA. ST. 75, DELAWARE ST. 43 Le'Bryan Nash had 14 points and eight rebounds to lead No. 7 Oklahoma State (10-1) at home.Markel Brown added 14 points for the Cowboys (10-1). Oklahoma State led, 30-16, at halftime and went on an 18-2 run to start the second half. (AP)PROVIDENCE 76, YALE 74 Bryce Cotton finished with 21 points as Providence held on for a win at home. Tyler Harris added 19 points and LaDontae Henton had 13 for the Friars (9-2). The Yale sophomore Justin Sears went 13 of 16 from the field and led all scorers with 31 points. (AP)WOMENUCONN 83, DUKE 61 Kaleena Mosqueda-Lewis scored 21 points with a career-high seven 3-pointers, and No. 1 Connecticut won at second-ranked Duke. (AP)TENNESSEE 94, TENNESSEE ST. 43 Bashaara Graves scored 17 points to lead five Lady Vols in double figures and No. 3 Tennessee continued its best start since its 2007-8 national championship season. (AP)LOUISVILLE 105, BALL STATE 67 Shoni Schimmel had 17 points, 8 rebounds and 7 assists, and Sara Hammond scored 11 of her 13 points in the first five minutes as No. 7 Louisville overwhelmed host Ball State. (AP)HOLY CROSS SUIT HEARD The parties in a lawsuit brought by a former Holy Cross women's basketball player met in United States District Court in Manhattan to discuss whether a trial should proceed in federal or state court.In a complaint filed Oct. 16 against Holy Cross, its trustees and its women's basketball coach, Bill Gibbons, the former player Ashley Cooper accused Gibbons of verbally and physically abusing her from September 2011 until May 2013.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — It seems impossible these days for Knicks Coach Mike Woodson to get a bit of good news without it being compromised by another injury to another player.So it was more of the same on Tuesday, when Woodson couched his optimism over center Tyson Chandler's potential return Wednesday against the Milwaukee Bucks by disclosing that forward Amar'e Stoudemire had arrived at the training facility with a swollen knee."Amar'e's going to be out awhile," Woodson said.Stoudemire, who has chronic knee problems, appeared to land awkwardly in Monday's loss to the Washington Wizards and was limping. It was his fifth game in seven days, with Woodson becoming increasingly reliant on him in the absence of Chandler and Kenyon Martin, who has been out with a strained abdominal muscle.Stoudemire was unavailable to reporters after Tuesday's practice, but he later posted a message on his Twitter account, assuring fans that he was "not injured."He added that his knees "felt great" and that he was only taking some time off to recover.As for Chandler, who has been sidelined since Nov. 5 with a fractured bone in his right leg, he participated in some three-on-three drills at practice. Woodson said he would confer with Chandler on Wednesday morning to see how he felt. Barring any setbacks, Chandler could play in Milwaukee."I wouldn't say I'm rushing back to health," Chandler said. "I feel pretty good. Obviously, watching is tough for me, so that's not fun, especially with a lot of the games going down to the wire."The Knicks sorely need Chandler's defense. During the course of his rehabilitation, Chandler said he had tried to stay as involved as possible."I've watched a lot of basketball," he said. "So things I couldn't do on the floor, I've tried to do mentally."The Knicks are also thin at point guard. Pablo Prigioni will miss at least two weeks after breaking his right big toe in Monday's game, and Raymond Felton has missed the past four games while dealing with a strained hamstring.Seeking reinforcements, the Knicks on Tuesday recalled Chris Smith — J. R. Smith's younger brother — from the Erie BayHawks, their N.B.A. Development League affiliate. Chris Smith, whose signing was scrutinized in the preseason, has averaged 11.3 points and 2.7 assists in six games for Erie.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — Coach Mike Woodson watched the game film with his players Tuesday, reviewing their many blunders. The foul they opted not to give. The defense they refused to play. The timeout they decided not to take. It was ugly and demoralizing and necessary."We're always going to watch tape," Woodson said, "and I never let anything go unnoticed."Nobody has accused the Knicks of playing top-notch basketball, but for a team that was already being lampooned for its all-consuming struggles, the final 15 seconds of Monday night's loss to the Washington Wizards provided another round of punch lines, the jokes more robust than ever.The Knicks keep finding new and unusual ways to lose, and as the pressure continues to mount — on the team in general, and on Woodson in particular — the danger is that the final possessions of their 102-101 loss have become a defining moment for them, their dysfunction plain to see.Where was the help defense on Bradley Beal's go-ahead layup with 6.9 seconds remaining? Why did Woodson refuse to call a timeout? Why did Carmelo Anthony slow his dribble to a crawl before he attempted a running 25-footer at the buzzer? Why are the Knicks determined to make things so ridiculously hard on themselves?"Bad coaching," Woodson said. "We made a lot of mistakes coming down the stretch."The atmosphere is pressurized in New York, of course, where every late-game decision is dissected by a cast of thousands. Woodson has been short-handed. Tyson Chandler could return Wednesday against the Milwaukee Bucks after missing 20 games with a broken right leg. But the Knicks will still be without Pablo Prigioni (toe), Raymond Felton (hamstring), Kenyon Martin (abdominal strain) and Amar'e Stoudemire (knees)."Guys are playing hard, and they're trying," Mike Dunleavy Sr., a former N.B.A. coach and player, said in a telephone interview. "All coaches go through this at some point in time. It's part of the business."But while Woodson has been able to shield himself after previous losses by citing injuries and poor shooting, the Knicks had ample opportunities to win Monday's game. It had nothing to do with injuries. It had nothing to do with poor shooting. It had everything to do with questionable decisions.After the Knicks' Beno Udrih, who had replaced Prigioni, sank one of two free throws for a 1-point lead with 24 seconds remaining, the Wizards called a timeout. With Iman Shumpert defending John Wall, Wizards Coach Randy Wittman expected that Beal would have an advantage against Udrih, who had labored against him throughout the fourth quarter. So Wittman drew up a play for Beal to use a high screen set by Marcin Gortat.The Knicks had a foul to give, and Woodson said he advised his players to use it, the idea being that the foul would force the Wizards to inbounds the ball again and reset their offense. Beyond that, though, Woodson expected Beal or Wall to come off a screen set by Gortat. Woodson wanted his players to double-team the ball handler and pressure him into passing to Gortat.The Knicks had three timeouts, but Woodson did not address whether to call one in the event the Wizards scored."I think we were banking on getting our stop," Shumpert said. "We usually get stops."It was a liberal use of the word "usually" for a member of a 7-17 team. In any case, Wittman had Wall bring the ball upcourt, more or less as a decoy. With 12 seconds left, Wall handed it off to Beal about 35 feet from the basket. Beal surveyed the scene.The Knicks' defense did not feature a smorgasbord of lockdown defenders. Andrea Bargnani had been assigned to guard Gortat, and sure enough, Udrih was on Beal. In fairness, Woodson had few options. Martin was sidelined with his injury, and Metta World Peace has been hindered by a bad knee.Beal said he knew the screen from Gortat was coming, and he also knew the Knicks would try to get him to give up the ball. So his instinct was to reject the screen and drive baseline if the lane was clear. It was only a matter of seeing what was available to him, he said.
TUCSON, Ariz. — Aaron Gordon scored 21 points, Nick Johnson added 17 and Arizona opened its second week at No. 1 with a 69-43 rout over Southern on Thursday night.Arizona (12-0) had no trouble with the Jaguars early on, racing out to a 15-point halftime lead while playing without injured center Kaleb Tarczewski. The second half wasn't quite as smooth and the Wildcats went 22 of 37 on free throws, but it was good enough to get them to 12-0 for the second straight season.Brandon Ashley had 11 points and 10 rebounds for Arizona.Southern (3-8) fought back after a miserable first half, but fell in too deep of a hole to make a game of it. Malcolm Miller and Calvin Godfrey had 11 points each for the Jaguars.Arizona moved to the top of The Associated Press poll last week for the first time since 2003 and immediately faced two difficult tests.The Wildcats passed both, racing past New Mexico State after stumbling early against the Aggies' quirky defenses, then rallying from an 11-point deficit to beat Michigan on the road for what may be their biggest win of an already impressive season.Arizona's task over its next two games — the Wildcats face Northern Arizona on Monday — was to avoid complacency and looking ahead to the holiday break and the Pac-12 season.Southern didn't figure to pose much of a threat to the long, athletic Wildcats.The Jaguars nearly pulled off a monumental upset in the first round of last year's NCAA tournament, leading No. 1 Gonzaga late before losing to the Zags.Southern is a much different team this year after losing four seniors and with Godfrey ailing because of an elbow injury.It went about as expected early.Even without Tarczewski, who sprained his ankle against Michigan on Saturday, Arizona dominated Southern from the start, building a 12-point by the midpoint of the first half.The Wildcats kept rolling behind the wheeling and dealing of T.J. McConnell (five assists) and inside game of Gordon, who had eight of his 10 first-half points on layups or dunks.Southern tried to work inside-out on offense, without much luck; Arizona had an 18-2 advantage in the paint in the first half.The Jaguars couldn't seem to hit much from anywhere, shooting 7 of 24, including 3 of 11 from the 3-point arc, in the opening 20 minutes.The Wildcats, on the other hand, had little trouble scoring, hitting 13 of 24 shots from the floor. Had they been a little better without pressure — 6 of 16 on free throws — the lead would have been even more than 34-19 at halftime.Southern was better offensively to open the second half and chipped the lead down to 10.The Jaguars had no answer for Gordon.The freshman phenom used his long arms to reach over defenders for offensive rebounds and his strength to bull past them for putbacks. Gordon added a 3-pointer from the wing and hit three straight free throws after going 0 for 4 in the first half, drawing cheers from the home fans.That turned out to be the only excitement in the second half as Arizona prevented the Jaguars from getting any closer.
LOS ANGELES — Just 11 days after Kobe Bryant made his long-awaited return for the Los Angeles Lakers, the shooting guard is expected to be out for "approximately six weeks" because of a knee injury, the team announced on Thursday.The 35-year-old, who spent almost eight months on the sidelines with a torn left Achilles' tendon before making his comeback on December 8, hyper-extended his left knee during Tuesday's 96-92 win against the Grizzlies in Memphis.Bryant, a 15-time All-Star and five-time NBA champion, had a magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) exam on Thursday and was also examined by a team physician."Results of the MRI show that Bryant has a fracture of the lateral tibial plateau of his knee," the Lakers said in a statement. "He is expected to be out approximately six weeks."Bryant's latest injury comes as a major blow for the Lakers, who only last month signed the league veteran to a two-year, $48.5 million contract extension."That's too bad, you hate it for Kobe," Lakers coach Mike D'Antoni told reporters after the team practiced at their El Segundo training facility."He's worked so hard to get back. But he'll be back. He'll be back in six weeks. He's got to weather the storm to get back. We're going to play hard. We have enough guys and enough talent. We'll be fine."Xavier Henry will take over as starting point guard in Bryant's absence, the Lakers said.Bryant, who injured his left knee with 3:25 left in the third quarter of Tuesday's game against Memphis before returning to the court to finish with a total 21 points, posted a brief comment on Twitter on Thursday.Asked on Tuesday to explain what happened during the decisive play when he fell after backing Tony Allen down into the post, Bryant told reporters: "I just hyper-extended it. I tend to hyper-extend my knees every now and then."Bryant's widely anticipated return from his Achilles' tendon injury gave the team a significant boost, though they have struggled to a win-loss record of 2-4 since then.Making matters worse for the Lakers is that all three of their point guards have been sidelined by injury - Steve Nash (nerve damage in back), Steve Blake (torn ligament in right elbow) and Jordan Farmar (torn hamstring).Bryant has averaged 13.8 points, 4.3 rebounds and 6.3 assists in six games this season for the Lakers (12-13) who sit 11th in the 15-team Western Conference.
DURHAM, N.C. — Haley Peters scored 17 points to help No. 2 Duke beat Albany 80-51 on Thursday night.Chelsea Gray and Richa Jackson had 12 points apiece for the Blue Devils (11-1), who shot 59 percent from the floor in their first game since an 83-61 home loss to No. 1 Connecticut on Tuesday.Albany (8-2) led 20-13 with 7:53 remaining in the first half, but Duke answered with a 15-2 run en route to a 34-26 lead at halftime.The Blue Devils opened the second half with a 17-2 spurt and scored on their first 10 possessions of the half.Shereesha Richards scored 20 of her 24 points in the first half for the Great Danes.Richards, who scored her team's first 14 points, made 10 of 15 shots from the floor in the first half. Her teammates made 1 of 15 during that span.
SAN DIEGO — Xavier Thames scored 16 points and Josh Davis had 13 points and 14 rebounds to lead No. 24 San Diego State to a 76-39 laugher over Southern Utah on Wednesday night.Aqeel Quinn added 14 points for the Aztecs (8-1), who had been off for nine days for finals.SDSU sophomore forward Winston Shepard didn't suit up due to unspecified conduct issues. Shepard was suspended for three games last season by the NCAA for violating an unspecified rule.SDSU raced to leads of 21-2 and 37-4. It was 41-11 at halftime.The Thunderbirds had two shot-clock violations and a handful of air balls in the first half.Late in the first half, SDSU's student section, "The Show," duped Kennedy into thinking the shot clock was winding down and he launched a 3-pointer with about 16 seconds still on the clock. He was fouled by Skylar Spencer and made all three free throws to make it 39-9.The student section also chanted "single digits" before Southern Utah's Juwan Major hit a jumper in the final seconds of the first half to pull to 40-11.Southern Utah's 11 points in the first half were the second-fewest allowed in a Division I game this season and the fewest allowed in any half by SDSU since 1996-97.The Aztecs were missing Dwayne Polee, who was ill.Despite facing an outmanned opponent, the Aztecs still had some rough stretches and made only 11 of 28 free throws.Southern Utah will play at the University of San Diego on Saturday and then take a break until opening Big Sky play at North Dakota on Jan. 2.
WACO, Texas — Kenny Chery scored 12 of his 20 points in overtime and No. 12 Baylor returned from an extended break with a 91-84 victory over Northwestern State on Wednesday night.Chery had a steal in the first minute of overtime after Sabri Thompson lost control of the ball. Chery picked it up and drove to make a tough short jumper while being fouled. He shouted out while still sitting on the court after the ball went through the hoop to put the Bears (9-1) ahead to stay. He added the free throw.There was an assist for Chery on Gary Franklin's 3-pointer in the extra period. After Brison White's jumper got Northwestern State within 82-80 with 2 minutes left, Chery drove for a layup and then made a 3-pointer after a shot-clock violation by the Demons (4-6).Cory Jefferson had 22 points and 10 rebounds for Baylor, which was playing for the first time in 12 days. Rico Gathers had 19 points and 10 rebounds, and Franklin added 11 points.Jalan West had 26 points for Northwestern State, including a tying 3-pointer with 14 seconds left in regulation.Chery, the junior college transfer who took over as Baylor's starting point guard this season, had a chance before time ran out. But he drove and missed with 2 seconds left, and Royce O'Neal then missed a putback.DeQuan Hicks and Zikiteran Woodley had 15 points each for the Demons, and White had 11.Jefferson had a thunderous two-handed dunk after a behind-the-back pass from Franklin with 2:49 left in regulation that gave the Bears a 74-69 lead, but that wasn't enough to avoid overtime.West made a jumper before Chery had a bad pass that went out of bounds for a turnover. Northwestern State then got a second-chance tip by White after he missed his own shot with 1:17 left. But Jefferson made two free throws with a minute left for a 76-73 lead.West missed a 3-pointer, but White got the rebound to give him another chance — and West hit from the top of the key.Northwestern State had a 38-36 rebounding edge, the first team this season to beat Baylor on the boards.The Bears played for the first time since a 67-62 win over then-No. 3 Kentucky on Dec. 6. That game before final exams was at the Dallas Cowboys' massive stadium where the NCAA Final Four will be played in April.The game was tied 38-all at halftime before Jefferson scored nine points in the first 4½ minutes of the second half to put Baylor ahead to stay. His alley-oop dunk from Franklin at the end of that spurt gave Baylor a 51-45 lead.Northwestern State plays Thursday night at UTEP. The Demons stayed in Waco after the game, before driving about 100 miles to Dallas-Fort Worth International Airport for a day-of-game flight to El Paso.
On the side of Barclays Center is a giant decal of the Nets ' projected starting lineup for this season. In a seemingly rare occurrence, all five players depicted were in action Wednesday night, but the Nets still lost, 113-107, to the Washington Wizards .The players — Kevin Garnett, Paul Pierce, Joe Johnson, Deron Williams and Brook Lopez — have a combined 35 All-Star selections. This season, however, the team has rarely been able to employ the star-laden lineup: Entering Wednesday's game, the group had shared the court for a total of only 78 minutes over the course of nine games.On the court together to start the fourth quarter, the unit nearly rallied the team to victory but came up short in a game that exposed many of the team's larger flaws.The Nets repeatedly left Washington's shooters open on the perimeter, and the Wizards took advantage by going 12 for 20 from 3-point range. Washington's shooting confidence was bolstered by its dominance in the paint, with 19 offensive rebounds keeping possessions alive and leading to a number of second-chance points.The Nets' struggles to contain Washington's offense muted the return of Lopez from a sprained ankle that had kept him out of the last two games.Back in the paint, Lopez was the focal point of the Nets' offense in the first half, but he ran into foul trouble and had a difficult and tentative night on defense. Although he finished the game with 22 points, he had only five rebounds and often looked overmatched as Trevor Booker and Marcin Gortat combined for 23 rebounds."I personally didn't do a great job," Lopez said. "Obviously, that's what won the game for them."Both Jason Kidd, the Nets' coach, and Garnett cited the rebounding differential as what cost the team the game, but both were quick to take the blame off Lopez."They crashed three or four guys each time, and they were able to get offensive rebounds," Garnett said. "Offensive rebounds mean second shots, and we didn't do a good job of controlling that."Kidd said Lopez was frequently forced to defend pick-and-rolls that led to him being away from the basket, which explained some of his defensive problems.Despite the Wizards' ability to dominate the paint, the Nets were kept in the game largely by Pierce, who continued to thrive as the team's sixth man.In his fifth consecutive game off the bench — Pierce started 1,099 of 1,102 games during 15 seasons with the Boston Celtics — he provided an immediate lift to the team on both offense and defense. With less than four minutes left in the first quarter, he entered what was shaping up as a blowout and immediately hit a 3-pointer. His presence helped lead the team on a 12-3 run that made the game interesting.Despite a season-high 27 points, Pierce was not celebrating."It is easy to sit here and talk to you guys about what kind of night I had, but the bottom line is I really don't care," Pierce said. "We lost the game, and that is pretty much all that matters."Kidd was noncommittal about whether the bench role would be permanent for Pierce, repeatedly saying that his staff would look at the tape and try to figure out how to make the team better."I mean, I don't really care," Pierce said when asked if he wanted the change to be permanent. "I have adjusted."Pierce thrived, but the rest of the team seemed out of sync for large periods of the game. Williams passed up a number of seemingly open shots (while tying his season high with 13 assists), and Alan Anderson, who replaced Pierce in the starting lineup, had no points, no assists and one rebound in 19 minutes.In the end, a day that started with Kidd talking about the faith his players and the Nets organization have shown in him ended with the team looking flawed. And this time, there were no injuries to blame.Reggie Evans, who has found his role greatly diminished in the Jason Kidd era, entered the game in the third quarter to loud chants of "Reg-gie! Reg-gie!" He played six minutes. ... On Wednesday, Spike Lee revealed on Twitter that Ray Allen of the Miami Heat planned to wear "J. Shuttlesworth" on his jersey during his team's matchups with the Nets on March 12 and April 8. Players on both sides will have nicknames on their jerseys rather than their last names. The name is a reference to Allen's character, Jesus Shuttlesworth, in Lee's film "He Got Game."
Dwyane Wade scored 32 points, Ray Allen hit a go-ahead 3-pointer with just under a minute left, and the Miami Heat erased a 15-point deficit in the second half to beat the Indiana Pacers , 97-94, on Wednesday night.LeBron James scored 24 on a sore left ankle for the Heat, who closed within a game of the Eastern Conference-leading Pacers. Chris Bosh added 15 points for host Miami, including a 3 that tied the score late in the fourth quarter.James set up Allen for the 3-pointer that put Miami ahead for good with 59.5 seconds left, capping a 10-0 run.Paul George scored 25 points but missed a 3-pointer that would have tied the score with four seconds left. David West had 23 and Lance Stephenson added 13 for the Pacers, who have dropped two straight.Down by 1, the Pacers saw their best chance go awry when George Hill turned the ball over on a bad pass with 14 seconds left. Allen made two free throws with 10.3 seconds remaining to put Miami up by 3, and that capped a big comeback win for the two-time defending N.B.A. champions.PISTONS 107, CELTICS 106 Brandon Jennings scored 28 points, including a key 3-pointer with 46.7 seconds left, and matched his season high with 14 assists to lead Detroit past host Boston.Andre Drummond had 14 points and 16 rebounds, and Josh Smith added 20 points for the Pistons, who won for the seventh time in 11 games. It was the Pistons' sixth win in their past seven road games.Jared Sullinger scored 19 points, Jordan Crawford had 17, Avery Bradley 14 and Jeff Green 13 for Boston, which lost for just the third time in nine games.HAWKS 124, KINGS 107 Kyle Korver made seven consecutive 3-point shots on his way to a season-high 28 points, leading host Atlanta.Al Horford added 25 points and 10 rebounds for the Hawks, who have won two straight and five of seven.DeMarcus Cousins scored 28 points, Rudy Gay had 22 and Isaiah Thomas 20 for the Kings, who allowed a season high in points.BOBCATS 104, RAPTORS 102 Kemba Walker hit a buzzer-beating jump shot in overtime as Charlotte snapped a three-game losing streak in Toronto.Walker had 29 points, and Al Jefferson had 24 points and 11 rebounds as the Bobcats won their second straight. Five of Jefferson's points came in overtime.Josh McRoberts scored 13 points, Ramon Sessions and Gerald Henderson each had 11 and Anthony Tolliver had 10.DeMar DeRozan scored 30 points, and Kyle Lowry had 17 for the Raptors. Amir Johnson fouled out with 10 points and 13 rebounds as Toronto's two-game winning streak was snapped.T'WOLVES 120, BLAZERS 109 Kevin Love made an emphatic case for the title of the N.B.A.'s best power forward.Love had 29 points, 15 rebounds and 9 assists to outshine LaMarcus Aldridge as Minnesota won at home.Nikola Pekovic had 30 points and 9 rebounds, and Kevin Martin scored 22 for the Timberwolves, who led by 32 points in the second quarter and held off a second-half charge by the Trail Blazers.Damian Lillard had 36 points, 6 assists and 6 rebounds, and Aldridge had 15 points and 14 rebounds for the Blazers, who lost for the first time in six games. It was just their fifth loss of the season in 27 games and came at the end of a four-game trip.The Blazers have been the most surprising team of this young season, and they stormed into Target Center fresh off two straight heart-pounding victories on last-second shots by Lillard that gave them the best record in the N.B.A. But they were tired from playing their fourth game in five nights, and Minnesota pounced.WIZARDS 113, NETS 107 John Wall scored 21 points and made two big defensive plays against Deron Williams down the stretch to lead Washington to a victory at the Nets.Nene added 17 points in his return from injury for the Wizards, who completed a New York sweep after a victory over the Knicks on Monday following a four-game losing streak.Paul Pierce had a season-high 27 points for the Nets, and Brook Lopez added 22 after missing two games with a sprained left ankle.JAZZ 86, MAGIC 82 Trey Burke had a career-high 30 points and 8 assists, Gordon Hayward added 15 points, and Utah held off host Orlando.Orlando had a chance to tie the score in the closing seconds, but Jameer Nelson's layup rolled off the rim and was rebounded by Utah. Hayward then hit a pair of free throws.The Jazz, who had lost back-to-back games, extended their winning streak over the Magic to six games. The Magic lost for the sixth time in seven home games.
MILWAUKEE — In a season that has been abysmal for the Knicks, Wednesday began with a bit of good news and a much-needed break when they arrived at BMO Harris Bradley Center. Tyson Chandler, the 7-footer who provides a steady presence in the lane and in the locker room, returned to the lineup after missing 20 games with a broken right fibula. The Bucks' leading scorer, O. J. Mayo, missed the game to attend the funeral of his grandmother.The Knicks (8-17) needed all the help they could get — even against the worst team in the N.B.A., squeaking out a 107-101 victory in double overtime.With the Knicks ahead, 99-98, Carmelo Anthony (55 minutes, a team-high 29 points on 9-for-29 shooting) hit two free throws and then a 3-pointer to finally end a most maddening game for the Knicks.J. R. Smith set a team record by shooting 17 3-pointers. He hit 5, and over all, he shot 7 for 23 for 19 points. Chandler played 37 minutes, grabbed 9 rebounds and scored 9 points. The Knicks had a chance to win the game in regulation with less than 90 seconds remaining and leading by 4 points, but they grew cold and allowed the Bucks (5-20) to tie the score.The more egregious mistake, though, came in the first overtime, when they could have — and should have — won the game.Leading by 94-92 with 15 seconds remaining, Chandler rebounded an Anthony miss and passed the ball to Andrea Bargnani standing at the top of the key. Instead of holding the ball to run out the clock or waiting for the Bucks to foul with the shot clock turned off, Bargnani inexplicably, and immediately, fired a 3-pointer that bounced off the rim.The Bucks corralled the rebound and John Henson tipped home the tying basket with 0.3 seconds remaining to send the crowd into hysterics, Bargnani to the doghouse and the game into another overtime."It was a bad decision," Bargnani said. "It was a mistake. Good thing we won the game."It was a painful reminder of Monday's gut-wrenching, last-second loss to the Washington Wizards, when a mental defensive lapse led to the winning basket and then strategic confusion arose when Coach Mike Woodson declined to take a timeout with the game clock running out. Anthony slowly took the ball up court, and when he realized Woodson did not call time, he forced an errant shot.The Knicks and the Bucks went back and forth throughout the second half and both overtime periods, though it meant very different things. The Bucks are a depleted team of youngsters. The Knicks have been proclaimed a championship contender by their owner, James L. Dolan. But the teams traded baskets as equals, with neither team ever cracking a double-digit lead.Tied at 81-81 in regulation, the Knicks had a chance to win it when Beno Udrih drove the baseline and missed a short jumper. The Bucks had two chances at the final buzzer, but Henson and Khris Middleton had potential game-winning shots clang off the rim.The Knicks opened a 9-point lead in the second quarter, but could not pull away — mostly because they had such a hard time hitting shots.Anthony struggled mightily at times. On two possessions in overtime, he first failed to get a good shot with the shot clock running down, and was forced to fling the ball toward the basket. On another, he dribbled the ball out of bounds."The game should have been over," Anthony said. "I shot the ball poorly tonight."Chandler landed awkwardly in the second overtime and seemed to injure his left leg. He played on, noticeably limping, and afterward said he just cramped up a little."I apologized to him," Woodson said of Chandler's minutes. "But I needed him."He was injured Nov. 5, the Knicks' fourth game of the season, against the Charlotte Bobcats in a collision with Kemba Walker, who drove the lane and rolled into Chandler.In his absence, the Knicks were 4-16. Chandler's ability to guard the rim, his aggressive style of play and his leadership were sorely missed.Without him, Woodson was forced to mix and match his lineups and had recently relied heavily on Amar'e Stoudemire, who did not make the trip to Milwaukee because of soreness in his surgically repaired knee. Still more controversy could be brewing as Woodson declared Stoudemire "out a while," although Stoudemire tweeted that he was not injured.Raymond Felton remained out with a hamstring injury, Kenyon Martin missed the game with a strained abdominal muscle and Pablo Prigioni sat out with a toe problem.Such a victory — a desperation win over one of the league's bottom feeders — however parsed, is certainly not enough to turn the Knicks' season or quiet the calls for Woodson's job.As the mental mistakes, missed shots and a general lack of sharpness piled up, there was little — aside from the final score — to put a positive spin on.
MILWAUKEE — In a season that has been abysmal for the Knicks, Wednesday began with a bit of good news and a much-needed break when they arrived at BMO Harris Bradley Center. Tyson Chandler, the 7-footer who provides a steady presence in the lane and in the locker room, returned to the lineup after missing 20 games with a broken right fibula. The Bucks' leading scorer, O. J. Mayo, missed the game to attend the funeral of his grandmother.The Knicks (8-17) needed all the help they could get — even against the worst team in the N.B.A., squeaking out a 107-101 victory in double overtime.With the Knicks ahead, 99-98, Carmelo Anthony (55 minutes, a team-high 29 points on 9-for-29 shooting) hit two free throws and then a 3-pointer to finally end a most maddening game for the Knicks.J. R. Smith set a team record by shooting 17 3-pointers. He hit 5, and over all, he shot 7 for 23 for 19 points. Chandler played 37 minutes, grabbed 9 rebounds and scored 9 points. The Knicks had a chance to win the game in regulation with less than 90 seconds remaining and leading by 4 points, but they grew cold and allowed the Bucks (5-20) to tie the score.The more egregious mistake, though, came in the first overtime, when they could have — and should have — won the game.Leading by 94-92 with 15 seconds remaining, Chandler rebounded an Anthony miss and passed the ball to Andrea Bargnani standing at the top of the key. Instead of holding the ball to run out the clock or waiting for the Bucks to foul with the shot clock turned off, Bargnani inexplicably, and immediately, fired a 3-pointer that bounced off the rim.The Bucks corralled the rebound and John Henson tipped home the tying basket with 0.3 seconds remaining to send the crowd into hysterics, Bargnani to the doghouse and the game into another overtime."It was a bad decision," Bargnani said. "It was a mistake. Good thing we won the game."It was a painful reminder of Monday's gut-wrenching, last-second loss to the Washington Wizards, when a mental defensive lapse led to the winning basket and then strategic confusion arose when Coach Mike Woodson declined to take a timeout with the game clock running out. Anthony slowly took the ball up court, and when he realized Woodson did not call time, he forced an errant shot.The Knicks and the Bucks went back and forth throughout the second half and both overtime periods, though it meant very different things. The Bucks are a depleted team of youngsters. The Knicks have been proclaimed a championship contender by their owner, James L. Dolan. But the teams traded baskets as equals, with neither team ever cracking a double-digit lead.Tied at 81-81 in regulation, the Knicks had a chance to win it when Beno Udrih drove the baseline and missed a short jumper. The Bucks had two chances at the final buzzer, but Henson and Khris Middleton had potential game-winning shots clang off the rim.The Knicks opened a 9-point lead in the second quarter, but could not pull away — mostly because they had such a hard time hitting shots.Anthony struggled mightily at times. On two possessions in overtime, he first failed to get a good shot with the shot clock running down, and was forced to fling the ball toward the basket. On another, he dribbled the ball out of bounds."The game should have been over," Anthony said. "I shot the ball poorly tonight."Chandler landed awkwardly in the second overtime and seemed to injure his left leg. He played on, noticeably limping, and afterward said he just cramped up a little."I apologized to him," Woodson said of Chandler's minutes. "But I needed him."He was injured Nov. 5, the Knicks' fourth game of the season, against the Charlotte Bobcats in a collision with Kemba Walker, who drove the lane and rolled into Chandler.In his absence, the Knicks were 4-16. Chandler's ability to guard the rim, his aggressive style of play and his leadership were sorely missed.Without him, Woodson was forced to mix and match his lineups and had recently relied heavily on Amar'e Stoudemire, who did not make the trip to Milwaukee because of soreness in his surgically repaired knee. Still more controversy could be brewing as Woodson declared Stoudemire "out a while," although Stoudemire tweeted that he was not injured.Raymond Felton remained out with a hamstring injury, Kenyon Martin missed the game with a strained abdominal muscle and Pablo Prigioni sat out with a toe problem.Such a victory — a desperation win over one of the league's bottom feeders — however parsed, is certainly not enough to turn the Knicks' season or quiet the calls for Woodson's job.As the mental mistakes, missed shots and a general lack of sharpness piled up, there was little — aside from the final score — to put a positive spin on.
DENVER — Markieff Morris scored 25 points and Gerald Green added 19, helping the Phoenix Suns rally for a 103-99 win over the Denver Nuggets on Friday night.Goran Dragic contributed 17 points, including two big layups down the stretch, in the Suns' sixth win in seven games. They did most of their work behind the 3-point line, with Green tying a career-high with six. Phoenix was 12 of 34 from long range.Wilson Chandler had 15 points for the Nuggets, who lost their second straight game at Pepsi Center to drop to 7-5 at home on the season. They were a franchise-best 38-3 last season.Ty Lawson was in the lineup despite coming down with a case of the stomach flu on Thursday. He was slightly off his game, shooting 3 of 11 and finishing with 13 points.Trailing by as many as 21 points in the first half, Phoenix tied it 88-all on a layup from Ish Smith with 8:21 remaining. Soon after, the Suns took their first lead since scoring the opening bucket when Dragic dribbled past Denver defenders for a layup.Up 102-99 with less than 10 seconds left, Phoenix allowed Randy Foye to get a good look at a 3-point attempt, but Foye was off target. Morris sealed the win by making a free throw.Dragic and fellow guard Eric Bledsoe entered the game averaging more than 18 points apiece. They combined for 27, with Dragic's biggest buckets coming in the final minutes.The fourth quarter turned into quite a show for Morris and twin Marcus as they combined for 16 points.Jordan Hamilton served his one-game suspension for throwing a punch at Oklahoma City center Steven Adams on Tuesday. Anthony Randolph and Evan Fournier played more minutes in Hamilton's absence.Behind the hot shooting of Chandler, the Nuggets built a 21-point lead in the first half, only to have it whittled to 62-48 at halftime.Nate Robinson continued to give the Nuggets a boost of energy off the bench. Asked before the game if there was anything more Robinson could do, Nuggets coach Brian Shaw quipped: "He can stay off the refs, that's one of the things he can definitely do."That turned out to be quite relevant as Robinson argued with officials over a call at the end of the first quarter and then was given a technical for jawing in the second quarter.At 15-10, the Suns may just be ahead of schedule in terms of turning around a team that had the worst record in the Western Conference last season. First-year coach Jeff Hornacek said before the game that his team is "winning some games against some good teams and that's giving them confidence and helping to speed up the process a little bit."NOTES: Both teams return to the court Saturday night. Phoenix hosts the Dallas Mavericks while the Nuggets play the Clippers in Los Angeles. ... Shaw knows Hornacek a little bit from their NBA playing days. Any tales to tell? "No stories," Shaw chuckled. "(Hornacek) was just always a player that you had to respect and had to honor what he could do out there on the floor." ... Phoenix averaged a league-best 19.7 fast-break points, but were held to 14 on Friday. ... J.J. Hickson had 13 points and 14 rebounds.
Led by center Al Horford's 23 points, the Atlanta Hawks continued their high-scoring ways in a 118-85 victory over the Utah Jazz, extending their winning streak to three games.Horford, a sixth-year veteran from Florida, made 11 of 15 shots from the field in only 23 minutes. He added four rebounds and one assist and did not play in the fourth quarter. Horford is averaging 23.6 points and 9.2 rebounds in the last five games (four wins).In the last four games, the Hawks (15-12) are averaging 115.5 points and have reached 100 in their last 10 games. Atlanta improved to 5-1 at Philips Arena against Western Conference teams.Forward Chris Bosh scored 25 points to lead the Miami Heat to 122-103 victory over the Sacramento Kings at AmericanAirlines Arena, the third time in four games that Bosh has scored more than 20 points.Heat forward LeBron James had 18 points, six rebounds and eight assists. Heat guard Dwyane Wade had 20 points, his fourth straight game with at least that many points.It was also a season high in points for the Heat.Forward DeMarcus Cousins led the Kings with 27 points, eight rebounds and five assists. The Kings lost despite shooting 58 percent from the floor.Point guard Kemba Walker scored a season-high 34 points and the Charlotte Bobcats outscored the Detroit Pistons 41-17 in the fourth quarter for a 116-106 victory at The Palace.Center Al Jefferson scored 15 of his 24 points in the fourth and grabbed 14 rebounds. Shooting guard Gerald Henderson contributed 22 points and eight rebounds for the Bobcats (13-14), who trailed by as much as 20 points.Point guard Brandon Jennings led the Pistons (13-15) with 26 points and forward Josh Smith added 18 points and six rebounds.Forward Evan Turner coaxed in a layup at the overtime buzzer as the Philadelphia 76ers beat the Brooklyn Nets 121-120 to snap a seven-game losing streak.Turner, who collected 29 points and 10 rebounds, took a handoff from center Spencer Hawes at the top of the circle and drove the left side of the lane before firing from close range while surrounded by defenders. The ball danced on the rim before dropping through.Forward Thaddeus Young added 25 points for the Sixers (8-19), who on Monday had been drubbed 130-94 by the Nets in Brooklyn, behind guard Joe Johnson's 37-point explosion.
RALEIGH, N.C. — Markeisha Gatling and Kody Burke each scored 25 points to lead North Carolina State to an 89-79 win over No. 12 Louisiana State Friday night.Gatling shot 11 of 13 from the field and grabbed eight rebounds, six off the offensive glass, to lead the Wolfpack (11-1) to its first win over a ranked opponent since a 76-69 win over No.19 Florida State on Valentine's Day.Burke drilled three straight jumpers to help NC State to a 12-6 lead to start the game, but the Lady Tigers clawed their way back into the game, taking a lead on a Theresa Plaisance 3-pointer with 9:44 left in the game.Gatling's layup with 8:01 left sparked an 11-1 run that put the Wolfpack back in the lead for good.Plaisance finished with 18 points off the bench to lead LSU (9-2). Jeanne Kenney added another 17 points.
COLUMBIA, S.C. — Tiffany Mitchell scored 20 points and No. 10 South Carolina held off a late charge by Winthrop for a 69-61 victory Friday.The Gamecocks (10-1) led by 19 points in the opening half, yet struggled to stay ahead down the stretch against the Eagles (6-3) of the Big South Conference. Erica Williams' jumper with 4:34 left drew Winthrop to 59-55. Mitchell then added a bucket to increase South Carolina's lead.Schaquilla Nunn's put-back brought Winthrop within four points before Asia Dozier's two foul shots and Mitchell's jumper extended the margin to 65-57 with 1:55 to play. Winthrop could not get closer than five points the rest of the way.Dozier had 14 points for the Gamecocks, who rallied after their first loss of the season Wednesday night against No. 14 North Carolina.Dequesha McClanahan and Williams had 19 points each for the Eagles.Mitchell had four 3-pointers, including one that turned into a four-point play to put the Gamecocks up 45-29 with just under 17 minutes left.The Gamecocks played without starting point guard Khadijah Sessions, who injured her left ankle in a 74-66 defeat to No. 14 North Carolina in Myrtle Beach.Sessions was on crutches on the bench. She's also expected to miss South Carolina's game with South Carolina State on Sunday.The Gamecocks started fast and opened a 14-0 lead in less than five minutes behind Ibiam and Dozier.Ibiam had three inside baskets while Dozier, who was 1-of-3 for three points in the North Carolina loss, hit both her first-half three-pointers before the Eagles scored a point.Winthrop's first basket came on McClanahan's 3-pointer with 15:10 left in the period. The Eagles got within 22-10 on Pamela Decheva's 3-pointer before the Gamecocks took off on another surge, this time an 11-4 run that built a 33-14 lead.While the Gamecocks held a strong height advantage, Winthrop did its best to keep up. The Eagles had as many offensive boards as South Carolina in the opening half and had just one more turnover (10) than their opponents.Dozier was held scoreless after her strong start, yet topped the Gamecocks with eight points in the first half.Sessions' replacement, Tiffany Davis, struggled and made only one of four attempts. She also drew the ire of coach Dawn Staley after a late turnover led to an open shot by McClanahan to end the half.South Carolina's defensive struggles continued in the second half when Winthrop tightened up the game with a 17-8 run.
CHAPEL HILL, N.C. — P.J. Hairston's career is over at North Carolina.The school said Friday that it won't seek Hairston's reinstatement from the NCAA after the junior committed several rule violations. Hairston hasn't played all season while the school and NCAA worked to resolve eligibility questions stemming from the use of cars linked to a felon and party promoter earlier this year.Coach Roy Williams said Friday it was "probably the most difficult and saddest thing I've ever gone through as a head coach."The news came two days after the school announced the NCAA had cleared senior Leslie McDonald to return after missing the first nine games due to related violations."We tried to do everything we could possibly do to get both kids back playing," athletic director Bubba Cunningham said. "... We had enough information that we all agreed upon with the university and the NCAA to submit reinstatement for Leslie, but we just didn't have it for P.J."Hairston led the team in scoring last year and is a dangerous outside shooter. He flirted with entering the NBA draft before deciding to return, yet he never made it back on the court. He has practiced as a reserve, including Friday after the announcement, and sat on the bench for home games.Hairston's family said in a statement that he would decide on his plans in coming weeks while wishing the No. 14 Tar Heels continued success."We are displeased with the University of North Carolina's decision not to submit the necessary paperwork to the NCAA requesting to have P.J. reinstated," the family said. "This process has been long, and for to end without having a final decision from the governing body is a shame."Cunningham didn't release specifics, including when asked how much Hairston had received nor whether Hairston had been honest with investigators.Authorities twice cited Hairston during the offseason while driving rental vehicles linked to Haydn Patrick "Fats" Thomas of Durham to raise the possibility of improper benefits violations.McDonald's reinstatement letter sheds light on Hairston's case, saying McDonald occasionally drove two rental vehicles — a 2012 Chevrolet Camaro that Hairston was driving when he was cited for speeding in May and a 2013 Mercedes 350 — tied to Thomas as well as a 2008 Audi A4 "associated" with Thomas.The letter states McDonald shared access to the vehicles with another UNC student-athlete whose name is redacted, as well as Hairston's friend — Elizabeth City State player Miykael Faulcon, who missed the first nine games before returning Thursday — and non-athletes.According to the letter, the unnamed player was charged with using the vehicles 75 percent of the time he and McDonald had possession of them.The school has since adjusted the amount of McDonald's improper benefits that he's required to repay to charity, increasing it by about $100 to $1,883.46. The value for McDonald's end of using the shared vehicles and associated unpaid parking tickets is $1,157.50, putting the unnamed player's usage on that part alone to at least $3,472.50.Bill Thomas, a Durham-based attorney for Fats Thomas, said his client met with school officials Dec. 10 for "an in-depth interview ... to clear up any misconception about the relationship between Haydn Thomas and Mr. Hairston." Bill Thomas said he invited NCAA officials "but they elected not to participate."Fats Thomas said Friday night he told UNC officials that Faulcon had access to the vehicles and the players apparently shared them among themselves. He said he believed the matter "was blown way out of proportion" and that he was disappointed by the school's decision."Like I told UNC's lawyers, I don't have a relationship with P.J. Hairston," he said. "I do have a relationship with his friend, Miykael Faulcon, who had access to those vehicles. Boys will be boys and they hang out together, so I don't know."Hairston was first cited for speeding in May while driving the Camaro rented under the name of a woman sharing the Thomas' home address. Less than a month later, Hairston was arrested in Durham along with Faulcon and another passenger, and charged with misdemeanor marijuana possession while driving a 2013 GMC Yukon rented under Thomas' name.Hairston's drug charge was dismissed in July after he completed a drug assessment program. But nine days later, authorities cited Hairston for driving 93 mph in a 65 mph zone along Interstate 85 in Salisbury while driving a 2008 Acura owned by a friend, Randi Lee Furr.Williams suspended Hairston indefinitely that day before letting him practice with the team in preseason as the "first step toward permanently earning his place back on the roster."The No. 14 Tar Heels beat highly ranked Michigan State, Kentucky and Louisville without Hairston and McDonald. McDonald scored 15 points with four 3-pointers in his return Wednesday, an 86-83 loss to Texas.
OAKLAND, Calif. — With or without its star trio, the San Antonio Spurs still play with a championship pedigree.Tiago Splitter tipped in a rebound with 2.1 seconds left, lifting the short-handed Spurs to a 104-102 victory over the Golden State Warriors on Thursday night.San Antonio (21-5) rested Tim Duncan and Manu Ginobili, and Tony Parker sat out for the second straight game with a bruised right shin. None of it mattered."They did play well in the absence of our players, but it happens a lot in this league when players are hurt and other players want to prove something," Spurs coach Gregg Popovich said. "They want to show the coach they should be getting more minutes and that the coach doesn't know what the heck he's talking about."The Spurs used big nights from Marco Belinelli, Kawhi Leonard and Patty Mills to hand the Warriors (14-13) another devastating defeat in a rematch of last season's Western Conference semifinals.The Warriors led by 14 points in the second quarter, fell behind by nine in the third but were still in position to win against San Antonio's second-stringers in the closing moments.Stephen Curry hit a tying 3-pointer to cap Golden State's comeback. But after two misses by teammates, Splitter was wide open under the rim to tap in the winning score.Belinelli scored a career-high 28 points against his former team, Leonard had 21 points and 10 rebounds and Mills added 20 points in one of San Antonio's most impressive wins this season. It also was a season high in points for Leonard and Mills."Every guy stepped up," Belinelli said.David Lee had 32 points and 13 rebounds in Golden State's sloppy performance. Curry scored 30 points and tied his career high with 15 assists, and Andrew Bogut collected 18 rebounds.The Warriors allowed a season-high 31 points off 24 turnovers. San Antonio gave up 19 points on 19 turnovers."We can't lose that game. Period," Bogut said.The Warriors started the final quarter on a 12-4 run, tying the game on Klay Thompson's 3-pointer with 8:37 remaining. Curry gave Golden State the lead moments later with another from long range.San Antonio was clinging to a 102-99 lead when Curry stepped up once again. Andre Iguodala corralled Curry's missed jumper, and handed it back to him at the top of the arc. Curry connected from there for the tying basket with 28.7 seconds left.In a wild scrum on San Antonio's final possession, Belinelli missed a jumper and then Diaw's tip bounced out. Splitter was unguarded in front of the rim, tipping the ball in for the go-ahead basket."It was a loose ball. Me and Boris didn't know who was going to get it. I was lucky to be there at the perfect moment," Splitter said.Warriors coach Mark Jackson called timeout, but his team got little out of the resulting play. Iguodala inbounded on the side to Curry, he was immediately doubled teamed and heaved a one-handed shot that was never close."We got out of character when we established our lead," Jackson said. "And we gave them life."San Antonio showed off its depth and winning system in its first visit to Oracle Arena since eliminating the Warriors in Game 6 of the conference semifinals last season.After the Warriors went ahead by 14 in the second quarter, Danny Green and Leonard led the Spurs back. The pair powered a 19-4 run that put San Antonio up 39-38 and left most of the announced crowd of 19,596 — the 50th straight sellout for the Warriors — stunned and silent.The Spurs held a 53-51 halftime lead, and they didn't relent after the break. Belinelli scored 17 points in the third quarter to help San Antonio to an 82-74 lead before Golden State nearly rallied in the fourth."They're a team that has won championships and knows how to win," Lee said. "Regardless of who's on the floor, they have a proven system."NOTES: It was the first time in NBA history that three Australians started in the same game: Bogut for the Warriors, and Mills and Aron Baynes for San Antonio. ... San Antonio was 1-2 last season when Duncan, Ginobili and Parker all didn't play, including a 116-106 loss at Golden State on April 15. ... San Antonio makes its only other visit to Golden State on March 22.
Rodney Hood was 10 in 2003 when Syracuse, led by a freshman named Carmelo Anthony , beat Kansas for the national title.Hood, a sophomore forward, thought about this while sitting in the Knicks' locker room Thursday night, across from Jabari Parker, whose 23 points, 10 rebounds and 5 assists led Duke past U.C.L.A., 80-63, at Madison Square Garden.It was Parker's third game here in two months. He is averaging 23 points and 9 rebounds at the Garden, a shade above his season average.Beyond the fact that Parker was sitting a few feet from Anthony's locker, Hood delighted in pointing out the similarities."I watched Carmelo that whole year," Hood said. "It's a great comparison."Duke, ranked No. 8, has a roster loaded with McDonald's all-Americans, but they all seem happy deferring to Parker, a 6-foot-8 phenom. Before the game, Hood said, they confronted Parker about scoring more."I think at the beginning of the season he thought scoring was a problem," Hood said. "He thought we cared that he scored the ball all the time. We don't care."Even with the stands littered with dozens of representatives of N.B.A. teams, perhaps counting the seconds until the draft lottery, Parker was not bowed by the pressure. In fact, he said, that has never been a problem."You put too much pressure on yourself, and the outcome will be uptight," Parker said. "You wouldn't have fun. The main point I try to bring with myself is just to have fun with the game. Try to do everything.""He has to learn how to use all that even better," Krzyzewski said. "But he's not afraid of the moment. He embraces the moment. He's been terrific."Parker scored 6 of Duke's first 8 points Thursday, helping the Blue Devils jump out to an 18-8 lead. But U.C.L.A. (9-2), playing its first game east of the Mississippi River under Coach Steve Alford, showed its fight midway through, stirred by inspired play from Kyle Anderson and Jordan Adams.A 3-pointer by Bryce Alford, the coach's son, gave U.C.L.A. a 24-23 lead. The Bruins hit 5 of their first 8 from 3-point range, while Duke went cold, missing 11 of its first 16 attempts from beyond the arc. A couple of transition baskets brought the Blue Devils back even, 37-37, at halftime.Duke (9-2) turned up its defensive pressure and hit 8 of its first 13 shots in the second, including two 3-pointers by Hood, to go ahead, 60-49.The Bruins lurched back, with back-to-back buckets by Anderson to trim Duke's lead to 8 with six minutes remaining. Anderson averages 13.8 points, 8.7 rebounds and 6.7 assists per game, and at 6-foot-9, playing point guard, he was a matchup nightmare for Duke.Anderson scored 8 of his 15 points late in the second half (he also added 10 rebounds and 7 assists). His play kept U.C.L.A. reasonably close, until a 3-pointer by Rasheed Sulaimon with 1 minute 56 seconds remaining pushed Duke's lead back up to 11.After the game, Parker did not shake off the comparisons to Anthony."He mastered the fundamentals," Parker said. "He's always worked on his craft. That's a person I'll be looking up to. That's a great compliment."Parker found an echo chamber in the U.C.L.A. coach. "There's a lot of Melo in him," Alford said. "He's a very, very talented, gifted player. You don't see a lot that's this polished 10, 11 games into their freshman year."ARIZONA 69, SOUTHERN 43 Aaron Gordon scored 21 points, Nick Johnson added 17 and Arizona (12-0) opened its second week at No. 1 with a rout at home. (AP)DAYTON 96, IONA 84 Dyshawn Pierre scored 22 points as Dayton (9-2) handled visiting Iona. A. J. English had a career-high 30 points for Iona (5-4). (AP)LA SALLE 80, WAGNER 54 Jerrell Wright scored a game-high 17 points as La Salle (6-5) ran away from Wagner (5-7) in Philadelphia. (AP)ST. FRANCIS 65, LAFAYETTE 62 Aleksandar Isailovic banked in a 3-pointer from the left wing with 0.7 of a second remaining to lift St. Francis (7-5) of Brooklyn over visiting Lafayette. (AP)DUKE 80, ALBANY 51 Haley Peters scored 17 points to help No. 2 Duke beat Albany in Durham, N.C. Chelsea Gray and Richa Jackson had 12 points apiece for the Blue Devils (11-1). (AP)IN OTHER GAMES Tiffany Bias made four consecutive free throws in the final 29 seconds, helping No. 13 Oklahoma State (9-0) hold on for a 63-57 win over Michigan State in the Puerto Rico Classic. ... Brittney Sykes had 20 points to lead No. 23 Syracuse past Niagara, 80-44. (AP)
LONG BEACH, Calif. — Natasha Howard scored 16 points and pulled down 15 rebounds to lead the No. 24 Florida State women over Long Beach State 72-57 Saturday.The Seminoles (11-1) got 14 points apiece from Yashira Delgado and Morgan Jones as the team shot over 48 percent from the floor.Long Beach was led by Alex Sanchez' 21 points, while Hallie Meneses chipped in with 15 points. The 49ers (7-5) were held to just 27 percent shooting on the evening, including just 7 of 31 (23 percent) from beyond the arc.Long Beach State was down by just one with 11:34 left in the first half after a pair of free throws by Meneses, but a 10-0 run by Florida State — including a pair of jumpers by Delgado — helped the Seminoles race out to a 14-point advantage at the intermission.
NEW YORK — Lenzelle Smith Jr. scored seven of his nine points in the final 33 seconds and No. 3 Ohio State rallied from an eight-point deficit with 1:54 to play to beat Notre Dame 64-61 on Saturday night in the BlackRock Gotham Classic at Madison Square Garden.The Buckeyes (12-0), who had a woeful second half from the field, closed the game on a 14-3 run and Smith was the key to the closing spurt.Jerian Grant hit a 3-pointer as the shot clock was expiring to give the Fighting Irish (8-4) a seemingly comfortable 58-50 lead with 1:54 to play.But the Buckeyes turned up the defensive intensity and they converted consecutive steals into a 58-56 deficit with 40 seconds to go.Demetrius Jackson made two free throws for Notre Dame a second later.Smith was fouled taking a 3-pointer and he made all three free throws to bring Ohio State within 60-59 with 32 seconds left.Steve Vasturia, who was in the game because Eric Atkins had fouled out, missed the front end of a 1-and-1 with 31 seconds left, his first free throw attempt of the season.Smith scored down low on a nice pass by Aaron Craft to give the Buckeyes a 61-60 lead with 16 seconds to go. After a Notre Dame turnover, Smith made two free throws for a 63-60 lead with 9.8 seconds left.Grant made one free throw with 6.7 seconds left and Craft made one free throw with 3.3 seconds left.LaQuinton Ross had 16 points and 11 rebounds for Ohio State while Amir Williams had 13 points and Shannon Scott and Craft both added 10.Grant had 18 points for Notre Dame while Garrick Sherman had 14 and Pat Connaughton 13.The Buckeyes shot 34.5 percent in the second half (10 of 29, including missing all nine 3-point attempts). They went 9:10 without a field goal in the second half, and that's when Notre Dame opened a 52-44 lead with 5:33 to play.Williams dunked on the next possession to end Ohio State's long drought.Notre Dame opened the second half on a 9-2 run that tied the game at 35. The run was started by a 3-pointer by Atkins, the Fighting Irish's first in seven attempts from beyond the arc.
LAWRENCE, Kan. — Tarik Black came off the bench to score 17 points, Joel Embiid also had 17 and No. 18 Kansas bludgeoned Georgetown 86-64 on Saturday in the Hoyas' first visit to Allen Fieldhouse.Andrew Wiggins added 12 points and Naadir Tharpe had 10 for the Jayhawks (8-3), who proved once more why the Phog is such a hostile venue. Kansas pushed its non-conference home winning streak to 67 games by pounding one of the nation's premier programs.The Hoyas (7-3) tried to use the kind of muscle that has suited them so well in the rough-and-tumble Big East, but all they did was get into debilitating foul trouble.Markel Starks scored 19 points and D'Vauntes Smith-Rivera had 12 to lead the Hoyas, but they were forced to carry the burden almost entirely by themselves. Bruising big man Josh Smith, who had been averaging 14.1 points, scored just five before fouling out.Moses Ayegba and Nate Lubick also fouled out as Kansas asserted its dominance in the post.The game was so physical that Jayhawks forward Perry Ellis left early in the second half after taking an elbow to the back of his head. Ellis tried to stay in the game but missed a free throw so badly that he took himself out. He never returned from the locker room.Just as every other team has done this season, Georgetown tried to combat the Jayhawks' length and athleticism by employing a zone defense in the first half. The only problem was the Hoyas were so mired in foul trouble that they didn't have anybody to occupy the inside.Black, who began the season as a starter, took advantage by piling up 10 points — six on free throws — in just 8 minutes. Embiid also had nine first-half points.Kansas built its 44-34 lead thanks in part to a 14-3 run fueled by its defense. Georgetown at one point went more than 10½ minutes without a field goal, missing five straight attempts, turning the ball over and even getting hit with a shot-clock violation.Ayegba and Lubick had three fouls each by halftime, and three other players who spent time guarding the paint had picked up two fouls. That included Smith, who picked up his third in the opening minute of the second half and had to spend long stretches on the bench.Embiid and Black took advantage of his absence.When the Jayhawks' two post players weren't scoring on an array of layups and dunks, they were getting hacked. Embiid wound up 9 of 12 from the free throw line, while Black was 7 of 9.Georgetown tried to get back into the game midway through the second half, trimming its deficit to 59-47 on Jabil Trawick's basket. But frustration boiled over for the Hoyas when Trawick clobbered Wiggins on the way to the basket, and the teams nearly came to blows.Wiggins responded by knocking down a 3-pointer in Trawick's face from the wing, and in a matter of minutes, the Jayhawks had built a comfortable lead. Embiid put an exclamation mark on it when he followed up a miss by Wiggins with a thunderous jam that left the entire goal shaking.
LEXINGTON, Ky. — Julius Randle scored a career-high 29 points and led a second-half rally that pushed No. 19 Kentucky past stubborn Belmont 93-80 on Saturday.A week after a season-worst performance in a loss at North Carolina, the 6-foot-9 freshman forward was 8 of 10 from the field and grabbed 10 rebounds. More importantly, he asserted himself late in the first half and throughout the second for the Wildcats (9-3), who found themselves in a battle against the team that upset the Tar Heels earlier this season.Kentucky trailed until the 16:21 mark of the second half and constantly had to fight off challenges from the Bruins (8-5).Aaron Harrison added 23 points for the Wildcats while 7-footer Willie Cauley-Stein had 16 points, seven rebounds and two blocks.The Wildcats finished 32 of 58 from the field (55 percent), outrebounded the Bruins 42-25 and made 26 of 36 free throws.Craig Bradshaw had 22 points while Drew Windler added 21 on five 3-pointers for the Bruins, who shot 47 percent from the field and were 11 of 30 from behind the arc but still lost their third straight and fourth in five.Kentucky's week spent working on defense, free throw shooting and body language yielded some results as the Wildcats came up with timely stops and rebounds in the second half against upset-minded Belmont. While better free throw shooting was also critical in the outcome, their improved engagement made the biggest difference and helped them outscore the Bruins 52-34 in the paint.Kentucky certainly needed all those areas to overcome and withstand Belmont.The Bruins weren't awed by playing before 24,224 at Rupp Arena. They were coming off Tuesday night's 28-point loss at Denver that marked the low point since that signature win over the Tar Heels.Belmont played the recent losing stretch without injured point guard Reece Chamberlain, whose return to the starting lineup restored normalcy and something of a swagger as the Bruins led 43-41 at halftime.Windler set the tone with consecutive 3-pointers to open the game and had four of the Bruins' seven long-range baskets in the half. Caleb Chowbay added two 3s and Chamberlain had one for Belmont, which created 18 chances thanks to quick ball movement that Kentucky initially struggled to keep up with.The strategy resulted in an 11-point lead over the Wildcats, who were cold for a stretch before clawing back into the game with help from the bench. Alex Poythress, Jarrod Polson and Dominique Hawkins combined for 12 points overall but were more helpful in getting the ball to Randle and Cauley-Stein, whose seven combined points provided a 41-41 tie with 25 seconds left in the half before Belmont re-took the lead on Windler's free throws.Harrison and Randle led Kentucky's comeback with 19 combined points in the first 10 minutes of the half for a 66-57 lead.
MIAMI — Russ Smith scored 18 points, Wayne Blackshear added 13 and No. 6 Louisville won its sixth straight, easing past FIU 85-56 on Saturday night.Smith had 12 in the first half for the Cardinals (11-1), who never trailed and were rarely threatened, outside of a couple brief early stretches where the game was tight.Tymell Murphy scored 16 points and former Louisville player Rakeen Buckles added 13 for FIU (8-5), which was coached last season by Richard Pitino, the son of Louisville coach Rick Pitino.Rick Pitino decided to honor the contract and play FIU, offering to do so in Miami even after his son left the Panthers to take over at Minnesota after last season. When Richard Pitino left FIU, Louisville had the option of canceling the series."But they wanted to give us the game and we're very appreciative," FIU director of sports and entertainment Pete Garcia said.There were plenty of potential pratfalls that could have grabbed at Louisville in this one.First, it absolutely was the biggest game of FIU's season, considering the Panthers are ineligible for any postseason appearance because of academic sanctions.The Cardinals had to avoid slipping into vacation mode, which likely wasn't easy since they checked into an upscale Miami Beach resort on Wednesday and aren't leaving until Monday.Christmas is looming and when Louisville gets past that, the rivalry game against Kentucky awaits on Dec. 28.There was no looking ahead, not to the holiday and not to Kentucky, either. From the outset, Louisville was all business.Louisville opened the game on a 10-3 run, setting a tone where the Cardinals would only have to flex their muscle in short spurts to assert control. FIU scored the next six points, but the next Louisville run restored order in a hurry.Montrezl Harrell, who finished with 10 points, had an alley-oop that left the basket shaking for a full 15 seconds afterward, a play that started a 12-0 run by the Cardinals and turned a 10-9 edge into a 22-9 gap.FIU settled down and back-to-back 3-pointers by Buckles and Dennis Mavin got the Panthers within 30-25 late in the half. But the Cardinals had one last first-half flurry in them, ripping off the last nine points and capping that spurt with another alley-oop dunk by Harrell with just over a second remaining.That sent Louisville into the locker room with a 39-25 lead, and there was no doubt from there.
Led by center Al Horford's 23 points, the Atlanta Hawks continued their high-scoring ways in a victory over the Utah Jazz, extending their winning streak to three games.Horford, a sixth-year veteran from Florida, made 11 of 15 shots from the field in only 23 minutes. He added four rebounds and one assist and did not play in the fourth quarter. Horford is averaging 23.6 points and 9.2 rebounds in the last five games (four wins).In the last four games, the Hawks (15-12) are averaging 115.5 points and have reached 100 in their last 10 games. Atlanta improved to 5-1 at Philips Arena against Western Conference teams.Forward Chris Bosh scored 25 points to lead the Miami Heat to victory over the Sacramento Kings at AmericanAirlines Arena, the third time in four games that Bosh has scored more than 20 points.Heat forward LeBron James had 18 points, six rebounds and eight assists. Heat guard Dwyane Wade had 20 points, his fourth straight game with at least that many points.Forward DeMarcus Cousins led the Kings with 27 points, eight rebounds and five assists. The Kings lost despite shooting 58 percent from the floor.Point guard Kemba Walker scored a season-high 34 points and the Charlotte Bobcats outscored the Detroit Pistons 41-17 in the fourth quarter for a victory at The Palace.Center Al Jefferson scored 15 of his 24 points in the fourth and grabbed 14 rebounds. Shooting guard Gerald Henderson contributed 22 points and eight rebounds for the Bobcats (13-14), who trailed by as much as 20 points.Point guard Brandon Jennings led the Pistons (13-15) with 26 points while forward Josh Smith added 18 points and six rebounds.Forward Evan Turner coaxed in a layup at the overtime buzzer as the Philadelphia 76ers beat the Brooklyn Nets to snap a seven-game losing streak.Turner, who collected 29 points and 10 rebounds, took a handoff from center Spencer Hawes at the top of the circle and drove the left side of the lane before firing from close range while surrounded by defenders. The ball danced on the rim before dropping through.Forward Thaddeus Young added 25 points for the Sixers (8-19), who on Monday had been drubbed 130-94 by the Nets in Brooklyn, behind guard Joe Johnson's 37-point explosion.All-Star guard Kyrie Irving fired in a game-high 39 points in the Cleveland Cavaliers' overtime victory over the Milwaukee Bucks at Quicken Loans Arena.Irving, who has been sick the last two days, had 28 points in the second half and extra period.The Cavs (10-15) are now 3-0 in overtime this season. They outscored the Bucks in overtime 18-15. Guard Jarrett Jack came up big for the Cavaliers with 17 points and five assists.Forward Paul George had 24 points and nine rebounds to help the Indiana Pacers snap a two-game losing streak with a victory over the Houston Rockets.Guard Lance Stephenson had 16 points, six rebounds and six assists and forward Luis Scola added 13 points and six rebounds for the Pacers, who outscored the Rockets 31-20 in the third quarter to take control of the game.Pacers forward Danny Granger played for the first time this season after missing the first 25 games with a strained left calf. He finished with five points, two rebounds and two assists in 22 minutes.Toronto guard DeMar DeRozan knocked down an off-balance jumper in overtime that proved the difference in the Raptors' victory over the Dallas Mavericks at American Airlines Center.The Raptors, down by as many as 19 points in the first half, improved to 10-14 with their third consecutive road win. Toronto won for only the fourth time ever in Dallas.DeRozan finished with 15 points and was one of six Raptors with at least 14. Point guard Kyle Lowry led Toronto with 20 points while center Jonas Valanciunas added 18 points and 13 rebounds.Forward Markieff Morris scored 25 points, guard Gerald Green added 19 points and the Phoenix Suns rallied from a 17-point deficit in the third quarter to beat the Denver Nuggets.Guard Goran Dragic had 17 points and forward Marcus Morris added 14 for the Suns who have won six of their last seven. Center J.J. Hickson had 13 points and 13 rebounds for the Nuggets who have dropped two straight and three of their last four.Guard Nick Young came off the bench to score 25 points, guiding the Los Angeles Lakers to victory before a sellout crowd of 18,997 at the Staples Center.Young connected on 9 of 14 from the floor, including 4 of 6 behind the arc, as the Lakers prevailed in their first outing without guard Kobe Bryant, who is out at least six weeks with a fractured knee.Young, guards Xavier Henry and Jodie Meeks and center Pau Gasol picked up the slack, as the Lakers (13-13) claimed their third victory in four games. Gasol just missed recording a triple-double, finishing with 21 points, 13 rebounds and eight assists. Henry also scored 21, while Meeks added 17.
LONG BEACH, Calif. — Natasha Howard scored 20 points and had eight rebounds to lead No. 24 Florida State to a 73-66 win over Pacific in the Long Beach Classic on Friday night.Morgan Jones and Yashira Delgado contributed 11 points apiece for Florida State (10-1), which had hold off Pacific late in the second half by hitting 6 of 8 from the foul line in the closing minutes to preserve the win.Pacific (4-5) trailed the entire game but kept the score close, narrowing the gap to four points on a 3-pointer by Madison Parrish to make it 67-63 with 1:37 left. But the Tigers couldn't overtake Florida State down the stretch.Kendall Kenyon led Pacific with 24 points and 11 rebounds, while KiKi Moore added 14 points and Parrish had 10.Florida State went 23 of 59 from the field and was just 1 of 11 from 3-point range.
PHILADELPHIA — The Nets entered the season talking up their collective size as one of their greatest strengths. But as the season continues, the team keeps shrinking in the face of even the smallest challenges.The Philadelphia 76ers became the latest team to cut the Nets down to size, sending them to a 121-120 overtime defeat on Friday night at Wells Fargo Center. The 76ers stanched a seven-game losing streak when Evan Turner finished a driving layup from the baseline with time running out. The ball bounced around before slipping through the net, delighting the smallish crowd.The Nets, meanwhile, were dejected, lacking answers to the hard questions they posed to themselves. The players wondered aloud about their effort. They doubted their own readiness to play. It was a stark contrast to the puffed-up championship ambitions that colored their preseason rhetoric."It's not like we're walking giants," said Paul Pierce, whose 3-pointer with 16.9 seconds left had given the Nets a one-point lead. "We're bottom feeders right now, just like Philadelphia. We've got to be up for everybody."The Nets could have used an easy week, a rare thing in this losing season, and with three games against two subpar teams, it had seemed cautiously possible. But sandwiching two games against the 76ers (8-19) around a home game against the Washington Wizards (11-13), the Nets went only 1-2 and fell to a 9-17 record over all. Alan Anderson, who led the Nets with 26 points, said the Nets needed to treat every opponent like the Miami Heat.The Nets had crushed the 76ers by 36 points on Monday, but Friday's game possessed a different character. The Nets seemed halfhearted and hurt themselves in myriad ways. They were outrebounded, 49-36. They let the 76ers score 66 points in the paint, while producing just 30 of their own. They went only 21 for 30 from the free-throw line."I don't think anybody expected this," said Deron Williams, who had 17 points and 14 assists. "I don't think anybody could imagine us having the record we have right now, talking about the things we're having to talk about every game."Two things the Nets have talked about after almost every loss have been protecting the paint and grabbing rebounds. They did neither Friday, which forced a tense overtime period against a far inferior team.Williams hit a long jumper with 1 minute 39 seconds left in overtime to cut the Sixers' lead to two. After a series of 76ers misses, Williams then fed Pierce the go-ahead 3-pointer. It appeared Pierce had hit his most important shot in his new Nets uniform.But with 6.3 seconds left, Turner circled around, drove along the baseline to the left of the basket and flipped up a shot at the rim. The ball bobbled tantalizingly up and down before finally slipping through the hoop."We score 120 points and lose," Coach Jason Kidd said. "We have to take some pride on the defensive side."Extending a season-long trend, the Nets were short-handed Friday night. Besides the long-term injuries to the reserves Andrei Kirilenko and Jason Terry, the Nets were also without Joe Johnson, who missed the game because of personal reasons, and Kevin Garnett, who had the night off. The Nets used their 12th different starting lineup of the season. (Last season, they used just 13.)Philadelphia, meanwhile, welcomed Michael Carter-Williams, a dynamic rookie, back to its lineup, and he had 15 points and 10 assists. He missed the 76ers' past 11 games because of a bacterial skin infection on his right knee.Before sinking the Nets late, Turner heated up early, scoring 18 points on 9-for-11 shooting through the first two quarters to shepherd Philadelphia to a 60-57 halftime lead.The Nets did have a chance to win in regulation. With 5.5 seconds remaining and the score tied, 108-108, Williams took a contested jumper at the buzzer that clanged off the side of the rim."We're giving effort for 20 seconds, and we need to give it for 24," Williams said. "We need to give it for 48 minutes."The game, and the week, felt like a missed chance. The Nets' road gets harder, as they play the Indiana Pacers on Monday night, the Chicago Bulls on Christmas Day, then finish a three-game homestand Friday against the downtrodden Milwaukee Bucks. After that, they will embark on a difficult road trip featuring games against the Pacers, the San Antonio Spurs and the Oklahoma City Thunder.
MILTON, Ga. — A referee's whistle halted play during a recent game at Milton High, a school situated among horse farms in an affluent area north of Atlanta. A foul had been called, leaving the culprit's coach mystified.Zach Hodskins, a senior guard, was hand-checking with both hands, the official explained."Hey," Hodskins said, "I don't even have two hands."Born without a left hand and forearm, Hodskins was thought to have a better chance to become president of the United States, as a relative imagined when he was an infant, than to play basketball for a college powerhouse. Yet the University of Florida, which won back-to-back national titles in the past decade and reached the N.C.A.A. tournament's Round of 8 the past three years, recently guaranteed him a roster spot for next season by designating him a preferred walk-on.After people watch Hodskins sink 3-point shots, lunge for loose balls and unleash his unusual brand of play, what they notice almost as much as his missing hand is the chip on his shoulder. He has converted years of slights, perceived and real, into a continual source of energy that compels him to set lofty goals.At nearly 6 feet 4 inches, Hodskins is a strong passer with extraordinary range. "He doesn't have 3-point range; it's in-the-gym range," Kramer said. "Cross halfcourt, he's in range after a dribble or two."Hodskins, who averaged 11 points a game last season and is averaging 6 points and 2.3 assists per game this season, would be assured significant playing time, perhaps even a starting role, at a lower-level college. But his nature made him accept the Gators."Zach wants the biggest challenge," his father, Bob, said. "He has such an extreme desire to prove himself at the highest level he can."Bob and Stephanie Hodskins did not know that Zach would be born without half a limb. Early on, they pledged to rear him as they did his two older sisters — not that he would have tolerated any coddling."If you ever tried to help him up," Bob Hodskins said, "he wouldn't have wanted that."A daredevil from the beginning, Zach would climb out of his crib with a loud thud, alarming his parents.Since then, he has dabbled in various sports, from skimboarding to triathlon.Stephanie Hodskins yielded to one assumed limitation and bought Zach slip-on shoes to spare him laces. Yet he gravitated to shoes with laces, tying them at school as a sort of performance art on request.When Hodskins locked in on basketball, his footwear of choice became high-top sneakers. He never hid an ambition to play in college, saying recently, "I never doubted myself, even though a lot of people did." To them, he said, "Just watch."For every pickup-game captain who did not choose him and every Amateur Athletic Union program that did not invite him, Hodskins stockpiled motivation.Concern that he was pushing himself too hard tempered his parents' pride. Bob Hodskins would tape the calloused fingers on Zach's right hand when they bled from marathon solo workouts."Dial it back," his father would tell him. "You don't have to prove yourself every day."Zach would hear none of it. "I love my competitiveness," he said. "It got me to where I am today."In middle school, he went out for cross-country, primarily as conditioning for basketball. He promptly placed second in a meet that left him so exhausted his parents feared for his health. Zach's explanation: "Allowing anyone to beat me was unacceptable."His parents removed him from the team. "We tried to tell him, 'You can't be perfect,' " Bob Hodskins said. "He expects to be so."The family found two A.A.U. coaches who helped Hodskins develop a repertory of moves, like a crossover dribble between the legs, to minimize the effect of his disability. Fine-tuning took place at gyms, playgrounds and, most often, the Hodskinses' driveway. The continual thumping of the ball planted a nagging question: Would the investment pay off?Zach's parents never imagined how much it would. A year ago, a scouting service posted a one-minute clip of Hodskins's highlights on YouTube that has nearly four million views.
STANFORD, Calif. — Bashaara Graves tried to keep Chiney Ogwumike off the boards on both ends of the court any way she could to no avail.For a Tennessee team so well accustomed to owning the rebounding advantage against opponents, Ogwumike's dominance on the glass made all the difference in the third-ranked Lady Vols' 76-70 loss to sixth-ranked Stanford on Saturday for Tennessee's first defeat.Ogwumike had 32 points, a season-best 20 rebounds — 11 on the offensive end — and three blocks as Stanford held off a late Tennessee rally."Everything I tried to do, I tried to box her out, it just didn't work," Graves said. "There's no way she should have had that many offensive rebounds."Stanford coach Tara VanDerveer had one simple message for her players before tipoff that rung true: "If we rebound, we win."Amber Orrange scored on a left-handed layin and was fouled with 25.8 seconds left and converted the free throw, helping seal the win.Andraya Carter's baseline 3-pointer with 1:02 remaining cut the Cardinal's lead to 70-68 but Stanford kept possession with 36 seconds to go on a jump ball in a big break, and Orrange came through.Stanford (10-1) has its first three-game winning streak in the rivalry between perennial national powers."It's going to be a great teaching tape for us when we get back from break," Tennessee coach Holly Warlick said.Ariel Massengale scored 17 points and Meighan Simmons 15 to lead the Lady Vols (10-1), who were hurt 35.8 percent shooting.Tennessee has lost its last four matchups at Maples Pavilion since its last win on Stanford's home floor on Dec. 4, 2005. The Lady Vols have lost 13 straight road games against Top 10 teams dating back to 2008.The Cardinal held a 24-19 rebounding advantage in the first half and wound up with a 43-40 edge on the boards — the first time all season Tennessee has lost in rebounding. The Lady Vols had a 52.1 to 36.3 mismatch on the boards entering the game."We're a very strong rebounding team but we can't allow somebody to dominate on the boards like we did Chiney," Warlick said.While Ogwumike did her part with a fourth 30-point game of the season, she had plenty of support on both ends with teammates crashing the boards and hustling for loose balls — just the kind of balance and energy VanDerveer has been calling for from her young team."We didn't bring that Tennessee pressure we know we're capable of playing," Massengale said. "We knew we would have to disrupt them on the offensive end for us to win this game. We did that in spurts but not for 40 minutes."Ogwumike had 18 points and 11 rebounds by halftime and shot 15 for 25 overall for outsized Stanford, which needed a big second half to hold on for its ninth straight victory."I have a great support system," she said. "It's just being aggressive. It's those little things."After Graves scored to cut the Cardinal's lead to 38-33 with 18:10 remaining, Orrange and Thompson hit consecutive 3-pointers for Stanford.But Massengale then scored five straight points to keep Tennessee close.Ogwumike drove the lane for easy layins, converted athletic putbacks or plain out-jumped Tennessee to catch high lob passes into the paint before pivoting around to score."This game really boiled down to we had Chiney," VanDerveer said. "Chiney had a monster game."The Cardinal, who haven't lost since a 76-57 defeat at No. 1 Connecticut on Nov. 11, have won five of the last eighth meetings and four of five.Tennessee, facing just its second ranked team of the season, missed a chance for its first win over a top-10 opponent since beating No. 10 Georgia in the Lady Vols' SEC home opener last Jan. 6.Stanford snapped Tennessee's five-game winning streak here last Nov. 20, 2012, 97-80 loss for the fifth-most points allowed in program history.Tennessee began the game 6 for 23 and never recovered despite making things interesting down the stretch with Simmons taking charge."I thought we got good looks," Warlick said. "You've got to make free throws, layups and free throws. If you don't make those you're not going to win games. At crucial times we didn't make free throws, and at crucial times we gave up the 3-point shot. Little things for us got magnified today."After Tennessee jumped to a quick 4-0 lead, Stanford then scored 13 unanswered points for a 13-4 lead that forced a Lady Vols timeout at the 14:54 mark of the opening half. Tennessee missed seven straight shots over a nearly 3 1/2-minute stretch."We don't give up," Warlick said. "We could have really folded when we got down by 12. For that I'm extremely proud of them."
CHAPEL HILL, N.C. — Marcus Paige scored 11 of his 17 points in overtime to help No. 14 North Carolina hold off Davidson 97-85 on Saturday.Paige missed his first six shots and didn't score until the 8:17 mark of the second half, but took over late to help the Tar Heels (8-3) bounce back from Wednesday's loss to Texas and avoid another surprising home defeat.J.P. Tokoto posted career-highs of 22 points and 11 rebounds to lead North Carolina, which needed two free throws from Paige with 29.3 seconds left to force the extra session. The Tar Heels dominated the extra period, with Paige scoring in the lane to open the overtime and hitting his only 3-pointer of the game moments later to put UNC in control.Brian Sullivan had career-highs of 33 points and seven 3-pointers for the Wildcats (4-8), who shot just 2-for-10 in overtime to fade late.Sullivan had a chance to win it in regulation after Paige's tying free throws but missed a contested 3 over Nate Britt just before the horn. The Tar Heels took over from there, with Paige assisting on Britt's jumper early in the overtime and hitting two free throws before knocking down the 3 that pushed UNC to an 88-80 lead.The Tar Heels, who rank as one of the nation's worst free-throw shooting teams, then secured the win with an unusually steady performance at the line. North Carolina missed 12 free throws in regulation but went 11-for-12 in overtime to stay in control.The game followed an eventful week for the Tar Heels, starting with last weekend's tough-it-out win against then-No. 11 Kentucky. Four days later, the NCAA cleared senior Leslie McDonald — who had missed the first nine games due to NCAA eligibility concerns — hours before tipoff of an 86-83 home loss to Texas in a performance that left coach Roy Williams so angry that he scheduled a 5 a.m. practice the next day.Then, on Friday, the school said it wouldn't seek reinstatement from the NCAA for Hairston after the junior committed several rule violations. Hairston hadn't played all year while the school and NCAA worked to resolve eligibility questions focused largely on the use of cars linked to a felon and party promoter earlier this year.Hairston practiced with the team once again after Friday's announcement, then was back on the bench Saturday to support his teammates again.North Carolina had beaten highly ranked Michigan State, Kentucky and Louisville without Hairston and McDonald while the school and NCAA worked to determine their statuses. But the Tar Heels had also lost at home to Belmont and on the road at UAB, then nearly added another surprising loss to that list Saturday.Davidson shot 46 percent and hit nine 3-pointers. Sullivan had made just 5 of 28 3-pointers in his last four games before going 7-for-14 against the Tar Heels.
The beige buildings collectively known as Industry City form narrow cobblestone canyons perpendicular to the Sunset Park waterfront. The loud roar of vehicles speeding down the nearby Gowanus Expressway gives way toward the west to the slow rumble of trucks creeping across the uneven streets.Within this complex, the Nets are eyeing a remote, ramshackle warehouse close to Gowanus Bay as the final step in their long evolution into legitimate Brooklynites.The team has signed a tentative deal to build its new base of basketball operations atop a building on 39th Street, according to multiple people briefed on the plans. If the deal goes through, the landlord will raise the roof about 15 feet, allowing the team to install practice courts and training rooms. The team's front office will be housed there, too.The project, which has yet to be officially announced by the Nets, is expected to be completed by the fall of 2015. If that happens, the Nets will leave their training center in East Rutherford, N.J., and drop the last vestige of their former incarnation."The Nets are a forward-thinking organization," said Michael Phillips, chief operating officer of Jamestown, a real estate firm that recently bought a large stake in Industry City. "It's a great day for Sunset Park and the Nets."The Nets played in New Jersey from 1977 to 2012 before leaving for Barclays Center on Atlantic Avenue in Brooklyn, a move that reshaped the surrounding neighborhoods. But the team has maintained a dual presence, continuing to hold most practices at an office park in New Jersey, where most of the basketball staff works. The Nets have spent months looking for a new site to practice.If their plans hold firm, the Nets will find themselves practicing on a street as peaceful as a nature preserve, in a working class area of bodegas, live poultry stores and auto repair shops.The neighborhood is in an intriguing state of transition. Sunset Park is home to a large Latino population as well as Brooklyn's Chinatown. With the impending move, the Nets have inserted themselves into a Brooklyn neighborhood that has reinvented itself several times in the past few decades, and seems poised for more change to come.The warehouse — at 148 39th Street, just west of Second Avenue — is one of 16 that make up the 6.5-million-square-foot Industry City. The group of buildings, called Bush Terminal until the 1980s, has been in operation since the late 1800s. It was once the largest multiple-tenant industrial complex in the country, combining manufacturing and warehousing with easy access to shipping.In the past few years, the buildings have begun to attract artists drawn to the affordable studio space. More recently, the landlords committed to a full-out renewal of the complex. The buildings now house a mixture of artist studios, light manufacturers, technology firms and other creative-minded tenants, many of whom moved in within the last two years. On a recent morning, people carrying portfolios and artists' tubes trickled into Industry City from the direction of the 36th Street subway stop."There's not a lot going on here," said Tomas Cruz, an employee at Colson Patisserie, which opened recently on the ground floor of one Industry City building. "But it feels like there's a lot that's starting to happen."Cruz said the arrival of an N.B.A. team could attract more business to the area. Chris Havens, a commercial property broker specializing in Brooklyn real estate, said the area could aspire to be something like Dumbo, a neighborhood about five miles away that has been transformed from a gritty outpost to a creative, high-priced hub.The Nets' building is separated from the main Industry City cluster by a Costco store and a vast parking lot. A strip club called Peyton's Playpen sits nearby.The team wants to open a Nets store at street level, according to people who know of the plans. The Nets are also expected to integrate the organization into the community through basketball clinics, public events and other means.The team declined to comment on the move, which was first reported on the website Nets Daily.Jeremy Laufer, the district manager of the local community board, said he had heard talk of the plans and would welcome the Nets to the neighborhood, especially if it meant more jobs. He noted Sunset Park was far below the city average for park and recreation space per capita."I think it's a positive thing for the community, a recognition that this is a community on the rise and that it has some strong assets that have not been realized in the past," said Laufer, who said he was a Knicks fan.The move also spurs the possibility that a Nets player will become a Brooklyn resident, something that has not happened since the team moved. Most of the current roster lives in northern New Jersey, with a few in Lower Manhattan.Some artists are concerned that the Nets' potential move represents the beginning of the end of their time in the complex. Karen Lederer, a 27-year-old artist from Prospect Heights who makes paintings and prints inspired by knitted textiles, said she and her studio mate had wondered whether the aesthetic improvements in their Industry City building augured a rent hike.Lederer, who has worked in the complex for a little over a year, laughed as she recounted a story about a recent visitor who noticed the clean tiles and curved faucets inside a renovated public restroom: "He said, 'This bathroom is way too nice. It doesn't spell good things for you.' "Such signs have long marked the cycle of change in Brooklyn. The Nets' arrival would symbolize another.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — Noon games on weekends are a rarity for the Knicks. This season, they have also been a disaster. When the Knicks played the San Antonio Spurs on Nov. 10 at that early starting time, they lost by 31 points. When they tried again a month later against the Boston Celtics, they lost by 41.Adding to the embarrassment, both games were played at Madison Square Garden, before a lot of speechless fans and a very bewildered-looking Mike Woodson. With a third noon start at the Garden looming on Saturday, this time against the Memphis Grizzlies, Woodson planned to have the entire team spend Friday night in a hotel in the hope that everyone would get a good night's sleep.The goal is for the Knicks to play with more focus and energy Saturday than they did against the Spurs and the Celtics."I'm not going to let them hang out," Woodson, who has faced growing criticism, said of his players at the team's practice on Friday. "We're going to be together."That Woodson felt compelled to take such a step and institute what amounted to a bed check of sorts for his woebegone 8-17 team could hardly be seen in a positive light. But even worse, Woodson tried the same tactic before the Boston blowout, to no avail.Carmelo Anthony was the one who disclosed to reporters Friday that the Knicks had bunked down in a hotel on Saturday night, Dec. 7, only to fall behind the Celtics, 34-11, after one quarter the next afternoon."Sometimes it works, sometimes it doesn't," Anthony said about the hotel strategy. "We'll see about that tomorrow. I don't think it will have anything to do with whether we stay in a hotel or not, but that's what Coach wants us to do."In the game against San Antonio, the Spurs scored 10 points before the Knicks made a single basket. In the Boston game, the Celtics began the first quarter with an 18-1 run. Both the Spurs and the Celtics moved the ball on offense, scored in transition and played consistent defense for long stretches, none of which the Knicks did. In both games, plenty of fans fled the Garden in the second half, looking to do something else with their afternoon.Even in a season in which the Knicks have so often been disappointing, the two matinee fiascos were hard to explain. On Friday, Anthony tried. "When you have them early morning games, you start thinking too much," he said. "Should you go to sleep early? Should you get this amount of rest? I think it's all mental."Usually, it is the other 29 N.B.A. teams that would seem vulnerable to an early weekend start at the Garden; it is their players who would seemingly be tempted into staying out late and sampling New York's night life. Coincidence or not, the Knicks went 12-3 last season in weekend afternoon games at home.But nothing about this season has gone quite right. The Knicks are 0-6 in their orange alternate jerseys — which they happened to wear in the Celtics and Spurs games — and it is not clear when, and if, they will dare to put them on again. And then there are the mental miscues.In a loss at the Garden on Monday, the Knicks allowed an easy layup that put the Washington Wizards ahead by 1 point with seven seconds to go and then failed to call a timeout to set up a final play. On Wednesday, the Knicks nearly lost to the woeful Milwaukee Bucks because Andrea Bargnani fired up a 3-point attempt even though the Knicks had a 2-point lead, the ball and a chance to run out the clock.Woodson acknowledged on Friday that it was not just lack of sleep that had caused the Knicks' problems this season. Still, he said, he would put everyone under one roof Friday night and see if it helped.And what time would be bedtime?"I think 10," Anthony said with a laugh. "That's what I'm hearing."Perhaps now, looking back, Mike Woodson used the wrong phrase Tuesday when he said Amar'e Stoudemire would "be out a while" after it was revealed that Stoudemire had a swollen knee. Stoudemire, who did not play in Wednesday's game against Milwaukee, said Friday that he would play in Saturday's game and that he was not opposed to sitting out periodically.
STANFORD, Calif. — Tara VanDerveer had one simple message for her players before facing Tennessee: "If we rebound, we win."Chiney Ogwumike and Co. delivered in that department, and on offense, too.Amber Orrange scored on a left-handed layin and was fouled with 25.8 seconds left and converted the free throw, helping seal No. 6 Stanford's 76-70 victory against third-ranked Tennessee on Saturday that handed the Lady Vols their first loss.Ogwumike had 32 points, a season-best 20 rebounds — 11 on the offensive end — and three blocks as Stanford held off a late Tennessee rally."This game really boiled down to we had Chiney," VanDerveer said. "Chiney had a monster game. She's a warrior for us. She doesn't have as much help around her as (big sister) Nneka did."Yet Ogwumike's supporting cast is making noticeable strides as the Pac-12 Conference season approaches.Freshman Lili Thompson's pullup 12-footer with 8:09 to play put Stanford ahead 63-51 and she finished with a season-best 14 points.Taylor Greenfield hit a trio of 3-pointers in the first half on the way to 11 points off the bench.While Ogwumike did her part with a fourth 30-point game of the season, she had plenty of support on both ends with teammates crashing the boards and hustling for loose balls — just the kind of balance and energy VanDerveer has been calling for from her young team."We were playing some very young players," VanDerveer said. "I thought they did a really good job, handled the ball and worked hard."Andraya Carter's baseline 3-pointer with 1:02 remaining cut the Cardinal's lead to 70-68 but Stanford kept possession with 36 seconds to go on a jump ball in a big break, and Orrange came through.Stanford (10-1) has its first three-game winning streak in the rivalry between perennial national powers.Ariel Massengale scored 17 points and Meighan Simmons 15 to lead the Lady Vols (10-1), who were hurt 35.8 percent shooting.Tennessee has lost its last four matchups at Maples Pavilion since its last win on Stanford's home floor on Dec. 4, 2005. The Lady Vols have lost 13 straight road games against Top 10 teams dating back to 2008.Ogwumike had 18 points and 11 rebounds by halftime and shot 15 for 25 overall for outsized Stanford, which needed a big second half to hold on for its ninth straight victory."I have a great support system," she said. "It's just being aggressive. It's those little things."After Bashaara Graves scored to cut the Cardinal's lead to 38-33 with 18:10 remaining, Orrange and Thompson hit consecutive 3-pointers for Stanford.But Massengale then scored five straight points to keep Tennessee close."Like coach tells us, they're a great team and a great team is going to make a run," Thompson said.Ogwumike drove the lane for easy layins, converted athletic putbacks or plain out-jumped Tennessee to catch high lob passes into the paint before pivoting around to score."Everything I tried to do, I tried to box her out, it just didn't work," Graves said. "There's no way she should have had that many offensive rebounds."The Cardinal held a 24-19 rebounding advantage in the first half and wound up with a 43-40 edge on the boards — the first time all season Tennessee has lost in rebounding. The Lady Vols had a 52.1 to 36.3 mismatch on the boards entering the game.The Cardinal haven't lost since a 76-57 defeat at No. 1 Connecticut on Nov. 11. Stanford made seven of its initial 10 shots but overcame 37.5-percent shooting in the second half. Stanford has won five of the last eighth meetings and four of five.Tennessee, facing just its second ranked team of the season, missed a chance for its first win over a top-10 opponent since beating No. 10 Georgia in the Lady Vols' SEC home opener last Jan. 6.Stanford snapped Tennessee's five-game winning streak here last Nov. 20, 2012, 97-80 loss for the fifth-most points allowed in program history.This one was plenty impressive, too.Tennessee began the game 6 for 23 and never recovered despite making things interesting down the stretch with Simmons taking charge."I thought we got good looks," coach Holly Warlick said. "You've got to make free throws, layups and free throws. If you don't make those you're not going to win games. At crucial times we didn't make free throws, and at crucial times we gave up the 3-point shot. Little things for us got magnified today."After Tennessee jumped to a quick 4-0 lead, Stanford then scored 13 unanswered points for a 13-4 lead that forced a Lady Vols timeout at the 14:54 mark of the opening half. Tennessee missed seven straight shots over a nearly 3 1/2-minute stretch.Ogwumike passed Jeanne Ruark Hoff to move into seventh place on Stanford's career scoring list (2,059).
SUNRISE, Fla. — Will Yeguete led a strong rebounding effort Saturday by the 16th-ranked Florida Gators, who pulled away in the second half to beat Fresno State 66-49 in the Orange Bowl Classic.Yeguete had five offensive rebounds and a season-high 10 total for the Gators, who had a 47-24 advantage on the boards, by far their largest this season. Florida won easily despite shooting only 42 percent.Casey Prather scored 16 points for the Gators (9-2), who won away from Gainesville for the third time this season. Prather was voted the game's most valuable player.Scottie Wilbekin added 11 points and Yeguete nine. Patric Young had eight points and nine rebounds.Fresno State (6-6) lost its third game in a row and fell to 1-5 away from home.In the first game of the doubleheader, No. 22 Massachusetts lost to Florida State 60-55.The Gators shot 29 percent in the first half and 58 percent in the second half. They went 1 for 13 from 3-point range in the opening half and still led 23-19.Michael Frazier II, Wilbekin and Kasey Hill each sank a 3-pointer as Florida outscored Fresno State 15-4 to start the second half and open up a 15-point lead. A basket by Yeguete made it 55-35, and the margin reached 26 with 2:40 left.Cezar Guerrero had 17 points for Fresno State. Paul Watson and Marvelle Harris added 10 each, but the Bulldogs' bench totaled only four points.Fresno State shot just 32 percent, including 4 for 17 from 3-point range.
AUSTIN, Texas — Adreian Payne scored a career-high 32 points and No. 5 Michigan State dominated the final 11 minutes of a 92-78 victory over Texas on Saturday.The Spartans (10-1) led for only 56 seconds in the first half as Texas (10-2) controlled the game early.Michigan State used a 9-2 run to take a 52-50 lead about halfway through the second half. Following two quick buckets by Jonathan Holmes, six Spartans scored during a 14-2 run that put the game away.Payne made two free throws during that run and went 10 of 13 from the field and 11 of 12 from the free throw line. Gary Harris, who missed three recent games with an ankle injury, scored 19 points while Travis Trice, battling a foot blister, contributed 13 points and was 3 of 4 from 3-point range.Cameron Ridley scored 13 of his 17 points in the first half for Texas, which was coming off an 86-83 win at No. 14 North Carolina. He was 7 of 10 from the free throw line but he attempted only two shots from the field in the second half. Texas had four players score in double figures for the 10th straight game as Isaiah Taylor had 16 points and five assists while Javan Felix and Holmes each added 11 points.Texas opened the game on an 8-2 run. The Spartans took their first lead of the game at 21-19 on a layup by Branden Dawson, who finished with 11 points and 10 rebounds.But the Longhorns quickly reclaimed the lead on two 3s by Damarcus Croaker. Felix hit a 15-footer in the final seconds of the first half to give Texas a 38-36 lead. His only 3-pointer of the game put the Longhorns on top 47-43 early in the second half but they never held that large of a lead again.Kendal Yancy of Texas hit a 3-pointer to tie the game at 50. Holmes gave Texas a 54-52 lead with a putback and a layup on consecutive possessions. Dawson answered with a layup that triggered the game-deciding run by Michigan State that the Longhorns were unable to recover from.The Spartans took their first double-digit lead with 7:26 remaining after two free throws by Payne on the way to their most lopsided win over Texas in school history.
VILLANOVA, Pa. — Freshman Josh Hart came off the bench to score 19 points and No. 8 Villanova stayed perfect with an 88-67 rout of Rider on Saturday.One of 12 unbeaten teams remaining in Division I, the Wildcats (11-0) are off to their best start since the 1961-62 team won its first 12.JayVaughn Pinkston added 14 points for Villanova, which shot 50 percent from the field in its final non-conference home game of the season.Anthony Myles, Rider's top scorer had 22 points. Jimmie Taylor added 15 points for Rider (5-5) and Daniel Stewart scored 13.Villanova's pressure rattled Rider as the Wildcats began to pull away in the second half.With just under 15 minutes to go, Darrun Hilliard picked the pocket of Shawn Valentine in the backcourt and finished with a slam to give Villanova a 56-35 lead.Hilliard finished with 13 points and has scored in double figures in all but one game this season.The Wildcats extended their lead to 27 before emptying their bench with one minute left.Villanova has outscored its opposition by an average of nearly 18 points including wins over No. 18 Kansas and No. 25 Iowa.The Broncs managed to hang around for much of the first half, pulling within five with 4:41 left until halftime on a pair of free throws from Taylor.But the Wildcats closed the half on a 16-7 spurt, capped by a 3-pointer from Tony Chennault in the final seconds, to take a comfortable 43-29 lead into the break.Villanova owns a 24-1 record against Rider - with the Broncs' only win coming in 1944 - and is 49-2 in its last 51 non-conference games at the Pavilion.The Wildcats will put their unbeaten record on the line next Saturday when they face former Big East rival Syracuse at the Carrier Dome. Three days later, Villanova opens its Big East slate on the road against Butler.
MINNEAPOLIS — Marv Wolfenson, one of the two businessmen who brought the NBA back to Minnesota, died Saturday. He was 87.Wolfenson died in La Jolla, Calif., Timberwolves spokesman Brad Ruiter told The Associated Press on Saturday. He did not know any other details.Wolfenson and Harvey Ratner were the Timberwolves original owners when the NBA granted them and Minnesota an expansion franchise that began play in 1989. They also owned a series of Twin Cities health clubs.The team released a statement Saturday, saying the organization was deeply saddened."Marv will long be remembered by our organization as not only an original owner of the franchise, but more importantly a mentor, friend, and incredible businessman who helped us all establish the Wolves in this market," the statement said.The pair were known as "Harv and Marv," working together for nearly five decades while managing their collection of apartment complexes and health and fitness facilities.The Timberwolves marked the NBA's return to Minnesota after an absence that began when the Minneapolis Lakers moved to Los Angeles in 1960.One of four expansion franchises spawned by the league in 1987, the Wolves were bought for $32.5 million and began playing in the Metrodome in 1989.The following season, they went to the other end of downtown into a new arena, Target Center, which was funded by Ratner and Wolfenson.Their ownership was ultimately unsuccessful, ending in debt after five mostly miserable seasons on the court. Minnesota went 105-305 during that time and the franchise was sold to a group of investors in New Orleans in May 1994. The league blocked the sale a month later.Glen Taylor, a printing magnate and former state senator, wound up finalizing his purchase of the team in March 1995 with his limited partners for $88.5 million after a messy transition that included a widely criticized, publicly funded takeover of Target Center.Ratner and Wolfenson eventually sold most of the rest of their holdings, including the chain of Northwest Athletic Clubs in 1997. But they were regulars at Timberwolves home games, as the team finally found a way to win and made eight straight playoff appearances from 1997-2004.
LINCOLN, Neb. — Jordan Hooper scored 19 points and grabbed seven rebounds as No. 19 Nebraska rolled over South Dakota 87-53 on Saturday.Tear'a Laudermill had 15 points with five rebounds. Emily Cady had 10 with seven rebounds and Rachel Theriot added nine with five assists for the Cornhuskers (9-2).Nebraska opened with an 11-0 run in the game's first four minutes and had a 20-point lead by halftime. The Coyotes (7-6) hit just 30 percent from the field in the first half.Hooper sank a 3-pointer at 15:25 in the second to cap a 14-6 Nebraska run. Allie Havers' layup at 8:16 gave the Cornhuskers a 30-point advantage and put the game away for good.Nebraska was 46 percent from the field overall and 79 percent from the line.Raeshel Contreras scored 17 points to lead the Coyotes. The loss breaks a five-game winning streak for South Dakota.
WICHITA, Kan. — Thomas Gipson scored eight of his 14 points in the game's decisive minutes and freshman Marcus Foster also had 14 points as Kansas State outlasted No. 21 Gonzaga 72-62 on Saturday at Intrust Bank Arena.Wesley Iwundu scored 13 points for the Wildcats (8-3) while Shane Southwell had 11.Kevin Pangos had 14 points for Gonzaga (10-2) while reserve Drew Barham added 13 and David Stockton and Przemek Karnowski both scored 10.The Bulldogs entered the game averaging 87.5 points and had not scored fewer than 68 this season.Gonzaga played the second half without second-leading scorer Sam Dower, who took a hard fall late in the first half and did not return.Southwell scored five straight points to give Kansas State a 33-24 lead with 18:46 to play.Then Foster, among the top 10 scorers in the Big 12, went on a personal 7-3 run with a 3-pointer, layup and monster dunk over Stockton. The Wildcats led 40-32 and the crowd was buzzing.But a 3-pointer by Gary Bell Jr. capped a 7-0 Gonzaga run that pulled the Bulldogs within 40-39 with 14:48 to play.The teams exchanged the lead for 6 minutes before K-State finally managed to pull away behind Gipson. Twice the 6-foot-7 Gipson posted up the tiring Karnowski, a 7-footer forced into extended minutes by Dower's injury, for baskets.The second one gave Kansas State a 60-54 lead with 3:39 remaining. Karnowski entered the game averaging 23 minutes but played 30 Saturday, 17 in the second half.Gipson's putback with 1:59 to play pushed the lead to eight, and the Wildcats could milk out the victory.Gonzaga, among the top 20 nationally in scoring, had real difficulties finding its offense in the first half.The Bulldogs had just 19 points in the game's first 17 minutes and trailed by five.But Kyle Dranginis followed a driving layup with a 3-pointer, making the score 24-24 with 1:49 remaining in the half.Kansas State scored the half's final five points on a 3 by Nigel Johnson and a layup by Nino Williams for a 29-24 lead. Gonzaga had not scored fewer than 31 points in a first half this season.
HONOLULU — Georges Niang scored 22 points and No. 17 Iowa State beat George Mason 79-67 on Sunday in the first round of the Diamond Head Classic.The Cyclones (9-0) had their second-lowest scoring game of the season but still managed to extend their winning streak. Iowa State — the top scoring team in the country — was one of 10 undefeated teams in Division I at the start of Sunday.Melvin Ejim, Iowa State's leading scorer going into the game, had 14 points and 11 rebounds while DeAndre Kane had 13 points and eight assists.Patrick Holloway scored 19 points for George Mason (5-5) and Byron Allen had 14.The game was played amid tight security among arrangements made by the White House for President Barack Obama to attend the tournament's second game, Oregon State against Akron. Obama's brother-in-law, Craig Robinson, is the head coach of the Beavers.Players for both Iowa State and George Mason were screened with metal detectors as they entered the arena Sunday morning.Three minutes into the second half, Niang stole the ball from Marko Gujanicic and his layup gave Iowa State its first 10-point lead at 40-30. After that, George Mason (5-5) pulled no closer than five points with 6:18 left.Iowa State made just three of 14 3-point attempts in the first half (21 percent) but the Cyclones used a 10-2 run to avoid their worst half in any game this season. Iowa State scored 34 points in the first half; its season low is 29 points in the first half against Northern Iowa on Dec. 7.Niang gave Iowa State its largest lead of the game with little more than 2 minutes left, hitting a 3-pointer at the top of the key. After making the shot, Niang trotted backward down the court with his arms outstretched and signaling threes on each hand with his pinky, ring and middle fingers.Iowa State shot 52 percent in the second half after shooting 40 percent in the first half. Iowa state scored 45 points in the second half — its season low in a second half this season is 42 points.
LAS VEGAS — Markel Brown scored 23 points and had 11 rebounds to lead No. 7 Oklahoma State over No. 20 Colorado 78-73 at the MGM Grand Showcase benefiting Coaches vs. Cancer on Saturday night.Marcus Smart had 18 points, and Phil Forte added 16 points — making 4 of 7 from three-point range — for Oklahoma State (11-1), which shot 52 percent from the field overall and 62 percent in the second half.Le'Bryan Nash had 15 points, six rebounds, and three blocked shots as the Cowboys' win snapped Colorado's 10-game winning streak. Brown scored 11 points from the free-throw line to lift Oklahoma State to its fourth straight win.Josh Scott led Colorado (10-2) with 20 points, 12 rebounds, and three steals. Askia Booker scored 19 points and Spencer Dinwiddie added 18.Oklahoma State built its lead to 63-53 with 7:36 remaining. Colorado chipped away and brought the deficit down to four points twice in the final minute, but couldn't get any closer.Oklahoma State built two six-point first-half leads, including at halftime. The Buffaloes briefly led 7-4 in the first half as they only went 1 of 2 from the free-throw line.Booker had 13 first-half points for Colorado, which trailed 32-26 at halftime. The Cowboys took the lead for good with 1:37 left in the opening half.Colorado will be back at the MGM Grand Arena for the Pac-12 Conference Tournament in March.The Cowboys now lead the all-time series 61-48.The teams last met nearly three years ago with the Buffaloes winning 75-71 in January 2011. The last time the teams met on a neutral court was in March 2005 at the Big 12 Conference Tournament in Kansas City.Colorado hasn't beaten a Top 10 team on a neutral floor since 1990 at the Big Eight Tournament in Kansas City.
EUGENE, Ore. — Jason Calliste scored a career-high 31 points and No. 13 Oregon stayed unbeaten, topping BYU 100-96 in overtime Saturday night.Joseph Young added 25 points for the Ducks (11-0). Calliste, a senior guard, made all 13 of his foul shots.Tyler Haws led the Cougars (8-5) with 32 points and Kyle Collinsworth added 15 points, five rebounds and eight assists.Both teams went into the game averaging nearly 90 points. Oregon had a chance to win in regulation, but Elgin Cook missed two foul shots with 1.8 seconds, sending it into overtime tied at 84. Cook finished 1 for 6 on free throws.Damyean Dotson scored on a drive in the final minute, putting the Ducks ahead for good at 96-94.BYU led by 10 points in the second half and was still ahead 83-77 before Young's 3-pointer with 1:58 left.Johnathan Loyd made two free throws with 1:12 left to cut the margin to 84-82. Mike Moser blocked a shot by BYU's Matt Carlino on the next possession, and Moser made a jumper for the Ducks with less than a minute left.In overtime, with the score tied at 94, Moser drew a charge by Frank Bartley IV with 46.5 seconds left. Dotson scored on the next Ducks possession. Dotson finished with 15 points.Oregon is 11-0 for the fourth time in school history. The previous time was in 2006-07, when the Ducks made it to the final eight.
Shannon Scott said he and his fellow Ohio State guard Aaron Craft share something of a sixth sense, what he calls a "turnover sense." When one of them harasses an opponent, the other can sense the turnover coming and even take off to jump-start a transition basket."You can tell when the offensive player is getting shaky with the ball," Scott said. But really, he added, "it's more of an instinct."Defensively, Craft and Shannon are considered the nation's best backcourt, and they displayed that in No. 3 Ohio State's 64-61 victory against Notre Dame at Madison Square Garden on Saturday night.Within the first 65 seconds, Scott and Craft each had a steal. But it was with less than a minute left in the game that their pickpocketing enabled a comeback for the Buckeyes (12-0). Scott nabbed the biggest steal of the game with 43 seconds to play and made two free throws moments later to cut the deficit to 58-56.Demetrius Jackson hit a pair of free throws for the Fighting Irish (8-4) to stretch the lead to 4 before Lenzelle Smith Jr. made three foul shots to pull the Buckeyes to 60-59. On Ohio State's next possession, Craft fell as he was dribbling in the lane but managed to pass the ball to Smith for an uncontested layup and a 61-60 Buckeyes lead.Craft then all but sealed the win when he reached from behind after being beaten by Jerian Grant in the lane. He slapped the ball off Grant's thigh and sent it out of bounds for a turnover.Craft and Scott have combined for 57 steals, the most in the country for two teammates. But they cause turnovers in other ways. Early on Saturday, Scott pressured Eric Atkins into dribbling the ball off his foot. Near the end of the first half, Craft slapped the ball out of the hands of Pat Connaughton and into those of Ohio State's LaQuinton Ross, who passed the ball back to Craft for a layup. Craft's expertise in disruption led Sports Illustrated to invent a more encompassing statistic, called the Turnometer.Craft and Scott are all the more impressive because of rule changes that call for a foul when a defender makes contact with a ballhandler using his hand or forearm. While the changes have led to a rise in scoring, fouls and the use of zone defense, Craft and Scott are linchpins of Ohio State's man-to-man defense, which allows few points and seldom fouls."Early on we thought the rules were going to affect the poor defenders more than the ones that can move their feet," Craft said, indirectly crediting himself. Craft, Ohio State's career leader in assists with 586 and steals with 277, is particularly good at defending with his chest, abdomen and thighs instead of his hands.Ohio State coaches preach two things on defense. The first is to guard your yard, or G.Y.Y., as the Buckeyes refer to it. Within a three-foot radius, each defender must prevent his assignment from dribbling by, receiving a pass or sending the ball to the post. The other is to know your personnel (K.Y.P.). Each player studies scouting videos, homework Craft said he loved. He figures out opponent tendencies and uses the knowledge to beat the ballhandler to his spot."The game has really become a ball-screen offense," the assistant Jeff Boals said. He said teams relied on a variety of sophisticated screens to bump defenders off their assignments and open the lanes. Ohio State spends a lot of practice time teaching how to defend these screens, including running a 5-on-4 "scramble," something Coach Thad Matta learned from Bob Knight."You have to fly around and no one really has a guy, no one's really matched up, but you have to find a way," Craft said of having to stop the offense when down a man on defense.Craft and Scott learned defensive technique from their fathers. Craft's father, John, a former coach, committed his son to shuffling his feet with a drill that required him to hold bricks while he was in the defensive stance. Scott's father, Charles, was a three-time All-Star in 11 seasons in the N.B.A., and when his son was 6 taught his team how to rotate on weakside defense."Everyone would just follow the ball, but on our team, we'd zone up the basket and be like one pass or two passes away," Scott said, explaining how at 6 he and his teammates understood what it meant to clog the passing lanes. Craft and Scott have an innate ability to know when to go off script — leaving an assignment to double the ballhandler, or swiping at the ball — and be more aggressive."You kind of see something on defense, and you go away from the principles," Craft said.After Saturday's comeback, Matta said Craft had "saved the day" because he recognized the defense was out of position and adjusted, which was why he was able to deflect the ball off Grant's thigh.But Matta is used to seeing those instincts. "That's the type of things he does," he said.
Amber Orrange scored on a left-handed layup and a free throw with 25.8 seconds left, helping No. 6 Stanford to a 76-70 victory at home over third-ranked Tennessee on Saturday.Chiney Ogwumike had 32 points, a season-best 20 rebounds and 3 blocks as Stanford held off a late Tennessee rally and dealt the Lady Vols their first loss of the season.Andraya Carter's baseline 3-pointer with 1 minute 2 seconds remaining cut the Cardinal's lead to 70-68, but Stanford kept possession with 36 seconds to go on a jump ball.Stanford (10-1) has its first three-game winning streak in the rivalry between the two perennial national powers.Ariel Massengale scored 17 points and Meighan Simmons 15 to lead the Lady Vols (10-1), who were hurt by 35.8 percent shooting from the field.Tennessee has lost four straight matchups at Maples Pavilion since its last win on Stanford's home floor, on Dec. 4, 2005. The Lady Vols have lost 13 straight road games against top-10 teams dating to 2008.While Ogwumike did her part with her fourth 30-point game of the season, she had plenty of support on both ends with teammates crashing the boards and hustling for loose balls. The freshman Lili Thompson's 12-footer with 8:09 to play put Stanford ahead, 63-51, and she finished with a season-best 14 points. Taylor Greenfield hit three 3-pointers in the first half on the way to 11 points off the bench.RUTGERS 61, GEORGIA 58 Kahleah Copper and Betnijah Laney each scored 18 points to lead host Rutgers past No. 16 Georgia.Rutgers (9-2) led by 4 points at the break, but Georgia (11-1) took a 46-45 lead on a 3-point play by Tiaria Griffin with 7:25 left in the second half. The Scarlet Knights answered with 6 straight points to make the score 51-46 with five minutes left.Georgia closed the gap to 1 point before Tyler Scaife hit two free throws with 5.9 seconds left to seal the win for Rutgers.MARIST 76, OKLAHOMA 69 Sydney Coffey and Casey Dulin each scored 4 points in the final 33 seconds to lead host Marist to an upset win over No. 20 Oklahoma.Coffey had 25 points, and Dulin and Leanne Ockenden each added 17 for Marist (7-4).LOUISVILLE 69, COLORADO 62 Shoni Schimmel had a season-high 30 points and Bria Smith added 13 as host No. 7 Louisville handed No. 11 Colorado its first loss of the season.Lexy Kresl led Colorado (9-1) with 17 points. The loss ended Colorado's streak of 33 straight victories in nonconference, regular-season games. Schimmel, who was 13 of 16 from the free-throw line, made two free throws and a layup to help Louisville close out its fifth straight win and improve to 12-1.SYRACUSE 64, ST. JOSEPH'S 62 Brittney Sykes scored 6 of her 20 points in the final 2:37, including the game-winning layup with 3 seconds to play, as host No. 23 Syracuse slipped past St. Joseph's.Rachel Coffey's 3-pointer with 3:32 to play gave Syracuse (10-1) its first lead, 58-57, since the opening minute of the second half. Erin Shields led St. Joseph's (9-2) with 21 points.OKLAHOMA ST. 68, GA. TECH 60 Liz Donohoe scored 27 points to lead No. 13 Oklahoma State (10-0) in Carolina, P.R.IOWA 73, DRAKE 51 Ally Disterhoft scored 17 points and gathered 9 rebounds to lift No. 22 Iowa to a win at home.Iowa (11-2) shot 46 percent from the field but just 4 of 26 from 3-point range. Melissa Dixon added 13 points for the Hawkeyes while Samantha Logic went 6 of 7 for 12 points, pulled down 17 rebounds and handed out 10 assists.Drake (5-5) was led by Ashley Bartow with 16 points.N. CAROLINA 103, HIGH POINT 71 Six North Carolina players scored in double figures as the No. 14 Tar Heels used a balanced attack to defeat visiting High Point. Xylina McDaniel led the Tar Heels (11-2) with 16 points and 8 reboundsNEBRASKA 87, SOUTH DAKOTA 53 Jordan Hooper had 19 points and 7 rebounds to lift No. 19 Nebraska to a win at home. Tear'a Laudermill added 15 for the Cornhuskers (9-2).
Florida State scored the final 6 points Saturday, taking the lead on two free throws by Ian Miller with 1 minute 6 seconds left, to hand No. 22 Massachusetts its first defeat of the season, 60-55, in the Orange Bowl Classic in Sunrise, Fla.Aaron Thomas scored 18 points for Florida State. His two free throws with two seconds left sealed the victory. Florida State (8-3) beat a ranked team for the second time this season. UMass (10-1) had been off to its best start since 1995.ILLINOIS 65, MISSOURI 64 Tracy Abrams scored a season-best 22 points and made two free throws with 4.6 seconds remaining to lift Illinois over No. 23 Missouri in the annual Braggin' Rights game in St. Louis.Rayvonte Rice added 14 points for Illinois (9-2). Jordan Clarkson had 25 points for Missouri (10-1), which had entered the game as the lone unbeaten team in the Southeastern Conference.KANSAS STATE 72, GONZAGA 62 Thomas Gipson scored 8 of his 14 points in the game's decisive minutes, and the freshman Marcus Foster also had 14 points as host Kansas State outlasted No. 21 Gonzaga.Wesley Iwundu scored 13 points for the Wildcats (8-3). Kevin Pangos had 14 points for Gonzaga (10-2).MICHIGAN STATE 92, TEXAS 78 Adreian Payne scored a career-high 32 points as No. 5 Michigan State dominated the final 11 minutes of a win over host Texas.The Spartans (10-1) led for only 56 seconds in the first half as Texas (10-2) took control early.VILLANOVA 88, RIDER 67 The freshman Josh Hart came off the bench to score 19 points as No. 8 Villanova stayed perfect with a rout of Rider at home.The Wildcats (11-0) are off to their best start since the 1961-62 team won its first 12. JayVaughn Pinkston added 14 points for Villanova. Anthony Myles led Rider (5-5) with 22 points. N. CAROLINA 97, DAVIDSON 85 Marcus Paige scored 11 of his 17 points in overtime to help No. 14 North Carolina hold off visiting Davidson.J. P. Tokoto posted career highs of 22 points and 11 rebounds to lead North Carolina (8-3). Brian Sullivan had career highs of 33 points and seven 3-pointers for the Wildcats (4-8).LOUISVILLE 85, FLA. INT'L. 56 Russ Smith scored 18 points, and Wayne Blackshear added 13 as No. 6 Louisville won its sixth straight, easing past host Florida International.Smith had 12 in the first half for the Cardinals (11-1). Tymell Murphy scored 16 points for F.I.U. (8-5).FLORIDA 66, FRESNO STATE 49 Will Yeguete led a strong rebounding effort by No. 16 Florida, which pulled away in the second half to beat Fresno State in the Orange Bowl Classic.Casey Prater scored 16 points for the Gators (9-2). Fresno State (6-6) lost its third game in a row and fell to 1-5 away from home.KANSAS 86, GEORGETOWN 64 Tarik Black came off the bench to score 17 points, and Joel Embiid also had 17 as No. 18 Kansas defeated visiting Georgetown.Kansas (8-3) pushed its nonconference home winning streak to 67 games. Markel Starks scored 19 points for the Hoyas (7-3).KENTUCKY 93, BELMONT 80 Julius Randle scored a career-high 29 points and led a second-half rally that pushed No. 19 Kentucky past stubborn Belmont (8-5) at home.Randle, a 6-foot-9 freshman forward, was 8 of 10 from the field and grabbed 10 rebounds for the Wildcats (9-3).MEMPHIS 77, SE MISSOURI 65 Shaq Goodwin scored 20 points, and Joe Jackson added 16 as No. 15 Memphis pulled away for a win over Southeast Missouri State.Goodwin made 10 of 12 shots and had 8 rebounds for the Tigers (8-2). Tyler Stone led the Redhawks (7-4) with 23 points.SAN DIEGO ST. 65, MCNEESE ST. 36 Winston Shepard returned from a one-game suspension to score 7 straight points during a 13-0 run midway through the second half that helped No. 24 San Diego State (9-1) pull away from visiting McNeese State (2-9).
SEATTLE — Shabazz Napier scored 15 of his 20 points in the second half and grabbed six rebounds to lead No. 10 Connecticut to an 82-70 victory over Washington on Sunday.Fellow guard Ryan Boatwright had 16 points and five rebounds and Lasan Kromah scored 14 points for Connecticut (10-1), which fell into a double-digit hole early in its first true road game of the season but controlled the game in the second half.C.J. Wilcox led Washington (6-5) with 19 points on 6-of-15 shooting and had four assists and four fouls. Darin Johnson had 13 points for Washington and Mike Anderson, who is from Hartford, Conn., added 10 points.Connecticut was coming off its first loss of the season, 53-51 to Stanford at home Wednesday. In that game UConn was 5 of 31 from the field and 0 for 12 on 3-pointers in the second half. The early going against Washington wasn't much better as Connecticut missed its first six shots from behind the arc as UW built a double-digit lead.Wilcox hit two straight 3-pointers to give UW a 31-17 lead with 7 minutes to go in the first half, but those shots seemed to wake up the visiting Huskies.UConn answered with a 15-2 run, including a stretch of 10 straight points. Connecticut took the lead for the first time since the opening minutes when DeAndre Daniel's layup made it 39-37 with 1:46 left in the first half, and UConn led 43-39 at halftime.Connecticut scored the first six points of the second half to push the lead to 10 points, and then used a nine-point run to pull away to 62-48 with 11 minutes to play. Washington wasn't able to make a run to get back into the game.Connecticut's long-range shooting improved after the dismal start, as UConn finished 4 of 12 behind the arc and 28 of 51 (54.9 percent) overall from the field.UConn changed its starters after going with the same lineup for the first 10 games of the season. Amida Brimah started at center, replacing Phillip Nolan. Brimah dunked on the game's first possession and had four points and three rebounds.One of the largest cheers from the home crowd came 6½ minutes into the game, when junior forward Desmond Simmons checked in. It was Simmons' first appearance since having arthroscopic surgery on his right knee Nov. 7. Simmons hit the first 3-pointer of the game to put UW up 17-10 but got into foul trouble and finished with five points.
Health has been everything for the Nets this season: the ominous variable that threatened to derail their season even before it began, the fickle state they lacked during their disastrous start, the factor they enthusiastically linked to their brief moments of success. As a vague and mutable concept, it still offered hope that the Nets could turn around their season. Now that seems far less likely.The Nets announced Saturday morning that Brook Lopez, their All-Star center and primary scoring option, had fractured the fifth metatarsal in his right foot, an injury that seemed likely to keep him sidelined for most, if not all, of the remainder of the season.The diagnosis delivered a devastating blow to the reeling, injury-stricken Nets, who spent the summer pumping up their ambitions to win the N.B.A. championship this season. Instead, they have stumbled to a 9-17 record while dealing with significant injuries to several players.But Lopez's injury overshadows them all. It will unsettle the Nets' deeply talented but still dysfunctional roster, forcing the team to scramble to fill a huge void. It will also magnify the already big health-related question mark that has wrapped itself around Lopez, even as he was earning plaudits as one of the league's premier offensive centers.The Nets did not immediately specify a timetable on his return, noting that they would have more information after further consultation with team physicians in the coming week. But a long layoff seems likely, given that it is the third time Lopez has fractured the foot.Lopez broke the same foot twice — and required two operations — during the lockout-shortened 2011-12 season, in which he appeared in just five games. This past summer, he had a third operation, to repair a bent screw that had been implanted in the foot after the initial fracture.Lopez, 25, was drafted 10th over all in 2008 after playing two years at Stanford. The Nets committed to him two summers ago, signing him to a four-year, $61 million contract. Lopez came back strong last season and was named to his first All-Star team.But concerns about whether he was another talented big man whose career could be undercut by foot injuries were already widespread. Chronic foot issues curtailed the careers of outstanding players like Bill Walton and Yao Ming.After the front office assembled a roster filled with star players this past summer, Lopez remained the Nets' focal point on offense, a player whose presence needed to be established each night to open up the rest of the offense."I've never played with a center whose skill level is at this point," Kevin Garnett said during the team's October training camp. "I've obviously played with greats, but to the point where he's young and still hasn't peaked yet."Lopez delivered when he was healthy. He played in 17 games this year, averaging 20.7 points, 6.0 rebounds and 1.8 blocks a game.But his health this season had already been a problem. He sprained his left ankle during a Nov. 15 game in Phoenix and missed seven games. He returned for a short spell and played well, but then sprained the ankle again and missed another two contests.The foot injury occurred Friday night during the Nets' 121-120 overtime loss to the 76ers at Wells Fargo Center. The Nets did not say on which play Lopez injured his foot, but he did fall with 4 minutes 53 seconds remaining in the fourth quarter after colliding under the basket with Thaddeus Young of Philadelphia. Lopez seemed to land awkwardly on his right foot on his way down.Lopez played the remainder of the game, logging more than 44 minutes in all, and finished with 22 points. He did not make himself available to reporters after the game.Size was considered a strong point of the Nets' roster, and players like Garnett, Andray Blatche and Mirza Teletovic will be called upon to make up for Lopez's inside presence. Reserve big men like the rookie Mason Plumlee and the veteran Reggie Evens could also have expanded roles. But making up for Lopez's production will be a difficult task.The Nets have battled numerous injuries. Deron Williams, the team's starting point guard, returned recently after missing considerable time with a series of ankle injuries. Paul Pierce, a veteran forward, strained his groin during the opening month and has been playing with a broken bone in his shooting hand.The team is also without forward Andrei Kirilenko, who has played just four games because of a sore back, and guard Jason Terry, who has played just 11 games while battling soreness in his surgically repaired left knee.Capricious health has been a problem for the Nets this season, but there was a lingering sense that thing would stabilize, that the team could blossom before too long to chase a trophy.
LEXINGTON, Ky. — Tricia Liston had some good looks at the basket, but the Duke senior guard just mostly used her height and quickness to score easy layups no matter who was on her.Those opportunities seemed to be there all day for the Blue Devils against Kentucky.Liston scored a season-high 28 points to help No. 2 Duke beat the fifth-ranked Wildcats 69-61 before 23,706 fans at Rupp Arena on Sunday.Five days after defending champion and No. 1 Connecticut soundly dealt the Blue Devils their first loss, they used their size and length to hand the Wildcats their first defeat before the largest crowd to see a women's game in Kentucky along with the biggest Duke has ever played in front of.The 6-foot-1 Liston thrived on mismatches to shoot 10 of 19 from the field, including two 3-pointers, falling a point short of her career best. Duke's 6-3 center, Elizabeth Williams, was 6 of 10 to chip in 17 points and had eight rebounds.The Blue Devils (12-1) stifled Kentucky (11-1) around the basket, limiting the Wildcats to 25-of-75 shooting (33 percent) and 3 of 15 from long range. Poor free throw shooting also doomed Kentucky, which made a season-worst 8 of 19 from the line (42 percent).Janee Thompson had 12 second-half points to lead Kentucky and helped rally the Wildcats to 59-55 with 6:07 remaining. Liston answered with consecutive layups to stretch Duke's lead back to eight and provide a safe cushion as the Blue Devils won their second in a row."We just stayed more focused on what we needed to do, taking care of the ball and getting stops on defense, rather than worrying about it getting too tight," Liston said. "We needed to make sure not to get involved with the crowd and everything else that was going on. We did a really good job of staying poised and staying with our game plan."Added Duke coach Joanne P. McCallie: "Tricia's leadership was incredible. She's a very, very smart basketball player with a lot of experience. She was huge for us in terms of getting the team together and making things happen."Duke shot 26 of 59 (44 percent), made 15 of 18 free throws and outrebounded Kentucky 46-42. The Blue Devils also outscored the Wildcats 40-34 in the paint.Samarie Walker and Bria Goss had eight points for Kentucky."They outworked us today and I think that's what happens in games with two really good teams going at it," Wildcats coach Matthew Mitchell said. "They were just a team that worked harder. Not that our team didn't work hard, I just think Duke worked harder. You give them credit. They did a nice job."The game began in a charged atmosphere with the Wildcats playing before a crowd four times their season average at nearby Memorial Coliseum. The question was whether students and faculty would help break the state record of 22,152 set in 2010 when Kentucky played at Louisville's KFC Yum! Center.Duke entered its third game in a week after blowing out Albany on Thursday. There have been few easy opponents for the Blue Devils, particularly this month with Kentucky representing their fourth ranked foe in five games.That stretch thoroughly prepared a Duke squad that was no stranger to 23,000-seat Rupp, losing here to Kentucky two years ago as the Wildcats' annual appearance resumed after a brief hiatus. And in building a 36-24 halftime lead, the Blue Devils certainly weren't in awe of the massive building, the partisan crowd or Kentucky's trademark pressure defense.With size advantages at many positions including Williams having a two-inch edge over Walker — who went scoreless in the first half — Duke simply exploited it on both ends. Frequent layups helped the Blue Devils shoot 14 of 29 from the field including seven straight baskets during one stretch."One thing that we talked about was being able to control the tempo this game, knowing they were a pressing team," Williams said. "We were aware of their pressure and overall we did a pretty good job."Duke's length also made it difficult for Kentucky to pass and shoot against the zone. The Wildcats began 0 for 5 en route to 10 of 35 for the half, often finding hands in front of them as they struggled to work the ball inside and around the perimeter, keeping them from spotting up from long range.
IOWA CITY, Iowa — Josh Oglesby scored 13 points in his season debut and No. 25 Iowa rolled to an 85-61 victory over Arkansas-Pine Bluff on Sunday.The Hawkeyes (11-2) opened their final non-conference game with a 39-5 run. Jarrod Uthoff scored 16 points and Adam Woodbury added 10.Oglesby missed Iowa's first 12 games with a broken foot. He made his first four 3-pointers during a 6-minute stretch in the first half— drawing a loud ovation from the fans in Carver-Hawkeye Arena.Tevin Hammond scored 19 points for Pine Bluff (2-9), which lost its ninth straight.The Hawkeyes shot 75 percent from the field in taking a 52-15 halftime lead. Iowa committed a season-worst 27 turnovers but dominated the rebounding 42-27.The Golden Eagles shot 33 percent from the field overall.Oglesby could become a much-needed outside shooting threat for the Hawkeyes, who rank near the bottom of the Big Ten in 3-pointers.The junior struggled last season, making only 26.9 percent of his 3-point attempts after shooting an impressive 37.2 percent as a freshman.It's unclear how Oglesby will fit into Iowa's already deep rotation. Ten Hawkeyes average at least 14 minutes a game. Iowa coach Fran McCaffery now has five guards he's comfortable playing.On one play late in the half, Iowa's Adam Woodbury fumbled his dribble on a fast break on what looked like a sure turnover. But the 7-foot-1 center recovered and wrapped a pass around his back to Aaron White for a dunk and foul.Pine Bluff outscored the Hawkeyes 46-34 in the second half. McCaffery even pulled his third team off the court in the final minute because of frustration with the sloppy play.Pine Bluff is in the middle a brutal 15-game stretch of road and neutral-site games to open its season. The Golden Lions' home opener is Jan. 18.Iowa held a moment of silence before the game for Pam Culver, the school's longtime basketball secretary who died Saturday.
COLUMBIA, S.C. — Freshman Alaina Coates scored a career-high 23 points on perfect shooting to lead No. 10 South Carolina to its 21st straight win over South Carolina State, 70-26 on Sunday.The 6-foot-4 Coates made all seven of her field goal attempts and was 9 of 9 at the free throw line for the Gamecocks (11-1), who had any easy time putting away the overmatched Lady Bulldogs (1-8) of the Mid-Eastern Athletic Conference.Coates left the game after connecting on her second three-point play with about 5 minutes left. That moved her past her old mark of 21 points set last month in a win over San Diego State. She had three of South Carolina's five blocks.Elem Ibiam added nine points and nine rebounds for the Gamecocks.South Carolina used a 19-0 run in the first half to take control.Mykala Jones led the Lady Bulldogs with seven points.South Carolina State was held to under 25 percent shooting (12 of 49), which included a 2-of-19 showing from 3-point range. Leading scorer Kourtney Williams, who averaged 18.8 points coming, was held to six points on 3-of-14 shooting.South Carolina was looking to clean up the defense that nearly let the Gamecocks down the previous game as they watched Winthrop cut a 19-point lead to 61-57 in the final minutes before holding on for a 69-61 victory.Cherisha Floyd drew the Lady Bulldogs within 10-6 on a basket about 5 minutes in when the Gamecocks took off. Coates and Tina Roy fueled the charge. Coates had an inside basket and Roy followed with a 3-pointer as South Carolina took an 18-6 lead.Roy hit a jumper and Coates followed with a three-point play and two free throws to increase the lead to 27-6. The Gamecocks led 37-12 at halftime.The Lady Bulldogs made two of their first three shots, then made just four of 23 the rest of the period. They were held scoreless for nearly 9 minutes of the period and were 0 for 7 from behind the arc.South Carolina State dropped to 0-8 on the road this season/The Lady Bulldogs begin play in the MEAC — and return home for the first time in more than five weeks — when they face Maryland-Eastern Shore on Dec. 30.The Gamecocks have one more nonconference opponent — Savannah State on Dec. 28 — before starting Southeastern Conference play at Arkansas on Jan. 2.
WEST LAFAYETTE, Ind. — KK Hauser pulled down a defensive rebound and followed it up with two clutch free throws with 21 seconds left in the game to allow No. 18 Purdue to escape with a 57-48 win over Bowling Green Sunday.Alexis Rogers' layup with under a minute to play cut the Purdue lead to three points, 51-48, but the Boilermakers responded when Hauser fed Courtney Moses for a layup. The Falcons' Jasmine Matthews missed a 3-pointer and Hauser corralled the carom seconds later, then pushed the lead to 55-48. Bridget Perry was fouled after rebounding a second missed 3-pointer by Matthews and she converted both free throws for the final margin.April Wilson scored 18 points to lead Purdue (9-2). Hauser finished with 13 points and nine rebounds and Liza Clemons and Courtney Moses each added 10 points.Rogers finished with 16 points and Jillian Halfhill added 15 for Bowling Green (9-2).
MIAMI — A 13-0 run to start the game, that was too easy for the Miami Heat.Down by seven with 90 seconds left in regulation, that's where they looked comfortable.And down by three late in overtime, that's when the Heat finally decided to put things away.LeBron James scored 38 points, Michael Beasley made two free throws with 9.2 seconds left to put Miami up for good, and the Heat beat the Atlanta Hawks 121-119 in overtime on Monday night — topping the Hawks for the ninth straight time."Obviously, after going through what we experienced last year in The Finals, it's never over," James said. "So we just keep fighting until the end, and we were able to force overtime."It didn't have the down-five, 28.2-seconds-left feel that Game 6 against San Antonio had in last June's title series.But there was much drama, much to the chagrin of Hawks coach Mike Budenholzer, an assistant on that Spurs club."They made a few big plays down the stretch and you've got to give them credit," Budenholzer said.Jeff Teague scored 26 points, Paul Millsap made seven 3-pointers on the way to a 25-point night, and Al Horford finished with 21 points and 11 rebounds for Atlanta. Kyle Korver scored 15 for the Hawks.Korver put the Hawks up 107-100 with 1:40 left in regulation by connecting on a deep 3-pointer, a well-covered one at that. It came 20 seconds after the Heat temporarily lost Chris Bosh to a cut upper lip, courtesy of an elbow by Millsap on a drive.From there, the Heat ignited.James made a pair of 3-pointers, then a dunk with 14.4 seconds left in the fourth to get the Heat within one. And after seeing something in the Hawks' defense on the play where he got the slam, he approached Heat coach Erik Spoelstra with a tweak to a play that started with the Heat down three with 14 seconds left.He adjusted Ray Allen's role on the play, and it worked. Allen got fouled by Atlanta's DeMarre Carroll while trying a 3-pointer with 8 seconds left in regulation, and needed all three free throws to tie the game."I'm not even going to comment on it," Carroll said.To overtime they went, and the Hawks were up three with 1:21 left after a score by Horford. Miami scored the game's final five points, with Chris Andersen getting three of them, plus snuffing out a lob that Atlanta threw to Korver at the rim down by one in the final seconds."We were able to stay the course, keep on grinding, get stops and execute one possession at a time," Heat coach Erik Spoelstra said.Allen finished with 19 points, Mario Chalmers and Andersen each scored 12 and Bosh finished with 11 for the Heat, who played without Dwyane Wade.One stop was all Miami needed from there, and the Heat found a way."They're an awesome offensive team," Bosh said. "They've been on a tear lately. We see why. ... It was difficult all night, but eventually we found a way."It was all part of a game that had wild ebbs and flows.The Hawks were scoreless for the game's first 4:48, falling behind big as the Heat had everything working early — even a reverse dunk in transition from the suddenly spry Allen, who has been fighting tendinitis in his right knee for a few days. Shane Battier dove on the floor for a steal and to knock the ball ahead to James, who got loose for a dunk that put Miami up 13-0.It all changed in a hurry in the second.Atlanta shot 72 percent; the Heat shot 32 percent. The Hawks outscored the Heat 31-17 and had a 54-50 lead at the break, fueled largely by Korver taking four shots, all from 3-point range, all of them good.Millsap went 4 for 4 from beyond the arc in the third, Atlanta made six in all and led by as many as 11 before going into the fourth up 84-77."There were a lot of good things we did," Millsap said.NOTES: Korver's NBA-record streak of consecutive games with a 3-pointer is now at 97. ... The Heat ran a tribute to Nelson Mandela on the arena screens at halftime, narrated by Alonzo Mourning, who spoke of his time meeting the former South African president who died earlier this month. ... Including playoffs, the Heat went 47-7 at AmericanAirlines Arena in 2013. ... James has scored in double figures in 522 consecutive regular-season games, four shy of matching Moses Malone for the NBA's fourth-longest such streak.
MEMPHIS, Tenn. — Zach Randolph scored 22 points and grabbed 10 rebounds, Jerryd Bayless added all of his 17 points in the second half and the Memphis Grizzlies beat the Utah Jazz 104-94 on Monday night.Memphis (12-15) has won two in the row after losing a season-high five straight. Bayless hit two 3-pointers in a row, one at the end of the third quarter and the other at the beginning of the fourth, to help the Grizzlies push out to an 80-71 lead.The Grizzlies' bench had a big game. Bayless was 4 of 5 from 3-point range while Mike Miller scored 15 and Jon Leuer added 11. Memphis shot 11 of 20 (55 percent) from 3-point range.Utah (8-23) was led by Trey Burke and Richard Jefferson, who each scored 18 points. Gordon Hayward added 16 points, 11 rebounds and nine assists. Derrick Favors also scored 16.Utah made several runs to keep the game close, but never led after late in the first quarter, when the Grizzlies went on an 11-0 to turn a 21-18 deficit into a 29-21 advantage.The Grizzlies pushed out to a 41-29 lead by midway through the second quarter, but nearly lost it before recovering for a 53-48 halftime lead. Randolph led all scorers with 12 first-half points while Burke had 11 for the Jazz.James Johnson — a 6-foot-9 forward who the Grizzlies signed last week from the D-League — once again received extensive playing time. He started his second straight game and played 33 minutes, contributing nine points, five rebounds, four blocks and a constant stream of energy.He swatted Hayward's 3-point attempt into the seats just before the end of the first quarter and jammed Richard Jefferson's layup attempt back in his face in the third quarter. Both blocks received huge cheers from the bench.The Grizzlies need all the energy they can get these days while trying to weather a steady stream of injuries. Tayshaun Prince sat out a third straight game because of a sore left knee.Randolph added a season-high seven assists, which was one short of his career high.NOTES: Memphis F Jon Leuer made 1 of 2 3-point attempts, which actually dropped his season mark to 14 of 26 (53.8 percent). Leuer has scored in double figures in eight of his last nine games ... Tony Allen was called a technical foul in the third quarter after shoving Utah's John Lucas III. ... The Grizzlies improved to 6-10 at FedExForum. ... The Jazz have traveled 4,684 miles on a five-game road trip in the span of eight days.
Breaking down this week's Associated Press college basketball poll:TOP TEN TIME: Wichita State, which beat Alabama and North Carolina Central last week, moved up one place in The Associated Press college basketball poll, cracking the top 10 for the first time since 2006.The Shockers (12-0) were ranked No. 8 for consecutive weeks in late December 2006 but a visit to Las Vegas ended that run.Losses to New Mexico and Southern California in the Las Vegas Classic dropped the Shockers to No. 16 and a third straight loss — Northern Iowa at home — had them out of the Top 25 for the rest of the season.The No. 8 ranking is still Wichita State's highest since being No. 2 for one week in late December 1981.The Shockers reached the Final Four last season but were ranked for just five weeks with the highest being 15th for one week in January.HOLY TOLEDO: There are nine undefeated Division I teams and eight of them are ranked in the top 14. The other unbeaten isn't even in the Top 25.Toledo (11-0) is the only team yet to lose that doesn't have a number in front of its name. The Rockets' best win of the season has been a 95-92 victory over Boston College, the only team they have played from one of the major conferences. One impressive number, however, is that five of the wins, including Boston College, have been on the road.Next up for the Rockets is Coppin State at home on Saturday and two days they are back on the road for a game at No. 15 Kansas. A win in that one would almost guarantee the Rockets their first Top 25 appearance since the final poll of 1978-79.FIRST LOSS: The number of unbeaten Division I teams took a big hit last week with five teams losing for the first time.The biggest of the losses was Saint Mary's of California's 77-71 defeat to South Carolina in the first round of the Diamond Head Classic. Massachusetts lost 60-55 to Florida State.The others were very close. Connecticut lost 53-51 to Stanford, Pittsburgh lost 44-43 to Cincinnati and Missouri lost to Illinois 65-64.Tennessee State escaped the ranks of the winless with a 108-85 victory over Fisk. Two teams — Cornell (0-11) and Grambling State (0-6) — have yet to win a game this season.EXTRA TIME: The teams ranked 12th through 14th last week all won a game in overtime.No. 12 Baylor beat Northwestern State 91-84, No. 13. Oregon beat BYU 100-96 and No. 14. North Carolina beat Davidson 97-85, all in overtime.Eight ranked teams have gone to overtime this season and their record is 7-1 with the only loss being Iowa's 88-83 defeat to Villanova, a win that started the Wildcats on their ride to No. 8 this week. Oregon, with wins over Mississippi and BYU, and Iowa, with the loss to Villanova and a win over Xavier, are the only ranked teams to play in more than one overtime game this season.DOUBLE-RANKED GAMES: The week's only double-ranked games have some history behind them.In a matchup of unbeatens, No. 8 Villanova is at No. 2 Syracuse on Saturday, a game that used to be a Big East Conference staple. The Wildcats are still in the Big East but Syracuse has moved to the Atlantic Coast Conference. Last January, in Philadelphia, the unranked Wildcats beat then-No. 3 Syracuse 75-71.The other big game on Saturday needs no explanation on why it's important: No. 6 Louisville is at No. 18 Kentucky. There may be more important things going on in the Commonwealth of Kentucky that day, but for two hours or so in the afternoon it's doubtful.ROARING TWENTIES: It wasn't a good week to be ranked in the low 20s in the AP poll last week: No. 20 Colorado lost to No. 7 Oklahoma State; No. 21 Gonzaga lost to Kansas State; No. 22. UMass lost to Florida State; and No. 23 Missouri lost to Illinois 65-64.The all stayed in the poll this week, however, as the three teams just outside the Top 25 last week — UCLA, Pittsburgh and Saint Mary's, Calif. — all lost as well.
Arizona is No. 1 in The Associated Press college basketball poll for the third straight week.The Wildcats (12-0) are again a runaway choice, receiving 63 No. 1 votes from the 65-member national media panel Monday.Syracuse drew the other No. 1 votes and was No. 2, with the top eight teams holding their spots from last week.Ohio State is third followed by Wisconsin, Michigan State, Louisville, Oklahoma State and Villanova. Duke drops to ninth after it was tied for eighth last week with Villanova. Wichita State is No. 10, its first top 10 ranking since spending two weeks at No. 8 in December 2006.The rest of the Top 25 teams remained the same despite Nos. 20-23 — Colorado, Gonzaga, Massachusetts and Missouri — all losing a game.
LOS ANGELES — The situation looked bleak at best for the coach Doc Rivers' Clippers — down by four points with 18 seconds left in the fourth quarter. Then a couple of defensive stops, a huge turnover by Minnesota's Kevin Martin, and two clutch baskets by Jamal Crawford forced overtime.That's where Jared Dudley and Chris Paul took over. Dudley made a go-ahead 3-pointer with 38 seconds remaining in OT and Paul added five free throws in the final 19 seconds, leading Los Angeles to a 120-116 victory over the Minnesota Timberwolves on Sunday night."The biggest thing we learned as a team from Doc is, even in practice, he talks about 'The game is not over," Paul said. "When we got down three or four there with seconds left, we could've said we lost this one. But we fought hard."Blake Griffin had 32 points and 10 rebounds and was 10 for 11 from the free throw line before fouling out with 4:08 left in OT. The defending Pacific Division champions extended their winning streak to a season-best five games while beating the Timberwolves for the eighth straight time, their longest current streak against any opponent.Jamal Crawford had 22 points for Los Angeles, 7-4 since losing starting forward J.J. Redick with a broken right hand and a torn ligament in his wrist but 5-0 since Crawford was moved into the starting lineup. Paul finished with 19 points and 13 assists.Kevin Love had a season-high 45 points and tied a season best with 19 rebounds for the Timberwolves, back at Staples Center after their 104-91 loss to the Lakers on Friday night. It was Minnesota's first overtime game since beating Orlando at home on opening night."We just blew it. Blew the game. I don't know how else to say it. We blew the game," Love said.Nikola Pekovic had a career-high 34 points and 14 boards. Martin scored 16 points after averaging 29 in the Timberwolves' other two meetings against the Clippers — also narrow losses. Point guard Ricky Rubio played 38 scoreless minutes with 12 assists."It was a tough loss for a lot of reasons. That's all I have to say," coach Rick Adelman said. "I don't want to say anything. I don't want to get fined.""We need to know how to win and play hard all the way to the end," Pekovic said. "Winning is a habit, like everything else. We still need to get over the hump to learn how to close out these games."Matt Barnes, in his second game back following an eye injury, was ejected with 56 seconds left in the third quarter after committing a flagrant 2 foul against Love on a drive to the basket with the Clippers leading 77-75. Love sank both free throws, then added a go-ahead 3-pointer when Minnesota retained possession.Minnesota was leading 106-102 before the Clippers forced OT. Crawford made a driving layup and a dunk after Paul forced Martin into his critical turnover. Pekovic then missed an 11-footer and a 20-footer in the final 2 seconds of regulation.Pekovic had a chance to redeem himself, but missed a 5-foot baseline hook shot and Paul canned two free throws at the other end to seal the victory."We just played so hard for something like that to go down," Martin said. "But we'll bounce back from it."Griffin powered the Clippers to a 56-54 halftime lead with 20 points, offsetting 22 points by Love — the second straight game in which Love had at least 20 in the first half.Referee Marc Davis made a questionable foul call against Griffin — his third of the game — as Love initiated contact while trying a desperation, buzzer-beating shot from at least 10 feet behind the midcourt line before intermission. Love made all three free throws.NOTES: Minnesota is 7-6 when Love gets 15 or more rebounds. In his six seasons with the Timberwolves, they are just 39-61 under those circumstances — including a woeful 9-33 mark in 2010-11. ... A year ago at this time, the Clippers had won 12 straight en route to a franchise-record 17-game streak. ... Love has had 10 or more rebounds in 11 straight games, tying Griffin for the league's longest such streak this season. ... The Timberwolves (13-14) haven't been more than two games above or below .500 since beating Boston on Nov. 16 to go 7-4.
Shabazz Napier scored 15 of his 20 points in the second half and grabbed 6 rebounds to lead No. 10 Connecticut to an 82-70 victory at Washington on Sunday.Napier's fellow guard Ryan Boatwright had 16 points and 5 rebounds, and Lasan Kromah scored 14 points for UConn (10-1), which fell into a double-digit hole early in its first true road game of the season but controlled the game in the second half.C. J. Wilcox led Washington (6-5) with 19 points and had 4 assists. Darin Johnson had 13 points for Washington, and Mike Anderson, who is from Hartford, added 10 points.UConn was coming off its first loss of the season, 53-51 to Stanford at home Wednesday. In that game, UConn was 5 of 31 from the field and 0 for 12 on 3-pointers in the second half.The early going against Washington was not much better, as UConn missed its first six shots from behind the arc while Washington built a double-digit lead.WICHITA ST. 77, N.C. CENTRAL 66 Darius Carter scored 19 points to help No. 11 Wichita State (12-0) overcome Jeremy Ingram's 37-point night in a win at home over North Carolina Central (7-3).BAYLOR 81, SOUTHERN 56 Isaiah Austin had 14 points and 10 rebounds as No. 12 Baylor (10-1) won its 10th straight home game, beating Southern (3-9).IOWA ST. 79, GEORGE MASON 67 Georges Niang scored 22 points as No. 17 Iowa State (9-0) beat George Mason (5-5) in the first round of the Diamond Head Classic in Honolulu.IOWA 85, ARK.-PINE BLUFF 61 Josh Oglesby scored 13 points in his season debut as No. 25 Iowa (11-2) rolled to a victory at home over Arkansas-Pine Bluff (2-9).RUTGERS 75, ARMY 72 Myles Mack hit a 3-pointer from the top of the arc with 3.5 seconds left to give Rutgers (6-7) a victory at home over Army (3-7).SETON HALL 92, E. WASH. 70 The freshman guard Jaren Sina scored 14 points and had 8 assists, powering Seton Hall (8-4) to a win over visiting Eastern Washington (5-5).STONY BROOK 76, CORNELL 54 Jameel Warney scored 14 points and grabbed 7 rebounds to lead Stony Brook (9-4) over visiting Cornell (0-11), the only Division I team without a win.MARIST 76, PENN 62 Khallid Hart had 21 points to pace Marist (3-9) in a win over visiting Penn (2-7).DUKE 69, KENTUCKY 61 Tricia Liston scored a season-high 28 points to help visiting No. 2 Duke beat No. 5 Kentucky.The 6-foot-1 Liston shot 10 of 19 from the field, including two 3-pointers. The Blue Devils (12-1) stifled Kentucky (11-1) around the basket, limiting the Wildcats to 25-of-75 shooting (33 percent) and 3 of 15 from 3-point range.NOTRE DAME 106, CENT. MICH. 72 Jewell Loyd had a career-high 30 points and 11 rebounds for No. 4 Notre Dame (10-0), which never trailed in a blowout of visiting Central Michigan (4-6).S. CAROLINA 70, S. CAR. ST. 26 Alaina Coates scored a career-high 23 points on perfect shooting to lead No. 10 South Carolina (11-1) to its 21st straight win over visiting South Carolina State (1-8).
EAST RUTHERFORD, N.J. — It may be futile when one is chased by a shark in deep water to question the decision to have gone swimming in the first place. But regret is a common human experience, and so it is fair to wonder if Billy King is feeling any as his master plan for winning an N.B.A. championship appears to have fractured like the fifth metatarsal in Brook Lopez's right foot.Will there be a time — like right now — when he might have to admit that the Nets' daring mission to win at all costs has become an unmitigated failure and that the best option is to at least explore reversing course?"Not at this point," King, the Nets' general manager, said Sunday at the team's practice facility. "We're not there."Where King and the Nets are after losing Lopez, their center and leading scorer, for the season is even more apparent than when they were beaten at the buzzer in overtime in Philadelphia on Friday night and slunk off the floor with a 9-17 record. X-rays taken afterward revealed Lopez's third fracture of the same foot, adding gloom to distress around a franchise that had such a celebratory summer — which, unfortunately, is when projected success is worth the paper it is printed on.This is not meant to second-guess the deal that brought Paul Pierce and Kevin Garnett to Brooklyn, because many folks in the news media gallery — myself included — thought it was a splendid idea, the cost of draft picks notwithstanding. The problem has turned out to be less with the former Celtics than with Lopez and Deron Williams, whom they were brought in to support.Lopez, 25, may be following the career path of Yao Ming, who, like Lopez, was a picture of health for his first three N.B.A. seasons before foot problems derailed him. Williams, 29, seemed like the ideal point guard to build a team around when the Nets acquired him in early 2011, but he has proved fragile in multiple ways, less than the sum of his talented parts.Even fully healthy, the Nets' foundational pieces are good, not great, and that has had a diminishing effect on everyone else in their splurge of roughly $183 million (including payroll taxes)."Oh, we got plenty of guys that can play the 5 and the 4," Jason Kidd, the rookie coach, said of the center and power forward positions that must now be restructured. Noting that he finally had the back-pained Andrei Kirilenko on the practice court as the Nets prepared for the Indiana Pacers on Monday night in Brooklyn, Kidd added, "This team was built for depth."Not surprisingly, depth became the post-Lopez mantra, and in a conference as forgiving as the N.B.A.'s Eastern, the Nets — again, on paper, worth the change in the pocket of their owner, Mikhail D. Prokhorov — should still have enough talent to contend for the playoffs.Having spent so much of Prokhorov's money, they could add another frontcourt player, like the disgruntled Houston center Omer Asik, a better defender than Lopez but offensively inept."When you get an injury like this, everybody calls you," King said. "There's no imminent deal. We're not going to panic."That would obviously be the owner's prerogative, even if everything the Nets have done, all the No. 1 picks they have traded for a 9-17 team, can be traced to Prokhorov's introductory promise to produce a championship in relatively short order, or at least to arrive in Brooklyn with a team to be reckoned with.The alternative path would have been to recognize that the novelty of Barclays Center would have given the Nets a two- to three-year window to build from the ground up. They might have let the Knicks continue to overspend, mortgage their future and deflate their fan base.But Prokhorov gave King the green light and the cash to out-Knick the Knicks. The acquisition of Williams was presumably a response to the Knicks' trade for Carmelo Anthony. The sacrifice of their 2012 draft position to Portland (hello, Damian Lillard) for Gerald Wallace was done to persuade Williams to re-sign, as was the deal for Joe Johnson. If you are scoring and second-guessing at home, forget Pierce and Garnett — go back to the beginning.Whatever King does from here, the odds are that there will come a time when he or his successor will have to turn the Nets from buyers into sellers and start all over again. If there is no turnaround, the Nets will at least have to try to shop some of their expensive pieces come the February trade deadline or during the usual flurry of activity around the college draft in June.They were on the upswing for about a week, winning four of five games, getting healthy. Then they lost to Washington at home and surrendered 121 points to the lowly 76ers, and it no longer seemed like a good idea to brag on how Kidd had changed the defenses of his departed assistant, Lawrence Frank.Having missed the Philadelphia game for personal reasons, Johnson, watching on television, saw Lopez take a fall and grab his foot. He called the trainer, Tim Walsh, after the game and was told the bad news."I was devastated, man," Johnson said. "It seems like we can't catch a break."The word use was unintentional but fateful. Another broken foot for Lopez begets the question, How long before it's time to break up the Nets?
CHAPEL HILL, N.C. — Sylvia Hatchell is fighting to get back to her North Carolina women's basketball program as quickly as possible.The recently inducted Naismith Hall of Fame coach has been away from sideline duties since October while receiving treatment for leukemia. She spent a month in the hospital for the first round of chemotherapy with more ahead as she holds out hope of getting back by conference tournament time."You don't realize, especially after all this time, how much something means to you until you don't have it," Hatchell said in an interview with The Associated Press."It was like a tsunami hit me and all of a sudden it's taken away. But that's my motivation, to get back out there."Hatchell, 61, said she feels great and even attended Saturday's win against High Point, the first time she watched her No. 10 Tar Heels play in person this year.She returns to the hospital Friday for her next five-day round of chemotherapy, the second of at least three and maybe four "consolidation" sessions to complete her treatment. Her chances of returning this year depending largely on how her immune system recovers each time.Dr. Pete Voorhees, the oncologist overseeing her treatment at UNC's Lineberger Comprehensive Cancer Center, said last month physicians were "extremely pleased" with her progress."I haven't had one test come back and knock me down, so the only thing I've got against me is my age," she said with a laugh.Hatchell, in her 28th season at UNC, has more than 900 career victories, eight Atlantic Coast Conference tournament titles, three Final Fours and the 1994 NCAA championship. With longtime assistant Andrew Calder leading UNC on the sideline, Hatchell has remained involved by reviewing practice and game video, conferring with her staff and meeting with her players.This is the first time she's missed games since missing two in January 1989 due to the birth of her son, Van."Coach Hatchell still makes the decisions," said Ivory Latta, UNC's career scoring leader and a first-year assistant coach. "She definitely still calls the shots. We still play the way she wants us to play."While she misses her team, Hatchell said she's blessed because her illness was caught early. She works to stay positive as she would coach her players to do and leans on her faith."I've had moments," she said. "The biggest thing is in the mornings when I open my eyes, sometimes I'll close my eyes again like, 'Wake up, this is a bad dream.'"The trouble started after a routine physical shortly before her Naismith induction in September. A test showed a low white blood cell count, though Hatchell felt fine and stuck to her busy schedule full of recruiting visits and speaking engagements.She eventually developed a sore throat, though doctors weren't able to find the cause of her low white count in subsequent tests.Hatchell soon started feeling fatigued and contacted the Lineberger Center — she's been a supporter and donor for years — to get the bone marrow test that found the answer.Voorhees told her to report to the hospital the next day, staying for a week of heavy chemotherapy followed by three weeks of recovery.She stayed with her exercise regimen to minimize the side effects, walking laps around her hospital wing or using strength bands and weights in her room. She wouldn't get in bed other than to sleep. She refused to wear a hospital gown, opting to stay in team apparel down to slippers that look like athletic shoes.When she started losing her hair, Hatchell had her head shaved — pausing long enough to see herself with a Mohawk — while some of the friends who took shifts staying overnights with her in the hospital took photos and videos in a makeshift party. She's wearing a wig as her hair grows back.She tells people asking what they can do for her at Christmas to donate blood and platelets as well as to get tested for bone marrow matches for transplants — which she might need one day if her cancer returns.For now, she's filling her time by watching old TV shows and spending extra time with her golden retriever, Maddie.And these days of waiting can't go by fast enough."My doctors are very encouraging and very confident that they're going to get me back out there," Hatchell said. "It's just going to take some time."
ORLANDO — The Knicks were not, by all appearances, in a good place when they arrived here to play the Magic on Monday. Before the team's morning shootaround at Amway Center, Carmelo Anthony talked about quiet conversations with teammates, about players who seemed distracted, about the endless search for solutions.He even used the phrase "mental status" — a new one amid a season that has featured staples like "trying to figure it out" and "I don't know."Their season has been a disaster of such cinematic proportions that even their victories are laden with bad breaks. So perhaps it was entirely appropriate that the Knicks would escape with a 103-98 win as two of their starters limped off the court with injuries.Anthony sprained his left ankle early in the third quarter when he landed on Tobias Harris's foot. Anthony removed himself from the game and briefly sat on the bench before hobbling to the locker room. He sounded optimistic that he would be able to play Wednesday against the Oklahoma City Thunder."I don't want to miss that game," said Anthony, who led the Knicks with 19 points in just 24 minutes. "The good thing is I'm able to walk with a little bit of pain."Anthony, who missed two games after spraining his left ankle last season, watched the fourth quarter on a television in the locker room. He soon had company. Raymond Felton strained his groin after sitting out six games with an injured hamstring. He said he felt a pop.Anthony and Felton both said they would be re-evaluated Tuesday morning, further congesting the trainer's room. Pablo Prigioni (toe), Kenyon Martin (strained abdominal) and Metta World Peace, who announced he would be undergoing platelet-rich plasma therapy on his left knee early next month, did not play against the Magic. Mike Woodson looked as if he needed a spa retreat."We fought today," he said. "I applaud our guys."If there was one thing the Knicks (9-18) had going for them before the game, it was their opponent. The Magic (8-20) are young and vulnerable, a soft mattress upon which countless other teams have thrown themselves when they need a break from the rigors of the N.B.A. schedule.Though the Knicks did not win so much as survive — the Magic took a pair of garden shears to the Knicks' 25-point lead, cutting it to 1 early in the fourth quarter — they did reveal glimpses of atypical play: good passing, decent defense and solid chemistry, at least for a while, at least until Anthony went out.The Knicks have grown increasingly reliant on Anthony, who has led the team in scoring every game this season. He entered Monday averaging a league-high 41.3 minutes per game, and he has consistently produced for a team in dire need of points, rebounds, group therapy — anything and everything.Monday's game was another indication of his importance. The Knicks were leading, 72-52, when he left the game, and they looked lost without him. The Magic pounded the ball inside and hacked away at the lead with frightening efficiency, trimming it from 20 to 15, from 10 to 5."All teams make runs," Woodson said, "and they made a hell of a run."After a quiet first half, Andrea Bargnani unearthed his shooting stroke at an opportune time, canning consecutive jumpers. Iman Shumpert followed with a steal and a layup for a 97-91 lead, and later made a terrific defensive play on Glen Davis to prevent an open-court layup. "Huge plays," Bargnani said.The last time the Knicks faced the Magic, on Dec. 6, they ran away with a 121-83 victory — one night after obliterating the Nets. At the time, it looked as if the Knicks were emerging from the jumbled mess that was their season. It turned out to be a premature assessment.Over the subsequent eight games, the Knicks went 3-5, their flirtation with mediocrity quickly tumbling into a familiar gulf of incompetence. There was a 41-point loss to the Boston Celtics. There was a double-overtime victory over the Milwaukee Bucks, arguably the worst team in the league. And, finally, there was Saturday's dispiriting loss to the Memphis Grizzlies, a contest waged before boo birds at Madison Square Garden.Over those eight games, the Knicks got scant production from J. R. Smith, who shot 32 percent. He showed signs of emerging from his funk against the Magic, finishing with 18 points and sparking the Knicks in the first half.The Knicks built a huge lead in the second quarter, outscoring the Magic by 36-14. Coincidence or not, the Knicks did their damage with Bargnani on the bench and with Anthony operating at power forward. Late in the quarter, Smith pulled up in transition for a 3-pointer that gave the Knicks a 62-39 lead."When we get stops and run like that, we're a tough team to beat," Smith said. "We had guys feeling good about their offensive game."Nothing has come easily for the Knicks, though, and they cannot escape injury. Felton was considered a game-time decision, and he collected 13 points and 4 assists before he took a hard fall in the fourth quarter, ending his night. He said his new injury was unrelated to his old ones.Anthony said he was optimistic because the ankle injury he had sustained last season was more severe. "No comparison," he said.As Anthony departed the locker room, a group of fans chanted "Melo! Melo!" He waved, then limped to the bus.
If the gulf in quality in the Eastern Conference has not been made clear enough each day in the standings, it was cruelly personified and reiterated Monday night at Barclays Center.The Indiana Pacers, the top team in the conference standings, embarrassed the Nets, outdoing them in all facets on their way to an easy 103-86 victory. The Nets spiraled to a 9-18 record, and Coach Jason Kidd afterward suggested his players might be worryingly comfortable with the pitiable state of affairs."I think it's getting very close to just accepting losing," Kidd said, the knot in his tie halfway down his chest. "We're kind of getting comfortable with losing, and we've got to make a stand with that," he went on, "because when things get tough, do we just give in? Most of the time, right now, we do."In this unpleasant way, the Pacers provided a blunt measuring stick for the Nets. The Nets, after all, have been talking about a championship since the roster was retooled this summer. Indiana was precisely the sort of team they were constructed to compete against. But that was simply not the case Monday.The Pacers (23-5) are just one of three teams over .500 in the sorry Eastern Conference. They came to Barclays Center having dispatched their previous two opponents by a combined score of 220-160, and they extended their run of dominance Monday. After wearing the Nets down over the first two, scrappy quarters, they hit the open floor in more stylish fashion to run away with the game."We're a confident team that believes in ourselves and is never going to shy away from our goals and wanting to win a championship," Pacers Coach Frank Vogel said.Lance Stephenson, 23, a Brooklyn native, produced a swaggering, all-around performance to lead the Pacers, finishing with 26 points, 7 rebounds, 5 assists and 2 steals.When the game was over, Stephenson walked off the floor with his hands raised over his head, and he received a cheer from some fans assembled near the tunnel. No player on the Nets had matched his athleticism, his effort or his charisma."I was just very motivated and very hyped for this game," said Stephenson, who had several family members watching him from the stands.The Nets as a group are on the opposite end of the spectrum. They shot 38.2 percent, going just 6 for 26 from 3-point range. Joe Johnson had a quiet 17 points to lead them.The Nets trailed by 6 points at halftime, but they were outscored 30-19 in the third quarter. And as their effort was disintegrating, the game took another unseemly turn.The Pacers' George Hill was racing down the court on a fast break when Paul Pierce ran alongside him at high speed and dragged him to the floor, clobbering him in the head. Upon reviewing the play, the referees determined the foul was a flagrant foul-2, and Pierce was ejected from the game with 4 minutes 22 seconds left in the third quarter.George, who was slow to get up but was not hurt, did not seem to have an issue with the play. "Hard fouls are part of the game," he said.Pierce did not speak to reporters after the game. He missed all seven of his shots and finished a game without a point for the first time since March 1999, his rookie season. His performance encapsulated the Nets' night.Deron Williams (9 points, 8 assists) said the Nets were not confident, but he disputed his coach's theory that they were growing comfortable. "I'm not comfortable with losing," he said. "It's not fun."The Nets were beginning life without center Brook Lopez, who will miss the rest of the season after fracturing the fifth metatarsal in his right foot in Friday's loss to Philadelphia. Mirza Teletovic played power forward — starting for the third time in his career — while Kevin Garnett shifted to center. They combined to go 6 for 20 from the field and had nine rebounds.The Nets received a small lift in the return of guard Jason Terry, who had not played since Nov. 20 while battling left knee soreness. He played more than 15 minutes and scored 11 points. He said the Pacers were simply firmer in their group identity."For us, it's a process, and it's going to take us a while to get there," Terry said. "But they've set the bar very high."On Monday, the bar seemed far out of the Nets' reach.
Lance Stephenson prepped for his pre-Christmas return to Brooklyn, the borough of his youth, with a festive Sunday in Indianapolis, where, as a basketball player, he has, by leaps and bounds, apparently grown up.In an Indiana Pacers' rout of the Boston Celtics, Stephenson filled the box score with 12 points, 10 rebounds and 10 assists, his third triple-double in what has been a breakout season for the player once celebrated as "Born Ready."This, of course, was high school hyperbole bordering on unwitting parody, and too often as applied to New York City basketball prodigies a self-immolating malady. Fortunately for Stephenson, who not long ago seemed on a fast track to failure, he has developed in a secure N.B.A. environment, antithetical to what currently exists in his native New York."He has totally reinvented himself," said Tom Konchalski, the Queens-based scout and savant of city scholastic hoops. "He plays more Indiana basketball than he does New York City basketball. He's a Hoosier now."Explosive off the dribble yet under control, keen-eyed and alert at both ends of the floor, Stephenson had a career-high 26 points, 7 rebounds and 5 assists as the 23-5 Pacers smothered the reeling Nets, 103-86, on Monday night at Barclays Center. It turned out that Sunday's triple-double was just a warm-up.For Eastern Conference-leading Indiana, Stephenson is the team leader in assists (5.1 a game), while averaging 13.4 points and 6.7 rebounds. Not bad for a 6-foot-5, 23-year-old guard who, until last season, was a bench warmer best known for flashing LeBron James a choke sign in the playoffs and taking a retaliatory forearm to the neck by a former Miami scrub named Dexter Pittman."Every shot I think is going in," Stephenson said after his eye-opening homecoming. "That's how confident I am right now."A behavioral work in progress, Stephenson still arouses opponents — and his coach, Frank Vogel — with occasional look-at-me indulgences. Most recently, James seethed and promised the Pacers star Paul George that he would "remember that" after Stephenson dunked and preened in the final seconds of a victory over the Heat."He does some irritating things," said Donnie Walsh, who subbed for Larry Bird as the Pacers' president last season and has remained with the organization since Bird's return. "But other than that, in the last two years, there's nothing I've seen from this kid that doesn't make me think he can be really good."It was Walsh, while running the Knicks, who helped Stephenson land in Indiana when he refused to take him in the 2010 draft — not once, but twice, with consecutive second-round selections. Do Andy Rautins (38th pick) and Landry Fields (39th) ring a bell?Bird took a chance on Stephenson with the 40th pick, and while Walsh would have to say "oops" on that, such was Stephenson's reputation as a tempestuous presence after one lukewarm college season (at Cincinnati) and all the Born Ready hoopla at Lincoln High School in Brooklyn.Coming behind Lincoln predecessors Stephon Marbury and Sebastian Telfair — both of whom were disappointing pros for different reasons — Stephenson was also dealing with the growing notion that New York City players were legends only in their own minds.In a recent telephone interview, Konchalski said: "In high school, Lance's whole focus was on scoring, on breaking Telfair's state record, which he did. Now he's one of the best rebounding and passing wings in the league, he guards multiple positions and his own scoring is almost secondary."Would such a transformation have occurred under the dropped ceiling and circus of Madison Square Garden? The answer might be the next question: When was the last time the Knicks really nurtured and retained a good, young player?Brooklyn may not have been a much different professional environment and possibly would have been worse, given all the home borough distractions.When he arrived in Indianapolis, Stephenson was not exactly beloved, and center Roy Hibbert described him with a rather profane noun. "He'd tell you that himself," said Hibbert, who credited the former center, Jeff Foster, for "settling him down."As Stephenson put it, "A lot of good vets put me in my place." According to Walsh, Stephenson is now the protégé of the no-nonsense power forward David West. When he crosses the line, he will hear it from West, Vogel and even Bird, one of the great trash talkers but in a more clandestine way.Bird once believed Stephenson might have the most natural talent of anyone he drafted, probably a reach now that George has ascended to the league's elite. Still, Stephenson, George and Hibbert give the Pacers a nucleus of players still getting better, making the recently activated former All-Star Danny Granger expendable."Everything he does is very efficient, instinctive," Walsh said of Stephenson. "He can get past his man almost every time, and he has a great knack for finding guys under the basket and out in the corners, which is what we do, spacing the floor."Stephenson and George were the best players by an Indiana mile at Barclays, where Stephenson needed about 25 tickets for relatives and friends."I'm going to be broke," he said, scraping by on a low-end N.B.A. salary of slightly less than $1 million.By next summer, entering free agency, he will be in line for a hefty raise."This is a great team — I'd love to stay," he said, while knowing that the small-market Pacers will have to be creative to keep him and avoid the dreaded luxury tax.For his part, Stephenson may want to take a hard look at the state of the game in his home city and remember how much a stable workplace is worth to an emerging N.B.A. player, born ready or not.
HONOLULU — Iowa State is flying home from its holiday trip to Hawaii with three more wins and its best start in school history.The No. 14 Cyclones beat Boise State 70-66 on Wednesday night to win the Diamond Head Classic, recovering from a season-low 27 points in the first half.The 70 total points also was a season low, but the result was still the only one they've known so far — the latest of 11 wins."We've only played eight games coming into this tournament so it was very important to get these and take care of business and give us some momentum heading into conference," Iowa State coach Fred Hoiberg said.DeAndre Kane scored 23 points, winning tournament MVP honors for his three-game performance. Iowa State beat George Mason and Akron to get to the final.Kane hit a 3-pointer with less than 2 minutes left to help seal the win for the Cyclones. Boise State's Derrick Marks had a chance to tie with less than 30 seconds left, but missed a 15-foot jumper.Melvin Ejim had 15 points and 10 rebounds, and Georges Niang had 16 points."The guys do a great job of sharing the ball and being unselfish and understanding who's got the best mismatch out there on the floor," Hoiberg said. "DeAndre did a great job getting to spots and making the right play. Georges hit some huge shots for us and Melvin did what he always does for us by getting us extra possessions."Kane said he, Ejim and Niang are "like a brotherhood.""We hang together every day and all day and when one guy gets it rolling we know that we're going to that guy no matter what," he said.Iowa State pushed beyond its best-ever start after tying it Monday. The Cyclones started with 10 straight wins in the 1996-97 season en route to a final 16 appearance in the NCAA tournament.Iowa State came back after making less than a third of its shots in the first half, improving to 50 percent in the second half, including 6 of 13 3-pointers (46.2 percent)."In the first half we were a little stagnant on offense, guys were shooting shots, not running back and we weren't as hungry as we were in the first half as we were in the second half," Kane said. "(Boise State) came out really aggressive and they got up big on us."Kane put Iowa State within a point about 6 minutes into the second half. Kane took two dribbles with his right hand near the top of the key, then hit a jumper and was fouled. He missed a free throw to tie, but Ejim pulled down the rebound and hit a layup to give the Cyclones their first lead of the game.Marks tied it at 60 with a jumper and a 3-pointer on consecutive possessions, but Iowa State responded with two free throws and a straightaway 3-pointer by Kane with less than 2 minutes left.Boise State coach Leon Rice said there's a reason Iowa State is undefeated."Nobody's been able to do it and I think we did a great job both offensively and defensively," he said. "We had a chance to be there at the end and that's what we wanted, but they know how to make plays, they know how to win games and there's a reason they're undefeated."Kane, Ejim and Georges Niang were selected to the tournament's all-tournament team, winning trophies etched in paddles for canoes or paddle surfing. Anthony Drmic made the all-tournament team for Boise State.
The last time the Chicago Bulls were in Brooklyn, they sent the Nets tumbling out of the playoffs and into a period of soul-searching. The Nets were deemed too soft. There was no core, no spine. They would need to be retooled and rebranded.The Nets made various highly trumpeted changes this summer designed to solve those issues and avoid a similar playoff embarrassment this season. And yet, when the Bulls return to Barclays Center on Wednesday for the first time since that first-round Game 7 playoff victory, they will face a team that is more adrift than ever.On Tuesday, the morning after Coach Jason Kidd questioned whether his team was growing too comfortable with losing, some of his players suggested the team had yet to form a defining character. Such a sentiment is coming from a team that has already played 27 games, helping to explain why it has lost 18 of them."I don't think we have an identity," said Kevin Garnett, who was traded to the Nets this year and had been expected to set a new tone. "I don't know what we are."Garnett said the "moving parts" — presumably the integration of new players into a new system, along with the team's numerous injuries — had slowed the process of self-discovery. He said the defense, ranked 27th in the league in points allowed per 100 possessions, had fallen into disarray because the Nets had to learn a new system during training camp and then scrap much of it when the assistant Lawrence Frank was relieved of his duties.Wednesday's game has lost much of its expected glamour as the Nets and the Bulls have struggled. The Bulls (10-16), who overcame injury and illness to oust the Nets last season, have not showed similar resilience since losing point guard Derrick Rose, once a most valuable player, to another knee injury this season, only 10 games after he returned from one that cost him all last season. They are also likely to be without their leading scorer, Luol Deng, who has a sore left Achilles' tendon.Still, the opponent has hardly mattered to the Nets. They are defeating themselves as much as their foes are beating them. Injuries to several key players have been a continual problem, but Kidd has begun questioning his team's effort. He has been particularly upset about the defense and rebounding. The team ranks 24th in rebound rate, the percentage of total available rebounds collected.Joe Johnson said he agreed with Garnett's assessment. He implied that the Nets' scatterbrained state had made them vulnerable in key situations."I don't think we kind of know or understand what kind of team we are, offensively or defensively," Johnson said Tuesday. "It's hurt us in a lot of games. We've lost a lot of close games."He added, "I don't know when we're going to figure it out, or how we're going to figure it out, but we have to."As much as they have admitted their struggles, the Nets' players have disagreed with Kidd's assessment from Monday night that they were getting "close to just accepting losing."Kidd added: "When things get tough, do we just give in? Most of the time, right now, we do."Garnett said he and his teammates were not wired to accept losing."Obviously, we're going through a tough time, and that's his assessment," he said of Kidd, "but I don't think that's true."Johnson said the Nets understood what was at stake this season and had not lost their focus or motivation. But he added that they had developed bad habits, like hanging their heads, or not getting back on defense after turning the ball over or missing a shot."It's very glaring things, man, that we definitely have to clean up," Johnson said.And they are far from the only things. During a news conference shortly before training camp, Kidd said the identity of last season's Nets team was "just vanilla."And that was a group that had won 49 games in the regular season. What, then, is the identity of this team now?Paul Pierce was fined $15,000 "for making excessive and unnecessary contact with George Hill of the Indiana Pacers," the N.B.A. announced Tuesday. Pierce was issued a flagrant foul-2 and ejected midway through the third quarter Monday night after he delivered a hard foul near Hill's head on a breakaway layup attempt. Pierce has not made himself available for comment about the incident.
ORLANDO, Fla. — Carmelo Anthony was the last player to leave the locker room after Monday's game here against the Magic, and he was dressed for the trip back to New York: slim-fitting slacks, blue sweater, pageboy cap. As far as these things go, he looked composed.He could not hide his limp, however, and within the Knicks' already topsy-turvy environment, yet another injury — this one to the team's leading scorer — ran the risk of erasing what little momentum they had gained with a narrow win over one of the worst teams in the league.For the Knicks (9-18), there can be no joy without grief. There can be no victory without struggle. And they cannot play 48 minutes without someone twisting an ankle, straining a hamstring or damaging some other appendage.They are huge consumers of medical tape. It is a habit they cannot shake.It has been a frustrating season for Anthony in particular. Because of the team's poor play and an evaporating depth chart, Coach Mike Woodson has leaned on him to play heavy minutes — the most per game in the league and the most of his career.Even before Anthony sprained his left ankle against the Magic, which cast some doubt over his availability for Wednesday's game against the Oklahoma City Thunder (22-5) at Madison Square Garden, Woodson acknowledged that the situation was far from ideal. Anthony's game is based on absorbing contact from defenders, and creating a fair share of his own, so he tends to relish what little time he gets to recuperate on the bench.But Woodson has been coaching the team with increasing desperation, to save the Knicks' season and perhaps his own job. Consider Tyson Chandler, who played 37 minutes last week against the Milwaukee Bucks in his return after missing six weeks with a fractured right leg. Woodson said he had "no choice." So Chandler played and played, until he finally began having cramps in overtime. Anthony played 55 minutes in that game.On Monday, Anthony sprained his ankle while battling for a rebound with the Magic's Tobias Harris.He attempted to walk it off on the sideline before determining that he was in too much pain, a rare admission for him. He retreated to the locker room after a season-low 24 minutes, and watched bits and pieces of the Knicks' 103-98 victory on television as he iced his ankle and kept it elevated."I'm walking," Anthony said in response to a question about whether he was in serious discomfort.The Knicks said Anthony's availability on Wednesday would be a game-time decision, which was widely interpreted as good news. Anthony indicated that he hoped to play."I don't want to miss that game," he said. "It's Christmas in the Garden."In an interview Tuesday on ESPN Radio, Woodson said Anthony had received treatment at the team's training facility in Greenburgh, N.Y. Woodson said Anthony would be reassessed on Wednesday morning after another round of treatment. "We've got to weigh it out," Woodson said.One Knick who will not play is Raymond Felton, who returned to the lineup against the Magic after missing six games with a hamstring injury and proceeded to strain his right groin in the fourth quarter. The Knicks said Felton would meet with the team's training staff on Wednesday to decide on a timetable for his return.Anthony has become close to indispensable for the Knicks. He might be addicted to isolation sets, but he is averaging 26.3 points and shooting 44.7 percent while facing waves of defenders. He is also averaging 8.8 rebounds in 39.4 minutes per game, both career highs.There was always the danger that Anthony's heavy workload might cost him. Injuries are sometimes the product of fatigue. Pablo Prigioni, 36, broke his toe last week when he tripped running upcourt against the Washington Wizards after he had averaged 34 minutes in the previous three games — a significant increase in his playing time in the absence of Felton.Now both players are sidelined."We've been an injury-prone team," J. R. Smith said. "But we've always had guys who step in and fill those roles, and that's what's going to have to keep happening."If Anthony misses Wednesday's game, it would most likely mean more shot attempts for Smith and Andrea Bargnani, who was on the bench when the Knicks built a huge early lead against the Magic. He returned to hit a pair of key jumpers, an encouraging sign for a player whose contributions have been questionable.When Anthony sprained his left ankle last season, he missed just two games — and he said that sprain was more severe."Melo's a tough kid," Woodson said. "He doesn't sit down that often."Anthony dismissed the suggestion that it might be in his best interests to miss a game or two, lest he rush back and cause additional damage."I'm hardheaded when it comes to that sometimes," he said.
ORLANDO, Fla. — Carmelo Anthony was the last player to leave the locker room after Monday's game here against the Magic, and he was dressed for the trip back to New York: slim-fitting slacks, blue sweater, pageboy cap. As far as these things go, he looked composed.He could not hide his limp, however, and within the Knicks' already topsy-turvy environment, yet another injury — this one to the team's leading scorer — ran the risk of erasing what little momentum they had gained with a narrow win over one of the worst teams in the league.For the Knicks (9-18), there can be no joy without grief. There can be no victory without struggle. And they cannot play 48 minutes without someone twisting an ankle, straining a hamstring or damaging some other appendage.They are huge consumers of medical tape. It is a habit they cannot shake.It has been a frustrating season for Anthony in particular. Because of the team's poor play and an evaporating depth chart, Coach Mike Woodson has leaned on him to play heavy minutes — the most per game in the league and the most of his career.Even before Anthony sprained his left ankle against the Magic, which cast some doubt over his availability for Wednesday's game against the Oklahoma City Thunder (22-5) at Madison Square Garden, Woodson acknowledged that the situation was far from ideal. Anthony's game is based on absorbing contact from defenders, and creating a fair share of his own, so he tends to relish what little time he gets to recuperate on the bench.But Woodson has been coaching the team with increasing desperation, to save the Knicks' season and perhaps his own job. Consider Tyson Chandler, who played 37 minutes last week against the Milwaukee Bucks in his return after missing six weeks with a fractured right leg. Woodson said he had "no choice." So Chandler played and played, until he finally began having cramps in overtime. Anthony played 55 minutes in that game.On Monday, Anthony sprained his ankle while battling for a rebound with the Magic's Tobias Harris.He attempted to walk it off on the sideline before determining that he was in too much pain, a rare admission for him. He retreated to the locker room after a season-low 24 minutes, and watched bits and pieces of the Knicks' 103-98 victory on television as he iced his ankle and kept it elevated."I'm walking," Anthony said in response to a question about whether he was in serious discomfort.The Knicks said Anthony's availability on Wednesday would be a game-time decision, which was widely interpreted as good news. Anthony indicated that he hoped to play."I don't want to miss that game," he said. "It's Christmas in the Garden."In an interview Tuesday on ESPN Radio, Woodson said Anthony had received treatment at the team's training facility in Greenburgh, N.Y. Woodson said Anthony would be reassessed on Wednesday morning after another round of treatment. "We've got to weigh it out," Woodson said.One Knick who will not play is Raymond Felton, who returned to the lineup against the Magic after missing six games with a hamstring injury and proceeded to strain his right groin in the fourth quarter. The Knicks said Felton would meet with the team's training staff on Wednesday to decide on a timetable for his return.Anthony has become close to indispensable for the Knicks. He might be addicted to isolation sets, but he is averaging 26.3 points and shooting 44.7 percent while facing waves of defenders. He is also averaging 8.8 rebounds in 39.4 minutes per game, both career highs.There was always the danger that Anthony's heavy workload might cost him. Injuries are sometimes the product of fatigue. Pablo Prigioni, 36, broke his toe last week when he tripped running upcourt against the Washington Wizards after he had averaged 34 minutes in the previous three games — a significant increase in his playing time in the absence of Felton.Now both players are sidelined."We've been an injury-prone team," J. R. Smith said. "But we've always had guys who step in and fill those roles, and that's what's going to have to keep happening."If Anthony misses Wednesday's game, it would most likely mean more shot attempts for Smith and Andrea Bargnani, who was on the bench when the Knicks built a huge early lead against the Magic. He returned to hit a pair of key jumpers, an encouraging sign for a player whose contributions have been questionable.When Anthony sprained his left ankle last season, he missed just two games — and he said that sprain was more severe."Melo's a tough kid," Woodson said. "He doesn't sit down that often."Anthony dismissed the suggestion that it might be in his best interests to miss a game or two, lest he rush back and cause additional damage."I'm hardheaded when it comes to that sometimes," he said.
LOS ANGELES — Kobe Bryant wasn't happy about spending Christmas Day on the sideline, unable to help the struggling Los Angeles Lakers.It's a place he's unaccustomed to being on the holiday. Bryant leads the NBA with a record 15 appearances on Christmas Day, but he's out an expected four to six weeks with a fracture in his left knee."It's strange to be coming in on Christmas and not playing," he said before the Lakers' 101-95 loss to the Miami Heat on Wednesday. "It's a foreign feeling, but I'm here to support my guys."LeBron James and Co. have won six in a row, and the Lakers have dropped three straight."It's not as special when Kobe's not out there," James said afterward.Bryant's injury was diagnosed last week, his second major one of the season.He didn't play his first game until Dec. 8 after nearly eight months away while recovering from a torn Achilles tendon. Then he got hurt again Dec. 17 at Memphis while playing his fourth game in five nights."I was fortunate that it was not a meniscus," he said.Initially, Bryant didn't think he was seriously hurt against Memphis. He went down late in the third quarter, but returned to finish out the victory in which he logged a season-high 21 points in 32 minutes."I didn't know it was fractured," he said. "I was expecting a bone bruise more than anything else. I thought (the doctor) was joking when he told me."Bryant has been limited to riding a bike; he isn't supposed to put any pressure on his knee."It's just been slow in terms of laying off it and letting it heal," he said. "When you don't have activity, you got to watch the other parts like nutrition."Typical of Bryant's attention to detail, he said he has been reading critical comments that suggest he won't return this season."It's the same old tune, just being sung a little more loudly now," he said. "These type of things just help me lock in more."Asked if there's any chance he won't be back, Bryant replied, "Not that I'm aware of."James said, "When he comes back he's going to play at a high level."Los Angeles signed the 35-year-old guard to a two-year, $48.5 million contract extension in November.James, along with other NBA players, tweeted out well wishes to Bryant, although the two superstars hadn't talked until they shared a post-game hug."Especially games like today, you want to have the best guys out there," James said beforehand.After the Achilles injury, Bryant expressed rare self-doubt. He hasn't felt any this time."The knee is not really a concern to me," he said. "The biggest question was would the Achilles respond to my game. It felt fine. It was strong."Bryant was looking forward to playing against the defending NBA champions as a way to see where he was physically with his Achilles."This was a really big measuring stick," he said.Instead, he sat at the end of the bench wearing a black suit and print T-shirt. He sat on a chair with extra inches of padding, likely to take stress off his left knee."My spirits are fine," he said. "I feel more locked in now than my entire career."
About 10 minutes remained in the N.C.A.A. women's regional semifinal between Louisville and Baylor in March. Baylor was the defending national champion. Brittney Griner , its 6-foot-8 center, had blocked more shots in her career than any male or female player in college basketball history.On the fast break came Shoni Schimmel, Louisville's 5-9 point guard. Many players would have been intimidated by Griner. Not Schimmel, an American Indian who belongs to the Confederated Tribes of the Umatilla in eastern Oregon. She grew up playing an intrepid style of the sport known as rez ball."It's run and gun, shoot whenever you're open, trust in your heart," Schimmel said.That night in March, she was not open, but she did trust in her heart.On the break, Schimmel dribbled behind her back, trying to elude the retreating Griner. Slicing through the lane, Schimmel turned away from the basket and blindly flicked a shot over her head and Griner's outstretched arm, banking it off the backboard. No play made in sports over the past year was more fearless or brash.The shot not only went in, it lured Griner into a foul. Schimmel barked at Griner and sank the free throw.Schimmel's 22 points led Louisville to an 82-81 upset and even bigger news in her family: her parents' wedding.During the 26-hour drive from Portland, Ore., to Oklahoma City, where the regional was played, Schimmel's father, Rick, said jokingly that Louisville would beat Baylor because the game was on "Easter Sunday, a day of miracles."Ceci Moses, who had been his companion for 25 years and had eight children with him, replied, "If they win, I'll marry you."Two days after the victory, the couple married in a chapel. Shoni and her younger sister Jude, also a Louisville guard, could not attend because of a shootaround. That night, after Louisville defeated Tennessee to reach the Final Four, Moses flashed her wedding ring to her daughters as they helped cut down the net in celebration.Louisville advanced to the national championship game, losing to Connecticut. Never before had American Indian women reached such prominence in basketball. Shoni and Jude Schimmel offered an inspiring variation to the bleak narrative of alcoholism and teenage pregnancy often described on reservations."It's a blessing to show other people you can make it," Shoni Schimmel said at the time. "Coming off a reservation, you can do whatever you want. You've got to set your mind to it and believe in yourself."
NEW YORK — Taj Gibson enjoyed coming home for the holidays.Gibson, a Brooklyn native, scored 20 points and Jimmy Butler added 15 to help the Chicago Bulls rout the Nets 95-78 on Wednesday."It was stressful," said the 28-year-old, who grew up minutes from Barclays Center. "I did a toy drive and I was tired, but it was great to see my family."Gibson led a balanced offense with six players in double figures for Chicago, which was buoyed by the return of guards Kirk Hinrich and Butler.With the Bulls trailing 50-49 early in the third quarter, Butler took over, keying a 21-5 run that gave Chicago control. Butler, who sat out the last game with a right ankle injury, started the burst with a 3-pointer and added a three-point play that made it 57-52. That was the first of 12 straight points by the Bulls.Another three-point play by Butler made it 66-52."Coming out of halftime was a focus for us," Hinrich said.Chicago (11-16) led by 19 at the end of the period after Reggie Evans' dunk with less than a second left ended a 5½-minute field goal drought for the Nets (9-19).Brooklyn couldn't get much closer in the fourth and was serenaded with a chorus of loud boos from the fans."They cheer when things are good and they let you know when things aren't going good," Nets coach Jason Kidd said. "They expect good and they expect it 90 percent of the time, but right now we are 90 percent bad and so they have every right to boo and express how they feel."What once was viewed as a Christmas Day showdown between Eastern Conference contenders became a matchup of two of the NBA's biggest disappointments so far, as both teams have been plagued by injuries.Deron Williams scored 18 points and Mizra Teletovic added 17 for the Nets, who have lost four straight."I'm surprised at this season, how it's played out altogether," Williams said. "It's like a nightmare the way the injuries have been, the things we talk about every day, the lack of effort, the lack of energy."The victory was Chicago's second straight, the first time since five consecutive wins from Nov. 8-18 that the Bulls had two in a row. Chicago is starting to get healthy with the return Hinrich and Butler, both of whom started.Hinrich spurred a 12-0 run midway through the second quarter that gave Chicago a 39-31 lead. Williams then scored seven straight to make it a one-point game. Chicago led 41-38 at the half before Butler took over."It's good to get guys back," Bulls coach Tom Thibodeau said. "Our starters were very solid and our bench guys did a great job. Taj was super."The Bulls were still missing Luol Deng (Achilles) and Derrick Rose, who is sidelined for the season with a right knee injury.Brooklyn has its own injury issues with center Brook Lopez lost for the season Friday to a broken right foot."We talk about it a lot. We're really trying to figure out what it is. It's tough," Teletovic said of the Nets' struggles. "A lot of NBA teams aren't going to give you anything easy. You really have to concentrate and bring a lot of energy to win the game."The two clubs were wearing their Christmas short-sleeve jerseys that look straight out of a rec league game. Instead of numbers and a team name on the front, there was a big shiny logo. There are numbers on the sleeves, while the backs look more like a normal NBA jersey.Both squads were also wearing striped socks to complete the outfit.Notes: The Nets were still missing Andrei Kirilenko, who has been sidelined this season with a back injury. Kidd said before the game that his forward is making progress. ... Kidd's always loved playing on Christmas. "One of the biggest honors as a player and coach is to participate on Christmas," he said. "The world is watching so you can showcase your talent." ... These two teams met in the first round of the playoffs last season and the Bulls won in seven games. ... Chicago has won eight of the last 10 regular-season meetings.
OAKLAND, Calif. — The coaches can downplay a rivalry all they want.The signs of dislike and fiery competition are right there on the court, with the players involved.An all-California Christmas nightcap got heated in a hurry. Flailing arms, swinging elbows, even tussling that spilled into the postgame exit with Stephen Jackson mouthing off in the middle of it all.Golden State's Draymond Green was ejected for a flagrant 2 foul after the third quarter of the Warriors' 105-103 win Wednesday night for throwing an elbow on a play that drew a technical on Blake Griffin, then Griffin followed him to the locker room with 10:43 remaining when he drew his second technical.The thing is: The Clippers questioned whether Golden State did all it could to ignite Griffin and get him thrown out.If this isn't a rivalry, it's darn close."I still believe this isn't a rivalry because neither one of us have done anything," Golden State coach Mark Jackson said. "It was two teams playing with an edge competing against each other."That's not quite how Griffin and Clippers coach Doc Rivers saw it."If you look at it, I didn't do anything and I got thrown out of the game. It all boils down to they (referees) fell for it," Griffin said."To me, it's cowardly basketball. I don't know their intentions, but it worked. ... If I knew the answer I'd probably be in a different position. Tonight I got two technicals for nothing."With Griffin gone, the Clippers missed several key chances in the waning moments.Klay Thompson blocked a shot by Chris Paul with 1 second left then contested Jamal Crawford's 3-pointer that fell short at the final buzzer as the Warriors rallied in the second half.Griffin was ejected for his second technical after scuffling with Andrew Bogut, following Green to the showers.Paul's lay-in with 11.9 seconds left went around the rim and out, but Andre Iguodala missed a pair of free throws with 9.3 seconds remaining. That gave the Clippers the ball back with 8.3 seconds to go.Stephen Curry overcame a slow start to score seven of his 15 points over the final 3:01 to go with 11 assists as Golden State snapped the Pacific Division-leading Clippers' season-best five-game winning streak. Thompson finished with 23 points and David Lee had 23 points and 13 rebounds.When the game ended, players tangled near the tunnel to the Clippers' locker room and security personnel stepped in — and former Warriors swingman Jackson could be seen screaming in the fray.Whether the Warriors intended to ignite Griffin, Rivers can only guess."I don't know if they were but it sure looked like it. I can't accuse them of that but it looked like it. I'm not sure but that's what it looked like," Rivers said. "It's whatever you have to do to win, I guess."This one sure was feisty and festive from the opening tipoff at sold-out Oracle Arena, where fans wore "Christmas Whiteout" snowflake Warriors T-shirts for the holiday occasion.Paul had 26 points and 11 assists as he and Curry put on a late-game show between two of the Western Conference's top point guards. Griffin added 20 points, 14 rebounds and five assists before his early exit.Both Rivers and Jackson said before the game this can't truly be a rivalry until both teams are consistent contenders year after year.It's certainly getting testy enough to be close to such status. And they see each other twice more. The Clippers come back Jan. 30."We like them. Merry Christmas," Jackson said jokingly. "It's just physical basketball, so we don't get caught up in that. ... It's good, old-fashioned basketball between two teams that are playing for something."Griffin was held back by teammates at the end of the third quarter while jawing with Green. Following a review, Griffin received a technical and Green was ejected for a flagrant foul 2 after throwing an elbow."You have some key matchups in the game where guys want to go at each other," Green said. "Any time you have that, you're going to have a tough, hard-nosed game."Then, officials went to review once more to look at a tussle between Griffin and Bogut. Griffin left the game while Bogut was hit with a flagrant 1 and a technical.The Clippers, who never trailed in the first half, took a 77-74 lead into the see-saw fourth. They dropped to 19-3 when leading after three quarters and 8-3 on the road.Los Angeles beat Golden State 126-115 at home on Oct. 31 to hand the Warriors their first loss a day after a season-opening win against the Lakers.Curry performed when it mattered, though he is shooting just 9 for 44 in three Christmas games. Lee and Bogut each have double digits in rebounds in 10 straight games."We were kicking their butts and they went to something else, to be honest," Rivers said of triggering the second technical on Griffin. "But that's fine. We have to have better composure and just keep playing. ... I thought in the basketball part of it we were showing them pretty well. All the other stuff worked in their favor, so it's a smart thing for them to do."
OAKLAND, Calif. — Clippers star Blake Griffin fired off some harsh words for the Golden State Warriors after being ejected on a Christmas night turned spirited.Coach Doc Rivers is equally as irritated — and believes the Warriors tried to get Griffin thrown out.Griffin and Golden State's Draymond Green were long gone before a wild finish Wednesday night, when Klay Thompson blocked a shot by Chris Paul with 1 second left then contested Jamal Crawford's 3-pointer that fell short at the final buzzer to send the Warriors past Los Angeles 105-103.Griffin was ejected for his second technical with 10:43 remaining after scuffling with Andrew Bogut, following Green to the showers after they got into it at the end of the third. Green was tossed for a flagrant 2 foul."If you look at it, I didn't do anything and I got thrown out of the game. It all boils down to they (referees) fell for it," Griffin said. "To me, it's cowardly basketball. I don't know their intentions, but it worked. ... If I knew the answer I'd probably be in a different position. Tonight I got two technicals for nothing."Without Griffin, the Clippers missed too many chances in the waning moments.Paul's lay-in with 11.9 seconds left went around the rim and out, but Andre Iguodala missed a pair of free throws with 9.3 seconds remaining. That gave the Clippers the ball back with 8.3 seconds to go.Stephen Curry overcame a slow start to score seven of his 15 points over the final 3:01 to go with 11 assists as Golden State snapped the Pacific Division-leading Clippers' season-best five-game winning streak. Thompson finished with 23 points and David Lee had 23 points and 13 rebounds.When the game ended, players tangled near the tunnel to the Clippers' locker room and security personnel stepped in — and former Warriors swingman Stephen Jackson could be seen screaming in the middle of it all.Whether the Warriors intended to ignite Griffin, Rivers can only guess."I don't know if they were but it sure looked like it. I can't accuse them of that but it looked like it. I'm not sure but that's what it looked like," Rivers said. "It's whatever you have to do to win, I guess."This one was sure was feisty and festive from the opening tipoff at sold-out Oracle Arena, where fans wore "Christmas Whiteout" snowflake Warriors T-shirts for the holiday occasion.Paul had 26 points and 11 assists as he and Curry put on a late-game show between two of the Western Conference's top point guards. Griffin added 20 points, 14 rebounds and five assists before his early exit.Neither Rivers nor Warriors coach Mark Jackson is ready to deem this a California rivalry just yet — not until both teams are consistent contenders year after year, they say.It's certainly getting heated enough to be close to such status. And they see each other twice more. The Clippers come back Jan. 30."We like them. Merry Christmas," Jackson said jokingly. "It's just physical basketball, so we don't get caught up in that. ... It's good, old-fashioned basketball between two teams that are playing for something."Griffin was held back by teammates at the end of the third quarter while jawing with Green. Following a review, Griffin received a technical and Green was ejected for a flagrant foul 2 after throwing an elbow."You have some key matchups in the game where guys want to go at each other," Green said. "Any time you have that, you're going to have a tough, hard-nosed game."Then, officials went to review once more to look at a tussle between Griffin and Bogut. Griffin left the game while Bogut was hit with a flagrant 1 and a technical.The Clippers, who never trailed in the first half, took a 77-74 lead into the see-saw fourth. They dropped to 19-3 when leading after three quarters and 8-3 on the road.Los Angeles beat Golden State 126-115 at home on Oct. 31 to hand the Warriors their first loss a day after a season-opening win against the Lakers.Curry performed when it mattered, though he is shooting just 9 for 44 in three Christmas games. Lee and Bogut each have double digits in rebounds in 10 straight games.Golden State grabbed its first lead at the 10:35 mark in the third on Bogut's running jumper and began the second half with an 11-6 spurt.The Warriors were 22 for 52 in the first half — taking more shots than the Clippers' 21 of 40 — but Lee's dunk pulled Golden State within 53-51 at halftime.Notes: Former Warriors G Matt Barnes got some Christmas boos when he checked in for the Clippers midway through the first, while Antawn Jamison still gets his due respect. ... The Warriors played their 23rd Christmas game and third in four years after having Christmas off for 26 years. They lost their previous Dec. 25 outing to the Clippers 105-86 at Oracle — Los Angeles' last on Golden State's home floor — to start the lockout-shortened 66-game 2011-12 season. ... The Warriors haven't lost a season series to the Clippers since 2005-06. Golden State was one of only two teams along with the Thunder to take three of four from Los Angeles last season.
The chorus of boos and jeers started with about half a minute left in the game, when Tornike Shengelia tried to dribble the ball behind his back but instead felt it stripped away. Shengelia, an infrequently used reserve, was far from the object of the fans' ire, but he was the Nets player unfortunate enough to be standing there when it all finally boiled over.The antagonism simmered through four quarters Wednesday afternoon at Barclays Center, where the Nets delivered yet another halfhearted performance before losing, 95-78, to the depleted Chicago Bulls. That the Nets have yet to firmly establish a fervent fan base within New York has probably saved them this season from extreme shows of unified, negative emotion at their home arena. But even the most casual fan can discern indifference."It's frustrating," shooting guard Joe Johnson said about the booing, the loudest and nastiest heard at Barclays Center this season. "But we deserve it."In the end, the players' Christmas-colored sneakers and candy-swirl socks were the brightest things on the court. The Nets shot 25 for 71 from the field, including 5 for 17 from 3-point range. They made just 23 of 31 free-throw attempts and turned the ball over 17 times.The Nets trailed by only 3 points at halftime, despite making two field goals the entire second quarter. Their good fortune faded quickly, though, as the Bulls scored 36 points during the third quarter to cruise to victory. General apathy from the crowd turned into indiscriminate jeers.The Nets, who fell to 9-19, have lost four straight games. The individual defeats, for the fans and the players, are blending into one depressing fog."I'm surprised at this season, how it's played out altogether," point guard Deron Williams said. "It's like a nightmare."Jason Kidd, the Nets' rookie coach, once again criticized his team's effort. He said some players were not running back to defend quickly enough after missed shots on offense. He pointed out that he had substituted four players at once with 4 minutes 26 seconds remaining in the third quarter after the Bulls had finished a series of easy layups."At the end of the day, the coach can only hold you responsible for energy and effort," Kidd said. "If you're not giving it, I have to take you out. If you're missing shots, that's just part of the game. But if you're not giving energy or effort, I've got to take you out."After the Nets' previous loss, on Monday night, Kidd went so far as to wonder whether his players were becoming comfortable with losing games. When asked whether it was worrisome that his players were not responding to his public criticisms, he smiled and said, "Sometimes the response is a little delayed."Kidd said the Nets had gone into Wednesday's game believing it was one they should win. The Bulls arrived in Brooklyn having lost 13 of 17 games since Nov. 21. They were without Luol Deng, their leading scorer, who was bothered by a sore left Achilles' tendon. They have been without Derrick Rose since Nov. 22, when he tore the medial meniscus in his right knee.Given the Nets' internal turmoil, it hardly mattered. Taj Gibson came off the Bulls' bench to lead the way, scoring 20 points and grabbing eight rebounds. Five other players scored in double digits for the Bulls, who outrebounded the Nets, 45-39.Williams scored 18 points for the Nets, shooting 6 of 10 from the field, and Mirza Teletovic added 17 points while going 7 for 11. But the Nets' statistical lines were otherwise ugly. Kevin Garnett shot 2 for 7. Andray Blatche was 1 for 11. Paul Pierce was 1 for 8."Our record shows we are not a good team right now," Pierce said. "We are 9-19. I mean, we've got a lot of work to do. Our goal is still to improve, but when you are 9-19, the record speaks for itself."The game had a curious aesthetic, as the Nets and the Bulls — like the other teams playing Wednesday — wore short-sleeved uniform shirts to go with their festive sneakers and socks.But otherwise it was familiar futility from the Nets, whose season is descending into a dreary, repetitive pattern. Chants of "Fire Kidd" popped up sporadically from the stands, though they did not gain much traction.The Nets will host the Milwaukee Bucks at Barclays Center on Friday night before embarking on a tough trip featuring games against the Indiana Pacers, the San Antonio Spurs and the Oklahoma City Thunder. Facing such a hard road, Johnson was asked after the game whether the team would be able to turn its season around."That's the plan," Johnson said. "I don't know if it will. But that's the plan."It was not quite the response of a confident player on a winning team.Andrei Kirilenko, who had targeted a home game this week to return after a long absence because of a sore back, did not play Wednesday. Jason Kidd said Kirilenko would be re-evaluated Thursday.
SALT LAKE CITY — Derrick Favors had 18 points and 14 rebounds and made a putback dunk with 2.1 seconds remaining to lift the Utah Jazz to a 105-103 victory over the depleted Los Angeles Lakers on Friday night.With the game tied at 103, Gordon Hayward drove to the basket on Utah's final possession but missed his off-balance attempt as the Lakers converged. Favors grabbed the rebound and slammed the ball through the hoop to snap Utah's four-game home losing streak. Hayward finished with 24 points and nine assists.Jodie Meeks tied the game at 99-all, but Hayward hit a 3-pointer, made a steal and hit one of two free throws to put Utah ahead.Jordan Hill put in a follow and then made a pair of free throws to knot the game at 103 with 18.6 seconds left.Nick Young scored 21 points in 27 minutes before fouling out with 5:45 remaining and Chris Kaman had a season-high 19 points starting in place of Pau Gasol, who was out with a respiratory infection.Kobe Bryant (knee fracture) and point guards Steve Nash (back) and Steve Blake (elbow) remain sidelined for Lakers, who have lost four in a row. Bryant missed his fifth game after a short six-game comeback after Achilles surgery and is not expected back for three to five weeks.Midway through the fourth quarter, Alec Burks hit 3 of 4 free throws and then tracked down a long rebound and fed the streaking Hayward for a dunk that made it 96-90. The rim-rocking slam brought a thunderous roar from the first sellout crowd of the season since opening night.But the Lakers fought back behind Hill, who had 13 points in the period.Marvin Williams scored 16 points, Trey Burke had 14 points and seven assists, and Burks had 13 points for the Jazz, who stopped their worst home skid since losing seven straight in February and March of 2011.Utah had been struggling offensively, averaging 88.5 points in the previous six games on 41.2 percent shooting. The Jazz ran often against the Lakers, scoring 25 points on fast breaks.The Lakers play a more free-flowing game without Gasol and Bryant, but fall into long scoring droughts, don't get back on defense and don't know where to turn in crunch time.The Jazz are finally starting to learn how to win close games, coming out on top in a contest that featured 14 lead changes and 16 ties.Los Angeles did have Jordan Farmar, who had 16 points and seven assists.Farmar missed 10 games with a hamstring tear and then played 33 minutes against Miami on Christmas Day without the benefit of a full practice, scoring three points on 1-of-7 shooting. Without Blake and Nash, they don't have much of a choice but to go with Farmar, who spent last season playing in Turkey.In their sixth straight game with a different starting lineup, the Lakers made Kaman their featured option. But Hill took center stage when the game was on the line.But no one blocked out Favors, who flashed a big smile as he headed to the bench after his game-clinching dunk. Meeks missed a 40-foot heave as time expired.In the see-saw game, Burke went on an individual 7-0 run late in the second quarter to boost the Jazz to a 55-52 lead at halftime.NOTES: Jazz reserve Mike Harris was not with the team so he could be at the birth of his daughter. . A sizable percentage of the arena cheered loudly for the Lakers, included Real Salt Lake goalkeeper Nick Rimando and his son. . The Jazz have won five of their last six games against the Lakers.
ORLANDO, Fla. — Arron Afflalo scored 23 points to lead five Orlando players in double-figures and the Magic snapped a three-game losing streak with a 109-92 win over the Detroit Pistons on Friday night.Orlando led the Pistons by as many as 22 points and cruised in the fourth quarter.Nik Vucevic added 20 points and 11 rebounds, and rookie Victor Oladipo finished with 16 points and a career-high 11 assists.The victory also halted a five-game home losing streak for the Magic, who hadn't won at the Amway Center since the day before Thanksgiving.Brandon Jennings had 21 points and Will Bynum added 18 for the Pistons, who ended a streak of three consecutive road victories.In some of their recent losses Orlando had started fast, only to fall apart late in the games.The Magic jumped out to another early lead, but this time were able to sustain it with a variety of scoring bursts that kept the Pistons playing catch up for most of the night.Orlando hovered over 50 percent shooting throughout and carried a 19-point lead into the fourth quarter.The Pistons, who claimed eight of their 14 wins on the road, never found a flow on offense. They shot 41 percent for the game, and were outscored in the paint 58-48.The Magic carved out their early advantage shooting 56 percent in the opening 24 minutes to take a 55-48 lead into halftime.Glen Davis had eight points in less than five minutes and then yielded to Afflalo, who finished the half with 12 points. Oladipo and Tobias Harris each added 10 points.The Pistons shot 44 percent for the half, but Jennings' 18 points kept them within striking distance.NOTES: The Magic improved to 5-6 when they score 100 or more points. ... Pistons G Chauncey Billups opted to continue his recent program of resting his tendinitis-affected knee on the first game of back-to-backs. Pistons coach Maurice Cheeks said Billups is expected to play when Detroit visits Washington on Saturday.
CHAPEL HILL, N.C. — James Michael McAdoo scored 12 of his 14 points in the second half to help No. 19 North Carolina beat Northern Kentucky 75-60 on Friday night.Marcus Paige and Leslie McDonald added 11 points each for the Tar Heels (9-3), who never trailed after opening the game with a 14-2 run.Northern Kentucky trailed 44-37 early in the second half before North Carolina went on a 12-3 spurt to blow open the game.McAdoo scored 10 points during the decisive stretch, making three shots inside and hitting four consecutive free throws.Tyler White scored 13 points to lead the Norse (4-8), whose three-game winning streak ended. Jalen Billups added 12 points, and Jack Flournoy and Jordan Jackson had 10 points apiece for Northern Kentucky, which shot 33 percent from the field, including 5 of 23 from 3-point range.With his team leading 35-30 at halftime, North Carolina coach Roy Williams changed his lineup to start the second half. He surrounded Paige, the star point guard, with reserves Luke Davis, Isaiah Hicks, Jackson Simmons and Desmond Hubert.The group responded with a 5-0 run, holding the Norse scoreless on six possessions. Hubert had an emphatic blocked shot on Northern Kentucky's second possession, and the Tar Heels later delivered their best team defense of the game.Northern Kentucky hunted for a shot before settling for an off-balance 3-pointer by Anthony Monaco just before the shot clock expired. The shot failed to draw iron, and the resulting violation sparked a standing ovation from North Carolina's fans.Northern Kentucky went more than 6 minutes before getting its first field goal of the second half, and the Tar Heels extended their lead to 12.The Norse pulled within 44-37 on a 3-pointer by Monaco with 13:15 to play, but they never got closer.The Tar Heels answered with seven straight points, six from McAdoo, to restore their double-digit lead.Northern Kentucky started the game 1 of 13 from the field, and the Tar Heels pulled away as McDonald made three 3-pointers in a 3-minute stretch.The Tar Heels had their biggest lead at 24-10 midway through the half before Northern Kentucky rallied behind White.White scored on four drives into the lane and hit a 3-pointer in transition as the Norse scored on nine of 11 possessions.Billups delivered a left-handed tip dunk to bring Northern Kentucky within 33-30 just before halftime.P.J. Hairston, a swingman for whom North Carolina recently said it would not seek reinstatement, was not around. He watched the team's previous home games from the bench.
COLUMBUS, Ohio — Lenzelle Smith Jr. scored 17 points and LaQuinton Ross added 15 to lead No. 3 Ohio State past Louisiana at Monroe 71-31 on Friday night.Amedeo Della Valle chipped in with 14 points for the Buckeyes (13-0), who have won their first 13 games in a season for the fifth time in school history (1961, '62, '91 and 2011).Jayon James led the Warhawks (3-5), who have lost their last four, with eight points.They hit just 19 percent of their shots from the field (10 of 54) and 17 percent on 3-pointers (3 of 18).The Buckeyes won each of their first 11 games by double digits. They had far from an easy time of it in their most recent game.Down by eight points in the last minute, they went on a 14-3 run over the last 48 seconds to beat Notre Dame 64-61 on Dec. 21 at Madison Square Garden in the finale of the BlackRock Gotham Classic. In that game they scored 17 points in the first 19:12 of the second half and 14 in those last decisive 48 seconds.Ohio State came into the game fifth in the nation in scoring defense (55.9 points) and 13th in field goal percentage defense (.379).They went a long way toward padding those numbers while holding the Warhawks to 20 points on 23.3 percent shooting in the opening half.The game was never in doubt after Ohio State bolted to a 12-0 lead in the opening 4 minutes.The Warhawks didn't score until Tylor Ongwae hit a baseline drive at the 15:34 mark.Ross got things going early with eight of the first 12 points, hitting his only two attempts from the field, including his lone 3, and adding a perfect 3 for 3 at the free throw line.The lead hovered around 20 for the remainder of the half with the Buckeyes up 41-20 at the break.The Buckeyes opened the second half the same way they did the first — on a run.Smith followed a miss and then hit a 3, Shannon Scott hit from behind the arc and Ross hit a jumper and two free throws in another 12-0 run to push the lead to 53-20. Then Marc Loving added a three-point play off a twisting reverse layup to make it 15 straight points.The Warhawks finally ended a scoring drought of 9:50 when Chinedu Amajoyi hit two free throws at the 10:40 mark for their first points of the second half.ULM has never beaten a top 5 team, losing its opener at No. 5 Kansas 80-63 on Nov. 8.The Warhawks' last win over a ranked opponent came almost exactly 21 years ago, an 87-78 victory over No. 9 Arkansas on Dec. 30, 1992.Their only previous win over a Big Ten school was a 72-67 overtime victory over Iowa on Nov. 30, 2007.The game was the final non-conference tuneup for the Buckeyes, who open Big Ten play on New Year's Eve at Purdue.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — The atmosphere felt familiar Thursday morning at the Knicks' training facility. For the 19th time this season, the Knicks reconvened to talk about another defeat. Several players, including Carmelo Anthony, did not practice because of injuries, and that felt familiar, too.In the wake of Wednesday's loss to the Oklahoma City Thunder at Madison Square Garden, where the team was blown out (again) and the fans booed (again), Coach Mike Woodson somehow summoned the energy to talk about an important opportunity this week: back-to-back games against the Atlantic Division-leading Toronto Raptors, who will visit the Knicks on Friday before hosting them Saturday. Woodson also reminded everyone that his team was, inexplicably, only three games out of first place.This has been another of Woodson's frequent messages — that the Knicks, despite their many problems, remain in contention. Go figure.Avid fans of the Knicks have heard this all before, of course, and the true die-hards know it all by rote: the coach's messages and the players' responses, the many injuries and the many losses. With that in mind, take the following quiz to gauge just how well you know the beleaguered Knicks.Mike Woodson has gained a lot of experience this season in the delicate art of briefing the news media in the wake of defeat. It is not an easy job. His emotions have ranged from angry to disturbed to frustrated to mortified. Match the quotation with the game.2. "You just can't come out on your home court and dig a hole, 21 points, and spot a team, and then have to fight so tough to get back in the game."3. "I didn't like the fact that we let a 17- to 19-point lead shrink within six minutes. So that's something that was addressed today."4. "Nobody should be happy about watching something like this happen."A. An 85-83 preseason loss to the Charlotte Bobcats on Oct. 25B. A 109-100 loss to the Minnesota Timberwolves on Nov. 3C. A 120-89 loss to the San Antonio Spurs on Nov. 10D. A 102-97 loss to the Charlotte Bobcats on Nov. 5E. A 114-73 loss to the Boston Celtics on Dec. 8Sometimes, losses defy explanation. Sometimes, it is better to avoid trying to explain altogether. Match the quotation with the player.1. "It was just one of those days."2. "It was just one of those nights."A. Tyson Chandler after a loss to the Minnesota Timberwolves on Nov. 3B. J. R. Smith after a loss to the Oklahoma City Thunder on WednesdayAs the self-declared leader of the Knicks, Carmelo Anthony has attempted to remain upbeat amid the team's struggles. He wants to figure it out. No, really, he does. It has been a point of emphasis since the preseason. Match the quotation with the game.2. "We have to try to pinpoint the problem, try to figure it out and go from there."4. "We, as a team, should feel that losing is unacceptable, and try to figure it out."5. "If you never been through situations like this before, it'd be hard for you to try to figure it out."6. "I don't want to try to figure this one out right now."A. After a loss to the San Antonio Spurs on Nov. 10B. After a loss to the Los Angeles Clippers on Nov. 27C. After a loss to the Cleveland Cavaliers on Dec. 10D. After a loss to the Minnesota Timberwolves on Nov. 3E. After a loss to the Boston Celtics on Dec. 8F. Before a loss to the Detroit Pistons on Nov. 19The Knicks have established a bit of a pattern. After they are roughed up by an opponent, Mike Woodson talks about areas where his team needs to improve before lauding players on the other team. Match Woodson's quotation with the target of his affection.2. "I like everything about him."4. "He's starting to come into his own now as a player."C. Paul George of the Indiana PacersWho Said It?Losing has become monotonous for the Knicks, but the players still have a knack for spicing things up during their postgame interviews. Match the quotation with the player.
WEST LONG BRANCH, N.J. — Josh James is a 6-foot-2 freshman point guard for Monmouth, lithe and agile, with an edge and a little tenacity, which can delight his coach but can also terrify him."He guards the way I tried to guard," King Rice said as he watched James warm up before practice on Monmouth's campus earlier this month.Rice recruited James in the manner in which the renowned North Carolina coach Dean Smith once recruited Rice. Smith sat in Rice's living room in Binghamton, N.Y. He needed to say only one thing to Astor Rice, King's father, words that resonated deeply: If King comes to North Carolina and does what he is supposed to do, he will graduate. Astor Rice, who never learned to read, could only smile at that.King Rice, 45, thinks back on that moment often. He sat in countless living rooms as an assistant coach for Illinois State, Providence and Vanderbilt, telling prospects only what they wanted to hear, or what his bosses wanted him to say. But in his third season at Monmouth, the program is built in his image, the roster as he constructed it. How does he want that to look? What does he want them to hear?"My problems," Rice said, "came when I'm that age."They came shortly after he arrived at Chapel Hill, a hot prospect who joined one of the nation's celebrated teams and soon discovered a quenchless taste for alcohol, partying, life in excess. His troubles continued after his playing career fizzled. He became a brash young assistant coach with a hard-bitten drinking problem. In 1996, at Illinois State, his boss, Coach Kevin Stallings, bailed Rice out of jail after he was arrested on a charge of driving under the influence.He tearfully addressed the team about how partying and alcohol "got me." It was the beginning of Rice's third career evolution, one beyond playing and coaching: engaging.As he did on a Tuesday afternoon in November when, for the second year in a row, Rice led a group of troubled young adults from the New Jersey Youth Corps, from Asbury Park, N.J., on a tour of the campus and spoke to them about the influences that had once derailed his career."He says to them, 'Listen, I made some mistakes on the way,' " said Peter Cheney, the group's director. "But I'm not making them anymore."He has talked in classrooms, to other coaches, at local high schools. He is a natural, if unpolished, speaker who can command an audience for hours with a stream-of-consciousness manner that just pours and pours, never about basketball or infused with Vince Lombardi axioms. He speaks about what went wrong with him.On an unseasonably warm afternoon last February, Rice sat in his office at the tail end of a 10-21 season, frustrated and drained. His eyes, deeply set, now rested above eggplant-colored pools. He had lost weight. His cheekbones jutted out like cliffs against sunken cheeks.Rice had to laugh at himself. This is what he had waited so long for?After the drunken-driving charge, Rice was considered, not so metaphorically, damaged goods — too reckless and immature to deserve a job as a head coach. Stallings kept him on staff at Illinois State, but on a short leash. Rice was ashamed and angry with himself. He entered an outpatient rehabilitation program in nearby Wilmington, Ill., led by an instructor he knew only as Merlin.For 75 hours over four weeks, Rice sat in a room with other recovering alcoholics listening to Merlin, simmering."I just sat there thinking, I don't have the same problem as these people," Rice said. "I'm just a guy who likes to drink. I don't have those problems."It was not the first time Rice had been in trouble with the law. In 1990, at the end of his junior year at North Carolina, Rice was arrested in downtown Chapel Hill on charges of assaulting his girlfriend outside a bar, resisting arrest and destroying public property. Instead of being remorseful, he was irate that the North Carolina coaching staff did not post his bail. He did not realize at the time that N.C.A.A. regulations prohibited that; a teammate posted the bail for him.
In Cornell 's last men's basketball game, at Stony Brook, Coach Bill Courtney often threw his arms up in frustration after turnovers and frequently flashed an exhausted smile when his team committed imprudent fouls.By the time Jameel Warney of Stony Brook made a layup and free throw with 12 minutes 32 seconds remaining, giving the Seawolves a 55-36 lead, the front of Courtney's dress shirt was untucked, completing the image of a coach watching his hapless team.Cornell lost Sunday, 76-54, dropping to 0-11 this season. Of the 351 Division I men's basketball programs in the country, Cornell is the only team without a victory. Grambling had also been winless until Dec. 16, when it snapped a 32-game losing streak.As Cornell searches for that first win, its coach is trying to forge a team identity."We don't have a lot of issues with guys giving up or doubting what we're trying to do — I feel very fortunate for that," said Courtney, who was an assistant coach at Virginia Tech and a longtime assistant at George Mason under Jim Larranaga. "I see brighter days ahead for us. We just got to keep working at it."Just four seasons ago, Cornell was the darling of the N.C.A.A. tournament, the underdog from the Ivy League that hit 3-pointers with regularity and advanced to the program's first appearance in the Round of 16.That senior-laden team earned three consecutive Ivy League titles and N.C.A.A. tournament appearances, the most prominent run in Cornell history. Before 2008, the Big Red had qualified only twice, in 1954 and 1988.But Cornell has not had a winning record since the 2009-10 season. The first two months of this season exemplified its struggles. This is the first time a Cornell team has started a season 0-11. Dating to February of last season, the Big Red have lost 17 consecutive games, the longest skid in program history.In 2009-10, the Big Red played toe-to-toe with Kansas and Kentucky. They were personified by the outside shooting of Ryan Wittman; the post presence of the 7-footer Jeff Foote, who played four N.B.A. games for New Orleans in 2012; and the dynamic point guard play of Louis Dale. Cornell has yet to solidify its philosophy under Courtney, who was hired after Steve Donahue was lured to Boston College after the 2010 season."It's tough to watch a little bit, but I know they're a very young team, still kind of finding their groove," said Foote, who is playing for the Springfield (Mass.) Armor of the N.B.A. Development League.Stephen Steinlight, editor of the Cornell Basketball Blog, said Courtney has recruited more players who like to create off the dribble, with "less emphasis on skill and more emphasis on athleticism." Among those who post frequently on the site's forums, Steinlight said, "there were some doubts if a program could be built that way." Recent forum threads have included "Has Bill Lost This Team?" and "When Will Rebuilding End?"Courtney pointed to Harvard, which won or shared the last three Ivy League titles and is 10-1 this season, as proof that a faster style of play could succeed in the Ivy League.Despite the success of the teams from 2008 to 2010, Cornell's league dominance was unlikely to continue. The 2010 class graduated eight seniors, four of them starters. Courtney is "a tremendous guy and coach," Foote said, "but I knew there'd be a little bit of a down period."One roadblock to rebuilding has been injuries. Shonn Miller, who was a first team all-Ivy League selection last season, missed the end of 2012-13 with a shoulder injury and remains sidelined indefinitely.Steinlight, who graduated from Cornell in 1998 and started the blog in 2007, said this team "has a lot more talent than what its win-loss record reflects."Steinlight said he was a big supporter of Courtney and that the failures "can't all be blamed on just Shonn Miller being unavailable this season."
(Reuters) - Oklahoma City Thunder guard Russell Westbrook has had knee surgery and will be out of action for up to two months, the National Basketball Association team said on Friday.The three-time All-Star had "successful arthroscopic surgery on his right knee" and was not expected to return until after the mid-February All-Star Game break, the Thunder said on their website.The surgery was the third on the knee this year.Westbrook has averaged 21.3 points for Oklahoma City this season and his absence is clearly a blow for the team, which has started the season 23-5 - the second best record in the Western Conference."Russell has been playing pain free, but recently had experienced increased swelling," team general manager Sam Presti said in a statement."On the most recent MRI it was determined by the surgeon that there was an area of concern that had not previously existed, nor was detectable in the previous procedures, and it was necessary to evaluate Russell further."The consulting physician determined that arthroscopic surgery was necessary to address the swelling that was taking place."
ANN ARBOR, Mich. — Michigan star Mitch McGary is out indefinitely after deciding to have surgery on his lower back.McGary's absence leaves the Wolverines in a tough spot with Big Ten play just around the corner. McGary helped Michigan reach the Final Four last season when he was a freshman, and he was a preseason All-America selection after deciding to put off the NBA and return to the Wolverines for his sophomore year.Now Michigan's hopes for another extended NCAA tournament run have taken a hit."We met with a lot of people, and Mitch decided his best interest for his long-term health is to go ahead and have surgery," coach John Beilein said. "Right now he's out indefinitely. That may mean the end of the season. We do not know. It depends a lot on the surgery and the rehab."Beilein and McGary met with reporters Friday, the day before Michigan's game against Holy Cross. McGary missed the first two games of the season because of his back problem. In eight games since then, he has averaged 9.5 points.The 6-foot-10 McGary did not play in Michigan's 68-65 win over Stanford last weekend."I just tried to rehab," McGary said. "It's just kind of painful to play through it."Michigan says the medical staff expects a full recovery for McGary, who said his back has been a problem since late August."I just kind of injured myself during the preseason," McGary said. "I just tried to rehab the whole time."Beilein said Friday that surgery was an option in the immediate aftermath of the injury. Instead, McGary came back and was able to contribute. He had 15 points and 14 rebounds in a loss at Duke earlier this month.But the Wolverines struggled inside in a loss to Arizona on Dec. 14, and McGary hasn't played since."The week before the Arizona game, he couldn't practice very well," Beilein said. "He didn't practice hardly at all before the Stanford game. Didn't feel that was going to change unless he had this surgery."Michigan will now turn to a couple of experienced big men — Jordan Morgan and Jon Horford — to hold down the fort inside. Both have played plenty of minutes for the Wolverines over the years, but they'll have to avoid foul trouble. Neither will have an easy time replacing McGary's offensive ability and his aggressive rebounding around the basket."Jordan Morgan has won a Big Ten championship," Beilein said. "He needs minutes to get back to where he was, and he could never get that last year. So excited for him and Jon Horford, and Max (Bielfeldt) as well. The thing is now, with scout team, Max doesn't get the reps. We don't have enough players for a scout team, so it'll be hard, but at the same time, Max will have to perform. He'll play probably in every game going forward."
FRESNO, Calif. — Chiney Ogwumike scored 16 of her 20 points in the first half and No. 4 Stanford routed Fresno State 86-54 on Saturday night in the Cardinal's final tuneup before Pac-12 play.Stanford (11-1) was coming off a six-day holiday break, and playing for the first time since defeating then-No. 3 Tennessee 76-70 on Dec. 21. The rustiness showed for half of the first half before Ogwumike got going.She added 10 rebounds to give her 1,257 in her career — nine short of Kayla Pedersen's Pac-12 and school record. She also had three blocks.Stanford guard Amber Orrange had 15 points, six assists and three steals. Cardinal forward Taylor Greenfield added 18 points, and Bonnie Samuelson scored 14 points off the bench.Up four points midway through the first half, The Cardinal used an 11-0 run during 5 minutes of shutout defense to stake itself to a 33-18 lead over the Bulldogs with 5:54 left in the first half.Stanford led 43-31 at halftime, and ensured there would be no spirited rally by Fresno State. The Cardinal outscored the Bulldogs 16-2 in the first five minutes of the second half, and stretched the lead to 33 points with 12 minutes remaining in the game.Alex Sheedy had 15 points and 11 rebounds to lead Fresno State (6-5).
SPOKANE, Wash. — David Stockton scored a season-high 21 points as injury-plagued No. 24 Gonzaga beat Santa Clara 74-60 in the teams' West Coast Conference opener on Saturday night.Kevin Pangos had 17 points on 5-for-8 shooting for the Bulldogs (11-2, 1-0), who have won 12 of the previous 13 conference titles.Gonzaga was without starting forward Sam Dower Jr., the team's second-leading scorer and rebounder, who was out with a back injury caused by a fall in a recent loss against Kansas State. Pangos, who was averaging a team-high 18.3 points despite dealing with a toe injury, also missed a stretch of the second half while receiving treatment.Brandon Clark scored 22 points as the Broncos (7-7, 0-1) lost for the seventh consecutive time in Spokane.Pangos was actually off the court when the Zags went on an 8-0 run, building a 46-38 lead with 12:15 left.Santa Clara roared back after a timeout, pulling within two numerous times — the last at 51-49 on John McArthur's jumper with 9 minutes remaining.But with Pangos back on the court, the Bulldogs used a 12-1 run over the next 4:10 to take a 13-point lead. The run, fueled by three Gonzaga steals and five Santa Clara turnovers, was capped by a transition 21-footer from Pangos — one of his three 3-pointers.Clark put an end to the run with a 10-foot jumper at the 4:18 mark but the damage had been done.The Broncos led 26-22 with 4 minutes to go in the first half, but Gonzaga finished the period on a 9-0 run with Pangos scoring five. Santa Clara's Clark put an end to the run with five consecutive points following intermission.Center Przemek Karnowski led Gonzaga with nine rebounds, while Yannick Atanga led Santa Clara with nine boards off the bench.The last six Santa Clara losses in Spokane came by an average of 31.2 points, with the Broncos holding the margin under 10 points just one time.
ATLANTA — Paul Millsap scored a season-high 31 points, Lou Williams scored 10 of his season-best 28 points in overtime and the Atlanta Hawks rallied to beat the Charlotte Bobcats 118-116 on Saturday night.Al Jefferson had 24 points and a season-high 23 rebounds, and Gerald Henderson added 22 points for Charlotte.Playing their first game since leading scorer and rebounder Al Horford suffered a torn pectoral muscle, the Hawks trailed by 14 after Henderson hit a 20-foot fadeaway jumper with 4:19 left in the third quarter.But Atlanta, which has won two straight and five of six, rallied to force overtime when backup center Pero Antic made a 3-pointer off one leg from the right wing with 3.1 seconds left in regulation.Jeff Teague finished with 20 points and nine assists for the Hawks. Mike Scott added 18 points, and Millsap pulled down 13 rebounds.The Bobcats, who have lost two straight and three of four, didn't trail again in regulation after Ben Gordon's 3 from the left corner made it 86-84.Antic's shot made it 101-all and the game went to overtime when Henderson's fadeaway jumper bounced off the rim at the buzzer.In the final minute of OT, Millsap hit a pair of free throws to make it 108-all, Kemba Walker missed a wild shot for Charlotte and Williams hit two foul shots to give Atlanta the lead for good at 110-108.There were five lead changes in the first half and five in the second half. Charlotte's biggest advantage before intermission was 10 on Henderson's 4-foot turnaround jumper with 4:22 left in the second quarter.Walker, who scored at least 20 in six straight games before finishing with 18 in Friday's home loss to Oklahoma City, missed his first six shots before hitting a 3-pointer that put Charlotte up 55-47 early in the third.Walker finished 4 for 20 from the field and scored 16 points.It took until the final seconds of the third for Atlanta to cut the lead to six when Antic blocked three shots by Cody Zeller on the same possession and Williams followed with a 3 from the left sideline to make it 77-71.Kyle Korver hit a 3 early in the fourth to extend his NBA career record to a 94th consecutive game.Notes: With Horford sidelined, Millsap and G DeMarre Carroll are the only Hawks to start and play in all 30 games. ... Hawks coach Mike Budenholzer said before the game that the team doesn't know much time Horford will miss. He tore his right pectoral muscle in Friday's OT win at Cleveland. Two years ago, Horford played in just 11 regular-season games after tearing his left pectoral muscle. ... Carroll was a game-time decision with a sprained right thumb and was scoreless after going 0 for 4 from the field. ... Charlotte dropped to 6-4 on the road against Eastern Conference opponents. ... The Bobcats dropped to 5-14 at Philips Arena. ... Horford's replacements at center — Elton Brand, Antic and Gustavo Ayon — were a combined 2 for 13 from the field for six points.
WACO, Texas — Odyssey Sims scored 27 points, and No. 9 Baylor beat McNeese State 82-57 Saturday night in the last game before the start of conference play for both teams.The Lady Bears (10-1) extended their nation-leading home winning streak to 67 games, a school record.Sims, the top scorer in the country at 30.1 points per game, led a 14-2 first-half run to take control heading into a visit to Kansas State for the Big 12 opener on Thursday. The Lady Bears have won three straight conference regular-season and tournament titles.Baylor has one more non-conference game at home against No. 1 Connecticut on Jan. 13.Allison Baggett scored 22 points to lead McNeese State (7-4), which had a three-game winning streak snapped. The Cowgirls play host to Southeastern Louisiana in their Southland Conference opener Thursday.Before the game, Baylor coach Kim Mulkey presented Sims with a ball commemorating the school assists record she broke with a career-high 13 against San Jose State on Dec. 3. She had two assists against McNeese to put her at 524. Angela Tisdale had 493 from 2004-08.It won't be long before Sims becomes the school's career 3-point leader. She was 5 of 7 from long range against McNeese and needs six to break Jennifer King's record of 195 from 1989-93.Sims, the only Baylor player in double figures, had back-to-back 3-pointers and 10 points overall during the 14-2 run that put Baylor in front 27-12 with 7:47 remaining in the first half.Jalyn Johnson opened the second half with a 3-pointer to get McNeese within 12, but Sims hit two free throws and made a crosscourt pass to Imani Wright for an opener 3-pointer. Alexis Prince added a putback layup for a 51-32 lead.Sims put the Lady Bears up 61-39 with 11:58 remaining on a steal and layup in the backcourt right after a bucket from Sune Agbuke and went to the bench for good less than a minute later.Sims had more points than minutes (25), which isn't unusual because she's averaging more points than minutes for the season. Sims has played at least 30 minutes just four times because the Lady Bears have won by at least 25 points in nine of their 11 games.Agbuke, Baylor's leader in rebounding and blocks, had eight rebounds and four blocks while freshman Nina Davis led Baylor with 10 boards.Prince, who had offseason foot surgery and made her debut against Kentucky only after the Lady Bears ran out of players because of fouls, scored the first four Baylor points and finished with eight.Cecilia Okoye had 14 points and six rebounds for McNeese, and Hailey Jenkins scored 11.
SAN DIEGO — Winston Shepard scored 21 points and Dwayne Polee had 19 points and 12 rebounds as No. 20 San Diego State overwhelmed tiny St. Katherine College 118-35 on Friday night for its ninth straight win.SDSU (10-1) finished a three-game stretch against outmanned teams. The competition gets considerably tougher when the Aztecs open Mountain West Conference play at Colorado State on Wednesday and then visit No. 16 Kansas on Jan. 5.The 83-point win was San Diego State's largest victory margin since moving to Division I in 1970-71. The previous largest was 60 points, 128-68 over Morgan State on Dec. 1, 1984. The Aztecs became the first Division I team since Oregon State in 2000 to hold three straight opponents under 40 points.Joshua White led the Firebirds (2-12) with nine points.St. Katherine College, a tiny orthodox Christian school in northern San Diego County, is playing its inaugural season of hoops. In their only other games against Division I teams, the Firebirds lost 107-36 at Weber State and 88-39 to Utah Valley.Their latest mismatch started when 6-foot-10 Skylar Spencer controlled the opening tip against 6-7 Jonathan Wood, the Firebirds' tallest starter. Matt Shrigley hit a 3-pointer and SDSU raced to leads of 13-1, 27-3 and 43-10.The Firebirds at least hit the rim on their first six shots, with their first air ball coming on their seventh shot, by White. St. Katherine's first point, a free throw by Alex Perez, pulled the Firebirds to 13-1. Their first field goal, a left-handed shot by Dante Miller, made it 20-3 with 12:30 to go in the first half.The Aztecs led 63-17 at halftime. They played without Josh Davis, who had wisdom teeth pulled earlier in the week.SDSU made it 100-31 on a 3-pointer by Aqeel Quinn with 6:09 to go.Quinn scored 14 points, Shrigley 12 and Xavier Thames and Spencer 10 apiece for SDSU.The Firebirds were scheduled to catch an early morning flight for a game at Utah on Saturday afternoon.
LEXINGTON, Ky. — Kentucky coach John Calipari was so focused on coaching his team that he barely noticed star forward Julius Randle was on the bench being treated for cramps.Fortunately for the Wildcats, guards Andrew and Aaron Harrison knew he wasn't there and their work in offsetting his absence proved crucial in overcoming No. 6 Louisville. The identical twin freshmen combined for 28 points, including 11 during a critical second-half stretch with Randle sidelined, helping the 18th-ranked Wildcats earn a 73-66 victory on Saturday."It always hurts you when you lose a great player," said Andrew Harrison, who went 6 of 16 from the field. "But at the same time, we all knew we had to bring it and that just means we all had to step it up a little bit."Randle's 17 first-half points staked Kentucky (10-3) to a 41-36 halftime lead before the 6-foot-9 forward went to the locker room early in the second with leg cramps. He returned but soon limped to the bench with more cramps and spent the rest of the game on the bench.The Harrison twins amply filled the void, turning a 52-51 deficit with 11:01 remaining into a 68-58 lead with four minutes left. Andrew Harrison and James Young each scored 18 points with Young adding a key 3-pointer during the 17-7 run that helped Kentucky beat its in-state archrival for the fifth time in six meetings."Andrew played incredible today down the stretch," forward Alex Poythress said.The young, talented Wildcats also earned their first win against a ranked opponent in four tries this season. This victory was particularly impressive coming against the defending national champions, who entered with significantly more experience than Kentucky's squad featuring six high school All-Americans."I thought we grew up," Calipari said. "We looked like a basketball team today. Here's what was on the (drawing) board today: 'Look like a team. Play like a team. Fight like a team.' Those were the keys to the victory."Russ Smith scored 19 points but was just 5 of 10 from the foul line for Louisville (11-2), which failed to capitalize after rallying from the halftime hole. Chris Jones added 18 points for the Cardinals, who made just 14 of 22 free throws and missed their second chance to beat a top-25 school.After losing tough early-season games to Michigan State, Baylor and North Carolina, Kentucky finally found the formula to beat a ranked team. Other than allowing Louisville to open both halves with runs, the Wildcats handled everything the Cardinals tried, especially in the clutch, and kept control down the stretch.The Wildcats outrebounded Louisville 44-36 including 17-12 offensively. Their significant size advantage kept the Cardinals from driving inside as they consistently contested shots and passes, and they controlled the paint in outscoring Louisville 42-24 and held the Cards to 40 percent shooting.Young and Willie Cauley-Stein each grabbed 10 rebounds for Kentucky."We had a shot in the second half, and missed free throws and a big defensive mistake in giving up the 3-pointer," Louisville coach Rick Pitino said. "I give them credit, they did a good job against our pressure."Most importantly, Kentucky earned Bluegrass State bragging rights after a week in which Pitino and Calipari tried to stress the big-picture perspective. Besides cautioning players about putting too much weight in this game, both coaches also told them to block out the noise leading up to this well-hyped showdown.Tuning out the noise before 24,396 in Rupp Arena was another story. The standing-room only student section was filled an hour before tipoff and the din only grew louder — just after Louisville took the sea of Kentucky blue out of the game by scoring the first eight points.Randle answered with five for the Wildcats, including a driving dunk for his first basket that quickly got the crowd excited. That play set the stage for a half in which he muscled his way past a variety of Louisville defenders on 7-of-8 shooting.Cramps limited Randle to four second-half minutes and 21 overall, but not without a huge attempt from Kentucky's medical staff to rehydrate him."Three bags of IV (fluid) and the doc was squeezing it in," Calipari joked, "because I was saying, get him back, squeeze it."Andrew Harrison added seven points, helping to provide a 41-36 halftime lead as the Wildcats used their size to keep the Cardinals on the perimeter. Louisville started the second half quickly and tied it at 43 after two minutes as Smith scored five points while Mangok Mathiang added a putback. Louisville eventually grabbed its first lead since 9:09 of the first half, 52-51, on Jones' three-point play.From there it was all Kentucky as Andrew Harrison, Young and others banded together provided the victory the Wildcats had been seeking all year. That it came under adversity against their biggest rival before a charged-up crowd made it even sweeter."That's what you come to Kentucky for, to play the big games," Andrew Harrison said. "It's a great feeling and it's an even better win, but we're always looking to get better."
ATHENS, Ga. — Shacobia Barbee had 17 points, eight rebounds and six assists to lead No. 19 Georgia over Illinois 82-60 on Saturday.The Lady Bulldogs (12-1) took a 65-40 lead with 10:06 left in the game as Khaalidah Miller's layup capped an 18-6 run. Georgia also used an 11-0 run in the first half to go ahead 25-15 and closed out the half on a 10-3 run to lead 38-25 at the break.Krista Donald had 10 points and 15 rebounds and seven assists for Georgia which outrebounded the Illini 51-30. The Lady Bulldogs shot 55 percent from the field while holding Illinois to 33.8 percent. Tiaria Griffin had 17 points, Erika Ford scored 14 and Miller had 12.Ivory Crawford led Illinois (7-6) with 23 points, five rebounds and five steals. Amber Moore added 16 points for the Illini who never challenged the Lady Bulldogs in the second half.
Kevin Durant had 34 points and 12 rebounds, and the Oklahoma City Thunder held on to defeat the host Charlotte Bobcats, 89-85, on Friday night without the injured guard Russell Westbrook.The Thunder announced before the game that Westbrook had arthroscopic surgery on his right knee and would be out until after the All-Star break.Durant scored 14 points in the fourth quarter and finished 14 of 28 from the field. Serge Ibaka had 12 points and 9 rebounds for the Thunder, who have won seven straight road games and 11 of 12 over all.Reggie Jackson started in place of Westbrook but shot only 4 of 19 from the field.The Thunder managed to escape after Josh McRoberts missed a wide-open 3-point shot with three seconds left.Kemba Walker led the Bobcats with 18 points and 7 assists. Al Jefferson added 16 points and 11 rebounds.Durant is expected to take on an even bigger scoring load with Westbrook out at least 27 games. The surprising news came just two days after Westbrook had a triple-double against the Knicks.General Manager Sam Presti said in a news release that Westbrook had been playing without pain but "recently had experienced increased swelling" in his right knee.Westbrook's knee problems began in April when he tore his meniscus in the second game of the Western Conference playoffs, sidelining him for the remainder of the postseason and diminishing Oklahoma City's chances of reaching the N.B.A. finals. He had a second arthroscopic surgery before training camp.Oklahoma City is 21-3 with Westbrook in the starting lineup."He was playing great basketball, probably some of the best basketball in the entire league," Thunder Coach Scott Brooks said."We're looking forward to him coming back and getting back to the level that he has played at — and he will."TIMBERWOLVES 120, WIZARDS 98 Kevin Love had 25 points and 11 rebounds, and J. J. Barea scored 17 points off the bench to help host Minnesota beat Washington.Ricky Rubio had 11 points, 9 assists and 8 rebounds in 26 minutes, and Nikola Pekovic added 18 points and 10 rebounds for the Timberwolves. Minnesota outrebounded Washington, 44-35, and turned the ball over only five times.John Wall had 26 points and 7 assists for the Wizards, who missed a chance to win their fourth straight road game for the first time since March 2008. Nene added 13 points and 5 rebounds, but Bradley Beal had to be helped off the floor in the fourth quarter with a left leg injury.PELICANS 105, NUGGETS 89 Tyreke Evans had 19 points and 10 assists, and host New Orleans handed Denver its fifth straight loss.Jrue Holiday had 17 points and 4 steals, causing two turnovers that led to late fast-break points as the Pelicans halted the Nuggets' comeback bid.Anthony Davis added 17 points and 4 blocked shots despite playing sparingly in the first half because of three early fouls.Wilson Chandler scored 22 points and J. J. Hickson added 16 points and 10 rebounds for the Nuggets, who trailed by 18 in the second quarter but were as close as 93-87 on Quincy Miller's 3-point shot with 2 minutes 55 seconds to go.That is when Holiday found Davis for an alley-oop tip and again for a fast-break basket as New Orleans pulled away for its second straight win.MAGIC 109, PISTONS 92 Arron Afflalo scored 23 points to lead five Orlando players in double figures, and the Magic snapped a three-game losing streak with a win over visiting Detroit.Orlando led by as many as 22 and cruised in the fourth quarter.Nik Vucevic added 20 points and 11 rebounds, and Victor Oladipo, a rookie, had 16 points and a career-high 11 assists.The victory also ended a five-game home losing streak for the Magic, who had not won at Amway Center since the day before Thanksgiving.Brandon Jennings had 21 points and Will Bynum added 18 for the Pistons, who ended a streak of three consecutive road victories.In some of their recent losses, Orlando had started fast only to fall apart late.The Magic jumped out to another early lead, but this time they were able to sustain it with a variety of scoring bursts that kept the Pistons playing catch-up most of the night.
In a week when their tumultuous season may have reached its lowest point — a week marred by back-to-back 17-point losses, a season-ending injury to the All-Star center Brook Lopez and reports of locker-room turmoil — the Nets finished a three-game home stand by showing a glimpse of the play that many had envisioned when they talked of a title contender budding in Brooklyn."Losing is not something that we're getting comfortable with," Kevin Garnett said Friday after a 104-93 victory at home over the Milwaukee Bucks. "Tonight was definitely, Come out here, let's get a win, try and change this momentum around here."The good vibes from the victory may not last long. On Saturday, the Nets (10-19) begin a three-game trip that will pit them against a series of teams — Indiana, San Antonio and Oklahoma City — that have proved themselves contenders. Before Friday's game, the Nets also announced that Andray Blatche would miss the next three games.Coach Jason Kidd said that Blatche was out for "personal reasons" and that he would not accompany the team on the trip.Despite the uninspiring play of the Nets and the Knicks this season, there are teams outside New York that are playing even worse. The Bucks, who have the league's worst record at 6-23, shot 37.5 percent from the field.Milwaukee proved to be a remedy for the Nets' recent woes. After Lopez broke his right foot last Friday against the Philadelphia 76ers, the Nets entered the week facing a daunting challenge. The Eastern Conference-leading Pacers came first, easily defeating the Nets at Barclays Center, 103-86. Afterward, Kidd said his team was reaching a point where it seemed to accept losing."When things get tough, do we just give in? Most of the time, right now, we do," he said.Two days later, on Christmas, the Nets were outplayed by the Chicago Bulls on national television, 95-78. The Bulls, another preseason pick to be a contender, have been decimated by injuries, but they out-hustled the Nets much as they did in last season's first-round playoff victory. After the loss, Deron Williams called the season a "nightmare." The following day, reports surfaced that Kidd and Kevin Garnett had voiced their displeasure in the locker room.Before Friday's game, Kidd clarified his message. "It wasn't to call them out," Kidd said. "It was just a conversation in the locker room that we've got to compete."Garnett said he did not want to share what had been said after the Chicago loss. "That has nothing to do with anybody here," he said. "That was a personal thing that I had with the team, and I want to keep it personal."In the short term, the messages resonated with the players, who make up a $190 million roster.The Nets played their 13th starting lineup Friday, adding the reserve point guard Shaun Livingston — who led the team with 20 points — to the backcourt alongside Deron Williams. Paul Pierce, who played seven of the last eight games coming off the bench, started in the frontcourt along with Joe Johnson and Garnett. Kidd said he had been looking for a more energetic lineup.The revamping of the starting five paid off immediately, as the Nets took a 31-18 lead after the first quarter. Livingston and Williams combined for 11 of the Nets' first 15 points, while their smaller defensive lineup held the Bucks to 29.2 percent shooting."I thought it was the first quarter that really buried us and set the tone," Bucks Coach Larry Drew said.Mirza Teletovic, who had started the last three games for Brooklyn, added five 3-pointers and scored a career-high 19 points.Trailing by as many as 23 points in the fourth quarter, the Bucks were able to cut the Nets' lead to 88-79 on two free throws by Giannis Antetokounmpo with 3 minutes 2 seconds remaining. Kidd soon reinserted Williams, who had rested along with Garnett for the entire quarter.With 1:03 remaining, Williams drew a charge on Milwaukee's Khris Middleton to seal the victory. Williams left the game and was greeted by celebrating teammates on the bench.Whether the good times continue may hinge on whether the Nets have finally heeded their coach's message or just ran into a team on Friday that is having a worse season than they are.Garnett, the player many expected to be the vocal leader of this team, said the Nets had displayed the fight and belief he expected of them.
MORAGA, Calif. — Jackie Nared scored 27 points and Danielle Mauldin had 24 with 23 rebounds to lift Saint Mary's to a 79-78 win over No. 24 Gonzaga in the West Coast Conference opener Saturday.Haiden Palmer, who had a career-high 31 points, had a couple missed shots in the closing seconds for Gonzaga, the nine-time defending WCC champion.It was a wild ending to regulation with Nared hitting a 3-pointer with 0.3 seconds left to give St Mary's (11-1) a 72-71 lead. But on the inbounds play, screener Lindsay Sherbert was fouled and she made one of two free throws for Gonzaga (10-3).Gonzaga had led since Palmer's six points fueled a 12-2 run to close the half for a 37-32 lead.Saint Mary's pounded Gonzaga on the boards 54-31, 10 of Mauldin's career-high coming on the offensive end, and at the foul line, going 23 of 29 while Gonzaga was 6-14.
EAST LANSING, Mich. — Keith Appling scored 16 of his career-high tying 27 points in the first half to help No. 5 Michigan State pull away and rout New Orleans 101-48 Saturday.The Spartans (11-1) struggled for several minutes before taking control with a 12-0 run midway through the first half. They led 44-27 at halftime and easily added to their comfortable cushion in the second half, finishing with their highest-scoring game since beating Nebraska-Omaha 110-68 two years ago.The Privateers (3-5) had won two straight, including its previous game at UTEP.New Orleans' Matt Derenbecker scored 16 and Cory Dixon had 11 points.Gary Harris scored 19 on 7-of-17 shooting and Adreian Payne had 17 points for the Spartans in their final tuneup before beginning the Big Ten season Tuesday night at Penn State. Michigan State's Denzel Valentine had 10 points, a career-high 13 rebounds and six assists.The Spartans rested starting forward Branden Dawson because of a shin bruise.Appling bounced back from a bad game, equaling the career high in scoring that he set last month against Oklahoma. The senior point guard was held to four points, playing with a hip pointer, after making just 2 of 11 shots in last week's 14-point win at Texas. He also matched a season high with eight assists and grabbed five rebounds against New Orleans.Harris responded with a poor start against New Orleans with a solid game offensively. The sophomore shooting guard was 0 for 5 before a second straight 3-pointer capped Michigan State's pivotal run that gave it a 21-10 lead.Before the burst, the Spartans had more turnovers (six) than made shots (four) against a fired-up team aiming for an upset.New Orleans, a Southland Conference school, couldn't sustain its early success and fell to 7-30 against ranked teams.
IOWA CITY, Iowa — Melissa Dixon sparked a key run before halftime and Samantha Logic heated up in the second half as No. 21 Iowa rallied from as many as nine down to roar past North Dakota 88-62 on Saturday.Logic, the reigning Big Ten player of the week after a triple-double against Drake, had six points at halftime. She finished with a game-high 21 with eight assists. Dixon scored 10 of her 13 points as the Hawkeyes (12-2) closed the first half with a crushing 25-4 run that included five of their six first-half 3-pointers, two from Dixon. Iowa was 9-for-25 from 3-point range.The Bison (6-4) had led through much of the opening half, until Iowa started dropping 3-pointers. North Dakota was led by Madi Buck's 19 points with Mia Loyd adding 13 and Emily Evers 10.North Dakota committed 21 turnovers, 12 on Iowa steals and shot just 39.7 percent (23-58).
TALLAHASSEE, Fla. — Natasha Howard tied a career high with 26 points on Saturday and No. 22 Florida State defeated Tennessee-Martin 76-53.Howard was 12 of 14 from the field to lead Florida State to 54.5 percent shooting. Ivey Slaughter had 11 points and 13 rebounds and Morgan Jones added 17 points for the Seminoles (12-1) which extended their winning streak to eight games.FSU completed its nonconference schedule with only one loss for the third time since joining the Atlantic Coast Conference in the 1991-92 season.The Seminoles scored 11 straight points to go ahead 19-8 in the first half and led by as many as 25 before the intermission. They built their biggest lead at 69-38 before UT-Martin scored seven straight points.Heather Butler led UT-Martin (7-6) with 16 points and five steals, but the Seahawks managed only 20 rebounds, compared to 41 by the Seminoles.
DURHAM, N.C. — Jabari Parker scored 23 points and No. 9 Duke beat Eastern Michigan 82-59 on Saturday.Andre Dawkins added 20 points with a season-high six 3-pointers as a late replacement for an ill Rodney Hood in the starting lineup.Rasheed Sulaimon added 13 points and came up with the key hustle play during the decisive second-half run that helped the Blue Devils (10-2) polish off their fourth straight win.They shot 40 percent against Eastern Michigan's tough matchup zone defense with 10 3-pointers, built a 47-32 advantage on the boards and wrapped up the pre-ACC home schedule with their 101st straight nonconference win at Cameron Indoor Stadium.Mike Talley scored 20 points to lead the Eagles (7-4). They went 6 minutes between field goals during the critical stretch when Duke pulled away.The Blue Devils led just 43-35 with 15 minutes left before breaking the game open with a 15-1 run.Quinn Cook and Hood hit 3-pointers roughly 25 seconds apart before Sulaimon's key hustle play.He had Eagles guard J.R. Sims trapped near midcourt when Sims tried to spike the ball off Sulaimon and out of bounds — but the ball instead rolled down the sideline toward the Duke basket.Sulaimon scooped it up, was fouled hard by Sims — who received a flagrant foul — on his way to the basket and hit the ensuing two free throws to stretch the lead to 53-35 with 13:12 left.Dawkins' 3-pointer roughly 3 minutes later gave the Blue Devils their first 20-point lead at 56-36. Amile Jefferson — who started the run with a free throw with 14:28 left — hit a foul shot to push it to 58-36 with 10:25 remaining, and they pulled away from there.Jefferson finished with a career-high 14 rebounds for the Blue Devils, who have had at least one 20-point scorer in every game this season. It's the first time they've done it since the eventual national champion 2000-01 team, which accomplished it in its first 17 games.And 10 of those 20-point games belong to Parker, who has led or shared the team's scoring lead eight times.He scored 14 of Duke's 37 points in the first half after hitting six of his first 11 shots, including a pair of thunderous alley-oop dunks.That helped make up for an off day for Hood, who finished with eight points on 3-of-8 shooting with eight rebounds while playing through what team officials said was an unspecified illness. Hood was announced as a starter but briefly left the court before tipoff and was replaced by Dawkins before the opening tip.This was the first meeting between the schools since the 1996 NCAA tournament, when the Earl Boykins-led Eagles upset Duke in the first round.And for a while, they looked plenty capable of knocking off Duke again.Early on, Eastern Michigan frustrated the Blue Devils with that matchup zone that held them to 3-of-14 shooting from 3-point range in the first half.Duke didn't take its first double-figure lead until the 4-minute mark of the half when Hood's stickback dunk of a missed jumper by Parker made it 32-21.Karrington Ward scored 11 points and Sims finished with 10 for Eastern Michigan.
WEST LAFAYETTE, Ind. — Whitney Bays scored 24 points to lead No. 17 Purdue over Central Michigan 109-97 on Saturday.Purdue (10-2) shot 58 percent from the floor, including 15 of 29 (52 percent) from beyond the arc. KK Houser had 21 points and 11 boards, Liza Clemons added 20 points on 8-of-10 shooting, Courtney Moses had 20 (6 of 10 on 3-pointers) and April Wilson chipped in with 16 points.Central Michigan (4-7) was led by Jessica Green's 24 points, while Nichole DiGuilio had 21. The Chippewas also had five in double figures.Wilson's 3-pointer midway through the first half gave the Boilermakers a nine-point lead, but DiGuilio knocked a trey down for Central with 29 seconds in the half to cut Purdue's advantage to six at intermission.Moses made three consecutive treys end the end of the game to bump up Purdue's winning margin.
BRIDGEPORT, Conn. — Shabazz Napier had 15 points and nine assists Saturday to lead No. 15 Connecticut to an 82-65 win over Eastern Washington in a Huskies home game played 80 miles from campus.Napier led a balanced attack in which five UConn players reached double figures. Ryan Boatright had 14 points and Niels Giffey, making his first start this season, added 13 for the Huskies (11-1).Tyler Harvey scored 19 points to lead Eastern Washington (5-6), which trailed by just six points midway through the second half. Ognjen Miljkovic added 15 points and Drew Brandon 13 for the Eagles, who took 28 shots from 3-point range and made nine.UConn came in shooting just under 44 percent from 3-point range, but made just 3 of 10 shots from behind the arc. Eastern Washington was 3 of 13 in the first half. The Huskies had shot 46.5 percent on 3s over their first nine games, but are now just 13 of 44 in their last three.UConn made up the difference at the foul line, hitting 25 of 27 free-throw attempts. Eastern Washington made took just seven foul shots, making six.The Huskies led 30-23 at halftime, and took their first double-digit lead at 38-27 early in the second half on a dunk by DeAndre Daniels.But a 3-pointer by Harvey cut the Eagles' deficit to 48-42 midway through the second half, forcing UConn coach Kevin Ollie to use a timeout.Napier responded with a three-point play, and UConn stretched the lead to 58-45 after five straight points from Phil Nolan.Nolan finished with 11 points and Omar Calhoun had 12.The game, played during UConn's winter break, gave the fan base and donors in wealthy Fairfield County a chance to see the team in person. It was the first "home" game played outside of Storrs or Hartford since the Huskies lost to Syracuse, 88-71, on Jan. 3, 1987, in New Haven.Ollie and Boatright both celebrated birthdays on Friday. Ollie is 21 and his coach just turned 41. Ollie's wife, Stephanie, is from Bridgeport and had 16 members of her family at the game.Eastern Washington, which was coming off a 92-70 loss at Seton Hall, has now dropped five of its last six to fall under .500 heading into conference play. The Eagles, in the middle of a four-game road trip, open the Big Sky schedule Jan. 2 at Weber State.The Eagles were playing a ranked team for the first time since November 2011. They fell to 1-19 against the Top 25, including 15 consecutive losses.They led this one early.Harvey hit a 3-pointer to give them an 11-8 lead, and a layup by Drew Brandon with just over 6 minutes left put them in front 21-20.The Huskies closed the first half on a 10-2 run, holding Eastern Washington scoreless for the final 4:21. Giffey had a 3-pointer and a layup in a 15-second span to give UConn a 30-23 lead with just under 3 minutes remaining, and neither team scored the rest of the period.
COLUMBIA, S.C. — Tiffany Mitchell scored 18 points and the South Carolina defense made sure Savannah State was no challenge in an 82-40 rout Saturday afternoon.Alaina Coates came off the bench to score 17 points and grab 12 rebounds for the Gamecocks (12-1). Aleighsa Welch added 14 points and Asia Dozier had 10. Mitchell also had seven rebounds, five steals and four assists.Senior reserve Jasmine Kirkland topped Savannah State (5-7) with 19 points, one shy of her career high. No starter had more than three points as they combined for 10 points. Kirkland hit 6 of 9 shots and 7 of 8 free throws.South Carolina held the Tigers to 26.5 percent shooting and forced 19 turnovers. Coates hit 4 of 5 shots and made 9 of 14 free throws. The Gamecocks went 30 of 48 from the foul line while Savannah State was 12 of 14.
SAN ANTONIO — Manu Ginobili scored 28 points, Tony Parker added 22, and Tim Duncan had 17 points and 13 rebounds to lead the San Antonio Spurs to a 112-104 victory over the Sacramento Kings on Sunday night.Boris Diaw had 14 points and Tiago Splitter added 11 for San Antonio (24-7).DeMarcus Cousins had 29 points and 14 rebounds, Isaiah Thomas added 27 points and Rudy Gay had 24 for Sacramento (9-20).Struggling mightily on defense for much of the second half, the Spurs turned to their Big Three to close out the upstart Kings.Ginobili, Duncan and Parker scored San Antonio's final 21 points in a 23-8 run to close the game.Ginobili had consecutive 3s to tie the game at 102 with 3 minutes remaining.The Spurs switched Duncan to guard Cousins, and the move immediately paid off as the Kings center committed a backcourt violation while attempting to take an inbounds from Ben McLemore.Duncan then hit a free throw to complete a three-point play after drawing Cousins' second foul on the ensuing possession.Cousins then shot an airball while attempting several spins and duck-and-under moves against Duncan. Parker followed with a 3 to put San Antonio up 108-102 with less than a minute remaining.NOTES: Kings F Carl Landry remains out with a torn left hip flexor muscle. Landry has not played this season. . The mascots for the Texas Longhorns and Oregon Ducks appeared in a skit during the first quarter to promote Monday's Valero Alamo Bowl at the Alamodome, former home to the Spurs. . San Antonio coach Gregg Popovich was teased about his wardrobe selection, wearing a black jacket with a white checkered pattern. A Spurs television analyst attempted to play tic-tac-toe when Popovich appeared on the local coverage.
COLLEGE PARK, Md. — Alyssa Thomas scored a season-high 28 points and grabbed her 1,000th rebound as No. 8 Maryland routed the College of Charleston 103-51 on Sunday in the Terrapin Classic championship game.Thomas reached the milestone with her 10th and final rebound of the game, leading to her last field goal, a putback that pushed it to 91-40.Coach Brenda Frese then substituted for the senior, who played 23 minutes, before an appreciative crowd.Shatori Walker-Kimbrough added 15 points as the Terrapins (12-1) closed out December and the non-conference portion of their schedule with their 10th consecutive victory.Maryland has defeated its last four opponents, all at home, by an average of 53.5 points, and played its most dominant first half of the season Sunday, taking a 54-15 lead.January gets significantly tougher, with an ACC opener at No. 10 North Carolina next weekend and home games against No. 20 Syracuse and No. 2 Notre Dame later in the month. Maryland's only loss came at home on Nov. 15 against top-ranked UConn, Maryland's only ranked opponent to date.Tolbert was the only Charleston player to make a field goal in the first half. The 54 points were the most they allowed and the 15 the least they scored in a half this season.Tolbert's teammates were 0 for 21 from the field in the first 20 minutes, before Breanna Bolden, who finished with 11 points, hit an inside basket that made it 58-19 early in the second half.Thomas' performance — her 12th consecutive double-double — came a day after posting her second triple-double of the season in the Terrapins' semifinal victory over Wofford.And by the time Bolden made her first field goal, Thomas had scored 22 points, including 20 before halftime, turning from facilitator to scorer a day after contributing 10 assists.Thomas had already hit three inside baskets before Tolbert made Charleston's first field goal 5:31 in. Later in the half, she scored eight consecutive points for Maryland as the lead grew to 45-13.Maryland guard Lexie Brown returned to action after missing Saturday's semifinal because of a family issue.
LOS ANGELES — The best teams in the National Basketball Association are typically able to win games "playing ugly", and Los Angeles Clippers coach Doc Rivers wants to see his players develop this attribute.Rivers was delighted with the outcome at a packed Staples Center on Saturday, but readily admitted he was taken aback by his team's ability to deliver the 'ugly' script on cue as they overcame an erratic display to beat the Utah Jazz 98-90."You're playing hard, things still aren't going right and you've got to find a way to win," the husky-voiced Rivers told reporters after the (21-11) Clippers took control of the game after the score was tied at 90-90 with 2:25 left."And that's the team I want us to become one day. I didn't mean tonight but I will take tonight."Every time we got a 10-point, nine-point lead, it was almost guaranteed we're going to have three turnovers in a row or bobble the ball. It was just one of those nights. We just made enough plays to win the game."Power forward Blake Griffin shrugged off a career-high eight turnovers to pile up 40 points on 13-for-20 shooting, along with 10 rebounds, while All-Star point guard Chris Paul narrowly missed a rare triple-double.Paul, playmaker extraordinaire for the Clippers and so often their prime closer, finished with 21 points, 10 rebounds and nine assists as he and Griffin inspired one another with their 'must win' energy in the fourth quarter."We just tried to get out the win, it's not going to be pretty every night," Paul ruefully said after the Clippers ended a two-game losing streak by fending off a spirited fightback by the (9-24) Jazz."We missed a lot of easy shots, I missed a few layups and we didn't convert a lot of lobs tonight but when it was winning time (late in the fourth quarter), we converted."Me and Blake have been talking a lot before the jump ball about dominating and being aggressive, both of us, because I think the team feeds off our energy. So we're just trying to keep rolling, keep piling up wins and playing the right way."Griffin, a three-time All-Star, has averaged 26.9 points, 11.1 rebounds and 3.4 assists in his last eight games while improving his once woeful free throw percentage to an impressive 80.6 percent. Paul is not at all surprised."His confidence right now is pretty high, and rightfully so," said Paul, a six-time All-Star. "It's great to see how he's dominated games, whether he's taking jump shots, posting up or going to the free throw line."It's fun to watch and I wouldn't know how to guard him. It's not just the offensive end, it's the defensive end, his rebounding. And it's contagious because I feed off of it."Perhaps the most impressive thing about the Clippers' win was that they avoided an emotional hangover after suffering heart-breaking losses on the road in their previous two games, to the Golden State Warriors and the Portland Trail Blazers."We just had to regroup," said Griffin, referring to the 116-112 defeat in overtime by Portland on Thursday and the 105-103 loss to Golden State on Christmas Day. "It's about mentally moving on and learning from our mistakes."My team mates just kept giving me the ball and giving me the confidence. They did their work and put me in a position to score easily, so I had to finish for them."Though Rivers was a frustrated figure as the Clippers trailed the Jazz after each of the first two quarters before ending the night with 13 turnovers, he felt his team was on the brink of achieving something special."It was amazing," Rivers said. "We miss how many dunks and lobs? It was one of those games and it's nice to win them. When you have the talent that we have, it's more trying to get guys to play in the right spirit every night."And we're getting there. I think our team is really close. I've been saying it for a week or two, you can feel it. We're close to being really good."
OKLAHOMA CITY — Kevin Durant had 33 points, 13 rebounds and five assists, and the Oklahoma City Thunder won their second straight game without Russell Westbrook, beating the Houston Rockets 117-86 on Sunday night.Jeremy Lamb added a career-high 22 points and five assists for Oklahoma City, which has the NBA's best record at 25-5. The Thunder have won 12 of their last 13 and 20 of their last 22 games.Reggie Jackson, starting in Westbrook's place, had 16 points and eight assists.Aaron Brooks had 17 points and Chandler Parsons scored 15 for Houston, which was playing its fourth game in five days. The Rockets, who had a three-game winning streak snapped, missed their first 12 shots and shot 36.5 percent from the field (31 of 85).Oklahoma City shot 57 percent (47 of 82) in dealing the Rockets their worst loss of the season.Oklahoma City moved to 3-2 on the season without Westbrook. The All-Star point guard underwent arthroscopic knee surgery on Friday, his third surgery since last April, when he tore his meniscus after Houston guard Patrick Beverley banged knees with him as Westbrook tried to call a timeout in Game 2 of a first-round playoff series.The Thunder have said Westbrook's latest surgery will sideline him until after the All-Star break. Oklahoma City won 89-85 at Charlotte on Friday night in their first game since that surgery, as Durant had 34 points and 12 rebounds.Oklahoma City jumped to a 13-0 lead as the Rockets — making their first trip to Oklahoma City since falling to the Thunder in six games in their playoff series — failed to score until Dwight Howard hit a 3-foot jump hook with 5:27 left in the first quarter.The Thunder extended their lead to 22-5 on a driving layup by Thabo Sefolosha and were up 26-14 at the end of the quarter. The Thunder's lead stayed in double digits most of the second quarter and Oklahoma City led 56-44 at halftime.Parsons opened the second half with a corner 3-pointer to pull the Rockets within nine points, but Durant hit two 3-pointers and Jackson had another during a 15-0 run to give Oklahoma City its biggest lead to that point at 71-47.Houston came no closer than 17 points the rest of the way and Oklahoma City's lead eventually reached as many as 32 points, with Lamb putting on a shooting show, finishing 8 of 10 from the field, including 3 of 4 from 3-point range.Houston had all five starters reach double figures in scoring in two of its previous three games, but only Parsons did so against Oklahoma City. Howard struggled against the defense of Oklahoma City's Kendrick Perkins and had nine points and nine rebounds.Houston also struggled at the free throw line, hitting just 17 of 31 attempts (54.8 percent).Sefolosha scored 13 points, one off his season high, for Oklahoma City. Omri Casspi added 15 points for the Rockets.Notes: James Harden, a former fan favorite with the Thunder before being traded to Houston before last season, received a strong mix of boos and cheers during pregame introductions. Right before the tipoff, Harden walked over to the Thunder bench to greet some of his former teammates and coaches . Houston's 14-point first quarter was a season low and the Rockets' second-lowest quarter of the season . Aaron Brooks hit a halfcourt shot at the end of the third quarter, which pulled the Rockets within 90-70 . Oklahoma City is 13-1 at Chesapeake Energy Arena this season, falling only to Toronto on Dec. 22.
ATLANTA — Paul Millsap knows the Atlanta Hawks won't have an easy time replacing Al Horford.Even so, Millsap was proud that the Hawks held together despite the absence of their leading scorer and rebounder."Everybody's still a little shocked about the situation," Millsap said. "You could tell. Al's a big part of what we do, but once we shook it off, guys just got out there and played ball."Millsap scored a season-high 33 points, Lou Williams scored 10 of his season-best 28 points in overtime and the Hawks rallied to beat the Charlotte Bobcats 118-116 on Saturday night.Al Jefferson had 24 points and a season-high 23 rebounds, and Gerald Henderson added 22 points for Charlotte.Playing their first game since Horford suffered a torn pectoral muscle, the Hawks trailed by 14 after Henderson hit a 20-foot fadeaway jumper with 4:19 left in the third quarter.But Atlanta, which has won two straight and five of six, rallied to force overtime when backup center Pero Antic made a one-legged 3-pointer from the right wing with 3.1 seconds left in regulation."It's going to take some time to learn to play without Al," Hawks coach Mike Budenholzer said. "We have to get everybody comfortable, to keep the ball moving, to know where the spots are. I thought our start was OK, actually."Jeff Teague finished with 20 points and nine assists for the Hawks. Mike Scott added 18 points, and Millsap pulled down 13 rebounds.The Bobcats, who have lost two straight and three of four, didn't trail again in regulation after Ben Gordon's 3 from the left corner made it 86-84.Antic's shot while moving away from the basket made it 101-all and the game went to overtime when Henderson's fadeaway jumper bounced off the rim at the buzzer.Jefferson bemoaned that Antic was able to get the ball in a scramble and score his only points of the game."My guy hit a shot fake, going left, off one leg, a 3-point shot to tie the game," Jefferson said. "I mean, what can you say? It's part of the game, I guess. It hurts, though."In the final minute of OT, Millsap hit a pair of free throws to make it 108-all, Kemba Walker missed a wild shot for Charlotte and Williams hit two foul shots to give Atlanta the lead for good at 110-108.There were five lead changes in the first half and five in the second half. Charlotte's biggest advantage before intermission was 10 on Henderson's 4-foot turnaround jumper with 4:22 left in the second quarter.Walker, who scored at least 20 in six straight games before finishing with 18 in Friday's home loss to Oklahoma City, missed his first six shots before hitting a 3-pointer that put Charlotte up 55-47 early in the third.Walker finished 4 for 20 from the field and scored 16 points."I just told them, we have to get past the point where everybody's happy that the Bobcats aren't getting beat every night," Charlotte coach Steve Clifford said. "Because we're better than that, OK? We can play better than this."It took until the final seconds of the third for Atlanta to cut the lead to six when Antic blocked three shots by Cody Zeller on the same possession and Williams followed with a 3 from the left sideline to make it 77-71."We did a great job of getting stops there at the end," Williams said. "We made timely baskets. We made big shots in situations where we needed them. In overtime, we just battled."Notes: Atlanta G Kyle Korver hit a 3 early in the fourth to extend his NBA career record to a 99th consecutive game. ... With Horford sidelined, Millsap and G DeMarre Carroll are the only Hawks to start and play in all 30 games. Budenholzer said before the game that the team doesn't know much time Horford will miss. He tore his right pectoral muscle in Friday's OT win at Cleveland. Two years ago, Horford played in just 11 regular-season games after tearing his left pectoral muscle. ... Carroll was a game-time decision with a sprained right thumb and was scoreless after going 0 for 4 from the field. ... Charlotte dropped to 6-4 on the road against Eastern Conference opponents. ... The Bobcats dropped to 5-14 at Philips Arena. ... Horford's replacements at center — Elton Brand, Antic and Gustavo Ayon — were a combined 2 for 13 from the field for six points.
INDIANAPOLIS — A little more than four minutes into the third quarter, after Paul Pierce had spun and made a 17-foot, fadeaway jump shot, Alan Anderson bounced up from his seat, clapping his hands."We can score all day," yelled Anderson, the most vocal player on the Nets' bench most nights. "We've got to play D!"It was a worthy sentiment, but it was for naught: The Nets' disarray this season has been no more apparent than on the defensive end, and they looked powerless again Saturday night, tumbling to a 105-91 loss against the Indiana Pacers at Bankers Life Fieldhouse.Several Nets players sat with forlorn looks as the clock ticked down on their latest loss, which dropped their record to 10-20. After the game, Anderson could only shake his head."It's just not being consistent," Anderson said. "We're focused for a certain amount of time, then there's a lack of focus for whatever reason. That's what's been hurting us this year."The two teams had met only Monday night, and Nets Coach Jason Kidd suggested after that game that his team might be growing comfortable losing. After another poor performance Wednesday, he questioned his players' collective effort.On Saturday, Kidd said his players showed more resilience — but not for the whole four quarters."We played for a half; the effort was there," he said. "That third quarter, once we got down 10, guys thought we were down 20."The game featured eight lead changes before halftime but none afterward as the Nets' night crept to another disappointing finish. The Pacers led by only 58-56 at the beginning of the second half but proceeded to outscore the Nets, 28-20, during the third quarter.Kidd said the Nets missed opportunities to make the game competitive again."We've got to keep fighting," he said. "That's something we've got to get better at."Pierce scored 18 points while going 8 for 14 from the field to lead the Nets. Paul George had 24 points to lead the Pacers, and George Hill added 21. But Indiana guard Lance Stephenson, 23, a Brooklyn native who seems to be emerging as a star, may have overshadowed them all.Stephenson heard some comments during the first quarter from the Nets, who were needling him about his dribbling tendencies. In the second quarter, he looked to the Nets' bench and yelled, "You want me to go left?"In reality, the Nets could not stop him in any direction: Stephenson finished with 23 points, 9 rebounds and 7 assists.The Pacers as a whole presented a formidable challenge. They have the best record in the Eastern Conference (24-5), which includes a 14-1 record at home, and they were well rested, not having played since that 103-86 rout of the Nets on Monday at Barclays Center.That victory was the Pacers' third straight, a run in which they had outscored their opponents, 323-246, for an average margin of victory of 25.7 points. For the season, they were allowing the fewest points a game and had the highest net points per 100 possessions in the N.B.A.Kidd used his 14th lineup of the season to try to match the Pacers' size, but it was to no avail."You almost have to be flawless," Pierce said about playing the Pacers right now.The Nets weathered the early storm. They displayed some tenacity, forcing eight turnovers during the first two quarters, and they displayed some determination around the basket, outscoring the Pacers in the lane, 28-22, in the first half.But the Pacers started the second half on a 9-2 run and never looked back."This team has a unique way of figuring a team out as the game goes on," Coach Frank Vogel said of his Pacers.The Nets have a shown a unique ability to fall apart in the same time frame.Andrei Kirilenko (sore back) traveled with the Nets and worked out on Saturday but was unavailable for the game. He did not rule out playing Tuesday. "We're trying to get in the flow, get some hard practices and see how it feels after," said Kirilenko, who has not played since Nov. 8. "It is still feeling like it's not there, that it's a little bit early." ... Andray Blatche did not travel with the team. The Nets announced Friday that he would be unavailable at least through their Jan. 2 game against the Oklahoma City Thunder for personal reasons. Asked about Blatche on Saturday afternoon, Jason Kidd said: "It's just personal. It's a team issue. So no need to comment about it." ... The Nets said center Brook Lopez would have surgery Jan. 4 to repair the fractured fifth metatarsal in his right foot. It will be the third operation on his foot since December 2011.
Jim Boeheim stared up in frustration at the Carrier Dome scoreboard, his No. 2 Orange in big trouble against eighth-ranked Villanova (11-1).The Wildcats had started Saturday's game by hitting four straight 3-point shots and led, 25-7, midway through the first half after a dunk by Josh Hart.Syracuse (12-0) went nearly four minutes without a basket as the Wildcats looked exactly like the team that had already beaten two ranked opponents."There was no indication we were going to get going," Boeheim said.If the Orange were frazzled by their largest deficit of the season, it never showed. They responded with a 20-0 run over the next five minutes to take their first lead and never trailed again, winning, 78-62, in a game between two of nine unbeaten teams left in N.C.A.A. Division I.KENTUCKY 73, LOUISVILLE 66 Kentucky guards Aaron Harrison and Andrew Harrison combined for 28 points, including 11 during a critical second-half stretch with Julius Randle sidelined by cramps, helping the 18th-ranked Wildcats (10-3) beat No. 6 Louisville in Lexington, Ky.The Harrisons, who are twins, amply filled the void left by Randle, turning a 52-51 deficit with 11 minutes 1 second remaining into a 68-58 lead with four minutes left. Russ Smith scored 19 points for Louisville (11-2).UCONN 82, E. WASHINGTON 65 Shabazz Napier had 15 points and 9 assists to lead 15th-ranked Connecticut (11-1) over Eastern Washington (5-6) in Bridgeport, Conn.Napier led a balanced offense in which five Huskies reached double figures. Ryan Boatright had 14 points and Niels Giffey, making his first start this season, added 13 for UConn.Mike Talley scored 20 points to lead the Eagles (7-4). WISCONSIN 80, PRAIRIE VIEW 43 Sam Dekker had 16 points and 11 rebounds for his third career double-double as No. 4 Wisconsin (13-0) cruised past visiting Prairie View (2-10).MICH. ST. 101, N. ORLEANS 48 Keith Appling scored 16 of his career-high tying 27 points in the first half to help No. 5 Michigan State (11-1) pull away and rout visiting New Orleans (3-5).MEMPHIS 75, JACKSON ST. 61 Michael Dixon scored 14 points, Shaq Goodwin had 13 points and 7 rebounds, and No. 17 Memphis (9-2) never trailed against visiting Jackson State (4-8). UMASS 69, PROVIDENCE 67 Derrick Gordon's put-back with 1.1 seconds left in overtime lifted 23rd-ranked Massachusetts (11-1) to a victory over visiting Providence (10-3).GONZAGA 74, SANTA CLARA 60 David Stockton scored a season-high 21 points as No. 24 Gonzaga (11-2) beat visiting Santa Clara (7-7) in the teams' West Coast Conference opener.ST. JOHN'S 65, COLUMBIA 59 D'Angelo Harrison scored 15 points and Orlando Sanchez had 12 points and 9 rebounds to lead St. John's (9-3) to a victory over Columbia in the Brooklyn Hoops Winter Festival at Barclays Center. Grant Mullins had 17 points for Columbia (7-6).HARVARD 94, FORDHAM 86 Siyani Chambers scored 19 points and finished with nine assists as balanced shooting by Harvard (11-1) led to a victory over host Fordham (7-5).GEO. WASH. 69, HOFSTRA 58 Maurice Creek had 17 points and 4 steals to lead George Washington (11-1) to a victory over host Hofstra (3-8).MARYLAND 110, WOFFORD 53 Alyssa Thomas had her second triple-double in three games to lead No. 8 Maryland (11-1) to a rout of visiting Wofford (2-9) in the Terrapin Classic semifinals.STANFORD 86, FRESNO STATE 54 Chiney Ogwumike scored 16 of her 20 points in the first half and No. 4 Stanford (11-1) routed host Fresno State (6-5).
BERKELEY, Calif. — Reshanda Gray had 20 points and eight rebounds on Sunday to lead No. 23 California over Lafayette 77-60 in the first meeting between the programs.Cal (8-3) led 30-27 at the break and used second-half runs of 13-2 and 10-0 to build a 70-48 advantage with 4:15 to go. Brittany Boyd had 13 points, seven assists and four steals and Courtney Range added 11 points.The win allowed the Golden Bears to bounce back after losing to No. 1 UConn 80-47 on Dec. 22.Danielle Fiacco and Linnel Macklin each had 13 points and Emily Homan added 11 points for Lafayette (6-5).Macklin was 3 of 6 from 3-point range. She tied the game at 30-30 with a 3-pointer just 17 seconds after intermission, but the Leopards fell behind as they allowed Cal to shoot 16 for 31 from the field in the second half.
CORVALLIS, Ore. — Kayla McBride scored 20 points, Natalie Achonwa added 16 points and eight rebounds, and No. 2 Notre Dame remained perfect with a 70-58 victory over Oregon State on Sunday.Sophomore Jewell Loyd, last year's national freshman of the year, had 10 points for the Irish (11-0) — 8.5 below her team-leading average coming in.Jamie Weisner scored 18 points to lead the Beavers (8-4), and Ruth Hamblin added 12 points, eight rebounds and a school record-tying nine blocks.Notre Dame used an 11-0 run bridging halftime to take a 37-33 lead, and didn't trail again.Oregon State didn't trail until Ali Gibson's 3-pointer with 13:06 left in the first half.Hamblin's put-back had stretched the Beavers' lead to 33-26 with 55 seconds left in the opening half. The Irish scored the last five points of the period to pull within two at the break, and then scored the first six points of the second half.Notre Dame began the day leading the nation in field-goal shooting (52.2 percent) and 3-point shooting (44.9 percent), but the Irish shot 36 percent overall in the first half and 1 from 6 on 3s.With 1:25 left, however, Ariel Braker got a steal off an inbounds play for Oregon State, and McBride made a jumper to push the lead to 66-58. Braker blocked Weisner on the Beavers' next possession.The Irish, who have reached the Final Four each of the last three years and title games in 2011 and 2012, are off to their best start since 2009-10, when they began 15-0.Notre Dame's next game is Jan. 2 against South Dakota State.Weisner, a sophomore guard, entered the contest as the Beavers top scorer at 14.9 points per game. OSU has a young team, with four underclassmen starters.Sunday's game was the start of a tough stretch for the Beavers, who open Pac-12 play next week with games against No. 23 California and No. 4 Stanford.
BOULDER, Colo. — Arielle Roberson scored 18 points and gathered 12 rebounds to lead No. 12 Colorado over Southern Utah 75-59 Sunday.Colorado (9-1) struggled from the floor, shooting just 38 percent for the game, including a woeful 1 of 13 beyond the arc. Ashley Wilson scored 14 points in the win, with Jasmine Sborov adding 12 points and 10 rebounds, and Jen Reese chipping in with 11 points.Southern Utah struggled with its shooting as well. The Thunderbirds hit just 34 percent from the field and 1 of 13 on 3-pointers. They were led by Desiree Jackson with 21 points, six rebounds and three assists.Southern Utah used a 7-0 run, fueled by multiple fouls by Colorado and made free throws by Jackson, to cut the lead to two points at 54-52 with 8:08 left. But Colorado responded with a 19-2 run to wrest control of the game.
NORMAN, Okla. — Morgan Hook scored 12 points and handed out five assists as No. 25 Oklahoma topped Samford 66-35 Sunday.Samford (3-9) took an 8-4 lead but Oklahoma then rattled off 25 of the next 30 points, including eight by Hook, who capped the run with her second 3-pointer of the game. The Bulldogs, who made just 12 of 48 (25 percent) field goals and 6 of 33 (18.2 percent) 3-pointers, would never again get closer than 14.Oklahoma (9-4), which took a 36-20 advantage into the break, out-rebounded Samford 46-21 and shot 50 percent from the field and 47.6 percent from long range. The Sooners recorded 16 assists on 23 field goals.Nicole Griffin added 12 points and Derica Wyatt added 11 in the win. Nicole Kornet led the Sooners with nine rebounds while Kaylon Williams added eight boards.
WICHITA, Kan. — Cleanthony Early had 24 points and 10 rebounds to help No. 10 Wichita State to extend the best start in school history with an 81-70 victory over Davidson on Sunday.Ron Baker had 15 points for Wichita State (13-0) while Darius Carter scored 13 and Tekele Cotton added 10.Tyler Kalinoski had 17 points for Davidson (4-9), while Tom Droney added 12 and De'Mon Brooks scored 10.Wichita State was able to salt away the victory at the free throw line. The Shockers were 28 of 41 on free throws while Davidson was just 11 of 16. Three Wildcats fouled out.Wichita State also had a significant advantage in points off turnovers, converting Davidson's 15 turnovers into 18 points. The Shockers had nine turnovers, which the Wildcats turned into seven points.The Wildcats used a 6-0 run in less than 90 seconds on two running jumpers by Droney and a basket by Chris Czerapowicz to cut Wichita State's lead to 45-44 with 15:34 remaining.The Shockers stemmed the tide with a 9-2 run. Davidson shot 1 of 7 during the stretch, which was capped by a 3 by Early that made it 55-46 with 12:15 to play, the Shockers' biggest lead of the game to that point.But the Wildcats stayed within striking distance thanks to 3-pointers. In the next 5 minutes, Kalinoski hit two 3s while Czerapowicz and Brian Sullivan each hit one.Kalinoski's second 3-pointer in that span made the Wildcats 5 of 8 from beyond the arc in the half and cut the Shockers' lead to 65-60.But Davidson went on another drought after that, not hitting another field goal until Jake Belford's 3-pointer with 1:33 remaining. By that time, the Shockers had methodically pushed the lead to double digits for the first time, 75-64, after Baker's two free throws with 1:44 left.The Shockers scored the first half's final five points, including a tip-in by Carter at the buzzer, for a 36-32 lead.
UNIVERSITY PARK, Pa. — Maggie Lucas scored 18 points and No. 15 Penn State held off Hartford 70-56 Sunday.Penn State (9-3) started the second half with a 10-4 run, opening up a 47-35 lead with 14:49 remaining. Hartford would never again get closer than nine.Hartford kept the game close throughout the first 20 minutes but the Lady Lions pulled away by dominating the interior. They out-rebounded Hartford 47-30, including 15-6 on the offensive glass, and outscored the Hawks 40-14 in the paint and 14-5 on second chance points.Alyssa Englert, who came into the game with 14 assists all season, recorded a career-high nine for the Hawks (3-10). Cherelle Moore scored 11 points and grabbed nine rebounds.Ariel Edwards added 15 points and seven rebounds for Penn State, which failed to convert a 3-point basket (0 for 8) for the first time this season.
STILLWATER, Okla. — Liz Donohoe scored 21 points and gathered 16 rebounds to lead No. 11 Oklahoma State over Texas-Pan American 90-48 on Sunday.The Cowgirls (11-0) got 16 points from LaShawn Jones and 11 points and five assists from Tiffany Bias.Texas-Pan American (6-7) was led by Shawnte Goff's 11 points and the Broncs shot just 23 percent from the floor, including 7 of 28 from beyond the arc.Oklahoma State opened a 20-point first-half lead on a Bias 3-pointer with 3:21 left before the break, but UTPA scored the last eight points of the half, including treys by LaQuinta Garner and Alexandria Hill, to cut the lead to 12 at 33-21 at intermission.The Cowgirls exerted their dominance in the second half. They opened the frame with a 13-0 run to push the lead to 25 points at 46-21 and UTPA never challenged again.
GAINESVILLE, Fla. — Pat Young scored 15 points, becoming the 50th player in school history to reach 1,000 in his career, and No. 13 Florida handled Savannah State 76-34 on Sunday.Young received a standing ovation as he left the game with 5:41 remaining, waving to the crowd as his achievement was announced.Young topped the 1,000-point plateau on a putback with 7:15 to play. It came shortly after he stepped to the free throw line with a chance to join the club. Young clanged it off the front rim, drawing groans from the crowd. He made amends, though, a few minutes later.Young was one of four Florida players in double figures. Michael Frazier II had 11 points for the Gators (10-2). Casey Prather and Scottie Wilbekin chipped in 10 points each.Jyles Smith led Savannah State (2-11) with eight points and eight rebounds. The Tigers have lost nine straight.It was Florida's 22nd consecutive home win, leaving coach Billy Donovan's team two shy of the school record set in 2007.The Gators dominated from the opening tip, getting any shot they wanted against the undersized Tigers.Florida used two double-digit runs to make the game a rout, outscoring Savannah State 12-0 early and then 14-0 a few minutes later. The Tigers went 5:47 without a basket before enduring an 8:12 scoreless stretch.Florida led 34-11 at halftime and coasted from there.It had to be a somewhat different feeling for the Gators, who had eight days off after a brutal stretch that included games against Florida State, then-No. 12 Connecticut, then-No. 13 Kansas, then-No. 15 Memphis and Fresno State. It marked the first time in Donovan's 18 seasons in Gainesville that Florida played consecutive non-conference teams ranked in the top 15.The only thing worth watching in the second half was Young's countdown to 1,000.He had eight points in the first half and needed only four more to reach the milestone.Young got a layup on Florida's second possession after the break and then went nearly 10 minutes without another shot. As he stepped to the free throw line, the crowd knew what was at stake.He smiled after making the first one, which put him at 999 points, but grimaced as the second free throw came up short.No worries, though. He crashed the boards for his sixth rebound a short time later and topped 1,000 points with a tip-in. Donovan took him out at the next timeout.
LEXINGTON, Ky. — Bria Goss scored a career-high 23 points to lead No. 6 Kentucky to a 109-46 rout of Grambling State on Sunday.The Wildcats (12-1), coming off a 69-61 loss to No. 2 Duke, led from start and were never threatened. Grambling State was without coach Pat Gibbs, who was recovering from an undisclosed surgery, and dressed seven players.Kentucky set a season high for most points scored in the first half in taking a 60-19 lead. Grambling State managed seven field goals in the first half and shot 23.3 percent from the field.Kentucky scored 100 points for the fifth time this season, with four of those lopsided victories coming at home.Linnae Harper had 15 points for Kentucky and Janee Thompson scored 13, Samarie Walker and Kastine Evans added 11 each and Makayla Epps had 10.
BATON ROUGE, La. — Jeanne Kenney made 6 of 7 3-point attempts as No. 16 LSU dominated Jackson State 72-45 Monday night.Kenney tied her career-high with 22 points. Raigyne Moncrief had 13 points and Theresa Plaisance added 10 for LSU (10-2).LSU took an early lead but Jackson State (2-8) came back to tie at 12 on a layup by Ekwara Ndongo at the 11:03 mark. LSU held a 33-24 lead at the half.LSU went on a 16-3 run to start the second half to lead 48-30 with 16:34 remaining in the game. The Tigers stretched that to 62-36 with 9:16 remaining.Jackson State was led by Ndongo's 12 points and Kameron Jones with 10.LSU dominated the boards, pulling down 40 rebounds to 29 for Jackson State. LSU also made 22 of 32 free throws while Jackson State only took 11 free throws, making seven of those.
SPOKANE, Wash. — Drew Barham scored 15 points, all on 3-pointers, as short-handed No. 24 Gonzaga beat San Francisco 69-41 on Monday night.Przemek Karnowski added 11 points for Gonzaga (12-2, 2-0 West Coast), whose top three scorers are battling injuries. David Stockton and Kevin Pangos finished with 10 points each.Avry Holmes led cold-shooting San Francisco (8-6, 1-1) with 16 points. The Dons made just 25.5 percent of their shots, to 43 percent for the Zags.Gonzaga played without starting guard Gary Bell Jr., who has a broken hand, and starting forward Sam Dower, who has an injured back. The team announced Monday that Bell, third-leading scorer at 12 points per game, will miss the next four to six weeks because of the injury that occurred in Saturday's win over Santa Clara.Dower, who fell hard on his back against Kansas State, is being evaluated on a day-to-day basis. He is averaging 13.8 ppg. In addition, leading scorer Pangos is battling turf toe, but remains in the lineup.Players like Barham and Gerard Coleman have picked up the slack as five Zags scored in double figures.Gonzaga scored the first seven points of the game and the Dons had only two field goals in the first 8 minutes to fall behind 11-6. The Zags pushed the lead to 19-10 as San Francisco made just three of its first 16 shots.The Dons were held without a field goal for more than five minutes and Barham and Pangos sank consecutive 3-pointers as Gonzaga extended its lead to 27-12.Gonzaga went on a 9-2 run, including another Pangos 3, for a 36-16 lead. The Zags led 41-23 at halftime, despite shooting just 38.5 percent in the first.San Francisco shot just 27 percent in the first half, making 7 of 26 shots. The Dons sank just four field goals in the final 11 minutes of the first half, including a 3-point buzzer beater by Holmes, who had 11 points in the half.Gonzaga opened the second half with a 13-5 run, including a pair of 3-pointers by Barham, for a 54-28 lead.The Dons have dropped 25 consecutive games against Gonzaga in Spokane, dating to their last win here in 1989.San Francisco came in averaging 81.9 points per game and 51 percent shooting this season.Gonzaga is 127-8 in the McCarthey Athletic Center since it opened a decade ago.
AMES, Iowa — Brynn Williamson and Jadda Buckley scored 19 points each to help No. 14 Iowa State remain perfect with an 85-65 victory over William & Mary in the championship game of the Cyclone Challenge on Sunday.Nikki Moody added 14 points and Hallie Christofferson had 11 for the Cyclones (11-0).Kyla Kerstetter scored 12 points, and Marlena Tremba and Latrice Hunter each had 11 to lead the Pride (3-8).Iowa State used an 8-0 run to take a 10-2 lead less than 3 1/2 minutes into the game, then closed the first half with a 15-0 spurt to extend the lead to 55-23 at the break.Moody's jumper in the opening minute of the second half put the Cyclones up 34 — their largest advantage of the game. The final margin was the smallest of the second half.
LOS ANGELES — The postgame whoops and hollers from the visitors' locker room were audible through two closed doors after the Philadelphia 76ers capitalized on their final chance in 2013 to end their 13-game road losing streak.Thaddeus Young scored seven of his 25 points in the fourth quarter, Evan Turner added 22 points, and the 76ers hung on for their first road win since Nov. 1, beating the depleted Los Angeles Lakers 111-104 on Sunday night.Spencer Hawes had 19 points and eight rebounds, while Young and Michael Carter-Williams contributed big points down the stretch as the last-place Sixers held on for just their second win in 11 games overall."You keep hammering the rock, and one day it's going to split," Philadelphia coach Brett Brown said. "Tonight it split."The Lakers are a shadow of their traditional selves these days, with Pau Gasol joining Kobe Bryant and Steve Nash on the sidelines for this meeting. That didn't dampen the Sixers' enthusiasm after doubling their road win total in the second game of a back-to-back set.Philadelphia had lost 19 of 23 since its unlikely 4-2 start to the season."Wins from time to time help validate the work that everybody is putting in," Brown said. "If there's such a thing as deserving something, I think they deserved it."Philadelphia went up 104-99 with 1:44 to play on a layup by Young, who added a three-point play on the next possession.Jordan Farmar's 3-pointer with 55 seconds left cut the Sixers' lead to three points, but Shawne Williams missed an open 3-pointer that could have tied it, and Carter-Williams hit two late free throws to secure Philadelphia's second straight road win over the Lakers."It's definitely a great way to close out the year," Young said. "We've been playing hard all season long. Our record doesn't say we're going out there and doing the job, but we're working to get better every time."Nick Young scored 26 points on 6-for-21 shooting in the Lakers' fifth consecutive loss. Los Angeles also has lost five of six at Staples Center, winning just once at home since Nov. 24.Gasol missed his second straight game with a respiratory infection for the Lakers, who already were without Bryant, Nash and Steve Blake. Chris Kaman suited up despite limited movement on his injured ankle, and Jordan Hill contributed 18 points and 13 rebounds while starting at center.Los Angeles then lost swingman Xavier Henry to a strained right knee in the first quarter. Henry recently filled in at point guard while Bryant and the Lakers' top three point guards were injured."We had guys battling, but we just don't have enough right now," Lakers coach Mike D'Antoni said. "It's tough to gauge where we are because we don't quite know what we're going to get when we get out there. ... We've got to turn the corner somehow. We've got to get a couple of breaks and get some momentum going."Two days after the Lakers lost to Utah, the Western Conference's last-place team, Los Angeles lost to another one of the NBA's worst. Injuries are an undeniable factor, but the Lakers' 22 turnovers and 37-percent shooting might have been topics of general manager Mitch Kupchak's meeting with D'Antoni after the game.Jodie Meeks scored 15 points as the Lakers used their 16th starting lineup in 31 games, including seven straight games with a new starting five since Bryant broke a bone near his knee."We've just got to go out there and find ourselves again," Nick Young said. "We have to bring our energy and just have fun. We've been worrying too much out there. It's tough trying to get wins, but we have to fight. We can't fight with ourselves and be down on ourselves. This is the time we have to stay together the most. We need to be a team right now more than anything."Henry will have an MRI exam Monday. In his absence, recent D-League call-up Kendall Marshall stepped in as Farmar's backup at point guard, contributing eight points and three assists.NOTES: After the Sixers missed nine of their first 10 shots in the first quarter, the Lakers promptly missed nine of their next 10. ... Nick Young spent last season with Philadelphia, averaging 10.6 points while largely coming off the bench. He left as a free agent to join his favorite boyhood team in his native Los Angeles. ... The Lakers are one of just four Western Conference teams with a losing record at home.
The upstarts of the N.C.A.A. tournament hailed from Dunk City (Florida Gulf Coast) and unspooled Southwest Philly Floaters (LaSalle) and redefined nicknames, those mighty Shockers of Wichita State becoming known less for wheat than for, ahem, shock. All lingered as long as they could, but by April 8, night of the national championship game, the underdogs had packed up and returned to campus.Or had they?With 15 minutes 34 seconds left in the first half, a 5-foot-11, 170-pound freshman for Michigan checked in. His first 3-point shot swished through the net 35 seconds later. Then came a second. And a third. And a fourth.As the Wolverines built a double-digit lead against Louisville, fans throughout the Georgia Dome and across the nation — maybe even in the Republic of Georgia, given that his name was trending worldwide on Twitter — wondered just what in the name of Glen Rice was happening.The answer: Spike Albrecht happened. Summoned when the star guard Trey Burke lapsed into foul trouble, Albrecht delivered perhaps the most unexpected — and mesmerizing — shooting display of the college basketball season. Louisville's Luke Hancock, who countered with four 3-pointers in 1:59, matched his marksmanship, though hardly its unpredictability.In Albrecht, here was a player who had not scored in half of his 38 appearances. And when he did, he averaged less than a basket a game.Here was a player who would stroll around Ann Arbor with taller teammates and go unrecognized — like that time he told an inquiring mind that he did, in fact, play a sport at Michigan: golf.Here was a player offered only one other scholarship, by Appalachian State. During his recruitment, Michigan Coach John Beilein told Albrecht, "You're either going to get me fired or make me look like a genius."Albrecht said, "I didn't want to get him fired."Fired? Please. Albrecht accounted for 17 of Michigan's 38 first-half points, sinking 3-pointers from the corner and the wing and from five feet behind the arc. You wanted him to keep going, keep shooting, keep dazzling.In the second half, though, Michigan fizzled, and so did he. Albrecht attempted two shots and missed both. Louisville, overcoming a gruesome leg injury to Kevin Ware a week earlier, won, 82-76.Afterward, Albrecht was inconsolable. His eyes were red. He spoke softly. He did not care about what he had just done. By the morning, though, he seemed to be feeling better. He posted a message on Twitter to the supermodel Kate Upton, thanking her for attending the game and saying, "Hope to see you again."Alas, Upton never responded. But after his performance the night before, you cannot fault Albrecht for thinking he had a shot.
Eight teams remain undefeated in N.C.A.A. Division I men's college basketball, the least known of which is set to take the court Monday against Kansas.Toledo's 12-0 start would be noteworthy under most circumstances but is potentially transformative given the length and depth of the program's previous struggles.When the former coach Gene Cross resigned in March 2010 after the athletic department received a lurid letter detailing claims of a series of relationships between Cross and local women, Athletic Director Mike O'Brien concluded that Toledo's program had problems that went beyond basketball. O'Brien's coaching search focused as much on candidates' ability to change the culture as to win games.He hired Tod Kowalczyk, a little-known coach who had taken Wisconsin-Green Bay from mediocrity to chasing perennial power Butler at the top of the Horizon League. Green Bay's best freshman, Rian Pearson, followed Kowalczyk out of a goodbye meeting with his former team, hugged him and said, "I'm coming with you, Coach."Close to four years later, Pearson, Smith and Kowalczyk are set to take the court together Monday at Allen Fieldhouse. After winning 22 games in their last season at Green Bay, this is the type of game they expected a rebuilt Toledo to play in.The journey since then has proved a lesson in turning expectations into reality."It was humbling," said Pearson, a 6-foot-4 guard and a preseason All-Mid-American Conference first-team selection who is on schedule to graduate this spring. "When we came here, I had three years left, and I thought that was time for us to get the program up and running. At times, though, I did question that."The Rockets went 4-28 in Kowalczyk's first season, playing seven scholarship players as Pearson and Smith sat out under N.C.A.A. transfer rules.There were 14 players on the roster with eligibility remaining when Cross resigned; none made it to Kowalczyk's second season."Some guys wanted a fresh start," said Kowalczyk, a college basketball lifer who at 47 has already put in 14 seasons as an assistant and 12 as a Division I head coach. "There were guys who just didn't want to be committed and others that we didn't feel fit the culture of our program. Those are not easy decisions to make. Having Matt and Rian was a difference-maker for us. I would tell recruits' parents, you know if we were bad guys, those guys would not have come with us."With the transfers eligible and joined by the Mid-American rookie of the year Julius Brown at point guard, Toledo won 19 games the next season, the second-largest improvement in Division I that season after Manhattan and Nevada, who tied for the lead. Just as fans began to contemplate Toledo's first N.C.A.A. tournament bid since 1980, the program received a one-year postseason ban for failing to meet minimum academic standards during Cross's tenure. An appeal documenting marked improvement under Kowalczyk failed."It was another annoying-slash-frustrating thing," Smith said. "We had no control over what had happened years before, but we had to pay the price for it."After a 2-6 start, the Rockets tied for first place in the Mid-American West Division, a recovery that Smith sees as laying the groundwork for this year's fast start."We got a little taste of what it felt like to be successful, just a taste," said Smith, who has already completed a bachelor's degree in business management and now comes off the bench as one of the MAC's best 3-point shooters. "Now we have so much bigger expectations."Toledo's best start since 1967 has only fueled those expectations. Kowalczyk goes nine deep into his bench, blending a veteran core with two transfers and three freshmen. All five starters average double figures in points, and Brown ties it together, averaging 7.3 assists, fifth nationally, and pushing the offense to 86.3 points per game, tied with Oklahoma for ninth nationally.With their best win having come at Boston College, the Rockets are relatively untested. Beating Kansas could push Kowalczyk's team into the top 25 and provide a signature upset for a still-rebuilding program with little national profile.Brown, who will be in charge of handling 16th-ranked Kansas' pressure defense, most likely holds the key to what could turn out to be one of the biggest upsets of the nonconference college basketball season.Game and season outcomes aside, there is already satisfaction for Kowalczyk in seeing Pearson and Smith forge a legacy that shows up in practices and the classroom as much as in games."We had a lot of pain together; we had a lot of failures together," Kowalczyk said. "What makes it most interesting is they came in while we were having success at Green Bay. They weren't the reason for that success there. But when we came here, they came and helped us develop the same kind of culture we had at Green Bay. So it's very gratifying for all three of us being together as long as we have been."
IOWA CITY, Iowa — Devyn Marble had 15 points and eight rebounds and No. 22 Iowa opened its Big Ten season with a 67-57 victory over Nebraska on Tuesday night.Aaron White scored 11 of his 13 points in the first half for the Hawkeyes (12-2, 1-0), who led by as many as 20 points in the second half.Terran Petteway had 20 points for Nebraska (8-5, 0-1), which shot a season-low 29.9 percent from the field as it lost its 14th straight game to a ranked opponent.White's breakaway two-handed dunk put the Hawkeyes ahead 55-35 with 8:16 left — the biggest lead of the game.Nebraska stormed back with a 20-5 run, capped off by Petteway's 3-pointer with 1:45 left to cut the deficit to 60-55.Nebraska got the ball back after an Iowa free throw, but Deverell Biggs' pass deflected off the rim for a turnover.The Hawkeyes — who missed 17 free throws in the game — hit 7 of 10 from the line in the final 2 minutes to secure the win.Walter Pitchford scored 13 for the Cornhuskers and Biggs added 12.Iowa won despite making only one 3-pointer and being outrebounded. Nebraska put up 19 more field goal attempts than the Hawkeyes.The Hawkeyes led 30-23 after a shaky first half where they went nearly 5½ minutes without a field goal.White jolted Iowa and the fans inside Carver-Hawkeye Arena with another dunk — this time an impressive reverse slam in transition.A couple of minutes later, White made two free throws to tie the game 22-22.Then White hit a rare 3-pointer — only his third of the season — to put the Hawkeyes back in front. White score two more baskets down the stretch to help Iowa end the half on a 12-1 run.
WEST LAFAYETTE, Ind. — No. 3 Ohio State relied on a rare commodity to derail Purdue's young shooters Tuesday.LaQuinton Ross finished with 25 points and 12 rebounds, both career-highs, and Shannon Scott added a career-best 18 points to help the Buckeyes pull away for a 78-69 win at Purdue — a victory that kept Ohio State among the shrinking group of teams that will take a perfect record into 2014."I thought down the stretch our veterans were as good as they could be," Ohio State coach Thad Matta said.It's an unusual luxury for Ohio State, which has seen a regular parade of underclassmen leave early for the NBA draft. The list includes Greg Oden and Mike Conley to Jared Sullinger and Deshaun Thomas.Things are different this season. The Buckeyes have started the same two seniors and the same three juniors in all 14 games, so when things got tough in Tuesday's Big Ten opener, the older Buckeyes buckled down and came up big every time Ohio State needed a play.Ross and Scott, both juniors, combined for all of the points in a decisive 10-2 second-half run that finally gave Ohio State some breathing room. And, of course, the wily Aaron Craft continually turned Purdue miscues into game-changing moments. Craft finished with seven points, eight rebounds, 10 assists and four steals against a team came into the game with four of the Big Ten's top 10 freshman scorers, two of the league's most dangerous sophomores and a perfect 8-0 record on their home court."Ten assists and zero turnovers speaks for itself," Purdue coach Matt Painter said after losing to the Buckeyes for the fourth straight time. "He gets eight defensive rebounds, and he's able to affect the game without scoring. There are not a lot of guys who can do that today, especially when they're 6-foot-2."The combination has the Buckeyes (14-0, 1-0) rolling.Ohio State started the day as one of the nation's eight remaining unbeaten teams. It left Mackey Arena with the fifth-longest winning streak in one season in school history and the school's best start since going 24-0 in 2010-11, and the Buckeyes did that on a day they shot 44.6 percent from the field, went 4 of 22 on 3-pointers and were outrebounded 46-37.Instead, the Buckeyes dug down defensively.Yes, Purdue sophomore A.J. Hammons produced one of the most complete games of his career. He finished with a season-best 18 points, 16 rebounds and four assists, both career highs, and five blocks. Another sophomore, Ronnie Johnson, had 16 points and Johnson's older brother, Terone, finished with 13 points, nine rebounds and five assists.But the Buckeyes suddenly staunch defense still made it tough. Hammons was just 6 of 16 from the field and accounted for four of Purdue's 12 turnovers. The Boilermakers shot just 41.8 percent from the field, were 3 of 14 on 3-pointers and lost for only the second time in seven games — a telltale sign of how the Buckeyes' unflappable veterans will respond to challenges."That's something (experience) that we haven't had the luxury of having very much at Ohio State," Matta said. "I talk about it with our guys all the time, 'You've been through this before.' You know we never panicked and there's no drill that you can do in practice to give them experience."Ohio State still showed how much it has learned over the years.After a topsy-turvy first half, in which neither team led by more than four points, and with the Buckeyes' top two centers getting into foul trouble defending Hammons, Ohio State managed to find a way out.It made a concerted effort early in the second half to push the ball inside, extending a 34-33 halftime to 44-39. Forty-five seconds later, Terone Johnson tied the score with a 3. Hammons tied it again at 46 on a tip-in with 13:57 left.Then the Buckeyes veterans took over.After using a 6-0 run to finally take a 52-46 lead with 10:35 to go, Scott and Ross went on a personal scoring spree. Each of the juniors scored five points in the decisive 10-2 spurt that pushed the lead to 65-53 with 6:17 remaining — and this time, it was too much for Purdue to overcome. The Boilermakers couldn't get closer than five the rest of the way."That might be one of his best games," Matta said when asked about Craft's performance. "I mean, what do you say? His poise, he had great reads on penetration."
AMES, Iowa — DeAndre Kane had 16 points, 12 rebounds and eight assists and No. 13 Iowa State blew past Northern Illinois 99-63 on Tuesday night for its 12th straight win.Melvin Ejim and Naz Long had 17 points each for the Cyclones (12-0), who rolled past the Huskies just hours after learning of the death of longtime former coach Johnny Orr.Orr, who was 86, spent 29 years as a Division I coach, with current Cyclones coach Fred Hoiberg among his many star players. Orr won a school-record 218 games at Iowa State from 1980-94.Dontel Highsmith had 19 points for Northern Illinois, (5-6), which had its two-game winning streak snapped.It was a rough day for Hoiberg, who grew up in Ames idolizing Orr and later starred for Iowa State at the tail end of Orr's illustrious career.The Cyclones made sure their grieving coach never had to worry about the outcome.They did it in a way that would have made Orr proud.Orr's Iowa State teams were synonymous with the fast break, and the Cyclones ran the Huskies out of the gym in the first half.Iowa State was ahead 28-10 less than 8 minutes in, and Northern Illinois never got within single digits again. The Cyclones set a season high for first-half points on an alley-oop pass from Kane to Ejim that gave them a 55-34 lead.Kane could have easily posted the fifth triple-double in school history. But Hoiberg pulled him midway through the second half with the game well in hand.Georges Niang had 14 points and Monte Morris and Dustin Hogue had 11 each for Iowa State, which shot 58.7 percent from the field.Tuesday night's matchup against the lowly Huskies was supposed to be a coronation of the best non-conference run in recent memory for Iowa State.It instead became a side note to a celebration of Orr's career.The Cyclones shined a single spotlight on the banner honoring Orr in the rafters. Their players entered the arena in T-shirts emblazoned with "JO" above the right shoulder, and fans left flowers at the foot of a statue of Orr inside the Hilton Coliseum concourse.A sellout out crowd — which was nearly unheard of in Ames before Orr breathed life into a once-dormant program in the early 1980s — stood for a video tribute and a moment of silence for Orr before tipoff.Orr's last trip to Hilton Coliseum came last month, when he was introduced to a standing ovation before Iowa State's game against Michigan.Orr is also the winningest coach in Michigan history, winning 209 games in Ann Arbor before leaving for Ames.
DES MOINES, Iowa — Johnny Orr, the fist-pumping basketball coach who led Michigan to the national title game and Iowa State into national prominence, has died. He was 86.His death was confirmed Tuesday by Iowa State, where Orr led the Cyclones to a school-record 218 wins from 1980 until 1994.Orr spent 29 seasons as a Division I coach. Twelve were at Michigan, where he guided the Wolverines to four NCAA tournament berths, the national title game in 1976 and 209 wins, the most in the school history.Orr also spent three seasons at Massachusetts. The energetic and charismatic Orr finished with a career record of 466-346 and 10 NCAA tournament appearances."He was my hero," said Iowa State coach Fred Hoiberg, who grew up in Ames and played for three years under Orr.Orr left UMass for Michigan and spent one season as an assistant before taking over as head coach in 1968.Orr was twice named the Big Ten's coach of the year. In 1976, Orr was honored by the National Association of Basketball Coaches (NABC) as its national coach of the year, and the Wolverines won the league title the following season."The Michigan basketball program is saddened by the passing of Johnny Orr today," Michigan coach John Beilein said. "Johnny was a tremendous person and basketball coach. We will always value the many positives he brought to both the University of Michigan and college basketball in general."Orr made the jump to Iowa State, then a struggling program, before the 1980-81 season and guided the program to its first NCAA tournament berth in 41 years in 1985.A year later, Orr led the Cyclones in the Sweet Sixteen by beating Michigan. Iowa State would go on to reach the NCAA tournament four more times under Orr, whose up-tempo style and outgoing personality is viewed as the catalyst for the program's fervent following.Orr would enter Hilton Coliseum to the "Tonight Show" theme and a trademark fist pump, helping cultivate a tremendous home-court advantage for the Cyclones.Iowa State honored Orr with a video tribute and a moment of silence Tuesday night before its home game against Northern Illinois."He's one of the greatest guys I ever coached against. One of the funniest guys, one of the most sincere guys. He cared about people," said North Carolina coach Roy Williams, who was at Kansas during Orr's tenure in Ames. "He brought an excitement to Ames that wasn't there before. I loved him. He was a great mentor to me, a great friend."Iowa State beat 20 ranked opponents at home under Orr, who was honored with a statue inside the arena in 2011. Orr coached 18 players who went on to the NBA, including Hoiberg and Phoenix Suns coach Jeff Hornacek."As a kid, just to see him walk out of that tunnel was what you waited for on game nights. Just to see his enthusiasm and passion. He was a father figure to so many of us. He impacted so many lives and made all of us better people. Not only was he a great basketball coach, he was even a better person," Hoiberg said.Orr, who was born in Taylorville, Ill., is survived by his wife, Romie, and daughters Jennifer, Leslie and Rebecca.
STATE COLLEGE, Pa. — Branden Dawson scored 20 points and Keith Appling had 14 to help No. 5 Michigan State beat Penn State 79-63 on Tuesday night.Gary Harris added 13 points and Travis Tice had 12 for the Spartans (12-1, 1-0) in the Big Ten opener for both teams. Dawson led a second-half charge to help the Spartans rally from a halftime deficit and win their fifth straight game.The Spartans were in total control in the second half, and hit 10 of 20 3-pointers overall to turn this one into a rout.Brandon Taylor had 18 points for the Nittany Lions (9-5, 0-1) and D.J. Newbill scored 17. Newbill had three 3s and 14 points in the first half to keep the upset bid alive. But a second-half shooting funk for the Nittany Lions cost them against the preseason conference favorite.The Spartans needed Harris to drive the offense and squash Penn State's surprising seven-point halftime lead.Harris, the preseason Big Ten player of the year, scored five quick points to open the second half and put the Spartans ahead. But he went to the bench with his third foul only 3½ minutes into the half, leaving the Spartans without their second-leading scorer for a spell.It didn't matter who was in the game for the Spartans, the Nittany Lions kept making 3s as if they were layups. Tim Frazier tied it at 52-all on Penn State's eighth 3 (on 14 attempts) — a stout number after the team missed nine of 11 attempts in the last game against Mount St. Mary's.Appling, though, sparked Michigan State's long-range game with consecutive 3s for a seven-point lead. Dawson got the job done inside, scoring eight straight points on three layups and two free throws, for a 68-55 lead, all but ending Penn State's upset hopes.The Nittany Lions went cold from outside, and Michigan State used 3s and second-chance points off a whopping rebounding edge (45-26).Michigan State coach Tom Izzo tied Indiana's Branch McCracken for fifth place on the Big Ten career wins list with 210.Penn State had its best non-conference record in five seasons and played for 20 minutes like a team capable of kicking off conference play with a shocker.The Nittany Lions made their 36-percent 3-point shooting number worthless in the first half, hitting one after another to race to a 12-point lead.Newbill made a 3, then followed with a four-point play on the next possession for a 17-9 lead. Taylor hit consecutive 3s for a 25-14 lead that had a small, yet wildly enthusiastic, crowd on their feet.Michigan State appeared to establish its dominance with a 12-0 run to take the lead until Penn State got hot again from 3-point range. Donovan Jack hit PSU's sixth 3 of the half for a 32-29 lead and Newbill's third 3 of the half helped the Nittany Lions take a 47-40 lead.The Nittany Lions connected on seven of 12 3-pointers in the half.Both programs had bigger concerns than the Big 10 opener: No. 4 Michigan State was in Pasadena, Calif., prepping for No. 5 Stanford in the Rose Bowl and the Nittany Lions are in limbo as Bill O'Brien decides if he wants to stay loyal to his team or bolt for the NFL.
CHAPEL HILL, N.C. — James Michael McAdoo had 23 points and 10 rebounds and No. 19 North Carolina beat UNC Wilmington 84-51 on Tuesday to become the third program to reach 2,100 victories.Marcus Paige scored 12 of his 15 points in the second half to help the Tar Heels (10-3) shake free from a slow start and blow open the game. North Carolina shot 63 percent in the second half to turn its final nonconference game into a rout.The Tar Heels joined Kentucky and Kansas as the only programs with 2,100 victories heading into Sunday's Atlantic Coast Conference opener at Wake Forest.Cedrick Williams had 18 points and nine rebounds for the Seahawks (6-9), coached by former UNC player Buzz Peterson. UNCW lost its fourth straight game and fell to 1-24 against ranked opponents heading into its Colonial Athletic Association opener against James Madison.
GREENBURGH, N.Y. — When Carmelo Anthony sprained his left ankle against the Orlando Magic on Dec. 23, he retreated to the locker room to have it taped. He wanted to return to the game, he said. Then he realized there was no way that would happen."It was worse than I thought," Anthony said Monday afternoon at the team's practice facility here.Speaking with the news media for the first time since the Orlando game, Anthony said he was optimistic about playing Thursday against the San Antonio Spurs, the start of a crucial three-game swing through Texas. The Knicks, at 9-21, appear to be on the brink of collapse, having lost three straight without Anthony.Coach Mike Woodson said Anthony did some light shooting at Monday's practice. Anthony said he also jogged, adding that he was feeling better."There's still some swelling," he said. "There's still some tenderness. But eventually I'll have to play with a little bit of tenderness and a little bit of pain."The team's most recent stretch of futility featured back-to-back losses to the Toronto Raptors, who secured their lead atop the Atlantic Division with a losing record. It was a missed opportunity for the Knicks, who trailed by as many as 21 points in Saturday's 115-100 loss. Anthony did not make the trip to Toronto."That was when the swelling came back, so they didn't want to take that risk of getting on the plane, getting in late, not playing — it would've been a wasted trip," he said. "It was tough. These were two games that I know I was looking forward to, and knowing the significance of them and knowing we had a chance to make up ground. So it was definitely disappointing, sitting back and watching."Anthony, who is averaging a team-leading 26.3 points per game, again questioned the team's effort — a theme in recent weeks. The Knicks' two games against the Raptors were preceded by a pep talk from James L. Dolan, the team's owner, who assured the team that no personnel changes were forthcoming. It did little good.Anthony said he never envisioned that the Knicks would enter the new year 12 games under .500."We can't be crying about it," he said. "We have to find a solution."At the same time, Anthony reiterated that Woodson had the support of the team."Coach Woodson is a strong person, a strong-willed person," Anthony said. "His message is definitely getting through to people, especially through to me and the guys who have been here and understand the situation."He added: "It's so easy to just fold in this moment right now. So his message is very, very clear throughout this locker room."In their three games without Anthony last week, the Knicks lost by an average of 18.7 points.In other Knicks news, Woodson continued to describe point guards Raymond Felton and Pablo Prigioni as day to day with their injuries, and declined to offer a timetable for either player's return. Neither Felton (groin) nor Prigioni (toe) participated in practice, though the Knicks posted a photo of Felton taking jumpers on the team's Twitter account."Raymond and Pablo are getting treatment," Woodson said, adding, "Until they tell me they're ready to suit up and play, I just got to get these other guys ready to play."
SYRACUSE, N.Y. — Syracuse coach Jim Boeheim said he was worried about facing a team coached by one of his former assistants and that employs his signature zone defense. Jerami Grant helped ease those nerves in a hurry.Making his first start of the season and 10th of his career, the sophomore forward scored 11 points in the first 7 minutes as the No. 2 Orange built an early 20-point lead and beat Eastern Michigan 70-48 on Tuesday in the final nonconference game for both teams.It was a far cry from Saturday, when Syracuse trailed then-No. 8 Villanova 25-7 before rallying for a 78-62 victory."We just wanted to come out and be aggressive," said Grant, who started in place of injured Dajuan Coleman and finished with 15 points. "We didn't want to let them get to a big lead like we did against Villanova. We just came out aggressive, but we kind of let up after that."Syracuse (13-0), one of seven unbeaten teams in Division I, has won 51 straight nonconference games in the Carrier Dome and begins its first season of play in the Atlantic Coast Conference at home against Miami on Saturday."We really have come through this first 13 games as well as you could ever hope for," Boeheim said. "We played some really good teams. It's ironic the one game we could have lost was St. Francis. We've put ourselves in the best position we could possibly put ourselves in."Rakeem Christmas matched his career high with 15 points, C.J. Fair finished with 13 points and eight rebounds, and Trevor Cooney had 10 points for the Orange. Freshman point guard Tyler Ennis, second nationally in assist to turnover ratio (4.69), matched his season high with nine assists to go with two turnovers and pulled down five rebounds but did not score.Glenn Bryant led Eastern Michigan (7-5) with 19 points and eight rebounds and Raven Lee had 12 points. Leading scorer Karrington Ward had five points, 10 below his average, on 2-of-10 shooting. Former Syracuse center Da'Shonte Riley, a 7-footer, was a nonfactor, failing to score or snare a rebound in 15 minutes of play.The Orange put together a 19-4 spurt as the Eagles sputtered mightily, making just 3 of their first 16 shots and committing eight turnovers in the opening 12 minutes.After Darell Combs hit a 3 to pull Eastern Michigan to 11-6, Cooney started the Syracuse run with a 3 from the left wing and Fair and Grant followed with dunks to give Syracuse an 18-6 lead at 13:28.Christmas converted a lay-in to complete a pretty passing play under the basket with Ennis and Tyler Roberson and boost the Orange lead to 30-10 at 7:33."I knew with Jerami starting it makes them better offensively," Eastern Michigan coach Rob Murphy said. "He was able to get into the high post and create some havoc. When we figured that out, it was a game."The Orange got sloppy after their spurt, committing five turnovers, Christmas was called for two fouls, and Ennis missed the front end of a 1-and-1 as the Eagles clawed back with a 15-6 surge keyed by two three-point plays from Bryant."The first four minutes determined a lot," Bryant said. "We came out kind of sluggish and were down so much. We just talked to each other, said we had to bring more energy, consistency, and we were able to fight and get back into the game."In the final 80 seconds of the period, Fair and Christmas missed dunks and Grant was called for goaltending. A pair of free throws by Mike Talley with 1.7 seconds left narrowed the Orange's lead to 36-27 at the break.EMU moved within 36-30 in the first minute of the second half when Talley drained a 3-pointer from the wing, but Christmas responded with a putback, Fair sank two free throws, and Cooney hit his second 3 of the game to give the Orange a 12-point lead less than 4 minutes in.After Lee's 3-pointer closed the gap to 44-37 at 15:53, Syracuse responded with a 14-2 run to clinch it. Christmas's putback capped it at 7:46 and gave the Orange a 58-39 edge.Syracuse committed 13 turnovers, finished 3 of 14 from long range, Fair missing all five he attempted, and misfired on 10 of 25 free throws."We started to play at a very high level," Boeheim said. "We played at a very low level the rest of the game. It's something to think about. I think we felt we had the game under control and offensively settled a little bit. They made a couple of good offensive plays. We had a really bad stretch at the end of the first half, made some turnovers we don't usually make."Coleman, who has a contusion in his left leg, watched the game dressed in sweats on the Syracuse bench. He's been receiving treatment for the injury and Boeheim called the injury day-to-day.
